


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 1: 


In the heavenly Buddha, there is a famous three-story laughing stock. 


According to legend, eight hundred years ago, the land of the Central 
Plains had an ancient country called Xianleguo. 


The ancient country of Xianle, the land is big, the folk and the music. 
State-owned four treasures: beauty such as clouds, color music chapter, 
gold jewelry. And a famous Prince Edward. 


This is what the Prince of the Prince said, it is a strange man. 


Wang and later regarded him as a jewel in the palm of his hand. He loved 
it and often said with pride: "My child will be Ming Jun in the future. 


However, for the worldly kingship, the Prince is completely uninterested. 
He is interested, using what he often said to himself, that 1s -- 
"I want to save the people!" 


When the Prince was a child, he practiced one heart and practiced. On the 
way to practice, there were two small stories that were widely circulated. 


The first story happened when he was seventeen. 

That year, Xianleguo held a grand Shangyuan Festival tour. 

Although this traditional sacred thing has been abandoned for hundreds of 
years, it is still possible to learn from the surviving ancient books and the 
former population that it is a grand event. 


Shangyuan Festival, Shenwu Street. 


On both sides of the street, there are many people. The princes and nobles 
talked and laughed on the high-rise buildings; the royal warriors swayed in 


the armor; the girls danced, the white hands sprinkled with the rain, and 
the people and the flowers were more beautiful; the melodious music 
came from the golden car. Floating over the Imperial City. At the end of 
the honor guard, sixteen golden horses and white horses pulled a Chinese 
platform in parallel. 


On top of this high Huatai, there is a lot of pleasing martial arts. 


During the festival tour, the Yueshen warrior will wear a golden mask, 
dressed in a Chinese costume, holding a sword, and playing the first **** 
of the millennium, the **** of the martial arts. 


Once selected as a pleasing god, it is the supreme glory, so the selection 
criteria are extremely strict. The one chosen this year is His Royal 
Highness Prince. The whole country believes that he will complete the 
most exciting Yuewu in history. 


However, on that day, there was an accident. 


When the guard of honor circled the third circle of the city, it passed a wall 
of more than ten feet high. 


At that time, the Wushen on Huatai was about to kill the demon sword. 


This is the most exciting scene. The sides of the street are boiling, and the 
walls are raging. People are rushing to probe, struggling and pushing. 


At this time, a child fell from the tower. 


Screaming all day long. Just when people thought that the child was about 
to splatter Shenwu Street, the Prince raised his head slightly and jumped 
and caught him. 


People only had time to see a bird-like white shadow flying up the sky, and 
the Prince had already landed with the child. The golden mask fell, 


revealing the young and beautiful face behind the mask. 


The next moment, everyone cheered. 


The people are elated, but the national teachers of the Royal Dojo have a 
headache. 


I never imagined such a big mistake. 
Ominous, too ominous! 


Every round of Huatai’s tour around the Imperial City symbolizes the 
national security of the country for the year. Now it’s not a disaster! 


The teachers of the country were so mad that they thought about it, and 
after they thought about it, please come to the Prince and euphemistically 
say, can you be down for a month to show your regret? You don't have to 
face the wall, just have a look. 


The prince smiled and said: "No." 


He said this: "It is not a bad thing to save people. How can God condemn 
me because I did the right thing?" 


Uh... if you sin in the first place? 

"So God is wrong, why should you apologize to the wrong?" 
The national teachers are speechless. 

This Royal Highness is such a person. 


He has never encountered anything he can't do, and he has never met 
someone who doesn't love him. He is the right way in the world, he is the 
center of the world. 


Therefore, although the national teachers are very painful: "You know a 
fart!" 


But I don’t say much, I don’t dare to say more. Anyway, His Royal 
Highness will not listen. 


The second story also happened when the Prince was seventeen years old. 


Legend has it that there is a bridge in the south of the Yellow River called 
Yi Nian Bridge. There is a ghost on this bridge for many years. 


This ghost is very horrible: wearing a residual armor, a foot in the fire, all 
over the body of blood and sharp arrows, leaving a trail of blood and fire 
behind each step. Every few years, it will suddenly appear at night, 
wandering around the bridge, and stop the pedestrians asking three 
questions: "Where is this?" "Who is this?" "Why ts it?" 


If you don't answer the question correctly, you will be swallowed up by the 
ghost. However, no one knows what the correct answer is, so in a few 
years, this ghost has swallowed countless pedestrians. 


On the way to the Prince's Cloud Tour, I heard about this, found a bridge, 
stayed at the bridge at night, and finally met the ghost of the night. 


The ghost appeared, and it was as horrible as the rumor. It asked the first 
question of the Prince. The Prince smiled and replied: "This is the world." 


The ghost said: "There is no room." 
Opening the door, the first question is wrong. 


The Prince thought, anyway, the three questions are all wrong, why wait 
for you to ask? Then he lit up the weapon and started to fight. 


This battle was stunned. The martial arts of the prince is high and strong, 
and the ghost 1s even more brave. One person and one ghost fight on the 
bridge almost every day, and finally, the ghost finally lost. 


After the ghost disappeared, the Prince planted a flower tree at the bridge. 
At this time, a Taoist passing by, just saw him throwing a loess here, 
sending him a line and asking: "What is this?" 


The prince said the famous eight words: "Being in the air, the heart is in 
Taoyuan." 


The Taoist listened, smiled a little, turned into a **** who was wearing a 
white armor, stepping on the clouds, pulling the wind, and going by the 


sky. The Prince only knew that it happened to happen to the Emperor Wu 
of the Emperor who came to the devil to descend the demon. 


The gods of the gods noticed this very good Yue Shenwu when he jumped 
on the Yuan Festival. After seeing the bridge at the beginning of this, there 
was a fairy saying to the emperor: "What do you think of this Prince?" 


The emperor also answered eight words: "This child will not be limited in 
the future." 


That night, the natural vision above the palace, the storm. 
In the lightning and thunder, His Royal Highness rose. 


But when someone rises, the heavens will be shocked. The Prince's Temple 
was soaring, and the whole heaven was shaken three times. 


It’s too hard and too difficult to make a positive result. 


To be talented, to cultivate, to have a chance. The birth of a **** is often a 
long road. 


When I was a teenager, I was not able to feather the celestial celestial 
beings. I was exhausted for a lifetime and I hoped that there would be a lot 
of people robbing. Even if I waited for the catastrophe, I would die if I 
couldn’t pass this. As the number of the rivers of the Ganges, it is the 
ignorant mortal who can never find his own path in his life. 


The Highness of the Prince is undoubtedly the darling of heaven. What he 
wanted was not available; what he wanted to do was not impossible; he 
wanted to fly to God, and he really rose to God at the age of seventeen. 


He was originally the intention of the people, plus the king and the post- 
thinking son, ordered him to vigorously cultivate temples and temples in 
various places, open cave statues, and worship the people. The more 
believers there are, the more the courts are, the longer the longevity 1s. As 
a result, the Prince of the Palace of Xianle Palace had no scenery in just a 
few years, and it reached its peak at the peak. 


- Until three years later, Xianle was in chaos. 


The cause of the chaos is the tyrant of the kingdom of government | 
politics, the rebels from the righteousness. However, although the world 
has been in full swing, the gods of the heavens are not free to intervene. 
Unless it is a violation of the demon and the ghost, what should happen? 
Imagine that there are disputes everywhere. Everyone feels that they are 
reasonable. If anyone goes up, today, you will help your country to support 
you. Tomorrow, he will help his descendants to revenge. If you don’t 
move, you will fight with the gods, and the sun and the moon will be dull. 
Like the case of His Royal Highness Prince, it is even more necessary to 
avoid suspicion. 


But he doesn't care. He said to the emperor: "I want to save the people." 


The emperor sat with thousands of gods, but he did not dare to hang these 
words all day long. Hearing what he said, the mood can be imagined. But 
he can't help him, saying: "You can't save everyone." 


Prince Edward: "I can." 
Therefore, he turned his back on the ground. 


The people of Xianle are naturally celebrating the whole country. 
However, folk stories from the past and the present have long tried to 
explain to people the truth: the gods are privately separated, and there is 
absolutely no good result. 


As aresult, the war did not calm down, but burned even more crazy. 


Nor does it mean that His Royal Highness did not work hard, but he might 
as well not work hard. The harder he worked, the more the battle was in a 
mess. The Xianle people were beaten and bloodshed, and the casualties 
were heavy. Finally, a plague swept the entire imperial city, and the rebels 
entered the palace, and the war ended. 


If Xianle was still lingering, then His Royal Highness directly let it break. 


After the country was destroyed, people finally found one thing: 


It turned out that they were regarded as the princes of the gods, and they 
were not as perfect and powerful as they thought. 


To say that it’s hard to hear, isn’t it a waste that is not enough to make a 
mistake? ! 


The pain of losing their homes and their families was nowhere to be 
vented, and the people who were full of pain rushed into the temple of the 
Prince, and they overthrew the statue and burned the temple. 


Eight thousand palace views, burned for seven days and seven nights, 
burned dry and clean. 


Since then, a martial **** who guards the peace has disappeared, and a 
* Of sorrow has been born. 


People say that you are God, you are God, saying that you are jealous, you 
are jealous, saying what you are, what you have. This is the case. 


His Royal Highness Prince will not accept this fact anyway. What he is 
even more unacceptable is the punishment he wants to accept: Hey. 


Blocking mana, killing the world. 


He grew up in a thousand pets and has never suffered from human 
suffering. And this punishment made him fall from the clouds to the mud. 
In this mud, he first experienced the hunger, poverty, and dirty taste. For 
the first time, I never thought about what would be done by him in this 
life: stealing, robbery, swearing, and self-defeating. Lost face, no self- 
respect, how ugly and ugly, even the most loyal attendants can not accept 
his change, chose to leave. 


The eight characters of "Being in the infinite, heart in Taoyuan" are all 
engraved on the various stone tablets of Xianle. If they were not burnt out 
after the war, let His Royal Highness see it again. It is estimated that he is 
the first. I rushed to the ground. 


The person who said this sentence has personally proved that when he is in 
the middle of his life, he can’t be in the heart of Taoyuan. 


He climbed the sky and fell faster. Shenwu Road is a stunned glimpse. It 
seems to be yesterday's business. But the heavens have been smashing for 
a while, and the past has passed. 


Until many years, on a certain day, the sky rang loudly. His Royal 
Highness, the second time, soared. 


Throughout the ages, the shackled priests are not stunned, they are 
breaking into the ghost world, and there are not a few who can be turned 
down after being beaten. The second flight, deservedly, was vigorous. 


More vigorously, after he ascended, he rushed into the heavens, punched 
and kicked, and killed the Quartet. So, he only flew a scent and was beaten 
again. 


A musk. It can be said that it is the fastest and shortest flight in history. 


If it is said that the first soaring is a beautiful talk, this second soaring is a 
farce. 


Two times down, the heavens are full of disgusting feelings about this 
Prince. Aside from the disappointment, there 1s still some vigilance. After 
all, if you are killed once, you have to die and you have to be killed twice. 
Would you not want to revenge the sin? 


Who knows, after this beggar, he did not enter the devil, but also quite 
honestly adapt to life. No problem at all, the only problem 1s... it’s too 
serious. 


Sometimes, he sells art on the streets, and he is very proficient in blowing 
and playing. He even has a big stone in his chest. Although he heard that 
the Prince’s Highness can be sing and dance, he is versatile, but he actually 
saw it in this way. People are in a complicated mood. Sometimes, he is 
diligently collecting and breaking. 


The gods of the gods were shocked. 


This is the end of the matter, incredible. So that now, if you say "you have 
a son who is a Prince of Xianle", it is much more vicious than the other 


party. 


He was also a prince of the Prince of the Golden Branch, and he was the 
priest of the Xianban. He was mixed to this point, and no one was there. 
The so-called three-story laughing stock is such a thing. 


After laughing, there may be some affectionate feelings that may sigh: the 
arrogant son of the sky that was above the heights has completely 
disappeared. 


The gods collapsed, and the country was destroyed. A believer did not stay 
and was gradually forgotten by the world. So, no one knows where he 
wandered there. 


It’s a shame to be defamed once. Being smashed twice, no one can get up 
again. 


After many years, suddenly one day, the sky was a loud noise. 
The sky is falling apart, and the ground is shaking. 


The long light shudders, the fire dances wildly, and the priests are 
awakened from their own golden temples. They rushed to ask: Which 
newcomer is flying up? It’s really a big battle! 


Who knows, the forefoot only sighed, and it was impossible to see it. After 
the hind legs, the Buddha of Heaven was smashed. 


You are finished! 


The famous miracle, the three worlds laughing, the legendary Prince 
Edward, he and his - **** and soaring! 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 2: Tattered 
immortal Sanden Xianjing 


"Congratulations, Your Royal Highness." 


Hearing words, thanking him for raising his head, he said without a word, 
"Thank you. But can you ask me what congratulations?" 


Lingwen Zhenjun held his hand and said: "Congratulations, you have won 
the first place in the list of the priests who are most eager to take their 
virginity." 


Thanks to the pity: "In any case, it is always the first. But I think since you 
congratulate me, it should be a good thing?" 


Lingwen said: "Yes. This list is the first, you can get 100 merits." 


Xie pity immediately said: "If there is such a list next time, please be sure 
to pick me up again." 


Lingwen said: "Do you know who the second is?" 


Thanks for thinking, said: "It's too hard to guess. After all, if you talk 
about strength, I should be able to take the top three." 


Lingwen said: "It's almost there. There is no second place. You can't get 
away with it." 


Thanks to pity: "This is really not dare to be. Who 1s the first person in the 
previous one?" 


Ling Wendao: "None. Because this list is from this year, exactly, it is only 
from today." 


"Oh," thanked me for a moment, "That said, this will not be a list for me." 


Lingwen said: "You can also think that just because you just caught up, it 
just happened to win." 


Thanks and smiles: "Well, I will be more happy if I think so." 
Lingwen continued: "Do you know why you won the championship?" 
Thanks to the pity: "All expectations are returned." 

Lingwen said: "Let me tell you why. Look at that clock." 


She lifted her finger and thanked her for looking back. She saw a beautiful 
view of the white jade palace, pavilions, fairy clouds, and flying birds. 


But he looked at it for a long time and asked: "Are you pointing the wrong 
direction? Where is the clock?" 


Lingwen said: "No mistakes. Is there, have you seen it?" 
Thanks and pity carefully, as the truth said: "I didn't see it." 


Lingwen said: "It’s right to see it. There was a clock there, but when you 
ascended, it shocked it." 


"The clock is bigger than your age, but it is a lively and lively temper, but 
when someone is soaring, it will ring a few times. You will be as crazy as 
you are on the day of the flight, you can’t stop it, and finally you will be 
from the bell tower. It fell off, and it stopped. It fell and fell on a passing 
official." 


Thanks for the pity: "This... is it better now?" 
Lingwen: "No good, still repairing." 


Thanks: "I am talking about the priest who was taken." 


Lingwen said: "There is a martial art. It is split into two halves on the spot. 
Come back. Look at the golden temple over there. Have you seen it?" 


She also pointed out that she was grateful and hopeful, and looked at the 
golden dome of the glass in the misty clouds. "Oh, I saw it this time." 


Lingwen said: "It’s not right to see it. There is nothing here." 


"When you are flying, the golden temples of some of the priests are 
dumped, the glazed tiles are broken, and some of them are not repaired for 
a while. Then they have to make a few new make-ups." 


"Responsibility is in me?" 
"The responsibility is with you." 


"Oh..." thanked him for confirming, "I just offended many of my priests 
when I first came up?" 


Lingwen said: "If you can recover, maybe not." 

"So how can I save it?" 

"Good to say. Eighty-eight thousand eighty-eight virtues." 
Thanks and smiled. 

Ling Wendao: "Of course, I know that you can't get one tenth." 


Thanks for being honest and honest: "How to say it, although I am very 
embarrassed, but you are going to be one in ten thousand, I can't get it." 


The faith of the mortal believers is the power of the priests, and each of 
their incense and offerings 1s called "goodness." 


After the laughter was over, thanked and asked seriously: "Would you like 
to kick me off from here and give me 8.88 million merits." 


Lingwen said: "I am a god. You want to play and you should find a 
Valkyrie. Play more heavily and give more." 


Long sigh, thank you: "Let me think about it again." 


Ling Wen patted him on the shoulder and said: "Mo Pan, there must be a 
road to the mountain." 


Thanks for the pity: "I am, the ship is sinking to the bridge." 


If it was the most prosperous period of the Xianle Palace eight hundred 
years ago, the difficulty of the 8.88 million merits, the imperial edict of 
the Prince will not blink. But nowadays, in the past, his prince’s palace 
view has long been burned. No believers, no incense, no offerings. 


Needless to say. Anyway, no, no, nothing! 


A man squatted on the side of Xianjing Street for a long time, he suddenly 
remembered, he flew for three days, and did not enter the psychic array of 
heaven, only to forget what the password 1s. 


The priests of the heavenly courts have jointly set up a set of methods, 
which can make the gods know how to pass the sounds in the array, and 
must go in after the ascent. But you need to know the password, and God 
can find a specific psychic array. Thanks to the last time it was eight 
hundred years ago, I didn’t remember what the password was. He went out 
and searched it. He looked at it and looked like a bit, and went in. As soon 
as he entered the battlefield, he was rushed by all directions. 


"Open the bet to buy a hand, to gamble this time our Prince Edward can 
last for a long time before going on!!" 


"I bet for a year!" 


"One year is too long. It was only a scent last time. This is three days. 
Three days and three days!" 


"Don't be stupid! Three days are coming, can't you do it?!" 


... thank you for quietly retreating. 
wrong. Certainly not this. 


In the heavenly court, they are all the big priests who sit on the side of the 
town. Everyone knows the daily affairs of the family. Moreover, because 
they are all heavenly officials who are ascending to the sky, their self- 
sustaining identities are usually more reserved, and their speeches often 
carry a shelf. Only when he was soaring for the first time, because he was 
too excited, he grabbed every priest in the psychic array and said hello, 
and he introduced himself from head to toe in a serious and incomparably 
detailed manner. 


After he quit, he was again chasing and chasing one. Going in this time, 
thank you for your pity, and said: "So quiet, most of it is this." 


At this time, I only listened to one voice and said softly: "This is the return 
of His Royal Highness?" 


This voice is very comfortable, the voice is soft, and the tone is gentle. If 
you can listen carefully, you will find that the scorpion is very cold, and 
the mood is very cold. It makes the gentleness seem a little unfriendly. 


Thanks to pity, I just wanted to enter the battlefield according to the rules. 
It’s good to lurk in silence, but since people have already talked to him, 
they can’t be dumb. Moreover, there is still a **** officer in the heavenly 
court who is willing to take the initiative to talk to him. He is still very 
happy. So he quickly replied: "Yes! Hello everyone, I am back." 


Where did he know that after this question and answer, all the priests who 
were in the psychic circle at the moment had all erected their ears. 


The priest was slow and succinct: "This is the great squad of His Royal 
Highness." 


In the heavenly court, it can be said that the emperor will go all the way, 
the hero hero is like a stream of water. 


To become a god, you must first become an adult. People who have made 
great contributions to the world or who have great talents have a greater 
chance of flying. Therefore, it is no exaggeration to say that the king of the 
emperor, the emperor of the emperor, is not a rarity here. Who is not the 
pride of the sky? Everyone is polite and polite, and then they will scream 
under the Highness, the generals, and the lords. How to compliment them. 
But the two official sentences of this priest are not so good. 


Although he was the next Prince of the Prince, and the right one of the 
Prince, he did not feel that he was half-homished. Instead, he was like a 
pin-up. There are several other priests in the Psychic Array who are also 
the true Prince of the Prince. They are so shouted by his voice that they are 
screaming behind and unhappy. Xie Pity has heard that the other party is 
not good, but I don't want to compete. I thought I ran and smiled. "It's 
okay." The priest did not give him a chance to run, not cold or hot: "His 
Royal Highness?" It’s okay. However, my luck is not good.” 


Suddenly, thank you for hearing a secret message from the spiritual side. 
She only said one word: "Clock." 

Thank you for your understanding. 

It turned out that this is the **** of war that has been smashed! 

In this case, it is not unreasonable that people are angry. Thankfulness has 
always been very good at apologizing, and immediately said: "I heard 
about the clock, I am really sorry, I can't help it." 

The other party snorted and couldn’t say anything. 

There are many prominent gods in the heavens, many of them are upstarts 
after the blessing. Listening to the sound, thank you for not knowing which 
one is this. You can't even apologize for not knowing the name of the 


family. So he asked another question: "What do you call you?" 


The words came out and the opposite was silent. 


Not only was the opposite silence, the entire psychic array was solidified, 
and a dead air came. 


The Lingwen also gave him a voice: "His Royal Highness, although I think 
you should not say it for a long time, but I still want to remind you. That is 
mysterious." 


Thanks for your pity: "Xuanzhen?" 


He had a card, and this was reflected. He was sent back with a slight 
shock: "Is this a love?" 


General Xuanzhen is the Wushen who sits in the southwest of the town. He 
sits on the seven thousand palaces and is famous in the world. 


The Xuan Zhen general, whose real name is Mu Qing, was a deputy who 
was standing under the seat of the Prince of the Palace in Xianle Palace 
eight hundred years ago. 


The spirit is also shocked: "You don't really recognize it." 


Thanks: "I really didn't recognize it. He used to talk to me. It wasn't like 
this. And when I met him last time, I couldn't remember it completely, not 
five hundred years or six hundred years, I Even if he doesn't remember 
what he looks like, how can he still hear his voice." 


The psychic array is still silent. The feelings of silence are not heard. The 
other priests, while pretending that they were not listening, frantically 
waited for someone of them to continue to pick up. 


It is also embarrassing to say these two. The songs have been passed down 
for so many years, and everyone knows that there are seven seven eight 
eight. In the past, I thanked you as a Prince of Music and practiced in the 
Emperor. This royal view is the royal dojo of the Xianle Kingdom, and the 
standard of appreciating is strict. He is a sinner who has been decapitated. 
His father is not qualified to enter the emperor's view. Therefore, he can 
only be a servant. In the view, he is cleaning the house and delivering tea 
to His Royal Highness. Thanks to his hard work, he asked the national 


division to take him as an example. His Majesty the Prince of the Epoch, 
Jinkou Yuyan, was able to enter the practice and practice with the Prince. 
After the ascent, Xie pity also ordered his will, and he took him to 
Xianjing. 


However, after Xianle was wiped out of the country, Xie Li was detained 
and he did not follow him. Not only did he not follow, he didn’t even say a 
word for him. Anyway, the prince was gone, he was free, and he found a 
hole in Tianfu to work hard. After a few years, he took the day and robbed 
himself. 


At the beginning, it was one in the sky, and now it was one in the sky, but 
the two people completely lost everything. 


At this end, Lingwen said: "He is very angry." 
Thanks: "I guess too." 


Lingwen said: "I will say something else, you will take the opportunity to 
leave." 


Thanks to pity: "No, pretend that nothing has happened." 
Lingwen said: "Don't you? I look at you all." 
Thank you, "Okay!" 


Thanks to this person, anything can be, that is, death can not; no matter 
how much, the face must be lost. He has done more than this many times, 
and I feel really good in my heart. Who knows that everything can't be 
said first. He just said "good", and he heard a voice snarling: "Who is the 
mother who demolished my golden temple?! Get out!!!" 


This roar, I heard the scalp of the gods in the array blasted. 


Although the stomach is already rolling in the rivers and lakes, but still a 
breath of calm, waiting for the sound of thank you to return to this 
sentence. What I expected, there is no most exciting, only more exciting, 
thank you have not opened, and the feelings first sounded. 


He smiled twice: "Oh." 

The people are cold and cold: "You take it apart, wait." 

The feelings are faint: "I didn't say it was me, you don't have blood." 
The other side said: "What are you laughing at? Are you sick?" 


Admire the feeling: "Without him, what you said is funny. The person who 
broke your golden temple is now in the psychic array, ask yourself." 


When things got to this point, thank you for being embarrassed to run like 
this anyway. 


He coughed and said, "It's me. Sorry." 
As soon as he spoke, the latter was silent. 
In the ear, the spirit 1s also voiced: "His Royal Highness, that is Nanyang." 


Thanks to the pity: "I recognized this. But he does not seem to recognize 
me." 


Lingwen said: "No. He just wandered more in the mortal world, and he 
returned to Xianjing less. I don't know if you are flying again." 


Nanyang Zhenjun is the Wushen who sits in the southeast of the town. He 
sits on the nearly eight thousand palaces and is very popular among the 
people. 


And his real name, after eight hundred years ago, was the first **** under 
the seat of the Prince of the Palace. 


He believed in his loyalty and loyalty. From the time he was 14 years old, 
he was his bodyguard. When he grew up with his princes, they all went to 
heaven, and they were all shackled and exiled together. It’s a pity that I 
haven’t lived through these eight hundred years. In the end, I’m not happy, 
I’m parting, and I’m not seeing again. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 3: Tattered 
immortal Sanden Xianjing 


In the past, the Lord’s sorrow was a three-handed stalk that had no incense, 
no priests and no believers. The two servants of the sects had crossed the 
sacred robbery and flew to the Dawu **** on the side of the town. In this 
situation, no one can do anything. miss you. If you want to thank you for 
choosing one of the styles and feelings to make him more jealous, he will 
say, "It’s all right!" But if you let others choose, they would like to see 
more pity and mutual trust, or would like to see more Thanks to pity and 
mutual affection, then everyone has their own tastes. After all, there are 
plenty of reasons for mutual disparity. 


Therefore, no one answered for a long time in the wind letter. It was a 
word that was not answered, and it was directly hidden. Everyone was very 
disappointed. Xie pity took a tail and then hit a few big boards. He said: "I 
didn't expect it to be like this. It was a matter of heart and trouble for you.' 


The feelings are cool and cool: "Oh, that's really a coincidence." 


Coincidentally, thanking me also feels that it is too clever, how can I just 
succumb to the feelings, and tear down the wind letter, to teach others to 
see, it is like he is deliberately revenge. But in fact, he is the kind, who 
chooses a cup of poison in a thousand cups of wine, no matter how you 
choose, you will definitely choose a poisonous wine. But what do people 
think in their hearts, you can't help it, thank you for your pity: "You will 
try your best to remedy the Golden Temple and other losses, and hope to 
give me some time." 


Although I want to know with the tail of the dust, I still want to continue 
to blow the cool breeze, but after all, his golden temple has not been 
damaged, and his bell is still smashed by him, and then it is ugly to be 
aggressive. Therefore, he also said nothing. Thanks for the pity, the mess 
went away on his own, and he ran quickly. 


He still seriously took the opportunity to get the 8.8 million merits. On the 
second day, the spirit asked him to go to the Temple of the Spirit. 


Lingwen is the priest of the personnel of the department. The person in 
charge is prosperous and pacing, and the whole temple is filled with 
official documents and scrolls from the ground to the dome. The scene is 
very shocking and frightening. Thanks for the way, every sergeant who 
came out of the Temple of Spirits had a high official document, and no one 
was coloring. It was not a face that collapsed or a numb face. Into the hall, 
the spirit turned and saw the mountain: "His Royal Highness, the emperor 
has something to do, can you help him?" 


There are many true monarchs and Yuanjuns in the heavens, but there is 
only one who can be called the emperor. If this person wants to do 
something, then he never needs to ask someone else. Therefore, thank you 
for your pity, and said: "What is it?" 


Lingwen handed him a scroll and said: "There have been a group of big 
believers in the north who have prayed frequently, and it is not very flat." 


The so-called big believers generally refer to three types of people: the 
first category, the rich, the money to burn incense, the construction of the 
palace temple; the second type, the preacher who can preach to the others; 
the third category, physical and mental thoroughness Carry out the beliefs. 
Among them, the first category is the most, the richer people are the more 
fearful of the ghosts, and the rich people in the world are like the rivers; 
the third category 1s the least, because if you can really do this, then the 
realm of this person must be high, from soaring too far away. What is said 
here is obviously the first type of person. 


Ling Wen said: "Emperor heads attend to the north, if you are willing to go 
in his stead, then dedicated to merit geometric Whether these big believer 
votive, give you instructions on how you look at the altar.?" 


Xie reel pity both hands, and said: "Thank you." 


This is clearly in my king to help him, but in turn asked him if he would 
be willing to do yourself a favor, where Xie pity can not see, but can not 


find better express their thoughts and words to replace the word this . Ling 
Wen said: "I only work, they want to thank you again to come back and so 
the Emperor himself to thank him for it, you may need to take what I give 
you magic. ?" 


Thanks to pity: "No need. It is a magic weapon for me. I can't use it when I 
go down. I can't use it." 


Thanks for being beaten twice, and the mana was lost. In Heaven, it’s 
better to say that Heaven is the place where the heavenly palaces are 
gathered. The spirit is abundant and the source is endless. If you come 
back to the world, you can be stupid. If you want to fight, you can only 
find it. It is inconvenient for people to borrow points. 


The spirit of thinking for a moment, said: "It is best to borrow a few 
military officers to help you." 


The current martial arts people don’t know themselves or don’t want to 
see themselves. This is still clear, and he said: “It’s not necessary. You 
can’t borrow people.” 


Lingwen has its own considerations and said: "I will try." 


Nothing to try is not bad, thank you for not agreeing or opposing, let her 
try. Therefore, the spirit entered the psychic array, and sighed: "You, the 
emperor has important tasks in the north, and you need to use people. 
Which of the martial arts can call two military officers from the temple?" 


As soon as the voice fell, the voice of the affection came out lightly: "I 
heard that the emperor is not in the north now, afraid that it will be 
borrowed from His Royal Highness." 


Thank you for your pity: "Are you staying in the psychic array all day 
long..." 


Lingwen went with him to think about it, and he wanted to take a slap in 
the face of the slap in the face, and smiled on the mouth: "Xuan Zhen, how 


can I always see you in the array these two days? Recently, you have been 
stealing a half-day leisurely? Congratulations." 


The feelings are faint: "The hand is hurt, and the injury is being repaired." 


The priests of the priests said: "You haven’t been in the middle of the day 
when you broke the sea. How can you be a silly clock?" 


Ling text wants to lie to the two to work and then say, stop knowing the 
feelings and know, the partial life still said, this must not find people. Sure 
enough, half a mile did not affect, thank you for not knowing anything, 
said to her: "Look, I said that I can't borrow people." 


Ling Wendao: "If Xuanzhen did not speak, he could borrow it." 


Xie pity smiled and said: "Your words are still half-faced, and the flowers 
look beautiful in the fog. People think that they are doing things for the 
emperor. Of course, they can be called, but if they come to discover that 
they are working with me, I am afraid When I got into trouble, how could I 
work together? I used to be alone, and I didn’t see any lack of arms and 
legs. Just like this. If you work, I will go." 


The spirit can't be done anymore, and he said, "Well, I wish you all the 
best." 


Thanks for the pity: "No taboos!" Waved, and left. 
Three days later, the world, the north. 


There is a small tea shop on the side of the road, the pavement is not big, 
the folks are simple, but the scenery is good. There are mountains and 
water, and some have cities. There are, not many; not much, just right. If 
you are in the scene, if you meet here, you will become a wonderful 
memory. Dr. Tea in the store was very busy. When he was not in the room, 
he moved to the stool and sat at the door. He watched the mountains and 
watched the water. He watched the city and watched it. He saw a white 
man walking on the road. Wind dust, as if walking for a long time. Going 
closer, passing the store, suddenly settled, and slowly backed back, a fight, 


looked up and looked at the wine trick, said: "‘Meet the store,' the name is 
interesting.” 


Although this person is slightly tired, his look is a smile, and he can't help 
but bend the two corners. He asked again: "Excuse me, is it with Junshan 
here?" 


Dr. Tea pointed him in the direction and said: "It is in this area." 


The man vomited, and finally did not spit out the soul together, said: "It is 
finally here." 


It is thanks. 


He left Xianjing on that day. He had originally set a place to be in the 
vicinity of Junshan. Who knows that he is leaving, and when he jumps 
down, the sleeves are hung up by a cloud of clouds. Yes, it is hung up by 
the cloud. He doesn’t know how to hang it. Anyway, he hits a high altitude. 
Roll, roll down and don't know where you are. After three days on foot, I 
finally came to the original landing place. For a moment, I was filled with 
emotion. 


Entering the store, Xie pity a table by the window, asked for tea and 
snacks, and finally sat down, suddenly heard a cry of crying, knocking and 
drumming. 


He looked at the street and saw a group of men, women and children 
surrounded by a big red sedan chair and walked across the road. 


This team, revealing the eccentric atmosphere. At first glance, it is like 
sending a pro-team, but when you look at it carefully, the look on these 
people's faces is serious, there is mourning, there is anger, there is fear, 
but there is no joy, no matter what, it is not like doing happy things. 
However, they all wear red flowers and blow them. This situation is really 
strange. Dr. Tea's portable copper pot, hung up high, clicked a little, and 
saw this scene, but only shook his head, and this went on. 


Thanks to the strange team to go, decided to think for a moment, is about 
to take out the scrolls of the spirit to see again, and suddenly a dazzling 
thing flashed past. 


As soon as he looked up, a silver butterfly flew over his eyes. 


The silver butterfly was crystal clear and flew in the air, leaving traces of 
shackles. Thankful, I couldn’t help but extend my hand to it. This silver 
butterfly is very spiritual, not only not shocked, but staying at his 
fingertips, the wings are shining, the beauty 1s extremely faint, in the sun, 
as if the dream bubble of breaking hands, then flew away. 


Xie pity waved to it, be farewell, and then look back, he sat on the table, 
sitting on two people. 


The table has four sides. The two men are one left and one right, each 
occupying one side. Both sides are teenagers of ten years old. The one on 
the left is taller. The eyebrows are quite deep and clear, and the eyes are 
unruly. The white on the right, the delicate and the gentle, but the look is 
too cold and indifferent, as if the heart is not so happy. In fact, the two 
faces are not very good looking. 


Thanks for the blessing, said: "Two?" 

On the left: "Southwind." 

On the right: "Shake." 

Thanks for your pity: "I am not asking your name..." 

At this time, the spirit suddenly passed over. She said: "Your Highness, 
there are two small military officers in Zhongtianting who are willing to 


come to assist. They have already gone to find you, and it is time to 
arrive." 


The so-called Zhongtian court is naturally opposite to the heavenly court. 
The celestial gods can be divided into two categories simply: rough, and 
not flying. The heavens are all based on their own ascending priests. There 


are only a hundred in the whole heavens, and they are extremely 
expensive. In the heavenly court, they are called up by the "points." 
Strictly speaking, the full name should be called "the same official." 
However, when everyone calls, the word "same" is often omitted. 


Then, is there a heaven and a heavenly court, is there a heaven court? 
No. 


In fact, when Xie pity first rose, it was really there. At that time, the points 
were still in heaven and in heaven. But later, everyone found a problem: 
When I introduced myself, I said, "I am from a certain person in the 
heavens." It is really unpleasant. If you have a "below" word, you will feel 
that you are particularly inferior. You must know that there are no talents 
who are talented and powerful, and they are just a day behind the real 
priest. Maybe one day will wait? Then someone proposed to change a 
word and become "I am from a certain person in the heavens", which is 
much better. Although it is actually a meaning. In short, after the change, 
thank you for not being used for a while. 


Thanks to the two small military officers, their faces are more ugly than 
they are. They are not like "willing to come to help". They can't help but 
ask: "Liewen, I don't think they are going to help me. It’s more like to take 
my dog’s head. You have to pick someone up.” 


It is a pity that he did not seem to pass it out, and he could not hear the 
voice of the spirit. I want to come down to Xianjing too long, and the 
mana is drained. Thanks for the pity, the two small military officers 
smiled and said: "Is the South Wind and the Shake? Are you willing to 
come and help, I will thank you first." 


Both of them just nodded a little, and they were quite stance. It seemed to 
be from the famous Valkyrie. Thanks for letting Dr. Tea add two more 
cups, pick up the tea, scrape the tea, and ask: "Which of you are under the 
seat of your Highness?" 


South Wind Road: "Nanyang Temple." 


Fudao: "Xuanzhen Temple." 


This is really amazing. 


Thanks for a cup of tea swallowed, said: "Do your family generals let you 
come over?" 


Both of them said: "Our generals don't know that I am coming." 
Thank you for thinking, and said: "So, do you know who I am?" 


If the two small military officers were confused and scammed by the 
spirits, they helped him, and he would have to go back to his own generals. 
This is not worth it. 


Southwind Road: "You are His Royal Highness Prince." 


Fudao said: "You are the right way in the world, you are the center of the 
world." 


Thank you for your pity, and asked the south wind indefinitely: "Have he 
turned a blind eye?" 


South Wind Road: "Yes. Let him roll." 


Nanyang and Xuanzhen have a bad relationship. This is not a secret. Xie Li 
was not surprised when he heard about this. Because the relationship 
between the wind and the feelings was not good, but he was the master of 
them at the time. The Prince said that you should not quarrel. You must be 
friends. Everyone can't help but turn their faces. It's really unpleasant to 
take the words and stab the other side at most. If you mix them up now, 
you can use them without any fakes. Therefore, even the two believers in 
the southeast and southwest are not able to get to the other side. The 
Nanyang Hall and the Xuanzhen Hall are all year-round hatred. These two 
are the typical examples. Shake and sneer: "Linwen Zhenjun said that he 
can come on his own, why let me roll back." 


The word "voluntary", with his expression, is really not convincing. 
Thanks to the pity: "I confirm. Are you really willing? Do not want to be 
reluctant." 


Both of them said: "I volunteer." 


Looking at the two disheartened faces, thank you, what you want to say is 
actually "I commit suicide." 


"all in all--" 


Thanks to pity: "First talk about business. You know what you are doing to 
the north, then I will not talk from the beginning..." 


Both of them said: "I don't know." 


" " 


Thanks for the pity, I had to take out the scroll and said, "I will still tell 
you from the beginning." 


It is said that many years ago, there was a couple of new people married to 
Junshan. 


The love of the new couple is very good. The groom waited for the team to 
send the pro, and waited for a long time, and did not see the bride coming. 
The bridegroom was in a hurry and went to the bride's maiden. As a result, 
the father-in-law told him that the bride had already set off. The two 
families reported to the office and looked around. They never looked at it. 
They gave it to the beasts in the mountains. If there were any arms and 
legs left, what could be the reason for disappearing out of thin air? It is 
inevitable that some people suspect that the bride is not willing to marry, 
and colluded to send the pro-team to run. Who knows, after a few years, 
another couple will get married and the nightmare will reappear. 


The bride is gone again. However, this time it is not nothing left. On a 
small road, everyone found a foot that didn't finish eating. 2k novel 
reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 4: Sanhuobao 
Night Talk about Juyang Temple 


Since then, it has been out of control. Since then, a total of seventeen 
brides have disappeared with Junshan in the past 100 years. Sometimes it 
is safe for more than a decade, sometimes missing two in just one month. 
A horror legend spread quickly: a ghost bridegroom lived in Junshan. If he 
saw a woman, he would take her away on the way she married and then eat 
the team. 


This was originally not transmitted to the sky, because although there were 
seventeen brides missing, there were more than a hundred innocent brides. 
Anyway, I can't find it, and I can't keep it. It can only be done in this way. 
It’s just that there are fewer people who dare to marry their daughters in 
this area. Local newcomers are not willing to dare to do so. But it is 
precisely the seventeenth bride, the father is an official. He is quite a 
favorite of his daughter, and he has heard the legends of this place. He has 
carefully selected forty courageous military officers to **** their 
daughters to become relatives, but the daughter is still gone. 


This ghost groom can marry the horse. The official who can find the man 
in the world can't take it, so he unites a group of friends and friends in a 
rage, madly doing a wave of rituals, and also according to the instructions 
of the Supreme People to open a position to help the poor, and make the 
city full of wind and rain, This finally surprised the several priests above. 
Otherwise, it is almost impossible for the tiny mortal voices to reach the 
ears of the heavenly gods. 


Thanks to the pity: "This is generally the case." 


Because the two of them looked very uncooperative, he did not know if 
they were not listening. If I didn't listen to it, I had to talk about it again. 
The south wind raised his head and frowned. "What do the missing brides 
have in common?" 


Thanks to pity: "There are rich and rich, beautiful and ugly, and wives and 
wives. In a word: there is no law. There is no way to judge what the taste 
of this ghost groom 1s." 


Nanfeng "Well", took a cup and took a sip, it seems to start thinking. 
Shake it up, but he didn’t touch the tea that he pushed to him. He used to 
use a white hand to gently rub his fingers. While rubbing his eyebrows, he 
said coldly: "His Royal Highness, how do you know that it must be a ghost 
groom? Not necessarily, no one has ever seen it. How do you know that it 
is male or female, is it always young? Are you taking it for granted?" 


Thank you, Charles, said: "The scroll is summed up by the civil servants 
of the Temple of the Spirit. The ghost groom is just a folk name. However, 
what you said is very reasonable." 


I also said a few words. Thanks to the pity, the two small military officers 
thought quite clearly. Although they looked bad, the arguments were 
unambiguous and quite gratifying. Looking out the window is too late, the 
three temporarily out of the store. Thanks to the fight, he walked for a 
while, and suddenly he noticed that neither of them had followed, and he 
looked back and looked at it. As a result, the two were also watching him. 
Nanfeng asked: "Where are you going?" 


Thanks for your pity: "Looking for the land. Why do you turn your eyes?" 


The south wind asked wonderingly, "Why are you going to the barren 
hills?" 


When I prayed, I often went to sleep on the street, and when I found a 
piece of cloth, I could lie down for a night. Naturally, I was accustomed to 
finding a cave to make a fire. After he reminded me, this reaction was 
over. This southerly wind and the swaying are the military officers under 
the **** of Valu If there is a Nanyang Temple or a Xuanzhen Temple in 
the vicinity, you can go straight in, why do you need to sleep in the 
wilderness? 


After a short while, the three found a ragged land in a very small corner. 
The fragrant scent broke and looked very deserted for a round and small 


stone land. Thanks for a few voices, this land has not been enshrined for 
many years, and I heard people crying, and I saw the three people standing 
in front of the front, and the left and right sides were covered with a layer 
of upstart-like aura. I couldn’t see my face at all, I was shocked and 
trembled and said: "What can the three immortals have to call?" 


Thank you for your first words: "Do not call. Just ask, can there be a city 
temple dedicated to General Nanyang or General Xuanzhen?" 


The land did not dare to neglect, said: "This is this ..."???,,,,,,5,555555 


DDD DAD EP DP DD DD DD DE DAD DP DD ODP DN DD AD DD DD DS IDE DED DED DEBE De DID: DAD DPD 


Thanks for the pity and the hands together: "Thank you." And the land was 
stunned by the two groups of spirits, and quickly disappeared. Thanks for 
feeling a few dollars in front of the donkey, seeing scattered perfume on 
the side, then pick it up. During the period, I was so worried that I couldn’t 
get tired of my eyes. 


After five miles, I saw a city temple, and the red fire stood on the side of 
the road. Although the temples are small and complete, people come and 
go. The three men concealed themselves into the temple, and the temple 
was filled with clay statues of Nanyang Wushen’s armor. 


Thanks to seeing this statue in the heart, "Hmm...". 


The small temples in the countryside, the statues and paintings of the gods 
can be said to be rough, and the overall appearance is quite different from 
the style of the letterhead in the impression of thanking the pity. 


However, it is a common practice for the gods to be shaped by the gods. 
Don't say that the mother doesn't know each other. Some of the priests see 
their own gods and don't know them. After all, few master craftsmen have 
really seen the priests themselves, so they are either beautiful or ugly, and 
can only recognize which priest is by specific posture, instrument, and 
crown. 


In general, the more enriched the land, the more the gods like the gods. 
The poorer the place, the worse the taste of the craftsman, the more 


miserable the statue is. On the present day, only the general image of 
General Xuan Zhen is better. Why? Because people are ugly and ugly, no 
matter, he sees that he is ugly, he will secretly ruin the reinvention, or 
conceal his dissatisfaction with a dream, so in the long run, The big 
believers will know that they must find a good-looking master! 


The entire Xuanzhen Temple is exactly the same as their generals. After 
swaying into the Nanyang Temple, I have been commenting on this 
Nanyang image for an hour. What shape is distorted, the color is vulgar, 
the craft is inferior, and the taste is strange. Thanks for watching the south 
wind forehead, the blue veins are slowly coming out, thinking that I have 
to find a topic and pull it away. I just saw another girl coming in to pay 
homage, devoutly squatting, and she said: "Say, Nanyang Zhenjun’s home 
is in the southeast, and I didn’t expect you to be so strong in the north.” 


People build temples and temples, which are actually imitations of the 
Heavenly Palace, and the gods are the reflections of the gods. Gongguan 
gathers believers to attract incense and become an important source of 
magical power for the officers. Due to multiple reasons such as 
geographical and historical customs, people from different regions usually 
offer different sacred officials. On his own site, the power of a priest will 
be the strongest, which is the home advantage. It is only the gods of the 
Emperor Wuwu who are all believers in the world and who have the 
priests in the world. Is it completely meaningless at home? The temple of 
his own general is also incense at the non-home court. This is a good 
thing. The south wind should be proud, but it can be awkward, but it 1s not 
good. Aside from the side, it was a slight smile, saying: "Good, good, 
deeply loved." 


Thanks: "But I have a question, I don't know..." 


Nanfeng Road: "If it is ‘I don’t know if it’s not said properly,’ then don’t 
talk.” 


Thanks to the heart: "No. I want to say is ‘I wonder if anyone can answer 
it’ ae 


However, he foresaw that this sentence would be bad, and decided to 
change the topic. Who knows, swaying and arrogant: "I know what you 
want to ask. You must be asking, why are there so many female followers 
who come to visit?" 


It is this question that thank you for asking. 


The female believers in the Wushen system have always been fewer than 
the male followers, and he was only an exception eight hundred years ago. 
However, the reason for the exception is very simple, just two words: 
good-looking. 


He is very clear, not because of his high dedication or extraordinary 
power, just because his **** looks good, his palace view is also good- 
looking. His palace view is almost entirely royal, and the statue is a top 
craftsman who has gathered all the skills of the country, according to his 
face carving. Moreover, because the phrase "in the infinite, heart in 
Taoyuan", craftsmen often like to add some flowers to his god, but also 
like to plant the view into a sea of ??flowers. Therefore, at that time, he 
also had a personal name, called "Corolla Wushen". The believers liked 
his gods to look good, and they liked the flowers in his palace. They would 
like to come in and worship him. 


But the general Wushen, because the gas of killing is too heavy, the face 1s 
often shaped into a serious, embarrassing, cold look, teaching the son-in- 
law, and would rather go to worship Guanyin or something. Although this 
Nanyang image is not in contact with the killing, it is farther away from 
the good side. The number of female followers who come to pay homage 
is almost more than that of male believers. The south wind obviously does 
not want to answer this question. He is quite strange. Just then, the girl 
was finished, got up and took the incense, and turned again. 


This turn, thanked the pity pushed the other two. The two were originally 
very intolerant, and he was pushed by him. As they looked, their faces 
changed. 


Fudao said: "It's too ugly!" 


Thank you for your pity, and said: "I can't say a girl like this." 


In all fairness, it is the truth to support it. The girl was flat and flat, and 
she was like a slap in the face. The five senses said that there were some 
grievances. If you must describe it, you might only use the "snot of the 
nose". 


But in the eyes of Xie, she did not distinguish whether she was beautiful or 
ugly. Mainly because she turned around, a huge hole in the skirt hung 
there, it was impossible to pretend not to see. 


The first wave of surprise was shocked, but it quickly calmed down. The 
blue veins of the southerly frontal angle disappeared without a trace. 


Seeing his face changed greatly, thank you for your help: "Don't be 
nervous. Don't be nervous." 


The girl took the incense and squatted again, and worshipped the side: 
"Nanyang General bless, believe in the female little firefly, pray for the 
early capture of the ghost groom, do not call the innocent people to suffer 
from him..." 


She was pious, and she did not realize that she was behind her, and she was 
unaware that three people were kneeling at the feet of her god. Xie pity is 
quite big and said: "What to do, can't let her go out like this? It will be 
seen all the way back." 


Moreover, looking at the break after her skirt, it 1s clearly deliberately cut 
by people with a sharp weapon, I am afraid that not only will be onlookers, 
but also will be ridiculed by the big rumors, it is really a shame. 


Shake indifferently: "Don't ask me. She is not our general." I don't see 
anything. I didn't see anything." 


The south wind is a handsome face, green and white, only waved, can not 
speak, a good little brother, life was forced into a dumb, did not have to 
count. Xie pity had to go out of his own, and the coat was taken off. The 


coat fluttered to the girl and blocked the very indecent hole in her skirt. 
The three people were relieved. 


But this gust of wind ts really evil, the girl was shocked, looked around, 
took the robe, hesitated for a moment, put it on the platform, but still 
unaware, and after finishing the incense, they have to go out. . If this 1s to 
let her go out again, the little girl is afraid to see her face. Seeing that the 
two ones next to them are not stiff or stiff, they are not used in the 
horizontal and vertical directions. Thank you for your sigh. The south 
wind and the swaying of the air only felt that there was an empty space, 
and the pity had already appeared and jumped. 


The lights in the temple were not dark. He jumped and brought a gust of 
wind. The fire shook. The girl Xiaoying only felt a flower in front of her 
eyes. Then she saw a man suddenly emerged from the darkness and 
stretched out to her. Hand, the soul flies on the spot. 


Unexpectedly, a scream. Xie Li just wanted to talk, the girl had already 
slapped her hand and screamed, shouting: "Indecent!" 


"2". thanked the pity so slap in the face. 


The slaps were crisp, and the two faces and half-faces that were heard on 
the altar were all in the same breath. 


I ate a palm, thanked me for not being annoyed. I only slammed my coat 
over and whispered quickly. The girl was shocked. After she touched her 
body, she suddenly became flushed, and her eyes were filled with tears. I 
wonder if it was hard. Shyly angry, grasped the cloak that thanked her for 
giving her a cover, and flew away, leaving only the pity and thinness 
standing in the same place. When people go to the temple, the cool breeze 
is in the hall, and suddenly, it is a bit cold. 


He rubbed his face and turned around, holding a half of the red palm print, 
and said to the little two: "Okay. It's okay." 


The voice just fell, the south wind pointed to him, said: "You... is the 
wound broken?" 


Thanks for a bow, "Oh," he said. 


He took off his clothes, and the end was a good skin of sheep fat jade, but 
the chest was tightly covered with layers of white cloth, wrapped tightly, 
and even the neck and wrists were full of bandages, countless The tiny 
wound climbed out of the white stretched edge, which was a bit shocking. 


It’s almost a good idea to think of the twisted neck. Thanks to pity, I began 
to untie the bandage. He shook his eyes and said: "Who?" 


Thanks: "What?" 

He swayed: "Who is the warrior with you?" 
Thanks for the pity: "The battle? No." 
Nanfeng: "Then your injury is..." 

Thanks for the pity: "I fell." 


It was the injury that fell when I rolled down three days ago. If you are 
fighting against people, you really can't hurt this level. 


He swayed a few words and didn't hear it. Anyway, he certainly didn't 
praise him for being strong. He didn't ask for it, and he solved a thick 
bandage on his neck. The next moment, the south wind and the swaying 
eyes were all condensed and fell on his neck. 


A black collar with a ring between his white neck. 2k novel reading 
network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 5: Sanhuobao 
Night Talk about Juyang Temple 


I noticed their gaze, thanked me with a slight smile, turned and said: "The 
first time I saw the real curse?" 


Cursing, as the name implies, the shackles formed by the curse. 


The priest who was left behind by the heavens will be condemned as a sin 
seal, imposed on his body, formed a bondage, banned the power of God, 
and taught him to never get rid of it. It is like a tattoo on a person's face or 
a lock on a hand or a foot. It is a punishment and a warning. It is terrifying 
and shameful. 


As a three-story laughing stock that has been beaten twice, Xie Pity 
naturally has such a curse. These two small military officers could not 
have heard of it, but they have heard and witnessed it, and there is still a 
big gap. Therefore, they show such expressions, and thanking them is not 
incomprehensible. 


He guessed that this thing might make the two small military officers feel 
jealous and uncomfortable. After all, it is not a good thing. 


I wanted to find a piece of clothing to wear outside to take a lap, but was 
shaken by a white eye and added a sentence, "You look like this to the 
street, it can be said that it is very sloppy." Blocked back, or the south 
wind to the temple The clothes that the temple wished were thrown at him, 
so that it is no longer necessary to continue to flow. However, after sitting 
down again, I always felt that after a while, the atmosphere became a bit 
embarrassing, so thank you for taking out the scroll from the Lingwen Hall 
and saying, "Would you like to see it again?" 


The south wind raised his eyelids and looked at him. He said, "I have seen 
it. I think he needs to take a good look." 


He yelled: "What makes me need to take a good look. The scroll is not 
well written. It is worthless. It is worth seeing." 


Hearing that he said that the reel is worthless, thanking the pity, he 
couldn’t help but feel a little bit of distressed Lingwendian who wrote the 
scrolls and wrote the little civil servants. Hearing and supporting the road: 
"Ah, where did you say it? Nanyang Temple - why Nanyang believes in 
women, is it?" 


All right. Thanks to the reel, I took a look at the scroll, and I knew it: I 
can’t see it tonight! 


If you can't see the right thing, then let's see what's going on. It turns out 
that in addition to the princes of the Prince who have been ruined in the 
world for hundreds of years, the gods of the heavens are well known. The 
Nanyang Zhenjun Fengxin has been called "Gian|Yang Zhenjun" for some 
time. He himself is referring to this, and it is really abhorrent. And 
everyone's experience of him, there is only one word of thought: "Hey!" 


Because the original correct way of writing is "all positive." The reason 
why it is misrepresented 1s because of such a thing. 


Many years ago, there was a monarch who cultivated the palace view and 
expressed his sincerity. He personally gave the title of each temple to each 
palace. When I wrote "Changyang Temple", somehow, he wrote 
"Gian|Yang Temple". 


This time, officials responsible for the construction of the palace can be 
killed. They are unpredictable, is it that they are deliberately trying to 
change to this, or are they accidentally wrong? If it is intentional, why not 
make it clear that I am going to change this? If not intentionally, how can 
you make such a low-level mistake? He can't always say, "Your Majesty, 
you are wrong." Who knows if His Majesty will feel that he is sarcastic? 
Implying that his knowledge is shallow? Heart dishonest? And this is the 
ink treasure of your majesty, don't you have to be invalid? 


The most difficult thing to speculate under the sun is the meaning of the 
saint. The officials were extremely painful. After thinking about it, they 


still felt that 1t was better to be wronged than to grieve. 


Have to say that they made the right choice. Under the armpits, it turned 
out that the yang became a giant | Yang, there is nothing else to express, 
just invited a group of scholars, vigorously read the ancient books, find out 
the reasons for countless details, wrote many articles, and tried to prove 
that it was originally a giant Yang, Yang 1s the wrong way to write. In 
short, after a night, the National Palace of the Sun has become a giant | 
Yang Temple. 


It was inexplicable to change the name of the gods for more than ten years 
to know about it. He basically never looked at the signboard of his temple, 
but one day he was very depressed. How could it be that there were so 
many women who came to visit him in his temple, and all of them were 
shy and licking their faces, and they were eager to get it. What are the 
gadgets? ! 


After figuring out what was going on, he rushed to the top of the Nine 
Miles and was yelling at the sky in the sky. 


All the priests were shocked by him. 


After the end of the day, there is no way to worship it. He can’t say that he 
can’t go through these devout women, and he has been listening to the 
scalp for many years. Until the giant | Yang was changed to Nanyang by a 
serious monarch who felt that this was simply not a system. Everyone still 
did not forget that he could bless what he would be, besides being a **** 
of war. However, everyone also adheres to a tacit understanding: Never use 
the two words to call him. At the same time, it also adheres to a cognition: 
How to evaluate Nanyang Zhenjun? One word: Good! 


Just don't let him open his mouth, everything is fine! 


The face of the south wind has been black and the bottom of the pot is old. 
This box is still a poem, and Sven is authentic: "Friends of women, the 
strongest child. The secret of the aphrodisiac, send son Nanyang. Ah haha, 
ah haha, Ah ha ha ha ha ha ha...... " 


Xie Li reluctantly held back the smile and left him a face in front of the 
statue of Nanyang. The south wind is furious: "You don't come here to yin 
and yang, you have to go to sweep the ground!" 


This sentence, the face of the swaying 1s also the bottom of the pot. If the 
Nanyang Temple is to hear the words of the people, the Xuanzhen Temple 
is not to hear the words of the people. Because the emperor is doing the 
chores in the emperor's view, it is the whole day to give the Prince the 
Prince's polite tea to sweep the floor. One day, thanking him for watching 
him while sweeping the ground and silently practicing his mouth, he was 
moved by the spirit of his hard work and adversity, and he went to the 
national division to ask him to be a disciple. How do you say this? It can 
be big or small, but it can be humiliating and beautiful. It depends on what 
the parties think. Obviously, the parties think that this is a shame of life, 
because the admiration and the military commanders under his seat are all 
heard by the word. Sure enough, the support was fixed, and I glanced at the 
innocent smile of the hand, and sneered: "Listen to what you said, I don't 
know if you think that Nanyang Temple is more than the Prince Edward." 


The south wind also sneered: "Your general is indeed ungrateful. Is there 
anything to say?" 


"Oh..." Xie Li just wanted to insert a sentence and sway "Ahaha": "Your 
general is only a hundred steps to laugh, is it possible to poke a little?" 


'..." Listening to them like this as a big stick and hammering the backbone 
of the other officer's backbone, thank you finally can't listen, said: "Wait, 
wait. Stop, stop." 


Naturally, no one cares about him, and he still starts to move his hands. I 
don’t know who is the first to do it. Anyway, the table is split in two, and 
the bones are rolling over the ground. Thanks for seeing this, I couldn’t 
hold it anymore, sitting in the corner, sighing “Creating a career’, licking 
a little girl rolling to the feet, wiping the skin and preparing to eat it. 
Immediately slap him off: "Don't eat!" 


Shake also stopped, shocked and disgusted: "You can still eat in the ash!" 


Thanks for the gesture, thank you for saying: "Stop, stop, stop. I have 
something to say." 


He separated the two, and he said with joy: "First, the prince of your 
prince who said in your mouth is exactly what you are. There 1s no talk 
under the lord. You should not throw me as a weapon and throw it at the 
other side." And added another sentence, "I think the two generals in your 
family will definitely not be like this. You are so decent, what are their 
faces?" 


When the sentence is huge, the two look a little unpredictable. Thanks 
again and again: "Second, you are here to help me, right? Then, are you 
listening to me, or am I listening to you?" 


For a long while, two talents said: "Listen to you." 


Although their faces look like they are saying, "You dream, listen to you," 
but Xie Pity is also very satisfied, "?" with a clasped hands, said: "Good. 
Finally, the third, the most important point - - If you must throw 
something, then please drop me, don't throw it away." 


Nanfeng finally picked him up and put it in his hand. He wanted to find a 
chance to eat it. He couldn’t bear it: "Don’t eat it on the ground!" 


The next day, I still meet the store. 
Dr. Tea raised his bones at the door and saw the three-person line near. A 
Taoist man was light and simple, carrying a fight in front of him, and two 


tall black teenagers followed. 


The man came up with his hand and applied it, but he was more like a idler 
than him: "The store, tired of three cups of tea." 


Dr. Tea laughed: "Come on!" 


I thought: "The three silly little brothers are coming again. It is a pity that 
they are a decent one. The brain is more than one. It is a god, what is a 


god, what a ghost, what day." What is the use of this person to be sick and 
to be decent?" 


Thanks for the sake of the window. After sitting down together, Nanfeng 
Road: "Why come here to talk, do you want to be heard by others?" 


Thank you for your kindness: "It doesn't matter. Even if you hear someone 
else, you won't care. You only think we are sick." 


Thanks to the pity: "In order to avoid the three of us who have been 
relatively sloppy like this, open the door. After calming down after a night, 
have you thought of any solution?" 


With a glimpse of his eyes, he said coldly: "Kill!" 
South Wind Road: "Crap!" 


Thanks to the pity: "Nanfeng, you don't want to be so fierce, and you don't 
have to make a mistake. The fundamental way to solve the problem is to 
kill. The question is where to go, who to kill, how to kill. I suggest..." 


At this time, the street was filled with a bang and drums, and the three 
looked out the window. 


It was also the team’s miserable “send a kiss”. This group of people blew 
and beat, even calling the number, as if afraid of others can not hear. 
Nanfeng frowned: "Isn't it true that I don't dare to do anything with the 
locals near Junshan?" 


Each of the team is a strong black sturdy man. His expression and muscles 
are tight and tight, and he is cold and sweaty. It seems that they are not 
carrying a happy big sedan chair, but a deadly decapitation. . I don’t know 
what kind of person is sitting in the sedan chair? 


Indulge in a moment, thanking the pity to think of going out, a gust of 
wind blowing, the curtain on one side of the sedan chair picked up with the 
wind. 


The man behind the curtain squatted in the sedan chair in a very strange 
position. Her head was awkward, and a red-colored mouth was revealed 
under the cover, and the smile on the corner of her mouth was too 
exaggerated. As soon as the sedan chair was upside down, the cover 
slipped down, revealing a pair of round eyes and licking this side. 


It seems that it is a woman who has broken her neck and is laughing at 
them silently. 


I don't know if the bearer's hand shakes too much, the sedan chair is not 
stable, and the woman's head is also swaying. Shaking, "?", a head fell, and 
the bones rolled onto the street. 


And the headless body sitting in the sedan chair was also thrown forward - 
"2", the whole person saved the car door. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 6: Ghostly pro- 
pals on the sedan 


A bearer did not pay attention, stepped on one arm and took the lead in 
yelling. The team that sent the pro to blasted the pot immediately. The 
good guy, the group of people brushed the brush and smashed a large knife 
of white flowers, shouting: What's wrong?! Is it coming?!" I don't know 
where I used to hide. The street was smashed into a piece, and the pity was 
fixed again. The separated head was not a living person, but a wooden doll. 


Shake again and said: "It's too ugly!" 


Just as Dr. Tea came up with a copper pot, thanked him for thinking about 
his spirit yesterday. "The store, I saw this group of people blowing on the 
street yesterday. See you today, what are they doing?" 


Dr. Tea said: "Do death." 
"Ha ha ha..." 


Xie pity is not unexpected, said: "Do they want to bring out the ghost 
groom?" 


Dr. Tea said: "Can you still do what you want? There is a bride's heavy 
reward for finding his daughter, catching the ghost groom, and this group 
of people will be so smoky all day long." 


The embarrassment of this reward is inevitably the official. Thanks again, 
he glanced at the head of the shoddy woman on the ground, knowing that 
they wanted to use this dummy to disguise the bride. 


Just listen to the sorrowful voice: "If I am a ghost groom, send me such a 
ugly thing, I will destroy the town." 


Thanks to pity: "When you shake, you are not like a fairy. You can change 
your habit of turning your eyes. It is better to set a small goal for yourself. 


Only five times a day. some type of." 


Nanfeng Road: "You don't have enough time to give him a day and fifty 
times!" 


At this time, the team suddenly drilled a young man, and he was full of 
energy. He looked like a leader. He shouted: "Listen to me, listen to me! It 
doesn't work like this! How many squats have we ran in these days?" Did 
the ghost groom be led out?" 


The big Hans have echoed and complained, and the young man said: "In 
my opinion, it is better not to do two endlessly, directly rushing into the 
Junshan, everyone to search for the mountain, to catch the ugly eight 
monsters to kill! I take the lead, the **** good guys are with I am coming, 
killing the ugly, and rewarding everyone!" 


A group of men first seldom pulled a few words, and gradually increased 
their voices. Finally, everyone responded, and it sounded so loud. Xie pity 
asked: "Ugly ugly? Store, what are they saying about this ugly?" 


Dr. Tea said: "It 1s said that the ghost groom is a ugly monster living in 
Junshan. It is because it is too ugly, no woman likes it, so it is resentful, 
and it is not a good thing to rob someone else's bride." 


There is no record on the scroll of the Lingwen Hall. Thanks to the pity: 
"Is there such a statement? Is it not a guess?" 


Dr. Tea said: "Who knows, it is said that many people have seen that the 
whole face is bandaged, his eyes are fierce, and he can only speak like a 
wolf dog. It is a god." 


He swayed: "The bandages on the face are not necessarily ugly, but it may 
be because it is too beautiful to be seen." 


Dr. Tea was speechless for a moment and said: "Who knows, I have never 
seen it before." 


At this time, the street uploaded a girl’s voice and said: "You... don’t listen 
to him, don’t go, it’s dangerous with Junshan...” 


The girl who was hiding in the corner of the street was the little girl who 
came to the Nanyang Temple to pray for the night. 


When she saw her, she felt a little pain in her face, and she unconsciously 
raised her hand and touched it. 


When the young man saw her, she didn't have a good color. She pushed her 
and said: "The big men are talking, what is a little girl?" 


Xiaoying was pushed by him, a little shivering, courage, and whispered: 
"Don't listen to him. Whether it's a fake kiss or a search for a mountain, 
it's so dangerous, isn't it dead?" 


Xiaonong said: "You are very good at speaking. Let's make a big guy fight 
for the name to kill the people. What about you? Selfishness, don't pretend 
to be a bride on the sedan chair. For the sake of the people here, there is no 
courage. Now come again. What hinders us, what is your heart?" 


Every time he said a word, he pushed the girl and saw that the people in 
the store frowned. Thanks for patience and bowing his wrist bandage, he 
heard Dr. Tea said: "This little Pengtou, I wanted to marry this girl as a 
fake bride, and the mouth was like a honey, the girl refused, now it is this 
face. It is." 


On the street, a group of big men also said: "You don't stand here to stop 
the road, go to the side!" Xiaoying saw, a flat face rose red, tears in the 
eyelids turned, said: " You... why do you have to say this?" 


The young man said again: "Is it right? I want you to pretend to be a bride. 
Are you not willing to die?" 


Xiao Huidao: "I don't dare, but you don't have to scratch or scratch my 
skirt..." 


When she mentioned this, the young man was poked in a moment and 
jumped up. He pointed to her nose and said: "You are ugly and ugly here 
with blood spray! I cut your skirt? You look at me!" Who knows if you 
want to show it to yourself and give it to you? Who knows that your ugly 
face is broken and no one is watching, you don't want to rely on me!" 


The south wind couldn’t be heard anymore, and the teacup “Takaka” was 
broken in the hand. Just as he was about to get up, the white shadow 
fluttered around him. And Xiao Pengtou, who was just three feet high, 
yelled, and his face fell to the ground, and the blood of the ticking between 
the fingers ran out. 


Everyone didn't have time to see what was going on. He was already 
sitting on the ground. He thought it was a small firefly. Whoever saw her 
again couldn't see it anymore. A white Taoist person was in front of her. 


Xie pity hands clasped sleeves, the head does not return, smiled at 
Xiaoying, slightly bent, and looked at her, asked: "This girl, I wonder if I 
can invite you to eat a cup of tea?" 


There was a pain in the mouth and mouth of Xiao Pengtou over there. A 
face hurt as if it had been beaten by a steel whip. But this person clearly 
did not bring a weapon, nor did he see how he shot and used what he shot. 
He groaned and climbed, screaming and shouting: "This person makes the 
demon law!" 


Behind them, a group of big men listened to the "demon" and they raised 
their swords. Who knows, the south wind suddenly took a shot, "snap"! A 
column was broken. 


Seeing this divine power, a group of big men’s faces changed, and Xiao 
Peng’s head was stunned, but he was still hard. He ran and yelled at them 
as he ran: “I am planted today, which hero are you? Leave your name, we 
will come back later..." 


The south wind did not bother to answer, but the support was on the side: 
"Let's say that this is a huge..." 


The south wind backhand was another palm, and the two were so 
unmovably removed. Xie Liben wanted to ask the little girl to come in and 
sit down and give her a fruit tea to eat. She wiped her tears and walked 
away. She had to look at her back and sigh, and she came in. When I came 
in, Dr. Tea said: "The pillars remember to pay." 


So when she sat down, she said to the south wind: "The pillars remember 
to pay." 


south wind:"...... 


Thanks to pity: "Before that, we must do business first. Whoever borrows 
me a mana, | have to go through the spiritual array to verify the 
intelligence." 


The south wind raised his hand, and the two men sweared as an oath, 
which made it a very simple contract. In this way, thank you finally can 
enter the spirits. 


As soon as he entered, he listened to the spirit: "Your Highness finally 
borrowed mana? Is it possible to travel smoothly in the north? How about 
the help of the two small servants who recommended themselves?" 


Xie pity looked up and glanced at the pillar that was cut off by the south 
wind. There was also a cold face and a refreshing eye, and said: "The two 
small military officers have their own merits. They are all plastic." 


Lingwen smiled and said: "That is really to congratulate General Nanyang 
and General Xuanzhen. According to His Royal Highness, these two small 
military officers must have a promising future. Flying is a good day." 


After a while, the voice of admiration came out coldly and said: "He did 
not inform me about his trip. He went, and I know nothing about it." 


Thank you for your pity: "You really stayed in the psychic array all day 
long..." 


Lingwen said: "His Royal Highness, where are you going now? The north 
is the place where the generals are sitting in the town. The incense is very 
prosperous. If there is a need for His Royal Highness, he can stay in his 
Mingguang Hall." 


Thanks to pity: "You don't have to bother. There is no Mingguang Temple 
in the vicinity. We have settled in a Nanyang Temple. Ask, Lingwen, do 
you have more information about this ghost groom?" 


Lingwen said: "Yes. The rating in our temple is out, it 1s 'fierce."" 
"fierce"! 


For the evil spirits and ghosts of the human world, according to their 
abilities, the Lingwen Temple divides them into "evil", "strong", "fierce" 
and "absolute". 


"Evil" kills one person, "Li" can destroy one, and "violent" can kill a city. 
The most terrible "absolute", but when they are born, it will be a disaster 
for the country and the people. 


This ghost and groom in the Junshan is actually a "fierce" chapter, second 
only to the "absolute", then, those who have seen him, I am afraid that it is 
unlikely to retreat. 


Therefore, after the psychic array, after telling the rest of the two people, 
Nanfeng said: "Those ugly and bandaged men are mostly rumors. 
Otherwise they just see something else." 


Thanks to the pity: "There is another possibility. For example, in a certain 
situation, this ghost groom will not, or can not hurt." 


There are quite a few words in the sway: "The Lingwen Temple is really 
inefficient. It takes so long to get a rating. What to use!" 


Thanks to pity: "Well, I know something about the strength of the enemy. 
But since it is fierce, the ghost groom must be very strong, and the dummy 
can't deceive him. If we want to lead him out, the person who sent the pro- 


team will You can't behave with a sham, and you can't have a blade. The 
most important thing is that the bride must be a living person." 


Fudao said: "Let's find a woman on the street to let her do the bait." 
The south wind vetoed: "No." 
Fudao said: "Why? Unwilling? I will be willing to pay." 


Thanks to pity: "When you shake, even if a woman is willing, this method 
is best not to use. This ghost groom is a murderer. If it is a miss, we will 
not be like it, but if the bride is taken away, a weak woman can’t escape. I 
can’t resist, I’m afraid there will be only one dead road.” 


He swayed: "If you can't find a woman, you can only find a man." 
Nanfeng Road: "Where to find a man who is willing to dress up..." 
The voice did not fall, and the eyes of both of them shifted. 

Xie Li is still smiling: "???" 

Late, Nanyang Temple. 

Thanks to the pity, the head turned out from behind the temple. 


When the two people at the temple gate looked at it, the south wind 
screamed on the spot: "Fuck!!!" rushed out. 


Thanks for a moment, said: "Where 1s it?" 
It’s a gentle handsome man who can see it and see it at a glance. 


But for this reason, a handsome and handsome man wearing a woman's 
wedding dress, this picture, many people may not be able to look directly. 
For example, in the south wind, he may not accept it personally, so the 
reaction is so intense. 


Thanks for watching and standing in the same place, his eyes glanced up 
and down in a complicated way, saying: "Do you have anything to say?" 


Nodded and nodded, said: "If I am a ghost groom, whoever sends this 
woman to me..." 


Thanks to pity: "Are you going to kill this town?" 
Shake the cold and honestly: "No, I will kill this woman." 
Thanks and smiled: "That can only say, fortunately, I am not a woman." 


He swayed: "I feel that you are better off asking the Psychic Array now to 
see if any of the priests are willing to teach you how to change, more 
practical." 


There are indeed several priests in the heavens who are familiar with the 
law of transformation because of special needs. But I am afraid that it will 
be too late to learn again. At that end, Nanfeng’s face came in. When he 
finished, he calmed down a lot. This is exactly the same as the general he 
served. Thank you for watching the sky is too late, said: "Well, the cover is 
the same." He said that he had to cover himself, but he raised his hand and 
said: "And slow. You don't know how the ghost groom hurts. If he 1s 
deceived when he uncovers his hair, he will become a sudden change 
under the wrath of anger. 


Thanks for listening to this, it makes sense, but when he stepped forward, 
he heard a "squeaky" sound. 


The red wedding dress that was raised for him was not very fit. 


The original woman's body shape is much smaller. When he wears it, the 
waist is not very different, but the sleeves are lifted, and they are 
extremely restrained. When the action is big, the clothes are torn open. 
Just as he found everywhere where the crack was broken, there was a voice 
at the entrance of the temple: "Excuse me..." 


The three looked at the sound, and saw Xiaoying’s hand holding a folded 
white dress, standing at the entrance of the temple and staring at them. 


She said: "I remember seeing you here last night, I want to see if I will 
meet... I have washed the clothes, put it here. Thank you, yesterday and 
today." 


Xie Pity is about to smile at her, suddenly remembered what he is like 
now, decided not to talk too scary. 


Who knows, Xiaoyan not only was not scared by him, but went a step 
forward and said: "You are... if you like, I help you?" 


"..." Thanks, "No, girl, don't misunderstand, I don't have this hobby." 


Xiaoying said: "I know that I know. I mean if you don't give up, I can help 
you. You... are you going to catch the ghost groom?" 


Her voice and face suddenly rose up and said: "I, I will change the clothes, 
I have needlework with me, I can change it if I am not good, I will dress 
up, I will help you!" 


After the two musk, thanked again, bowed his head and came out from 
behind the temple. 


This time, the bride's hijab has been covered, and the south wind and the 
swaying seem to want to sneak a glimpse, but ultimately decided to 
cherish their eyes. The sedan chair they found was at the entrance of the 
temple, and the carefully selected bearers had long waited for a long time. 
The moon and the night are high, and the Prince’s Highness is so a new 
wedding dress, sitting on the red flower. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 7: Ghostly pro- 
pals on the sedan 


The sedan chair, the whole body car are all red satin, the color line 
embroidered with flowers and moons and dragons and phoenixes. The 
south wind and the swaying two people are left and right, and the guards 
are on the side of the sedan chair. Thanks to the pity, he walked in the 
sedan, walking with the bearer, and swaying. 


The eight bearers of the eight-lifted sedan are all military officers of the 
martial arts. The south wind and the swaying in order to find the martial 
arts high-powered bearers to pretend to send the pro-team, directly on the 
official's house, revealing a hand, saying that it is going to the night to 
explore with Junshan. The lord said that he would pull out a row of 
military officers from the high school. However, the reason why they want 
to find martial arts superiority is not to expect them to help, but to ask 
them to escape from self-protection when the murderer is in trouble. 


In fact, the eight military officers also did not think much about them. 
They are a good first-class player in the government. Where is the leader 
of the group? These two little white faces actually ride on their heads as 
soon as they come up, and they also make them a bearer. It can be said that 
it is very unpleasant. The master's order must be inconsistent, strong in the 
heart of disdain, but the heart is angry, it is inevitable to attack, 
deliberately from time to time, the foot is awkward, the hand is shocked, 
and a sedan chair is uplifted. The outsiders can't see it, but the people 
sitting in the sedan chair are only slightly delicate, and they are afraid to 
vomit. 


Upside down, I heard the politeness in the sedan chair sighed low, and 
several military officers could not help but secretly smug. 


Shake it outside and cool down: "Miss, what's wrong with you? When you 
are older, you will cry." 


Indeed, many of the brides are out of the cabinet, and many of them are 
crying on the sedan chair. Thanks for the pity and sorrow, but when I 
opened my mouth, my voice was calm and free. I didn’t have a slight 
disappointment. “No. It’s just that I suddenly found out that this is a very 
important thing in the pro-team.” 


Nanfeng Road: "What is missing? We should all prepare for this 
preparation." 


Thanks and laughs: "Two dowry." 


The two outsiders glanced at each other and didn't know what to imagine. 
It was a bit of aversion. He swayed: "You are poor at home, no money to 
buy, you can do it." 


Thanks for your pity: "Well." 


The bearers of the bearers listened to their instigations, and they all 
couldn’t help it. As a result, the dissatisfaction of the heart was dissipated 
a lot. The intention of being close was a little more, and the sedan chair 
was also stable. Thanks to pity, he leaned back and was sitting in danger 
and closed his eyes. 


Who knows, not long after, a string of children's laughter suddenly 
sounded in his ear. 


Giggle, oh, haha. 


Laughter spread like a sly in the mountains, ethereal and strange. 
However, the sedan chair did not stop, and still walked steadily. Even the 
south wind and the swaying sound did not sound, it seems that no 
abnormalities were found. 


Xie pity opened his eyes and whispered: "South wind, help." 


The south wind is on the left side of the sedan chair and asks: "What 
happened?" 


Thanks for the pity: "There is something coming." 


At this time, this "send to the pro-team" has gradually entered the depths 
of Junshan. 


The silence of the four wilderness, even the sound of the wooden sedan, 
the sound of the dead leaves and the sound of the bearers' breaths, 
appeared to be slightly noisy in the silence of this party. 


The laughter of the child has not disappeared. From time to time, as if in 
the depths of the forest, from time to time, as if lying on the side of the 
sedan. 


The southerly look is condensed: "I didn't hear any sound." 
The swaying is also cold: "I don't have it." 
The rest of the bearers are even less likely to have. 


Thanks to the pity: "That is to say, it is deliberately only let me hear it 
alone. 


The eight military officers are from the martial arts high-powered, plus 
the feeling that the ghosts and grooms are not regular, and they will not 
return tonight, and they are not afraid, but somehow, they suddenly think 
of the forty incompetent missing pro-weapons. A few of the foreheads 
suddenly showed a cold sweat. Thanks to pity, someone was stagnating, 
and said, "Don't stop. There is nothing to pretend." 


The south wind waved and signaled them to continue. Thanks again, "He is 
singing." 


He asked: "What are you singing?" 


Listen carefully to the voice of the child, thank you for a word, one 
sentence and one sentence: "New married mother, new married mother, 
new bride on the red flower sedan..." 


In the middle of the night, his slightly slow voice was clear, and he was 
clearly reading, but the eight military officers seemed to hear the sound of 
a childish child, and he was singing this strange little with him. The heart 
iS creepy. 


Xie pity continued: "Tears, over the hills, under the cover of the head... I 
laughed... Ghost new... Ghost and groom? Or what?" 


After a pause, he said: "No. It has been laughing, I can't hear it." 
Nanfeng frowned: "What do you mean?" 


Thanks to the pity: "The literal meaning 1s to let the bride sitting in the 
sedan chair, just cry, don't laugh." 


Nanfeng Road: "I mean this thing is running to remind you what it means." 


Shake but always have different opinions, said: "It may not be a reminder, 
it may be deliberately contrary to its own way, in fact, laughter can be 
safe, but its purpose is to deceive people cry. It is difficult to protect the 
brides of the past is not so When." 


Thanks to pity: "When the ordinary bride, I heard this voice on the road, I 
was scared to death, I was scared to death, and I laughed. And, no matter 
what I cried or laughed, what was the worst result? ?" 


Fudao said: "It was robbed." 
Thanks: "The purpose of our trip tonight is not this?" 


There was a sound in the nose, but it didn’t continue to refute. Thanks, 
"There is one thing, I think I have to tell you." 


South Wind Road: "What?" 


Thanks to the pity: "I started laughing when I started from the sedan 
chair." 


" " 


The voice just fell, and the car body suddenly sank! 


The eight military officers outside suddenly had a riot, and the sedan chair 
stopped completely. The south wind shouted: "Don't panic!" 


Thanks for the slightest rise, he said: "What happened?" 
Shake the ground: "Nothing. Meet a group of beasts." 


When he had just finished answering, thanked Pity and heard a scream of 
wolverine breaking through the night sky. 


The wolves block! 


I don’t think it’s too normal to think about it. “Ask, is there a lot of wolves 
in Junshan?” 


An armed officer carrier replied outside: "I have never heard of it! How 
could this be with Junshan!" 


Thank you for raising your eyebrows and saying, "Well, then we are 
coming to the right place." 


The barren mountain wolves are nothing more than the south wind and the 
swaying, but they can't help the group of military officers who climbed the 
molds on the tip of the sword all the year round, but they were all 
pondering the ghostly songs in the ghosts, which was too late to be 
shocked. In the wild forest of the night, a pair of dark-eyed wolf eyes lit 
up, and one after another hungry wolf slowly came out of the forest and 
surrounded. But this can be seen as a beast that can be beaten, compared 
with something that can't be touched, but it is much stronger, so everyone 
is gearing up and ready to launch a big fight. However, the good play is 
still behind. Followed by their pace, rustling, sly, like a beast, a strange, 
strange voice. 


A military officer was shocked: "This... what is this! What is this!!!" 


The south wind also snorted. Thanks for knowing that there is a sudden 
change in the mind, I want to stand up and say: "What happened?" 


The south wind immediately said: "Don't come out!" 


Thanks to the pity, the car body jerked, and it seemed that something was 
lying on the car door. His head was not low, his eyes narrowed slightly, and 
from the gap under the hijab, he saw a black back. 


It actually came into the sedan chair! 


The thing slammed into the car door, but it was suddenly dragged out by 
the outside. The south wind shouted in front of the sedan chair: "Fucking, 
itis a slave!" 


One listens to the slave, thank you for knowing that this can be 
troublesome. 


In the judgment of the Lingwen Temple, the slaves are a kind of thing that 
is not worthy of even the "bad" evaluation. 


It is said that the slaves were originally human, but now, even if they are 
humans, it is also a deformed person. It has a face and a face, but it 1s 
ambiguous; it has hands and feet, but it is unable to go straight; it has teeth 
and teeth, but it bites for a long time. However, if you let everyone choose, 
everyone would rather encounter a more terrible "evil" or "severe" and 
would not want to encounter it. 


Because, slaves are often associated with other demons and ghosts. The 
prey is fighting the enemy, and it pops up, using its entangled hands and 
feet, the sticky body/liquid, and the partner who goes on and on, the 
entanglement of the prey with cowhide. Despite its low fighting power, but 
because it is extremely tenacious and often appears in groups, you can't 
open them, and it's hard to kill them quickly. Gradually, it will be 
exhausted by it, and it will be stumped by it. There will always be a 
momentary intention, and it will be succeeded by the enemies waiting for 
the opportunity. 


After the prey is killed by other monsters and demon ghosts, the slaves 
will be stunned by the other side's leftover limbs, and they will be eaten 
with gusto. 


This is really a very disgusting thing. If it is the sacred officer of the 
heavenly court, the sacred light will release a weapon and sacrifice, 
naturally it will scare them to avoid the three homes, but for the small 
priests of the heavenly heavens, this thing is very difficult to entangle. The 
swaying is far from evil: "I, the most hateful, this thing! The Temple of the 
Spirit, did you say that there is this?" 


Thanks for your pity: "No." 
Fudao said: "What is the use for him!" 
Thank you for asking: "How many are you coming?" 


South Wind Road: "More than one hundred, maybe more! Don't come 
out!" 


The more and more such things, the more powerful, more than ten will be 
difficult to deal with. More than one hundred? It’s more than enough to 
kill them alive. It generally likes to live in a populous place, and never 
imagined that there would be so many ones in Junshan. Thanks a little bit 
of thought, slightly raised his arms, revealing a small half of the bandaged 
wrist. 


He said: "Go." 


When the two words came out, the white smack automatically slipped 
from his wrist. If there was life, he flew out from the curtain of the sedan 
chair. 


Thanks for the pity, sitting in the sedan, Wen said: "strangle." 
In the middle of the night, a white snake was swam out. 


The white sham fake bandages seem to be at most a few feet when 
wrapped in Xie's hands, but the ghostly lightning shuttle is like a smashing 
crowd, but it seems endless. Just listen to the "catch" and "??" a series of 
gaps that do not leave a crisp sound, dozens of wild wolves, slaves, and the 
moment they are broken by the neck! 


The six slaves who were entangled in the south wind fell to the ground in 
an instant. He flew a wild wolf in one palm, but he did not escape from the 
danger. He said to the sedan chair incredulously: "What is that!! You are 
not without mana." Drive the magic weapon?!" 


Thanks to the pity: "There are always exceptions in everything..." 


Nanfeng was very angry, and he shot the car door: "Thank you! You said 
clearly, what exactly is 1t?! Is it..." 


In this palm of his hand, the entire sedan chair was almost scattered, and 
Xie Pity had to raise his hand to help the door. The slightest glimpse of the 
two styles of the South Wind reminded him of the appearance of the old 
wind. The south wind has yet to be said, and the screams of the military 
officers came from far away. Shake the cold channel: "If there 1s anything, 
I will repel this wave first!" 


The south wind could not, but had to go to the rescue. Xie pity quickly 
returned to God and said: "The south wind is shaking, you should go first." 


The south wind turned back: "What?" 


Thanks to pity: "You will always have something around the sedan chair. If 
you can't finish it, let's take it first. I will stay with the groom." 


The south wind has to be stunned again: "You are alone..." He shook the 
other side and said coldly: "He can drive the shackle anyway, and he can't 
do anything for a while. You have time to pull and pull, it's better to settle 
down first." This group will come back to help. I will go first." 


He was so sloppy, and he walked away, not for a moment. The south wind 
bit his teeth, knowing what he said is not empty, but also to the remaining 
several military officials: "Follow me first!" 


Sure enough, after leaving the sedan chair, the wolves and the slaves were 
still entangled, but there was no new wave of siege. The two men guarded 
four military officers. On the road, they fought and shook their voices: 
"There is no reason, if not me..." 


With all this in mind, the two looked at each other with a gaze. He 
swallowed his words and turned to the beginning. Both of them 
temporarily stopped accepting and continued to rush. 


Around the sedan chair, the corpse is full of land. 


If the evil spirits had already strangled the wolves and the slaves who had 
been thrown up, they flew back and automatically wrapped back his wrists. 
Cherished sitting quietly in the sedan, surrounded by boundless darkness 
and rustling trees. 


Suddenly, everything 1s quiet. 


The sound of the wind, the sound of Lin Haisheng, the sound of the 
monsters, all of them suddenly fell into a dead silence, as if they were 
jealous of something. 


Then he heard a very light smile. 

Like a young man, it is like a teenager. 

Thank you for your pity. 

If evil spirits are quietly wrapped around his hands, he is ready to go. As 
soon as the coming out reveals a murderous temper, it will immediately go 


back ten times with madness. 


Who knows, he did not wait for the sudden pains and killings, but he 
waited for something else. 


The curtain of the sedan chair was slightly picked up, and through the gap 
under the bright red hijab, thank you for seeing, the man extended a hand 
to him. 


The knuckles are clear. The third finger is tied with a red line. In the 
slender and pale hands, it seems like a bright knot. 2k novel reading 
network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 8: Ghostly pro- 
pals on the sedan 


Give, or not? 


Thanks for your pity, I haven’t thought about it yet. It’s time to continue. 
I’m sitting on it, or I’m going to hide behind the panicked young lady. The 
owner of the hand is Very patient and quite graceful, he does not move, he 
does not move, it seems that he is waiting for his reply. 


For a long while, the ghost made the difference, and thanked the pity for 
reaching out. 


He stood up and went to open the curtain to the sedan, but the other party 
had taken the first step and provoked a red curtain for him. The man took 
his hand, but he did not hold it too tightly, as if he was afraid of pinching 
him, but it gave him a cautious illusion. 


Xie pity lowered his head, led by him, slowly came out of the sedan chair, 
and now he saw a wolf corpse shackled by Ruo Ruo, and his heart twitched 
slightly, his feet twitched, and he panted forward. go with. 


The comer immediately backhanded and helped him. 


This support, thankfulness is also a backhand grip, only to feel something 
cold and cold, it turns out that the person wearing a pair of silver 
wristbands. 


This wristband is gorgeous and exquisite, and the pattern 1s ancient. It is 
carved with maple leaves, butterflies, and beasts. It is quite mysterious 
and not like the Central Plains. It is like an alien antiquities. Kankan 
buckled the wrist of this person, looking refined and neat. 


Icy silver, pale hands, lifeless, but a bit murderous and evil. 


His fall is pretending to be a temptation, and if the evil spirits are always 
entangled under the wide sleeves, they are ready to go. However, the 
person who came here only took his hand and led him forward. 


Thanks for the pity, the cover is not clear, and the second 1s to delay the 
time. Therefore, the intention is very slow, and the other party is also very 
slow with his pace. The other hand comes from time to time. Holding him, 
as if he was afraid that he would fall again. Although Xie Pity is a 
120,000-point vigilance, I can't help but think: "If this is really a groom, it 
is really gentle and considerate." 


At this moment, he suddenly heard a very soft voice. Every time the two 
took a step, the sound would be clear and loud. Just as he was pondering 
what it was, there was a sudden roar of wild beasts. 


Wild wolf! 


Thanks for the slight movement of the body, if the evil is suddenly on his 
wrist. 


Who knows, he still has no movements, but the person holding him has 
patted him twice on the back of his hand, as if he is comforting, so that he 
should not worry. These two, light can be said to be gentle, thank you for a 
slight glimpse, and the burst of low roar has been pressed. After a closer 
look, he suddenly discovered that these wolves were not snarling but 
choked. 


That is clearly a sob of the beast that fears to the extreme, can't move, and 
dying. 


His curiosity about who is coming 1s getting stronger. I just wanted to 
cover the hijab and take a look at it. I can also know that it is not 
appropriate. I can only see the leopard through the gap under the red hijab. 
What I saw was the hem of a red dress. Under the red clothes, a pair of 
black leather boots are walking slowly. 


The pair of black leather boots were tightly packed, and a pair of slender, 
straight legs went up, and they walked along, and it was beautiful. There 


are two small pieces of silver chain hanging on the side of the black boots. 
Every step, the silver chain shakes and makes a crisp creaking sound. It is 
nice. 


This footstep is careless, with a light, more like a teenager. However, 
every step of his life is 1n the chest, as if no one can hinder his pace. 
Whoever dares to block his way, who is waiting to be crushed by him. In 
this way, it is to teach the pity and to say no, this is what kind of character. 


Just as he thought about himself, suddenly, the white things on the ground 
broke into his eyes. 


It is a skull cover. 
Xie pity at the foot stagnate for a moment. 


He saw at a glance that there was a problem with the way the skull was 
placed. This is clearly the corner of a certain array of methods. If it 
touches it, it is feared that the entire formation will immediately attack 
this point. But looking at the pace of the boy, it seems that I didn’t notice 
that there was something there. He was trying not to make a sound 
reminder, only to hear the "kick" sound of a terrible sound, just see the 
young man go down and instantly smash the skull cover. 


Then, as if he didn't feel anything in general, he walked indifferently on 
the pile of powder. 


Thanks: "..." 


He actually, just like this, stepped on the whole array, and turned it into a 
pile of waste powder... 


At this time, the boy’s foot was next. Thanks to the heart, I thought if he 
should have some action, but the boy only stayed for a while and 
continued to lead him forward. After two steps, there was a sudden "drip 
reply" sound, as if a little raindrop hit the umbrella. It turned out that the 
boy was holding up an umbrella and blocking it on the head of the two. 


Although it was out of date, Xie pity couldn’t help but praise him for 
being considerate, but my heart was still quite strange: "Is it raining?" 


Qq Montenegro, wilderness forest. Far from the depths of the mountains, 
the wolves are long on the moon. I don't know if it was because of a killing 
in the mountains, and there was a faint **** smell in the cold air. 


The feelings of the scene, the enchantment is extremely. But the boy took 
him in one hand and held the umbrella in one hand. He slowly moved 
forward, but it was a fascinating wind and moon. 


The strange rain was amazing, and it was amazing. After a while, the 
sound of the raindrops and the drops of the umbrella disappeared. The boy 
also settled in the set, seemingly put away the umbrella, and at the same 
time, finally took his hand and took a step closer to him. 


Holding his hand along the way, gently held the corner of the hijab and 
slowly picked it up. 


Xie Pity is waiting for this moment along the way, fixed still, watching the 
lingering red curtain slowly unveiled upwards - 


Inciting! 
It’s not that the boy has murdered, but he has to preempt, pretend to say! 


Who knows, if the evil spirits fly out and bring up a cross wind, the bright 
red hijab leaves the boy's hand, flies up and falls, thanking the pity only to 
see the shadow of a red boy, if the evil is worn past. 


The boy was broken into thousands of silver butterflies, and they burst into 
a burst of silvery starry wind. 


Although it is still out of place, but after thanking the two steps back, I 
can't help but marvel at it. This scene is really beautiful. At this time, a 
silver butterfly faintly flew in front of his eyes, he still has to look closer, 
the silver butterfly is flying around him two times, this will be merged 


into the butterfly wind, all into a silver Part of the light, fluttering wings to 
the night sky. 


For a while, thank you for returning to God, thinking: "Is this boy a ghost 
groom?" 


In his opinion, it always feels awkward. If so, the wolves in Junshan 
should be his subordinates. How can he be afraid to become the 
appearance? And the law on the road should also be laid by the ghost 
groom, but he just casually ... trampled. 


But if not, why did this boy come to rob the sedan? 


The more I think about it, the more weird it is. I feel sorry for it. I thought 
about it, and thought: "Forget it, 1t may just be just a passing. It’s still a 
matter of time. It’s important to do things." Hey, I heard it. It turned out 
that there was a building not far away, standing there. 


Since the boy brought him here, the building was painstakingly hidden in 
the puzzle, that is, you have to go in and see. 


Thanks for a few steps, suddenly stopped, think about it, and turned back, 
picked up the hijab on the ground and took it, and took it in his hand, and 
then continued to walk over there. 


This building red wall high courtyard, brick and stone shingles slightly 
mottled, is like a city temple with many years, and according to the 
experience of Xie Li, this form 1s mostly a Wu Shen Temple. Sure enough, 
as soon as he looked up, he saw the words of three diamond bones on the 
top of the gate: 


"Mingguang Temple"! 


The general of the Northern Wushu Mingguang, the last time the Lingwen 
said in the psychic array, the general who was very popular in the north. It 
is no wonder that they did not find the Mingguang Hall nearby, but found 
the Nanyang Temple. It turned out that the Mingguang Temple here and 


the Junshan, had long been blocked by a puzzle. What is the connection 
between this ghost groom and General Mingguang? 


However, this Mingguang general can be described as a stalwart and hot- 
skinned priest, and his position in the north is also very stable. I don’t 
think that the individual will be willing to engage with the ghosts and 
grooms. It is not a miracle to be unlucky enough to be ruined by fierce 
objects. What the truth 1s, let’s take a look. 


He went up, the temple door was closed, but he was not locked, and he 
pushed it open. After pushing it away, a strange smell came over. 


It is not a gray gas that has not been used for many years, but a faint smell 
of rot. 


Thanks for the backhand to cover the door, making it look like no one has 
come in and stepping into the temple. In the center of the main hall is a 
statue of Wu Shen, naturally the general of the Northern Wu Shenguang. 
Many humanoid things, such as statues, dolls, and portraits, are easily 
contaminated with evil spirits. So, first of all, go to see the statue of the 
statue of Wu. 


After watching it for a long time, the conclusion is: this statue is very well 
molded. Zhibao sword, Peiyu belt. Handsome, imposing. No problem, the 
rancid smell is not uploaded from the image of God, so thank you for 
leaving him, and turn to the back of the hall. 


This turn, thank you for the whole person must, the pupil shrinks instantly. 


A group of women wearing red wedding dresses and covered hijab stood in 
front of him. 


The faint smell of rancid smell came from these women in the wedding 
dress. 


Xie pity quickly set the mind, one by one, the past, one, two, three, four ... 
has been counted to seventeen. 


It was the seventeen brides who were missing in the area with Junshan! 


Some brides' wedding dresses have faded and are very old and broken. 
They should be the brides who disappeared earlier. Some brides' wedding 
dresses are new and the style is also new. The smell of old-aged carrion is 
extremely weak, and it should have been missing recently. Thanks a little 
thought, uncovering a bride's hijab. 


Under the bright red hijab is a pale face, white is a little green, and it is 
terrible to be faint moonlight. The most terrifying thing is that the face of 
this woman's death has been twisted, but on this distorted face, there is 
still a stiff smile. 


Thanks again, the woman’s hijab was uncovered, and the same mouth was 
raised. 


The dead man in the room was wearing a nice dress and smiling. 


Thanks to the ear, there seems to be another strange song sung by the 
child: "New married mother, new married mother, new bride on the red 
flower sedan... tearful, over the hill, under the hijab, laughing..." 


Suddenly, he heard a strange sound coming from outside the temple. 


It was a very strange sound. Strange to describe, like two sticks wrapped in 
thick cloth, slamming on the ground, and like heavy objects hanging on 
the ground. The sound came from far to near, and it came very fast. It was 
necessary to go to the door of Mingguang Temple. Just listen to "Oh--", a 
long sound, the door of the Mingguang Temple was pushed open. 


Whether it is an individual or something, most of it is the ghost groom. 
And now, it is back! 


There was nowhere to escape from the back of the temple, and there was 
nowhere to hide. Xie pity only thought for a moment. When I saw this row 
of brides, I immediately re-covered the hijab and stood up and motionless. 


If only 3,456 bodies stand here, it is natural to see through the number at a 
glance, but now there are seventeen brides’ bodies, unless they are counted 
one by one like others, otherwise it is difficult to detect them immediately. 
Someone is mixing in. 


He just stood in and listened to the strange voices, "??" and "go". 


Thanks and pity, standing still, thinking: "What is this sound? Listening to 
the length of the pause, a bit like footsteps, can there be something like the 
footsteps? This is definitely not the boy who brought me, he is It’s easy to 

take care of, and it’s also a ringing bell.” 


Suddenly, he thought of something, his heart slammed tightly: "Not good, 
tall and wrong!" 


These bodies are all women, but he is a real man, born to grow a little 
more than a woman. Although I can't see more people at a glance, one 
person in a group of corpses is particularly tall, but it can be seen at a 
glance! 


However, after thinking about it again, thanking and patience quickly 
calmed down. He is indeed high, but the girl Xiaoyan is simply giving him 
a bunch of hair, not doing much, and these brides are dressed up, their hair 
is high, and some wear a phoenix crown, and their heads rise high. A big 
piece, some may not be shorter than him, even if he is tall, it should not be 
very eye-catching. 


Just thinking about it, he heard a "brushing" sound, two feet away from 
him. 


After a while, it was a "brush", this time, a little closer to him. 
Thanks for the reaction, what the ghost groom is doing. 


It opens the bride's hijab one by one, and looks at the face of the body one 
by one! 


"boom!" 


Do not hit at this time, but when? If the evil spirits fly out, they are hitting 
the ghost groom. 


Just listen to a loud noise, black fog blowing. Xie pity does not know that 
the demon fog is poisonous. He does not have a spiritual guard. He 
immediately puts his breath on his mouth and nose, and at the same time 
urges the evil spirits to dance out of the wind and dispel the black fog. Just 
listen to '"??" and "??"! Thanks for your pity, I saw a short black shadow 
passing by at the entrance of the temple. The temple door opened wide, 
and a black mist rushed toward the woods. 


Xie pity took the initiative and immediately chased out. Who knows, he 
chased a few steps, the fire in the woods 1s soaring, there is a cry of 
shouting and shouting: "Chong ah -!" 


The voice of a young man is particularly bright: "Catch the ugly and 
blame, kill the people! Grab the ugly and blame, and kill the people! The 
bounty is equally divided!" It was the little Pengtou. Thanks for the 
bitterness in the heart, this group of people said that they would go up the 
mountain, and they actually went up the mountain. There was originally a 
way to cover them, but they couldn’t find them, but they were trampled by 
the teenager’s feet. They licked the cats. The dead mouse, actually found 
it. Look again, the direction they came in was just the direction in which 
the ghost groom escaped! 


Xie pity, if the evil spirits rushed over, shouted: "Stand up and move!" 
Everyone is a glimpse. He still talked, and he listened to Xiao Pengtou 
eagerly asking: "Girl! You were smashed into the mountains by the ghost 
groom? What is your name? We are here to save you, you can rest 
assured!" 


Thanks for a pity, my heart is funny, this reminds me that he is still a 
woman. There is no mirror in Nanyang Temple. He doesn't know what he 
is like now, but looking at the reaction, Xiaoying's hand should be very 
clever. This group of people was shocked to see him as a real new bride. 
This little Pengtou probably still counts on him as the 17th bride, so that 
he can get the reward. In any case, this situation can not let the villagers 
run around, but he can not guarantee that the ghost groom did not continue 


to flee. At this time, two black teenagers rushed over, and Xie pity 
immediately called: "The south wind is shaking, come help me!" 


Who knows, these two people follow the sound, but they are all in one, and 
they are two steps backwards. Thanks to a few words before they react. 
Thanks to the pity: "Where did you come from there? What could you 
encounter on the road?" 


South Wind Road: "Never!" 


Thanks for your pity: "Well. I am going to shake it. You are now going 
down this road and searching around to make sure the ghost groom is not 
at large." 


Hearing, he turned and left. Thanks again, "Nanfeng, you hold it here and 
make sure that no one can walk. If you don't find the ghost groom in the 
mountains, it must be in this group now!" 


Hearing the words, the big man is stunned. Xiao Pengtou also saw that he 
was not a woman. The first one jumped up: "Can't one go? What are you 
doing! There is no king. The big guys don't listen to them..." 


His shackles have not yet landed, and the south wind has slammed out, and 
a tree surrounded by one person has broken down. Everyone immediately 
remembered it. The boy yelled at something that was not in a word. If he 
gave him a post, it would be useless to lose money, and he would not 
speak. Xiao Pengtou said again: "You said that the ghost groom is inside 
us. We are all famous and have surnames here. Do not believe that you use 
the torch to take pictures of everyone's faces, one by one!" 


Thanks for the pity: "Southwind." 


Nanfeng took the torch in the hand of Xiao Pengtou and held it one by one. 
Every face is full of sweat, or nervous, or stunned, or excited, all vivid. 
Xie pity couldn’t see why, came before everyone, saying: “Everyone, it’s 
offensive to offend, but I hurt the ghost groom. It ran away, definitely not 
far away. My two children came on the road. I didn't touch it, I was afraid 
that this thing would be mixed in you. I also bothered to take a closer look 


at each other and see each other's faces to see if there is a person you don't 
know is mixed in." 


When everyone heard that the ghost groom might be mixed in this group 
of people, it was also a creepy, not dare to care about it, face to face, you 
see me, I see you up. After watching it for a long time, someone suddenly 
blamed: "How are you here?" 


Thanks for the brow, I grabbed the word and said: "Who?" 


Xiao Pengtou grabbed someone else's torch and took a photo to a corner, 
saying: "This ugly eight!" 


He pointed at it, it was actually a small firefly. Xiaoyan’s snot-squinted 
face looked a bit distorted under the fire. It seemed that he could not stand 
the light, and raised his hand to block his face. “I... I just don’t worry, I 
want to come up and see...” 


Seeing her panic, she took the torch from Xiao Pengtou and said to 
everyone: "How are you?" 


A group of people shook their heads and said: "There are no people you 
don't know." "I have seen it." 


Nanfeng Road: "Who will he be attached to?" 
Thanks for a moment, he said: "It shouldn't be, it's a solid one." 


Nanfeng Road: "But it is already a 'fierce', can change the form, it is hard 
to say." 


They are hesitating here, and Xiao Pengtou 1s the first one to say: "Ghost 
and groom are not in us. Do you see it clearly? If you see it clearly, you 
will not let us go!" 


Everyone was sparsely attached, and Xie pity swept them and said: "Please 
also stay in front of this Mingguang Temple, don't leave half a step." 


Everyone has to complain again, and they can't dare to see the south wind 
look cold. At this time, the support was also back, saying: "Nothing 
nearby." 


Looking at the black-pressed head in front of the Temple of Light, Xie pity 
slowly said: "That, it must be in this group now." 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 9: Mountain 
lock ancient temple upside down dead forest 


I waved to notice that there was a small swell in the crowd, frowning: 
"How come there is a woman here?" 


Although his tone was not hot, but he was not very kind, Xiaoying listened 
and bowed his head. Thanks, "She is afraid of something, come up and 
see,” 


Helping others to ask: "Are you coming up with her?" 


The people first hesitated, and later said: "I don't remember." "T can't tell." 
"No, we didn't have her when we came up!" "I didn't see it anyway." "I 
didn't see it." 


Xiaoying said: "Because I was secretly coming..." Xiao Pengtou 
immediately said: "Why are you secretly following up? Are you guilty? 
Are you a ghost groom posing?" 


As soon as this statement came out, Xiaoying had a large space around her 
time. She waved her hand and said: "No... No, I am Xiaoying, I am true!" 
She said to her: "The son, we are only I have seen it! I will give you rouge 
and dress it up..." 


Thanks: "..." 


Everyone stared at him and someone started to whisper. He heard the 
words "likes", "different from ordinary people" and "can't believe". He 
coughed twice and said: "This, mission demand. Mission demand. South 
wind Shake, you..." 


As soon as he turned his head, he realized that the south wind and the 
swaying had been staring at him with gaze, and his feet were restrained to 
pull a little away from him. 


Thanks to the gaze of their eyes, they said: "...Do you have anything to 
say?" 


Where did he know that the girl's point-and-shoot pen was a fascinating 
workman, and he taught him to use eyebrows and eyebrows. If you don't 
speak, it is a beautiful girl who is gentle and twirling. The two men looked 
at him and they were shocked, unbelievable, doubtful about life, and 
uncomfortable. The face 1s still that face, but I don’t know exactly who I 
am talking to. Helping the south wind: "What do you want to say." 


The south wind shook his head immediately: "I have nothing to say." 
"..." Thanks, "You still say something." 


At this time, the crowd said: "Hey? Is this a Mingguang Temple?" "There 
is still a Mingguang Temple in this mountain? It's rare, I have never seen 
it." 


Everyone has seen the strangeness. Xie pity but suddenly said: "Yes, 
Mingguang Temple." 


Nanfeng heard that his tone was different and said: "What happened?" 


Thanks to pity: "The northern Mingming is the site of General Mingguang. 
His incense is not not prosperous, nor is the mana strong, but why is there 
only Nanyang Temple under the Junshan Mountain?" 


The official lord prayed to the Emperor Wu of the gods, but it is a very 
good understanding, because the Emperor Wu of the gods is the first **** 
of the millennium, the status is higher than the generals of Mingguang, 
naturally the more you go to the top to seek insurance. General Mingguang 
and General Nanyang are equal in status. It is true that this Mingguang 
general has nine thousand palace views, and one thousand more than 
Nanyang. I really can’t think of it. Why do you have to go far. He said 
again: "It is reasonable to say that even if this Mingguang Temple in 
Junshan is occupied by the ghost groom, the others can't find it, but it 1s 
obvious that another Mingguang Temple can be built. Why do you want to 
build another Valkyrie? temple?" 


Raising the awareness, said: "There must be other reasons." 


Thanks to pity: "Yes, there must be other reasons. Let the people in the 
area of ??Junshan choose not to build Mingguang Temple again. Whoever 
borrows me from me, I am afraid I have to ask..." 


At this time, someone shouted: "A lot of brides!" 


As soon as the sound came from the temple, Xie pity turned and turned. 
He let the group stay in the open space in front of the temple. They turned 
a deaf ear and ran into the temple! 


Nanfeng shouted: "The situation is dangerous, don't run around!" 


That Xiao Peng’s head said: “The big guys don’t listen to them. They don’t 
dare to move them! We are good people. Do they dare to kill them? 
Everyone gets up and gets up!” 


He was actually sure that the three people wouldn’t really take them to the 
waist and discount them. The south wind knuckles creaking and it looks 
like it is smashing. As a military officer in the temple of Nanyang Temple, 
he really can't arbitrarily discount which mortal's hands and feet, and teach 
the supervising officer to find a slogan, but it is not fun. Xiao Pengtou 
sneered again: "Don't think that I can't see what you guys are trying to do. 
Don't just want to lie to us not to move, to monopolize the merits, to get a 
reward for yourself?" 


He was so incited that half of the people were eager to move and followed 
him into the temple. The swaying sleeves are indifferent: "Let them go. 
This group of people." It was disgusting and I didn't want to take care of it. 
In the Temple of Light, there is another scream: "These are dead!" 


Xiao Pengtou was also shocked and said: "All are dead?!" "All are dead!" 
"The evil door is gone, how is this like death for decades? Not yet bad?" 
No two, he immediately thought Opened: "It’s okay to die. Let the bride’s 
body be carried down the mountain. Do they still have money to buy?” 


The blessing of the eyes gradually sank. And everyone thinks, this is the 
truth. Some people are jealous, some are jealous, and some are happy 
again. Xie pity stood at the entrance of the temple and said: "You should 
come out first. After the temple, there is no wind and smoldering all the 
year round, and ordinary people inhaling the body is going to have an 
accident." 


This sounds very reasonable. Everyone doesn't know whether to listen or 
not. Xiaoying whispered: "Don't you like this? It's so dangerous here, or 
you should listen to this son first, go out and sit..." 


But this group of people don’t even listen to a few words, but where will 
they listen to her? No one cares. Xiaoying was not discouraged and said it 
several times. Xiao Pengtou also taught them: "The big guy picks up the 
fresh corpse, the old corpse, and their family members don't know that 
they are not in the world, so don't bother to go down." There are still a few 
people who praise him. Smart and capable. Thank you for listening to it. I 
saw someone crying and laughing. I saw someone moving his hands and 
feet. "Don't expose the hijab! The hijab can block the corpse and yang. You 
are too yang, if you **** them in, it's hard to keep something going. "" 


However, in order to pick a fresh body, a group of people had already 
smashed the hijab seven or seven. Thanks to the south wind that came to 
the door, he shook his head and knew that he couldn’t stop the group. After 
all, they couldn’t beat them to the blood. So what if there is something to 
do later is not teaching. They can't escape? It is also very helpless. At this 
time, a big man opened a bride's hijab and said: "My mother, this little girl 
is really beautiful!" 


Everyone gathered around and said: "There has been no such thing, it is a 
pity to die like this." "The clothes are broken, but the most beautiful!" 


This bride is probably a long-term death, and the skin on his face is quite 
elastic. Someone said: "Don't dare to touch two?" Xiao Peng said: "What 
is it?" It was on the face of the body. Twisted two, only to feel slippery and 
irritating, still waiting to touch again, thank you for not seeing it, just want 
to stop, Xiaoying has already rushed over, said: "Don't do this!" 


Xiao Pengtou’s backhand is a push, saying: “Don’t hinder the big men 
from doing things!” 


Xiaoying climbed up again and said, "You really want to be condemned!" 


Xiao Peng’s head was on fire, saying: “Fucking, you’re so ugly and really 
ugly!” 


When he was squatting, he was going to swear. He thanked him for 
carrying a small phoenix collar and gently opened her. Who knows, just 
listening to the "?", Xiao Pengtou shouted, said: "Who is jealous of me!" 


Xie pity looked back, he was actually a **** head, a big hole was pulled 
out of his head, and a blood-stained stone fell on the ground. Xiaoying a 
glimpse, busy said: "I'm sorry, sorry, I... | am afraid, accidentally lost..." 


However, even if she rushes to admit it, no one will believe it. Because the 
direction is not right at all. The stone was thrown in from a window behind 
Xiao Peng’s head. Fang Xiaopeng’s head was called, and everyone looked 
in that direction, just to see a figure swaying through the window. 


Xiao Peng’s head yelled: “It’s him! It’s the ugly monster with a bandage on 
his face!” 


Thanks for the small firefly to the south wind, a two-step step, the right 
hand gently on the window sill, turned over and chased in the woods. In 
addition, there are also a few daring who want to get a reward and follow 
him out of the window. Can catch up to the edge of the woods, thank you 
for suddenly smelling a **** gas, not aware of it, the heart is alert, 
slammed, said: "Don't go in!" 


He has already reminded him that the few people are thinking that you are 
not chasing me, and that they are constantly rushing into the woods. The 
people who had gathered in the temple also came out, watching Xie pity 
stop at the edge of the woods, and the courage was not so big, they 
followed. Not long after, just listening to a few screams, the woods 
stumbled out of a few black shadows, it was just a few people who took 


the lead. These black shadows went down the woods and walked under the 
moonlight. When everyone saw it, they flew away. 


When I entered, I was still a living person. When I came out, I became a 
blood man. 


These people from the face to the clothes on the body, all are bloodstained, 
blood is like a spring. If a person has left so much blood, it is a decision 
not to live. However, they are still coming over here step by step, everyone 
frightened and brushed back, and after retreating to the pity, thanked and 
raised their hands, said: "Stable. Blood 1s not theirs." 


Sure enough, those few people said: "Yes! Blood is not ours, is... is... 


The blood on his face could not cover the horror of their faces, and a group 
of people looked at them in the woods. Black lacquered, I don’t know what 
is inside the woods. Thanks for taking a torch and walking a few steps 
forward, holding it forward. In the darkness, something dripped onto the 
torch and made a "sweet" sound. He glanced at the torch and looked up, set 
a moment, and raised his hand to throw the torch. 


Although the torch that was thrown up only illumined the sky for a 
moment, everyone saw it clearly, what was above the woods. 


Long black hair, pale face, broken military uniforms, and arms that hang 
back and forth in the air. 


The bodies of more than forty men, high and low, swinging and swinging, 
hanging upside down on the tree. The blood didn't know how long it had 
flowed. It was not dried up yet, and it was a horror scene of a dead body 
and **** rain. 


Although this group of people outside are strong and strong, but where 
have you seen such a battle? It was all scared to stay, and the birds were 
silent. The south wind and the swaying over saw this scene, all of which 
was a condensate look. 


For a moment, the South Wind Road: "Green Ghost." 


He swayed: "It is indeed his favorite trick." 


The south wind thanked the pray: "Don't go. It's his words, it's a little 
troublesome." 


Thanks to pity and ask: "Who are you talking about?" 
South Wind Road: "One ‘near'.” 
Thanks for the pity: "What is close, is it close?" 


Fudao said: "Yes. The near-green" is a fierce object in the Temple of the 
Spirit, which is evaluated as a realm close to 'definite'. He likes this kind 
of game of upside down corpse, which is famous. ” 


Thanks to pity: "This is really unnecessary. It 1s absolutely perfect, not it 
is. Just like there is only ‘flying up' and 'no flying up', there is no 'close to 
flying’ and ‘fast to fly’. It’s a 'near' word, but it’s a bit tricky.” 


He remembered that when the teenager took him all the way, there was a 
rain and a voice of umbrella. Could it be that he is holding an umbrella, is 
it to stop him from this **** rain? At the moment, I sighed a little. The 
two immediately asked: "What happened?" 


He took a teenager on the sedan chair, and the boy said how to bring him 
here. At the end, Fu Zhi will be suspicious: "I was aware of this mountain 
when I came up, and I was very savage. He just broke it?" 


Thanks for thinking: "It’s not at all. He just stepped on his foot and put it 
in his eyes." Road: "Yes. You said this 'nearly' green ghost, will it be? he?" 


The south wind thought a little and said: "I have never seen a green ghost, 
I can't say it. What characteristics do you see in this boy?" 


Thanks to the pity: "Silver Butterfly." 


When the South Wind and the Awakening saw the scene of the hanging 
corpse, the performance was completely calm. When this statement came 
out, thankfulness clearly saw that the look on their faces changed instantly. 


Shake unbelievable: "What do you say? Silver Butterfly? What kind of 
silver butterfly?" 


Thanks to pity, he probably said something different, saying: "It looks like 
silver and crystal, not like a living thing. However, it is pretty." 


He saw the south wind swaying the two people and looking at each other. 
His face was extremely ugly and almost blue. 


Half a sigh, the swaying of the sighs: "Go. Go now." 


Thanks to the pity: "The ghost and groom here have not been resolved, 
how can I go?" 


Fudao: "Resolve?" 


He turned back and sneered: "It seems that you have been in the world for 
too long. This ghost groom is just a 'fierce'; even if this is a green ghost, it 


of 


is a headache, but it is It’s a 'nearby'. 


After another meal, he screamed sharply: "But you know, what is the 
owner of the silver butterfly?" 


Thanks for being honest: "I don't know." 


"..." swayed hard and said: "I don't know if I can't talk about it now. In 
short, you can't deal with it. You should go back to heaven to rescue the 
soldiers first." 


Thanks for your pity: "Then go back first." 


Thanks to the pity: "The owner of the silver butterfly did not reveal 
maliciousness. And if he is malicious, it is as terrible as you said, and I am 
afraid that it will be difficult to escape with Junshan. Stay here. So why 
not go back first and see if you can help me move a rescue." 


He saw that he did not want to stay here to deal with many troubles. If so, 
then it must not be reluctant. It’s very easy to shake this person, and I’m 
going to go away. Xie pity turned to the south wind, but also to openly ask 
the young things, but the crowd was a commotion, some people said: 
"Catch! Catch!" 


Thanks to this, I have no time to ask, "What have you caught?" 


Two **** figures came out of the woods. One was a big man. He was the 
first to rush into the woods. He was not scared away by the blood of the 
corpse. It was really bold. The other is that he was dragging a boy in his 
hand, and he was shackled in his hand, his face was covered with messy 
bandages. 


Xie pity still remembers that Dr. Tea said in a small shop before, "It is said 
that the ghost groom is a ugly monster with a bandage on his face. It is 
because it is too ugly, no woman likes it, so it is impossible to see others 
become good things." At that time, they also thought that it was very 
likely that it was a rumor, but it was actually such a person. 


It can be owned, is it the ghost groom, it is another matter. He just wanted 
to look at the bandage boy carefully, but Xiaoyan rushed over and said: 
"You got it wrong! This is not a ghost groom, he is not!" 


Xiao Pengtou said: "I was caught on the spot, you still said no? I..." A 
card, he suddenly realized what suddenly, said: "Oh, I said why you are 
always strange, A little 'not' is not, is it that you are colluding with this 
ghost groom?!" 


Xiaoying was shocked and waved again and again: "No, I don't, he doesn't. 
He really hasn't done anything. He's just ordinary... ordinary..." 


Xiao Pengtou is aggressive: "What is ordinary? Ordinary ugly?" He 
smashed two on the bandaged boy's head and said: "Would you like to take 
a look, this ordinary ghost groom is long, Only love to grab someone else's 
woman!" 


He messed up a few bandages, and the screaming teenager screamed in his 
head, and the voice was filled with fear, very fierce, and very poor. Thanks 
for holding a small Peng head arm, said: "Enough." 


Xiaoying heard the screams of the boy, tears falling, seeing Xie pity to 
stop, as 1f to see hope, quickly grabbed his sleeve and said: "Pub, ... 
Gongzi, help me, help him." 


Thanks to see her, Xiaoyan released his sleeves as if he was afraid that he 
would dislike his own hands and did not want to help her. Thanks to pity: 
"Nothing." Look at the bandaged boy who is full of blood. He found that 
the boy was wearing a pair of bloodshot eyes, leaking from the gap in the 
bandage under his arm, and also peeking at him, only peeking. After a 
moment, I immediately hanged down and was busy wrapping the bandage 
again. Although he did not show his face, but revealed a little skin on his 
face, this is extremely horrible, as if it had been burnt by the fire, it 1s not 
difficult to imagine, under the bandage, what a terrible face, attracting 
others to pour Cold air, and he is shrinking even more. 


Thanks for the pity, the two people's state of squeezing, like a glimpse, as 
if they did not dare to see the light all the year round, did not dare to see 
people, and sighed in their hearts. Xiao Pengtou was a little vigilant: 
"What do you want to do? The ghost groom is what we caught." 


Thanks to let him go, said: "I am afraid that it will not be so simple will be 
caught by you. Only then my friend searched around a circle, did not find 
him. This boy may only come later. Real Ghost and groom, it should still 
be here." 


Xiaoying also braved the courage: "You want to reward... but you can't 
mess with people to make up..." 


Xiao Pengtou listened and wanted to start. Since he was only a genius, he 
has been adding chaos. Thanks for finally, he can't bear it anymore. He 
waved his hand. If the evil spirits came out, the sound of "?" was a little 
bit of a head, and the south wind seemed to reach the limit. One foot, 
finally fell to the ground. This person is a special task. When he does not 
move, the crowd does not know who to follow, and he has become very 


honest. He has been screaming a few times and can’t make trouble. Thank 
you for your pity: "You can finally do something." He looked at the boy 
for a moment and asked: "Is it yours to stone people at the window?" 


His voice was mild, and the bandaged teenager shook like a sieve, and 
secretly looked at him and nodded. Xiao Huidao: "He doesn't want to hurt 
people. He just looks at Xiao Pengtou and seems to be hitting me. I want 
to help me..." 


Thanks and asked the boy: "The corpse hanging in the woods, do you know 
what is going on?" 


Xiao Huidao: "I don't know what happened, but it is definitely not what he 
hangs..." 


The bandage boy shook and shook his head. The south wind stared at him, 
suddenly said: "Who is the green ghost?" 


Hearing this name, thank you for your slightest glimpse. The bandaged 
boy was obviously a stunned person, and he did not respond to the name he 
said, nor did he dare to return to the south wind. Xiao Huidao: "He... he is 
afraid, can't talk..." 


She has been trying to protect this weird boy, thank you for your kindness: 
"Little girl, this kid is going on, what do you know, let me talk about it 
first." 


Seeing the pity, Xiaoying seems to have a little courage. The fire shone 
brightly on her face, and she did not hide. She twisted her hands and said: 
"He really didn't do bad things. The child just lived in Junshan, sometimes 
hungry, and ran down the mountain to steal. I just stole my home... I saw 
that he didn’t speak very much, and there were injuries on his face. He 
found some cloth bags for him, and sometimes he gave him some food to 
eat...” 


Xie Li originally thought that they might be a pair, but now it seems that 
Xiaoying is more like a sister to the boy, even like an elder who takes care 
of him. She said again: "There were many people who thought that he was 


a ghost groom. I couldn't say it. I just hoped that I could catch the real 
evil." I want you to be a big man, you have to be a bride. Ghost and groom, 
that will at least not catch the wrong person, because he will definitely not 
rob the sedan chair. Who knows that when I go out, I heard that Xiao 
Pengtou also wants to search the mountain today. I am really worried, but I 
will secretly keep up. Look." 


She guarded the boy in front of him, as if he was afraid of hitting him 
again, and he argued: "He is really not a ghost groom. You see him, only a 
few people will be like this. Where have you played so many escorts for 
the bride's sedan? military attache...... " 


Xie pity and the south wind look at each other, they feel very headache. 
If it is as she said, isn’t this teenager completely irrelevant to this matter? 


Bandage boy, "fierce" ghost groom, "nearly" green ghost, and the head of 
the silver butterfly that is not small, the heavenly gods talk about the color 
change, a small and Junshan, is actually a stranger, it is really teaching 
People can't cope. Who is who? What is the relationship between who and 
who? Thanks for feeling a lot of times. 


He stunned his eyebrows. For the time being, he didn't think about 
Xiaoying. There was a bit of true and false in his words. Suddenly he 
thought that there was something he wanted to ask, saying: "Little 
Xiaoyan, have you always lived near Junshan?" 


Xiaoblao: "Yes. I have been living here. I can guarantee that he has not 
done anything bad here." 


Thanks to the pity: "No, I want to ask you another question. With the 
Junshan area, has there been any other Mingguang Temple in addition to 
one on this mountain?" 


Xiaoying a glimpse: "This..." She thought for a moment, "I should have 
built it." 


Listening to her saying this, thankful pity suddenly felt that he had seized 
something important. 


He said: "Why do you only see Nanyang Temple under the mountain, but 
you can't see the Temple of Light?" 


Xiaoying scratched his head and said: "Building was built, but I heard that 
it seems because every time I want to build a Mingguang Temple, I will 
always have no fire for no reason during the construction. Some people 
say that there is no reason why General Mingguang has a town. Staying 
here, I changed to General Nanyang..." 


The south wind noticed that the praying eyes were condensed and said: 
"What happened to you?" 


Xie pity suddenly found that it was too simple. 


The unsmilable bride, the temple that had no fire for no reason, was 
fascinated by the Mingguang Temple in the mountains, the imperial 
martial arts statue of the martial arts, and the ghost groom who 
disappeared from the air after being injured by the evil spirits. 


too easy! 


It’s just that there’s something else that is disturbing the line of sight, so 
that he doesn’t realize such simple facts from the beginning! 


He slammed the south wind and said: "Take me a mana!" 


The south wind grabbed him a glimpse and hurriedly hit him in the air, 
saying: "What?" 


Thanks to pity, he ran and said: "I will explain it later, first try to keep the 
bodies of the eighteen brides!" 


Nanfeng Road: "You are confused? There are only the bodies of seventeen 
brides, plus you are the eighteenth!" 


Thanks to the pity: "No, no, there are only seventeen before, but now there 
are eighteen. In the body of eighteen brides, one is fake - the ghost groom 
is mixed inside!" 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 10: Mountain 
lock ancient temple upside down dead forest 


The two rushed back to the Mingguang Temple. However, after the hall 
was empty, there was only a mess of red hijab in the place where a group 
of brides stood. 


Seeing it, thank you for your heart: "It’s not good, it’s going to die." He 
quickly picked up the ground and covered his head, and he was so 
embarrassed that he heard the exclamation from outside the temple. The 
two looked through the window and saw a dozen or so marvelous women 
in the wedding dress, forming an encirclement, and slowly approaching 
the group of villagers. 


These women are all green, smiling, and their hands are flat. It 1s the body 
of the bride! 


Seeing that they were getting closer and closer, no one could calm down. 
Everyone couldn’t care for the bandaged teenager. They ran away when 
they pulled their legs. Xiaoying quickly helped him. Thank you for your 
helplessness: "Don't run!" He said this tonight that he didn't know how 
many times. Every time he did something, he would have to say at least 
thirty or forty times. However, there was always someone who turned a 
deaf ear and was helpless. He waved his hand, if the evil spirits flew out to 
the sky, free to pinch a cockroach, if the evil cockroaches would spin 
themselves in the air, as if the goddess fluttered, it was very eye-catching, 
and the group of brides saw a very active here. Things are turning 
cheerfully, and the tail is pumping them from time to time. Many of them 
are attracted, and seven are attracted by the **** smell in the deep forest. 
They slowly jump over there, thanking the South: The wind catches up, 
don't let them go down the hill!" 


Needless to say, the south wind has already caught up. The two brides 
attacked with respect to the pity, the fingers were bright red, the nails were 
sharp, and the red hijab that was taken out on the ground was taken out, 
and both hands were thrown away. The two hijabs spun and flew out, and 


they were placed on the heads of the two brides. . Their movements 
became dull in an instant. 


Sure enough, this thick red hijab covered the bride's body with a layer of 
eyes and nose, unable to see the figure, and could not smell the popularity. 
And because their bodies are stiff, they can't bend their arms to remove the 
cover. I can only stretch my hands and chaos, as if playing hide and seek 
with people. This situation is really horrible and funny. Xie pity stood in 
front of them, voluntarily waved in front of the two brides, saw them 
stunned to touch the other direction, thought about it, and finally did not 
hold back, said: "offended." Grab both arms Put their hands on the other's 
neck. 


The two brides suddenly touched things, and they felt shocked and could 
not see what it was. Xie pity hurriedly ran away, and it was a raise of the 
hand. If the evil spirits went along with the white rainbow, they silently 
fell into a big white ring on the ground. He said to all the people who fled: 
"Go into the circle!" 


A group of people hesitated while running, but Xiaoyan quickly supported 
the bandage boy and stood in. After thinking about it, she ran out again 
and dragged the little Pengtou who fell into the ground. At this time, a 
bride jumped to the edge of the white circle and stretched her claws, but it 
seemed to be separated by an invisible wall. Xiaoyan found that she could 
not jump in, and said loudly: "Everyone is coming in, this circle They can't 
get in!" 


When everyone saw it, they rushed to the ground again. Fortunately, 
thanking the pity for letting the evils smashed several times, the circle was 
big enough, otherwise they were really worried that someone would be 
squeezed out. The brides couldn’t jump into the circle, knowing that they 
couldn’t move here, and they turned and screamed and shook. 


And thank you for waiting for a long time, grabbed a large number of 
hijabs in the sleeves, four or five red cloths flew up and down in his hands, 
left and right, and did not stop at the foot, to cover one, one cover one 
When she was in the middle of a bride, she began to feel like a blind 
person. His hijab was really dazzling, and he threw himself around his 


hands and threw himself into several red shadows in the air. People 
couldn’t help but drink in the white circle: "Good!" It’s really amazing.” 
“This skill is practiced!” 


Thank you for listening, habitually blurted out: "Fortunately, okay. You 
have money to hold a money field and have no money to hold a personal 
field... ah ???" The words are not right when you export, even in the past 
acrobatics When the class made up the scene, he said that if he had 
finished, he slipped out and stopped. During the speech, several brides 
jumped up. It was a height of seven feet and a foot. As soon as they were 
three feet away, they came to his eyes with a rancid smell. Thanks for the 
soles of the foot, the body also swept out, rushing through the air to 
meditation three times the psychic password, said: "Learning the spirit and 
the spirit of everything! I asked a question, you know that the Northern 
Wu Shenguang general has any confidante?" 


The voice of the spirit rang in the ear and said: "Your Highness, what do 
you ask this?" 


Thanks to pity: "There is a bit of a situation here, a little critical. It is not a 
match. There are more than a dozen dead people chasing me." 


Lingwen: "Ah? So terrible?" 


Thanks: "It's okay. So is there? I know that this question is more private 
and difficult to answer, so I don't ask in the psychic array. The task needs, 
never leak." 


Ling Wendao: "You have misunderstood your Highness. This question is 
not a bad answer, but the old man is too confidant. You suddenly ask, I 
don't know which one you ask for?" 


Xie pity at the foot almost a sigh, said: "Well. In the confidantes of these 
confidantes, is there a woman with strong desire, strong heart, and some 
kind of disability?" 


Lingwen said: "If you say this, you really think of one." 


Thanks again, the two hijabs flew out and attracted a cheer. He turned and 
shook his hand and said, "Say!" 


Ling Wendao: "When the old man did not fly before, he was a general. He 
met a female general in the enemy's country on the battlefield. It was very 
beautiful and temperamental, called Xuan Ji." 


Thanks for your pity: "Well, Xuan Ji." 


Lingwen continued: "Who is this general, seeing a beautiful woman, even 
if he is holding a knife on his neck, he is also going to entangle. This 
woman led the soldiers to confront him and became his defeat." 


Xuan Ji became a prisoner and was sent to the enemy camp. The defending 
army was not prepared and would be killed on the spot. The partiality was 
not self-sufficient, and was rescued by a general who broke the three- 
footed Qingfeng. The enemies, the handsome generals of the enemy, were 
the generals of Mingguang who later flew up. 


This sergeant general has always been a person who has pity and cherished 
jade. Secondly, the overall situation of the war has been fixed. Even if it is 
sawn, there will be no possibility of turning over, and Xuan Ji will be 
released. It’s really good to imagine what happens when you come and go 
again and again. At this time, a bride grabbed her right leg, five fingers 
and one button, almost into the meat, he was trying to kick out, found that 
this angle can only reach the face, the heart can not beat the girl's face, 
changed a posture She changed her shoulders, and the backhand was flying 
over with a hijab. "It sounds like a beautiful talk." 


Lingwen said: "It was originally a beautiful talk. If it is bad, it will be bad. 
Xuan Ji must have a double with the general." 


Thanks to two steps, he climbed onto the roof and overlooked the five or 
six brides who continued to approach him. He wiped a sweat and said: 
"Women want to have a lifetime and a double, this is not wrong." 


Lingwen said: "It is true, but the two countries have sent troops, the 
battlefield is ruthless, the two have said it well, the dew marriage, you 


love me, there is a present, no Ming Dynasty, only talk about the wind and 
the moon. And the old man This person, I am telling the truth, it 1s not 
good to not double with you." 


"That Xuan Ji is a beautiful woman, her temperament is extremely fierce. 
The things she wants must be killed and not let go..." 


“And slow and slow!” thanked the pity. “You tell me first, is Xuan Ji 
disabled? Is it disabled?” 


"It's her..." When the words came here, the voice of the spirit stopped 
abruptly. 


It’s really terrible. Every time I hear the key points, I use the borrowed 
mana to exhaust. It seems that next time he gets to the beginning, he will 
cover his face and ask for the key points. In the middle of the leap, Xie 
pity quickly re-thought the idea: If the bandage boy is not a ghost groom, 
and this group of villagers have confirmed each other that there is no ghost 
groom, then the only remaining place to hide in, only Seventeen brides are 
piled up! 


When he mixed in, he couldn't be seen by the ghost groom at a glance. In 
turn, when the ghost and groom mixed in, he couldn't see a corpse at a 
glance. If you think about it carefully, if the evil spirits hurt the groom, he 
will only see a black mist rolling into the woods, and there is no guarantee 
that there will be someone in the black fog. In fact, I was afraid that at that 
time, he ran out of the temple door to chase, and the ghost groom stayed in 
the black smoke of a house, passed him by, returned to the temple, hiding 
leaves in the forest, mixed into the brides In the body of the body. 


Then, the "ghost groom" is not the "groom", but the "bride" - a woman 
wearing a bride's wedding dress! 


Since it is a woman, many things can be reversed. For example, why there 
is no Mingguang Temple in the area with Junshan. It is not that the locals 
do not want to build, but they cannot build it. Xiaoying said, "Every time I 


want to build a temple, I will always have a fire for no reason." It doesn't 
sound like a coincidence, it can only be deliberately set on fire. Why set 
fire to the temple? Usually, it is because of hate. However, this has another 
Mingguang Temple that has been blocked by the blockade in Junshan. No 
one has come, but the statue inside the temple has been carved very well 
and the preservation is excellent. Why? The ghost bride herself wore a 
wedding dress, but she did not see the woman wearing a wedding dress 
passing by with Junshan when she smiled. Why? 


All things are connected in series, except for jealousy and monopoly, thank 
you for not thinking of other answers. And it is like a weird sound wrapped 
in thick cloth and dragging heavy objects. If it is really footsteps, thank 
you can only think of a possibility! 


The bride chasing him has been covered with hijab. Thanks for the pity, I 
finally got to the ground, took a breath, and calmed my mind and got up 
and counted. 


One, two, three, four... ten. 


The seven brides jumped into the woods and chased by the south wind. Ten 
brides were re-covered by the hijab, all here. Well, there is one, not yet. 


At this time, he heard the familiar '"??" and "??" sounds coming from 
behind him. 


Thanks for turning slowly, a short figure that caught his eye. 
He took a sigh of relief and said, "Sure enough." 


The little woman in front of her, a red wedding dress, not happy, only to 
see stern. 


But the reason why she is short is not because she 1s short, but because she 
is lying on the ground. 


Her legs were broken, but she did not cut off her calf. She used to walk on 
the ground with two kneecaps. 


The weird "squeaky" sound he heard was the sound of her jumping on the 
ground with two broken legs. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 11: Mountain 
lock ancient temple upside down dead forest 


The female ghost has a long face and her eyebrows are rising. It is really 
beautiful. Originally, there was still a three-point glory in the glamorous, 
and now, a grievous grievance comes from the glamorous, as if it is ina 
narrow place all the year round, and there is no clear sky. Kneeling on the 
ground, the wedding dress below the knee is ruined, and it is no wonder 
that someone said something at the time. 


Thanks to her for a while, she said: "Xuan Ji?" 


It seems that no one has called her name for many years. After a long 
time, the sullen grievances of this female ghost face faintly scattered, and 
a flash of light flashed in the eyes. 


She said: "...Is he sending you to me?" 
This "he", thankful and conjecture, naturally refers to the general. 
Xuan Ji asked again: "He himself? Why didn't he come to see me?" 


The kind of eager look when she spoke, the kind of hopeful voice, the joy 
of teaching, or not saying "not" is wonderful. Seeing that he did not answer 
for a long while, Xuan Ji fell to the ground. 


She leaned back against the handsome and upright statue of Wu, the red 
wedding dress on the ground paved into a huge blood flower, the head of 
the hair, the face of pain and difficulty, as if suffering a great suffering, 
said: "...he Why don't you come to see me?" 


This question, thank you can't answer, so it can only remain silent. Xuan Ji 
looked up at the statue, and said: "Hey, Lang, I am betraying my country 
for you, abandoning everything, becoming like this, why don't you come to 
see me?" 


She pulled her hair in her hands and asked, "Is your heart made of iron?" 


Thanks for the quietness, I heard these words, thinking secretly, Xuan Ji 
said that she was betrayed her country by the generals, is it that the general 
of the sergeant swindled intelligence from her mouth when she was 
affectionate, resulting in The national battlefield of Xuan Ji lost? She 
added that it was because the generals of the squad became like this. "This 
way" naturally refers to the horror of this broken leg. Xuan Ji is a female 
general. She can't be disabled on the battlefield. Her legs may only be 
broken later. Is this also related to the general? Does it mean that her 
general grievances are so deep after she has been abandoned? 


Although he felt that what he thought and thought was very vulgar, Xuan 
Ji’s resentment was so deep that he wanted to kill the lives of innocent 
people. Even though he was vulgar, he had to think hard about it. At this 
time, a woman’s scream suddenly came from outside the temple: “Help! 
Help!” 


Xie Li and Xuan Ji looked out the window at the same time. I saw that if 
the evil circle was completed, one person was dragging the bandaged 
teenager out, and Xiaoying was holding the man’s leg and letting it go. The 
man was screaming, it was Xiao Pengtou: “Get out of the way” You are an 
idiot, what do you do when you call the female ghost!" 


Xiaoying loudly said: "Call over and shout, you are more terrible than 
ghosts! I... I would rather see female ghosts!" 


It turned out that Xiao Peng, who had been stunned by the past, woke up 
and saw the brides who were slowly exploring the surroundings. They 
were shocked first, but they soon found that they could not see people. He 
was very courageous. Shantou was stunned, and he wanted to swear that 
others would not dare to move and dragged the bandages down the 
mountain to get a reward. He didn't care whether the boy was a ghost or a 
groom. Anyway, everyone in the mountain passed him, then he is. Who 
knows that Xiaoying rushed over and yelled, and both the brides 
wandering around and the Xuan Ji in the Mingguang Temple were 
alarmed. Thank you for seeing him again. I only had to take a little more 


in my heart. I couldn’t wake up for three days and three nights and 
shouted: "Go back to the circle!" 


Xiao Pengtou saw a black fog coming to him and hurriedly retraced, but he 
had a bandaged teenager in his hand and a small firefly on his leg. It was a 
slow step, and was instantly smashed by black fog. To Xuan Ji’s hand. He 
looked back and saw that this long-haired, sullen woman was not the 
glamorous female body that he had touched in the bride. 


Nowadays, he finally knows the fear and screams loudly, and Xuan Ji’s 
five fingers and a bend, from his back, inserts his entire skull cover from a 
thick layer of brain. 


The stripped skull cover is steaming and is still yelling: "Ah-!!!!" 
The souls scattered in the white circle also shouted: "Ah-!!!!" 


Xiaoying was also frightened. While screaming the bandaged teenager in 
the circle, Xuan Ji extended five fingers to them. She thanked her and 
stopped her and said: "General, don't make another kill." ” 


He called her general, the intention is to remind her, she was also a hero 
on the battlefield, and defended the country. However, Xuan Ji grabbed the 
screaming skull cover in his hand, a very beautiful face, and there was a 
seven-point deformation at the moment. She sneered: "Don't he dare to see 
me?" 


Xie pity can not, the heart of the road or else pretend to be a general sent 
by the generals, but Xuan Ji does not need his answer. She laughed a few 
times, turned sharply and pointed at the statue of the god: "I burned your 
temple, messed up on your site! Just look at me for you, how many years 
have I waited for you!" 


She looked at the statue of Wushu for a while, suddenly jumped up and 
swayed his neck and said: "You still refuse to come to see me, do you 
know that I am sorry for you? You look My legs! Look at what I am like 
now! I am here for you, for you! Is your heart made of iron stone!" 


Although he is an outsider, Xie Li does not want to comment on who is 
who, but according to his personal sense, he can't help but think: "If you 
want to see him, can you change the normal way? If anyone wants to use 
this See me in a way, I don’t think about it at all." 


The little phoenix at that end finally returned to the circle with the 
bandaged teenager. Looking at this side, he worriedly whispered: "The 
son..." Hearing, thanking her for a smile, indicating that there 1s no need to 
worry. Who knows that he smiles, Xuan Ji’s face is twisted in an instant, 
rushing over from the statue, saying: “You don’t look at me, love to watch 
those women who love to laugh, I will let you see it slowly! ” 


Although she was jealous, she said to the general. Xie pity he thought that 
Xuan Ji himself could not marry the beloved, and saw the married bride 
smile happily on the sedan chair. But I did not expect that it was because 
the general who liked to laugh at the woman, she was imaginatively 
confused that this is the bride who is going to marry her sweetheart. It is 
no wonder that she burned the Mingguang Temple under the mountain. I 
couldn’t stand it all day. There were women in the temple of the generals 
who came in and out and shared the same statue with her. This female 
ghost is not a "fierce", broke her legs, but the action is extremely ghostly 
and swift, and after being hit by the evil, it is so powerful, and she is 
grateful to her and she is deadlocked. He was about to call Ruo, but he 
heard a big drink: "Ah, ah, ah, ah-" 


The young girl Xiaoying saw that he and the female ghost were 
deadlocked. He actually rushed over a branch from the ground and shouted 
and shouted. He seemed to be courageous. Xuan Ji didn't need to start, but 
Sensen looked back. She flew out before she got close, flying out a few 
feet, head down, body up, heavy landing! 


The bandage boy "ah" screamed and screamed and ran out, thanking pity 
was also a shock, sitting up, but the back of the head was stunned, Xuan Ji 
five fingers have been put up, it seems that he must also be like him The 
skull is also stripped from the scalp. In a hurry, Xie pity grabbed her wrist 
with her right hand and shouted: "Bound!" 


Just listening to the "brushing" burst of sound, a white singer called, 
around Xuan Ji wrapped around the nine bends, tied her five flowers. Xuan 
Ji’s legs were broken and could not be avoided. The “?” slammed down 
and rolled on the ground, trying to break the day, and it was getting tighter 
and tighter. When I got out of the way, I couldn’t wait to take a breath, and 
immediately got up and ran to the place where the little firefly landed. 


If the evil has been collected, the people still dare not move, but there are 
also a few bold villagers who are used to the brides who touched and 
touched and surrounded the past. The bandaged teenager squatted beside 
her squatting figure, stunned by the worms on the hot pot. No one dared to 
move her, and she was afraid that she would break down what was 
important, and it would be more difficult to break. Xie pity quickly looked 
at it, knowing how to be careful and useless, and fell into this way, it 
seems that you can't live. 


Although it didn't take long to get along with this young girl, I didn't even 
talk much, but I also knew that although she was ugly but well- 
intentioned, the ending was really heavy. Xuan Ji should be unable to make 
a fortune at a time and for a while. Thanks to pity: "Even if it is useless, it 
can't be allowed to let her go before she died." So she carefully turned her 
over. 


Xiaoying’s face is full of blood. She can see that everyone is sighing, but 
she still has a sigh of relief. Xiaoqu: "... son, I am not helping out..." 


Although she did not help, but she did not help what was busy. At that 
time, thanking the pity would have to call for evil, and no one would help 
others. And even if her branch hits Xuan Ji, it will not have any effect, let 
alone she can't get close to the female ghost? In this way, it can be said 
that it is worthless to die. 


Thanks for your pity: "No. You have helped a lot. You see, when you come 
over and lead the attention of the female ghost, I can take the time to 
subdue her. I really appreciate you. But next time I can’t do this again, I 
have to tell me before I can help, otherwise it will be bad if I don't pick it 


up." 


Xiaoying smiled a little and said: "Hey, son, you don't need to yell at me, I 
know I didn't help, and I didn't have it next time." 


Her speech was confusing, and she spit out blood. The blood was mixed 
with a few broken front teeth. The bandaged boy was anxiously shaking, 
and he didn’t know what to say. Xiaoying told him: "In the future, don't go 
down the mountain and steal things. You will find out that it will be over." 


Thanks to pity: "If he is hungry, he can ask me for something to eat." 


Hearing the words, Xiaoying’s eyes lit up and said: "...Really? Then, thank 
you very much..." 


Laughing and laughing, the two pairs of small eyes suddenly shed two 
lines of tears. 


She whispered: "I feel that I live in this world, and I have not lived in a 
few days." 


Xie pity did not know what to say, patted her hand gently. Xiaoying sighed 
again: "Hey, forget it, maybe I am... it’s bad luck." 


This sounds a bit funny. Moreover, because her nose is slanting, ugly and 
funny, so **** face bursts, it looks really funny. 


She shed tears: "But, even then, I still... I still..." 


When it comes to this, she 1s mad at death. The bandaged teenager saw her 
dead, screaming at her body, and a head buried in her stomach, as if she 
had lost this one, and she did not dare to lift it. 


And thanking her for helping her put her eyes together, the heart said: 
"You are stronger than me." 


At this moment, a strange bell came. 


"When!" "When!" "When!" Three loud noises, when you sigh, thank you 
for a dizzy, said: "What happened?" 


Looking around again, the brides planted a land, and only the arms were 
still moving forward, straight into the sky. A group of villagers also fell to 
the ground, as if they were both stunned by the deafening bells. Xie pity is 
also a little groggy, one hand to support the amount, the force to stand up, 
the foot is soft, half a squat on the ground, fortunately one person will help 
him, look up, it is the south wind. It turned out that the seven brides 
immediately dispersed in the forest, and the south wind almost ran all over 
the place and Junshan to catch them all without leaking. This has just 
come back. Seeing that he was very calm, Xie pity immediately asked: 
"What is the sound of this bell?" 


Nanfeng Road: "Don't worry, this is a rescue." 


Looking down at him, thanked him for discovering that there was a soldier 
in front of the Temple of Light. 


Each of the soldiers in this column was wearing armor, and they were all 
fascinating, and they all had a faint aura. In front of the soldiers, there is a 
young military commander who is a long-standing young man. It is clearly 
not a mortal. The military commander took the hand and came to the face 
of praying, and he succumbed to him, saying: "His Royal Highness." 


Thanks to the inquiry, the south wind whispered: "This is the general." 


Xie Pity immediately glanced at Xuan Ji on the ground and said: "General 
General?" 


This monk general is not the same as he imagined, but also very different 
from the god. The **** is like a hero, and his eyebrows are full of 
arrogance. It is a beautiful beauty with aggression. Although this young 
military commander is also beautiful, but his face is white, his eyebrows 
are as quiet as a piece of cold jade, no murderous, only a group of calm 
and calm. It is said that it is a military commander, and it is said that it is 
a reality. 


The general saw the Xuan Ji on the ground and said: "The Lingwen Temple 
informed us that this incident with Junshan may have something to do 


with our Mingguang Temple. It will come here. I didn't expect it to be 
quite a source. Your Highness." 


Thanks to the spirit, the efficiency of the Temple of the Spirit 1s low, and 
said: "There are also generals." 


And Xuan Ji struggled to hear the words "? General", suddenly looked up, 
eagerly said: "??, ??! Is it you, are you here? Are you finally here?" 


She was **** with Ruo, and she was only ecstatic when she was ecstatic. 
Who knows, she looked at the generals, but her face was white, saying: 
"Who are you?!" 


Thanks to the south wind, I have already talked a little about the ghosts 
and grooms about the South Wind. Listening to her asking, she said, "Is 
this not a general? Is she waiting for too long, don't recognize it?" 


Nanfeng Road: "It is a general. But it is not the one she waits for." 
Xie pity is strange: "Is there still two generals?" 
The south wind said: "Yes, there are two!" 


It turned out that the sergeant general of the female ghost Xuan Ji was the 
main **** of the Mingguang Temple, and the one in front of them was the 
auxiliary **** of the Mingguang Temple, the descendant of the general. 
When calling, in order to distinguish, this is called "Little General." In the 
orthodox temple of Mingguang, it is necessary to provide them with one 
right and one. The general is the main hall of the temple, the statue is 
facing the temple door, and the statue of the general is placed on the back 
of him. Although it is a ancestors, it looks like a brother. One of the two 
flying up, it is also a singular story. 


Xuan Ji looked around and didn't see the soldier she wanted to see in the 
soldier. He said, "Hey? Why didn't he come? Why didn't he come to see 


me?" 


General Otaru slightly decapitated, saying: "The general has a job to be." 


Xuan Ji muttered: "What are you going to do?" 


Under the long hair of the shawl, she shed tears and said: "I have waited 
for him for hundreds of years. What do he have to do? When he saw me, 
he could cross the border in one night. Now what will he do? Important 
When he came down to see me, I didn’t want to see it at all. Is there? Is 
there nothing?” 


General Ozawa said: "General Xuan Ji, please go on the road." 


The soldiers of the two Mingguang Halls in the queue walked over. If they 
sneaked down from Xuan Ji and stalked them back to Xie's wrist, Xie pity 
patted it twice to show appeasement. Xuan Ji was held by the two soldiers, 
stayed for a while, suddenly earned, and said: "Oh! I curse you!" 


Her voice was very sharp, and she politely said, "Is this not in the presence 
of future generations?" 


The general of the little sergeant did not change his face. He said, "Look at 
it." 


Xuan Ji screamed and said: "I curse you, you better never fall in love with 
anyone, or if there is one day, I curse you, like me, forever and ever, every 
moment, endless, love burning Body! Love the fire, burn your heart, liver, 
spleen and lungs!" 


At this time, General Xiao Yan said to Xie Li and other people: "I am rude. 
Please wait a moment." And take **** in the food, light on the temple. 
This is the trick to open a psychic spell, and he must be psychic with 
whom. Hey, he sighed, put his hand down, turned back to him, turned to 
Xuan Ji, said: "The general told me to tell you - 'that 1s impossible."" 


Xuan Ji screamed: "I curse you -!!!" 
General Xiao Yan raised his hand and said: "Go away." 


The two soldiers drove down the maddening Xuan Ji. Thanks to the pity: 
"General Xiao Xiao, let me ask, how will this Xuan Ji be disposed of?" 


General Ozawa said: "The town is under the mountain." 


Looking for a mountain town, this is indeed a common method used by 
Heaven to deal with monsters and ghosts. After a moment of indulgence, 
Xie Pity still said: "This general Xuan Ji is very resentful, and he never 
forgets his hatred of the generals who are betraying the country. I am 
afraid that the suppression is not a long-term solution." 


General Xiao Yan was slightly headed and said: "She said that she was 
rebellious because of the general?" 


Thanks to pity: "She did say that it was because the generals became like 
this, but the truth is, then I don't know." 


General Ozawa said: "If you must say this, you can. It is true that the 
generals are treason. However, the details may not be the same as what 
others think. After the generals dispersed with her, General Xuan Ji was 
Retaining, he will not hesitate to take the initiative to serve the military 
intelligence. The generals are unwilling to win without taking advantage 
of it." 


... This is really nothing to do, the so-called "I betrayed my country for 
you", it would be like this. Thanks to pity: "Then she said that her legs 
were broken because of the general, this is...?" 


General Ozawa said: "Her legs are broken by herself." 
... broken by myself? 


General Ozawa said plainly: "The generals do not like strong women, and 
General Xuan Ji is strong, which is why they can't last long. General Xuan 
Ji is unwilling, and said to the general, she is willing to be his Sacrifice the 
change, so she abolished the martial arts and broke her legs. As a result, 
she was equal to her own wings and tied herself to the general. The general 
did not abandon her, she took care of her, but always I don’t want to marry 
her. General Xuan Ji’s wish 1s not to pay, hate suicide, not to be him, just to 
make the generals sad. But, let me be blunt.” 


His speech was always so polite and calm, and said: "It won't." 
Thank you for your pity, not talking, and said: "Who are all this?" 


General Xiao Yan said again: "I am right or wrong, I don't know. I only 
know that General Xuan Ji will let go, it would not have been like this. His 
Royal Highness, he will leave." 


Xie pity also handed over and sent them away. The south wind 
commented: "Odd." 


Thank you for your pity, he is also a laughing and laughing singer in the 
Three Realms, or not to mention others. The matter between the general 
and Xuan Ji is not the person in the game. Who is the right person? Only 
the seven innocent brides, as well as the military officers and bearers who 
escorted the trip, are innocent. 


Referring to the bride, he immediately turned around and saw that the 
body of the seventeen brides on the ground had changed to varying 
degrees. Some have turned into a white bone, and some have begun to rot, 
emitting a stench. The smell smothered everyone on the ground, and they 
woke up and saw this situation, and it was a big shock. 


Taking this opportunity, thanking God and God for spreading a good and 
evil karma to them, telling everyone to pray for the bride after going down 
the mountain, to find a way to inform the bride family to claim the corpse, 
never to do the corpse You can't do anything wrong with your business. 
After experiencing such a thrilling night, I didn’t take the lead in picking 
up the people. Everyone listened to him and dared to say anything else. 
They felt like they had a nightmare. They found out that it seemed like a 
monster last night. same? With so many dead people, how can they still 
make money when they are still full of brains? Looking back, I feel 
horrible. Everyone was doing it last night, and there were a lot of people, 
and some people took the lead, and they rushed. Now I am afraid in my 
heart, but I have always prayed for blessings. 


The sky is still not bright, there are wolves in the mountains, and so on. 
The south wind has just finished a large circle around the mountain, and it 


is necessary to bring such a large group of people down the mountain. He 
did not complain, and after the agreement with the pity, he discussed the 
follow-up matters of the hanging corpse. 


After the bandaged teenager woke up, he sat down on the head of the little 
squirrel and stared at her. Xie pity also sat beside him, playing a half-day 
draft, 1s about to say comfort, suddenly found that the boy's head is 
bleeding. 


If it is the blood of the corpse, it should have dried up, but the blood is still 
flowing, only he is injured. At the moment, Xie pity said to him: "You 
have a wound on your head. I will help you with the bandage." 


The boy slowly looked up, and the two bloodshot eyes looked at him, 
seemingly timid. Thanks a little smile, said: "Don't be afraid. If you have 
injuries, you must bandage. I promise not to be scared by you." 


The boy hesitated for a moment, turned around, circled and slowly 
dispelled the bandage on his head. He is very slow, and he 1s patiently 
waiting for him. He is already thinking about the next question: "This boy 
must not stay in Junshan anymore. Where can he go? I can't go back to 
heaven with me. I haven’t gotten a meal on my own, I have to think about 
a safe way to settle him. Also, the green ghost, grace..." 


At this time, the boy picked up the bandage and turned around. 


When Xie pity saw the face, I felt that the blood in my body was fading 
between the moments. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 12: Red WISP 
Burning Wenwu Temple 


The boy’s face, indeed, as he had thought, was a scar of severe burns. 
However, under the contiguous blood red scars, it is faintly visible, three 
or four small faces. 


The faces were all small in size, and the twists and turns were on his 
cheeks and forehead. Because of the fire, the facial features of each small 
face are violently shrunk, as if screaming in pain. These screaming strange 
faces are crowded on the face of a normal person, and it is really more 
horrible than any ghost! 


Seeing the moment of this face, thanking the pity is like falling into a 
nightmare. The great fear made him numb so much that he didn't know 
when he stood up. He didn't know what kind of expression on his face, but 
it must be terrible. The teenager grinds and dispels the bandage. He was 
uneasy. After seeing his reaction, he also stepped back two steps. It seems 
that he could not accept this face, as if he was protecting himself. The 
earth slammed the horrible face, picked it up from the ground, shouted and 
fled deep into the woods. 


Thank you for your return, and said: "Wait!" 
He chased and said: "Wait! Come back!" 


But after all, he stayed for a while before reacting, and the teenager was 
familiar with the distance in the mountains, and used to flee in the dark, 
and escaped without a trace without a trace, let him not ask for it. No one 
was looking for it nearby. He was partial and mana exhausted. He couldn’t 
pass the sound of the spirit. He flew in the mountains, but he searched for 
a small half hour. When the cold wind blows, he wakes up a little. He 
knows that a person who has no head flies is not a way. He is calm and 
calm. He said: "Maybe he will go back and take away the body of 
Xiaoying girl." It is a glimpse. 


I saw many black people gathered in the woods behind the temple. They 
looked serious and were carefully putting down the more than forty bodies 
that had been hanging upside down. In front of the woods, there is a long- 
shoulder figure holding his hands. He is watching, turning his head is a 
beautiful and cold teenager face, it is lifting. It seems that he is going 
back, and the priests who took a wave of Xuanzhen Temple came down to 
help. 


Xie pity is about to open, and there is a footstep behind him. The south 
wind also sent the helpers and returned. He saw this situation, glanced at 
him and said: "Are you not running yourself?" 


This is a big deal, and it’s unpleasant to raise your eyebrows. Xie pity did 
not want them to make a squabble on this bone, saying: "I told him to go 
back and rescue the soldiers." 


Nanfeng said: "What about the rescue? I thought that at least you should 
ask your general to come down." 


It’s faintly said: “When I went back, I heard that General Xiao Yan had 
rushed down and didn’t go to our general. Moreover, even if I went to find 
him, he was so busy, and he might not be free.” 


To be honest, according to Xie’s understanding of the feelings of 
admiration, he is free and will not be willing to personally come down. 
But he didn't have much time to think about it at the moment. He was 
slightly tired and said: "You shouldn't make a noise first. Let's do a favor 
first. Let's find the bandage boy together." 


Nanfeng frowned: "Is he not with you, guarding the girl's body?" 


Thanks: "I asked him to take the bandage down. He was scared away by 
me." 


Holding a corner of the mouth, said: "Not at all. You are not terrible in this 
way." 


Thanks and pity: "I blame me for not responding at the time. Xiaoying girl 
died, he was greatly stimulated, and thought that I was scared by his face, 
may not stand this kind of blow, then ran." 


He wrinkled his nose and said: "Is he really ugly to this extent?" 
Thanks: "It's not a ugly problem. He... someone 1s a face disease." 


When I heard the three words, the south wind and the swaying movements 
and expressions were instantly stiff. 


They finally know why they will be grateful. 


Eight hundred years ago, the Imperial City of Xianle was swept by a 
plague and ended up destroying the country. The plague, the sick person, 
will first appear a small lump in the body, the mass is getting bigger and 
bigger, harder and harder, slightly painful. Then you will find that the 
lumps begin to be somewhat uneven, three depressions, one bulge, as if it 
were... eyes, mouth and nose. Then the facial features became clearer and, 
in the end, grew into a shape similar to a human face. And if left 
unchecked, more and more faces will grow on the body. It is said that 
some people face up to the end, grow into a type, and speak and even 
scream. 


And the name of this plague is called human face disease! 


The face was changed and changed, and the hands held were put down. 
"How ts it possible? This kind of thing was extinguished hundreds of years 
ago, and it is absolutely impossible to appear again." 


Xie pity only said one sentence: "I am not mistaken." 


The south wind and the support are impossible to refute. No one can refute 
this sentence. 


Thanks for the pity: "There is still a trace of fire on his face. Maybe he 
wants to burn these necrotic faces." 


In the case of people with facial sores, many people responded by taking a 
knife to cut off this horrible thing, or burning it with fire, so that even if 
the meat is broken, it will not hesitate. The south wind sighed: "Then he is 
probably not an ordinary person, and he may have lived in this world for 
hundreds of years. If you don't say anything else, will the disease on his 
body be contagious?" 


Although it is a headache, but this question is still calm down and thought 
about it, definitely: "No. The human face is very contagious. If the 
epidemic of the boy can still be infected, he is hiding with Junshan. For so 
long, it should have been infected by the entire band. His plague should 
have been cured...only the scars left before can not be eliminated." 


The three did not dare to care. The swaying seems to be quite a position in 
the Xuanzhen Temple. The summoning of the priests and the Junshan is a 
good search for a three-foot digging. However, it is impossible to find the 
trace of the boy anyway. I am afraid that I have escaped from Junshan and 
disappeared into the sea of ??people. For the present, we can only go back 
to Heaven and then ask the Lingwen Temple to help find it and wait for the 
news. The thing in the boy 1s not contagious. This 1s a little gratifying, but 
thank you for thinking that his appearance 1s so terrible. If he is found 
after going down the mountain, he will be called as a monster to scream 
and kill, or he will find it as soon as possible. 


It is not good to continue to delay with Junshan. Thanks to the small body 
of Xiaoying, and step by step down the mountain. Because the mind was a 
little embarrassed, Dr. Tea yelled and he found that he almost took the 
body into the shop, even apologized, and folded it out before the client was 
buried. After getting everything down, thanked and sighed silently. 


One thing finally came to an end, and he only felt that after a few days of 
flying, he was more tired than he had been in the world for a year. He 
climbed his armpit, flew away, rolled, smashed, juggled, and bones all 
over the body. In order to fall apart, there are still many unsolved 
mysteries and after-effects. I really want to make a "flying as good as a 
bad" trick to hang around and go to the world to lobby. He shook his hem 
and sat down on his side, and finally couldn’t help but turn his eyes on him 
for a long time, saying, "What are you doing with this dress?" 


Seeing his white eyes, thankfulness has an incomparable intimacy. He took 
off the wedding dress that had been worn all the way, and wiped away the 
rouge gouache on his face. He was slightly depressed: "Do I always wear 
this dress to talk to General Xiaojun? If you remind me, I will be fine." 


Fudao said: "Maybe because you are obviously very happy to wear." 


The south wind ran for a day, and finally he was able to sit down and rest. 
He said: "You don't need to remind me. General Xiao Yan will not care 
what you wear. You are wearing it ten times strange, and he will not go 
back with others. Say one." 


Xie Li felt that this little hard official was tonight, gave him a cup of tea, 
and remembered the cold and clear spirit of the little general, comparing 
the crazy state of Xuan Ji, said: "This little general is really calm and self- 
sufficient. So I can hold my breath." 


Nanfeng drank the tea, but said: "Don't look at the little general who looks 
like a very polite, he is not as good as his ancestors." 


This kind of pity is naturally visible. Fuyang actually agrees with this. He 
said: "Yu Su is a new upstart that has only been flying for nearly a hundred 
or two years, but the momentum 1s very fierce and it climbs very fast. He 
was only the leader of the generals when he was only a weak champion. 
You Do you know what he did at the time?" 


Thanks: "What?" 
Shake the cold and spit out two words: "The massacre." 


Thank you for listening, thoughtful, but not unexpected. In the heavens, 
the emperors will go all the way, and this is a matter of fighting the 
mountains and the mountains, and the so-called "one will become a god, 
and to become a god, must first become an adult." At the foot of the 
people, all the steps are blood. Shake and sum up: "In the heavens, few are 
good, no one can believe." 


Thanks to him, he heard a pair of people telling the voices of future 
generations that he couldn’t help but laugh. He wondered if the swaying 
was in the heavens, and he felt so deeply. However, he also knows that 
although he has risen three times, every time he spends in heaven is short- 
lived and short-lived. If he wants to understand the understanding of these 
gods, he is not necessarily comparable. These two little gods. The south 
wind seems to disapprove of such a statement, saying: "You don't want to 
be alarmist. There are good and bad places everywhere. There are still 
many trustworthy priests in the heavens." 


Shake but said: "Haha, trustworthy priest, do you want to say your 
general?" 


Nanfeng Road: "I don't know if I am a general of my family. Anyway, it is 
definitely not your general." 


In the face of this situation, Xie pity has long been accustomed to it, it is 
not strange, and there is something in the heart, even pulling out has no 
strength to open. 


On the other side of the north, he returned to the heavens. He first went to 
the Temple of the Spirit, and said the thing of the bandaged boy, and 
entrusted the spirit to find someone in the world. When the spirits listened, 
it was also a dignified look. It should be followed. The last words: "The 
Lingwen Temple is going to search all the way. But I really didn't expect 
that a trip to the north involved so many things. This time it was really 
hard work." 


Thanks to the pity: "I still need to thank the two small priests who 
volunteered to help, and the generals of the Mingguang Temple. I really 
don't know how to thank them." 


Lingwen said: "It’s not only the old man’s shackles, but he’s got rid of it. 
He’s used to it, but he doesn’t need to thank him. If you go back, you’ll get 
empty, and you’ll have to go through the psychic array. Set up the matter." 


Xie Pity also has many doubts that have not yet been answered. I went out 
of the Lingwen Hall and went around to find a small stone bridge. The 


stone bridge spans the turbulent water, and the river is crystal clear. You 
can see the clouds flowing under the water, and even through the flowing 
water and the clouds, you can see the ups and downs of the mountains and 
the large squares. He said: "This is a good place." He sat down at the 
bridge and meditated on the password and entered. 


As soon as I entered, the psychic array in the heavens was a very rare 
excitement. Many voices flew in and out of the array, and they became a 
mess. The first thing I heard was the snoring of the wind letter: "Fuck! 
Have you picked the town under which mountain?" The female ghost Xuan 
Ji is a madman. No matter what she asked her, she was clamoring to see 
the general. Reluctant to tell where the green ghost is!" 


General Xiao Yan said: "General Xuan Ji has always been fierce." 


The voice of the wind letter sounds very fierce: "General Xiao Yan, did 
you come back to the general? Let her see one side and ask the 
whereabouts of the green ghost to take her away!" 


Feng Xin is the most uncomfortable to deal with women. He is actually 
letting him do the work of this inquiry. He can't help but feel sympathy. 
General Ozawa said: "It’s useless to see it, and it’s even more crazy.” 


There is a voice: "It’s another upside down corpse... The taste of grace 1s 
always so low and unpleasant." 


"Even if they are in the ghost world, they are disregarding his low grade. It 
is obvious that it is really very low grade." 


There is no gap in the communication between the gods and officials, and 
they are very familiar with each other. As a newcomer who flew up eight 
hundred years ago, thankfulness should have been silent, but after 
listening to it for a long time, he couldn’t help but insert a sentence: "You, 
that is the inverted corpse in Junshan. What happened? Is the Green Ghost 
also nearby?" 


Because he does not often speak in the psychic array, the voice is strange, 
the gods do not know whether to pick up the words, the first answer to him 


is actually a wind letter. He said: "The green ghost is not in contact with 
Junshan. However, the hanging corpse forest is a female ghost Xuan Ji in 
accordance with his request, to give him a confession." 


Thanks to the pity: "Xuanji is a subordinate of the green ghost?" 


General Xiao Xiaojun said: "It is. General Xuan Ji has been dead for 
hundreds of years. Although there was resentment before, but she has been 
unable to make trouble in the wind, until she was greeted by the green 
ghost more than 100 years ago, she appreciated it very much. 
Subordinates, this is a big increase in mana." 


What he actually means is that the female ghost Xuan Ji is in chaos, and 
she can’t blame the general because she didn’t have such a big skill. To 
blame the grievances, it is he who received Xuan Ji, so that she has the 
ability to come out to harm people. Originally, the priests felt that this was 
actually the embarrassment that the generals made themselves, but they 
did not say it clearly. It was actually noticed by him. So it’s not too light or 
just so good to remind him that the words are now between themselves. 
The mind is deeper. Thanks again and again: "Is it thoroughly checked 
with Junshan? There should be a child spirit." 


This time, the voice of the love came out, not cold and cold: "Children? 
What child spirit?" 


Thankful, I thought that I didn’t tell him the details. I might even ask him 
to help him, and I didn’t mention it, so I didn’t bother him. “I heard it 
when I was on the sedan chair. A child's laughter, with the voice of the 
nursery rhymes. At the time there were two small military officers near 
the temple of the martial arts, and they were not aware of it. It is also very 
good to want to come to this child spirit." 


Admiration: "There is no child spirit found in Junshan." 
Xie pity is strange, shouldn't that child spirit still specifically remind him? 


When I thought about it, he suddenly remembered one thing he had 
remembered all the way and asked: "Speaking of this, this time I was in 


Junshan, I met a teenager who could drive the silver butterfly. You know, 
who is this boy? ” 


The psychic array was so noisy and busy that he flew up. When he came 
out, it was suddenly silent. 


This kind of reaction, thankfulness has long been expected. He waited 
patiently. For a long while, Lingwen asked: "His Royal Highness, what did 
you say?" 


The feelings are cold and cold: "He just said that he met the flower city." 


Finally I learned the name of the red boy, Xie Pity is in a good mood, 
smiled and said: "It turned out that he is called Huacheng? Well, this name 
is quite suitable for him." 


Listening to his words in such a tone, the gods in the psychic array seem to 
be speechless. For a moment, the spirit coughed and said: "This... Your 
Highness, Prince, can you hear the so-called four evils?" 


Thanks for thinking: "Hey, I only know four scenes." 


The so-called four scenes are the four beautiful talks before the four 
priests in the heavens are flying up - Shaojun poured, Prince Edward. The 
general folded the sword and the princess sweared. Among them, "Prince 
Edward", it is said that the prince of Xianle is stunned by the martial arts. 
Being able to be in the top four is not necessarily the strongest mana of the 
priest, but because they have the most widely spread legends, they are 
relished. Regarding this kind of news from outside, Xie Pity has always 
been slow to respond, saying that it is ignorant, but after all, as one of 
them, he only knows a little. This "four major harms" is probably a very 
popular saying later, but Xie Pity has never heard of it. Since the word 
"harm" is used, it is definitely not a good thing. He said: "Hey, I haven't 
heard it. Can you ask which four evils?" 


The feelings are cool and cool: "His Royal Highness has been honed in the 
world for hundreds of years. It is so confusing. It is really a curiosity. 
What are you doing when you are below?" 


It is natural that the meal, sleep, and entertainment are broken. Thanks and 
smiles: "When you are a human being, there are many things to be busy 
and complicated. It is not as easy as being a **** official." 


Lingwen said: "Where are these four great evils, please remember your 
highness, but it is 'black water sinking, blue light night tour. White 
clothing disaster, blood rain and flower.' refers to the upper heaven and the 
middle heaven are very headaches The four ghost kings of the world." 


People, go up, become gods; go down, be a ghost. 


The gods of the gods opened up the heavens as a residence, separating 
themselves from the human world, and admiring the world and admiring 
the sentient beings. The so-called ghost world has not yet separated from 
the human world. Devils and ghosts enjoy the same land with people, 
some lurking in the dark, some disguised as human beings, mixed in the 
crowd, wandering in the world. 


Lingwen continued: "The black water sinks the boat, and it is a big water 
ghost. Although he has reached a desperate situation, he rarely provokes 
trouble, very low-key, and few people have seen it. 


"The green light night tour refers to our green taste of the low-grade, 
hobby-hanging corpse. However, he is the only one of the four evils, why 
is he here? Maybe because He has been troubled all the year round, and he 
is very annoying. It may just be because he is a good friend and he does 
not mention it. 


"White clothes catastrophe, this one, you should be familiar with His 
Royal Highness. He has a name, called White." 


Sitting in the stone bridge, thank you, heard the name, suddenly felt a pain 
from the heart to the limbs, the back of the hand slightly shook, 
unconsciously clenched the fist. 


He is naturally familiar. 


When the road is "exclusive", it will be a disaster. And the first country 
that was born without the appearance of the white, is the Xianle country. 


Thank you for your silence. Lingwen said again: "However, the white 
phase has been destroyed. Not to mention. Even if he still exists in the 
world, now I am afraid that he will not be able to take the lead." 


"His Royal Highness, the silver butterfly you see with Junshan, also known 
as the Death Butterfly. Its owner, the last one of the four, is also the one 
who wants to provoke the most in today's world. 'Blood rain flower' , 
Flower City." 


Among the heavens, when they are worthy of "famous", they belong to the 
Emperor Wu and the Prince of Xianle. Although the meaning of the two is 
completely opposite, the degree of the same is almost the same. In the 
ghost world, it is necessary to pick one who is equal to them in the 
"famous", and there is no second outside the flower city. 


If you want to know a priest, go out on the road, find a temple to go in, see 
what clothes the gods wear, and what kind of instruments you can, you can 
probably understand some. If you want to know more, listen to the myths 
and legends of the word of mouth, the identity of the priests and what they 
have done, almost all have been dug. The demons and ghosts are not. What 
kind of people are they when they are human beings, and what they are 
now, are almost all mysteries. 


The name of Huacheng is definitely fake, and the appearance is definitely 
fake. Because of the rumor, he is sometimes a moody young boy, 
sometimes a gentle and beautiful man, sometimes a snake-like and 
gorgeous female ghost, saying what it is. Regarding his deity, the only 
thing he was convinced was that he was dressed in red, often with a **** 
hurricane, and the silver butterfly chased between his placket and sleeves. 


As for his origins, there are countless versions. Some people say that he is 
a deformed child. He is born with no right eye. Therefore, he has been 
bullied and hated since childhood. Some people say that he is a young 
soldier. He died for the sake of his country. He is unwilling to die. Some 
people say that he is a person who loves him. The wicked man who died 


and died; others said he was a monster. The most bizarre version, it is said 
- just said. It is said that Huacheng is actually a rising official. However, 
after he ascended, he jumped and fell into a ghost. However, this is just a 
legend that is not widely spread. I don’t know if it’s true or false, and there 
are not many letters. Having said that, even if it is true, it must be fake. 
Because there are people in this world who don't do good gods, they would 
rather jump and be ghosts. This is too shameful for heaven. All in all, the 
more people talk, the more foggy. 


There are many reasons why the various priests are particularly jealous of 
the flower city. For example, his temperament is erratic, sometimes cruel 

and killing, and sometimes there are strange good deeds. For example, he 

is very powerful in the world and has a lot of believers. 


Yes, people worship God, pray for blessing, and stay away from the 
invasion of demons and ghosts. The priests have many believers. However, 
a ghost in Huacheng, there are also a large number of believers in the 
human world, almost to the point where only the hand covers the sky. 


Here, I have to say it. When Huacheng just took the lead, he did a very 
famous thing. 


He made a fierce battle with the thirty-five priests in the heavens. The 
content of the battle is to fight against the martial arts and ask the literary 
theory. 


Of the thirty-five priests, thirty-three priests felt ridiculous, but they were 
all provoked by his provocation, accepted the challenge, and prepared to 
teach him to be a ghost. 


The first thing I tried with him was the Valkyrie. 


Wushen ts the strongest **** in the heavens. Almost every believer has 
many mana, and his mana is strong. In the face of a fledgling little devil, it 
can be said that it is a stable victory. Who knows, after the First World 
War, the whole army was annihilated, and even the soldiers of the gods 
were all crushed by the strange scimitar of Huacheng! 


After I finished playing, I realized that Huacheng was from Tonglushan. 


Tonglushan is a volcano. It is not important. What is important is that 
there is a city in the mountain called Yucheng. Yucheng is not a city where 
everyone can raise a scorpion. The city itself is a large anti-drug. 


Every 100 years, thousands of ghosts gathered here to kill, and only one 
ghost left in the end. Although the result is often one is not left, but as 
long as one can come out, it will definitely be a mixed king. In the past 
few hundred years, only two ghosts have come out in the city, and these 
two, no matter what, have become the ghost kings in the world. 


Huacheng is one of them. 
The Valkyrie was beaten and defeated, and then it was the turn of the gods. 
Fighting can’t be beaten, can you argue about it? 


Coincidentally, I still can't win. The flower city on the heavens and the 
earth is ancient, and sometimes Sven, sometimes vicious, sometimes 
tough, sometimes incisive, and sometimes sophistry, really, the steel teeth 
are not leaking, and the levy swears the devil. The digital **** was taken 
from the sky to the earth, from the ancient to the present, and he got a 
*e* Waterfall and went straight into the sky. 


Flower City, became famous in World War I. 


However, if this is the case, he is not enough to say that it is terrible. The 
terrible thing is that after winning the victory, he asked thirty-three priests 
to fulfill their promises. 


Before the challenge, the two sides set a stipulation: If the flower city is 
defeated, the ashes will be offered. If the gods are defeated, they all jump 
off the heavens and become mortals. If his attitude is arrogant and his bet 
is decided, the 33rd priest is convinced that he will never lose, and he will 
not agree to fight against him. 


However, no one official has fulfilled his promise. Although it is very 
shameful to ruin, but think about it, there are thirty-three priests who have 
lost. It is very shameful to lose face. But if so many people humiliate, then 
they are not shameful, and can even reverse Laugh at each other. So they 
reached a tacit agreement, ignorant, pretending that this is not the case. 
Anyway, people forget to be very big. After another 50 years, maybe they 
don't remember. 


They are quite good at this point. What is wrong with them is that 
Huacheng is not so good. 


Not fulfilling? Ok, help. 


So, he burned the thirty-three priests in the palace of the world, and burned 
a fire. 


This is the nightmare that the gods of the heavens are still talking about, 
and the red-winged fires burn the Wenwu thirty-three temples. 


Gong Guan and believers are the greatest source of manpower for the 
priests. The temple is gone. Where do the believers go to worship? What is 
the incense? It 1s a big injury, and it will take a hundred years to re- 
establish the temple. It 1s not always possible to restore the original scale. 
For the priests, this is really a horrible catastrophe than the failure of the 
robbery. These gods have a large number of palaces, thousands of small 
ones, and hundreds of small ones. Adding up to tens of thousands, 
Huacheng, actually burned down overnight. No one knows how he did it, 
but he did it. 


It’s a mad heart. 


The priests cried to Jun Wu, but Jun Wu was helpless and he could not do 
anything. The challenge was that the officials had to bear it, and the 
promise was also promised. The flower city was very embarrassing. It was 
just ruining the temple and not hurting people. It was equivalent to digging 
a pit and asking them not to jump, so they dug themselves. Bigger then 
jumped in, what can I do now? 


The original thirty-three priests wanted to defeat this arrogant devil in 
front of the world, so they chose the battlefield of the martial arts in the 
dreams of many princes and nobles. The purpose was to show the gods in 
front of the big believers. Who knows that the aristocrats of the princes 
saw what they were defeated. So, after this dream woke up, many nobles 
did not worship the heavenly officials and changed their worship. These 
thirty-three priests lost their believers and palace views, and gradually 
disappeared. Until another generation of new priests soared, a large 
number of vacancies were filled. 


From then on, many of the celestial officials in the heavens mentioned the 
name "Flower City" and they were scared. Even when they heard the red 
and silver butterflies, they were horrified. Some are afraid of getting him, 
one is unhappy, first come to challenge, and then burn a temple in flames; 
some are because there are handles in his hands, and they can’t move; 
others are because the flower city only covers the sky in the human world, 
sometimes some priests To do things, I have to ask for him, and ask him to 
open the door of convenience. In the long run, some of the priests are 
actually out of a strange psychology, and they are quite admired. 


Therefore, for this, the heavens are really, hate, fear and respect. 


Among the thirty-five priests, the two martial arts who did not fight, it was 
the general of Xuanzheng, and the general of Nanyang. 


The two of them did not fight at the beginning, but they were not afraid of 
the flower city. They just did not put the other party in their eyes. They felt 
that there was no need to pay attention to this kind of challenge. Therefore, 
no one should know that this was actually beaten. However, did not fight, 
Huacheng did not forget the two of them, several times the Mid-Autumn 
Festival patrol, the two sides hit, played a few far away, both of them left a 
deep shadow on the crazy savage silver butterfly. 


Hearing here, thankful and full of brains are the cheerful appearance of the 
silver butterfly crystal clear and lovely around him, how can they not 
compare them with the rumors, can not help but think: "The little silver 
butterfly has So horrible? Fortunately... very cute." 2k novel reading 
network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 13: Clothing 
red wins maple skin white snow 


Of course, he will never say this. However, it is no wonder that the south 
wind and the swaying of the silver butterfly have changed their faces. 
They want to come and eat the bitter head of the silver butterfly with the 
two priests they serve. 


A priest asked: "His Royal Highness, you meet the Flower City, he and 
he... What did he do to you?" 


This tone, it sounds more like asking "Would you have fewer arms or less 
legs?" Thanks to pity: "There is nothing to do, just..." When he said this, 
he was actually a bit poor and thought: "What is it? I can’t say it, just 
robbed my sedan chair and took me along the way. "No words for a 
moment, I have to say: "Just broke the female ghost Xuan Ji in the jungle 
with Junshan, brought me in." 


All the priests are guilty of guilty conscience, and they are silent. Only a 
half-timed priest asked: "You, what do you think?" 


Listening to the sound and thanking you can imagine the appearance of the 
gods and his heads: 


"No opinion, no opinion at all!" 
"I don't know what he wants to do, it blames people." 
"What the flower city wants to do, whoever can't understand..." 


Although it is a popular demon king who has been popularized, it is not a 
terrible feeling for this person. Really want to say it, he thinks that this 
flower city is still helping him. All in all, the first blessing he received 
after he flew back to heaven was supposed to be completed. 


I first said that the merits of this trip with Junshan are all counted on him. 
Although the official has remembered for a long time because of the death 
of his daughter, he remembered that he would like to return it with a sad 
heart. But the seven get together, all kinds of water, 88.8 million merits, 
but also inseparable. Thanks for the debt and the lightness of the body, the 
heart is clear and clear, refreshing and beautiful, and the spirit 1s renewed, 
and I decided to be a god. It is best to be a half friend with your gods. 
Although the psychic array of the heavenly court is quiet, but it is also 
busy to drink and drink, and usually the gods are in a good mood, or see 
something interesting, and also talk about it in the circle, and then laugh a 
few words. Although he can't tell who is who, he listens silently. But I 
can't always talk like this, so he listened for a long time, and occasionally 
came out with a gentle saying: 


“Tt’s really fun.” 
"Read a beautiful little poem and share it with the princes." 


“A very effective little trick to treat low back pain, share it with the 
princes.” 


Regrettably, every time he sends out these carefully selected and very 
helpful content, there will be silence in the psychic array. Later, the spirit 
couldn't help it. He said to him privately: "His Royal Highness, these 
things you made in the psychic array, although they are all very good, but 
even if they are hundreds of years older than you, It won't be sent." 


Thanks for the pity, I feel a little depressed. In fact, he is not the oldest, 
but why is he like a senior in the position of a young man who can't keep 
up with young people? Probably because it has been out of bounds for too 
long, and has been ignorant, not caring about the outside world, can't save 
it, or it's gone. He gave up on this and he was not depressed. 


But there is still another problem: Until now, no one in the world has ever 
built a new palace for him. Maybe there is, but anyway, there is no search 
in the heavens, and there is no record. It is a very embarrassing thing to 

know that even the land is good and there is a shackle. As a priest who has 


risen eight hundred times and has risen three times, it is not a palace, and 
no believer is offering it. 


However, it is only the other priests who are jealous of him. I still feel that 
I am still okay. And he had a whim on a certain day, and suddenly 
wondered: "If no one wants to provide me, then I can do it for myself." 


The priests don't know what to answer. 
Who the gods have heard of which priest is for himself! 
God is doing so badly to this point, what is the taste! 


And Xie Pity has long been accustomed to his cold mouth, and it is an 
interesting thing to feel so entertained. Once he made a decision, he 
jumped off the world. 


This time, he landed in a small mountain village called Boao Village. 


Said to be a mountain village, in fact, is a small soil slope. Thank you for 
seeing the green mountains and green waters here, the rice fields are 
beautiful, the scenery is beautiful, and the heart said: "This time it really 
fell in a good place." Look again, there 1s a slanting broken house on the 
small soil slope, ask four times. Q, the villagers said: "The house is 
abolished, there is no master, and occasionally the tramp goes in and 
sleeps for a night, and feels free to live." Is this not what he wants? Go 
now and go. 


When he approached him, he discovered that the cabin was very ruined at 
a distance and was more ruined in the near future. The four pillars in the 
square of the square are afraid of two decaying. When the wind blows, the 
whole house creaks and it is suspected that it will fall at any time. 
However, this level is still within the acceptable range of thanks, and when 
you look at it, you will pack it up. 


The villagers were stunned. Actually, someone really wanted to stay here. 
It was amazement. They all came together to watch the fun. The villagers 
here were very enthusiastic. They not only sent him a broom, but also 


watched him clean his face and gave him a basket of newly picked 
bodhisattvas. The Bodhisattva has cut off the skin, one by one, tender and 
tender, sweet and juicy. Thanks for the pity, I finished eating at the door of 
the broken house, and my hands were very happy. My heart decided to call 
it here. 


In the Bodhisattva Guanli, there was originally a small table, which could 
be used for Taiwan. Thanks for the busy life, the onlookers saw that the 
young man had to vacate a small Taoist view. It was even more unusual. 
They asked: "Who is this for you?" 

Xie pity and cough, said: "Well, this view is for Prince Xianle." 

Everyone looked blank: "Who is that?" 

Thanks to pity: "I don't know... I seem to be a Prince." 

"Oh, what?" 


"Probably it is safe." By the way, it was broken. 


The people eagerly asked: "Where is this Prince Edward, does he manage 
to make money?" 


Thanks for your pity, it’s not bad to owe money. Wen said: "Unfortunately, 
it seems impossible." 


Everyone gave him an idea: "Or a water supplier, lucky wow! Definitely 
incense!" 


"Or else you can use Lingwen Zhenjun! Maybe we can get a champion in 
our village!" 


A woman shyly said: "That... do you have... there 1s no one..." 
Thanks for keeping a smile, said: "Which?" 


"General Yang." 


If he really opened a huge Yang view, I was afraid that the wind letter 
would fly out of the sky! 


Roughly cleaned up the view of the Bodhisattva, but also some incense 
burners, signs and other debris. But thankfulness completely forgot the 
most important thing - the idol. He went out of the door with his fight, 
right, and there was no door leaf. After thinking about it, the house must 
have been rebuilt, so I wrote a brand at the door: "This is a dangerous 
building, sincerely seeking good people, donating money, and 
accumulating merit." 


Going out, walking seven or eight miles, came to the town. What are you 
doing in town? Naturally, it was for the sake of eating and drinking, and he 
took up his old business. 


In myths and legends, the gods do not need to eat anything. In fact, this is 
hard to say. It is true that the great people of nature can take in the aura 
they need directly from the sun and rain. But the problem is - can be 
returned, no matter who loves to do this? Why do you want to do this? 


Some of the priests, because of the practice of the Famen, demanded that 
the five internal organs clean and clear, it is indeed completely smothered 
by the mortal greasy, if it 1s stained, it will be like the poisonous soil in all 
life, vomiting and diarrhea. However, it 1s not to eat food, but to eat only 
those who are born in the net, have longevity and enhance the 
effectiveness of mana. 


But thank you for not having this problem. He cursed himself, and he was 
no different from the mortal. He could eat anything, and because of his 
battles, he couldn’t die if he ate. Whether it's a one-month gimmick or a 
green-haired pastry, he will definitely be able to eat it. There is such a bad 
physique, so when he gets ruined, it is actually OK. Contrast: Open the 
view to post the money, collect the broken and make money, it is better to 
fly up and get worse. 


This person has a Yushu Linfengxian wind bone, when it is broken, it has 
an advantage. After a while, it will receive a big bag. On the way back, I 
saw an old ox holding a scooter. There were a few tall straws on the car. I 
remembered that I saw this board in the village of Bodhisattva. It should 
be the same road. He asked if he could take a ride and the owner of the 
board lifted his chin, indicating that he could come up, and thanked him 
for taking a big bag and smashing it up. When I sat up, I found that after 
the tall straw pile, I had already laid a person. 


After the upper body covered the haystack, he supported his left leg and 
drove his right leg. It seemed to be lying on his arm and lying there. It 
looked like a leisurely, self-satisfied gesture, but it was called envy and 
envy. The pair of black boots were tightly packed, sticking to the slender 
and straight legs, quite eye-catching, thanking the pity and seeing that 
under the cover of Junshan that night, couldn’t help but look at it more and 
more, confirming that there was no silver hanging on the boots. The chain, 
I don’t know what animal skin 1s made of, I thought: "Which is the little 
boy who ran out to play." 


The board slowly swayed on the road, thanking the brawling and taking 
out a reel to read. He has never kept all the news circulating in the 
accident world, but because of the cold field many times, I feel that it is 
better to make up for it. The oxcart swayed for a long time, passing 
through a maple forest. Looking up and looking around, the green grass 
and the waves, the bright and beautiful maple fire, with a bit of wild 
interest in the mountains, as well as the refreshing and fresh intentions of 
the heart, is extremely intoxicating, thankful and pity can not help but 
glimpse. 


When he was a young man, he practiced in the emperor's view. The 
emperor's view was built in the mountains. The mountains and plains are 
full of maple forests, and they are as golden as gold. This situation is 
inevitable and recalled. After looking for a while, I looked down at the 
scroll. 


Open it to the first sight, you will see a line of words, saying: 


Prince Xianle, flying three times. Valkyrie, blasphemy, and ruined god. 


Thanks to pity: "Well, in fact, think about it, there 1s not much difference 
between the **** of war and the **** of ruin. The gods are equal, and the 
lives of the people." 


At this moment, a chuckle came from behind him, one voice said: "Is it?" 


The young man’s lazy voice said: “People naturally love to say that the 
gods are equal and the lives of the people are waiting. But if this is the 
case, the gods of the heavens will never exist.” 


The sound came from the straw on the car. Xie pity looked back and saw 
that the young man was still lying there lazily, did not get up, probably just 
inserted a sentence, said: "You also make sense." 


He turned back, then looked at the scroll, and wrote: 


Many people believe that as a god, the personal or portrait of Prince 
Xianle has cursed effects. If it is posted on the back of someone, or on a 
certain door, it will make the person or the family bad luck. 


This kind of commentary makes it difficult to judge whether God is still 
talking about ghosts. 


Xie pity shook his head, could not bear to look at the comments related to 
himself, decided to first understand the priests in today's world, so as not 
to be confused who is who, is not rude. When I think of a villager who has 
mentioned the Navy, I will go through the comments on the Navy and turn 
to one sentence: 


The water master has no ferry. Palm water, and money. Many merchants 
will provide a statue of a navy in the store and at home, and keep their 


fortune. 


It’s a bit strange to thank you: “Is it a water god, and why is it a fortune?” 


At this time, the boy who was lying in the straw pile said: "The caravans 
are shipping goods, and they all go from the waterway. So before going on 
the road, they have to go to the Navy Temple to burn a high incense, pray 
for a safe journey, and promise how to come back. In the long run, the 
water **** has gradually taken over the fortune." 


This is actually to give him a special solution. Thanks for turning around, 
said: "Is this the case? Interesting, presumably this navy is a very powerful 
big priest." 


The boy smiled and said: "Well, it’s watery." 


Listening to his tone, it seems that he did not put the priest in his eyes. It 
is not like saying something good. Thanks to pity: "What is the water?" 


The young boy said: "The ship has passed from the river. It is a walk or a 
stay. It depends on him. If you don't give him a turn, he will turn it up, so 
he gave him an nickname, called Shuihengtian 8??5u??Happy muscles! 


The famous sergeant has a few mixed numbers in the world and in the 
heavens. It is similar to the three-faced laughing stock of the pity, the 
famous miracle, the broomstick, the funeral dog, the cough, the cough, and 
so on. Usually, it is very rude to use the nickname to call the priest. For 
example, if anyone dares to call him "sweeping general" in the face of 
admiration, the feelings will be furious. Thank you for remembering, you 
can't call it, said: "It turns out, thank you for your answer." Suddenly, I felt 
that this boy talked about fun and said: "This friend, you are young, you 
know a lot. of." 


The boy said: "Not much. Leisure. Have time to look at it." 


In the folk, there are a lot of mythical brochures everywhere, which are all 
the stories of the gods and gods. They are so big and grudged that they are 
so small and sorrowful that they are both true and false. It’s not surprising 
that this boy knows a lot. Thanks for putting down the scroll and said: 
"That, this friend, God, you know so much, you know you don't know?" 


The boy said: "Which ghost?" 


Thanks for the pity: "Blood rain and flowers, flower city." 


It was said that the boy smiled twice and finally sat up. As soon as he 
turned his head, thanked him with pity. 


I saw this young boy about sixteen or seven years old, clothing red wins 
maple, skin white if snow, eyes bright as a star, with a smile on his side, 
handsome, unusual, but inexplicably a bit of wildness. The black hair is 
loose, a little bit sloppy, and looks very casual. 


The two were passing through the flaming maple forest, and the maple 
leaves danced, and one fell to the shoulder of the boy. He blew a blow and 
blown off the maple, and then he looked up at him, smiling like a smile: 
"What do you want to know? Despite asking." 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 14: Clothing 
red wins maple skin white snow 


He looked sly, but he was inexplicably arrogant. Although it was a young 
man's voice, his voice was slightly lower than his age boy, and he was very 
pleasant. Xie Pity is sitting on the oxcart in a dangerous situation, thinking 
for a moment, said: "Blood rain and flowers, this scene sounds like a very 
bad, this friend, can you tell me how it came?" 


For the respect of the table, he still did not add a "small" word in front of 
his friends. The boy sat freely, one arm on the knees, and the cuffs of the 
whole arrow sleeves, inadvertently said: "There is no big deal. It’s just that 
he once took another ghost’s nest, under the mountain. The **** rain, 
when I left, I saw a flower on the side of the road, and I was beaten by the 
“ee rain. I turned the umbrella and blocked it." 


Xie pity imagined the scene, only the **** hurricane, inexplicable style. 
He also remembered the legend of the red-winged fire burning 33 temples, 
and smiled: "Does the flower city often fight everywhere?" 


The boy replied: "Neither often, look at the mood." 

Thank you for asking: "What kind of person was he during his lifetime?" 
The boy said: "It is definitely not a good person." 

Thank you for asking: "What does he look like?" 


The sentence asked, the teenager looked up at him, rubbed his head, stood 
up, and thanked him, sitting side by side, and asked: "What do you think 
he should look like?" 


So close, I feel that this young boy is amazingly beautiful, and it is a kind 
of handsome beauty with a faint attack. If the sword is squirted, it is 
extremely eye-catching. Only with him staring at each other for a moment, 


thanking the pity is a bit confusing, and slightly sideways, said: "It is a big 
ghost king, want to come to change shape, there are many different looks." 


Seeing him turn around, the boy raised an eyebrow and said: "Well. 
However, sometimes he will still use the original. We are of course the 
deity." 


I don't know if it is illusory. Chery felt that the distance between the two 
seemed far away, so he turned his face back and said: "Then I feel that his 
deity may be a teenager like you." 


It was said that the boy’s mouth was slightly curved and said: “Why?” 


Thanks for your pity: "No. You just talk about it, I just think about it. 
Everything is just fine." 


The boy laughed twice and said: "Is it possible? But he blinked one eye." 
He clicked on his right eye and said, "This one." 


This statement is not unusual. Thanks to the past, I also heard a little. In 
some legendary versions, Huacheng's right eye wears a black eye mask 
that covers the eye he lost. Thanks to pity: "Then you know, what is his 
eye?" 


The boy said: "Well, this question, many people want to figure it out." 


Others want to know what makes Huacheng without a right eye. In fact, 
they want to know what the weakness of Huacheng is. Thanks for asking, 
but I just want to know. He hadn't answered yet, and the boy said: "He dug 
himself." 


Thanks for your pity, said: "Why?" 
That boy said: "Go crazy." 
... mad, even his own eyes are dug, and this red-blooded ghost king, who is 


‘ee and rainy, 1s more and more curious. He expected that it would not be 
as simple as madness, but since it has already been said, there is no more 


detailed situation. He continued to ask: "What weaknesses can there be in 
Huacheng?" 


In this sentence, he did not expect the boy to answer, and asked him 
casually. If the weakness of Huacheng is so easy to be known, it is not a 
flower city. Who knows, the boy answered without hesitation, saying: "The 
ashes." 


If you can get a ghost's ashes, you can drive this ghost. If the ghost does 
not obey the drive and destroys the ashes, he will be destroyed and the soul 
will fly. This is common sense. However, this common sense is placed on 
Huacheng, and it may not make much sense. Thanks and laughs: "I am 
afraid that no one can get his ashes. Therefore, this weakness 1s equivalent 
to no weakness." 


The boy said: "Not necessarily. There is a situation where the ghost will 
take the initiative to send out the ashes." 


Thanks to the pity: "Like his appointment with the thirty-three priests, do 
you pay as a bet?" 


The boy shouted: "How come?" 


Although he did not say all, but thank you can also hear, he is probably 
how Huacheng may lose. He said: "There is a custom in the ghost world. If 
a ghost chooses a person, he will entrust his ashes to that person." 


In fact, it is equivalent to delivering your life to another person. It is so 
fascinating. Thanks to the interest and interest: "There was a custom in the 
ghost world." 


The boy said: "Yes. But few dare to do it." 


Thank you for your kindness. In the world, there are not only demon 
temptations, but also human beings to deceive the demon. There must be 
many uses and many betrayals. He said: "If it is a deliberate effort, it will 
be frustrating." 


The boy laughed and said: "What are you afraid of? If it is me, the ashes 
will be sent out, will he want to frustrate or play?" 


Thank you, Charlie, suddenly remembered, the two said so long, actually 
did not know the other party's name, said: "This friend, how to call it?" 


The boy raised his hand on his eyebrow, covered the red sunset, and 
narrowed his eyes. He didn't seem to like sunlight. He said: "I? Iam 
ranked third in the family, everyone calls me Saburo." 


He didn't take the initiative to say his name, and he didn't ask much if he 
thanked him. He said, "My name ts Xie, and the name is a pity. If you go 
in this direction, are you going to Bodhisattva?" 


Saburo leaned back and leaned against the straw, resting his hands and 
overlapping his legs. "I don't know. I walked away." 


Listening to his words seems to have an inside story, thank you: "What is 
it?" 


Saburo sighed and said: "The family quarreled and was driven out. After a 
long walk, there is no place to go. Today, I am so hungry that I fainted on 
the big street, and I just found a place to lie down." 


Although this teenager's clothing seems to be casual, but the material is 
very good, plus talk is not bad, but it seems to be very busy every day. 
Look at it and see everything, know everything, thank you for thinking 
about who he 1s, and which rich man is running out. The son is gone. A 
pampered young man has gone out alone for so long, and there must be a 
lot of hardship on the road. This kind of thankfulness is deeply 
understandable. Hearing that he was hungry, thanking him for turning over 
the small bag, he only turned out a hoe. He was glad that he was still not 
hard. He said to him, "Would you like to eat?" The boy nodded, and 
thanked him for giving the girl a hoe. he. Saburo looked at him and asked, 
"You are gone?" 


Thanks: "I am fine, not too hungry." 


Saburo returned the **** to him and said, "I am okay." 


Upon seeing it, Xie Puli took it back. He divided a **** into two halves 
and handed it to him halfway. He said, "That half of you, half of me." 


The boy took over and sat with him side by side. Seeing him sitting next to 
him, taking a bite of a hoe, inexplicably a little embarrassed, thank you 
always feel as if he had wronged him. 


The oxcart was slowly dragging on the ups and downs of the mountain 
road, and the sun gradually fell, and the two sat in the car and chatted. The 
more I talk about it, the more I feel that this is a strange boy. Although he 
is young, he has a state of arrogance between his gestures and his words. 
He is calm, as if he didn't know what he didn't know, and he couldn't stump 
him. Let him feel that he knows a lot and is young. And sometimes, he 
will reveal the taste of young people. Xie pity said that he is the owner of 
the Bodhisattva view. He said: "The view of the Bodhisattva? It sounds 
like there are many Bodhisattvas to eat. I like it. Who 1s it?" 


I was asked this question, which is called a big man. I thanked me with a 
soft cough and said: "Son Le Prince. You probably don't know." 


The boy smiled a little and didn't speak. Suddenly, the car body was 
shocked. 


The two also followed a few swaying, thanking the pity that the boy fell 
and slammed his hand and grabbed him. Who knows, his hand just touched 
Saburo, the boy seems to be burned by a hot thing, and suddenly opened 
his hand. 


Although his face was only slightly changed, but thankful is still aware of 
it, thinking that this boy actually hates him? I can clearly tell you that I am 
happy. But at this time, I didn’t think much about it. He stood up and said, 
"What happened?" 


The old man who drives the oxcart said: "I don't know what's going on! 
Old Huang, why don't you go, you go wow!" 


At this time the sun has come down, the twilight is coming, and the oxcart 
is in the middle of the mountain, and it is dull. The old oxen stopped in the 
same place, and kept tempering and refused to leave. It was useless for the 
old man to remind him. He wanted to bury his head in the ground, 
screaming, and the tail was as handsome as a whip. Thanks for seeing the 
situation 1s wrong, just about to jump off the car, suddenly, the old man 
yelled at the front. 


I saw the front of the mountain road, and many of the green flames of the 
East and the West were faintly burning. A group of white people holding 
their heads and slowly coming towards this side. 


See you, thank you immediately: "protect!" 


If the evil came out of his wrist, he flew around the oxcart and connected 
into a suspended circle in midair, protecting the three people and one 
animal. Thanks for turning back: "What day is it today?" 


The old man had not answered yet, and the boy replied behind him: 
"Zhongyuan." 


In the middle of July, the ghost door opened. He didn't look at the days 
when he went out, but today he just caught up with the Chinese New Year! 


Thanks and pity: "Don't go away. Today, I hit the evil. If I walked the road, 
I will not come back." 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 15: Clothing 
red wins maple skin white snow 


The group of white people had no heads and were wearing prison 
uniforms. Everyone held a head and seemed to be a group of beheaded 
prisoners. They walked slowly toward the ox cart, and the head in the arms 
was still lingering. 


Thanks and pity, the other two people whispered, "Don't be loud when they 
approach." 


Saburo Taro asked: "This brother, you are still a strange person." 


He was very interested in his tone, and thanked him: "The strangers can't 
say it, they will be a little bit. They can't see us now, and it's hard to say 
when they approach." 


The old man who drove the car saw that Bai Hao’s self-flight was already 
stunned. When he saw the headless person, he was so scared that he turned 
his eyes and shook his head. “I can’t do it! I’m afraid I can’t help it! What 
do the Daochang do?! ” 


"..." thanked the pity. "That's the way. It's offended." After talking about 
the speed behind him, the old man was on the bus and fell asleep. Xie pity 
gently caught him and laid it flat. On the top, I sat on the driving position, 
and suddenly I felt that there was a change behind me. I looked back and 
saw that the boy followed him and sat behind him. He said, "Are you 
okay?" 


Saburo supported his knees and said: "There is something. I am afraid." 


Although he did not hear half of his fear from his voice, thankfulness still 
comforted: "Don't be afraid. You will not have something to hurt you after 
me." 


The boy smiled and didn't talk. Xie pity suddenly found out that he was 
staring at himself. Swearing, finally reacted, this young boy stared at the 
curse between his neck. 


This curse is like a black collar on the neck of a person, can not hide, and 
easily lead to some bad associations, thank you for pulling the collar 
gently. Although it can't hide anything. 


The sky is dark and I can't see the boy's look. Thanks for picking up the 
rope and whispering the cow. The group of prisoners came over and 
wanted to go, but they felt that there was something in the middle of the 
road that was blocking them. They were all screaming: "It’s weird! How 
can I not go!" 


"Really! Can't go! Hell!" 
"Fuck, aren't we ghosts, what can we see?" 


Thanks to pity, it is not easy to smash the cows, and pass this group of 
headless prisoners, and listen to them holding their heads and noisy, just 
feel very funny. There are still many complaints about the ghosts: "That, 
are you mistaken? How do I feel that the one holding your head is my 
body?" 


"It’s your body that took the wrong head!" 
"Hurry and change it, you guys..." 
"How is the cut in your head so untidy?" 


"Hey, the executioner is a newbie. After cutting five or six knives, I will 
cut it down. I doubt if he is deliberate." 


"Your family didn't give him some money. Next time I remember to check 
it in advance, I will give you a knife." 


"Where is coming next time?" 


The Mid-November Festival on July 15 is the first major festival in the 
world of ghosts. On this day, the ghost gates are wide open, and the 
demons and ghosts lurking in the darkness all over the place are all 
coming out, and the people are eager to avoid. Especially on the night of 
the day, closing the door is not the best choice. When I go out, the chance 
of hitting something is much better than usual. Xie pity always used to 
drink cold water and stuffed his teeth. He also wore a robe. He was hit at 
the moment. I saw the ghostly fire floating in all directions, many ghosts 
chasing the wildfire, and some ghostless, muttering ghosts squatting in 
front of a circle, reaching out to pick up the paper money that people 
burned to them. Ingots and other offerings. 


This scene can be described as a group of magical dance. Xie pity walked 
through it, and my heart was thinking that I would like to see the yellow 
calendar in the future. Suddenly there was a voice that killed the chicken 
and screamed: "Not good! Not good! Kill the ghost!" 


This is called sneaky: "Where is it? Where is the killing?!" 


Screaming that ghost said: "Scared me! I found a lot of broken fires over 
there, all of them were broken by people, so oh!" 


"It's all broken? This is a corpse! It's too embarrassing!" 
"Who did it? It won't... Have the Master and the Taoist priests come in?!" 


The group of headless people shouted: "Ah! Speaking, we were blocked by 
something on the road just now. It wouldn't be..." 


"Where is it?" 

"It's there!" 

Xie pity screams bad. In the next moment, a large group of demons and 
ghosts surrounded the oxcart. They were all stunned and said: "I smell the 


steaming yang..." 


Can't hide it! 


It was originally unreasonable to smash the ghosts at the Mid-Autumn 
Festival. I would like to thank you for fighting with such a large group of 
things, and drove: "Go!" 


The cow was very frightened. I used to shovel my hoof in the same place. I 
couldn’t wait to pull the board and rushed up. I regretted pulling the boy 
behind me: "Sit steady!" 


If the evils are recovered, and by the way, a road to escape is taken out. A 
oxcart is suddenly exposed in a circle of wildfires, and rushing out of the 
encirclement, the ghosts with green teeth and lack of legs are screaming 
behind the car: "There are really Taoist priests. !!! The dead Taoist is 
impatient!" 


"The living people dare to stir up our Zhongyuanhui, this can not blame 
us!" 


"chase!" 


Xie pity grabbed the reins and threw a large spell into the ground and said: 
"Hey! " 


This is the escaped weapon "???", only to listen to a series of small rings, 
every time a ring is given to the group of ghosts set a barrier, dragging 
them for a short time, but only for a short period of time, so many 
characters used Less than half a column will catch up. Thanks to the fire 
and burning ass, he drove the cattle cart and escaped a mountain road. 
Suddenly said: "Stop -!" 


It turned out that the old oxen took the oxcart to a fork in the road. She 
looked at the two black-painted mountain roads in front and immediately 
pulled the rope. 


Here you can be very careful! 


On the day of the Mid-Autumn Festival, sometimes people walked and 
found that there was a road that did not exist in the past. This kind of way, 


people can not go. Once you get it wrong, you will go to the territory of 
the ghost world, and it will be difficult to come back! 


Thanks for the first time, I couldn’t tell which of these two mountain roads 
to take. I thought that I had bought some miscellaneous items in the town 
except for a big bag of broken goods. Among them, there was a signing 
machine, and I thought about it, so I counted it. Turning out the sign, 
holding it in his hand, shaking it, shaking the side: "Tianguan blessed no 
taboos! The road went all the way to the sky! The first left and the second 
right! Which way to sign, which one to go! "The voice just fell, hehe! Two 
tags fell out of the tube, and he took a look and was silent. 


Under the next sign, the most fierce! 


Both of them are signed down, and both roads are big murderers. Why 
aren't they going to die? 


Thanks for helplessness, the two hand-held cylinders are a mad sway: "The 
tube, the first time you meet me, why ts it so sad! Come again, give me a 
face!" The voice just fell, hehe! It’s two more. When you take it up, it’s 
still all under the sign. 


At this time, Saburo suddenly said: "I will try?" 


Anyway, it would never be worse than him. Thanks to the hand, he handed 
the sign to him. Saburo took it with one hand, shook it at random, dropped 
two, picked it up, and handed it to him without looking. Thanks for taking 
a look, even though both of them were on the list, they couldn’t help but 
be amazed. Because, to the point of his decline, it seems that even the 
hand of others has been degraded by him. I don't know if it is true. It is 
normal to complain so often. But this boy was actually unaffected by him, 
and he directly shook the two up and signed it out! 


Both of them were on the top, and he chose one by one. He drove and 
sighed and said: "Friend, your luck is very good." 


Saburo left the sign and left behind and smiled. "Is it? I also think I have a 
good luck. It has always been." 


Hearing that he said "always like this", the gap between people and people 
is really like a scorpio. I ran forever, and I heard a burst of ghosts and 
screams in all directions: "Catch it! Here!" 


"Everyone is here! The dead Taoist is here!!!" 
A ghost came out. Thanks to pity: "Oh, it is still wrong." 
The utility of the gait has passed, or is surrounded! 


These demons and ghosts have at least a hundred people. They are 
surrounded by three layers and three layers. They are still growing. I really 
don’t know why there are so many inhuman objects here, but there is no 
time to be strange. Thank you for your enthusiasm: It’s not the wish, but I 
hope you will exalt your hands." 


A headless ghost road: "Hey! Stinky Taoist, why don't you raise your hand 
first? It's you guys who break up a bunch of wildfires over there!" 


Thankfulness and innocence: "It’s not us, it’s not the opposite. In fact, it’s 
just a broken." 


"Don't be soaring! How can you get rid of you like this? You are clearly a 
Taoist! Is there a second priest who will do such a ferocious thing besides 
you?!" 


Thanks to the pity: "It is not necessarily a Taoist priest to break up the 
fire." 


"What can it be? Ghost?" 
Xie pity quietly put his hand in his sleeve and said: "It is not impossible." 
"Ha ha ha ha ha ha ha dead priest! you ... you ... you ..." 


The ghosts who made a sneer sneer suddenly stuck in the shell, thanking 
them: "How am I?" 


When he asked, the ghosts were even missing. They stared at the pity, as if 
they saw something terrible, either open their mouths or close their 
mouths, and several headless prisoners scared their heads and fell to the 
ground. 


Xie pity tempted: "You? You..." 


Who knows, before they have finished asking, the ghosts will be swept 
away, and the birds and beasts will be scattered. Thank you for your pity: 
"No, ???" 


His hand was still caught in the sleeve and was not taken out. Was it 
discovered? Is it so sharp? Moreover, this is not a powerful spell. 
Thankfulness is very strange. They look at it, is it really him? 


Or what is behind him? 
Thinking of this, he turned his head and looked behind him. 


Behind him, there was only the owner of the cow car that passed out and 
the red boy who was still squatting. 


Seeing him look back, Saburo smiled a little, and put down his hand, said: 
"This road leader, good life and heroic, those devils and ghosts are scared 
away by you." 


" " 


Thanks for the slightest smile, said: "Yes, I didn't think that I was so 
powerful." 


At the moment, he pulled the rope a few times and the cart wheel rolled 
slowly. The next road went smoothly. In less than half an hour, the oxcart 
crawled out of the forest slowly and came to the winding mountain road. 
The village of Bodhisattva is already under the hillside, and a cluster of 
lights is warm and bright. 


It was really the road to "sign up", and there was no danger. 


The night wind blew, thank you for turning back again. Saburo seems to be 
in a good mood, lying down, leaning on his hands and looking at the moon, 
the boy’s eyebrows are not like real people under the faint moonlight. 
After a moment of indulging, Xie pity opened a smile and said: "Friends." 
Saburo: "What?" 

Thanks for your pity: "Are you too life?" 

Saburo turned his head and said: "I haven't counted it." 

Thanks to the pity: "So, do you want me to calculate for you?" 

Saburo looked at him and smiled: "Do you want to help me?" 

Thanks to the pity: "I think a little." 

Saburo slightly nodded and said: "Yes." 


He sat up, his body slightly inclined to pity, said: "How do you want to 
count?" 


Thanks to the pity: "Look at the palm, how?" 


It is said that Sanlang’s mouth 1s slightly curved. That smile can't tell what 
it means, just listen to him: "Okay." 


Said, he extended a left hand to him. 


This left-handed finger is slender and has a clear knuckle and is very 
beautiful. And it's not the kind of soft, good-looking, but the power is 
hidden in it, no one wants to be covered by such a hand. Thanks for the 
slight change of his face when he touched him, he paid special attention to 
avoiding physical contact, not directly touching his hand, just looking 
down and looking at it. 


Moonlight is white, saying that the darkness does not seem dark, and it 
seems that the light is not bright. Thanks for watching for a while, the 


oxcart crawls slowly on the mountain road, and the wheels and wooden 
shafts creak. Saburo: "How?" 


After a short while, thank you for your slowness: "Your life is very good." 
Saburo said: "Oh? How 1s a good law?" 


Thanks for raising his head, Wen Wen said: "Your temperament is 
persevering, extremely persistent, although it 1s bumpy, but you are always 
sticking to your heart, often succumbing to evil, and being killed. This 
number of Fuze is long, friends, your future will inevitably bloom. It is 
bright and full of light." 


The above sentences are all written on the spot and nonsense. Xie pity will 
not give people a hand. He used to be jealous. For a while, he often 
regretted why he did not learn the palmistry and face of the emperor in the 
past. If he learned it, he would not always blow the street and the broken 
stone when he was living in the world. . The reason why he wants to see is 
not to look at the fate of this boy, but to see if the teenager has palm prints 
and fingerprints. 


The ordinary demon ghosts can change the false body and pretend to be a 
living person, but the nuances of the meat, such as palm prints, 
fingerprints, and hair tips, generally have no way to be meticulous. 
However, this juvenile has not had any mana fluctuations, and there is no 
clue to the clues. The palm prints are also very clear. If it is really a demon 
and a ghost pretending, then only the one above the "fierce" can achieve 
the perfect disguise of such dripping. However, when the ghost king of 
that status level, how can he come to a small mountain village to spend 
time with the oxcart? Just as the priests of the heavens are all in a good 
position, they are also very busy! 


Thanks for pretending to be very confident, he made a few words on the 
scalp, and finally couldn't make it. Saburo kept staring at him. He listened 
to him nonsense and laughed lowly. He smiled very intriguingly. Still? 
Uh?" 


Thank you for your pity, I don’t want to edit it. “What do you want to 
count?” 


Saburo said: "It is fortune telling, isn't it a marriage?" 


Xie pity and cough, awe-inspiring: "I don't know how to learn, I don't 
think it's a marriage. But if you want to come, you shouldn't have to worry 
about this." 


Saburo raised an eyebrow and said, "Why do you think I don't have to 
worry about this?" 


Thank you, Charlie: "There will be many girls who like you." 
Saburo said: "Why do you think there will be many girls who like me?" 


Xie Pity is about to open his mouth and follow him, and suddenly he 
reacted. The little friend was trying to lead himself to blame him. He was 
helpless and funny. He didn’t know what to say. He stunned his eyebrows 
and said: "Sanlang." 


This is his first voice, Saburo. The boy listened, haha ??smiled and finally 
let him go. At this point, the oxcart had panted and climbed into the 
village, thanking the pity and turning around, and slightly helping the 
amount, and quickly got out of the car. Saburo also jumped out of the car. 
Who knows, thanking him for looking up, he found that he was lazy lying 
on the cart. Now the two of them are standing together. This boy is 
actually taller than him. It is impossible to look at it. Saburo stood in front 
of the car and stretched out, thanking him: "Sanlang, where are you 
going?" 


Saburo sighed: "I don't know. Sleep on the street, or find a cave to do." 
Thanks for your pity: "Can't you?" 
Saburo spread his hand and said: "No way, I have no place to go." He 


squatted and smiled twice. He said, "Thank you for giving me fortune. If 
you have a good word, there will be a period." 


Listening to him and mentioning fortune telling is a shame. Seeing that he 
really turned around, thanked and said: "Wait, if you don't give up, do you 
want to come to my view?" 


Saburo took a meal and turned halfway. He said, "Can you?" 


Thanks to the pity: "The house was not mine. I heard that many people 
used to spend the night there. It may be much simpler than you think, 
afraid that you can't live." 


If this boy is really a small son who runs away from home, he can’t let 
him run around like this. Xie pity is very skeptical that he only ate the half 
of the **** in the whole day. The young man is so arrogant and arrogant, 
so that one day he will faint on the big street one day. After listening to 
him, Saburo turned around and did not answer, but went to the face of pity 
and leaned forward. Xie pity still didn't understand what he was going to 
do. He only felt that the distance between the two people suddenly became 
very close and could not be overwhelmed. 


The boy retired, and he actually smashed the big bag of broken iron and 
iron that thanked him for his pity, saying: "Let's go." 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 16: Clothing 
red wins maple skin white snow 


Thanks for the pity on the spot. Seeing that the boy was slender and 
slender, he helped him with a big bag of smashing, and he was so arrogant 
that he taught him that he had sinned in his heart. Saburo took a few steps 
and went out. He was grateful to catch up. Suddenly remembered that the 
old man who was driving was still lying in the car. Now he turned back and 
reached out, and he woke up and told him tonight. Don't say go out. The 
old man saw his ability on the road, saying that where to dare to have two, 
nodded again and again, pulling the old yellow and rushing home. 


There was only one roll of the rest of the board, and thanked him for 
carrying it up, and then looking back, Saburo had already carried one big 
bag of messy things with one hand and went up the hillside. 


In front of the twisted view of Bodhisattva, Saburo bowed his head and 
smiled, seeming to see something interesting. Xie pity approached and 
found out that he was looking at the sign of the dangerous house for 
donation. He coughed and said: "You see, that's it. So I said, you may not 
live." 


Saburo said: "It's good." 


In the past, it was all thanks to others saying "good fortunately". Today is 
the first time I heard someone say this to him. It’s really hard to describe 
how it feels. The original wooden door of Bodhisattva had already 
decayed. Thanks for taking it down and replacing it with a curtain. He 
picked it up and said, "Come in." Saburo followed him and went in. 


The furnishings in this cabin are clear at a glance. There is only one 
rectangular table for the table, two small wooden benches, a small futon, 
and a merit box. Xie pity took over the things mentioned by Saburo, put 
the bought sign, incense burner, paper and pen, etc. on the table, and set a 
red candle that was handy when the house was broken. The room was 


bright when it was smashed. Saburo picked up the sign, shook it, put it 
down, and said, "So, is there a bed?" 


Thanks for turning around, silently put the roll on the back and handed it 
to him. 


Saburo raised an eyebrow and said: "Only one is it?" 


Thanks to the boy who came back from the town, he only met this boy. 
Naturally, he did not expect to buy one more in advance. He said: "If you 
don't mind, we can squeeze a little tonight." 


Saburo: "Also." 


Thank you for taking the broom and sweeping the ground again. Saburo 
looked around in the view and said: "Dao, my brother, are you missing 
something in this view?" 


Thanks for the sweeping of the ground, he was kneeling on the floor and 
listening to the words. He said, "I think, except for believers, there should 
be nothing less." 


Saburo also squatted down and asked for a hand, "What about the god?" 


After he reminded him, thanking him for thinking about it, he actually 
forgot the most important thing - the god! 


No view of the gods, what is the view? Although his deity is here, he can't 
always let him sit on the stage every day. 


Thinking for a moment, thanked the pity and found a solution, said: "I just 
bought a pen and paper, and tomorrow I will draw a picture and hang it 


up." 


I will hang myself in my own view. If this is a matter of heaven, it is 
estimated that I will be laughed for another ten years. However, carving a 
statue is both costly and time consuming. In contrast, Xie Pity chose to be 
laughed for ten years. 


Unexpectedly, Saburo said: "Drawing? I will. Do you want to help?" 


Thanks for your pity, smiled and said: "That will thank you first. However, 
you are afraid that you will not paint the image of Prince Xianle." After 
all, his portraits were almost burned eight hundred years ago, regardless of 
How many people have survived today, I am afraid that not many people 
have seen it. Saburo said: "Of course. I will. We are in the car, aren't we 
talking about the Prince?" 


Thank you for your pity. Indeed, on the road, he said, "You should have 
never heard of it," but Saburo did not answer. Listening to him now, I am a 
little surprised. He laid the mat and straightened up and said, "Do you 
really know him?" 


Saburo sat on the mat and said, "Know." 


The look and tone of this young boy’s speech is very interesting. He often 
laughs, but it's hard to say whether his smile is genuine or ridiculous. 
Thanks to all the way, he listened to him and said that he was very 
interested in his evaluation. He sat down next to him and said, "What do 
you think of Saburo, the son of Xianle?" 


Under the two lights, the red candle flared. Saburo bears the candlelight, 
and a pair of black scorpions sink in the shadows and can't see the look. 
After a short while, he said: "I think that Junwu must hate him very 
much." 


Xie Li did not expect that this would be the answer, a glimpse, said: "Why 
do you think so?" 


Saburo said: "Why would you take him down twice?" 


Hearing words, thanking the patience and smiling, thought: "It is really a 
child's idea." 


He lowered his head and slowly went to the **** belt and said: "This is 
not related to hating and hating. There are many things in the world that 
cannot be explained simply by hate and like." 


Saburo: "Oh." 


Thanks for turning around, removing the white boots, and said: "If you do 
something wrong, you should be punished. The emperor only did his job 
twice." 


Saburo is not okay, said: "Maybe." 


Thank you for taking off your coat, stacking it and putting it on the table. I 
want to say a little more. When I look back, I see Saburo’s gaze falling on 
his foot. 


The gaze was very strange, saying that it was cold, but it felt hot and 
stabbing; it was hot, but it was faintly cold. Thanks for looking down, my 
heart is clear. This young man looked at a black curse on his right foot. 


The first curse is firmly wrapped between the necks, and the second curse 
is tightly tied to the ankle. These two curses, no matter which one 1s 
locked, are not too place, and there is no cover. In the past, if other people 
asked, thankfulness generally replied that this 1s necessary for practice, 
but if this Sanlang asks, I am afraid that it is not so perfunctory. 


However, Saburo just stared at his ankle for a while, not saying much. Xie 
pity is not entangled here, lying down. The boy was lying next to him, 
lying down with his clothes, and thought that he was not used to sleeping 
on the ground, thanking him, he still had to get a bed and said: "Relax." 


With a light blow, the red candle will go out. 


The next morning, Xie pity opened his eyes, Saburo did not lie next to 
him. Looking up, my heart was shocked. For the table, there is actually a 
picture hanging. 


This portrait is a man dressed in a Chinese costume and a golden mask. He 
has a sword in one hand and a flower in the other. The pen is excellent, and 
the color is absolutely brilliant. It 1s a pair of "Fairy Prince". 


Xie Pian has not seen this painting for many years. He has been stunned 
for a while, only to get up, wear clothes and pick up the curtain. Saburo 

was outside the house, leaning in a shadow, while turning a broom in his 
hand and watching the sky bored. 


This teenager seems to be really not very fond of daylight. The look of his 
gaze, like thinking about how to get the sun down and step on it. There was 
a pile of fallen leaves outside the door, all of them were piled up in one 
place. Thanks to the door, said: "Are you rested last night?" 


Saburo still leaned against the wall and turned his head and said: "Not 
bad." 


Thanks for the pity, he took the broom in his hand and said, "Samuro, is 
the portrait of Guanli painted by you?" 


Saburo said: "Yeah." 
Thanks to the pity: "It’s so good." 


Sanlang’s mouth is tilted and does not speak. I don't know if it was 
because I slept for a night, his hair was more sturdy today, loose and loose, 
very casual, but in fact, it is also very good-looking, casual and not messy, 
but a bit playful. Xie pity refers to his own hair and says: "Do you want me 
to help you?" 


Saburo nodded, and thanked him for watching. And when he sat down, 
thanked his hair, and held the black hair in his hand, and then carefully 
looked at it. 


Even if the palm prints and fingerprints are perfect, there will always be a 
loophole in the monsters. The number of a living person's hair is 
countless, and one by one is very fine and clear. And many fake ghosts 
faked by their ghosts, their hair is either a black cloud, or a large piece of 
glue, like a piece of cloth, or ... simply dressed as a bald. 


I confirmed the palm prints and fingerprints last night. I was relieved to be 
polite, but the portrait I saw this morning couldn’t help but make him 


slightly suspicious. 
How can ordinary people draw this picture? 


However, his fingers gently rubbed in Saburo's hair, slowly explored, the 
young black hair of this boy is long and clear, no abnormalities. For a long 
while, I don’t know if it hurts him. Saburo smiled a little. He squinted at 
him and said, "Brother, are you helping me with this, or are you thinking 
about doing something else?" What?" 


His long hair was draped, and his beauty was not reduced, but he was a bit 
more evil. So asking questions, it seems to be laughing, thank you for 
greeting: "Okay." This quickly helped him bundle his hair. 


Who knows, after the end of the bundle, Saburo glanced at the water basin 
on the side, and looked back and raised his eyebrows. Thanks for a 
moment, I coughed again. 


This hair is only awkward. Now it’s bunched up, it’s still awkward. 


Although Saburo did not say anything, he looked at him like this. Thanks 
to Pity, he felt that it had not been so bad for at least several hundred 
years. He put down his hand and wanted to say that you came over and 
come again, only to listen to the outside. The vocal footsteps began to 
sound, and a few loud voices came: "Da Xian!!!" 


Thanks for listening, I was taken aback, grabbed it and saw it. I saw a large 
circle of people outside the door. All of them were excited and their faces 
were red. The head of the village head grabbed a hand and grabbed his 
hand. : "Da Xian! Our village has come to a living god, it 1s so good!!!" 


Thankfulness: "???" 


The rest of the villagers have all come together: "Da Xian, welcome to our 
Bodhisattva village to settle down!" 


"Da Xian! Can you bless me to find my wife?!" 


"Da Xian! Can you bless my family and have a baby?!" 


"Da Xian! I have fresh Bodhisattva here! Eat Bodhisattva?! Can you save 
me by the way? I have a good harvest this year?!" 


The villagers were too enthusiastic, and the pity was besieged and 
retreated, and the heart complained. Last night, the old man was a big 
mouth. He clearly said that he wouldn’t say it. This morning, the whole 
village was spread all over! 


Although the villagers did not know which way to offer the gods in this 
view, they strongly urged to have a scent on this. Anyway, no matter what 
the fairy, all are celestial, and there is no harm in worshipping. Thanks to 
the original vision of the door, there were not many people coming to the 
door all year round, so he only meant to prepare a few small bundles of 
incense, who knows that this will be divided in an instant, a small incense 
burner It’s so dense that it’s messy, because I haven’t smelled it for a long 
time, thank you for a few mouthfuls, and then he said: “Coughing folks, 
really can’t bless the wealth, really, cough Please don't ask for money 
here! The consequences are unpredictable!... Sorry, no matter what the 
marriage is... No, no, no, you can't help the children." 


Saburo, regardless of his shackles, sat next to the merit box, with one hand 
and a hand, and slowly lost the bodhisattva. Many village women saw this 

boy, and their faces flew into a red glow. They thanked him: "That, do you 

have..." 


Although I don't know what they want to ask, but the intuition must be 
stopped immediately, immediately said: "No!" 


It’s easy to get people scattered, and there are piles of fruits, vegetables, 

and even white rice, noodles, etc. on the table. In any case, it was a wave 
of offerings, and Xie pity swept out the debris thrown by the villagers on 
the ground. Saburo followed him out and said: "The incense is good." 


Thanks to the side of the sweep, he shook his head and said: "The normal 
situation should be no one cares for ten days and a half." 


Saburo: "How come?" 


Thanks to him, he smiled and said: "Want to come, it may be the luck of 
Saburo." 


Said, he remembered to change the curtain, he took a new curtain from the 
sleeve and hung it on the door. After taking two steps and looking at it for 
a moment, Xie Li suddenly noticed that Saburo stopped and turned and 
said, "What happened?" 


I saw Saburo staring at the curtain, a thoughtful look. Looking down at his 
gaze, Xie Li found that he was watching the spell on the curtain. 


This symbol was painted by him before, and the layers of the spells were 
layered and powerful. It was originally used for evil spirits and could repel 
the invasion of external evils. However, because of the politeness of my 
own, will it also have the effect of a bad luck call, and I don’t know. 
However, since there are no doors, it is safe to draw such a row of spells 
on the curtain. 


Seeing this boy stayed in front of the curtain of this spell, and thanked him 
for his fretting, saying: "Sanlang?" 


Did you paint this sign, he was stopped outside the door, can't you go in? 
2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 17: 
Bodhisattva Guanyue talks about half a month off 


Saburo glanced at him and smiled. He said, "I will leave." 


He fluttered the next sentence, and he turned and left. It is reasonable to 
say that thank you for catching up and asking, but he has a strange feeling. 
I think that since the boy has said that he is leaving, he should not leave 
for too long, and he will definitely come back again. Going from the 
perspective of travel. 


Thanks to the things he received when he walked down the street last 
night, he turned over and turned his left hand, took out a hot pot in his left 
hand, and found a kitchen knife in his right hand. He looked at the pile of 
fruits and vegetables on the table and got up. 


After a scent of incense, the Bodhisattva actually sounded a full foot. This 
foot sound is not a disease, you can imagine the young man's calm and 
unrestrained appearance when he walks. 


At this point, the things that Xie pity had in his hand had turned into two 
plates. He looked at the things on the plate and looked left and right. He 
sighed and didn't want to see it again. So he went out and saw Sanro. 


The boy stood outside, perhaps because the sun was shining. He took off 
the red dress and tied it to his waist casually. He only wore a white light 
coat on his upper body and his sleeves rolled up. It seemed that the whole 
person was very clean. . He put his right foot on a rectangular board and 
turned a hatchet in his left hand. The hatchet was borrowed from which 
villager's house. It looked blunt and heavy. It was easy in his hands, and it 
seemed to be extremely sharp. From time to time, he cut two knives on the 
board, like peeling. He blinked and saw thankfulness and said: "Do 
something." 


Thanks for the past, he was actually doing a door leaf. Moreover, the size 
is just right, the appearance 1s beautiful, the noodles are very smooth, and 


the craftsmanship is extremely good. Because this boy seems to be a big 
man, thank you for thinking that he is probably a type of grain that does 

not distinguish between four bodies. Who knows that he is very good at 

doing things, saying: "Working hard, Saburo." 


Saburo smiled and did not answer. When he had a hatchet, he installed it, 
knocked on the door, and said to him: "It is better to draw a picture and 
draw it on the door." 


After that, if you had nothing to open the curtain, go in. 


It seems that the strict curse on the curtain did not have any deterrent 
effect on him, and Saburo did not care. 


Thanks for closing this new door, I couldn't help but open it again, then 
close it, open it again, and close it. I said that this door is really good. I 
switched it a few times and suddenly woke up and felt that I was really 
bored. That Saburo has already sat down in the house. Xie pity left the 
door and took out a plate of hoes from the villagers in the morning and 
placed them on the table. 


Saburo looked at the girl and didn't speak. He just laughed low and seemed 
to see through. Thanks for the pity, he poured two bowls of water and was 
preparing to sit down. He saw the sleeves that Sanlang rolled up, and there 
was a small row of tattoos on his arm, which was very strange. Saburo 
noticed his gaze, put his sleeve down, and smiled: "I was stabbed when I 
was young." 


If you put down your sleeves, you don't want to say more. Thank you for 
your understanding. He sat, looked up and glanced at the portrait, saying: 
"Sanlang, you paint very well, but some people in the family teach?" 


Saburo poked a few hoes with chopsticks and said: "Nobody teaches. I 
paint myself to be happy." 


Thanks to the pity: "How do you even draw a picture of the fairy tales?" 


Saburo smiled and said: "You don't mean that I know everything? Of 
course I know how to paint." 


Although this is a very ridiculous answer, his attitude is frank, as if he is 
not worried about pity and doubt, and he is not afraid of questioning him. 
Thank you for your kindness. At this time, there was a bang in the outside. 
The two men looked up and looked at each other. 


Just listen to someone knocking on the door, saying: "Da Xian! It’s gone, 
Daxian is saving!" 


Thanks for opening the door, a group of people stood in the doorway and 
circled. The village chief saw him open the door and said with great joy: 
"Da Xian! This person seems to be dying! You can save him!" 


Thanks to the people who heard that people are dying, they quickly went 
up to see. I saw a group of villagers surrounded by a Taoist, unkempt, a 
yellow sand, clothing and soles shoes ruined, seems to be rushing for 
many days, finally unable to support the past here, was lifted. Thanks to 
pity: "Don't panic, not dead." He leaned over and ordered a few times on 
this person. In the process, he found that some objects hanging on this 
person, such as gossip, iron sword, etc., are effective implements. It seems 
that it is not an ordinary rivers and lakes, and he can't help but sink. Not 
long after, this Taoist person really woke up and hoarse and asked: "Where 
is this?" 


The head of the village said: "This is the Bodhisattva village!" 
The man muttered: "... came out, I came out, and finally escaped..." 


He looked around and suddenly looked at his eyes and said: "Save, save 
lives, save lives!" 


For this kind of reaction, thankfulness has long been expected. He said: 
"The Taoist friend, what the **** is going on, what life is saved, what's 
wrong, don't worry, let's make it clear." 


The villagers also said: "Yeah, don't be afraid, we have a big fairy here, he 
must be everything for you!" 


Thankfulness: "???" 


This group of villagers did not actually see him showing any gods, but he 
really regarded him as a living god. He thanked him for not knowing what 
to say. He thought: "Everything 1s flat, this is really impossible to 
guarantee." That humanity: "Where is this from here?" 


That humanity: "I... lam coming from half a month!" 


Hearing the words, everyone looked at each other: "Where 1s the half- 
moon off?" "I haven't heard it!" 


Thanks to pity: "Half a month is in the northwest, far away from here. 
How did you come here?" 


That humanity: "I... I managed to escape." 


He speaks incoherently and his emotions are extremely unstable. In this 
case, the more people around you are the more difficult to talk, the 
screaming, unclear and inaudible, thanking the pity: "Go in and say." 


He gently mentioned the person and helped him into the house. He turned 
and said to the villagers: "Please go back, don't look around." 


The villagers are very enthusiastic: "Da Xian, what happened to him!" 
"Yeah, what the **** is going on?" "If there is any difficulty, we will help 
you!" 


The more enthusiastic they are, the more they can't help. Thanks for the 
pity, I just had to suppress the voice, and said awkwardly: "This... may be 
evil." 


The villagers were shocked. It’s got it in the evil! Still don't look at it, and 
it has been scattered quickly. Xie pity and laughter, close the door, Saburo 
is still sitting at the table, playing chopsticks in his hand. He stared at the 


man, his eyes were quite scrutinized, and thanked him for saying: 
"Nothing, you will eat." 


He let the person sit, and stood on his own, saying: "This Taoist friend, I 
am the master of this place, it is also a spiritual person. You should not be 
nervous, if there is anything to talk about. If you can help The place, 
maybe I can do a little bit of power. You just said, what happened in half a 
month?" 


The man took a few breaths, seemed to be in a place where there were few 
people, and listened to his comforting words. He finally calmed down and 
said, "Have you ever heard of this place?" 


Thanks for the pity: "I have heard it. Half a month is locked in an oasis in 
the Gobi. The half-moon night is beautiful, it 1s a beautiful scenery, so it is 
this name." 


That humanity: "Oasis? Beautiful? It was a thing of a hundred or two 
hundred years ago. Now, let it be half-life!" 


Thank you very much, said: "How do you say?" 


The person’s face was blue and green, and he said: “Because no matter 
who goes from there, at least half of the people will disappear without a 
trace. Isn’t it a half-life?” 


This is really not heard. Thanks to the pity: "Who is this to listen to?" 


The humanity said: "I don't listen to who said it, I saw it with my own 
eyes!" He sat up and said, "There is a caravan going through there, 
knowing the evil door of this place, and asking our entire division to **** 
that dart. "The result..." he said with sorrow and anger. "The result is that I 
will only have one!" 


Thank you for raising your hand and telling him to sit down, don't be 
excited, "How many people are there in your party?" 


That person said: "I have a whole division, plus a caravan, about sixty 
people!" 


More than sixty people. The female ghost Xuan Ji, in a hundred years of 
chaos, and finally the soul of the temple to calculate the victims of the 
disaster did not reach two hundred. Listening to this person's words, this 
kind of thing seems to have lasted for more than 100 years. If there are so 
many people missing every time, it would be a great thing to add up. Xie 
pity asked: "When did the half-month turn become a half-life, when did it 
start?" 


That humanity: "About, it was 150 years ago, when it became a land of 
demon." 


Xie pity still has to ask him carefully about the murder of his trip and the 
"demon road" in his mouth. However, from the conversation to the 
present, there has always been a faint feeling in his heart. When it comes 
to this, it cannot hide his heart. That weird feeling, so I accepted my words 
and raised my eyebrows slightly. 


At this time, Saburo suddenly said a word. 
He said: "Are you escaping all the way from half a month?" 
That humanity: "Yeah, hey! Nine deaths." 


Saburo "oh" and stopped talking. However, only to eliminate this sentence, 
thank you have already noticed that something is wrong. 


He turned and said warmly: "Then you have to escape all the way, you 
must be thirsty." 


That person is a glimpse. And Xie Pity has put a bowl of water in front of 
him and said: "There is water here, this Taoist friend, come and have a 
drink." 


Against this bowl of water, the face of this Taoist man’s face flashed 
through. And thank you for standing on the side, holding his hands in his 


sleeves and waiting quietly. 


This Taoist man came from the northwest, and he fled all the way. He was 
bound to be hungry and hungry. He looked at him like it, and he did not 
have the leisure to eat and drink. 


However, after he woke up, he said so much, but he did not ask for any 
water to eat at all. After he entered the house, he faced the food and water 
on the table. He did not even have a desire or hope. He even did not even 
look at it. 


This is really not like a living person. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 18: 
Bodhisattva Guanyue talks about half a month off 


Under the watchful eyes of the other two in the house, the man picked up 
the water bowl, rubbed his waist and slowly drank it. It doesn't mean that 
it is like a long drought, but it seems to be a little hesitant to guard. 


While he was drinking, Xie had heard the sound of "??" and "??" in his 
ears, as if he was pouring water into an empty can. 


In an instant, his heart was shining, and he grasped the other's hand and 
said: "Don't drink." 


The man shook and looked at him with trepidation. Xie said with a smile: 
"It’s useless to drink, isn't 1t?" 


The man heard the face change, and the other hand pulled out the iron 
sword from the waist and stabbed him. Thanks for standing still, raising 
his hand and playing a bullet, "squeaky", gently bounced the sword front. 
The man saw that he still clasped his hand and gnawed his teeth. Xie pity 
only felt that the arm suddenly slammed, as if the leaking ball was 
generally smashed, and broke away from his palm. As soon as the man 
broke free, he fled to the door. Xie Pity is not in a hurry. In this place 
where there is no external resistance, this person will escape from the ten 
feet, and if evil can drag him back. Who knows, he just lifted his wrist and 
a sharp wind broke through him. 


The voice was like someone shooting a sharp arrow from behind him, 
directly passing the person through his belly and nailing it to the door. 
Thanks for your attention, it was actually a bamboo chopstick. 


When he looked back, Saburo stood up from the table and walked over 
with him. He pulled out the bamboo chopsticks and shook it twice in front 
of him. "Dirty. I will lose it later." 


The man was so badly hit, there was no sound of crying, and he slowly 
slipped down against the door silently. It 1s not blood, but clear water, 
flowing from his belly. 


It was the bowl of water that he only drunk. 


Both of them squatted down the side of the man. Xie pity pressed at the 
wound of his wound. He felt that the wound was like a hole in a balloon 
that was punctured, and the air was leaking outside. The "corpse" is also 
changing. Just looking at him, it is clearly a big man, but now it seems that 
the whole person has been reduced in a circle, the face and limbs are 
somewhat shrinking, and still shrinking, it looks like a little old man. 


Thanks to pity: "It is an empty shell." 


Some demons and ghosts, who can't illusion themselves into perfect 
human shapes, would think of another way: making empty shells. 


They will use a very realistic material to craft a pair of fake skins. Such 
skin capsules often refer to real living people, sometimes even directly 
from the human skin, palm prints, fingerprints, and hair are naturally 
perfect. Moreover, such empty shells, as long as they do not wear this 
layer of skin, will not be contaminated with ghosts, and will not be afraid 
of those evil spells. This is why the spell on the door did not keep the 
Taoist out. 


However, such empty shells are often easily seen, because they are hollow 
dummys. If no one wears this layer of skin, they can only act according to 
the instructions of the operator. And this instruction can't be too 
complicated, it can only be simple, repetitive, pre-set things. Therefore, 
their demeanor is usually relatively sluggish, not like a living person. For 
example, they will repeat one or two sentences repeatedly, do the same 
thing, or ask themselves for self-answer, answer questions, and say a few 
words to people. . However, there is a more practical way to discern the 
empty shell: let them drink a bowl of water or eat something. After all, the 
shells are hollow and there are no internal organs. When they eat or drink 
water, they are like throwing things into an empty jar or pouring water. 


They can hear clear echoes, and the sound of living and drinking water is 
completely different. . 


The body of the man has been completely smashed, almost a soft skin. 
Saburo pressed the bamboo chopsticks on his skin and dropped the 
chopsticks. He said: "This shell is a bit interesting." 


Thank you for knowing what this boy is referring to. The Taoist demeanor, 
they are all in the eyes, to stop the real life, is simply a living person, 
communicate with him, answer the flow, it can be seen that the 
manipulator's mana is amazing. Thanks to see him, said: "It seems that 
Saburo is also very involved in this kind of different skills." 


Saburo smiled and said: "Not much." 


This empty shell was specially found on the door, telling him about the 
half-monthly thing, whether it is true or not, the purpose is to lead him to 
half a month off, in order to be safe, you must also get a psychic array to 
ask. Thanks to pity, the calculation of the remaining mana is enough to 
support him to use it again. This will pinch a child and go to the psychic 
array. 


Once inside, it was a rare excitement, and it was not busy because of busy 
business. It seems that everyone is playing games, laughing and laughing. 
Thanks to Pity, I was amazed. I only listened to the Lingwen: "His Lord 1s 
back? How have you been doing this in the past few days?" 


Thanks for the pity: "It's okay. What are you doing? I am so happy." 


Lingwen said: "The Fengshi adults are back, they are dying, and will not 
be able to grab a rob?" 


Sure enough, Xie Li heard that several priests in the array were screaming 
and shouting: "One hundred merits! Grab!" "Why do I have only one 
merit..." "One thousand! One thousand! Ah! Thank you, Master!" 
Hahahahahahaha..." He thought that this is the money in the sky, everyone 
is swearing? Although his merits are empty, he doesn't know how to grab 
it. Second, the rest of the priests are familiar with each other. It doesn't 


matter if you grab a game. It is a bit strange that he suddenly inserts it. So 
neither. I care about it and ask myself: "You, do you know this place half a 
month?" 


As soon as this was said, the psychic array that was eager to grab merits 
was silent. 


Thanks again, I feel a little depressed. 


He used to send some small poems and secret recipes, and everyone was 
silent, because the rest of the priests did not make these, then his words 
may indeed be out of place. However, in the psychic array, there are often 
priests who ask questions about official duties. For example, who of you 
knows which ghost, is it good to deal with it? Whose land is there, can you 
help me? At this time, everyone is also a different opinion, there are 
suggestions for suggestions, no suggestion to say that I have time to 
return, I will help you ask. He asked for half a month off, but it was also a 
official business. There was no reason to open the whole scene. 


For a long while, suddenly one shouted: "The wind master has scattered 
100,000 merits!!!" 


The psychic array was instantly active again, and the gods and officials 
had rushed to the merits. No one cares about the sentence that he only 
asked. Xie Li knows that this is probably not simple. I can’t ask anything 
in the line. I thought that this Fengshi adult is really a big deal. It’s a 
hundred thousand. It’s a good life, it’s about to retreat, suddenly, the spirit. 
The text sent him a sentence in private. 


Lingwen asked: "His Royal Highness, why do you suddenly ask half a 
month off?" 


Xie pity said that there was a shell coming to the door, saying: "The 
survivor who escaped from the half moon in the shell must have its 
purpose. I don't know if he said it was true or not, I will come up. Ask. 
What happened to this place?" 


Lingwen was indulging for a moment, saying: "Your Highness, this matter, 
I advise you, don't touch your hand." 


Thank you for your kindness. Otherwise, it will not last for a hundred and 
fifty years, and no one will care about it, and he will be silent when he 
asks. He said: "Every time I pass, I am missing more than half, 1s it true?" 


For a long time, Lingwen said: "This is a bad thing for everyone." 


Thank you for listening to the discretion in her voice. I have a hard time. 
"Okay, I understand. If you are not convenient, then you have to say more. 
We have never talked about this topic privately." 


After receiving the knowledge of God, I went out of the psychic array, 
thanked Pity for getting up, and swept the fake skinball on the ground with 
a broom. I sank for a moment and looked up: "Sanlang, I am afraid I have 
to go far." 


From the attitude of the spirit, it is not a small matter. Since the empty 
shell was sent to the door, it was meant to marry him. It would definitely 
not be a good place. Saburo said: "Okay, brother, don't mind picking me 


up." 


Thanks for the pity: "The road is far away, the wind is hard, why do you 
want to follow?" 


Saburo smiled and said: "Do you want to know what is going on in the half 
moon?" 


Thank you for your meal, "Do you even know this?" 


Saburo held his hand and said leisurely: "The half moon is not called the 
half moon. It is the place where the ancient country was two hundred years 
ago." 


He sat up straight and stared at the star, saying: "Half moon demon, that 
18x 


Thanks to the broom on the wall, you have to sit down and listen in detail. 
At this time, there was a sound of knocking on the door outside the door. 


At this time, the weather was late, and the villagers were scared to retreat 
into the house before the pity, and who would knock on the door? Xie pity 
stood at the door, holding his breath for a moment, did not feel the change 
of the spell on the door, followed by two '"??". Listening to this voice, it 
seems that two people are knocking at the same time. 


He thought about it and opened the door. Sure enough, two black teenagers 
stood at the door. A handsome, elegant, it is the south wind and the 
support. Thanks for your pity: "You two..." 


The first step was to turn a blind eye. The south wind opened the mouth 
and asked: "Are you going to go half a month?" 


Thank you, "Where did you hear it?" 


Nanfeng Road: "Several sects talked a few words on the road. I heard that 
you asked about a half-month off in the psychic array today." 


Thanks for your pity, hands clasped in the sleeves and said: "I understand. 
'T volunteer,' right?" 


Both of them were distorted with a toothache and said: "...yeah." 


Thanks to pity, Junjun can't help but said: "Understood, understand. 
However, if you say good things in advance, if you encounter something 
you can't cope with on the way, please feel free to run away." 


When the lower side opened, ask them to enter the room and elaborate. 
Who knows, the two men saw the young boy sitting behind him, the 


original black face, instantly turned into a blue. 


The south wind came in and grabbed in front of the pity, saying: "Retreat!" 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 19: 
Bodhisattva Guanyue talks about half a month off 


Thank you, "What's wrong?" 

Saburo sat, and spread his hand, and said: "What happened?" 

I raised my eyebrows and said, "Who are you?" 

Thanks to pity: "I am a friend. Do you know?" 

Saburo is full of innocence, saying: "Brother, who are these two?" 


Hearing his brother, Nanfeng’s mouth was pumping, and his eyebrows 
shook. Xie Li said to Saburo: "Nothing, don't be nervous." Nanfeng said: 
"Don't talk to him!" 


Thank you, "How come, do you know?" 


" " 


Shake the cold channel: "I don't know." 


Thanks to pity: "I don't know what you are doing..." The voice didn't fall. 
He suddenly felt that something was shining on both sides. Looking back 
at it inadvertently, the two men gathered a white light in the right hand at 
the same time. A bad premonition came to life, busy: "Call and stop. Don't 
be impulsive!" 


The two groups of white light that emerged from the air seemed to be 
dangerous, and it was definitely something that ordinary people could 
come up with. Saburo took two shots and politely said: "Fantastic, 
magical." These two compliments are really not sincere. Thanks to pity, it 
is easy to hug the two arms. The south wind looked back at him and 
angered: "Where did you meet this person? Who is the surname? Where is 
the family? What is the origin? Why are you with you?" 


Thanks to pity: "There was a problem on the road called Saburo. I don't 
know. Because there is nowhere to go, I will let him be with me. Don't you 
be impulsive first." 


"You..." The south wind sighed with a sigh of relief. It seemed to be 
awkward, forcibly swallowed, and asked, "If you don't know, you dare to 
let him in?! What if he doesn't care?" 


Thank you for thinking about how the South Wind 1s like his 
embarrassment? If you change to a priest, or change someone, and hear a 
person who is younger than himself, he will be unhappy. However, thanks 
to the pity, I have already done nothing about all kinds of scorns. Secondly, 
he knows that these two people are also good intentions, so they don't care. 
At this time, Saburo said: "Brother, are these two servants?" 


Thank you for your kindness: "The word servant is wrong. To be exact, it 
should be an assistant." 


Saburo smiled and said, "Is it?" 


He stood up and grabbed the same thing and shook it over and said, 
"Would you help me?" 


If you don’t look at it, you will catch that kind of thing, get it in your hand, 
bow your head, and smash it. 


This boy actually threw a broom to him! ! ! 


His look, as if to put the broom and the teenager together as a powder on 
the spot, thanked and quickly took the broom and said: "Calm, calm, I only 
have this." Who knows, the voice has not fallen The white light that had 
shaken the hand was put out. He shouted: "Speedy!" 


Saburo did not try to dodge, but still kept his arms and sat in a posture, 
only slightly biased, the dazzling white light hit the table for the foot, the 
table smashed, the smashing, the cup and the bowl of white flowers fell to 
the ground . Thank you for your help, and I feel that I can't go on like this 
anymore. If I wave my hand, if the evil is out, I will tie the south wind and 


the arm of the two. The two earned two and did not earn, and the south 
wind angered: "What are you doing!" 


Thanks to the gesture of suspending: "Go out and say, go out and say." 
Another wave, if the evil will take him and fly out. Xie pity turned back 
and said to Saburo: "Come back soon." The backhand closed the door and 
came to the front. He first received the evil, then took the brand in front of 
the door and placed it in front of the two, and said to them: "Please read it 
again and tell me what it is." 


I waved to the brand and read: "There is a dangerous house, sincerely seek 
good people, donate money to repair, and accumulate merits." He looked 
up, "Dangerous room for donation? You wrote?? You are a soaring priest, 
how can you write this? What kind of thing? Dignity?" 


Xie pity nodded: "Yes. I wrote. If you continue to fight in it, then I am not 
asking for a house but building a house. There will be no dignity at that 
time." 


Nanfeng pointed at the Bodhisattva and said: "You don't think that 
teenager is weird??" 


Thanks for the pity: "Of course I feel." 


Nanfeng Road: "Then you know that he is dangerous and dare to put him 
around?" 


Thanks for seeing that they didn’t have the intention to donate, they put 
the brand back and said: “Nanfeng, what you said is wrong. The world’s 
temperament and adventures are thousands of dollars. The weirdness 1s not 
the same as danger. It’s in the eyes of others. I seem to be very weird, but 
do you think I am dangerous?" 


This is really not to refute. This person clearly has a look of the sacred 
wind bones of the jade tree, but it 1s all over the day, it is not eccentric! 


Fudao said: "You are not afraid of his plans?" 
Xie pity asked: "Do you think I have something to plot?" 


As soon as this sentence came out, the south wind and the swaying of the 
two men sang. 


This question is really very reasonable. If a person is being plotted, it is 
usually because of his guilt. But what is sad is that if you think about it 
carefully, you can’t think of anything worthy of plotting. If you want 
money, you don’t have money, you don’t have treasure, can you still figure 
out the few broken pieces that he receives every day? 


Thanks again, "And, I have not tried him." 


The two looked at each other and said, "How do you test?" "How is the 
result?" 


Xie pity said that several times, said: "There 1s no result. I have already 
done this. If he is not a mortal, then there is only one possibility left." 


Absolutely! 
Shake and sneer: "Is it really true?" 


Thanks to pity: "Do you think that the ghosts of the Desperate Kings are as 
leisurely as we are? Go to a village and accompany me to get rid of it." 


"We are not busy!" 
"Yes Yes: Yesivvi::: " 


On the hillside, the three people outside Bodhisattva only heard the sound 
of the young boy walking slowly around the house. It sounded very 
pleasant, as if he was not worried about anything at all. Nanfeng Shen 
Sheng said: "No. Still have to think of a way, try to test if he 1s absolutely." 


Thank you for your pity, and said, "Let's try it. But don't make too much 
trouble. Is it really just a little boy who runs away from home? I am very 


close to this kid, you are friendly. Don't bully him." 


Hearing the phrase "Don't bully him", the south wind has a hard time, and 
the white eyes that are swaying are going to turn to the back. After 
smashing them, and then opening the door, Saburo is lowering his head 
and seems to be checking the table and table for the table. Thanks for the 
light cough, said: "Are you okay?" 


Saburo smiled and said: "I am fine. I can't repair it at this table." 
Thank you for your kindness: "It’s just a misunderstanding, don’t mind." 


Saburo smiled and said: "Since you said it, how can I mind? Maybe they 
are familiar with me." 


Shake the cool tunnel: "Yes. It's a bit familiar, so I may have read it 
wrong." 


Saburo smiled and said: "Oh. It’s very clever, I’m a bit familiar with both 
of them.” 


" " 


Although the two were still vigilant, there was no more radical action. The 
south wind is boring: "Give me a place to draw a picture of the Descending 
Thousand Miles." 


"Shrinking a thousand miles" is a shrinking technique. As the name 
suggests, it is a step in the mountains and rivers. In addition to using a 
large amount of mana every time you use it, it is very convenient. Thanks 
for accepting the mat on the ground, said: "Draw it here." 


Just before I came in, I didn’t look at the furnishings. Now I’m standing in 
this small, broken house, and I’m looking around, looking at the 
uncomfortable look. I’m embarrassed: “You live in this place?” 


Xie pity gave him a stool and said: "I have always lived in this place." 


Hearing the words, the south wind moved a meal, and he continued to 
paint. I didn't sit down, and my look was slightly condensed. I couldn't tell 
what his face was. There were nine minutes and one point, like a 
schadenfreude. 


But he quickly put away this strange look and said: "What about the bed?" 
Thanks for holding the mat, said: "This is." 


The south wind looked up at the mat and lowered his head. He took a look 
at Saburo and said, "Are you sleeping with him?" 


Thanks: "Is there any problem?" 


For a long while, the two did not say a word again. It seems that there is no 
problem. Thanks to pity, he turned his head and asked: "Sanlang, you will 
be interrupted when you say half of it. What is the half moon demon? 
Then say?" 


Saburo stared at them, a thoughtful look, dark eyes, listened to him and 
thanked him, returned to God, smiled and said: "Good." 


After a pause, he said: "The half-moon demon road is the national division 
of the ancient country in half a month. It is one of the double divisions of 
the demon." 


Thanks to the pity: "The demon and the double division must be two, who 
is there?" 


Saburo has a question and answer, saying: "It has nothing to do with the 
half-moon country. It is a demon road in the Central Plains. It is called 
Fangxin Guoshi." 


Thanks for the slightest look, I continued to listen. 


It turned out that half a month of manpower is infinite, and the 
temperament is fierce and aggressive, and it 1s in a strange position. It has 
one of the important levels of the road between the Central Plains and the 
Western Region. The two countries often face conflicts in the border areas, 


frictions are constantly changing, and there are numerous wars. Their 
national teachers were acquainted with the sorcerer, and the soldiers were 
very convinced by them for half a month. 


However, two hundred years ago, the Central Plains Dynasty dynasty 
finally sent troops to attack and settled for half a month. 


Although the half-moon country was extinguished, the resentment of the 
national division and the soldiers did not linger, leaving it for blasphemy. 
The half-moon country was originally an oasis. After the country was 
turned into a half-moon, it seemed to be eroded by evil spirits. The oasis 
was gradually swallowed up by the Gobi around. It is said that people in 
the night often see a tall, half-moon soldier holding a mace in the Gobi, 
patrolling and hunting. There were tens of thousands of residents here, and 
they gradually survived and moved away. At the same time, there is also a 
legend that “every time passes, disappeared more than half’, gradually 
spread: As long as people from the Central Plains pass by here, they must 
leave half of the “buy road money” — human life! 


Shake the skin and laugh at the meat and laugh: "This son, you know so 
much." 


Saburo smiled and said: "Where is it. You know less." 


Thanks to pity, Junjun can't help but think that this little child is really a 
sharp tooth. He also listened to Saburo’s lazy voice: “It’s just some wild 
history and the mystery of the ancient books. Who knows if there is such a 
national teacher? Even if there is no half-month country, maybe.” 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 20: Shrinking 
a thousand miles of wind and sand 


Thanks for the pity: "Although you are watching wild rumors, the half- 
moon country does exist." 


Saburo: "Oh?" 


At this time, the south wind finally painted a layered array on the ground, 
got up and said: "Okay. When will it start?" 


Xie pity quickly packed up a bag and came to the door and said, "Let's do 
it now." 


He put his hand on the door and said: "Heavenly blessing, no taboo!" 


When the door was opened, the hillside and the village were not seen 
outside the door. Instead, it was an empty street. 


Although the road is wide and wide, it is no one to see one or two 
pedestrians. It’s not because the sky is dark now, but because the land of 
the northwest is sparsely populated, and it’s so close, plus it’s close to the 
Gobi, even during the day, it’s not too much to estimate. Xie pity came out 
of the house, closed the door with his backhand, and then looked back. 
Where did he come from the view of Bodhisattva? Behind it, it is clearly a 
small inn. This step is only a matter of a thousand miles. This is the magic 
of shrinking. 


A few passers-by passed by, staring at them, even guarding. At this time, I 
only heard Saburo behind him: "According to the ancient books, when the 
moon sinks, go all the way to the North Star, you will see the half moon 
country. Brother, you see." He refers to the heavens, "Big Dipper." 


Thanks for looking up and laughing, "The Big Dipper is so bright." 


Saburo came to him, side by side with him, looked at him, looked up and 
smiled and said: "Yes. The night sky in the northwest, somehow, seems to 
be more lenient than the Central Plains." 


Thanks for agreeing. They are serious about discussing the night sky and 
the stars here, and the two small priests in the back are simply incredible. 
Nanfeng Road: "How is he here too?!" 


Saburo said innocently: "Oh, I think this strange door armor is very 
magical, so I will come over and visit." 


Nanfeng angered: "Visit? Do you think we are going to play?!" 


Thank you for your brow and heart, said: "Forget it, come over with it, he 
will not eat your dry food, I should bring enough. Saburo, keep up with 
me, don't lose it." 


Saburo is a bit awkward: "Okay." 
“Is this a question of who eats dry food?!” 


"Hey, south wind, big night, everyone is sleeping. Do the right thing, do 
not care so much. Go away." 


The four followed the guidance of the Big Dipper and went straight north. 
After walking all night, the towns and greens along the way gradually 
became scarce, and the sand on the road gradually increased. When the 
footsteps were no longer muddy, it entered the Gobi. The use of shrinking 
techniques, although it can be a thousand miles, but the farther the 
distance is crossed, the greater the mana cost, the south wind used this 
time, at least for a few hours can not be used. And since the south wind has 
consumed a wave of mana, due to the storage of war power, thankfulness 
will not let the booster be used again. In case, just in case, there must be a 
personal mana. 


In the desert land, the temperature difference between day and night is 
great, and the night is cold and cold, but it is okay, but in the daytime, it is 
completely another feeling. The sky here is extremely clean, and the sky is 
high, but the daylight is also extremely fierce. The group walked and 
walked. The more they walked, the more they went into a huge steamer, 
and the hot air in the heart of the earth seemed to take a day to steam the 
living. 


Thanks to the wind and some vegetation shrinking at the foot of the rock, I 
am worried that someone can't keep up. The south wind and the swaying 
are not mortals. Needless to say, Saburo made him smile. 


When the sun was shining, the boy took off his red robe and lazily covered 
the sun. His look was lazy and a little tired. His skin is fair, his hair is 
black, and his red dress is so covered that his face is more beautiful. Xie 
pity took the bucket off and raised his hand to a button on his head. He 
said, "This is a loan to you." 


Saburo, a slap, a smile, said: "No need." He handed back the fight to him. 
Xie pity does not tell him more than each other. Since he does not need it, 
he does not reluctantly. He said: "I need to find me again." I helped the 
fight and continued on. 


After another trip, the group saw a small gray building in the yellow sand 
in front. When I saw it, it seemed to be an inn that was abandoned for 
many years. Xie pity looked up at the sky, thinking that it was past noon, 
and immediately went to the time, fearing that it was the hottest time of 
the day, and they had already gone all night, it was time to trim, so they 
led the other three When people entered, they saw a square table in the 
building and they sat around. Thanks for taking the kettle out of the simple 
bag behind him and handing it to Saburo, saying, "Is it?" 


Saburo nodded, took it, took a sip, thanked him for taking it back. He 
swallowed a few mouthfuls of clear water, his throat rolled up and down, 
and the coldness of his throat rushed through, and it was very fast. Saburo 
was on the side, holding one hand and staring at it. After a while, suddenly 
said: "Is there still?" 


Thanks for a little bit of water on the lips, slightly moist, nodded, and 
handed out the kettle again. Saburo was about to pick it up. At this time, a 
hand opened the hand holding the kettle. 


Fudao: "And slow." 


Everyone looked at him and saw that the other bottle was taken out of the 
sleeve and placed on the table. He pushed it over and said, "I have it here 
too. Please." 


Thank you for your understanding. 


How can I share the same kettle with others? I remembered that they said 
last night that they would try again. The water in the kettle must not be 
just water. It must be shaped water. 


The water of this kind of secret medicine, if it is an ordinary person to 
drink, has nothing to do; but if it is not a person, drink it, it will appear 
under the action of the potion. They are trying to test whether the boy is 
"absolute", and the pot is shaped like water, which is bound to be 
powerful. 


Just listening to Saburo laughed: "I can drink a kettle with my brother." 


Both the south wind and the swaying look a glance at the side, thank you 
for thinking about what I am doing? Shake the cold channel: "His water is 
drunk, you are welcome." 


Saburo said: "Is it? Then you two first." 


The two did not say anything. For a long while, I waved and said: "You are 
a guest, please ask first." 


Although he spoke as a sleek look, but Xie pity always felt that his 
sentence was squeezed out from the teeth of his teeth. Saburo also made a 
"please" gesture and said: "You are from, you please first, otherwise I am 
embarrassed." 


Thank you for listening to them, and they went to work. Finally, they 
started to work. The three men secretly pushed on a poor kettle while 
leaning across a table. They only pushed their own faint hair. The 
trembling broken table is probably going to die in advance, shaking his 
head. There were a few back and forth over there, and the support was 
finally unable to hold back. He only listened to him and sneered: "You are 
not willing to drink this water, is it a guilty conscience?" 


Saburo smiled and said: "You are so unfriendly, and you are not willing to 
drink first. Is it more like a guilty conscience? Is it poisoned in the water?" 


He yelled: "You can ask the person next to you, this water is poisonous." 
Saburo asked thankfulness: "Brother, is this water poisonous?" 


It is really embarrassing to shake this issue. The shape of water is not a 
poisonous medicine. There is no difference between ordinary people 
drinking it and drinking water. Thanks can only answer: "No poison. 
But..." 


One sentence is not over, the south wind and the swaying are staring at 
him. Saburo actually loosened his hand and said: "Okay." 


He licked the kettle and shook it in his hand. He said, "Since you said that 
you are not poisonous, then I will drink." 


After that, he smiled and drank it. 


Xie Li did not expect that he would be so simple, a slight glimpse. The 
south wind and the swaying are also a glimpse, and then the whole **** is 
on alert. Who knows, Saburo finished the water, and shook the pot, saying: 
"The taste is not good." It was thrown away, and the kettle was thrown 
away. "Dangling", the kettle fell on the ground and shattered. 


Seeing that he drank the water, it still had no abnormalities, and he shook 
his face and flashed a moment of suspicion. Speaking, he said faintly: "It’s 
just water. It’s not all the same taste. What can be different." 


Saburo took the kettle that was placed on the elbow and said, "Of course it 
is different. This is much better." 


See you, thank you, pity, can not help. He does not care about the actual 
results, and does not care about the so-called identity purposes, so this 
chaos is here, and it is meaningless except for fun. He thought that he 
should stop there. Who knows, with a bang, the south wind put a sword on 
the table. 


His imposing manner, at first glance, thought he was going to kill people 
on the spot, thanking him for a moment, saying: "What are you doing?" 


The south wind sighed: "The place to go is dangerous. Send this little 
brother a sword to defend himself." 


Thanks for looking down, this sword scabbard is simple, it seems to have 
many years of tempering, not the goods, the heart shocked, raised the 
amount, turned to one side, the heart said: "It 1s actually a 'red mirror."" 


The name of this sword is called "Red Mirror". This is a sword. Although 
it can't demon, it can't escape its magical mirror. As long as it is inhuman, 
pull it out, its blade will slowly turn red, as if it is filled with blood, and 
the **** red blade will reflect the original shape of the swordsman. 
Whether you are fierce or not, no one is spared! 


Young people will always have a special eye for the sword BMW. Saburo 
"Oh?", it seems to be very interesting, said: "I look." 


He held the blade in one hand and held the hilt in one hand and slowly 
pulled out. The south wind and the four eyes shook his eyes and stared at 
his movements. The sword was squirted three inches, and the sword was 
sharp. For a long while, Saburo chuckled and said: "Brother, are you two 
servants, are you kidding me?" 


Xie pity and cough, turned back and said: "Sanlang, I said, not a servant." 
After saying this, he turned again. The south wind 1s cold: "Who is joking 
with you?" 


Saburo smiled and said: "A broken sword, how to defend yourself?" 


When he finished, he inserted the sword and went back and threw it on the 
table. Hearing the words, the south wind brows a glimpse, violently 
grasping the hilt and pulling out, only listening to the "squeaky" sound, he 
has a sharper cold in his hand... broken sword. 


The blade of the red mirror was actually broken from three inches below! 


The southerly face changed slightly, and then the scabbard was turned 
down. Only the "clam dangling" was heard, and the remaining swords in 
the scabbard were all broken into small pieces of sharp and sharp. 


The red mirror can distinguish all the demons and ghosts. This is true. I 
have never heard of anything that can escape its eye. However, I have 
never heard of anything. It can be broken through the scabbard! 


Both the south wind and the swaying are pointing to Saburo, saying: 
"You..." 


Saburo "haha" smiled twice, leaning back, black boots on the table, took a 
piece of red mirror and throwing a play in his hand, said: "I don't want to 
come to you with a broken sword." I am self-defense. Maybe it was 
accidentally broken on the road? Don't worry, I can defend myself without 
a sword. If you have a sword, you should keep it for yourself." 


Xie pity is completely unable to look directly at the sword. As a matter of 
fact, this "red mirror" is originally a collection of Junwu. When she first 
flew up, she once went to the Shenwu Temple to play, and saw it in him. I 
feel that this sword is not very good. Practical, but also interesting, Jun 
Wu sent him the red mirror. Later, he was shackled. For a while, it was 
really difficult. If he couldn’t get along, he would let Fengxin take the 
sword out. 


Yes, when it is lost! 


After the loss, the money exchanged was enough for the Lord to eat a few 
good meals from the two, and then there was no more. Thanks to the time 


when there were too many things to be dropped, so I forgot all about it, so 
that I would think that my heart would drop blood from time to time. I 
thought it might be that Fengxin was soaring. After thinking of such a 
thing, I was really squandered by a generation of Qijian red mirrors. Then 
I went down to find the sword, grinded it, polished it, and placed it in 
Nanyang Hall. Was taken by the south wind. All in all, thanks to seeing 
this sword head, it hurts and can only divert attention. He felt that the 
three men had slammed again, shook his head and carefully observed the 
weather outside the house. He said: "Look at this momentum. I am afraid 
that it will be a sandstorm. If I go on today, I don’t know if I can find it on 
the road. Where to shelter from the wind?" 


At this time, on the outside of the golden sand, there were two figures 
flashing past. 


Thank you for sitting up. 


The two figures, one black and one white, are not so hurried, or even calm, 
but they are extremely fast. The man in black 1s long, and the man in white 
is a female crown, carrying a long sword and arming. The black man did 
not return, but the white female crown was smiling when she was in the 
wrong direction with this small building. This smile is just like their 
figure, but it is fleeting, but there is a strange feeling in the endless. 


Xie pity has been staring at the outside, this just captured the scene, the 
other three people in the small building probably only saw their backs, and 
others could not take care of it for a while, the south wind Huo Ran got up 
and said: "Who 1s that? ?" 


Xie pity also stood up and said: "I don't know. But certainly not ordinary 
people." Shen Yan for a moment, he said, "You don't play anymore. I think 
this wind is big, let's go ahead, where can I go?" where." 


Fortunately, although this pedestrian has been jumping from time to time, 
it is still a matter of doing things. When it is no longer strong, the red 
mirror fragments are removed and the small building is out. The four 
people were in the air for a while. This time, about two hours, the distance 
that can be walked out is far less than the two hours before. The sand is 


much bigger than before. The wind was wrapped in sand, and the face was 
hit on the person, and the head and face that was exposed to the outside 
were faintly painful. The more I walked, the more I felt so hard, the 
whistling in my ears, the yellow sand was overwhelming, the things were 
unclear, and I was grateful for the fight, saying: "This wind is so good!" 


Half a sly, no one answered, thank you for your pity, and it’s not all left 
behind. Looking back, the three people are clearly following, just as if 
they didn’t even notice him. It turned out that the sand was too big, and an 
opening was actually even the sound was scraped away. The south wind 
and the nature of the wave do not need to worry about him, and the wind 
and the sand are steadily and murderous. And Saburo has been following 
the five steps behind him, and he walked without hesitation. 


Among the yellow sands of the sky, the boy’s look is waveless, and he is 
carrying his hand in a red dress and black hair. It seems that he does not 
feel any sandstorms at all. He is totally unmoved and does not even have 
eyes. Hey. Xie Pity has been beaten by the sand and hurts. Seeing him so 
indifferent, he is really worried and tells him: "Beware of sand coming 
into your eyes and clothes." Again, he couldn't hear what he said, thank 
you. Pity went straight and helped him to collect the clothes and collars, 
and wrapped them tightly, so that the wind and sand would not be poured 
in. Saburo is a glimpse. At this time, the other two people also followed 
up, the four people are closer, and finally can barely hear each other's 
voice. Thanks to pity: "Everyone is careful, this wind 1s coming suddenly, 
not quite right, afraid of being evil." 


He swayed: "But the wind and sand are a little bigger, what else can you 
do?" 


Xie pity shook his head and said: "The sand is good, afraid of the other 
things in the sand." 


At this time, a sudden gust of wind blew the blessings on the head. Once 
the fight was over, it would have disappeared completely into the yellow 
sand. Saburo responded to Chi Min and was very skilled. With one hand, 
he intercepted the fight that was about to fly to the sky and handed it to 


him again. Thanks for the blessing, while holding the fight, he said: "We 
better find a place to avoid." 


Shake but disapprove: "If the wind 1s really a ghost, the purpose is to stop 
us from moving forward. The more so, the more it should be." 


Hearing words, thank you for not talking yet, Saburo was the first to laugh 
and laughed. He shook his head and said coldly, "What are you laughing 
at?" 


Saburo held his hand and smiled and said: "I deliberately and people come 
back, is it giving you a sense of satisfaction that you are very maverick?" 


Before thanking the pity, I felt that although the boy was always laughing, 
he often told people that he was really sincere and still taunted each other 
with compliments. But this time, anyone can see it, he smiles, half-hearted 
does not bring. Shake his eyes and cool, thank you and raise your hand: 
"You must stop first. If you have something to say later, it is terrible." 


He swayed: "Can you still blow people up?" 
Thanks: "Well, this is very likely that you said..." 


The voice did not fall, and several people in front of him suddenly 
disappeared. 


In fact, it wasn't them who disappeared, but he—the wind sands that really 
wrapped him up and rolled up the sky. 


tornado! 


Thanks for turning around in the air, waving a hand, said: "If evil! Grab a 
solid and reliable thing!!!" 


If the evil spirits fly out, the next moment, thanking the pity will feel the 
whiteness of the end of the sinking, seems to be entangled in something, 
pulled him, thank you for being easy to settle in midair, looking down, he 
was actually squally Brought to a place at least ten feet from the ground. 


Now he is like a kite, only being held by the line, and his heart is on the 
ground. Among the yellow sands in the face, he grabbed Ruo Ruo and tried 
to see what Ruo Chou had caught. Looking at it, he finally recognized a 
red shadow. If the other end of the evil, it seems to be wrapped around the 
wrist of a red boy. 


He let Ruoqi grasp a solid and reliable thing, if the evil actually caught 
Saburo! 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 21: Shrinking 
a thousand miles of wind and sand 


Thanks to pity and laughter, I am about to let Ruogiang quickly catch 
another one, only to feel the whiteness of the wrist suddenly loose. His 
heart secretly screamed. 


This sudden feeling 1s not that the other end of the evil is released, but 
something more terrible happens. 


Sure enough, the red shadow on the ground suddenly came close to him. 
When it was not too much, he came to where he could reach. 


Saburo was also involved in the storm! 


Xie pity yelled at him and shouted: "Don't panic!" A mouthful of sand was 
eaten again, but nowadays, eating and eating are also used to eating. 
Although he shouted to let Saburo not panic, in fact, he also felt that 
Saburo would not panic. Sure enough, after the boy was caught in the air, 
if the evil quickly closed up, and the distance between the two was close, 
thank you for seeing the score, and there was no flustered look on his face. 
Just give him a book and he can immediately be in the sand. It seems 
safely in the dust, thank you even a little doubt whether he was 
deliberately rolled up. 


If the evil wraps around the waists of the two men, tie them together, 
thank you for holding Sanro, and say, "Go again! Don't catch people again 
this time!" 


So if the evil flies again. This time, the catch is... south wind and sway! 


Thank you for your tiredness, both physical and mental fatigue. "I want 
you not to arrest people. This 'person' does not mean people in the narrow 
sense... well." He rushed to the big voice: "Southerly winds! Support! 
Thousands Ten thousand hold!" 


The south wind and the swaying on the ground are naturally wanting to 
hold. The two set their own places, but the wind is really too mad and too 
strong. After a while, no accident, there are two shadows also by this 
tornado. Rolled in. 


Now, four people are spinning in the air, between the dark and the yellow 
world, the tornado is like a slanting branch of the sky, and a white singer is 
connected with four figures in this sand column. The faster you turn, the 
higher you get. Thanks for the madness of eating sand while frantically 
saying: "How come you are coming up too!" 


In addition to the sand or the sand, they heard that in addition to the wind 
or the wind, they had to use each other to smash each other with the 
loudest voice. Shaking while eating the sand, he said: "That would ask you 
this stupid white! What is going on!" 


Xie pity hands grasp the "stupid white ?", very helplessly said: "If evil is 
evil, now we all rely on you, this time, you must not catch the wrong, go!" 


With a tragic mood, he let go again. Nanfeng shouted: "Don't count on this 
stuff! I want to do something else!" At this time, thankful and prudent 
feeling is a tight hand, the spirit is alive, said: "Wait, give it a chance!" 
Grab it again!" 


Fuyang also said: "Don't be a crossover! Let's let go!" 


Don't say, thank you for worrying about this. He pulled the sorrow and the 
other end was not moving. This was a loose heart. He said, "No! The head 
is very heavy and steady!" Again, "Receive!" 


Against the frenzied tornado, if the evil is fast and short. The four figures 
rushed away from the wind pillars. Gradually, in the yellow sand of the 
sky, thank you for seeing the black outline of a semicircle below. 


This outline is so great that it is about the size of a small temple. If the 
other side of the evil is trapped, it is such a thing. And when they got close 
to the ground, he finally saw it, it was a huge rock. 


In this level of sand, this sandstone seems to be a solid and silent fortress, 
which is undoubtedly an excellent shelter. 


They just came all the way, obviously did not see such a rock, I really do 
not know how far the tornado took them out. The four men fell to the 
leeward side of the rock as soon as they landed. As soon as I walked 
around, thanking me for a bright heart, said: "This 1s really a blessing to 
the heavens." 


It turned out that there was a hole in the leeward side of the rock. This hole 
has two doors wide and the height is slightly shorter than one, but the adult 
bows and bows, and it is enough to go in. The hole is not regular, twisted, 
but it is not naturally formed, it may be artificially excavated. 


Xie pity went in and found that the rock was almost dug into a hollow. The 
space inside the hole did not seem small, but it was darker. He did not 
explore it inside. He only sat down in the place where the light was 
obtained, and took it off. If the yellow sand on the evil body, wrap it back 
in the wrist. 


The south wind and the swaying are all in the sand, and the nose, nose, and 
eyes are all in the sand, not to mention the folds of the clothes. They take 
off and shake, and the sinking is all the fine sand. Among the four people, 
it seems that Saburo is the most safe and sound. After bending over, he 
literally licked a little dust outside the red dress, no more. Except that his 
black hair was slightly scattered, and the shackles were not affected. 
However, his black hair was originally for the sake of blessing, and then 
he was a little bit, and nothing was said. 


The south wind wiped two faces, and the slamming was a scream. Thanks 
for pouring out the sand in the bucket, saying: "Oh, I didn't expect it, you 
will be blown into the sky. Why don't you make a pound?" 


The south wind snorted and said: "Make it! Useless." 
Shaking the other side and shaking the robe, while swearing: "What do you 


think is here? This is the desert land in the northwest, not the home of my 
general. The north is the site of the two homes, and the west is the right. 


The site is hundreds of miles away, and there is no way to find a Xuanzhen 
Temple." 


It should be noted that there is still a saying in the world - the strong 
dragon 1s not over the head of the snake. Therefore, the two of them are 
the deputy generals of the southeast Wushen and the southwestern martial 
arts. They cast spells on the sites that are not their own, and the mana is 
inevitably restricted. Thanks to seeing their appearance, they are very 
annoyed and annoyed. They want to be blown up by the wind and go to the 
circle. This is the first time, and said: "It’s really suffering you." 


Saburo sat on the ground next to him, supporting one hand and saying: 
"Let's just here, wait for the wind sand to pass?" 


Xie pity turned to him and said: "It seems that it can only be like this now. 
The tornado is so powerful that it will not roll up such a large piece of 
rock." 


Saburo said: "As you said before, this wind and sand is indeed weird." 


Xie pity suddenly thought of something, said: "Sanlang, I asked a 
question." 


Saburo said: "Although ask." 
Thanks to pity: "The half-month national teacher, is a man or a woman?" 
Saburo said: "I didn't say it? Female." 


Thank you for your pity, saying: "We used to rest in the abandoned 
building. Didn't we see two people walking past the building? They are 
light and strange, not mortal. The white man is one. A white female 
crown." 


Hearing and skeptical said: "Look at the man's robes, it is not easy to 
distinguish between men and women, and the figure is higher than the 
average woman. Do you really see it clearly?" 


Thanks to the pity: "If you look at it clearly, there will be no mistakes. So I 
am thinking, will it be half-moon national division." 


Nanfeng Road: "It is possible. But there is a black man around her, who is 
it?" 


Thanks to pity: "It's hard to say, but the man 1s going faster than her, and 
the skill is never under her." 


Fudao said: "Is there any other possibility that the demon and the double 
division, the heart of the country?" 


Thanks to the pity: "This, I think, the reason why the demon and the 
double division are said, may be just because of a double count, like the 
four evils in the ghost world, not enough four to make up four "" 


Upon hearing this sentence, Saburo laughed again and thanked him. He 
said: "Nothing, I just think that what you said 1s very reasonable. One of 
the four evils is indeed a number, you continue." 


Xie Pity continued to say: "In fact, they should have nothing to do with it. 
I am a little bit aware of this, and I am a national teacher of Yong'an. I was 
separated from the half-moon national division by a hundred years." 


He was unreasonable and said: "You don't know the four evils in the ghost 
world, but you know the heart of the world." 


Thanks to pity: "Sometimes you will get a little bit of understanding when 
you get through the bad roads. I don't know how to get rid of the ghosts. I 
certainly can't understand them." 


At this time, the wind outside the cave was weaker. Nanfeng stood a little 
outside, took a picture of the rock, checked its material, and condensed for 
a moment, bowed: "Why is this rock dug out such a hole?" 


He probably thinks that there is such a rock here that is very suspicious. 
This thank you is not surprising, said: "There are not a few holes in the 
hole. The former half-moon Chinese people, in order to graze outside 


when they can't catch up, can avoid the sand, or temporarily stay 
overnight, and occasionally dig a hole in the rock. Some The hole is not 
dug, it is blasted." 


The south wind wondered: "How to graze in the desert." 


Thanks to the pity: "Two hundred years ago, it was not all desert, but also 
an oasis." 


At this time, Saburo said: "Brother." 
Thanks for turning back: "What happened?" 


Saburo pointed out and said: "On the stone you are sitting on, it seems to 
have written a word." 


"What?" Xie Li first bowed his head and then got up. Only then did he 
discover that the place where he was sitting was a slate. 


Wiping the dust, the slate above, there 1s a word, just carved shallow, the 
writing is not very obvious. Half of the slate was buried in the sand, and 
the writing continued all the way up, hidden in the darkness. 


Since there is a word, it is necessary to look at it. Thanks to pity: "I have 
not much mana. Whoever holds a palm of your hand will help me 
illuminate it, thank you." 


The south wind made a snap, and when it was, the palms lifted a flame. 
Xie pity inadvertently glanced at Saburo, he was not surprised, after all, 
even after thousands of miles have been seen, thank you, no matter what 
the two sides will show each other in the future, there will be no surprise. 
The south wind moved the palm of the hand to the place where Xie Pity 
pointed, and the flame illuminated the words engraved on the stone. The 
text is very weird, as if the children are scribbling, slightly tilting, South 
Wind Road: "What is this written?" 


Saburo said: "Nature is the text of the half moon country." 


Thanks to the pity: "Nanfeng is afraid to ask what to write. I will see." 


He cleaned the sandstone on the slate all the way and came to the top row. 
These characters are particularly large and seem to be the subject. These 
symbols are repeated on the slate. Fuyang also held up a palm of heart and 
said: "You will see half moon?" 


Thanks for the pity: "I don't care about it. Before that half moon, the 
demon road didn't come out. I was in the half moon." 


"What's wrong?" 


"Nothing, just wondering how many places you have been collecting and 
breaking." 


Thanks for the smile, bowed and continued to look. Speaking, he suddenly 
said two words: 


"General." 
The south wind and the pilgrimage simultaneously said: "What?" 


Xie pity looked up and said: "I said, this slate, the words written on the 
top, is the 'General'." Suddenly, and again, "However, there is a character 
behind the 'General'. But, finally The meaning of this character, I am not 
very sure." 


The south wind seemed to be relieved and said: "Then you will look 
again." 


Thanks a little bit, the south wind held the palm of the hand, and the hand 
moved a little further forward. This move, thank you, suddenly felt that 
there is something wrong. At the edge of the line of sight, it seems that 
something is more. 


He pressed his hands on the slate with the words and slowly looked up. 


I saw the faint flame above the slate, showing a stiff face in the darkness. 
This face, two eyes looking down, staring at him. 


It’s not them who scream, but the stiff face. 


The other hand of the south wind also lifted the palm of the hand, and the 
flames of both hands slammed the old high, finally illuminating the 
interior of the entire cave. 


The only thing that shines out of the flame is a person who has been hiding 
in the darkness. At this moment, he even climbed to the side to retreat and 
retracted to the edge of the deep cave. The edge was already shrinking 
seven or eight people. The group shivered. 


Nanfeng shouted: "Who are you?!" 


This sound was filled and the whole cave was creaking. Thanks to the 
screams of the screams, the screams in the ears were faint and painful. At 
this time, they had to lick their ears. The wind and sand are too big, the 
noise is wide, and they can't hear each other when they whisper. After 
entering the hole, they begin to discuss the half-month of the national 
division. Later, they concentrate on interpreting the slate. They have never 
noticed that the hole is still heard. Do not hide from others. 


The seven or eight people were jealous, half awkward, and a 50-year-old 
old man said: "We are a caravan of crossing the road, an ordinary 
businessman. The wind is too big to walk, and it is here to shelter from the 
wind." 


He is the most calm of the group and seems to be the first. The south wind 
said: "It is an ordinary passing businessman. Why are you hiding here?" 


The old man was just about to talk. A 17-year-old boy next to him said 
loudly: "We were not sneaky. You suddenly rushed in. Who knows if you 
are good or bad? Then I vaguely listened to you all the time. Said, what 
half-month national teacher, what ghost world, will put fire in the air, we 
thought that you are the half-month soldier, came out to patrol and grab 
people to eat, where dare to speak out?" 


The old man seems to be afraid of his words colliding and angering the 
other side, saying: "Be born, don't talk." 


The boy was very eyebrows, and he was born with a tiger's head. He was 
said by the elders and immediately stopped. Thanks for the pain, the ear 
finally hurts, let go of the hand, and the cheerful color: "Misunder a game. 
Misunderstanding one. Everyone does not have to be nervous, they are 
relaxed." 


After a pause, he continued: "Of course we are not half-monthly soldiers. 
Underneath is a Taoist lord. These are all people in my view... people are 
learning the skills of Qimen armor. You are ordinary businessmen, we are 
just ordinary people, not malicious, just as a sheltered person, and just 
entered the same cave." 


His voice is gentle, so slow to swallow, quite calming people's emotions. 
After repeated explanations and guarantees, the expression of a group of 
merchants eased. 


Who knows, Saburo suddenly smiled: "Where, I am not a normal 
businessman, humility." 


Everyone is puzzled and looks at him. Saburo said: "Half-monthly 
customs are not ‘every time you pass the customs, you’ve lost more than 
half.’ If you know this rumor, you dare to go through it, and you’re very 
courageous. How can you say ordinary?” 


Hearing the words, the old man said: "This young man, this may not be the 
case. In fact, there are many exaggerations in rumors, and there are many 
caravans who have passed through here and walked peacefully." 


Saburo: "Oh?" 


The old man said: "Just look for people to lead the way, don't stray into the 
territory of the previous half-month country. So, we have passed this time 
and specifically found a local person to lead the way." 


The boy was born: "Yes! It still depends on the passers-by. Thanks to 
Azhao Ge on this road. He took us away from a lot of quicksand. Before I 
saw the wind, I quickly took us to the place to hide, or now I said Maybe 
we were buried alive by the sand." 


Cheering glanced at him, the A Zhao who led them was very young. About 
twenty years old, he was born with a handsome face. He was praised by 
everyone and said nothing. He only said: "There is nothing, it is the 
responsibility. I hope this wind has passed, and everyone’s camels and 
goods are fine." 


"It must be ok!" 


These businessmen are very optimistic, but they always feel that things are 
not as simple as they think. 


If you don't stray into the country of the half-moon, there will be no 
problem. Is it true that the caravans that have been "missing more than 
half" have all died in their own way? 


He thought for a moment and whispered to the south wind: "The incident 
is sudden, waiting for this wind and sand to pass, we must first ensure that 
these people leave safely, and then go to the half-moon country to find 
out." 


Then look down and continue to read the text on the slate. He only 
recognized the two characters of "General", but that is because the word 1s 
used quite a bit, and he has been in the half-moon country, it is already two 
hundred years ago. Even if I learned it well at the time, after two hundred 
years, I will forget everything, and now I suddenly need to regain my time. 
It takes a little time and patience. At this time, San Lang said: "General 
will be." 


As soon as he said, thank you for remembering. Is this last character the 
meaning of "?, tomb, acupoint"? 


He turned back and said: "Sanlang, are you half-moon?" 


Saburo smiled and said: "Not much. Interests, let's know a few." 


Thankfulness has been used to saying this. The half-month text is too thin, 
and it is rare to understand. The word "?" is not a common word. If it 1s 
really just "knowing a few", how can you just know this one? He said "not 
much", I am afraid that the meaning is equivalent to "despite the fear of 
asking", and immediately said: "It's very good. Maybe the few you know, 
just the few that I don't know. You come over Let's see together." 


He gently waved, and Saburo passed. The south wind and the swaying side 
held the palm of the hand and illuminated them. Cheering fingers slowly 
smashed the text on the tablet and whispered together with Saburo, 
whispering. Reading and reading, his eyes are getting more and more 
strange, and eventually they gradually precipitate. 


The young boy in the caravan was born young after all, the young man was 
curious, and the two sides arbitrarily pulled a few words at the top. He was 


mixed and asked: "Several brothers, what is written on this stone board?" 
4M 


Thanks to the resentment, he replied: "This slate is a monument, written 
on the tablet, is the life of a general." 


Born to be born: "The general of the half moon country?" 

Saburo said: "No, it is a general of the Central Plains." 

Nanfeng suspected: "The general of the Central Plains? Then why do 
people in the half-moon state stand for him? Isn't it true that the two 


countries are constantly fighting?" 


Saburo said: "This general is very strange. Although the stone board called 
him a general, but in fact, he is only a school." 


"Is he later a general?" 


"Not at all. And, at the beginning, he led a hundred people. Later, he led 
seventy people. Later, he led fifty people." 


“All in all, it’s been smashed all the way.” 


This kind of ambiguity and ignorance, it is very familiar, and there are two 
gaze on him, pretending not to notice, and continue to read the words on 
the slate. At this time, I can’t help but understand: “How do you do the 
official work, and how can you do it? If you don’t make a big mistake, you 
won’t rise, you won’t drop it. Is it more failure to do this?” 


Thanks to the right hand into a fist, put it in front of the mouth, a light 
cough, solemnly said: "This little friend, this official is getting lower and 
lower, it is also common." 


"what?" 
Saburo laughed and said: "Yes, there are often." 


When he paused, he continued: "The reason why the school is getting 
lower and lower is not because he is not working hard, not for his job, but 
because the relationship between the two countries is not good, but he is 
on the battlefield, not only Without building a tree, it is more 
inconvenient." 


Nanfeng Road: "What is the inconvenience?" 


Saburo said: "Not only does it prevent the other party from killing their 
own people, but it also prevents oneself from killing the other people. If 
you stop it once, you will drop one level." 


He stalked, and the seven or eight merchants gradually got together. He 
just listened to him telling stories. He listened fairly and invested, 
listening and commenting. Born to be born: "I feel that this school is not 
wrong? The soldiers will fight, and they will not let the people kill." Is this 
okay?" 


"Although it is not good to be a good soldier in a country, it 1s not 
appropriate, but in general, there is nothing wrong with it." 


"Yeah, after all, it is to save people, not to harm people." 
Thank you for listening, smiled slightly. 


The group of businessmen in front of them are neither the people living in 
the border area nor the ancients two hundred years ago. Nowadays, the 
half-moon country has already vanished, and everyone will mention it 
again. Naturally, it can be understated, sympathetic, and even praise a few 
words. Even if you don't agree, you can probably understand it. A hundred 
years before the wars and hatred of both sides, the consequences of such 
behaviors are definitely not the evaluation of a "good heart". 


Among the group of people, only Azhao probably knows more because it 
is a local. He said: "Today is today, two hundred years ago, two hundred 

years ago. This school is just being dereliction of duty, it is already very 

good luck. ” 


The swaying was a sigh, and said: "It’s ridiculous." 


Xie pity can almost guess what he is going to say, and stunned his 
eyebrows. 


Sure enough, under the fire, shining out of the gloomy eyebrows, he said: 
"In his position, he will do his job. Since this person has become a soldier, 
he should always remember to defend his country and fight for the enemy 
on the front line. It is inevitable that the country will be sent to the army. 
The fate of such a woman will only make his comrades stunned at him. 
The enemy soldiers think he is funny. No one will thank him." 


His words are also very reasonable, so there is silence in the cave. Shake 
and faintly said: "In the end, this kind of person has only one end - death. 
And, most of them die in their own hands." 


Without a word, thankfulness broke the silence and said: "Yes. You are 
quite right. Dead." 


Born to be born: "Ah! How did you die? Is it really killed by yourself?" 


After a moment of brewing, Xie pity still said: "This is not... It 1s said that 
there was a fight between the two sides, and the boots were not tied. They 
stepped on it and fell. ...... r 


The people in the cave originally thought that this general must die very 
tragically, and the words were all a glimpse. I thought about what it was 
like to die. The laughter spouted: "Ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha..." 


Thanks: "...the soldiers who were red-eyed by both sides smashed their 
feet and hacked to death." 


"hahahahahahahaha...... 7 
Saburo raised an eyebrow and said, "Is it funny?" 


Xie pity also said: "Cough. Yes, very bad. Everyone sympathizes, don't 
laugh. It is in the tablet of others, give him a face." 


Born to be busy: "I am not malicious! But this is too... a little... haha..." 


There is no way to thank you, because when he read this, he also wanted to 
laugh a little. He had no choice but to continue reading and translate it. "In 
short, although the schoolmaster has a bad reputation in the military, the 
border is The half-moon nationals and the Central Plains people in the 
land were somewhat taken care of by him. They called it the 'General'. He 
built a simple stone sarcophagus here and set up a stone slab to 
commemorate him." 


Saburo said: "Later, the Chinese people discovered the magic of this stone 
monument in half a month: as long as you bow down on this stone slab 
three times, you can get rid of it in the Gobi." 


His tone is really unpredictable and convincing, and his look is also 
serious. When everyone listens, several of them immediately worship, and 
Dao Ning believes that it is not credible. Xie pity is inexplicable: "Ah? Is 
there such a sentence? Is it so amazing?" 


Saburo smiled slightly and whispered: "No. I edited it. Since they just 
laughed, it’s not too much to worship." 


Thanks for your pity, it’s really, there is no more behind the slate. He still 
had a few minutes, but now it is funny, and whispered: "How are you so 
naughty?" 


Saburo spit out his tongue. The two were laughing, suddenly, someone 
exclaimed: "What is this!!!" 


This call is extremely sharp and creaking throughout the cave, making it 
creepy. Thanks to the place where the screams screamed, said: "What's 
wrong!" 


The people who had been worshipping the ancient stone monuments in the 
past fled and fled, and they were terrified: "Snake!" 


The south wind and the augmented turn of the arm, the two palms of the 
flame far illuminate the ground. Above the sand, there is a long, colorful 
snake! 


Everyone panicked: "How can there be a snake?!" 
"Why didn't the snake sound a little?? I don't know when it came in here!" 


The snake was photographed by the fire, and the snake was arrogant. It 
seemed to be extremely vigilant and ready to attack. The south wind is 
going to have a palm of heart in the past, but seeing a person slowly 
walked over and grabbed it. He took the snake's seven inches and put it on 
his left. He held it in front of his eyes and said: "There are deserts. Snake, 
is it a common occurrence?" 


It’s so unscrupulous, naturally it’s Saburo. The so-called snake hits seven 
inches. If the snake is pinched to death seven inches, the fangs are 
smashed again, and it is not powerful. The snake's tail was wrapped around 
his left arm in a soft way. At this moment, the distance was near. Thanks to 
the eye, the snake's snake skin seemed to be translucent. You can see the 
bright purple color inside, and the purple color. Black with silky silk, 


reminiscent of the color of the internal organs, is very uncomfortable, and 
the snake tail is actually flesh-colored, and one section, as if a layer of 
hard shell, not like a snake tail, It looks like the tail of a donkey. 


After seeing this section, thank you for your sudden changes, saying: 
"Beware of its tail!" 


The voice did not fall, the snake's entangled tail suddenly loosened 
Saburo's arm, the tail tip seemed to become another snake head, and then 
slammed back and slammed! 


The tail was very fierce, and Saburo was the right hand. When he caught it, 
he easily caught the tail. He pinched the tail, like holding something fun, 
and gave it to him, laughing: "This tail is very interesting." 


I saw the end of the snake's tail, but it was a red thorn. Thankful, he said 
with a sigh of relief. "It’s just fine. It’s a pigtail." 


The south wind and the swaying have also come to see the snake, saying: 
"The tail snake?" 


Thanks to pity: "Yes. It is a unique poison in the half-moon country. The 
quantity is still rare. I have never seen it before, but I have heard of it. It is 
like a snake, the tail is like a cockroach, and the toxicity is more than the 
two. It’s still fierce, whether it’s being bitten by its fangs or being tied by 
its poisonous tail, all...” 


Having said that, he saw Saburo throwing the snake in his hand and 
twisting it over and over. Sometimes it was stretched, sometimes it was 
short, and sometimes it was turned into a towel. It was a bow, and for a 
moment, Wen Sheng advised: "Sanlang, don't play it, it's dangerous." 


Saburo smiled and said: "It's okay. Brother doesn't have to worry. This is a 
totem snake, but the totem of the half-moon national division, the 
opportunity is rare, of course, look carefully." 


Thanks for your pity, said: "The totem of the half-moon national 
division?" 


Saburo said: "Exactly. It is said that the half-month of the national division 
is because it can manipulate this kind of rattlesnake. Half a month of 
talent thinks that she has no magic power and worships her as a national 
teacher." 


When I heard the word "manipulation", I wouldn’t feel sorry for it. I 
thought that when I talked about "manipulating", it would have been a 
large group of people. I immediately said: "Everyone is going out 
immediately, this is the case." The tail snake is afraid of more than one..." 


When he didn't finish the sentence, he heard a scream: "Ah!!!" 
Several people shouted: "Snake!" "A lot of snakes!" "There are also here!" 


In the darkness, seven or eight purple-red pythons climbed out silently. 
They came so suddenly that they didn't know which hole they came out of. 
They didn't attack, they stared quietly at the group, as if they were 
examining it. The snake crawling and attacking are silent, and even the 
sound of the "snake" when the general poisonous snake spits on the letter 
is really dangerous. The south wind and the two groups of palms and 
flames hit the past, a large group of fire broke out in the cave, thanking the 
pity: "Go out!" 


Everyone dared to stay in the cave and fled. Fortunately, the sky 1s very 
small, the tornado has long gone, and the wind and sand outside is also a 
lot smaller. The pedestrians evacuated to the open area and ran and ran: 
"This stone monument is terrible! How come we worshipped the three 
worships and met this kind of thing!" 


Fortunately, they are fortunate that they don’t know that the last sentence 
was written by Saburo, but they heard someone say: "Yes! The effect of 
the tattered immortal is better than that of Baina! The more you go, the 
more unfortunate!" 


In such a place where the gossip can't be hit, there is also an arrow in it, 
and thank you for being speechless. Suddenly, a natural exclamation: 


"Zheng Bobo!" The old man he helped fell. Xie pity rushed forward and 
said: "What happened?" 


The old man was full of painful colors, and he trembled and raised his 
hand. Xie pity caught his hand and saw it. His heart sank. He saw a purple- 
red color in his tiger's mouth. He was swollen and tall. He could barely see 
a tiny hole in the swelling. It was such a small wound that he was afraid of 
being After a while, I couldn’t detect it. | immediately said, “Let’s check if 
there is any wound on your body. If you have a rope with a rope!” Turn 
over his wrist and look at the meridians. There is a purple red visible to 
the naked eye. The color is climbing up along his meridians. Thanks to the 
thought that this snake venom is so powerful that it is about to solve the 
evil, but seeing A Zhao tearing down the cloth to the center of the old 
man's arm, and stabbing it tightly, preventing the poisonous blood from 
flowing back to the heart. He moved quickly, thanked him for his secret, 
and looked up. He said that the south wind had taken out a pill bottle and 
poured out a pill. He prayed to the old man and shouted: "Uncle Are you 
okay?! Azhao, the uncle will not die?!" 


Azhao shook his head and said: "By the biting snake, in two hours, it will 
die." 


Born awkwardly, said: "That... what should I do?" 


Zheng Laobo is the leader of the caravan. The businessmen are also eager 
to say: "Is this little brother not giving him medicine?" 


Nanfengdao: "I didn't give him the antidote, and it was temporarily 
renewed. It helped him to delay the two hours to twelve hours." 


All the businessmen are in a hurry: "There are only twelve hours?" "So, 
can you just wait for this to die?" "Is this poison not saved?" 


At this time, Saburo slowly walked up and said: "There 1s salvation." 


Everyone looked at him. Born a happy, turned to say: "Zhao Ge, how can 
you save you not to say early, scared me!" 


Azhao did not speak and shook his head silently. Saburo said: "Of course 
he can't say it. If the poisoned person is saved, other people may not be 
saved. How do you say it?" 


Thank you, "Sara, how do you say that?" 
Saburo said: "Brother, do you know the legend of this snaketail?" 


It turns out that, hundreds of years ago, half a month, a national lord, went 
into the mountains to hunt, inadvertently caught the lepers of two poisons, 
a viper and a scorpion. 


These two poisons are cultivated in the mountains, they don't care about 
the world, they never hurt, but the half-moon kings kill them because they 
are poisons and will kill people sooner or later. The two goblins pleaded 
with the Lord to put them on a path of life. The Lord was a cruel man, 
forcing the two goblins to hand over the tails in front of him and the 
ministers, for them to drink at the banquet. After the banquet, the king of 
the country killed two poisons. Only the queen couldn't bear it, and did not 
dare to disobey the kingdom. He took a vanilla leaf and threw it over and 
covered it with two poisonous bodies. 


The serpent and the scorpion turned into evil spirits, and they were very 
resentful. The descendants born after the curse of their mating will remain 
here forever, killing the people of the half-moon country. Therefore, the 
appendix snakes only appear in the half-moon country, and once they are 
bitten or stabbed in them, the poison is swift and the death is miserable. 
However, because of the queen of the queen, the queen of the queen used 
to throw away the vanilla leaves that covered them to solve the poison. 


In other words, Saburo said: "The kind of vanilla is called the good moon 
grass, and it only grows in the territory of the half-moon country." 


When the businessmen heard about it, they all said: "This... this myth and 
legend, can you really believe it?" 


"This little brother, life is a god, you have to make fun of us!" 


Saburo is not smiling, but after talking about thanking him, he will not say 
much. Born to Nazhao, he asked: "Zhao Ge, is this red-clothed brother 
saying really?" 


For a moment, A Zhaodao said: "Myths and legends are true and false. But 
in the territory of the half-moon country, there is indeed a good moon 
grass. And the good moon grass can indeed solve the poison of the snake." 


Thanks to the pity: "That is to say, the person who is bitten by the 
rattlesnake has only a glimmer of life. And this line of life can only be 
obtained in the half-moon country." 


It is no wonder that many caravans and travelers who have passed by know 
that "every time you pass the customs, you will be missing more than 
half", you will also break into the hometown of the half-moon country. It’s 
not because they are bent on going to death, but because they might die if 
they don’t go in! 


The appendix is ??a totem of the half moon demon, and can be 
manipulated by her. It is no coincidence that the appearance of this 
appendix. It’s impossible for them to guarantee that these people are 
unscathed by their priests. I don’t know if there will be more pigtails, 
thank you and take two fingers, and put them on the temples, running the 
psychic array, and want to see if you can cheeky again. Borrow a few small 
gods. Who knows, the operation is not successful, there is no news. He put 
his hand down and felt strange. He said: "I didn't use it so quickly. In the 
morning, I knew that there was still a little left." Then I turned to the south 
wind and shook my head: "Who are you trying to get into the psychic 
array?" I can't go in here." 


After a while, the two men were looking dignified, and the south wind 
said: "I can't go in." 


In some places where evil is soaring, the power of some of the priests will 
be affected and temporarily weakened or blocked. I am afraid that now 
they are in such a situation. 


Xie pity squatted back and forth for a while, and looked up. "Maybe 
because it is too close to the ancient country in half a month, the psychic is 
blocked..." At this moment, his eyes suddenly saw a glare of red. 


The south wind and the swaying are trying to enter the psychic array here. 
Other merchants are busy checking the body and there are small wounds. 
Only the boy is born, only holding Zheng Laobo in a hurry, not aware of it, 
there is a purple-red ?The tail snake climbed up silently along his back. 


And it is on the shoulders of the natural, fangs, but not the neck of the boy, 
but the arm of Saburo who stood by and carelessly. 


The snake body is raised and stands out! 


The moment before the fangs were about to stab the Saburo, Xie pity slid 
out and grasped its seven inches with precision. 


With his hand strength, this cockroach can directly explode the snake's 
seven inches and blow it up with a liver and brain splash. However, he 
does not know whether the snake's flesh and blood are also toxins, dare to 
shake it, and then lick it. Snake tail. Who knows, the snake is slippery and 
extremely difficult to catch. Thanks for the pity, only a round and soft cold 
thing slipped away from the fingers. The next moment, there was a sharp 
pain in the back of the hand. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 22: Shrinking 
a thousand miles of wind and sand fans 3 


Iris! 


However, after this embarrassment, Xie pity also slammed its tail, grabbed 
the whole rattlesnake, and forced it to faint. He was stunned, but his look 
was not changed. He only threw the faint snake on the ground and said: 
"Everyone pays attention, there may be snakes nearby..." 


The voice did not fall, the wrist was tight, and he looked up, but Saburo 
caught him. Thanks for the slightest sigh, said: "Sanlang?" 


The reason why he asked this is because the expression of the boy’s face at 
this time is really not quite right. He completely does not know how to 
describe it in words, and it almost makes people shudder. 


He stared at the tiny wound on the back of Xie's hand. The wound was 
originally similar to the needle. However, the poison was swift and the 
back of the hand was immediately a huge purple red block, and the tiny 
wound was also It was made so big that it was cut out. 


Saburo calmly looked at him with a sigh of relief. He grabbed Ruo if he 
used it to make a dead knot on Xie's wrist and locked the stagnation of 
poisonous blood. Although the evil is not so honest to the pity, but it is not 
so honest in his hands, but in his hands, he obeys the post as if it is dead. 


Since the two met, Xie has never seen his expression, just want to talk, he 
pulled a dagger from the waist of a businessman. When the south wind 
saw it, he immediately understood what he was going to do, and his right 
hand held a palm of heart. Saburo didn't look at him. He just put the tip of 
the knife on the fire and smashed it. After roasting it, he turned it back. 
The dagger shook a cross lightly and quickly on the wound on the back of 
the hand. Thanks for your help: "No. The toxins of the iris are so powerful 
that it is useless to suck. You are afraid of poisoning yourself..." 


The boy couldn’t help but say that he grabbed his hand and covered his 
lips. Somehow, Xie Pity felt that he was shaking with his arm. 


Over there, he swayed: "You can be smashed, it is poisonous. He won't 
necessarily be bitten. What are you going to do? It just adds chaos." 


This is the truth. In fact, now I am grateful to think that Saburo has tied 
the snake to the free-spirited momentum. He also thinks that he will not be 
bitten, and even if he is bitten, he will not be in the heart. Not afraid of 
10,000, I am afraid that if the boy did not notice the snake and was bitten 
with such a bite, wouldn’t it be useless to regret it? 


His other good hand was put on the side and said: "No matter how bad it 
is, you can't die. Don't worry." 


He yelled: "Do you really hurt?" 
Thanks for being honest and honest: "Really. I have no feeling." 


This is true. Thanks to this person, because he was very bad luck, he 
walked in the mountains. He had stepped on a poisonous snake or 
awakened poisonous insects eight times in ten times. He had been bitten 
by thousands of poisons for a long time, but he has been very tenacious. 
The land is not dead, the most fever is burning for three days and three 
nights, and after waking up, there is still nothing. And his pain is also very 
insensitive, and any pain is accustomed to pain and pain. 


After he finished this sentence, Saburo finally raised his head. The redness 
on the back of the hand was gone, and his lips were bloody, his eyes were 
very cold, his eyes moved to the side and moved to the rattlesnake on the 
ground. Just listening to the scream of "?", the purple-red snake, burst into 
a purple-red boiled meat sauce. 


When everyone saw that the snake actually exploded, they were all 
shocked, but they did not know who made it. Although the plasma did not 
splash on itself, it was very scary. Naturally remembered that Xie Pity was 
also smashed, and hurriedly said: "This brother, you have been smashed? 
What do you do?" 


Thanks for the bandage on the wrist, smiled and said: "Good boy, I am 
fine. Still do, then we will go to the city to find the good moon grass." 


A businessman is busy: "You go? Then what about us? Do we have to send 
individuals?" 


Thanks to pity: "You don't have to, the half-month country is afraid of 
danger, more than one person is missing. After we find the good moon 
grass, we will bring it out to you within twelve hours." ” 


Several businessmen said: "This... is this true?! That's really grateful..." 
"How nice this is..." 


However, thanks to the next sentence, their look changed. He said: "In 
order to find the ancient country half a month as soon as possible, I still 
want to bother you, and temporarily lend this little brother to us to take a 
road." 


What he wants to borrow is naturally Azhao. If the face of the merchants 
is grateful and gratified, most of them are hesitant now. Xie pity is also 
clear, they are worried that they will take the road to find the good moon 
grass and ran away, even if A Zhao still has a conscience not to run with 
him, but also willing to come back, that time is also a big delay. But they 
really don't want to go to the ghost place that "every time passes, 
disappears more than half", so it is very tangled. 


Human nature, understandable, thank you and followed up with a sentence: 
"But I am afraid there will be other things to attack you, so shake your stay 
here to look after them." 


After leaving a person here, all the businessmen finally nodded and said, 
"Okay. As long as Azhaoken is going with you." 


So, Shimi turned to A Zhaodao: "Little brother, are you willing to help? 
Do not want to be fine." 


Azhao nodded and said: "Yes. However, in fact, the ancient city of half a 
month is also easy to find, and it will come in this direction." 


After bidding farewell to the merchants, he walked in the front to lead the 
way, thanking the pity, Saburo and the south wind followed. After walking 
for a while, Xie pity asked: "Azhao, is there a pigtail in this area?" 


A Zhaodao: "The pigtails are not common. I see this for the first time." 


Xie pity nodded and no longer asked. In fact, he lived in the vicinity of the 
half-moon country for a while, and this is the first time he saw a 
rattlesnake. Therefore, there is nothing wrong with this answer. 


The south wind was aware, whispered: "Do you doubt this Azhao?" 
Xie pity also whispered: "I brought him out anyway, just stare." 


If in the past, the first thing to talk to him is Saburo. However, I don’t 
know if it’s because of the talent. At this time, the boy’s face is still not 
very good. I don’t know what happened, I can’t talk to him, I just have to 
walk. 


The four people walked in the Gobi Desert for half a hour. The storm had 
already gone. There was no wind and sand blocking the road. The footsteps 
were very fast. Gradually, the road could see some weeds that survived 
extremely hard and grew in the crack between the sand and the rocks. 
When the sun went down, Xie Li finally saw an ancient city on the 
horizon. 


This ancient city is hard to see because it is khaki, blended with the yellow 
sand of the dragonfly, the wall collapses, and several sections are buried in 
the yellow sand. When they walked close, they discovered that the wall 
was extremely high, and the highest point was about a dozen feet. It 1s not 
difficult to imagine the grandeur of the past. 


After passing through the city, the four people officially entered the land 
of the half-month old country. 


After passing the door is a street, still wide and empty, with broken walls 
and ruins on both sides, broken houses, broken stones, and broken wood. 


Perhaps it is customary, A Zhaodao said: "Be careful, don't go away." The 
three naturally do not need him to blame. 


It is probably that this ancient city 1s far from the half-moon country in his 
heart. The south wind suspects: "This is the half-moon country? How is it 
so small, it is not as good as a city." 


Thanks to the pity: "The small desert country, how big the oasis is, how 
big the country is. The half-moon country is only about 10,000 in its 
heyday. It is really only so big. It is quite good when there are many 
people. It is very lively. "" 


Nanfeng observed some times and said: "It is probably a matter of days to 
fight this country." 


Xie pity shook his head and said: "It's not necessarily. Nanfeng, you don't 
want to squat for half a month. Although they have only about 10,000 
people, the army keeps more than 4,000 years. They have fewer men than 
women, except for the old and the weak. Sick and sick, and then the farmer 
who removed the farming, the remaining men almost all joined the army. 
And half-monthly soldiers simply can not wait for a height of nine feet, 
the personality is brave and aggressive, holding a mace, he dare to insert a 
knife in front of the chest It’s hard to beat." 


Azhao seemed to be a little surprised. He glanced at him and said: "This 
son knows a lot." 


Thanks for keeping a smile, I was about to pull it with me. At this time, 
the south wind asked: "What is that wall?" 


He refers to a huge loess building in the distance. 


It is not a big deal to say that it is a building, because strictly speaking, it 
can only be called a thing surrounded by a tall earthen wall, without a door 
or a roof. There are only four walls of earth, each side is more than ten 
feet, a pole is inserted in the top of the wall, and the tattered ones are not 
known as flags or something floating in the wind. Somehow, I saw some 
people chilling in my heart. 


Thanks to pity, he glanced back and said: "That is a sinner." 


When I heard the name, I knew that it was definitely not a good thing. The 
south wind frowned: "Sinner pit?" 


For a moment, I prayed: "You can be a prison. It is a place dedicated to 
guilty people." 


Nanfeng Road: "There are no doors, how to hold it? Is it going directly 
from above?" 


Xie Li 1s trying not to say, Saburo suddenly said: "Throw it down. And, 
underneath are all poisonous snakes and hungry beasts." 


Hearing that he finally spoke, thanking him for his looseness and glanced 
at him. However, Saburo and his eyes looked at him for a moment, but he 
turned his eyes away. Nanfeng said: "This is where the mother is a prison! 
This is torture, so vicious! Half-moon people are not sick or fierce." 


Thanks for the pity of the eyebrows, said: "Not all. Half-moon people are 
also very cute." At this time, he suddenly said a card, eagerly said: "Wait." 


The other three people stopped and thanked and raised their hands. "You 
look at the pole above the pit. Is there a person hanging?" 


The sun is sinking, the night falls, and the distance is far away. It is 
difficult to see what the pole is hanging on. But, a little closer, look at the 
outline of the hanging object, clearly a thin black man, broken clothes. 
Tattered, hanged on the sinner's pit, like a rotten doll, blown by the wind. 


Saburo said: "Yes." 


Azhao saw a person hanging there and his face was slightly white. This 
scene is extremely sorrowful and strange, and it is calm and he can't stand 
it. At this time, Saburo micro side of the first, Shen said: "Someone." 


Not only did he notice it, but also the slightest footsteps. There were 
broken houses on both sides of the street, and the four people immediately 
dispersed and hid in. Xie Li and Saburo hid in the same broken house, 


while Nanfeng and Azhao hid in the opposite room. Not long after, at the 
end of the run-down street, turned out a white female crown. 


The woman's light white snow robes, arm-armed and dusty, walked down 
the street, looked around and looked forward, eyes bright, that look, as if 
this is not an old city abandoned for many years, but a small back garden 
that she can flip freely. Not far away, a black girl took her hand and walked 
slowly behind her. 


The girl in black is beautiful and cold, her eyes are like a dagger, her hair 
is long, and the whole person seems to be chilling. Although walking 
behind the white women's crown, there will be no subordinates who 
anyone regards her. 


It was the two people they saw at the abandoned building in the afternoon. 


At that time, the two men's body shape flashed past, the black man's body 
is tall, thank you for not seeing whether it is a man or a woman, now know 
that the two are women. This white dress can only be a half-month 
national teacher, and who is this black one? 


During that half-month, the national teacher squatted and said: "Where are 
those people hiding? If you don't pay attention, you will not see it. Do you 
want me to find out one by one?" 


Thanks to the heart, and sure enough, as soon as they entered the city, they 
were immediately stared. 


The girl in black walked up and crossed her face with a blank expression. 
"You can ask your friends to help you kill." 


This "friends" can only refer to the group of super-strong half-moon 
soldiers. Half Moon National Teacher smiled and said: "Ha! I don't like to 
call others, I love to call you. Happy?" 


The girl in black is not giving a face, she is cold and cold: "What is 
something to be happy about when you are called to do this kind of thing. 
Go away." 


Half a month, the national teacher raised an eyebrow and was sure to 
leave. Listening to their conversations is like a good old acquaintance. 


These two are certainly not ordinary people, and the black man will not be 
anonymous. Who is a woman who is familiar with the half-month teacher? 
Mysterious same door? Or is there a queen or a female general in the half 

moon country? 


Thanks for thinking about it, while holding his breath. He didn't want to be 
discovered at this time. It seems that this half-month of the national 
teacher's temper is very disappointing. If they see them, they are excited, 
and they are half-monthly tall and nine-foot-high. The soldiers are calling, 
and they have to fight for a while. Twelve hours, one less time is 
dangerous. Who knows, the more he wants to get this body, the more he 
comes. When the black girl walked past the room, she suddenly stopped 
and looked at her eyes sharply. 


In the past half of the month, the national teacher had already gone a few 
steps forward, seeing her stop, and the body fell backwards and said: "Hey, 
can't you go?" 


The black girl said: "You, retreat." 


Half Moon State Teacher: "Oh." Sure enough, the black girl seems to be 
raising her hand, suddenly, a loud noise across the street! 


Opposite, the room where the south wind had hidden was suddenly 
collapsed. The room collapsed, and the left and right rows collapsed. 
When the street was dusty, a black shadow leaped out of the sand and flew 
out of the sand. It hit a majestic flame and hit the half-moon national 
division. The black girl turned around and stopped in front of the half- 
month national teacher. The left hand was still behind her. The right hand 
took a copy and copied the flame into the palm of his hand and sent him 
back directly. The shadow was also swift and unremarkable, and it was 
avoided. A few rabbits fell and slammed into the dust. Half a month the 
national division chased up, and the black girl looked at this side, and this 
also caught up. 


This change happened only in an instant. Xie pity secretly said: "Good 
south wind!" The mind must be hiding in the south wind across the street 
to see this side is being discovered, the sound of the East hit the West, help 
them lead the enemy. He only jumped out of one person, and Azhao was 
definitely still in the house. After confirming that the three people were 
gone, Xie pity took Saburo out and said: "Azhao, you are still alive, are 
you injured?" 


Sorry, there was a muffled voice under the collapsed room: "...nothing." 
Thanks for letting go of the heart, said: "Nothing is fine." 


Although he believes that when the south wind collapses the house, it will 
inevitably be carefully controlled to leave room for another living person, 
but it is still necessary to confirm it. He lifted a rotten frame beam with 
one hand. After a while, Azhao climbed out from the bottom of the house, 
and his face was gray. He took two shots and restored his indifference. 


Thanks to the pity: "Now we have only three people left. The south wind 
has been chased and ran, we have to speed up. Azhao, you know where the 
ek orass grows in the city?" 


Azhao shook his head and said: "Sorry. I only know the location of the 
ancient city. I have never been there before. I don't know where the good 
moon grass grows." 


On the side, Saburo said: "It is said that the good moon grass is hi-yin, the 
birth is short, the roots are very thin, the leaves are large, and the shape is 
similar to a pointed peach. You might as well look for the tall building." 


Thanks for your pity, said: "High building?" 


Speaking of tall buildings, in a country, what architecture is more 
magnificent than the palace? Moreover, in that mythical legend, after the 
banquet, the queen took off a piece of good moon grass, and it can also be 
said that the palace can grow good moon grass. 


The three looked at it and saw a brick-and-mortar palace built in the center 
of the city. 


The palace is quite impressive from afar, and the degree of distress is only 
slightly better than other houses on the street. Passing through the palace 
gate is a big garden. Perhaps in the past, this was not a garden, it was a 
square, but now it is ridiculous for many years, leaving only a piece of 
land filled with various green plants. 


Yes, it’s not the sand but the dirt, which is probably the only remaining 
trace of the oasis. The sweet grass may be hidden in so many plants. 
Thanks for your pity: "Hurry up and find it. We only have twelve hours. 
However, we must be careful about the snake." 


Azhao should have been, and Saburo was also "hmm", and all three looked 
down. Thanks to pity, but suddenly remembered, that half-month national 
division can manipulate the iris, then, after her site, there should be more 
snakes. After a group of people entered the half-moon ancient city, it was a 
pigtail that did not see it again. 


He straightened his waist and was about to talk. At this moment, he 
suddenly touched a cylindrical thing. 


Looking down, it is a person's leg. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 23: Shrinking 
a thousand miles of wind and sand fans 4 


"Wow, ah, ah, ah!!!!" 


Xie pity took back his hand and was speechless. He found that whenever 
he saw or touched something in the darkness, in the face of such a 
fascinating scene, he often did not scream at all, and the other party had 
already screamed first. In fact, the most fearful thing is that he 1s not 
right? 


The shrubs in this garden are high and dense, and only when someone has 
sneaked into the grass, and thanked him for touching the calf. The leg flew 
away quickly, and the grass in front of it slammed. One person cried: 
"Don't call, don't fight, it's me, this brother!" 


Thanks for taking a closer look, this is really nothing to imagine, the 
person who called "Don’t fight," is actually a boy with a big eyebrow. Born 
to see him recognize himself, relieved. 


However, after seeing it is him, thank you but did not breathe a sigh of 
relief, but more vigilant. He raised his arm and stopped in front of him and 
said, "Are you not staying with others to look after the injured person? 
Why is it here? Are you really born?" 


In this case, it appears more like something else to pretend to pretend. 
Born to be busy: "It's me! It's me, not only me, but also three uncles come 
with me! They are inside, don't believe you!" He pointed at the palace, and 
sure enough, not much, the rundown Three people came out of the hall, 
and it was just a few of the group of merchants. They met with pity, they 
were all a glimpse, and then they looked awkward. 


Thanks for the pity, he just stood up and patted the white hem and said, 
"What are you doing?" 


He asked, these businessmen are all screaming. Half a sigh, born in Nane: 
"A few brothers, you have not gone long, Zheng Bobo's poison has 
recurred. He made a terrible, we... don't know when you will come back, 
worry that you can't find it, or come back late. Azhao Ge said that along 
the road, he could find the half-moon country, so we thought, how many 
people, or hurry to find it, came over..." 


To say it, I still regret it. | am afraid that they will find that after they have 
found the good moon grass, they will slip away with Azhao. If they don’t 
feel at ease, they will catch up. And Xie pity can fully imagine that 1f you 
can't persuade them, you may simply be too lazy to stop, and you will not 
be able to stop the people who are going to die. 


Thanks for your helplessness: "You are too courageous. You don't know 
what might be in this city, what might happen, so dare to come over?" 


I want to come here and know that it’s just that I don’t trust them. I’m a 
little embarrassed. I just dare not speak in the grass. I’m also embarrassed. 
“I’m sorry, life is a matter of urgency, just...” 


There is no way, human life, how long is a human heart. And Ken is 
willing to take medicine for the dangers of others. Xie pity is not good to 
say, he stunned his eyebrows and said: "You didn't encounter anything 
when you entered this ancient city. This is really a good luck. Then, how 
do you know that you have to go to the palace to find the good moon 
grass?" 


Naturally scratched his head and said: "We don't know where to look. But 
the story told by the red-clothed brother is not the good moon grass that 
the queen took off? The queen can't just go out of the palace, so I want to 
Can you come to the palace to try your luck." 


Thank you for thinking that this child’s brain will turn and think it is right. 
At this time, Sanlangdao on the side: "Found." 


He looked back and Sanlang raised his hand. What he had in his hand was 
a blue leaf with a little root. 


This leaf is only about the size of the baby's palm, the roots are very thin, 
peach-shaped, and the tip of the leaf 1s pointed. I don't have to confirm 
with Azhao at all, thank you for your instinct. This must be the legendary 
good moon grass. Before he could say anything, Saburo had already caught 
his injured hand. 


The hand was smashed, and it was swollen and scary. After Saburo took 
drugs for him, although the toxin was unclear, the swelling was a lot 
worse. At this moment, Saburo held his injured hand in one hand, and held 
the red moon grass in the other hand. He closed the five fingers and did 
not see how hard he tried. When he opened it, the leaves were broken into 
a pile of green. He painted the pile of green tail on the back of the pity, 
feeling the gentle coolness of the silk from the wound, and thanked him: 
"Sanlang, thank you." 


Saburo did not answer. After painting him the herb, he put down his hand. 
This is another kind of atmosphere between the two. Thanks to the pity, I 
feel that there 1s something weird, but I don’t know how to ask questions. I 
don’t think it’s right. Other people are not aware of the subtleties, and they 
are naturally eager to say: "Brother, do you think it is better? Is this herb 
useful?" 


Thanks to pity, I said, "It’s much better, it should be right." 


The other people were very excited and said: "Fast, look for it again." In a 
short while, Azhao also raised a green leaf and said: "I have found it here 
too." 


The leaves of the good moon grass in his hand were much bigger than the 
poor little piece that Sanlang had found. Everyone saw it, and the shape 
and features were all right. They all poured over and they said: "There is a 
big piece here. Ah!" "A lot!" "Get some more." "When you pick up more, 
can you sell it?" 


They were busy picking herbs, thanking them for coming back, looking at 
the back of their hands, and looking for nothing, to Saburo: "The place 
they were looking for, you just looked for it, didn't you find it?" 


After the opening, I also felt that this sentence was quite boring. Saburo 
shook his head and said: "You don't want grass to use there." 


Thank you for your pity: "Why?" 


Who knows, Saburo has not yet opened the door, he heard a scream: "Go 
away!" 


Everyone suddenly stunned, and the action was stagnation. They said: 
"Who is calling?" "I don't have it!" "Not me..." 


I heard the voice sternly: "Go away, you step on me..." 


This time, the talents noticed that this voice was actually coming from 
their feet! 


In an instant, a few people gathered in the patch of good moon grass were 
scattered. Xie pity has long been used to going up at this time. When 
someone else retreats, he will go on. So he went to the place where the 
screams came, and reached out and slowly opened the dense grass. This 
dial, several people on the spot have their breath stagnation. 


I saw under the grass, in the mud, buried a man's face. 


In this land, there was a big living man buried under the soil, only showing 
a face! 


This picture is really incomparably different, and several businessmen are 
scared to yell at each other. Xie pity 1s very skillful to comfort: "Don't 
panic. Everyone is calm. Just a face. No big deal. Who hasn't got a face 
yet?" 


The face smiled and said: "Scared you? Hehe... I often scare myself." 


Thanks for the slightest sigh, and carefully looked at the face buried in the 
land. 


This is a man's face, it is very flat when not laughing, and there are many 
wrinkles when laughing. I can't tell if it's always old, and it's not ugly or 


beautiful. He looked at it for a long time and couldn't see what it was. He 
had to ask directly: "Who are you?" 


That land is buried: "Who are you?" 
Thanks to the pity: "The caravan crossing the road." 


The buried face sighed and said: "Hey. The caravan crossing the road. I 
used to be a caravan that crossed the road. However, it was already fifty or 
sixty years ago." 


He said this, this picture is even more strange. 


This man was buried in the land of this abandoned ancient city for fifty or 
six decades. Is that still an individual? 


A businessman trembled and asked: "That... then your old man... Why is it 
here... ah?" 


The buried surface coughed a few times and wrinkled his face: "I... I was 
caught by a half-moon soldier. I accidentally entered the city and was 
caught by them. They buried me in the soil and made me change. Into 
these fertile fertilizers..." 


It turns out that these good moon grasses are made from living people as 
fertilizers. No wonder so fat! 


Several businessmen hurriedly threw the great moon grass in their hands 
on the ground, feeling that they were no different from catching the body. 
Xie pity couldn't help but looked down at the back of his hand, but listened 
to Saburo: "There is no problem with the herb." 


It is no wonder that Sang Saburo clearly found this land, but did not pick 
up those fat moon grass. I am afraid that he only saw this buried surface. 
He guessed that these herbs were all made from man-made fertilizers, so 
he ignored the thing directly and turned around until he found a clean herb 
that grew normally in a remote place. This is painted for him. 


Thanks to the pity: "Samuro has a heart, thank you very much." 


Saburo shook his head and was still a calm face. 


He has been in such an attitude since he was smashed into the front of the 
ancient city by half-moon. When the two were together in the past few 
days, he had been shouting in front of his brother and his brother, but now 
it is not called. In addition to taking drugs and taking medicine for him, 
Saburo seems to be trying to avoid contact with him. It is really strange 
that he is pitiful, and he is uneasy about his attitude. 


At this time, the buried surface was opened again: "I have not seen a living 
person for many years, you... you all stood up and let me have a good look, 
can you?" 


Everyone looked at each other and agreed that it is better not to do what he 
said. Half a sigh, see no one responded, the soil buried muttered: "Why, 
are you not willing? Oh... a pity..." 


Thanks to turning his head, said: "What a pity?" 


The earth buried the road: "From the time you came in, I have a very very 
concerned about it. I always wanted to confirm it with my own eyes and 
tell you, so I told you all to stand up and show me. Because I want a One 
place, take a closer look at you." 


Thank you, "What is it?" 


The earth buried a strange smile: "I said you should not be afraid... There 
is one among you, I have seen it fifty years ago." 


As soon as this statement came out, everyone’s back was bursting with a 
sudden burst of hair. 


If there is a person who has seen this buried surface 50 years ago, it is now 
at least sixty or seventy years old. However, among the few people here, 
the oldest looks absolutely no more than forty. How is this possible? 


Unless... that person is not a "person"! 


The praying eyes swept from everyone's face, from Azhao, to the end of 
nature, slightly shocked, fearful, terrified, and stunned. Everyone reacts 
incomparably. If you must say that someone's reaction is not in line with 
common sense, then there is only Saburo who is totally unresponsive. 
However, for this boy, there is probably no response, it is a normal 
reaction. 


He turned around and said, "Who is this person you said?" 


The face of the soil was twitched a few times, revealing a weird smile, as 
if trying to make himself look more reliable, but could not conceal the 
smirk that leaked from the bottom of his heart. His **** is mysterious: 
"You...you are close, I will tell you." 


When the sentence came out for the first time, thanked him for his 80%. 
After this sentence, only five are left. 


I know that this monster is not trying to deceive people, then suddenly it is 
difficult? 


Of course, thank you for not listening to him, getting up and retreating. 
The soil buried in a hurry: "Do you really want to know who that person 
is? He will kill all of you, just as he killed us!" 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 24: ???????? 


The more he is, the more dangerous he feels, the more he said: "Everyone 
is going back, don't get close to it, and don't care what it says." 


Everyone was too busy listening to him and panicked. The soil was buried 
and tried to laugh and said: "Hey, don't go, why are you, I am also a 
person, I will not harm you!" 


Thank you very much: "You think too much, you can be completely 
different from the individual!" 


Who knows, at this time, the sudden change, a businessman probably 
thought that in any case, he still had to take some herbs to save people, 
sneaked forward a few steps, bent over and wanted to go to the ground to 
be scared Lost the good moon grass. The eyes of the buried bones turned 
and passed, and a flash of light flashed across the eyes. 


Thank you for your bad feelings, rushing over and saying: "Don't worry! 
Come back!" 


However, it was already late, and the soil buried suddenly had a mouth, 
and a bright red thing slipped out of his mouth. 


Long tongue! 


Xie pity grabbed the merchant's back collar, and went backwards again 
and again, but the things that flew out of the buried face were very long, 
and a slamming slammed into the ear of the businessman! 


Xie pity felt a fierce tremor in the lower body, and the businessman made 
a short scream, his limbs twitching, his knees slamming. The long tongue 
quickly took a large piece of **** stuff from his ear and retracted into the 
mouth of the earth. The soil was buried and chewed and laughed, chewed 
with **** mouth, laughing almost to overturn the roof of the broken 
palace, screaming: "Ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha! delicious and 


delicious, delicious and delicious Delicious! Delicious and delicious!! 
Starved me, starved me!" 


The sound is sharp and sharp, and the eyes are bloodshot, which 1s really 
disgusting! 


This person has been buried here for more than 50 years, has been 
assimilated by this demon country, completely turned into something else! 


Xie Li released the right hand of the merchant's back collar, and was about 
to lick this disgusting thing. He suddenly heard the soil buried and 
screamed: "General! General! They are here! They are here!" 


Only heard a fierce roar than the beast, a black shadow descended from the 
sky, and fell heavily in the face of pity. 


At the moment when the black shadow landed, almost the entire ground 
was trembled. And when he slowly stood up, everyone was shrouded in the 
huge shadow he projected. 


This "person" is really too big. 


His face was dark as iron, and the facial features were fierce and rough, as 
if it were a beast. Armor on the chest and shoulders, more than nine feet 
long, not so much a person, it is better to say that it is a giant wolf walking 
upright. Behind him, there are one, two, three... more than a dozen 
"people" jumping off the roof of the palace. 


These "people" are tall and tall, with similar figures, and shoulders are 
carrying a spur of a dense tooth, which has the illusion of a wolf group. 
After they fell, they surrounded several people in the garden like a huge 
iron tower. 


Half moon soldier! 


These soldiers exude a burst of black air, of course, it is no longer a living. 
Xie pity is tight and tight, if the evil is ready to go. 


However, after those half-month soldiers saw them, they did not 
immediately rush to kill them. Instead, they gave off a scream of laughter 
and yelled at each other in a foreign language. The voice 1s so strange, the 
pronunciation is smashed, and the tongue is so powerful that it is the 
language of the half moon country. 


Although it has been said for two hundred years, the half-moon language 
of Xie Pity has forgotten 7780, but it was only after the General’s squad 
was reviewed with Saburo, and these soldiers were so vocal, and the words 
were rude and the vocabulary was simple. It is not difficult to understand. 


He heard all the half-moon soldiers shouting that the first half of the 
month was a "general". The conversation was interspersed with words such 
as "take away" and "temporarily not kill". They took a deep breath and 
whispered: "Everyone should not panic." These half-months will not kill 
people for the time being. It seems that we have to take us to another 
place. Don't act rashly, I can't guarantee that I can beat them and act on the 
plane." 


These soldiers are extremely difficult to deal with at first glance, and all 
of them are thick and fleshy. Even if he has the evil spirits in his hands, he 
is afraid that it will take a short time, and dozens of them will come, 
which is not easy to deal with. There are still a few ordinary people 
present, and I have to wait and see for a while. 


Saburo does not speak. Others had no claims at all, even if they wanted to 
act rashly, they didn’t know how to act rashly, nodding their heads with 
tears. Only the earth buried face screamed: "General! General! Let me go! 
I will help you leave the enemy, let me go home! I want to go back!" 


He saw this group of half-moon soldiers, his expression was extremely 
excited, while screaming and whispering, the words were also mixed with 
some half-moon vocabulary, which should be learned in the past fifty or 
six years of fertilizer. The nine-and-a-half-month-old man known as the 
"General" saw something in the soil that was screaming and screaming as 
if he felt very disgusting. A mace hammered down and several sharp 
spikes pierced. The head of the buried surface. The earth buried face 
screamed, and he added that the spiked face was embedded with the face 


of the buried face, and he was uprooted and brought out of the soil to 
realize his desire to "put me out." 


However, even the ground that broke out under the neck of this buried soil 
is not a human body, but a bone of a forest! 


Several businessmen saw this horror scene and shouted. The head of the 
buried surface fell off the spike of the mace, and the face was blood. 
Seeing his body, he seemed to be scared. He took a breath and said: "What 
is this? What is this? ?!" 


Thanks for reminding me: "This 1s your body." 


I think about it. The man was buried in the desert land for fifty or six 
decades, and the flesh and blood of the body had long been turned into the 
nutrients of the good moon grass, and only one bone shelf was left. 


The buried surface is still unwilling to believe, "How is this possible?? My 
body is not like this, this is not my body!!!" 


His voice was very fierce. This picture was terrible and sad. Xie pity shook 
his head. Saburo sneered and said: "You can't understand your body now? 
What is the thing that sticks out of your mouth?" Do you think it is ok?" 


The buried ground immediately retorted: "What's the problem! It's just... 
it's just a little longer than the tongue of an ordinary person!" 


Saburo’s eyebrows are full of laughter and said: “Well, yes, a little longer. 
Haha.” 


The earth buried surface: "Yes! It's just a little longer! It's just that I have 
been living for a long time in order to eat the flying reptiles, and it has 
become more and more like this!" 


When he was just buried in the soil, he might still be alive, and in order to 
survive, he tried to stretch his tongue to eat those flying insects and 
reptiles. Gradually, he is no longer a human being, and his tongue is 


getting longer and longer, and the "food" he eats has changed from flying 
reptiles to more terrible things. 


But because he has been buried in the soil, he has not seen his body for so 
many years, and he is unacceptable, and he does not want to believe that 
he is not alone. The buried soil strives to argue: "Someone's tongue 1s 
longer!" 


Saburo smiled. Looking at him, Xie pity is inexplicable. The smile of this 
boy is really a kind of coldness that is about to peel off the face of others. 


Saburo said: "Do you think you are still personal?" 


After being asked such a sentence, the buried surface seemed to have a 
sense of crisis. He suddenly became annoyed and said: "Of course I am a 
human. I am a human!" 


As he shouted, he worked hard to move his hands and feet that had become 
white bones and wanted to crawl on the ground. Perhaps because it finally 
came out of the soil, he felt sincerely happy and laughed and said: "I have 
to go back, I can go back! Hahahahahaha..." 


"Ka! " 


His laughter was too harsh, and finally annoyed the half-month general, 
one foot down, the skull of this buried face instantly shattered. And the 
scream of his "I am a man" can't be sent out anymore. 


After the "general" stepped on the annoying soil, the soldiers yelled aloud, 
and a group of half-monthly soldiers waved a mace and screamed at the 
crowd and began to drive them out of the palace. 


Thanks to the forefront, Saburo still followed him. Even on the way of 
being escorted by a group of fierce and half-moon soldiers, the boy’s steps 
are still not as slow as walking. From the moment, Xie Pity always wanted 
to find a chance to talk to him. After a while, I saw the group of half- 
month soldiers talking to each other and not paying much attention to 


them. They whispered: "They called the half-moon man of this leader as 
the general." 'I don't know what the general is." 


Sure enough, when he asked, Saburo still answered. He said: "At the time 
of the demise of the half moon, there was only one general. His name was 


1 


translated into Chinese, called ‘engraving’. 
Thanks for the pity: "Engrave?" 


This name is really strange. Saburo said: "It's good. It is said that because 
he was weak when he was a child, he was often bullied and vowed to 
become stronger. He used his stone carving to exercise his strength and got 
such a name." 


Thankful, I couldn’t help but think: "That can be called vigorous..." 


Saburo said again: "The rumor is the most brave general of the half-moon 
national calendar. It is nine feet long and is infinite. It is a loyal supporter 
of the half-month national division." 


Thanks: "Is it after death? Now he is going to send us to the half-month 
national division?" 


Saburo said: "Maybe." 


How can you get out of the way if there are more soldiers in the half 
month? I don’t know what happened to the south wind that led the two? 
The good moon grass has been handed, how should it be sent to the 
poisoned person within twelve hours? 


Xie pity walked all the way and thought about it, and found that the 
generals who drove them were getting more and more remote. Finally, 
they were brought to a place on the edge of the half moon, which stopped. 
Thanks for the pity, looked up and looked up, a tall, loess wall stood in 
front of him, like a giant. 


Their destination turned out to be a sinner pit. 


Although I have lived in the vicinity of the half-moon country for a while, 
but the pity does not often enter the half-moon city, of course, has never 
been close to this sinner pit. Looking at this sinner pit, I am inexplicably 
heartbroken. 


On the outer side of the loess wall, there is a staircase. While slowly 
climbing along the simple stairs, thanks to the downward view, and 
constantly watching with the naked eye, I finally understand what this 
heart is from. 


It is not because of the use of this place for torture, so it is not chilling, nor 
is it worried that this pedestrian will be pushed into the bottom of the pit, 
but a kind of heart that is purely due to the presence of the mana. 


The terrain and pattern around the sinner's pit were deliberately set up as 
an extremely powerful array. 


And this array of methods has only one effect - the one who makes this pit 
fall will never climb! 


The so-called "crawl up" means that even if someone puts the rope down 
or puts a ladder, the people underneath grab the line and climb up to 
halfway. The formation will start, and the person will also start. Will be 
re-played. Thanks to the wall, he walked the wall with his hand and walked 
through the road. He roughly figured out the material of the wall and 
found that the wall looked like a soil at a distance, but it was actually a 
hard stone, and may also bless the curse. It must be difficult to break. 


And when they had finished the stairs, they came to the top of the sinner's 
pit and stood on the wall of the loess wall. The first sight can only be 
described as "shocking". 


The entire sinner pit is surrounded by four high walls. Each high wall is 
more than 30 feet long and more than 20 feet high. Each wall is about four 
feet thick and stands tall. In the middle of the four walls, a large square 
space is enclosed, and there is no platform or crossbar for standing. 


It’s too late, and the crater’s black lacquer is completely out of sight. 
There is only a chill and **** temper, and it’s floating from the 
bottomless darkness from time to time. 


Everyone stepped on the high wall without any guardrails, and there were 
dozens of feet on the ground, and few people dared to look down. After a 
while, there was an erected long pole in front of it, and a corpse was hung 
on the pole, which was the one they had seen below. The body was very 
small, a black girl, and the clothes were ragged and lowered her head. 


Thanks for knowing that this pole is dedicated to sinners who want to be 
maliciously humiliated by the soldiers. Usually the jailers will light the 
sinner's clothes, red|naked up naked, let the prisoner starve to death or 
dehydrate and die. After death, the body will swing with the wind, the sun, 
the rain, the air, and the limbs will rot on one side. Falling down, the dead 
body of the body is extremely ugly. 


The girl’s body has not rotted, and it will not last long, perhaps a nearby 
resident. This group of half-moon soldiers actually hang the body of a 
little girl in such a place, it is extremely fierce and vicious. Azhao, 
Tiansheng and others saw this situation, they were all pale, and they did 
not dare to move forward, but fortunately, they did not rush them. He 
turned and screamed at the bottom of the sinner. 


Thanks for the pity, "Is 1t so screaming?" The next question, his question 
was answered. 


It seems to be a response to his loud drink, the dark bottom of the pit, 
there is a burst of roaring sound. Such as tiger wolves, such as monsters, 
such as the tsunami, hundreds of thousands, deafening. The number of 
people on the wall was almost unspeakable by the snoring. Xie Li also 
heard the sound of the sand and gravel being shattered, and it was 
extremely clear. 


Only the prisoner will be put into the sinner pit. Could it be that the death 
of the sinner is the soul of the sinner? 


At this time, the engraved and smashed the next one. Xie pity listened 
carefully. This time, he is no longer a meaningless bark, nor a curse. On 
the contrary, it should be inspiration. Xie pity is very certain, he heard 
such a word - "brothers." 


After half-cutting, the half-moon soldier who rushed to Xie Li and others 
shouted. This sentence, thank you for your understanding. 


What he said is: "Leave only two." 


Others don't understand what he is saying, but they can probably guess 
what this is going to do and their faces are white. Thanks for seeing that 
they were afraid, they couldn’t stand anymore. They took a step forward 
and whispered: "Don’t be nervous, I will go ahead if there is anything 
going on." 


If you have to wait for a while, then he will go down and look at it first. 
Anyway, nothing more than a vicious snake and beast with no new 
intentions. Since he can't die, he can't kill him, he can't bite him, and he 
can't kill him. So as long as it's not a magma flame, a corpse poisonous 
water, he shouldn't be too ugly to jump. 


Moreover, he still has the evil spirits, even if he can't use it to climb up 
because of the formation, but if these half-month soldiers go down again, 
it is okay to pick them up. This moment grinds that "others take away and 
look good", which means that other people will be safer for the time being. 
After all, it is not easy to get a living person in the Gobi. You can't eat it 
all at once. Maybe you want to pick it up and eat it once and for all. 


He thought clearly, who knows, but somebody is not holding his breath. 


Since I hit the top of this sinner's pit, everyone is shaking, except for the 
pity and Saburo's look, especially Azhao. 


Perhaps it is undoubtedly a must die, it is better to fight for a fight, A Zhao 
double fists, suddenly attacked, burying his head and rushing away! 


His rush seems to be the determination to fight the same, that is, to knock 
down the grind. Rao was carved tall and shaped like an iron tower. He was 
actually struck by three steps of his mortal determination. He almost lost 

his foot. He was furious on the spot and shouted and turned A Zhao down. 


Seeing that the young man had fallen into the deep pit of the darkness, 
everyone screamed in unison, thanking the pity: "A Zhao!" 


At this time, the black bottomless pit was far from a burst of cheers, and 
the extremely cruel bite of the sound, as if the evil spirits vying for the 
residual food. Just listen to it and know that this young man named Azhao 
has no chance of survival. 


Xie Li is also completely unaware that there will be such development, 
and it is a big deal. 


He was very skeptical that Azhao was the subordinate of the half-monthly 
national division. He specifically tricked the passers-by into the ancient 
country for half a month. He also suspected that the person who had seen 
the "five or sixty years ago" that was buried in the ground was also his, but 
he did not expect It was the first of them to be killed. How can you survive 
if you jump like this? 


Will it be a suspended animation? But their group is now the captive of the 
soldiers of the half-month. If Azhao is a subordinate of the half-month 
national division, at this moment, he has the upper hand. He can 
completely tear off the disguise and arrogant, why bother to do more, and 
die in front of them? This is meaningless at all. But why did Azhao rush to 
grind? Is this not meaningless death? 


Thanks to the thoughts in the mind, the half-month soldiers on the other 
side began to look for the next living person to push down. Grinding a 
hand, pointing to the birth. One and a half months old soldiers stretched 
out their hands and came to arrest people. They were scared by nature: 
"Ah! Help! Don't catch me! I am..." 


Reluctantly think again, stand up and say: "General, slow." 


Listening to his opening, he said that he was still half-moon, and his face 
was amazed. He waved his hand and stopped the soldiers. "You will say 
our words? Where are you from?" 


Thankful and gentle, "I am coming from the land of the Central Plains." 


He does not mind lying that he is a half-month national, but this is not 
feasible. His half-moon language does not know how many things have 
been picked up, and the dialogue with the engraving will last for a long 
time. In fact, his appearance can also clearly see where the person 1s. Half- 
monthly people are very annoyed to lie and deceive, and if they are 
dismantled, the consequences are even worse. 


Engraved: "Central Plains? Wing's descendants?" 


Thanks to pity: "No. Yong'an has long been destroyed. There is no Yongan 
now." 


However, for the people of the half-moon country, as long as the people 
from the Central Plains are similar, they are all relatives of Yongan. They 
were destroyed by the army of Yong'an. When they heard that he was 
coming from where they were, they burned a black face and flashed the 
anger. The soldiers of the half-monthly screamed, and they screamed with 
curses. Pity listens, nothing more than "despicable" "swindler" "throw him 
down", no pain. 


Engraved: "Our country has disappeared in the Gobi for more than two 
hundred years. You are not our nationals, but we speak our language. Who 
are you?" 


Thanks for pity, I couldn’t help but glance at the young boy who was 
stunned by my side. I hope that if I can’t go round in the future, I can’t 
help but scream for Saburo to save me. He is all ready to start talking 
nonsense. At this time, the dark bottom of the pit is a roar of mountains 
and rivers. 


The following things seem to have finished the food of Azhao's body. But 
they are still hungry, and they use this voice to convey their desire for 


fresh flesh and blood. After scrutinizing a wave, it seems that I have to 
catch the natural, and thank you again: "General, let me come first." 


I have never heard anyone asking for a first come here, and my eyes are 
big, like a brass bell. I am different: "You come first? Why?" 


Of course, thank you for being honest, because I was not afraid, I chose a 
moderately replied answer: "General, these are just innocent passers-by, 
and there are children inside." 


After listening to it, he sneered: "When your Yongan army washed our 
country, you never thought that there were many innocent businessmen 
and children here." 


The demise of the half-moon nation has been two hundred years ago, and 
now both sides have long since changed. However, they are the dead of 
time, and hatred will not fade with the change of the dynasty. Carved and 
said: "You are very suspicious, I want to ask you. You can't go down. Lose 
someone else!" 


Then there's no way. Xie Li is preparing to skip the second, and then see 
the Sanlang step forward. He jumped back and looked back. 


The boy held his arm and looked at the bottomless sinner pit thoughtfully 
with a careless look. 


Thanks to the heart, but a strange feeling of foreboding, said: "Sanlang?" 
Listening to his voice, Saburo turned his head and smiled. "Nothing." 

He took another step forward and the whole person was already in an 
extremely dangerous place. Thanks to my heart and eyelids for a while, 


said: "Wait, Saburo, you don't move first." 


At the height of the sky, the young red hem fluttered in the night wind. 
Saburo glanced at him and smiled. "Don't be afraid." 


Thanks for your pity: "You...returned back. I will not be afraid if you 
return." 


Saburo said: "Don't worry. I will leave for a while. I will see you soon." 
Thank you, "You don't want to..." 


When the voice did not fall, the boy maintained his posture of holding the 
arm, and took another step forward, fluttering in the air, instantly 
disappearing into the unfathomable darkness. 


At the moment when he jumped out, if the evil flies out of the blessing, he 
turns into a white rainbow and wants to wrap the figure of the boy. 
However, the speed of the crash was too fast, and the white cockroach 
even collected it without even catching a piece of clothing. Thanks for a 
moment, squatting on the high wall, shouting and shouting: "Sanlang!!!" 


Nothing is gone. 
After the boy jumped, there was no sound! 


Beside him, above the high wall, many half-monthly soldiers shouted at 
each other, and they were shocked. What is going on today? In the past, I 
had to throw it before I threw it. Today, I am taking turns to rush and jump, 
not to jump and jump down. 


At that moment, the generals sipped and let them calm down, and Xie pity 
saw that if they did not catch Saburo, they couldn’t think too much. When 
they received it, they jumped into the sinner’s pit. Who knows, his body 
has jumped into the air, but the collar of the clothes is suddenly tight, and 
it is suspended. Thanks for looking back, it turned out that the general who 
saw the general saw him also jumped down. It was a long arm that 
stretched out and caught him, not letting him fall! 


Thank you for your pity: "You have to come and do it together. It’s better 
to go on together." The heart is motivated, if the evil is like a white snake, 
squatting around the engraved arm, "brushing" the whole person live. 
Seeing this white and unpredictable, it is like being fine, the forehead is 
black and violent, and the muscles on the body are also rising several 
times in an instant. It seems that I want to break up and bind him. Xie Pity 


is deadlocked with him. Suddenly, the corner of his eye has swept a very 
strange thing. 


The body that was hung on the long pole suddenly moved and slightly 
raised his head. 


The group of half-moon soldiers also noticed that the body was moving, 
and they shouted and waved the mace to the body. After the black girl 
moved, she did not know how she untied the rope that hung her. Suddenly 
she jumped off the pole and rushed over here. 


She was like a black wind blowing from the top of the high wall. It was 
fast and evil. The soldiers were instantly smashed by this evil wind and 
screamed and fell off the high wall. The soldiers who saw him were swept 
down, fell into the sinner's pit, and screamed in anger. He was very vulgar, 
probably used a lot of market slang, thank you for not understanding. 
However, he understood the first sentence. The engraved one is: "This is 
another monk!" 


In the next moment, he couldn't make a sound, because, thanks to his 
sudden force, he fell down with the sinner pit. 


The sinner pit that can't climb up when you fall down! 


In the process of falling, the roar of the engraving almost shocked the 
peculiar eardrum. He had to accept Ruo, and kicked it by the way, let him 
stay away from himself and protect his ears. Then, he drives the evil 
spirits up, hoping to catch something to cushion, at least not to fall too 
badly when landing. 


However, this sinner has been repaired badly, and the law is also very 
powerful. If the evil is not able to explore higher places, there is nowhere 
to go in the walls of this high wall. Just when he thought that he had to fall 
into a flat piece of pie cake on the ground like many times before, he 
couldn’t dig it out for a few days. Suddenly, in the darkness, the silver 
light flashed. 


The next moment, there was a hand that caught him lightly. 


The man was very accurate and picked up. It was like waiting under the 
line to pick him up. He ran around his back and grabbed his shoulder. The 
other hand copied his knee and relaxed. Thanks to the fierceness of falling 
from the sky. 


Xie pity just fell from a height, slammed a bit, and some dizzy, 
subconsciously raised his hand, clenched the shoulders of the other side, 
said: "Sanlang?" 


There was darkness in the surroundings, and nothing could be seen clearly. 
Of course, I could not see who this person was. However, he still blurted 
out these two words. The other party did not answer, and thanked him for 
exploring a few times on his shoulder and chest. He wanted to confirm, 
saying: "Sanlang, is that you?" 


I don't know if it was because of coming to the bottom of the pit. The 
bloodyness here is so heavy that the person who rushed to stunned. Thanks 
for the pity, I don’t know what it 1s. I touched it all the way. When I 
touched the hard throat of the man, I suddenly woke up. My heart was 
guilty of sin. What I was doing, I immediately took my hand and said, "Is 
it Saburo? You are fine. Are you injured?" 


For a long while, he finally heard the boy’s response and came from a 
place very close to him: “Nothing.” 


I don't know why, thank you for feeling that the voice of his sentence 
seems to have subtle differences in peace. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 25: ????Feng 
sinner pit 2 


Thanks to the pity: "Sanlang, are you really okay? Let me down." 
Saburo said: "Don't come down." 


Thanks for your pity, I thought, "What happened? Is there something on 
the ground?" 


The hands still hold him tightly, and there is no meaning to loosen it. 
Thank you for your wish to raise your hand and gently push Saburo’s 
chest. However, when the hand was just put up, he remembered that when 
he fell down and was caught, he groped himself, touched the hard 
protrusion of the young man's throat, and sneaked back. 


I don't know how it happened. Thanks for the hundreds of years, I don't 
know how to write the word "??". At this time, there is a voice in my heart 
that has been warning him. It is best not to tamper with the manual foot, 
be honest. 


At this time, I only heard a roar of anger and sorrow, and a screaming 
scream came from the other side of the bottom of the pit: "What happened 
to you! ?" 


This voice is a half-monthly language, and listening to the voice is the 
engraved general who was pulled down by the pity. He was originally 
dead, and he did not fall to death. It was just that he fell so badly. It is 
estimated that a humanoid pit was also found, embedded in it. When he 
got up, he began to yell: "What happened? Soldiers! My brothers, what 
happened to you?!" 


He only shouted down on the high wall. There were hundreds of voices 
responding to him, as if the depth of the pit was crowded with the raging 
evil spirits to be fed. However, at this moment, in addition to the grief of 


the raging anger, only one piece of silence is left. He couldn't even hear 
the sounds of breathing and heartbeat of Saburo, who was close at hand. 


Thanks for breathing, I suddenly found out that something was wrong. 


Yes, he clearly adhered to Saburo, but he did not hear the boy’s breathing 
and heartbeat! 


Grinding the big shout: "Who killed you, who killed you!" 


When Azhao fell, he could still hear the horror sounds that came under the 
guise of eating and drinking. After Saburo jumped down, there was no 
more sound below, but who killed it? 


I must have reacted immediately and said: "Kill my soldiers, damn, I want 
you to die!" 


Although it is not possible to see things, thank you can sense that the 
danger is coming towards this side, the body moves, said: "Sanlang is 
careful!" 


Saburo said: "Don't care for him." Still holding him, his foot slightly 
moved, it seems to have turned around. 


In the darkness, Xie Li heard a very fine "??" flying sound, which is nice, 
crisp and intense, and fleeting. Waiting to catch again, the engraving was 
only thrown into the air, and once again, Saburo was gently and skillfully 
turned around, and he avoided it. Xie’s arm couldn’t help but climb up 
again, holding Sanro tightly and unconsciously grasping it. The clothes on 
his shoulders. 


However, this pair of hands hugged him extremely stable, flashing and 
moving, still steady. However, from time to time, she felt that there was 
something cold and cold on her hands that could hardly glare at him. In the 
boundless darkness, a piece of silver flashed, and the sound of the blade 
fluttering and the raging anger were heard in all directions. 


The general of the half-month seemed to be hurt, but extremely brave, still 
not retreating, and screaming again. Thanks for your pity: "If evil!" 


The white cockroach flew out, and the sound of "?" seemed to have 
plucked the grind in the air and fell to the ground. The fall was snarled and 
roared: "You two! Two to one, mean!" 


Thank you for your pity, you have to kill us, and you still have two pairs of 
two to one. You are despicable and not mean, and you must keep your life. 
Saburo laughed without a smile, saying: "You have no chance to win one- 
on-one. You don't shoot." The following sentence is for the pity, the voice 
is a bit low, the irony in the previous sentence. The meaning has also 
disappeared. Thanks to pity: "Okay." After that, he reminded him again, 
saying: "Sanlang, it is better to let me down first. So I am very hampering 
you." 


Saburo said: "I don't get in the way. Don't go down." 


Thank you for your pity: "Why can't you come down?" Isn't this teenager 
like to hold a fight? Do you not have to defy your opponent? 


The boy’s answer was only one word: “dirty.” 


Xie pity never thought that he would say such a reason, the partiality is 
still so serious, a little funny, and a little indescribable sense of singularity, 
only the chest is inexplicably feverish, said: "You can not always be like 
this Hold me." 


Saburo: "It's not a bad thing." 


Xie Li’s question was just a joke, but Saburo’s answer was that he was 
completely joking. He didn’t know what to pick next. In a few words, the 
engraving once again made an offensive in the darkness. Saburo clearly 
held his hands in his hands, but he did not know what method to use, and 
he was beaten and retreated. He retired and said: "The monks let you..." 


This sentence has not been finished yet. I only listened to the loud noise of 
"2", and a huge body crashed down. It was actually hit directly and fell to 
the ground. Hearing, thank you: "Sanlang, don't kill him first. We want to 
leave here and I have to ask from his mouth." 


Saburo did not take it anymore and stood still. He said: "There is no plan 
to kill him. Otherwise he will not stay." 


The sinner squatted and fell back into a dead silence. 


Silence for a moment, thank you: "Sanlang, the following, are you doing 
it?" 


Even if nothing can be seen in the dark, this overwhelming **** smell and 
murderousness, as well as the madness of grief and anger that has been 
engraved, has clearly outlined what happened below. After a moment of 
silence, Xie Li finally heard the answer from Saburo. 


He said: "Yes." 


The expected answer. For a long while, thank you with a deep sigh and 
said: "How do you Say..." 


He thought for a while, and finally, the words were long and eloquent: 
"Sanlang, next time you see such a pit, you must not jump down again. 
You can't stop you, I really don't know what to do." '"" 


It seems that he did not expect that he would come to such a sentence, 
Saburo seems to have stunned. 


When you open again, the tone is a bit weird, saying: "You don't ask more 
questions?" 


Thank you, "What do you want me to ask?" 
Saburo said: "For example, I am not a person." 


Thank you for your pity, and said, "This, I don't think there is any need to 
ask." 


Saburo said: "Well? No need?" 


Thanks for your pity: "Well. Is it necessary? Is it human? It doesn't 
matter." 


Saburo: "Oh?" 


Xie pity picked up his arm in his arms and said: "To meet people, to see if 
you don't vote, what is the opposite, not to look at identity. If I like you, 
you are like me, I like it; if I hate it. You, you are the emperor, I hate it 
too. Shouldn't it be like this? It's simple, so there is no need to ask." 


Saburo laughed and said: "Well, what you said is very reasonable." 


Thanks to pity: "Yes?" He also laughed twice. Laughing and laughing, I 
always felt that something was wrong. Suddenly, I finally reacted. 


He has been held by Saburo in this way, and the most terrible thing is that 
he is used to this position unconsciously! 


This is really a life. Xie pity and cough, said: "That, Saburo, this little 
thing we will talk about later. Do you still let me down?" 


Saburo seemed to smile and said: "Wait a minute." 


He held the pity, it seems that he went down a little way, and then gently 
put him down. Thanks to the land, stepped on a solid land, said: "Thank 
you." 


Saburo did not say, thank you for your gratitude, looked up and looked up. 


There is a bright moon hanging in the deep blue sky, which is extremely 
beautiful. It is only framed in a square sky, which is reminiscent of the 
frog sitting on the ground. 


He tried to drive the evil again and went up. Unsurprisingly, if the evil is 
in the air, it will be blocked by something invisible, and it will bounce 
back and not go up. 


Saburo said: "The sinner is surrounded by pits." 


Thanks for the pity: "I know, try it. Don't try it all the time. Don't know 
how the other people above are doing, then the black girl will sweep them 
down." 


He said that the girl who was hanging on the pole suddenly broke down 
and swept a group of soldiers. Saburo said something. He wanted to go a 
few steps forward, but stepped on something, it seemed to be an arm. Xie 
pity was almost stunned, and soon he stood firm. Saburo still helped him, 
saying: "Be careful." 


He added an understatement: "I said, the ground is dirty." 


Xie pity also understands what the "dirty" means, saying: "Nothing. I want 
to take a palm of my heart and see what happens next, and then plan." 


Saburo did not speak. At this time, in the distance, the sound of the 
grinding sounded again: "You are doing things for the monks, and our 
country will curse you!" 


Xie pity turned back and said in half a month: "The general is engraved, 
the one you said... Who is it?" 


Engraved and hate the channel: "Why do you ask? That demon!" 


Thanks to the pity: "Is that the female crown that wanders around the 
city?" 


It’s just a look at it. Thanks for your pity: "Are you not loyal to the half- 
moon national division?" 


The engraving was irritated by his words, saying: "I will never be loyal to 
her again! I can't spare this monk!" 


Then there was a long list of cursing screaming, exhilarating emotions, 
and the speed of speech was very fast. It was so deep that she had already 
looked awkward and couldn’t understand it. She had to secretly say: 
"Sanlang, Saburo." 


Saburo said: "He is swearing. He said that the country teacher betrayed 
their country, opened the city gate and placed the army in the Central 
Plains, and pushed his brothers into this sinister pit. He would hang her a 
thousand times. 10,000 times." 


Thanks for your help: "Wait!" 
How can this be so, there are two places that are completely wrong! 


First, the "female crown wandering in the city" that Xie Pianfang said, 
refers to the white woman. But now, the grinding voice claims that the 
half-month-old teacher is a "squatter", and that the national teacher pushed 
his brothers into this sinister pit, and when the black-haired girl swept the 
soldiers down the high wall, I heard a slap in the face of her. Add the last 
sentence, "Take her a thousand more times." - Xie Pui suddenly found out 
that what they were talking about seemed to be not a person at all. 


Second, the half-month country, actually was sold by the half-moon 
national division? ! 


Xie pity interrupted him: "General, you said the half-moon national 
division, is the black girl hanging on the pole of the sinner?" 


Engraved: "Isn't she still there?!" 


The black girl who hangs on the long pole like a corpse is actually the real 
half-moon national teacher! 


If so, then who is hanging around in the city of Half Moon and saying that 
they want to kill their white women's crown, and who ts the black girl who 
is with her? 


The black girl’s body is so different that she can sweep dozens of fierce 
and fierce half-moon soldiers down the high wall in an instant, why is it 
hanged on the sinner’s pit? 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 26: ???????23 


The more you listen to the more pitiful, the more you want to be more 
chaotic, said: "General, I want to ask..." 


Engraved but said: "Don't ask! You killed my soldiers and want to ask? I 
don't answer, come and fight!" 


Saburo said: "I killed it. He didn't do it. You can answer him and play with 
me." 


This is really justified. Engraved and angered: "You are all the helpers she 
has found, all the same!" 


Xie pity immediately said: "I haven't misunderstood what the general 1s. 
We originally wanted to get rid of the half-month national teacher to come 
to this Gobi. How could it be her helper?" 


When he heard that he was trying to eradicate the half-month of the 
national division, he was immersed in silence. After a while, he said: "If 
you are not sent by her, why are you killing these soldiers?" 


Thanks to the pity: "This is not because you have thrown us down, can we 
be self-protected?" 


Engraved: "Nonsense, I have no need to throw you. I just caught you. It is 
you who have to jump down!" 


Thanks for the pity: "Yes, it is, we have to jump into the pit. Generals, we 
are all trapped at the bottom of the pit, or temporarily unite the front. Why 
did the national division open the door to lead the army?" ” 


Wherever he grinds, he will listen to him and tell him the truth. "You two 
are too mean and beat me together." 


Thanks for helplessness: "I really only took a look at you. Nothing." 


He does not mind being said to be mean. If the situation is critical, don't 
say two hits, let him take a hundred encirclement, he has nothing to pull 
his face, who is one-on-one with you. However, Fang Lang, Sanlang 
Mingming is holding the individual to hold the upper hand, and also said 
that let Xie pity not to shoot, the result of engraving but as if to think that 
single-handedly can beat him, thank you is really depressed for him. 
However, look at the character of this moment, the words should be better, 
slowly, no problem. However, Saburo had no patience. He said leisurely: 
"For your soldiers, it is better to answer him." 


Engraved: "They have been killed by you, and it is useless to threaten me 
with them." 


Saburo said: "The body is still there." 


The engraving seems to be unstoppable, and he is alert: "What do you 
want?" 


Saburo said: "That is going to ask you, what do you want?" 


Listening to the sound, thank you can already imagine what he said when 
he said this: "Do you want them to be healthy in the future, or do they 
want to be a pool of plasma when they are born?" 


The engraving was first, then I understood: "You?!" 


Half moon people are extremely funeral ceremonies. They believe that 
when the deceased passed away, the bodies would look like what they 
would be like in the afterlife. For example, if you have one arm missing 
when you die, you will be born alone in the afterlife. If the corpse at the 
bottom of the pit was really crushed into a pool of plasma, wouldn’t it be 
better to have it in the afterlife? 


This moment ts a pure half-moon person, can not be afraid. Sure enough, 
he pondered a bit of teeth on the other side of the darkness, and he finally 
said helplessly: "You don't want to move their bodies! They are all heroic 
soldiers. They have been staying under the sinner for so many years. It is 


already very Unfortunately, you are destroyed today, I don’t know if it’s a 
relief. But they can no longer be insulted like this.” 


After a pause, he said again: "Are you really going to kill half a month?" 


Thank you for your kindness: "There is no bullying. The so-called 
knowing oneself and knowing each other, the victorious battles, the half- 
month of the national division's deeds are very little known, and there is 
no way to deal with it. But the generals who have worked with her should 
be able to give us directions. One or two." 


Perhaps it is because of the same enemy, or perhaps because of falling into 
the abyss that can't climb up. Sitting on the corpse of the soldiers, they are 
disheartened. The engraving seems to temporarily put away the hostility. 
"You don't know why she opened the door." Yongan people come in? 
Because she 1s going to retaliate against us. She hates half-moon country!" 


Thanks to pity: "What tells her to hate the half-moon country? Is the half- 
month national division not a half-moon person?" 


Engraved: "Yes. But not exactly. She is a mixed-race, and half of them are 
Yongan people!" 


It turned out that the half-month national teacher was born by a half-moon 
national woman and a Yongan man. In this border, the two nationals hated 
each other. This pair of interracial couples had a very difficult time. After 
a few years, the Central Plains man could no longer bear this kind of life, 
left the border and returned to the rich and peaceful Yongan. 


Although the two said that they were good, they were separated, but after a 
while, the woman of the half-moon country died of heart disease. They left 
a six-seven-year-old daughter, no one to look after, and hunger grew up. 
The couple were blinded and the offspring born were also blinded. Half a 
month, the Chinese people are tall and tall, and both men and women are 
strong and lively. This girl is extremely heterogeneous among a group of 
half-month-old children because of her interracial mixed blood. Therefore, 


she 1s often bullied and her character is getting more and more gloomy. 
The children of the Chinese people are not playing with her for half a 
month, but some children of Yongan are still willing to care for her. 


In this small mixed-race teen, there was a storm in the border, and the two 
sides fought a battle. This dying of many people, then the little mixed 
blood will disappear. 


She had no relatives and friends in the country for half a month, and no 
one asked for a few years after she disappeared. However, when she 
appeared again, the situation was very different. 


In the past few years, she has been trekking through the Gobi and went to 
Yongan. I don't know what adventures she had there, and learned the 
magical spells that came back. Not only that, but also the poisons that the 
half-mooners are most afraid of - the irises. 


Seeing her coming back, beyond the sigh, there are still some people who 
are scared. Because the character of this girl has not changed, it is still so 
gloomy and lonely. Many people in the past have been bullying her for 
many and a half years. Now she has entered the palace to serve, and she 
has become a very high-ranking mage. If she wants to retaliate against 
them one day, isn’t it to find them? 


Thanks to the pity: "I am afraid that there will be many and a half months 
of people saying her bad things." 


Inscribed: "It’s just to say her bad words, go directly to the palace and 
speak to the country, saying that she is a messy zippoker sentiment to the 
evil of the half-moon country, and should be hanged. But they have not 
succeeded." 


Thanks for guessing: "Have she robbed these people first?" 


The engraving is even more resentful: "How do you, Yongan, be so sinister 
and sinister? No! I protected her." 


Thanks for the helplessness: "I said that I am not a Yongan person... well, 
forget it." 


At that time, the engraving was already a general. Once he took his 
soldiers to encircle the desert robbers and took the girl who was the court 
magi. 


The bandits were very good. They built nests under the sand. Both sides 
suffered death and injury during the First World War. They won the battle, 
but the battle caused the nest to fall under the sand. In addition, the storm 
was coming, it was not suitable for a long time, and some soldiers were 
withdrawn. However, some people, including the Master, did not have 
time to escape. 


Withdrew to a safe place, and after the wind and sand passed, he re- 
entered and retired. He wanted to dig up the soldiers for burial. Who 
knows where to get there, only to find that the mage has dug a small 
underground hole to kill the wounded soldiers. They are dragged in to 
avoid the wind. 


The bodies of the deceased were also dug out and placed neatly. These 
were all done by her hands. When they arrived, the mage was **** around, 
but still stood silently at the hole, waiting for them, like a little lone wolf. 


Engraved and said: "After that incident, I think she is very good, and she is 
very right in doing things. There is absolutely no harm to the half-moon 
country. I will make a guarantee and refute those unfriendly voices." 


In addition, when I was a child, I was insulted by my peers because of my 
weakness. Therefore, I was quite impressed with this girl. Naturally, she 
also paid a lot of attention to her. The more I noticed, the more I 
discovered that this Master has great skills, so I recommended it all the 
way. She was sent to the position of the national division, and as recorded 
by later generations - became the most loyal supporter of the half-month 
national division. 


Until another outbreak of the Great War, Yongan State sent troops to 
encircle the half-moon country. 


Engraved and said: "The two countries have been handed over to the army 
for a long time. She opened the altar and said that she is going to give us 
half a month of soldiers to protect the law." 


As aresult, the soldiers were murderous, morale increased, and they 
succumbed to the city gate. Flowing, boulder, rolling oil, sword, killing 
the sky. 


Who knows, this national teacher, in the moment of the most intense 
battle, suddenly opened the gate. 


The gates opened wide, and tens of thousands of enemy troops rushed into 
the city. The iron rides through, the whole city suddenly turns into a blood 
altar! 


The engraving of the enemy army was heard that the national teacher 
opened the gate, and the whole person was mad. He 1s brave enough, and 
he is finally unable to return to heaven. 


I grind my teeth and say: "I knew at that time that she had colluded with 
the generals of the enemy and agreed to let people come in at this time. 
But even if I was destined to die, I would kill this traitor before I die!! So I 
let a team of soldiers rush to the tower, dragged her down and hanged on 
the sinner's pit. It was hanging on the pole!" 


The army crossed the country and the whole country became a dead 
country for half a month. The soldiers and the national division who died 
and hanged, both sides can not leave this ruin, but still hate each other. 


Thanks to pity: "So, the generals who led you, led the half-moon army 
under your command, searched for the figure of the national teacher 
everywhere, and when she caught her, she once again hanged her on the 
sinner's pit?" 


Engraved: "It is not an exaggeration to hang her thousands of times! 
Because she 1s also arresting my fierce soldiers everywhere, pushing them 
into the sinner pit! She set a pole around this pit. A powerful array of 
methods, only she can solve it, and she will not climb again when she 


falls, and the soldiers who have been betrayed and killed by her, have a lot 
of grievances. Only the blood and meat of the eternal people can dispel 
their hearts. Hate, gradually ascend to heaven, otherwise it will only be a 
trombone, no liberation!" 


Thanks to the pity: "So you keep grabbing people and throwing them to 
feed them." 


Engraved: "What if I don't? Let me listen to them crying below?" 
"The people who voted are caught by you, or are you?" 


"We can't leave the country for too long, but fortunately, her snake loves to 
be a demon. She often climbs out of the ancient city and bites people 
everywhere. Those bitten caravans will enter the city to find the good 
moon grass." 


"Is the buried ground in the palace, are you buried?" 


"Not bad. The man buried in the soil wants to steal the treasure of the 
palace. But all the treasures of our country were looted by the Yongan 
people two hundred years ago." 


Thanks: "Why are you just burying him instead of throwing him away?" 


Engraved: "There must be fertilizer to raise grass, or else we can't control 
those weirs? We don't want to encounter that kind of thing." 


Thank you, no, right. 


Since the engraving party will consciously plant the good moon grass, and 
even use the living people to make fertilizer, it is obvious that even if they 
are no longer human, the fear of the snaketail is not weakened. 


So, before they were born, this fear must be even worse. After the half- 
month of the national division mastered the big killer of the iris, how 
could it be so simple that a group of soldiers dragged down the tower to 
hang? 


According to the inscription, in the past two hundred years, they have 
seized the national division again and again, and the national division was 
hanged again and again by them. Anyway, thank you for feeling that if he 
is, he has mastered such a killer in his hand, and will never let the enemy 
have a chance to get close to himself. 


There is also a snake that climbs out of the ancient city to bite people. Is it 
an accident? Unlike, it is more like deliberately fascinating. That is what 
the national teacher deliberately did? Doesn't that mean that it is a 
convenient way to feed the soldiers to the soldiers? Isn’t the contradiction 
between the two sides hostile? 


Is that they pretending to be hostile? What is the significance of 
pretending to be hostile? 


Before this chaos, there was another puzzle - the white female crown and 
the identity of her companion. Xie pity decided to ask a few more words: 
"General, when we entered the city, we saw two black and white women's 
crowns on the street. Do you know who these two are?" 


Still not answering, Saburo whispered: "Hey." 


Although I don't know what happened, thank you for accepting the voice 
immediately. A strange instinct that made him look up. 


It was still the black and blue night sky of the square, or the half-moon of 
the cold. 


However, half a month later, he saw a person far away, and a small black 
figure explored and was looking down. 


Looking for a moment, the man half-body suddenly became the whole 
body - jumped down. 


In the process of falling down, thank you for seeing the score, this person, 
is the half-moon national teacher who was hanged on the long pole before! 
2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 27: ????????4 


After the national teacher jumped down, he used half a month to say: 
"What is going on?" 


As soon as she spoke, the gap between her voice and her imagination was 
quite large. It really sounds cold, but it 1s small, as if a depressed child is 
talking to himself, not a cold and powerful voice. If it is not good, it may 
not be clear at all. 


Engraved: "What happened? They are all dead!" 
Guo Shidao: "How can it all die?" 


Engraved: "It's not because you pushed them all down, shut in this **** 
place!" 


Guo Shidao: "Who is here? There is still one person." 


In fact, at this time, in addition to engraving, there should be two "people" 
in the bottom of the pit. However, Saburo did not breathe and heartbeat. In 
the past half of the month, the national division could not capture the 
traces of his existence. I can't remember who ran off who fell, so she 
thought she would only pity one. 


Engraved: "They killed their soldiers, are you happy now? Finally all 
died!" 


The Guoshi was silent for a while, half a sigh, and a fire suddenly ignited 
in the darkness, reflecting a black girl with a small flame in her palm. 


This girl seems to be only 17 or 18 years old, a simple black robes, and her 
eyes are dark, not not beautiful, just a very unhappy look, with forehead 
and mouth corners with indigo, Look at the score under the fire. 


If it is not confirmed in advance, no one can think of it. The half-month 
national teacher 1s actually such a pale girl. 


The flame also illuminates her surroundings. At her feet, they were all the 
bodies of half-moon soldiers wearing armor. 


Thanks for the pity, I couldn’t help but look aside. 


Because the flames that the national teacher held up were very small, and 
did not illuminate the whole picture of the sinner's bottom, they were still 
hidden in the darkness, but by the far fire, he could see a red figure beside 
him. 


I don't know if it is an illusion. Saburo was already taller than him, but 
now he seems to be a little higher. The praying eyes slowly moved up, 
came to the throat of the boy, paused, and then continued up, staying on 
the shape of the jaw. 


The first half of the boy's face is still hidden in the darkness, and the lower 
half of the face seems to be subtly different from before. Although it is 
beautiful, the outline of the lines seems to be more clear. Perhaps he 
noticed his gaze, this face was slightly on one side, turned over, and the 
corner of his lips was shallow. 


Maybe I want to see too much, I want to get too close, and unconsciously, 
thank you and walked closer to him. 


At this time, I only listened to the distance and screamed, and I wanted to 
see this horrible situation with my own eyes. Xie pity suddenly woke up, 
looked back, saw the grind and hugged his head, and the national teacher 
listened to him yelling, but no joy or no sorrow, just nodded: "Good." 


The grind is grief and furious: "What is good? What do you mean?!" 
Guoshi said: "The good thing is that we are finally free." 

She turned to the pity in the darkness and said, "Are you killing?" 
Thanks, "This is an accident." 


Engraved: "What do you say in your eyes?!" 


Thanks to the scalp: "Life is full of accidents!" 


The national teacher looked at him and couldn’t see his demeanor. He 
asked, "Who are you?" 


This sentence is actually a very standard Chinese language, and it is also a 
questionable tone. Thanks to pity: "I am a priest in heaven, this is... my 
friend." 


I can't understand it, but I can hear that they are not quarreling, and they 
are alert: "What are you talking about?" 


The eyes of the national teacher slowly swept over the pity, stayed in 
Saburo for a moment, and then put away, said: "There has never been a 
sergeant here. I thought you have long been here." 


Xie Pui originally thought that he would fight with the half-month teacher. 
Who knows that she was not fighting, and was slightly surprised. She 
asked again: "Can't you go out?" 


Thanks for the pity: "Of course I want to go out. But there are a lot of 
things around here, I can't go out." 


The teacher of the country listened. He walked to the high wall of the 
sinner's pit. He reached out and took a palm on the wall. He turned his 
head and said: "I have solved the battle, you can go." 


This is too good to talk! 


Thank you for not knowing what to say. At this time, there was a voice 
coming from above, far away: "Hey! Is there anyone below? No one is 
leaving!" 


It is a sound of swaying. 


Xie Li seems to hear San Lang screaming beside him. He immediately 
looked up and saw a figure in black looking down. He shouted: "Swing! 


Someone below! I am below!" 


After shouting, he also waved his hand and shook it on the road: "How ts it 
really below? What else is there beside you?" 


Thanks to the pity: "This... I have a lot of things besides me, or else you 
should check it out." 


The swaying seems to feel that he is not as good as he can see, so he 
slammed a large fireball and threw it down. 


At the time of the sin, the whole sinner’s bottom was illuminated by the 
fire, and Xie Li finally saw it. What kind of place did he stand? 


Surrounded by him in all directions, it was the **** sea of ??the peaks. 
The bodies of the soldiers of countless half-months were stacked, black 
faces and arms, bright armor, and purple blood. The place where the 
praying is under the foot is the only open space at the bottom of the sinner 
without a body. 


These are all done in the dark after a jump in Saburo. 
Thanks again, I went back and looked at the boy next to me. 


In the darkness, he vaguely saw that Saburo seemed to be suddenly higher, 
and some subtleties were subtly different. However, at the moment, under 
the bright fire, the one who stood next to him was the original handsome 
boy. Seeing him, he smiled. 


Cheering down and looking at his wrists and boots, it was the same as 
before, and there was nothing smacked with something that would make a 
whisper. 


At this time, I only heard a muffled sound and jumped and jumped. 
Thanks to the pity: "Are you not looking after the caravan?" 


Just swaying down, I am still not used to the **** atmosphere at the 
bottom of the pit. I frown and fan the air with my hand. I whispered: "I 


won’t see you when I waited for three hours. I thought it was an accident. I 
drew a circle to let them Waiting elsewhere, come and see." 


Thanks to pity: "It’s not long before you can draw a circle. If you go so far, 
they will inevitably be left behind. How is it good to run around?" 


Fudao said: "People want to find death, eight horses can't hold it, don't do 
it. What's going on with these two? Who and who?" 


He was very vigilant against the other two people at the bottom of the pit, 
but soon found that the knives were beaten and wounded, and it was 
difficult to move on the ground. In the half-month, the national teacher 
pulled his head and screamed, revealing the color of the accident. . Thanks 
to pity: "This is the general of the half-moon country. This is the national 
division of the half-moon country. Now they are..." 


The voice did not fall, and the carving suddenly jumped up. After he had 
been stunned for so long, he finally saved his strength and shouted. He 
stood up and slammed his hand to the half-moon national division. A big 
man in the shape of a big man plays a little girl. Such a scene can never 
happen before the pity in the past. However, there is a very good reason to 
hate the national teacher. The national teacher can hide and hide without 
hiding. He is like a rotten doll and he falls and falls. Engraved and 
angered: "What about your Iris? Come, let them kill me! Fast, give me a 
relief!" 


The national teacher was bored and said: "I will not listen to my words." 
Carved and said: "Why don't you kill you!" 

"..." Guoshi whispered, "I'm sorry." 

Engraved: "Do you really hate us?" 

Guo Shi shook his head. Engraving is even more angry, said: "You really 


want to mad at me! You don't hate us, why sell us?! You shameful 
undercover, traitor|fine, eat something outside!!" 


I saw that they were fighting more and more, and they were beaten 
unilaterally. They frowned: "Hey, what are they talking about? Do you 
want to go up and stop?" 


Thanks for the pity, I can’t stand it anymore. I grabbed it and said: 
“General! General! I see, it’s better to tell who the Yong’an thief 1s, we...” 
Suddenly, the national teacher grabbed him. Wrist. 


This arrested abrupt, caught tight. Xie pity first sinks in the bottom of my 
heart, thinking that she wants to take the opportunity to make a fuss. I 
didn’t expect to bow again. The country’s teacher was on the ground, with 
a little bit of purple on his lips and looking up at him. She clearly did not 
speak, but the two black eyes burst into a nearly hot life. 


This look coincides with a very small figure in his memory. Thanks to 
pity: "Is it you?" 


Guo Shi also said: "Flower General?" 


This time, everyone at the bottom of the pit was stunned. Take a step 
forward and grab it. You will stun the past and say: "Do you know?" 


Xie pity is an innocent answer. He knelt down, grabbed the shoulder of the 
national teacher, and carefully looked at her face. 


It was not really true that it was separated from the distance, and the 
appearance of this girl changed after it grew up. After another two hundred 
years, the reasons were so that he did not recognize it in the first place. 
But look at it now, this face, clearly or in memory! 


Thanks for a while, I couldn’t speak for a while, and I said, "Half month?" 


The Chinese teacher suddenly grabbed his sleeve and actually got a little 
excited. He said, "It's me! The flower general, do you remember me?" 


Thanks, "I certainly remember you. But..." 


He stared at the girl for a moment and sighed: "...but how do you make 
yourself like this?" 


Listening to him, the national teacher suddenly overflowed a few lines of 
pain in his eyes. 


She whispered: "I'm sorry for the school... I messed up." 


This is a general and a school, and where can the others not hear? Shake a 
little and sigh: "School? General? You? How could this be?? What is the 
general?" 


Thanks for your nod and said, "My sister." 


He yelled: "Don't you say that you came here two hundred years ago to get 
ruined?" 


Thanks for the pity: "This... it’s hard to say. I originally did this." 


It is said that two hundred years ago, for some reason, thanking the pity in 
the East can not continue, and decided to avoid the limelight, intending to 
cross the Qinling, to the south to find a broken new world. So he took the 
compass and went south. 


When he walked this way, he was depressed all the way. How did he feel 
that the scenery on the road was not right? It is clear that there should be 
trees and dense people, how can it become more and more desolate? 


Doubt was doubtful, he still kept on walking until he walked, came to the 
Gobi, was blown by the wind, and ate the sand full of mouth, he found that 
the compass he took was long gone. 


The direction pointed to him on this road is wrong! 


There is no way to point the wrong direction. In the spirit of "coming here, 
visiting the scenery of the desert", Xie Pity still went on, but temporarily 
changed the destination to the northwest and finally came to the border. 
And temporarily stay near the half-moon country. 


Thanks to pity: "In the beginning, I did only collect waste products in the 
vicinity. But the border movements | frequent chaos, often deserters, the 
army will chaos people." 


Saburo said: "Are you forced to get in?" 


Thanks for the pity: "It’s caught. But whatever it 1s doing is almost the 
same. If you are a soldier, you will be a soldier. Later, he drove a few 
robbers. I didn’t know how to do it. I gave my face and called mea 
general. ” 


Shake and doubt: "But how does she call you a general? You don't have a 
flower." 


Xie pity waved his hand and said: "Don't care about that, I took a 
pseudonym at the same time, it seems to be called Hua Xie." 


Hearing this name, Saburo's look is fretting, and if the lips are like a hook. 
Xie Pity did not pay attention and continued: "The border crossings have 
many wars and many orphans. When I am free, I occasionally play with 
them. One of them... the name is called half a month." 


When there is a robber, thank you must be the most brave soldier, no one 
dares to stop in front of him, not even dare to stand next to him. But when 
there is no, it seems that anyone can call him. 


One day, he found a piece of sand wall to make a fire, used his helmet to 
cook rice, boiled and boiled the smell, and gasped several soldiers to kick 
and flip the stuff he cooked. Thanks for the painfulness to go to his 
helmet, but when he turned back, he saw a unkempt child kneeling behind 
him, ignoring the hot stuff and smashing things on the ground, and stunned 
him: "Don't wait, wait, children. you!" 


Sure enough, the child screamed and ate a few squats on the ground, 
violently vomiting, wow, crying, scared and thanked her for a while, so I 
finally vacated the things I ate. . When he finished, he smacked on the 
ground and sweated: "You are fine. Children... Sorry, but you should never 
tell your parents about this thing. Don’t mess with the things on the 
ground next time... wait for you again. What are you doing!" 


The child was actually tearful and went to squat, and actually wanted to 
eat. Thanks to her, she found out that the child’s belly was really fast 


before the back. 


People are hungry to this point and can eat anything. Disgusting to cry will 
also eat. 


Thanks for the pity, I went back and took her last dry food to her. Later, I 
often saw the child peek at him in the dark nearby. 


In the impression, the child named half a month always has such a very 
unhappy look, and his body and face are always with indigo. When he 
looks at him, he just grabs his clothes and moves from bottom to top. Baba 
hopes. Because of the exclusion of children in the half-month, except for 
the pity, only one Yongan teenager living in the border occasionally 
rationalized her, so she followed the two men all day long. 


She rarely speaks, but speaks Chinese, so she still has no idea where she is. 
Anyway, I saw that the children who were not in charge were walking 
wildly, and he also took it with me. Empty to teach her to sing and sing, 
wrestling, and occasionally performing a broken chest or something, the 
feelings are not bad. 


Thanks to the pity: "I thought that the word "half-month" of the ‘half- 
month national division’ refers to the country, but did not expect that the 
name of the national teacher is called half a month.” 


Fudao said: "What later?" 

Thanks to the pity: "Later...just like the stone on the general." 

Silence for a moment, Saburo said: "The stone said that you are dead." 
When I mentioned the stone tablet, I felt very depressed. 

Isn’t the general inscription should be a singer and a singer? Once again, 
there is nothing to be said about this kind of writing. How can you write 


down the law of death that is so shameful? ? ? 


When he was sheltered from the wind, he couldn't look directly at it. If it 
wasn't for Saburo to read the half-moon text, he would also watch it. He 


pretended that there was no such thing as how to die on the tablet. 
Business Trading, I feel that I can scream, but also I can hang it. When 
people went to his memorial shackles to avoid the wind and saw his deeds 
on the stone tablets, they also had to comment on the whole story. Haha 
laughed a little. He was too embarrassed to ask everyone not to laugh. It 
was really a bit depressed. Xie pity felt that his eyebrows were reddened 
by him, saying: "Oh, that, of course, it is not dead. I pretend to die." 


It’s incredible to shake your face. Thanks for the pity: "If you are stepped 
on too much, you can't climb up. You can't kill it." 


In fact, the specific thank you for how to "death" is not clear. Even the 
reason why the soldiers of the two countries played the game is not clear. I 
only know that it is a very boring little thing. He really does not want to. 
hit. However, at that time, he was already indefatigable, no one listened to 
him. The two sides are killing their eyes, and Xie pity rushes out. They are 
the people on both sides. I don’t know what happened. The knife and the 
sword greeted him violently. Fuyang asked: "It must be that you always 
insert in the middle of the eye to pull the hatred on both sides? Or else 
how others will see you cut? And you know that you hate big, so why not 
avoid it Why do you have to drive in so many people? If you want to avoid 
you, you can definitely avoid it." 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 28: ?????2?2?225 
Thanks to the pity: "I really don't remember!" 


Although he is not a hundred, he can't stand such a slashing method. He 
thought on the spot: "This way it won't work!" When the machine was 
upright, 1t was slammed on the ground and was pretending to be dead. As a 
result, it was also a good step to be killed. I fainted in the past. When I 
woke up, I was awakened by the water, because after I finished the battle, I 
cleaned up the battlefield and the bodies were thrown into the river. 
Thanks to the river, it was washed back like Yongan. Since then, I have 
been raised for three or four years, and I have re-started without a bad 
compass. I finally arrived at the original destination in the south, and I did 
not pay much attention to the affairs of the half-moon country. 


Half a month and whispered: "I'm sorry." 
Frowning and frowning: "Why did she always say sorry to you?" 


Saburo suddenly said: "The engraving said that the half-month national 
division went to the Central Plains after a violent storm. Is this violence? 
Is it related to you?" 


After he reminded him, he recalled the contents of the stone tablet. Thanks 
to this, he vaguely remembered something, saying: "Oh, it seems..." 


Half Moon Road: "It is to save me." 


Everyone looked at her, she whispered: "The flower general was to be 
flattened to save me." 


Thanks for the moment, I remembered the feeling that thousands of people 
stepped on the hundred people. I couldn’t help but hug my arm. I saw the 
other two people staring at him with unpredictable feelings. They stopped 
and said, "There is no flat, really no. flat!" 


I don’t know where it’s unsatisfactory. Yin and Yang are strangely saying: 
“Oh, really deny yourself.” 


Xie pity waved: "I don't dare to be. It seems that I just wanted to take the 
child away and then run away. Who knows that it is too late to withdraw, 
and when I turn back, I hit both sides and fight..." 


He yelled: "In this case, how can you remember this kind of thing?" 


Thanks to the pity: "You don't look at me for a few hundred years. There 
are many things that can happen in a year. The whole person can change in 
ten years. What's more, for so many years? It's impossible to remember 
everything clearly." And a lot of things are still better to forget. Instead of 
remembering that hundreds of knives were cut hundreds of times hundreds 
of years ago, it is better to remember that you had a good meat bag 
yesterday. 


Half Moon Road: "I'm sorry." 


Thanks a little sigh, said: "Half a month, saving you is my own choice, you 
are right. To say sorry, perhaps you should say to others." 


Half a month stunned and bowed. 


Thanks again and again: "But... Maybe my impression of you is still two 
hundred years ago. I always feel that you are not a child who will be 
revengeful and betrayed... Are you willing to tell me what is going on? 
Why are you opening the gate?" 


After thinking about it for half a month, I shook my head and continued to 
silence. 


Thanks to pity: "Why, why do you put the snake out to bite?" 
This time, half a month said: "The snake is not for me." 


Thanks for your pity, said: "What?" 


Half Moon Road: "The snake is not for me, it is not running by myself. I 
don't know what is going on, they don't listen to me." 


Hearing his words, he shook his face and became impatient. Half Moon 
Road: "Flower General, I have not lied." 


Xie Pity hasn’t talked yet, and I’m so eager to say: ““Who’s been arrested is 
not the case. Even if you say it’s not intentional, it’s useless. I’m listening 
to it. Those who pass the test are indeed you. The snake bites, reach out 
and take it away." 


Half a month closed his mouth, and really stretched out his hands, and 
immediately shook a bundle of celestial cords from the sleeves, tied her 
and engraved, saying: "Okay, the purpose of this trip is reached, things can 
be over!" 


At this time, San Lang said: "She doesn't have to lie." 


Xie pity also felt that 1t was necessary to ask again. He said to the half 
moon: "Are you completely unable to call the pigtails now?" 


Half Moon Road: "I can call, they listen to me most of the time, but 
sometimes they don't listen. I don't know why." 


Thanks to pity: "You call the snake out and show us." 


Half a month before he came to him, and finally got up and nodded. Ina 
short time, a purple-red python came out from under a corpse, raised the 
upper body, and placed it on the corpse, silently spitting a letter to 
everyone. Xie Pity is going to take a closer look at the snake, but seeing 
half a month, his eyes widened and his look was different. When I saw it, I 
thanked my heart and sank my heart. "I don't think." 


Sure enough, the rattlesnake spit out the letter, and suddenly the mouth 
opened wide and slammed into it, hitting him! 


Although the attack of the snake was sudden, but the pity had long been 
prepared, and the score was clear, he was about to grab it. If he knew that 


his hand had not touched it, he would listen to the sound of "?", like 
something blasted. Looking at it again, the snake has fallen softly on the 
ground, bursting the flowers, and it is extremely fluent, without any 
venom splashing out. 


Xie Li immediately remembered that there was also a pigtail that died 
before entering the half-moon country. Who did it, it goes without saying. 
He hadn't looked up to look at Saburo, and he saw a pair of red-sleeved 
arrow Sleeves stretched over and stopped in front of him, separating him 
from the half moon. And there is a cold voice over there: "Sure enough, 
she is lying to you. Do you think this snake can bite him in this situation? 
Stupid." 


When I saw the snake in half a month, it was a bad face. I heard the words 
* and looked up. "I didn't. I said that some snakes don't listen to me, 
just that one." 


I don’t believe it at all, saying: "Who knows if you don’t listen to you or 
listen to you?" 


Half a month Shen Sheng said: "It is not called by me at all." 


Thanks to pity, I was going to talk, but I saw two claret-tailed pythons 
drilled out of the corpse, and they vomited them to the letter. Immediately, 
Articles 3, 4, and 5... Among the corpses, from all corners, they have 
swam out countless endangered snakes! 


Everyone looked at the half moon that was lying on the corpse, and shook 
his hands to run a white light. He rushed half a month and said: "Let them 
fall back, it is impossible to not listen to you." 


Half a month, the brows are close, seemingly trying to drive away. 
However, there are still more and more snakes appearing, and they are 
entangled and approached. Even if one or two snakes don't kill them, 
hundreds or thousands of them will be difficult to say. Even if they don't 
die, they will probably be difficult to see. Xie pity and his hands were 
about to mobilize Ruo, but they saw that the snakes stopped when they 


were a few feet away from them. They hesitated and formed a weird 
encirclement. 


Thanks for the enlightenment, looked up and looked at Sanlang next to 
him. He was looking at the pigtails with his condescending eyes, and his 
eyes were full of contempt. The appendix snakes seemed to understand his 
gaze, did not dare to approach, and then stepped back a little, and slid 
down his head, and put the sly snake on the ground, a state of surrender. 


However, it seems as if there is any force driving them, and they are not 
allowed to give up the attack and leave directly, so many pigtails turn 
around and swarm. With a wave of swaying, the flame spurted out of his 
sleeve and burned a circle, forcing a retreat. 


But this can't last long. Thanks to pity: "Let's go up first, leave here and 
say." 


I heard the sound, if the evil slammed, I pulled out. It didn't take long for 
it to slip back. Thanks for the slightest sorrow, facing the white shackles 
that entangled his wrist: "What are you doing back? The array has opened 
up and nothing has stopped you, go go quickly." 


If the evil is wrapped around his wrist, it seems to be horrible on the wrist. 
He regrets that he still has to lick it again. At this time, something fell, and 
he slammed his shoulder. With a swaying hand, this catching look 
changed, and the hand was lifted to the front to see it - the one that 
descended from the sky was actually a pigtail! 


I was unprepared for a while, and after being bitten, I threw the snake to 
the half moon door. Half a month, his hands were tied, and he still raised 
his hand and grabbed it. He grabbed it, and the purple-red snake was 
wrapped around her pale wrist and did not attack. At this time, it was a 
"squeaky" sound, and the second rattlesnake landed on the ground! 


Xie pity probably guessed why Ruoxu refused to go up. As soon as he 
looked up, and then a little moonlight, he barely saw such a scene. 
Hundreds of purple dots are falling from the top of the sinner's pit. 


Snake rain! 


Seeing that the purple-red dots are getting closer and closer, thank you for 
your help: "Shake! Fire! Hit a fire screen and solve them in midair!" 


Shake the palm of his hand, wave his hand, and a blood ball flies upwards, 

turning into a flame barrier that burns and rushes upwards. The fire barrier 
rose to dozens of feet and hanged in the air, and the snakes that met it were 
instantly burned to ashes, intercepting the falling snake rain. 


Seeing temporary escape, Xie pity sighed and said: "Good! Shake it, it is 
thanks to you." 


These spells will inevitably consume a lot of mana. After playing out, the 
face will be a bit blue, turn around and put a circle of fire on the ground, 
burning off the snake below, and said to the half moon: "You still say they 
are not Listen to your words? If it is not your control, how can these 
snakes not attack you?" 


Saburo smiled and said: "Maybe just because you are not lucky? It has not 
attacked us." 


He turned his head and turned his eyes over them. The hunch in the heart 
is terrible, but because there is a bit of a clue in the heart, it is too late to 
sort out, do not want to see them fight first, said: "First figure out what the 
snakes are going to do, rush out." 


Shake and sneer: "What is going on? It’s not this half-month that the 
national teacher is lying, that is, the one around you is playing a ghost!" 


Thanks for a long time, and looked at Saburo again, said: "I don't think 
they are." 


Although his tone is mild, he is very determined. This is the conclusion 
after his thinking, but it must be felt that he intends to cover up. The fire 
was so bright that his face was not good, and I didn’t know if it was anger 
or laugh. He said: "His Royal Highness, you don't know how to be 
confused. Do you still remember your identity? What is the thing next to 


you? I think you should know it well, I don't believe you till now. Still not 
aware of it!" 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 29: White wind 
division flat sand 


Xie pity intentionally or unintentionally took a step forward and stopped 
in front of Saburo. "I am what I am, I know better than others." 


He swayed: "So how do you dare to stand next to him?" 


Thanks for being honest and honest: "Because... standing next to him, 
there will be no snakes to bite." 


Upon hearing this answer, Saburo "snapped" and laughed. The swaying 
face is greener, saying: "You..." 


Green and blue, his face suddenly turned into pure black. Not only his 
face, but the whole line of sight has turned into pure black. 


It turned out that the flame barrier that was only played by the swaying 
party and the flame that he had cast at the bottom of the pit suddenly 
disappeared! 


In the darkness, thanked and heard Sanlanghaha laughed twice, saying: 
"Waste!" I felt that he would carry his shoulders. Immediately, Xie Li 
heard a rush of fierce screams from above, as if the rainstorm hit the 
umbrella. 


Needless to say, it must be that a burst of purple snake rain has no barrier 
to intercept, falling wildly. And there is an umbrella on the top, and the 
snake rain is blocked! 


Thanks for the smell of a very strong **** smell, waiting for action, 
Saburo said: "Don't move. Nothing that doesn't grow long will dare to 
come." 


His tone was calm, the first sentence was low and soft, and the latter 
sentence was a bit arrogant. I don’t have to worry about it, but I heard that 
there was a raging anger from the other side. It seems that he was poured 
over by the snake and said: "Sanlang!" 


Saburo immediately said: "No." 
Thanks to pity and laugh, said: "How do you know what I want to say?" 
Saburo said: "You can rest assured. He can't die." 


At this moment, the two men came forward with a sigh: "Half a month! If 
you want me to die, let them bite me a bite, so what is going on?" 


Half Moon Road: "Not me!" I want to come and wake up, and find myself 
immersed in countless slippery snakes, and I think it is a good thing to do 
half a month. Thanks for your pity: "When you shake, can you still ignite? 
Give another fire!" 


Sweeping your teeth and gnashing your teeth: "The thing next to you is 
suppressing my spells, not letting me ignite!" 


Thanks to the pity, Saburo said: "I don't." 


Thanks to the pity: "I know that you don't have it, because you are not 
right. Half moon and engraving are locked by the Kun clue. You can't cast 
spells. I have run out of mana, and you haven't suppressed him. This 
doesn't mean that this pit. There is a sixth person at the end?!" 


He yelled: "You are so fascinated! There is no sixth person, no one 1s 
coming down from above!" 


At this time, only listen to the half moon: "Who?!" 


Thanks for your pity: "What happened to you in half a month? But did 
someone go to your side?" 


Half Moon Road: "Someone..." The sentence was gone, and her voice 
disappeared. Thanks again and again: "Half month?!" 


The swaying is still fighting in the group of snakes. The short white light 
is exploding in a wave of darkness. He said: "Be careful, she will trick you 
into getting closer!" 


Thanks to pity: "Not necessarily. Save her first!" Then he rushed into the 
snake rain, but he heard Saburo in his ear: "Good!" 


Xie pity only felt a hand on his shoulder, and took him out in an instant, 
suddenly waking up, this boy was actually an umbrella, one by one, and 
attacked. In the darkness, the silver light flickered, and the jingle, 
suddenly, a shrill sword smashed the ears of everyone. Saburo "Oh?" said 
aloud, "I actually have a sixth person. Interesting." 


I don't know how he manipulated the weapon and what weapon he 
controlled. However, at this moment, the weapon he controlled is indeed 
confronting one person! 


The other party did not say a word, thank you for hearing the sound of the 
sword breaking the wind, and thinking that it was another attack. From 
time to time, dazzling sparks illuminate in the dark, but they are fleeting, 
not enough to illuminate each other's faces. Thanks to pity and listen to the 
battle, and sighed: "Are you still awake in half a month? Can you answer?" 


No one answered there. Fudao said: "Maybe the person you are playing is 
her!" 


Thanks: "No, this is definitely not half a month!" 


The same is the battle in the dark, when the carving is done, Saburo is as 
easy as playing the other side, but this one is a little more serious. The 
other party’s force was used, and the weapon was handy, while the half- 
month was thin and thin, and the arm also knew that strength and weapons 
were not her, so she could never be her. But who 1s this sixth man? When 
did it appear? ! 


He swayed: "This kind of person who sells his country is no different from 
the female ghost Xuan Ji. Why do you still believe her?" 


Thanks for your pity: "When you shake, can you not be so impatient? 
You... Wait, what did you say?" 


The swaying was a slap in the air, and said: "I said why do you believe her 
so much? Just like the one next to you!" 


Thanks for the pity: "No, I am not talking about this sentence - you said 
Xuan Ji. You mentioned Xuan Ji?" 


"What about it?! It doesn't matter!" 


Xie pity but held his breath, hey, said: "Stop it! No need to hide again, I 
already know who you are!" 


The swordsmanship did not stop, and the other party was indifferent. Xie 
pity is not in a hurry, said: "You think, I said that I already know who you 
are, 1S it swindling you? General Xiao Yan?" 


Shake up: "Who are you talking to? General Xiaojun? Don't be crazy. 
What is the status of General Xiaoxi? When he comes, who wouldn't 
know?" 


Thanks to pity: "You are right. But, if not his deity personally come 
down?" 


In the darkness, the sound of the swords of the soldiers stagnate for a 
moment, and then continue. 


Thanks to the pity: "I found it very late. In fact, from the beginning, I 
should have thought of it. 


"I know that there have been things going on in the past two hundred 
years, but no one has ever been convinced, and everyone 1s not willing to 
mention it. This must be something that everyone who dares not offend is 
pressing this matter. But because I am not familiar with the priests who are 
now in heaven, and dare not guess, I will not boldly speculate on which 
priest will be." 


I still reminded him of the female ghost Xuan Ji. 


When it comes to the female ghost Xuan Ji, it will inevitably be associated 
with the two. To the north is the site of two generals, and the swaying has 
been mentioned casually. Before the general of the sergeant, he did one 
thing: the massacre. 


What city is Tu? 
Most likely, it is the half-moon country! 


This kind of thing is not strange in the heavenly court. After all, if you 
want to be successful, who is still not allowed to shed blood? After all, the 
massacre is not a special glory. If it is spread too much, it will inevitably 
have an impact on the absorption of new believers. Therefore, after flying 
up, it is often necessary to cover up and whitewash. Therefore, although 
everyone knows that there is such a thing, it is not very detailed. After all, 
if there is no deep hatred or no good intentions, who would want to dig 
other people's old days and offend the backing behind them? 


Thanks for the gentleness: "There is a buried face saying that one of us has 
a person who was there fifty or sixty years ago. I originally suspected that 

this sentence was that he lied to deceive others, but it is also very likely it 

is true. 


"Before, in this group of people, what I doubt most is you. The caravans 
are following you. You want to take them anywhere. I have never seen a 
snake in the country for a few years, and you Just find a place to avoid the 
sand, but just happened to encounter this rare poison; 


"I will let you go with us to find the good moon grass. Before leaving, you 
will specifically give directions to other people and tell them the direction 
of the ancient city in half a month, so that other people who can't wait for 
us to come back can also go by themselves; just now In the sinner's pit, I 
clearly said that something will happen first, and you have always calmly 
jumped and suddenly jumped to death, meaninglessly sent to death." 


After a pause, he said: "You are so strange, unreasonable everywhere, but I 
have found out who you are now, it is really late, right? General Xiao Xiao, 
or I should call you The current name - Azhao!" 


Suddenly, a dead silence. 


For a long while, there was finally a voice that was cold and cold: "You 
never thought about it. Maybe the ground is talking about the red boy next 
to you." 


The voice just fell, the sinner squatted, and a fire blazed. Under the light, 
two **** figures are facing each other. 


One is the Saburo in red, who has already put up the blade, and stands up 
in a squatting manner; the other is a young man in cloth, and he has a 
sword in front of him, never letting go. 


Because the young man in the cloth is bloody, it seems to be wearing a red 
dress. His face is cold and his shoulders are squatting. Sure enough, that 
young Azhao. 


In fact, whether it is General Xiaojun’s deity or Azhao, the flatness and 
calmness of his face have never changed. However, Xie’s pity never 
thought about it, and he did not contact the two. together. 


It was half a month that he was kneeling on his shoulder. If you put the 
snake out, I am afraid that it was originally thought to be taken away for 
half a month. However, since the identity has been exposed, there is no 
need to create chaos. The snakes around and the snake rain that has fallen 
from the sky have stopped raging. He has received the sword in one hand 
and another. He put his hand on his shoulder for half a month. The 
engraving on the side said: "Who are you? Have you already fallen to 
death?" 


A Zhao’s gaze was not given to the honing, but he was still staring at 
Saburo. He only said in half a month: “I haven’t changed it for hundreds of 
years.” 


Perhaps this flat and flamboyant tone is too familiar. After listening and 
listening, the dark face instantly surges with the color of anger: "...is 
you!!! 2272!" 


If it wasn’t for the tying of the tying rope, he was afraid that he would 
have rushed up and desperately. 


Thanks to the pity: "General Xiao Yan, the Meridian Snake not only listens 
to one's orders. The half-month-old snakes that do not obey and bite 
people are all manipulated by you, right." 


It’s a pleasure to recognize it: “Yes. It’s me.” 
Thanks to the pity: "How did you teach the pigtails in half a month?" 
???: "She doesn't. But how she manipulates, I can learn by myself." 


Thanks to the pity: "After all, the generals of Xiao Yan are smart and 
intelligent." 


After a pause, he asked: "When did you get to know each other? How did 
you get to know each other?" 


He stayed at him and said, "Flower General." 

Xie Pity is inexplicable: "What do you call me like this?" 
? 2? 2: "You didn't recognize me, flower general." 

Thank you for your pity. 


The front is faintly remembered. Half a month, when I was a child, I was 
squeezed by a half-month child. Only a teenager from Yongan 
occasionally took care of her. The boy did not like to talk as much as half a 
month. Many children at the border are children of the military who are 
stationed at the border. Most of them will join the army when they grow 
up. Could it be... 


Thanks to pity: "Is it you?! I actually recognized it." 


Nostalgic nodded, said: "It is me. I also recognized the generals you 
came." 


No wonder. It turned out that half a month and enemy generals, so I have 
known it! 


Thanks to pity: "Is it really instructed to open the city gate in half a 
month?" 


There was a sigh of relief over there, saying: "Untie the rope, let me fight 
this despicable battle again!" 


second, dare to ask where is the mean?" 


Engraved and said: "If you two are not colluding, you should be outside, 
how can we lose?!" 


???: "I don't want to admit it. I only took 2,000 people at the time, but 
breaking the city gate is only a matter of time for me." 


Thankful, I couldn’t help but say: "Wait, you only have two thousand 
people, you are sent to attack a country? What are you doing, isn’t this a 
death? Are you still crowded out in the army?" 


" " 


I don’t talk. It seems that he was said to be. Thanks again and again: 
"Since you are stable, why do you want to open the city gate in half a 
month?" 


???: "Because I want to kill the city." 


Thanks for your pity: "What do you mean? Since you have already won, 
why not be a massacre?" It is not a hobby! 


???: "Because we are victorious, it is not a massacre. And as soon as 
possible, immediately, one does not stay." 


The phrase "one does not stay", it sounds sensational. Thanks: "Why?" 


???: "The night before the siege, many family leaders of many and a half 
months joined together to hold a meeting | the meeting, secretly agreed on 
one thing." 


"what's up?" 


Yu Sudao: "Half-monthly life is fierce, and it is very hateful to Yongan. 
Even if you know that you are losing, you will not recognize it. The men, 
women and children of the whole half-month are ready, and they must do 
their best to make a batch of things. ” 


Xie pity has faintly guessed what it is. The word that sputum spit out was 
really what he thought: 


"Fried | medicine!" 


OD Se Nt nn TES Rea ak ee Ee Hed Oa hare a 
L222 22 22 ETE TD DD 2 220 22 22 2D D2) 22 92 222? 27 Even if they die 
by themselves, they will have to bring more Yong'an people to death. Even 
if they are dead, they will swear to disturb the country where they are 
killed." 


Therefore, it is only necessary to smash these civilians when they are too 
late to escape. 


Thanks for turning to the moment: "Is this true?" 
There is no cover in the engraving, saying: "Really!" 


Hearing the words, Saburo provoked an eyebrow and said: "Vicious, 
poisonous." 


He said this sentence in half-monthly language, engraved with anger: 
"Small poison? What qualifications do you have to say that we are 
poisonous? If not you hit us first, how can we be forced to this step? You 
ruin us, we also Also retaliate against you, what is wrong with this?!" 


???: "If this is the case, then it is better for us to clear the money from the 
beginning? How many times did the half-monthly people take trouble at 
the border? How many times did the country intercept the Yongan’s 
caravans and travelers in the Western Region? You know that there are 
horse thieves in your country. The amnesty slaughtered the Yongan people, 
but they deliberately sheltered. The soldiers sent by Yongan to encircle the 
thieves were killed by you on the grounds of transgression. 


Although he is not fast, his tone is not excited, but the words have a sharp 
sense. Engraved and said: "But that is also the first time you forcibly 
occupy our country, we will fight back." 


???: "The land of the border between the two countries was originally 
unclear. How can it be forcibly occupied?" 


Engraved: "The two sides have already divided the site, you are not 
keeping your promise!" 


???: "Dividing one said that only one of you acknowledged, how did 
Yongan ever admit it? Your so-called division is nothing more than a 
desert to us, and an oasis for you, ridiculous?" 


Engraved and angered: "Oasis is ours. Half-monthly people have grown up 
in oases!" 


The two sides hold each other's words, just listening to them and tearing 
up their pity is one big and two big. Thinking of the days when he was 
beaten in the cracks two hundred years ago, his face seemed to be faintly 
painful. I don’t care about it, I’m sorry for it: “So, look. There are so many 
things in this world that it’s impossible to fight. It’s only a fight.” 


Thanks: "I agree with the previous sentence." 
Saburo said: "I agree with the latter sentence." 


The engraved anger subsided slightly, and suddenly said: "The Yongan 
People's Congress is shameless, and you are the most shameless I have 


ever seen. You are an indifferent person. You kill us, not for your country, 
nor for you. To save your people." 


I heard that the silence was silent. 


After engraving, he said: "You are the son of exile, and everyone is 
despised. You just want to climb up in the Yongan army and climb up. You 
have to win this battle. Sadly, you still feel that you are good. You took 
advantage of it because you like someone who betrayed us." 


Thanks to pity: "Can you be a general, not a descendant of the general?" Is 
there such a famous ancestor who will not fall to such a point? 


Saburo said: "He is not a general of the generals, but he does not know 
how many branches." 


It turned out to be the case. It means that if it is not later, it is afraid that 
there is no chance to get the blessing of the ancestors. 


PDD aie BE AARC CEES DODD DID EPDM P? OID DIIO GOP D 


Suddenly, the voice above said: "A good one has no regrets! Can you dare 
to say no regrets to the pedestrians who have been killed by you in the pits 
for so many years?" 


The voice was uploaded from the top of the crowd, and Xie pity 
immediately looked up: "Which high man is here?" 


There was no answer, but there was a strange noise coming. Huh, it’s like a 
gust of wind. When the voice was near, thankfulness was finally 
confirmed - it was indeed the whistling wind! 


This wind was so sudden and too violent that I couldn’t figure out what the 
situation was, and the whole body had already glimpsed, and the whole 
person floated! 


This sudden gust of wind poured directly into the bottom of the sinner 
from the top, and it was actually a day for everyone! 


Thanks for the moment, he grabbed Saburo, who was closest to him, and 
said: "Beware!" 


Saburo also grabbed him backhand and his look remained unchanged. 
Thanks for a moment of whirl, the body quickly blasted, and the air 
slammed, then suddenly began to fall. He quickly throws out the evil 
spirits and screams in his busy schedule: "Okay, it’s okay, fast, good, evil, 
first come out and save anxious!" 


I touched two, and if the evil finally flew out. However, surrounded by 
empty, bare, in addition to a large sinner pit, actually can not find anything 
that can be seized, if the evil came out and circled back and forth, all 
helpless, thank you have to adjust the landing posture in the air . In the 
past, most of the time he had to fall to the ground three feet, but this time, 
at the time of landing, Saburo handed him a hand, he was actually landing. 
When the boots were steady and when they stepped on the ground, he was 
still incredible. But this incredible is quickly diluted. As soon as he 
landed, he saw a black figure in front of him stumbled and came over. 


Thanks for your eyes, I liked it, "South Wind!" 


Sure enough, it is the south wind. However, it is already a wolvering south 
wind. His whole person seemed to have played more than a dozen rolls in 
the ash, and was thrown into the pile of beasts that flew in the chickens 
and dogs. After a night, the clothes in the whole body were ragged, and the 
wolf was so embarrassed that he would call him and thank him. After a 
hand, I wiped my face silently, and I couldn't even say anything. Thank 
you for helping him, "What happened to you? Is this being beaten by the 
two girls?" 


When the voice did not fall, I saw two figures followed by the south wind 
and came over. One is the white female crown, and the dust is in the arms, 
and he greets him with a smile, saying: "His Prince is good." 


Although I don’t know who the other person is, I have to thank you for the 
courtesy, but I don’t know how to call it. I just smiled and raised my hand 
and said, “You are friendly.” 


And the black girl was a cold-eyed look, did not pay much attention to 
him, but when he swept to Saburo, he was slightly stagnation. It seemed 
that this person was very suspicious and stopped for a moment. 


The wind that brought the wind to the bottom of the pit was brought up. 
The two men crossed the road and walked straight to the squat. I am not 
surprised when I look forward to coming to the people. After all, when he 
was dressed as Azhao, he had already seen these two people in the city. He 
kneel in the same place, bowed to the white female crown, whispered: 
"The wind master." 


Listen to these four words, thank you for your pity. 


He also always thought that this is where the goblin ghosts, where to know, 
is actually the priest of heaven? And it is still the wind division, the one 
who is scattered in the psychic array is the wind teacher of 100,000 merits! 


But if you think about it, there is nothing wrong with it. At that time, the 
white women's crown said something "Where are those people hiding? Do 
you want me to find out to kill one by one?" Only then did he think that he 
was not a good class, but in fact, this "person" is not necessarily It means 
that they may also refer to the "half-monthly person", but he is 
preoccupied with the main, and this is why the other side has a demon 
spirit with every move. 


For a shot that is a **** officer of 100,000 merits, Xie Pity will inevitably 
hold an inexplicable awe. He told the South Wind Road: "Why don't you 
tell me that this 1s a windshield? I have guessed whether it will be a snake 
or a scorpion, which is a bit rude." 


Nanfeng’s face was a bit dark, and said: “How do I know that it is a 
windshield? I have never seen this handsome wind master, the wind 
master has always been... forget it.” 


Thanks for your pity, probably this is the fake skin phase that the wind 
teacher has made. I don’t pay attention to it. “How can the Fengshi adults 
come here for half a month?” 


Nanfeng Road: "Come on. Just now they wandered in the city for half a 
month, they are looking for those half-moon soldiers." 


And thankfulness immediately remembered that when he first asked for a 
half-moon in the psychic circle, in the midst of a shackle, the wind master 
suddenly dispersed 100,000 merits, which led to the attention of others, 
fearing that it would be then Noticed what he was asking. 


Here, if he was thoughtful, the wind master squatted in front of him and 
said: "Small, I heard it all." 


I stayed down. Feng Shi said: "Do you admit that in the past two hundred 
years, those passers-by who entered the half-moon ancient city were 
introduced by you?" 


I have been arrested and I am not defending myself. Shen Sheng said: "It 
is me." 


Windshidao: "Why?" 


Suddenly, Yu Sudao said: "The Fengshi adults have long doubts, they will 
not guess why." 


Feng Shi said: "Just because these souls are the iron-clad proof of your 
hands when you are a human being, it may become a hindrance to one day 
in your future." 


I couldn’t help but feel sorry. I couldn’t help but listen. “It’s not good. 
Why don’t you kill them directly? Why do you have to use the way people 
live to calm the grievances here? A person's hunger|Thirst, is there any 
difference in feeding with another person's flesh and blood?" 


Saburo said: "He can't." 


Right. In the heavenly court, the priests like ?? are all stared at by 
countless eyes. A lot of things can't be done directly. You can't kill these 
grievous soldiers simply by the deity, and you can't send troops to 
annihilate. It was originally a cover-up thing, and the movement was too 


big. Didn’t it attract everyone’s eyes? At most, I can only send one such as 
Azhao. The body is quietly coming down. 


Through the half-month-long manipulation of the appendix to go out and 
bite people, attracting people to come and feed the grievances, so that their 
grievances dissipate, is undoubtedly the perfect knife to kill. 


Feng Shi said: "Your family general will not do this kind of thing. This 
time, you are afraid to do something a bit too." 


As a **** officer in the heavens, he released the points. In the half moon, 
it was nearly two hundred years of chaos. It led many countless passers-by 
to go astray, and became the soul of the half-month soldier. In any case, it 
is not a trivial matter. Hang Su said: "The younger generation knows." 


The wind master smashed the dust and said: "You know it. You have a 
good look in your heart, go up and talk." 


? whispered: "Yes." 


After the windshield and his account, he put the dust into the robes and got 
up, and he smiled and said to him: "His Royal Highness, long-awaited." 


This is officially greeting. For the pity, "long-term" is really not a good 
word, but anyway, it is just some scenes, and Xie pity also laughs: "Where 
is it. The talents of Fengshi are long-awaited." 


Windshidao said: "I was really embarrassed before." 
Thanks for your pity, said: "Before? What happened before?" 


Windshidao said: "Have you encountered a gust of sand in the desert 
before?" 


Thanks for the pity, I still feel that the mouth 1s full of sand, saying: "Yes." 


Windshidao said: "That is what I started." 


" " 


Feng Shidao: "The original intention of the wind and sand is to keep you 
from approaching the half-moon country. I didn't expect you to be taken 
away, and you are still looking for it." 


The more you listen, the more you feel, the more you feel wrong. The 
wind and sand stopped them from going to the half-month, and the matter 
suddenly appeared. What does this mean? 


He does not move, he does not return, listen to what the other party said. 
The wind teacher said again: "But, this thing, you should not take care of 
your Royal Highness Prince." 


Thanks for a half-month of squatting on the ground, my heart flashed a 
bad hunch. 


He was originally worried that this incident had reached the heavens. The 
priests were free to add or subtract a few strokes. When the words were 
changed, they became guilty and sinless. At this point, suddenly a half- 
way to kill a wind division to let him leave this matter, 1s it more like to 
want to cover up the small sister? 


So, he stood quietly and stepped forward, blocking in front of half a 
month, Wen said: "But I have finished this matter, and then I will not let 
me control it, and it is useless." 


The wind teacher smiled and said: "You can rest assured. Half a month, 
you can take it away." 


This is beyond expectation. He gave a slight glimpse, and the wind teacher 
said again: "This whole thing, we have already heard it on the above. 
Although the half-month national teacher is already in the 'fierce' 
situation, I am walking around the city and seeing She put the half-month 
soldier into the array she had set up, and saw that she had let go of the 
mortal who had been captured by the soldiers. Not only did she harm 
anyone, but she was still saving people. I had to take away only the 
generals and engraved generals. You don't have to worry about who I am 
holding." 


Thanks for your reassurance, said: "Hey! It’s my heart." 


Feng Shi said: "It is normal for you to worry so much. After all, many of 
the customs in heaven are not good." 


The girl in black seemed to be unable to bear to spend more time here, and 
said to her side: "Are you finished? Go and leave." 


The wind teacher shouted: "Hey! What are you anxious, the more urgent 
you are, the more I say!" That is what he said, but he has already turned 
around and took a folding fan from his waist and said: "His Royal 
Highness, if not Anything else, let’s go to heaven again?” 


Thanks a little bit, the wind division will open the folding fan. I saw a 
horizontal "wind" on the front of the fan and three clear streams on the 
back. It is expected that it is the instrument of the Fengshen official. She 
fanned the folding fan three times and turned it back three times. 
Suddenly, there was another gust of wind on the ground. The wind blows 
the sand and the stone is fascinating. Thanks to the wind and the sleeves, 
the wind blew, and the two women and the shackles and the carvings 
disappeared. Only Xie Li, Saburo, the south wind, and the half moon that 
collapsed to the ground were left. . 


Thanks for putting down his sleeve and shouting: "What is this?" 
Saburo came over leisurely and said: "It's a good situation." 
Thank you for watching him, said: "Is it good?" 


Saburo said: "It's very good. The windshield keeps you out, it is helping 
you." 


The south wind also came over and said: "Yes. You have already managed 
a lot of things. Then you will only have to go to the emperor to complain. 
You should not worry about the complaint." 


Thank you for your pity, "Is it because of the general?" 


Nanfeng Road: "Yes. You are completely offended by the generals this 
time." 


Thanks and laughs: "I have expected at least one offense anyway. It seems 
that it is not important to offend one." 


Nanfeng frowned: "Don't be a joke, except for the Shenwu Temple, the 
most powerful martial art is the Mingguang Temple. The generals are very 
valued, and they always want to let the shacks kick the right, they will find 
you trouble. of." 


Thanks to the pity: "Is the right to be the Western Wushu you said?" 


Nanfeng Road: "It is him. Quan Yizhen is also a newcomer. It is very close 
to the period of flying and flying. It is very young, but people are a bit... 
but it is also very powerful. The generals intend to let the believers in the 
west I won it, and I am very competitive. I have just walked in the past 
few years. As a result, you have done this. I am afraid that it will be bad 
luck. I don’t know if I will be defamed. In case he is defamed, you It’s 
going to be bad luck.” 


Thank you for your pity, and decided to be more careful about eating and 
drinking in the future. Saburo did not agree, saying: "Don't worry. You are 
very proud of this person and will not come to Yin." 


The south wind glanced at him, and thanked him again: "What about the 
wind division? The wind master told me to leave it alone, meaning that 
she was responsible for the complaint. Isn't this a change to her offending 
general? No, she is called her. Come back, Nanfeng, do you know what the 
psychic password of Fengshi adults 1s?" 


The south wind said: "You don't have to worry about the wind. The general 
will dare to move you, but will not move her. Although she is younger than 
you, it is much better than you." 


The silence of thankfulness was not hurt, but thought: "Is there any more 
mixed in heaven than in me? No." 


Saburo smiled and said: "The wind master has a support, and naturally 
mixes well." 


Thanks to pity: "Are you talking about the black girl next to her? I think it 
is also a powerful person." 


Saburo said: "No. But the black clothes are indeed a powerful person. They 
should also be one of the five divisions of the feng shui rain mine. It is not 
recommended to offend." 


The wind master can flatten the tornado, naturally the mana is strong, and 
the black girl is obviously better. Xie pity always felt that the girl seemed 
to be aware of what Sanlang had. He was slightly uncomfortable and said: 
"I agree with you." 


However, there is one more sentence, he feels that you don't have to say it. 
Thanks for your pity: "Some people don't necessarily have a good mix." I 
want to know that when I was thinking about it, I gave it to the Prince of 
the Three Kingdoms. Isn't he still not mixing? 


Thanks for the bounce on the ground where he fell, patted it, saw no 
flatness, let out a sigh of relief, re-backed it, and looked at the south wind, 
saying: "You are not chased by the two adults. All the way?" 


Nanfeng said with a black face: "Yes. Play all the way." 


Xie pity patted him on the shoulder and said: "It’s really hard for you." 
After that, suddenly I remembered, and one of them was very hard. She 
turned back and said, "Was it?" 


Nanfengdao: "Is he not looking at those poisoned people?" 


The implication was that they were not seen when they were taken out by 
the gust of wind. In fact, after Azhao appeared, thank you for not 
discovering him. If he hadn’t ran since then, he ran when the wind blew. 


Thank you for not worrying about him, guessing that he just didn't want to 
lick this drowning, so he hurried off. When I heard the south wind saying 
"poisoning", I was awakened in a dream, and the two called at the same 
time: "Good Moon!" 


Saburo said: "No hurry, genius just shines." 


However, there is nothing wrong with saving lives. Even if it is far from 
twelve o'clock, who knows if there will be a chance on the way? At the 
moment, she prayed for half a month on the ground and ran all the way 
toward the palace. 


When he arrived at the palace, he put down for half a month and went up 
to pick up a few great moon grasses. The earth was buried on the ground, 
leaving a pile of white bones and a **** face. 


If it was in the past, Xie Pity might dig a pit to bury it, but once he rushed 
to save people, secondly, this person has been buried in the soil for more 
than 50 years, presumably he is no longer willing to go back. But the 
corpse of the businessman was gone, and thanked the pity and stopped, it 
was strange that Saburo had a small pottery from the palace. Thanks for 
your pity, immediately said: "Good Saburo, thank you!" 


The next half of the month was weak, and she couldn’t wake up. She 
thanked her and accepted her and collected it in the clay pot. The group 
picked up the grass and finally rushed back. At this point, 1t was just four 
hours before they met the appendix. 


When I arrived at the place where the paintings were circled, several 
people still stayed in the circle honestly and did not dare to go out. The old 
man took the medicinal herbs given by the south wind, and the injury 
control was good. Then he took the sylvestris and took it for a while and 
walked. However, thank you for not thinking about what the fertilizer of 
this moon grass 1s. 


After a while, everyone decided to start, and they began to worry: "Born? 
Why haven’t they returned yet?" 


Before thanking me for picking up herbs to save people, and the half-moon 
soldiers in the ancient city are not left. I didn’t have time to take care of 
the natural people and other people. I was about to turn back, and I heard a 
young boy’s voice shouting and running closer and closer. Looking back, it 
is born. The boy was holding a lot of good moon grass in his hand, 
followed by two businessmen, all of whom were panting. 


When I asked, I realized that in the sinner’s pit, a group of soldiers were 
swept down in half a month, and a few people were taken away. A few 
people were born to be scared to death. Who knows that they took them 
down for half a month and pointed them out, let them go. They escaped 
from the birth of the day, quickly picked the good moon grass, buried the 
body of the businessman, and fought back, but still a little slower than the 
journey of Xie Li and others. 


All in all, the **** of this line of caravans out of the Gobi has finally 
come to an end. 


However, on the occasion of the farewell, he ran secretly to find him, God 
mysteriously said: "Brother, I ask you a question." 


Thanks, "You ask." 


Born to be born: "Are you a god?" 


Thanks a little bit shocked, and a little moved. 


Because, some time ago, he often shouted loudly to people, saying that I 
am a god, I am His Royal Highness, no one believes him. This time, he did 
not open the other side and asked him if he was a god. It really shocked 
him and moved him. 


Born to be born: "I saw your usage! You can rest assured, I will not say to 
others." 


Thank you for your pity: "How do you say that you will not believe 
anyone..." 


Born to be born: "This is thanks to you, or I will be kicked out of the pit by 
the dark ghost soldiers. I will go back and build a temple for you." 


Seeing that he took a picture of his chest, he was more than a "very big" 
gesture. He couldn't help but smile, and smiled happily: "Thank you." 


Saburo was on the side, for some reason, chuckled. Xie pity does not think 
that he is laughing at the child's words and he is not known. 


Although the child did not know how big it was to build a temple, he was 
very happy whether he could get it. 


Being entangled in all kinds, I had to leave a name of "broken fairy" in a 
random way, waved my hand and left the other side. The south wind 
opened a thousand miles and sent them back to the Bodhisattva. 


Open the door, thank you for taking the attendance to the ground, and then 
lie down, like a corpse, the whole movement is done in one go. Saburo sat 
down beside him and asked him to look at him. Thanks a little sigh, said: 
"Are we gone for a few days?" 


Saburo: "It will be three or four days in general." 
Thanks and pity: "Three or four days, why are you so tired." 


After playing from the sky, he is often tired as a dog, which is really not an 
illusion. He sighed and looked up and said, "Hey, south wind, why don't 
you go back and report?" 


South Wind Road: "What report?" 


Thanks to pity: "Are you not the priest of Nanyang Temple? If you leave 
for three or four days, will your general not look for you?" 


Nanfeng Road: "My family general is not in the temple, no matter what I 
am." 


Thanks to pity, he climbed up and said, "Well, you stay." 
Nanfeng Road: "What are you going to do?" 
Thanks to pity and Yan Yue: "I will cook for you. I will treat you." 


The south wind heard the words and his face changed greatly. He raised his 
hand, and the **** closed together, reaching the side of the temple. It 
seemed that he had received the psychic and got up and said: "There is 
something in the temple. I am leaving." 


Thanks for raising his hand, said: "Hey, south wind, don't go, how come 
suddenly? This time really hard you..." 


Nanfeng said: "There is something really happening!" Seeing him rushing 
out the door, thanked and prayed back to the mat, said to Sanlang: "It 
seems that he is not hungry." 


Saburo has not answered yet, only listened to the "?", the south wind 
rushed back, blocked at the door, said: "You two..." 


Xie Li and Saburo sat side by side on the mat and looked up at him. "What 
happened to us?" 


The south wind pointed to Saburo, and pointed to thank you for your pity. 
He said, "I will come back again." 


Thanks: "Welcome, welcome." 


The south wind glanced again at Saburo and closed the door. Thanks for 
raising his arms, Xue Sanlang smashed his head and said: "It seems that 
something really is going on." 


He glanced at the boy next to him and smiled and said: "He 1s not hungry, 
what about you?" 


Saburo also smiled and said: "I am hungry." 


Thank you, Charlie, and stood up again, turned around and cleaned up the 
table for the time, saying: "Okay. Then, what do you want to eat, 
Huacheng?" 


Behind him, the silence of the beggar, and then, a low laugh came. 


"I still prefer it, the name "Sanlang". 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 30: Poke the 
ghost king prince for truth 


Thank you for asking: "Blood rain and flowers?" 
Huacheng Road: "His Royal Highness." 
Thanks for turning around, he said, "It’s the first time I heard you call me." 


The red boy sat on the mat and raised a leg. He also smiled: "How do you 
feel?" 


Thanks for thinking, and honestly said: "It seems like... when people call 
me like this, it feels different." 


Huacheng Road: "Well, where is it different?" 
Thank you for your pity, and blinked slightly: "I can hardly say that is..." 


Others call him His Highness, either without feelings | color, business 
affairs, such as the spirit. And more people call him His Highness, but 
with a kind of running, it is like calling a ugly and eccentric beauty, but it 
is intentional and slightly ironic. 


But when Huacheng called him "His Royal Highness", these two words 
were precious. Therefore, although it is impossible to say it, thanking me 
is that Huacheng calls him "His Royal Highness" and feels different when 
he calls him "His Royal Highness". 


Thanks to pity: "With the Junshan, the groom who took me away is you." 
The deeper the smile on the lips of Huacheng. Thanks to this, I found out 
that this sentence seems to be ambiguous. I quickly changed it: "I mean, is 


that the one who took me away with the Junshan groom?" 


Huacheng said: "I did not disguise the groom." 


If you really want to say this, then it is true. At that time, the boy did not 
lie to him that he was a groom, he did not say a word at all, just stopped in 
front of the sedan door, and then extended his hand. Thank you for your 
own walk with him! 


Thank you, "Okay. Then, why did you appear with Junshan?" 


Huacheng Road: "There are two kinds of answers to this question: first, I 
am going to the Prince of the Crown to go to you; second, passing by, very 
busy. Which one do you think is more credible?" 


Counting the number of days he spent on his side, thank you: "Which is 
more credible than dare to say... but you seem to be really idle." 


His whole person and his eyes circled around the flower city, spinning 
back and forth. For a long time, he nodded and said: "You... not quite the 
same as the legend." 


Huacheng changed his position, but he still held his hand and looked at 
him. He said, "Oh? How did the Prince’s Highness know that I am 
bloody?" 


Thanks to the brain, the umbrella under the **** rain, the silver chain of 
the jingle, the silver wristband of the cold ice, I thought that you did not 
hide it very seriously. He said: "No matter how you try, you will not leak 
water, it must be 'extremely'. You are like a maple in blood, like 
omniscience, omnipotent, fearless, so arrogant, except that the fairy The 
**** rain of the gods is changing, and it seems that I can't think of other 
people." 


Huacheng smiled and said: "When I say this, can I praise you?" 
Thank you for your pity: "Don't you hear that it is?" 


Huacheng smiled slightly and said: "When you say so much, why don't 
you ask me, why is it close to you?" 


Thank you, "If you don't want to say it, I will ask you if you don't tell me, 
or tell me not the truth." 


Huacheng said: "That's not necessarily. And, then you can drive me away.' 


Thanks to pity: "You are so superb, even if I am driving you away now, do 
you really want to do something bad, will you not change your skin 
again?" 


The two men looked at each other and laughed. Suddenly, a burst of bones 
suddenly broke the short silence in the Bodhisattva. The two looked in the 
direction of the sound. No one, only a small black clay pot rolled on the 
ground. 


That was the little clay pot that was half a month old. It was originally put 
on the mat by the pity, but I didn’t know when it fell on its own, rolled to 
the door, and the wooden door made by Huacheng stopped it. Hit on the 
door. Thanks for fear that it broke himself, and went up to open the door. 
The small clay pot rolled all the way to the grass outside the door. 


Thanks to the back, the little clay pot rolled onto a meadow and stood up. 
It is only a jar, but it gives people the illusion that it is looking up at the 
Stars. 


Huacheng also came out of the Bodhisattva view, thanking the pottery to 
the pottery: "Half a month, are you awake?" 


Fortunately, they came into the middle of the night when they came back 
from Gobi. Otherwise, people could see that thank you and prayed that 
they would stand outside in the middle of the night and ask a jar. What 
happened to you, and most of them had to make a fuss. 


For a long while, a small voice in the small jar: "Flower General." 


Thanks for sitting down next to it, saying: "Half a month, are you coming 
out to see the stars? Do you want to come out and see." 


Huacheng stood by and leaned against a tree and said: "She just left Half 
Moon City, and it is better to stay in it for a while." 


After all, half a month ago, I stayed in the half-month for two hundred 
years. Suddenly I changed a place. I am afraid it will be difficult to adapt. 
She said: "You still stay in it for a while, then raise it. This is where I 
practice." You don't have to worry about anything else." 


The jar shook twice, I don't know what I wanted to say. For a moment, 
thank you: "Half a month, in fact, there is nothing wrong with you this 
time. Your snake 1s..." 


Half Moon Road: "Flower General, I couldn't move at the time, but I heard 
it." 


Hearing words, thank you for your pity. Only then did I know that it was 
only half a month's ability to act, and did not seal her consciousness. "I am 
good." 


I heard it all, too. 
That jar said: "What will the General of the Flower, General Xiaoyan?" 


Thanks to the hands and sleeves, said: "I don't know. But... 1f you do 
something wrong, you have to accept punishment." 


After a while of silence, the jar shook twice again. Now, thankfulness 
finally saw it. It turned out to be nod. 


Half Moon Road: "Actually, the young generals are not so bad." 
"IS ity" 

"Yeah." Half Moon Road, "He helped me." 

Somehow, I suddenly remembered more things in my mind. 


Half a month, often, in the words of other Yongan children, she "has a face 
that 1s owed." 


Xie pity also knew her long after she knew it. Because no matter how 
many times she plays in half a month, she will not talk to people. It was 
not until one day that she saw a group of children pressing her face into 
the mud to know how the bruises on her face came. 


However, after a while, she asked her again. She only remembered to wash 
the handkerchief that had pulled her out of the mud and washed her face 
back. Nothing else was remembered. 


She doesn't remember the person who beat her, but as long as she saves 
her once, she remembers her life. 


Half a month and again: "Although I was fascinated by him, I was used by 
people. But whether he used me or not, I know that opening the gate is my 
own." 


I don’t know what to say, but somewhere in my heart is suddenly soft. 


Hey, he patted the jar and said, "Okay, it’s gone. Right, half a month, 
flower thank you is a pseudonym, I haven’t been a general, you don’t have 
to call me a general.” 


Half Moon Road: "What should I call you?" 


This is also a problem. If it is half a month and he is screaming as his 
prince, he always feels a bit strange. Thanks to this, I don’t care about it. I 
just remembered the individual words. Then I said, "That's just for you. 
Continue to call the generals." However, there is a surname here, and it 
may be a bit confusing to shout. . But after thinking about it, I thought 
again: "Flower Xie" is of course a pseudonym. The first word of "Corolla 
Wushen" is taken as the surname, and "Flower City" is not a pseudonym? 
They took the pseudonym and chose the same surname, which is also very 
interesting. 


At this time, I listened again to the half moon: "I'm sorry, the general." 


Thanks for turning back, a little depressed: "Half month, why do you 
always apologize to me?" It doesn't always make him look grateful when 


he looks at it. 

Half Moon Road: "I want to save the people." 

Thanks: "0.0.00... 4 

Half Moon Road: "Flower General, you said so at the beginning." 
Thankfulness: "???" 

He quickly pressed the can and said: "Wait. Wait!" 

Half Moon Road: "Wait." 


Thanks for a glance at the flower city standing under the tree near the tree, 
whispering: "I really said this at the beginning?" 


This sentence is obviously the most loved by his mouth when he was a 
teenager. In the past few hundred years, he should have mentioned it at all. 
When he heard it, he felt that the impact was too big. A little unacceptable. 
Half a month but said: "General, you said." 


Xie pity still wants to struggle, said: "No..." 


Half a month seriously and coldly said: "Oh, no, said. Once, you asked me 
what I want to do when I grow up. I don't know. You said that you don't 
know what you want to grow up. I ask. Flower General, you? You said, 'My 
childhood dream is to save the lives!" 


" " 


It turned out to be the case. Thanks to pity: "This! Half a month, this kind 
of casual words, you remember to do so clearly!" 


Half Moon Road: "Is it casual? But, General Hua, I think you are very 
serious about it." 


Thanks for helplessness, looking up at the sky, said: "Haha... Is it? Maybe. 
I have said something, I don't remember." 


Half Moon Road: "You said, 'Do what you think is right!’ "Everything can't 
stop you!" Even if you fall a hundred times in the mud, you must climb 
up!" Many. ,akin." 


I don’t have to look back, I know it. It’s definitely a laugh in the flower 
city under the tree. 


Thanks to the jar, I couldn’t help myself. I thought, "...all nonsense...what 
do I love to say this?...[ am not such a person...I am such a person??" 


Half Moon Road: "But I don't know what is right." 
Hearing words, thank you for your pity. 


Half Moon Road: "I want to save the people like the Flower General said. 
But in the end, I ruined the half-moon country." 


She was confused: "And it seems that no matter what I do... the results are 
very bad. General, I know that I am not doing well, but can you tell me, 
where am I doing badly? What should I do? Can you really save your life 
like you said?" 


Thanks to pity: "I am sorry, half a month, how to save the people... I didn't 
know this question before, but I still don't know." 


Silence for a moment, half moon said: "Flower General, to be honest, I 
think I have been for more than two hundred years, I don't know what I am 
doing, I am failing." 


Listening to her saying this, thanking the pity is even more depressed, 
thinking that I am not even more failed? I have been mixing for eight 
hundred years... 


After staying for half a month, a ghost stayed in the jar and stared at the 
starry sky. Xie Pity and Huacheng returned to the Bodhisattva. 


After closing the door, Xie pity suddenly said: "Half a month is voluntary 
to stay in the half moon, not because it became a fierce, so it was trapped 
there." 


She always remembers that she opened the city gate and never asked 
herself for an excuse for "I am for the sake of the righteousness." In order 
to let the soldiers of the half-moon country vent their anger, and ascend to 
heaven as soon as possible, let the engraving take them to kill themselves 
once and for all. 


Xie pity shook his head and said: "Actually, if General Xiaoyan really does 
not want to stay for those half-month soldiers, and does not want to be 
found in heaven, he can quietly get a score for himself. Everyone is going 
to clean up those half-moon soldiers. Why must I use it? This way." 


Huacheng Road: "The power of the body will be weakened. The point of 
the sacred sacredness| You can see it, you can't solve the soldiers for so 
many and a half months, or use the living people to feed, and the 
grievances dissipate faster. the easiest." 


Thanks to the pity: "Why must we be so fast?" 


Huacheng Road: "Maybe I want you to be hanged a few times in 
painfulness for this half-month child." 


For a moment of silence, thank you: "Those mortals." 


Huacheng whispered: "God official, mortal life, nature is not as good as 
ants. ?? 1s a typical superior priest, as long as it is not found, killing 
hundreds of people, for him, it is no different from crushing hundreds of 
worms "" 


Xie pity looked at him and remembered that Sanlang had smashed the 
sinner pit and then killed the half-moon soldier at the bottom of the pit. He 
turned and said: "The power of the body will be weakened? I see, you The 
score is very powerful." 


Huacheng raised an eyebrow at him and said, "Of course. However, this is 
my deity." 


Thanks to turning his head, he was a little surprised: "Hey? Are you 
deity?" 


Huacheng Road: "If you change." 


To blame him, after he finished this sentence, the pair seemed to be saying 
that he would ask for a kiss. So, when Xie Pity did not notice what he had 
done, he had already raised a finger. Huacheng poked on the cheek. 


After the poke was finished, thanking the pity, he suddenly woke up, and 
his heart screamed badly. 


He is just a curious feeling in the heart of the ghostly ghost of the ghost 
king. I didn't expect the body to be quicker than the mind, and poked it 
when raising his hand. This is really not like a word. 


Suddenly, he was poked, and Huacheng seemed to be slightly surprised. 
However, he always calmed down and looked calm. He did not say 
anything, but his eyebrows were higher, as if waiting for his explanation. 
The smile in his eyes is at a glance. Of course, thank you for not giving 
any explanation. I looked at the finger and hid it without revealing it. 
"Yes." 


Huacheng finally laughed out, picked up his arm and asked him: "What is 
good? Do you think that my skin is good?" 


Thanks sincerely: "Yes, very good. But..." 
Huacheng Road: "But what?" 


Xie pity stared at his face and looked at it for a while. Finally, still said: 
"But, can I see what you are?" 


Since he only said "this skin", it means that although this body is the deity, 
the skin is not the truth. The appearance of this juvenile is not his true 
content. 


This time, Huacheng did not answer immediately. He put down his arm, I 
don't know if it is the illusion of pity, always feel that his eyes are darker, 
and a heart can't help but mention it. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 24: ER7EMS RR 
BATT 


The more he is, the more dangerous he feels, the more he said: "Everyone 
is going back, don't get close to it, and don't care what it says." 


Everyone was too busy listening to him and panicked. The soil was buried 
and tried to laugh and said: "Hey, don't go, why are you, I am also a 
person, I will not harm you!" 


Thank you very much: "You think too much, you can be completely 
different from the individual!" 


Who knows, at this time, the sudden change, a businessman probably 
thought that in any case, he still had to take some herbs to save people, 
sneaked forward a few steps, bent over and wanted to go to the ground to 
be scared Lost the good moon grass. The eyes of the buried bones turned 
and passed, and a flash of light flashed across the eyes. 


Thank you for your bad feelings, rushing over and saying: "Don't worry! 
Come back!" 


However, it was already late, and the soil buried suddenly had a mouth, 
and a bright red thing slipped out of his mouth. 


Long tongue! 


Xie pity grabbed the merchant's back collar, and went backwards again 
and again, but the things that flew out of the buried face were very long, 
and a slamming slammed into the ear of the businessman! 


Xie pity felt a fierce tremor in the lower body, and the businessman made 
a short scream, his limbs twitching, his knees slamming. The long tongue 
quickly took a large piece of **** stuff from his ear and retracted into the 
mouth of the earth. The soil was buried and chewed and laughed, chewed 

with **** mouth, laughing almost to overturn the roof of the broken 


palace, screaming: "Ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha! delicious and 
delicious, delicious and delicious Delicious! Delicious and delicious!! 
Starved me, starved me!" 


The sound is sharp and sharp, and the eyes are bloodshot, which 1s really 
disgusting! 


This person has been buried here for more than 50 years, has been 
assimilated by this demon country, completely turned into something else! 


Xie Li released the right hand of the merchant's back collar, and was about 
to lick this disgusting thing. He suddenly heard the soil buried and 
screamed: "General! General! They are here! They are here!" 


Only heard a fierce roar than the beast, a black shadow descended from the 
sky, and fell heavily in the face of pity. 


At the moment when the black shadow landed, almost the entire ground 
was trembled. And when he slowly stood up, everyone was shrouded in the 
huge shadow he projected. 


This "person" is really too big. 


His face was dark as iron, and the facial features were fierce and rough, as 
if it were a beast. Armor on the chest and shoulders, more than nine feet 
long, not so much a person, it is better to say that it is a giant wolf walking 
upright. Behind him, there are one, two, three... more than a dozen 
"people" jumping off the roof of the palace. 


These "people" are tall and tall, with similar figures, and shoulders are 
carrying a spur of a dense tooth, which has the illusion of a wolf group. 
After they fell, they surrounded several people in the garden like a huge 
iron tower. 


Half moon soldier! 


These soldiers exude a burst of black air, of course, it is no longer a living. 
Xie pity is tight and tight, if the evil is ready to go. 


However, after those half-month soldiers saw them, they did not 
immediately rush to kill them. Instead, they gave off a scream of laughter 
and yelled at each other in a foreign language. The voice 1s so strange, the 
pronunciation is smashed, and the tongue is so powerful that it is the 
language of the half moon country. 


Although it has been said for two hundred years, the half-moon language 
of Xie Pity has forgotten 7780, but it was only after the General’s squad 
was reviewed with Saburo, and these soldiers were so vocal, and the words 
were rude and the vocabulary was simple. It is not difficult to understand. 


He heard all the half-moon soldiers shouting that the first half of the 
month was a "general". The conversation was interspersed with words such 
as "take away" and "temporarily not kill". They took a deep breath and 
whispered: "Everyone should not panic." These half-months will not kill 
people for the time being. It seems that we have to take us to another 
place. Don't act rashly, I can't guarantee that I can beat them and act on the 
plane." 


These soldiers are extremely difficult to deal with at first glance, and all 
of them are thick and fleshy. Even if he has the evil spirits in his hands, he 
is afraid that it will take a short time, and dozens of them will come, 
which is not easy to deal with. There are still a few ordinary people 
present, and I have to wait and see for a while. 


Saburo does not speak. Others had no claims at all, even if they wanted to 
act rashly, they didn’t know how to act rashly, nodding their heads with 
tears. Only the earth buried face screamed: "General! General! Let me go! 
I will help you leave the enemy, let me go home! I want to go back!" 


He saw this group of half-moon soldiers, his expression was extremely 
excited, while screaming and whispering, the words were also mixed with 
some half-moon vocabulary, which should be learned in the past fifty or 
six years of fertilizer. The nine-and-a-half-month-old man known as the 
"General" saw something in the soil that was screaming and screaming as 
if he felt very disgusting. A mace hammered down and several sharp 
spikes pierced. The head of the buried surface. The earth buried face 
screamed, and he added that the spiked face was embedded with the face 


of the buried face, and he was uprooted and brought out of the soil to 
realize his desire to "put me out." 


However, even the ground that broke out under the neck of this buried soil 
is not a human body, but a bone of a forest! 


Several businessmen saw this horror scene and shouted. The head of the 
buried surface fell off the spike of the mace, and the face was blood. 
Seeing his body, he seemed to be scared. He took a breath and said: "What 
is this? What is this? ?!" 


Thanks for reminding me: "This 1s your body." 


I think about it. The man was buried in the desert land for fifty or six 
decades, and the flesh and blood of the body had long been turned into the 
nutrients of the good moon grass, and only one bone shelf was left. 


The buried surface is still unwilling to believe, "How is this possible?? My 
body is not like this, this is not my body!!!" 


His voice was very fierce. This picture was terrible and sad. Xie pity shook 
his head. Saburo sneered and said: "You can't understand your body now? 
What is the thing that sticks out of your mouth?" Do you think it is ok?" 


The buried ground immediately retorted: "What's the problem! It's just... 
it's just a little longer than the tongue of an ordinary person!" 


Saburo’s eyebrows are full of laughter and said: “Well, yes, a little longer. 
Haha.” 


The earth buried surface: "Yes! It's just a little longer! It's just that I have 
been living for a long time in order to eat the flying reptiles, and it has 
become more and more like this!" 


When he was just buried in the soil, he might still be alive, and in order to 
survive, he tried to stretch his tongue to eat those flying insects and 
reptiles. Gradually, he is no longer a human being, and his tongue is 


getting longer and longer, and the "food" he eats has changed from flying 
reptiles to more terrible things. 


But because he has been buried in the soil, he has not seen his body for so 
many years, and he is unacceptable, and he does not want to believe that 
he is not alone. The buried soil strives to argue: "Someone's tongue 1s 
longer!" 


Saburo smiled. Looking at him, Xie pity is inexplicable. The smile of this 
boy is really a kind of coldness that is about to peel off the face of others. 


Saburo said: "Do you think you are still personal?" 


After being asked such a sentence, the buried surface seemed to have a 
sense of crisis. He suddenly became annoyed and said: "Of course I am a 
human. I am a human!" 


As he shouted, he worked hard to move his hands and feet that had become 
white bones and wanted to crawl on the ground. Perhaps because it finally 
came out of the soil, he felt sincerely happy and laughed and said: "I have 
to go back, I can go back! Hahahahahaha..." 


"Ka! " 


His laughter was too harsh, and finally annoyed the half-month general, 
one foot down, the skull of this buried face instantly shattered. And the 
scream of his "I am a man" can't be sent out anymore. 


After the "general" stepped on the annoying soil, the soldiers yelled aloud, 
and a group of half-monthly soldiers waved a mace and screamed at the 
crowd and began to drive them out of the palace. 


Thanks to the forefront, Saburo still followed him. Even on the way of 
being escorted by a group of fierce and half-moon soldiers, the boy’s steps 
are still not as slow as walking. From the moment, Xie Pity always wanted 
to find a chance to talk to him. After a while, I saw the group of half- 
month soldiers talking to each other and not paying much attention to 


them. They whispered: "They called the half-moon man of this leader as 
the general." 'I don't know what the general is." 


Sure enough, when he asked, Saburo still answered. He said: "At the time 
of the demise of the half moon, there was only one general. His name was 


1 


translated into Chinese, called ‘engraving’. 
Thanks for the pity: "Engrave?" 


This name is really strange. Saburo said: "It's good. It is said that because 
he was weak when he was a child, he was often bullied and vowed to 
become stronger. He used his stone carving to exercise his strength and got 
such a name." 


Thankful, I couldn’t help but think: "That can be called vigorous..." 


Saburo said again: "The rumor is the most brave general of the half-moon 
national calendar. It is nine feet long and is infinite. It is a loyal supporter 
of the half-month national division." 


Thanks: "Is it after death? Now he is going to send us to the half-month 
national division?" 


Saburo said: "Maybe." 


How can you get out of the way if there are more soldiers in the half 
month? I don’t know what happened to the south wind that led the two? 
The good moon grass has been handed, how should it be sent to the 
poisoned person within twelve hours? 


Xie pity walked all the way and thought about it, and found that the 
generals who drove them were getting more and more remote. Finally, 
they were brought to a place on the edge of the half moon, which stopped. 
Thanks for the pity, looked up and looked up, a tall, loess wall stood in 
front of him, like a giant. 


Their destination turned out to be a sinner pit. 


Although I have lived in the vicinity of the half-moon country for a while, 
but the pity does not often enter the half-moon city, of course, has never 
been close to this sinner pit. Looking at this sinner pit, I am inexplicably 
heartbroken. 


On the outer side of the loess wall, there is a staircase. While slowly 
climbing along the simple stairs, thanks to the downward view, and 
constantly watching with the naked eye, I finally understand what this 
heart is from. 


It is not because of the use of this place for torture, so it is not chilling, nor 
is it worried that this pedestrian will be pushed into the bottom of the pit, 
but a kind of heart that is purely due to the presence of the mana. 


The terrain and pattern around the sinner's pit were deliberately set up as 
an extremely powerful array. 


And this array of methods has only one effect - the one who makes this pit 
fall will never climb! 


The so-called "crawl up" means that even if someone puts the rope down 
or puts a ladder, the people underneath grab the line and climb up to 
halfway. The formation will start, and the person will also start. Will be 
re-played. Thanks to the wall, he walked the wall with his hand and walked 
through the road. He roughly figured out the material of the wall and 
found that the wall looked like a soil at a distance, but it was actually a 
hard stone, and may also bless the curse. It must be difficult to break. 


And when they had finished the stairs, they came to the top of the sinner's 
pit and stood on the wall of the loess wall. The first sight can only be 
described as "shocking". 


The entire sinner pit is surrounded by four high walls. Each high wall is 
more than 30 feet long and more than 20 feet high. Each wall is about four 
feet thick and stands tall. In the middle of the four walls, a large square 
space is enclosed, and there is no platform or crossbar for standing. 


It’s too late, and the crater’s black lacquer is completely out of sight. 
There is only a chill and **** temper, and it’s floating from the 
bottomless darkness from time to time. 


Everyone stepped on the high wall without any guardrails, and there were 
dozens of feet on the ground, and few people dared to look down. After a 
while, there was an erected long pole in front of it, and a corpse was hung 
on the pole, which was the one they had seen below. The body was very 
small, a black girl, and the clothes were ragged and lowered her head. 


Thanks for knowing that this pole is dedicated to sinners who want to be 
maliciously humiliated by the soldiers. Usually the jailers will light the 
sinner's clothes, red|naked up naked, let the prisoner starve to death or 
dehydrate and die. After death, the body will swing with the wind, the sun, 
the rain, the air, and the limbs will rot on one side. Falling down, the dead 
body of the body is extremely ugly. 


The girl’s body has not rotted, and it will not last long, perhaps a nearby 
resident. This group of half-moon soldiers actually hang the body of a 
little girl in such a place, it is extremely fierce and vicious. Azhao, 
Tiansheng and others saw this situation, they were all pale, and they did 
not dare to move forward, but fortunately, they did not rush them. He 
turned and screamed at the bottom of the sinner. 


Thanks for the pity, "Is 1t so screaming?" The next question, his question 
was answered. 


It seems to be a response to his loud drink, the dark bottom of the pit, 
there is a burst of roaring sound. Such as tiger wolves, such as monsters, 
such as the tsunami, hundreds of thousands, deafening. The number of 
people on the wall was almost unspeakable by the snoring. Xie Li also 
heard the sound of the sand and gravel being shattered, and it was 
extremely clear. 


Only the prisoner will be put into the sinner pit. Could it be that the death 
of the sinner is the soul of the sinner? 


At this time, the engraved and smashed the next one. Xie pity listened 
carefully. This time, he is no longer a meaningless bark, nor a curse. On 
the contrary, it should be inspiration. Xie pity is very certain, he heard 
such a word - "brothers." 


After half-cutting, the half-moon soldier who rushed to Xie Li and others 
shouted. This sentence, thank you for your understanding. 


What he said is: "Leave only two." 


Others don't understand what he is saying, but they can probably guess 
what this is going to do and their faces are white. Thanks for seeing that 
they were afraid, they couldn’t stand anymore. They took a step forward 
and whispered: "Don’t be nervous, I will go ahead if there is anything 
going on." 


If you have to wait for a while, then he will go down and look at it first. 
Anyway, nothing more than a vicious snake and beast with no new 
intentions. Since he can't die, he can't kill him, he can't bite him, and he 
can't kill him. So as long as it's not a magma flame, a corpse poisonous 
water, he shouldn't be too ugly to jump. 


Moreover, he still has the evil spirits, even if he can't use it to climb up 
because of the formation, but if these half-month soldiers go down again, 
it is okay to pick them up. This moment grinds that "others take away and 
look good", which means that other people will be safer for the time being. 
After all, it is not easy to get a living person in the Gobi. You can't eat it 
all at once. Maybe you want to pick it up and eat it once and for all. 


He thought clearly, who knows, but somebody is not holding his breath. 


Since I hit the top of this sinner's pit, everyone is shaking, except for the 
pity and Saburo's look, especially Azhao. 


Perhaps it is undoubtedly a must die, it is better to fight for a fight, A Zhao 
double fists, suddenly attacked, burying his head and rushing away! 


His rush seems to be the determination to fight the same, that is, to knock 
down the grind. Rao was carved tall and shaped like an iron tower. He was 
actually struck by three steps of his mortal determination. He almost lost 

his foot. He was furious on the spot and shouted and turned A Zhao down. 


Seeing that the young man had fallen into the deep pit of the darkness, 
everyone screamed in unison, thanking the pity: "A Zhao!" 


At this time, the black bottomless pit was far from a burst of cheers, and 
the extremely cruel bite of the sound, as if the evil spirits vying for the 
residual food. Just listen to it and know that this young man named Azhao 
has no chance of survival. 


Xie Li is also completely unaware that there will be such development, 
and it is a big deal. 


He was very skeptical that Azhao was the subordinate of the half-monthly 
national division. He specifically tricked the passers-by into the ancient 
country for half a month. He also suspected that the person who had seen 
the "five or sixty years ago" that was buried in the ground was also his, but 
he did not expect It was the first of them to be killed. How can you survive 
if you jump like this? 


Will it be a suspended animation? But their group is now the captive of the 
soldiers of the half-month. If Azhao is a subordinate of the half-month 
national division, at this moment, he has the upper hand. He can 
completely tear off the disguise and arrogant, why bother to do more, and 
die in front of them? This is meaningless at all. But why did Azhao rush to 
grind? Is this not meaningless death? 


Thanks to the thoughts in the mind, the half-month soldiers on the other 
side began to look for the next living person to push down. Grinding a 
hand, pointing to the birth. One and a half months old soldiers stretched 
out their hands and came to arrest people. They were scared by nature: 
"Ah! Help! Don't catch me! I am..." 


Reluctantly think again, stand up and say: "General, slow." 


Listening to his opening, he said that he was still half-moon, and his face 
was amazed. He waved his hand and stopped the soldiers. "You will say 
our words? Where are you from?" 


Thankful and gentle, "I am coming from the land of the Central Plains." 


He does not mind lying that he is a half-month national, but this is not 
feasible. His half-moon language does not know how many things have 
been picked up, and the dialogue with the engraving will last for a long 
time. In fact, his appearance can also clearly see where the person 1s. Half- 
monthly people are very annoyed to lie and deceive, and if they are 
dismantled, the consequences are even worse. 


Engraved: "Central Plains? Wing's descendants?" 


Thanks to pity: "No. Yong'an has long been destroyed. There is no Yongan 
now." 


However, for the people of the half-moon country, as long as the people 
from the Central Plains are similar, they are all relatives of Yongan. They 
were destroyed by the army of Yong'an. When they heard that he was 
coming from where they were, they burned a black face and flashed the 
anger. The soldiers of the half-monthly screamed, and they screamed with 
curses. Pity listens, nothing more than "despicable" "swindler" "throw him 
down", no pain. 


Engraved: "Our country has disappeared in the Gobi for more than two 
hundred years. You are not our nationals, but we speak our language. Who 
are you?" 


Thanks for pity, I couldn’t help but glance at the young boy who was 
stunned by my side. I hope that if I can’t go round in the future, I can’t 
help but scream for Saburo to save me. He is all ready to start talking 
nonsense. At this time, the dark bottom of the pit is a roar of mountains 
and rivers. 


The following things seem to have finished the food of Azhao's body. But 
they are still hungry, and they use this voice to convey their desire for 


fresh flesh and blood. After scrutinizing a wave, it seems that I have to 
catch the natural, and thank you again: "General, let me come first." 


I have never heard anyone asking for a first come here, and my eyes are 
big, like a brass bell. I am different: "You come first? Why?" 


Of course, thank you for being honest, because I was not afraid, I chose a 
moderately replied answer: "General, these are just innocent passers-by, 
and there are children inside." 


After listening to it, he sneered: "When your Yongan army washed our 
country, you never thought that there were many innocent businessmen 
and children here." 


The demise of the half-moon nation has been two hundred years ago, and 
now both sides have long since changed. However, they are the dead of 
time, and hatred will not fade with the change of the dynasty. Carved and 
said: "You are very suspicious, I want to ask you. You can't go down. Lose 
someone else!" 


Then there's no way. Xie Li is preparing to skip the second, and then see 
the Sanlang step forward. He jumped back and looked back. 


The boy held his arm and looked at the bottomless sinner pit thoughtfully 
with a careless look. 


Thanks to the heart, but a strange feeling of foreboding, said: "Sanlang?" 
Listening to his voice, Saburo turned his head and smiled. "Nothing." 

He took another step forward and the whole person was already in an 
extremely dangerous place. Thanks to my heart and eyelids for a while, 


said: "Wait, Saburo, you don't move first." 


At the height of the sky, the young red hem fluttered in the night wind. 
Saburo glanced at him and smiled. "Don't be afraid." 


Thanks for your pity: "You...returned back. I will not be afraid if you 
return." 


Saburo said: "Don't worry. I will leave for a while. I will see you soon." 
Thank you, "You don't want to..." 


When the voice did not fall, the boy maintained his posture of holding the 
arm, and took another step forward, fluttering in the air, instantly 
disappearing into the unfathomable darkness. 


At the moment when he jumped out, if the evil flies out of the blessing, he 
turns into a white rainbow and wants to wrap the figure of the boy. 
However, the speed of the crash was too fast, and the white cockroach 
even collected it without even catching a piece of clothing. Thanks for a 
moment, squatting on the high wall, shouting and shouting: "Sanlang!!!" 


Nothing is gone. 
After the boy jumped, there was no sound! 


Beside him, above the high wall, many half-monthly soldiers shouted at 
each other, and they were shocked. What is going on today? In the past, I 
had to throw it before I threw it. Today, I am taking turns to rush and jump, 
not to jump and jump down. 


At that moment, the generals sipped and let them calm down, and Xie pity 
saw that if they did not catch Saburo, they couldn’t think too much. When 
they received it, they jumped into the sinner’s pit. Who knows, his body 
has jumped into the air, but the collar of the clothes is suddenly tight, and 
it is suspended. Thanks for looking back, it turned out that the general who 
saw the general saw him also jumped down. It was a long arm that 
stretched out and caught him, not letting him fall! 


Thank you for your pity: "You have to come and do it together. It’s better 
to go on together." The heart is motivated, if the evil is like a white snake, 
squatting around the engraved arm, "brushing" the whole person live. 
Seeing this white and unpredictable, it is like being fine, the forehead is 
black and violent, and the muscles on the body are also rising several 
times in an instant. It seems that I want to break up and bind him. Xie Pity 


is deadlocked with him. Suddenly, the corner of his eye has swept a very 
strange thing. 


The body that was hung on the long pole suddenly moved and slightly 
raised his head. 


The group of half-moon soldiers also noticed that the body was moving, 
and they shouted and waved the mace to the body. After the black girl 
moved, she did not know how she untied the rope that hung her. Suddenly 
she jumped off the pole and rushed over here. 


She was like a black wind blowing from the top of the high wall. It was 
fast and evil. The soldiers were instantly smashed by this evil wind and 
screamed and fell off the high wall. The soldiers who saw him were swept 
down, fell into the sinner's pit, and screamed in anger. He was very vulgar, 
probably used a lot of market slang, thank you for not understanding. 
However, he understood the first sentence. The engraved one is: "This is 
another monk!" 


In the next moment, he couldn't make a sound, because, thanks to his 
sudden force, he fell down with the sinner pit. 


The sinner pit that can't climb up when you fall down! 


In the process of falling, the roar of the engraving almost shocked the 
peculiar eardrum. He had to accept Ruo, and kicked it by the way, let him 
stay away from himself and protect his ears. Then, he drives the evil 
spirits up, hoping to catch something to cushion, at least not to fall too 
badly when landing. 


However, this sinner has been repaired badly, and the law is also very 
powerful. If the evil is not able to explore higher places, there is nowhere 
to go in the walls of this high wall. Just when he thought that he had to fall 
into a flat piece of pie cake on the ground like many times before, he 
couldn’t dig it out for a few days. Suddenly, in the darkness, the silver 
light flashed. 


The next moment, there was a hand that caught him lightly. 


The man was very accurate and picked up. It was like waiting under the 
line to pick him up. He ran around his back and grabbed his shoulder. The 
other hand copied his knee and relaxed. Thanks to the fierceness of falling 
from the sky. 


Xie pity just fell from a height, slammed a bit, and some dizzy, 
subconsciously raised his hand, clenched the shoulders of the other side, 
said: "Sanlang?" 


There was darkness in the surroundings, and nothing could be seen clearly. 
Of course, I could not see who this person was. However, he still blurted 
out these two words. The other party did not answer, and thanked him for 
exploring a few times on his shoulder and chest. He wanted to confirm, 
saying: "Sanlang, is that you?" 


I don't know if it was because of coming to the bottom of the pit. The 
bloodyness here is so heavy that the person who rushed to stunned. Thanks 
for the pity, I don’t know what it 1s. I touched it all the way. When I 
touched the hard throat of the man, I suddenly woke up. My heart was 
guilty of sin. What I was doing, I immediately took my hand and said, "Is 
it Saburo? You are fine. Are you injured?" 


For a long while, he finally heard the boy’s response and came from a 
place very close to him: “Nothing.” 


I don't know why, thank you for feeling that the voice of his sentence 
seems to have subtle differences in peace. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 25: ER{ETS 7 
Feng sinner pit 2 


Thanks to the pity: "Sanlang, are you really okay? Let me down." 
Saburo said: "Don't come down." 


Thanks for your pity, I thought, "What happened? Is there something on 
the ground?" 


The hands still hold him tightly, and there is no meaning to loosen it. 
Thank you for your wish to raise your hand and gently push Saburo’s 
chest. However, when the hand was just put up, he remembered that when 
he fell down and was caught, he groped himself, touched the hard 
protrusion of the young man's throat, and sneaked back. 


I don't know how it happened. Thanks for the hundreds of years, I don't 


know how to write the word " ". At this time, there is a voice in my 
heart that has been warning him. It is best not to tamper with the manual 
foot, be honest. 


At this time, I only heard a roar of anger and sorrow, and a screaming 
scream came from the other side of the bottom of the pit: "What happened 
to you! ?" 


This voice is a half-monthly language, and listening to the voice is the 
engraved general who was pulled down by the pity. He was originally 
dead, and he did not fall to death. It was just that he fell so badly. It is 
estimated that a humanoid pit was also found, embedded in it. When he 
got up, he began to yell: "What happened? Soldiers! My brothers, what 
happened to you?!" 


He only shouted down on the high wall. There were hundreds of voices 
responding to him, as if the depth of the pit was crowded with the raging 
evil spirits to be fed. However, at this moment, in addition to the grief of 


the raging anger, only one piece of silence is left. He couldn't even hear 
the sounds of breathing and heartbeat of Saburo, who was close at hand. 


Thanks for breathing, I suddenly found out that something was wrong. 


Yes, he clearly adhered to Saburo, but he did not hear the boy’s breathing 
and heartbeat! 


Grinding the big shout: "Who killed you, who killed you!" 


When Azhao fell, he could still hear the horror sounds that came under the 
guise of eating and drinking. After Saburo jumped down, there was no 
more sound below, but who killed it? 


I must have reacted immediately and said: "Kill my soldiers, damn, I want 
you to die!" 


Although it is not possible to see things, thank you can sense that the 
danger is coming towards this side, the body moves, said: "Sanlang is 
careful!" 


Saburo said: "Don't care for him." Still holding him, his foot slightly 
moved, it seems to have turned around. 


In the darkness, Xie Li heard a very fine " " flying sound, which is 
nice, crisp and intense, and fleeting. Waiting to catch again, the engraving 
was only thrown into the air, and once again, Saburo was gently and 
skillfully turned around, and he avoided it. Xie’s arm couldn’t help but 
climb up again, holding Sanro tightly and unconsciously grasping it. The 
clothes on his shoulders. 


However, this pair of hands hugged him extremely stable, flashing and 
moving, still steady. However, from time to time, she felt that there was 
something cold and cold on her hands that could hardly glare at him. In the 
boundless darkness, a piece of silver flashed, and the sound of the blade 
fluttering and the raging anger were heard in all directions. 


The general of the half-month seemed to be hurt, but extremely brave, still 
not retreating, and screaming again. Thanks for your pity: "If evil!" 


The white cockroach flew out, and the sound of" "seemed to have 
plucked the grind in the air and fell to the ground. The fall was snarled and 
roared: "You two! Two to one, mean!" 


Thank you for your pity, you have to kill us, and you still have two pairs of 
two to one. You are despicable and not mean, and you must keep your life. 
Saburo laughed without a smile, saying: "You have no chance to win one- 
on-one. You don't shoot." The following sentence is for the pity, the voice 
is a bit low, the irony in the previous sentence. The meaning has also 
disappeared. Thanks to pity: "Okay." After that, he reminded him again, 
saying: "Sanlang, it is better to let me down first. So I am very hampering 
you." 


Saburo said: "I don't get in the way. Don't go down." 


Thank you for your pity: "Why can't you come down?" Isn't this teenager 
like to hold a fight? Do you not have to defy your opponent? 


The boy’s answer was only one word: “dirty.” 


Xie pity never thought that he would say such a reason, the partiality is 
still so serious, a little funny, and a little indescribable sense of singularity, 
only the chest is inexplicably feverish, said: "You can not always be like 
this Hold me." 


Saburo: "It's not a bad thing." 


Xie Li’s question was just a joke, but Saburo’s answer was that he was 
completely joking. He didn’t know what to pick next. In a few words, the 
engraving once again made an offensive in the darkness. Saburo clearly 
held his hands in his hands, but he did not know what method to use, and 
he was beaten and retreated. He retired and said: "The monks let you..." 


This sentence has not been finished yet. I only listened to the loud noise of 


", and a huge body crashed down. It was actually hit directly and fell to 
the ground. Hearing, thank you: "Sanlang, don't kill him first. We want to 
leave here and I have to ask from his mouth." 


Saburo did not take it anymore and stood still. He said: "There is no plan 
to kill him. Otherwise he will not stay." 


The sinner squatted and fell back into a dead silence. 


Silence for a moment, thank you: "Sanlang, the following, are you doing 
it?" 


Even if nothing can be seen in the dark, this overwhelming **** smell and 
murderousness, as well as the madness of grief and anger that has been 
engraved, has clearly outlined what happened below. After a moment of 
silence, Xie Li finally heard the answer from Saburo. 


He said: "Yes." 


The expected answer. For a long while, thank you with a deep sigh and 
said: "How do you Say..." 


He thought for a while, and finally, the words were long and eloquent: 
"Sanlang, next time you see such a pit, you must not jump down again. 
You can't stop you, I really don't know what to do." "" 


It seems that he did not expect that he would come to such a sentence, 
Saburo seems to have stunned. 


When you open again, the tone is a bit weird, saying: "You don't ask more 
questions?" 


Thank you, "What do you want me to ask?" 


Saburo said: "For example, I am not a person." 


Thank you for your pity, and said, "This, I don't think there is any need to 
ask." 


Saburo said: "Well? No need?" 


Thanks for your pity: "Well. Is it necessary? Is it human? It doesn't 
matter." 


Saburo: "Oh?" 


Xie pity picked up his arm in his arms and said: "To meet people, to see if 
you don't vote, what is the opposite, not to look at identity. If I like you, 
you are like me, I like it; if I hate it. You, you are the emperor, I hate it 
too. Shouldn't it be like this? It's simple, so there is no need to ask." 


Saburo laughed and said: "Well, what you said is very reasonable." 


Thanks to pity: "Yes?" He also laughed twice. Laughing and laughing, I 
always felt that something was wrong. Suddenly, I finally reacted. 


He has been held by Saburo in this way, and the most terrible thing is that 
he is used to this position unconsciously! 


This is really a life. Xie pity and cough, said: "That, Saburo, this little 
thing we will talk about later. Do you still let me down?" 


Saburo seemed to smile and said: "Wait a minute." 


He held the pity, it seems that he went down a little way, and then gently 
put him down. Thanks to the land, stepped on a solid land, said: "Thank 
you." 


Saburo did not say, thank you for your gratitude, looked up and looked up. 


There is a bright moon hanging in the deep blue sky, which is extremely 
beautiful. It is only framed in a square sky, which is reminiscent of the 
frog sitting on the ground. 


He tried to drive the evil again and went up. Unsurprisingly, if the evil is 
in the air, it will be blocked by something invisible, and it will bounce 
back and not go up. 


Saburo said: "The sinner is surrounded by pits." 


Thanks for the pity: "I know, try it. Don't try it all the time. Don't know 
how the other people above are doing, then the black girl will sweep them 
down." 


He said that the girl who was hanging on the pole suddenly broke down 
and swept a group of soldiers. Saburo said something. He wanted to go a 
few steps forward, but stepped on something, it seemed to be an arm. Xie 
pity was almost stunned, and soon he stood firm. Saburo still helped him, 
saying: "Be careful." 


He added an understatement: "I said, the ground is dirty." 


Xie pity also understands what the "dirty" means, saying: "Nothing. I want 
to take a palm of my heart and see what happens next, and then plan." 


Saburo did not speak. At this time, in the distance, the sound of the 
grinding sounded again: "You are doing things for the monks, and our 
country will curse you!" 


Xie pity turned back and said in half a month: "The general is engraved, 
the one you said... Who is it?" 


Engraved and hate the channel: "Why do you ask? That demon!" 


Thanks to the pity: "Is that the female crown that wanders around the 
city?" 


It’s just a look at it. Thanks for your pity: "Are you not loyal to the half- 
moon national division?" 


The engraving was irritated by his words, saying: "I will never be loyal to 
her again! I can't spare this monk!" 


Then there was a long list of cursing screaming, exhilarating emotions, 
and the speed of speech was very fast. It was so deep that she had already 
looked awkward and couldn’t understand it. She had to secretly say: 
"Sanlang, Saburo." 


Saburo said: "He is swearing. He said that the country teacher betrayed 
their country, opened the city gate and placed the army in the Central 
Plains, and pushed his brothers into this sinister pit. He would hang her a 
thousand times. 10,000 times." 


Thanks for your help: "Wait!" 
How can this be so, there are two places that are completely wrong! 


First, the "female crown wandering in the city" that Xie Pianfang said, 
refers to the white woman. But now, the grinding voice claims that the 
half-month-old teacher is a "squatter", and that the national teacher pushed 
his brothers into this sinister pit, and when the black-haired girl swept the 
soldiers down the high wall, I heard a slap in the face of her. Add the last 
sentence, "Take her a thousand more times." - Xie Pui suddenly found out 
that what they were talking about seemed to be not a person at all. 


Second, the half-month country, actually was sold by the half-moon 
national division? ! 


Xie pity interrupted him: "General, you said the half-moon national 
division, is the black girl hanging on the pole of the sinner?" 


Engraved: "Isn't she still there?!" 


The black girl who hangs on the long pole like a corpse is actually the real 
half-moon national teacher! 


If so, then who is hanging around in the city of Half Moon and saying that 
they want to kill their white women's crown, and who ts the black girl who 
is with her? 


The black girl’s body is so different that she can sweep dozens of fierce 
and fierce half-moon soldiers down the high wall in an instant, why is it 
hanged on the sinner’s pit? 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 26: RTE RA 
SeAST3 


The more you listen to the more pitiful, the more you want to be more 
chaotic, said: "General, I want to ask..." 


Engraved but said: "Don't ask! You killed my soldiers and want to ask? I 
don't answer, come and fight!" 


Saburo said: "I killed it. He didn't do it. You can answer him and play with 
me." 


This is really justified. Engraved and angered: "You are all the helpers she 
has found, all the same!" 


Xie pity immediately said: "I haven't misunderstood what the general 1s. 
We originally wanted to get rid of the half-month national teacher to come 
to this Gobi. How could it be her helper?" 


When he heard that he was trying to eradicate the half-month of the 
national division, he was immersed in silence. After a while, he said: "If 
you are not sent by her, why are you killing these soldiers?" 


Thanks to the pity: "This is not because you have thrown us down, can we 
be self-protected?" 


Engraved: "Nonsense, I have no need to throw you. I just caught you. It is 
you who have to jump down!" 


Thanks for the pity: "Yes, it is, we have to jump into the pit. Generals, we 
are all trapped at the bottom of the pit, or temporarily unite the front. Why 
did the national division open the door to lead the army?" ” 


Wherever he grinds, he will listen to him and tell him the truth. "You two 
are too mean and beat me together." 


Thanks for helplessness: "I really only took a look at you. Nothing." 


He does not mind being said to be mean. If the situation 1s critical, don't 
say two hits, let him take a hundred encirclement, he has nothing to pull 
his face, who is one-on-one with you. However, Fang Lang, Sanlang 
Mingming is holding the individual to hold the upper hand, and also said 
that let Xie pity not to shoot, the result of engraving but as if to think that 
single-handedly can beat him, thank you 1s really depressed for him. 
However, look at the character of this moment, the words should be better, 
slowly, no problem. However, Saburo had no patience. He said leisurely: 
"For your soldiers, it is better to answer him." 


Engraved: "They have been killed by you, and it is useless to threaten me 
with them." 


Saburo said: "The body is still there." 


The engraving seems to be unstoppable, and he is alert: "What do you 
want?" 


Saburo said: "That is going to ask you, what do you want?" 


Listening to the sound, thank you can already imagine what he said when 
he said this: "Do you want them to be healthy in the future, or do they 
want to be a pool of plasma when they are born?" 


The engraving was first, then I understood: "You?!" 


Half moon people are extremely funeral ceremonies. They believe that 
when the deceased passed away, the bodies would look like what they 
would be like in the afterlife. For example, if you have one arm missing 
when you die, you will be born alone in the afterlife. If the corpse at the 
bottom of the pit was really crushed into a pool of plasma, wouldn’t it be 
better to have it in the afterlife? 


This moment ts a pure half-moon person, can not be afraid. Sure enough, 
he pondered a bit of teeth on the other side of the darkness, and he finally 
said helplessly: "You don't want to move their bodies! They are all heroic 


soldiers. They have been staying under the sinner for so many years. It is 
already very Unfortunately, you are destroyed today, I don’t know if it’s a 
relief. But they can no longer be insulted like this.” 


After a pause, he said again: "Are you really going to kill half a month?" 


Thank you for your kindness: "There is no bullying. The so-called 
knowing oneself and knowing each other, the victorious battles, the half- 
month of the national division's deeds are very little known, and there is 
no way to deal with it. But the generals who have worked with her should 
be able to give us directions. One or two." 


Perhaps it is because of the same enemy, or perhaps because of falling into 
the abyss that can't climb up. Sitting on the corpse of the soldiers, they are 
disheartened. The engraving seems to temporarily put away the hostility. 
"You don't know why she opened the door." Yongan people come in? 
Because she is going to retaliate against us. She hates half-moon country!" 


Thanks to pity: "What tells her to hate the half-moon country? Is the half- 
month national division not a half-moon person?" 


Engraved: "Yes. But not exactly. She is a mixed-race, and half of them are 
Yongan people!" 


It turned out that the half-month national teacher was born by a half-moon 
national woman and a Yongan man. In this border, the two nationals hated 
each other. This pair of interracial couples had a very difficult time. After 
a few years, the Central Plains man could no longer bear this kind of life, 
left the border and returned to the rich and peaceful Yongan. 


Although the two said that they were good, they were separated, but after a 
while, the woman of the half-moon country died of heart disease. They left 
a $1x-Seven-year-old daughter, no one to look after, and hunger grew up. 
The couple were blinded and the offspring born were also blinded. Half a 
month, the Chinese people are tall and tall, and both men and women are 
strong and lively. This girl is extremely heterogeneous among a group of 


half-month-old children because of her interracial mixed blood. Therefore, 
she 1s often bullied and her character is getting more and more gloomy. 
The children of the Chinese people are not playing with her for half a 
month, but some children of Yongan are still willing to care for her. 


In this small mixed-race teen, there was a storm in the border, and the two 
sides fought a battle. This dying of many people, then the little mixed 
blood will disappear. 


She had no relatives and friends in the country for half a month, and no 
one asked for a few years after she disappeared. However, when she 
appeared again, the situation was very different. 


In the past few years, she has been trekking through the Gobi and went to 
Yongan. I don't know what adventures she had there, and learned the 
magical spells that came back. Not only that, but also the poisons that the 
half-mooners are most afraid of - the irises. 


Seeing her coming back, beyond the sigh, there are still some people who 
are scared. Because the character of this girl has not changed, it is still so 
gloomy and lonely. Many people in the past have been bullying her for 
many and a half years. Now she has entered the palace to serve, and she 
has become a very high-ranking mage. If she wants to retaliate against 
them one day, isn’t it to find them? 


Thanks to the pity: "I am afraid that there will be many and a half months 
of people saying her bad things." 


Inscribed: "It’s just to say her bad words, go directly to the palace and 
speak to the country, saying that she is a messy zippoker sentiment to the 
evil of the half-moon country, and should be hanged. But they have not 
succeeded." 


Thanks for guessing: "Have she robbed these people first?" 


The engraving is even more resentful: "How do you, Yongan, be so sinister 
and sinister? No! I protected her." 


Thanks for the helplessness: "I said that I am not a Yongan person... well, 
forget it." 


At that time, the engraving was already a general. Once he took his 
soldiers to encircle the desert robbers and took the girl who was the court 
magi. 


The bandits were very good. They built nests under the sand. Both sides 
suffered death and injury during the First World War. They won the battle, 
but the battle caused the nest to fall under the sand. In addition, the storm 
was coming, it was not suitable for a long time, and some soldiers were 
withdrawn. However, some people, including the Master, did not have 
time to escape. 


Withdrew to a safe place, and after the wind and sand passed, he re- 
entered and retired. He wanted to dig up the soldiers for burial. Who 
knows where to get there, only to find that the mage has dug a small 
underground hole to kill the wounded soldiers. They are dragged in to 
avoid the wind. 


The bodies of the deceased were also dug out and placed neatly. These 
were all done by her hands. When they arrived, the mage was **** around, 
but still stood silently at the hole, waiting for them, like a little lone wolf. 


Engraved and said: "After that incident, I think she is very good, and she is 
very right in doing things. There is absolutely no harm to the half-moon 
country. I will make a guarantee and refute those unfriendly voices." 


In addition, when I was a child, I was insulted by my peers because of my 
weakness. Therefore, I was quite impressed with this girl. Naturally, she 
also paid a lot of attention to her. The more I noticed, the more I 
discovered that this Master has great skills, so I recommended it all the 
way. She was sent to the position of the national division, and as recorded 
by later generations - became the most loyal supporter of the half-month 
national division. 


Until another outbreak of the Great War, Yongan State sent troops to 
encircle the half-moon country. 


Engraved and said: "The two countries have been handed over to the army 
for a long time. She opened the altar and said that she is going to give us 
half a month of soldiers to protect the law." 


As aresult, the soldiers were murderous, morale increased, and they 
succumbed to the city gate. Flowing, boulder, rolling oil, sword, killing 
the sky. 


Who knows, this national teacher, in the moment of the most intense 
battle, suddenly opened the gate. 


The gates opened wide, and tens of thousands of enemy troops rushed into 
the city. The iron rides through, the whole city suddenly turns into a blood 
altar! 


The engraving of the enemy army was heard that the national teacher 
opened the gate, and the whole person was mad. He 1s brave enough, and 
he is finally unable to return to heaven. 


I grind my teeth and say: "I knew at that time that she had colluded with 
the generals of the enemy and agreed to let people come in at this time. 
But even if I was destined to die, I would kill this traitor before I die!! So I 
let a team of soldiers rush to the tower, dragged her down and hanged on 
the sinner's pit. It was hanging on the pole!" 


The army crossed the country and the whole country became a dead 
country for half a month. The soldiers and the national division who died 
and hanged, both sides can not leave this ruin, but still hate each other. 


Thanks to pity: "So, the generals who led you, led the half-moon army 
under your command, searched for the figure of the national teacher 
everywhere, and when she caught her, she once again hanged her on the 
sinner's pit?" 


Engraved: "It is not an exaggeration to hang her thousands of times! 
Because she 1s also arresting my fierce soldiers everywhere, pushing them 
into the sinner pit! She set a pole around this pit. A powerful array of 
methods, only she can solve it, and she will not climb again when she 


falls, and the soldiers who have been betrayed and killed by her, have a lot 
of grievances. Only the blood and meat of the eternal people can dispel 
their hearts. Hate, gradually ascend to heaven, otherwise it will only be a 
trombone, no liberation!" 


Thanks to the pity: "So you keep grabbing people and throwing them to 
feed them." 


Engraved: "What if I don't? Let me listen to them crying below?" 
"The people who voted are caught by you, or are you?" 


"We can't leave the country for too long, but fortunately, her snake loves to 
be a demon. She often climbs out of the ancient city and bites people 
everywhere. Those bitten caravans will enter the city to find the good 
moon grass." 


"Is the buried ground in the palace, are you buried?" 


"Not bad. The man buried in the soil wants to steal the treasure of the 
palace. But all the treasures of our country were looted by the Yongan 
people two hundred years ago." 


Thanks: "Why are you just burying him instead of throwing him away?" 


Engraved: "There must be fertilizer to raise grass, or else we can't control 
those weirs? We don't want to encounter that kind of thing." 


Thank you, no, right. 


Since the engraving party will consciously plant the good moon grass, and 
even use the living people to make fertilizer, it is obvious that even if they 
are no longer human, the fear of the snaketail is not weakened. 


So, before they were born, this fear must be even worse. After the half- 
month of the national division mastered the big killer of the iris, how 
could it be so simple that a group of soldiers dragged down the tower to 
hang? 


According to the inscription, in the past two hundred years, they have 
seized the national division again and again, and the national division was 
hanged again and again by them. Anyway, thank you for feeling that if he 
is, he has mastered such a killer in his hand, and will never let the enemy 
have a chance to get close to himself. 


There is also a snake that climbs out of the ancient city to bite people. Is it 
an accident? Unlike, it is more like deliberately fascinating. That is what 
the national teacher deliberately did? Doesn't that mean that it is a 
convenient way to feed the soldiers to the soldiers? Isn’t the contradiction 
between the two sides hostile? 


Is that they pretending to be hostile? What is the significance of 
pretending to be hostile? 


Before this chaos, there was another puzzle - the white female crown and 
the identity of her companion. Xie pity decided to ask a few more words: 
"General, when we entered the city, we saw two black and white women's 
crowns on the street. Do you know who these two are?" 


Still not answering, Saburo whispered: "Hey." 


Although I don't know what happened, thank you for accepting the voice 
immediately. A strange instinct that made him look up. 


It was still the black and blue night sky of the square, or the half-moon of 
the cold. 


However, half a month later, he saw a person far away, and a small black 
figure explored and was looking down. 


Looking for a moment, the man half-body suddenly became the whole 
body - jumped down. 


In the process of falling down, thank you for seeing the score, this person, 
is the half-moon national teacher who was hanged on the long pole before! 
2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 27: ERE RA 
SEAS 


After the national teacher jumped down, he used half a month to say: 
"What is going on?" 


As soon as she spoke, the gap between her voice and her imagination was 
quite large. It really sounds cold, but it 1s small, as if a depressed child is 
talking to himself, not a cold and powerful voice. If it is not good, it may 
not be clear at all. 


Engraved: "What happened? They are all dead!" 
Guo Shidao: "How can it all die?" 


Engraved: "It's not because you pushed them all down, shut in this **** 
place!" 


Guo Shidao: "Who is here? There is still one person." 


In fact, at this time, in addition to engraving, there should be two "people" 
in the bottom of the pit. However, Saburo did not breathe and heartbeat. In 
the past half of the month, the national division could not capture the 
traces of his existence. I can't remember who ran off who fell, so she 
thought she would only pity one. 


Engraved: "They killed their soldiers, are you happy now? Finally all 
died!" 


The Guoshi was silent for a while, half a sigh, and a fire suddenly ignited 
in the darkness, reflecting a black girl with a small flame in her palm. 


This girl seems to be only 17 or 18 years old, a simple black robes, and her 
eyes are dark, not not beautiful, just a very unhappy look, with forehead 
and mouth corners with indigo, Look at the score under the fire. 


If it is not confirmed in advance, no one can think of it. The half-month 
national teacher is actually such a pale girl. 


The flame also illuminates her surroundings. At her feet, they were all the 
bodies of half-moon soldiers wearing armor. 


Thanks for the pity, I couldn’t help but look aside. 


Because the flames that the national teacher held up were very small, and 
did not illuminate the whole picture of the sinner's bottom, they were still 
hidden in the darkness, but by the far fire, he could see a red figure beside 
him. 


I don't know if it is an illusion. Saburo was already taller than him, but 
now he seems to be a little higher. The praying eyes slowly moved up, 
came to the throat of the boy, paused, and then continued up, staying on 
the shape of the jaw. 


The first half of the boy's face is still hidden in the darkness, and the lower 
half of the face seems to be subtly different from before. Although it is 
beautiful, the outline of the lines seems to be more clear. Perhaps he 
noticed his gaze, this face was slightly on one side, turned over, and the 
corner of his lips was shallow. 


Maybe I want to see too much, I want to get too close, and unconsciously, 
thank you and walked closer to him. 


At this time, I only listened to the distance and screamed, and I wanted to 
see this horrible situation with my own eyes. Xie pity suddenly woke up, 
looked back, saw the grind and hugged his head, and the national teacher 
listened to him yelling, but no joy or no sorrow, just nodded: "Good." 

The grind is grief and furious: "What is good? What do you mean?!" 
Guoshi said: "The good thing is that we are finally free." 

She turned to the pity in the darkness and said, "Are you killing?" 


Thanks, "This is an accident." 


Engraved: "What do you say in your eyes?!" 
Thanks to the scalp: "Life is full of accidents!" 


The national teacher looked at him and couldn’t see his demeanor. He 
asked, "Who are you?" 


This sentence is actually a very standard Chinese language, and it is also a 
questionable tone. Thanks to pity: "I am a priest in heaven, this is... my 
friend." 


I can't understand it, but I can hear that they are not quarreling, and they 
are alert: "What are you talking about?" 


The eyes of the national teacher slowly swept over the pity, stayed in 
Saburo for a moment, and then put away, said: "There has never been a 
sergeant here. I thought you have long been here." 


Xie Pui originally thought that he would fight with the half-month teacher. 
Who knows that she was not fighting, and was slightly surprised. She 
asked again: "Can't you go out?" 


Thanks for the pity: "Of course I want to go out. But there are a lot of 
things around here, I can't go out." 


The teacher of the country listened. He walked to the high wall of the 
sinner's pit. He reached out and took a palm on the wall. He turned his 
head and said: "I have solved the battle, you can go." 


This is too good to talk! 
Thank you for not knowing what to say. At this time, there was a voice 
coming from above, far away: "Hey! Is there anyone below? No one is 


leaving!" 


It is a sound of swaying. 


Xie Li seems to hear San Lang screaming beside him. He immediately 
looked up and saw a figure in black looking down. He shouted: "Swing! 
Someone below! I am below!" 


After shouting, he also waved his hand and shook it on the road: "How ts it 
really below? What else is there beside you?" 


Thanks to the pity: "This... I have a lot of things besides me, or else you 
should check it out." 


The swaying seems to feel that he is not as good as he can see, so he 
slammed a large fireball and threw it down. 


At the time of the sin, the whole sinner’s bottom was illuminated by the 
fire, and Xie Li finally saw it. What kind of place did he stand? 


Surrounded by him in all directions, it was the **** sea of the peaks. The 
bodies of the soldiers of countless half-months were stacked, black faces 
and arms, bright armor, and purple blood. The place where the praying 1s 
under the foot is the only open space at the bottom of the sinner without a 
body. 


These are all done in the dark after a jump in Saburo. 
Thanks again, I went back and looked at the boy next to me. 


In the darkness, he vaguely saw that Saburo seemed to be suddenly higher, 
and some subtleties were subtly different. However, at the moment, under 
the bright fire, the one who stood next to him was the original handsome 
boy. Seeing him, he smiled. 


Cheering down and looking at his wrists and boots, it was the same as 
before, and there was nothing smacked with something that would make a 
whisper. 


At this time, I only heard a muffled sound and jumped and jumped. 
Thanks to the pity: "Are you not looking after the caravan?" 


Just swaying down, I am still not used to the **** atmosphere at the 
bottom of the pit. I frown and fan the air with my hand. I whispered: "I 
won’t see you when I waited for three hours. I thought it was an accident. I 
drew a circle to let them Waiting elsewhere, come and see." 


Thanks to pity: "It’s not long before you can draw a circle. If you go so far, 
they will inevitably be left behind. How is it good to run around?" 


Fudao said: "People want to find death, eight horses can't hold it, don't do 
it. What's going on with these two? Who and who?" 


He was very vigilant against the other two people at the bottom of the pit, 
but soon found that the knives were beaten and wounded, and it was 
difficult to move on the ground. In the half-month, the national teacher 
pulled his head and screamed, revealing the color of the accident. . Thanks 
to pity: "This is the general of the half-moon country. This is the national 
division of the half-moon country. Now they are..." 


The voice did not fall, and the carving suddenly jumped up. After he had 
been stunned for so long, he finally saved his strength and shouted. He 
stood up and slammed his hand to the half-moon national division. A big 
man in the shape of a big man plays a little girl. Such a scene can never 
happen before the pity in the past. However, there is a very good reason to 
hate the national teacher. The national teacher can hide and hide without 
hiding. He is like a rotten doll and he falls and falls. Engraved and 
angered: "What about your Iris? Come, let them kill me! Fast, give me a 
relief!" 


The national teacher was bored and said: "I will not listen to my words." 
Carved and said: "Why don't you kill you!" 

"..."Guoshi whispered, "I'm sorry." 

Engraved: "Do you really hate us?" 


Guo Shi shook his head. Engraving is even more angry, said: "You really 
want to mad at me! You don't hate us, why sell us?! You shameful 


undercover, traitor|fine, eat something outside!!" 


I saw that they were fighting more and more, and they were beaten 
unilaterally. They frowned: "Hey, what are they talking about? Do you 
want to go up and stop?" 


Thanks for the pity, I can’t stand it anymore. I grabbed it and said: 
“General! General! I see, it’s better to tell who the Yong’an thief 1s, we...” 
Suddenly, the national teacher grabbed him. Wrist. 


This arrested abrupt, caught tight. Xie pity first sinks in the bottom of my 
heart, thinking that she wants to take the opportunity to make a fuss. I 
didn’t expect to bow again. The country’s teacher was on the ground, with 
a little bit of purple on his lips and looking up at him. She clearly did not 
speak, but the two black eyes burst into a nearly hot life. 


This look coincides with a very small figure in his memory. Thanks to 
pity: "Is it you?" 


Guo Shi also said: "Flower General?" 


This time, everyone at the bottom of the pit was stunned. Take a step 
forward and grab it. You will stun the past and say: "Do you know?" 


Xie pity is an innocent answer. He knelt down, grabbed the shoulder of the 
national teacher, and carefully looked at her face. 


It was not really true that it was separated from the distance, and the 
appearance of this girl changed after 1t grew up. After another two hundred 
years, the reasons were so that he did not recognize it in the first place. 
But look at it now, this face, clearly or in memory! 


Thanks for a while, I couldn’t speak for a while, and I said, "Half month?" 


The Chinese teacher suddenly grabbed his sleeve and actually got a little 
excited. He said, "It's me! The flower general, do you remember me?" 


Thanks, "I certainly remember you. But..." 


He stared at the girl for a moment and sighed: "...but how do you make 
yourself like this?" 


Listening to him, the national teacher suddenly overflowed a few lines of 
pain in his eyes. 


She whispered: "I'm sorry for the school... I messed up." 


This is a general and a school, and where can the others not hear? Shake a 
little and sigh: "School? General? You? How could this be?? What is the 
general?" 


Thanks for your nod and said, "My sister." 


He yelled: "Don't you say that you came here two hundred years ago to get 
ruined?" 


Thanks for the pity: "This... it’s hard to say. I originally did this." 


It is said that two hundred years ago, for some reason, thanking the pity in 
the East can not continue, and decided to avoid the limelight, intending to 
cross the Qinling, to the south to find a broken new world. So he took the 
compass and went south. 


When he walked this way, he was depressed all the way. How did he feel 
that the scenery on the road was not right? It is clear that there should be 
trees and dense people, how can it become more and more desolate? 


Doubt was doubtful, he still kept on walking until he walked, came to the 
Gobi, was blown by the wind, and ate the sand full of mouth, he found that 
the compass he took was long gone. 


The direction pointed to him on this road is wrong! 


There is no way to point the wrong direction. In the spirit of "coming here, 
visiting the scenery of the desert", Xie Pity still went on, but temporarily 
changed the destination to the northwest and finally came to the border. 
And temporarily stay near the half-moon country. 


Thanks to pity: "In the beginning, I did only collect waste products in the 
vicinity. But the border movements | frequent chaos, often deserters, the 
army will chaos people." 


Saburo said: "Are you forced to get in?" 


Thanks for the pity: "It’s caught. But whatever it 1s doing is almost the 
same. If you are a soldier, you will be a soldier. Later, he drove a few 
robbers. I didn’t know how to do it. I gave my face and called me a 
general. ” 


Shake and doubt: "But how does she call you a general? You don't have a 
flower." 


Xie pity waved his hand and said: "Don't care about that, I took a 
pseudonym at the same time, it seems to be called Hua Xie." 


Hearing this name, Saburo's look is fretting, and if the lips are like a hook. 
Xie Pity did not pay attention and continued: "The border crossings have 
many wars and many orphans. When I am free, I occasionally play with 
them. One of them... the name is called half a month." 


When there is a robber, thank you must be the most brave soldier, no one 
dares to stop in front of him, not even dare to stand next to him. But when 
there is no, it seems that anyone can call him. 


One day, he found a piece of sand wall to make a fire, used his helmet to 
cook rice, boiled and boiled the smell, and gasped several soldiers to kick 
and flip the stuff he cooked. Thanks for the painfulness to go to his 
helmet, but when he turned back, he saw a unkempt child kneeling behind 
him, ignoring the hot stuff and smashing things on the ground, and stunned 
him: "Don't wait, wait, children. you!" 


Sure enough, the child screamed and ate a few squats on the ground, 
violently vomiting, wow, crying, scared and thanked her for a while, so I 
finally vacated the things I ate. . When he finished, he smacked on the 
ground and sweated: "You are fine. Children... Sorry, but you should never 


tell your parents about this thing. Don’t mess with the things on the 
ground next time... wait for you again. What are you doing!" 


The child was actually tearful and went to squat, and actually wanted to 
eat. Thanks to her, she found out that the child’s belly was really fast 
before the back. 


People are hungry to this point and can eat anything. Disgusting to cry will 
also eat. 


Thanks for the pity, I went back and took her last dry food to her. Later, I 
often saw the child peek at him in the dark nearby. 


In the impression, the child named half a month always has such a very 
unhappy look, and his body and face are always with indigo. When he 
looks at him, he just grabs his clothes and moves from bottom to top. Baba 
hopes. Because of the exclusion of children in the half-month, except for 
the pity, only one Yongan teenager living in the border occasionally 
rationalized her, so she followed the two men all day long. 


She rarely speaks, but speaks Chinese, so she still has no idea where she is. 
Anyway, I saw that the children who were not in charge were walking 
wildly, and he also took it with me. Empty to teach her to sing and sing, 
wrestling, and occasionally performing a broken chest or something, the 
feelings are not bad. 


Thanks to the pity: "I thought that the word "half-month" of the ‘half- 
month national division’ refers to the country, but did not expect that the 
name of the national teacher is called half a month.” 


Fudao said: "What later?" 
Thanks to the pity: "Later...just like the stone on the general." 
Silence for a moment, Saburo said: "The stone said that you are dead." 


When I mentioned the stone tablet, I felt very depressed. 


Isn’t the general inscription should be a singer and a singer? Once again, 
there is nothing to be said about this kind of writing. How can you write 
down the law of death that is so shameful? ? ? 


When he was sheltered from the wind, he couldn't look directly at it. If it 
wasn't for Saburo to read the half-moon text, he would also watch it. He 
pretended that there was no such thing as how to die on the tablet. 
Business Trading, I feel that I can scream, but also I can hang it. When 
people went to his memorial shackles to avoid the wind and saw his deeds 
on the stone tablets, they also had to comment on the whole story. Haha 
laughed a little. He was too embarrassed to ask everyone not to laugh. It 
was really a bit depressed. Xie pity felt that his eyebrows were reddened 
by him, saying: "Oh, that, of course, it is not dead. I pretend to die." 


It’s incredible to shake your face. Thanks for the pity: "If you are stepped 
on too much, you can't climb up. You can't kill it." 


In fact, the specific thank you for how to "death" is not clear. Even the 
reason why the soldiers of the two countries played the game is not clear. I 
only know that it is a very boring little thing. He really does not want to. 
hit. However, at that time, he was already indefatigable, no one listened to 
him. The two sides are killing their eyes, and Xie pity rushes out. They are 
the people on both sides. I don’t know what happened. The knife and the 
sword greeted him violently. Fuyang asked: "It must be that you always 
insert in the middle of the eye to pull the hatred on both sides? Or else 
how others will see you cut? And you know that you hate big, so why not 
avoid it Why do you have to drive in so many people? If you want to avoid 
you, you can definitely avoid it." 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 28: ERE RA 
BA STIS 


Thanks to the pity: "I really don't remember!" 


Although he is not a hundred, he can't stand such a slashing method. He 
thought on the spot: "This way it won't work!" When the machine was 
upright, it was slammed on the ground and was pretending to be dead. As a 
result, it was also a good step to be killed. I fainted in the past. When I 
woke up, I was awakened by the water, because after I finished the battle, I 
cleaned up the battlefield and the bodies were thrown into the river. 
Thanks to the river, it was washed back like Yongan. Since then, I have 
been raised for three or four years, and I have re-started without a bad 
compass. I finally arrived at the original destination in the south, and I did 
not pay much attention to the affairs of the half-moon country. 


Half a month and whispered: "I'm sorry." 
Frowning and frowning: "Why did she always say sorry to you?" 


Saburo suddenly said: "The engraving said that the half-month national 
division went to the Central Plains after a violent storm. Is this violence? 
Is it related to you?" 


After he reminded him, he recalled the contents of the stone tablet. Thanks 
to this, he vaguely remembered something, saying: "Oh, it seems..." 


Half Moon Road: "It is to save me." 


Everyone looked at her, she whispered: "The flower general was to be 
flattened to save me." 


Thanks for the moment, I remembered the feeling that thousands of people 
stepped on the hundred people. I couldn’t help but hug my arm. I saw the 


other two people staring at him with unpredictable feelings. They stopped 
and said, "There is no flat, really no. flat!" 


I don’t know where it’s unsatisfactory. Yin and Yang are strangely saying: 
“Oh, really deny yourself.” 


Xie pity waved: "I don't dare to be. It seems that I just wanted to take the 
child away and then run away. Who knows that it is too late to withdraw, 
and when I turn back, I hit both sides and fight..." 


He yelled: "In this case, how can you remember this kind of thing?" 


Thanks to the pity: "You don't look at me for a few hundred years. There 
are many things that can happen in a year. The whole person can change in 
ten years. What's more, for so many years? It's impossible to remember 
everything clearly." And a lot of things are still better to forget. Instead of 
remembering that hundreds of knives were cut hundreds of times hundreds 
of years ago, it is better to remember that you had a good meat bag 
yesterday. 


Half Moon Road: "I'm sorry." 


Thanks a little sigh, said: "Half a month, saving you is my own choice, you 
are right. To say sorry, perhaps you should say to others." 


Half a month stunned and bowed. 


Thanks again and again: "But... Maybe my impression of you is still two 
hundred years ago. I always feel that you are not a child who will be 
revengeful and betrayed... Are you willing to tell me what is going on? 
Why are you opening the gate?" 


After thinking about it for half a month, I shook my head and continued to 
silence. 


Thanks to pity: "Why, why do you put the snake out to bite?" 


This time, half a month said: "The snake is not for me." 


Thanks for your pity, said: "What?" 


Half Moon Road: "The snake is not for me, it is not running by myself. I 
don't know what is going on, they don't listen to me." 


Hearing his words, he shook his face and became impatient. Half Moon 
Road: "Flower General, I have not lied." 


Xie Pity hasn’t talked yet, and I’m so eager to say: ““Who’s been arrested is 
not the case. Even if you say it’s not intentional, it’s useless. I’m listening 
to it. Those who pass the test are indeed you. The snake bites, reach out 
and take it away." 


Half a month closed his mouth, and really stretched out his hands, and 
immediately shook a bundle of celestial cords from the sleeves, tied her 
and engraved, saying: "Okay, the purpose of this trip is reached, things can 
be over!" 


At this time, San Lang said: "She doesn't have to lie." 


Xie pity also felt that 1t was necessary to ask again. He said to the half 
moon: "Are you completely unable to call the pigtails now?" 


Half Moon Road: "I can call, they listen to me most of the time, but 
sometimes they don't listen. I don't know why." 


Thanks to pity: "You call the snake out and show us." 


Half a month before he came to him, and finally got up and nodded. In a 
short time, a purple-red python came out from under a corpse, raised the 
upper body, and placed it on the corpse, silently spitting a letter to 
everyone. Xie Pity is going to take a closer look at the snake, but seeing 
half a month, his eyes widened and his look was different. When I saw it, I 
thanked my heart and sank my heart. "I don't think." 


Sure enough, the rattlesnake spit out the letter, and suddenly the mouth 
opened wide and slammed into it, hitting him! 


Although the attack of the snake was sudden, but the pity had long been 
prepared, and the score was clear, he was about to grab it. If he knew that 


his hand had not touched it, he would listen to the sound of" _", like 
something blasted. Looking at it again, the snake has fallen softly on the 
ground, bursting the flowers, and it is extremely fluent, without any 
venom splashing out. 


Xie Li immediately remembered that there was also a pigtail that died 
before entering the half-moon country. Who did it, it goes without saying. 
He hadn't looked up to look at Saburo, and he saw a pair of red-sleeved 
arrow Sleeves stretched over and stopped in front of him, separating him 
from the half moon. And there is a cold voice over there: "Sure enough, 
she is lying to you. Do you think this snake can bite him in this situation? 
Stupid." 


When I saw the snake in half a month, it was a bad face. I heard the words 
* and looked up. "I didn't. I said that some snakes don't listen to me, 
just that one." 


I don’t believe it at all, saying: "Who knows if you don’t listen to you or 
listen to you?" 


Half a month Shen Sheng said: "It is not called by me at all." 


Thanks to pity, I was going to talk, but I saw two claret-tailed pythons 
drilled out of the corpse, and they vomited them to the letter. Immediately, 
Articles 3, 4, and 5... Among the corpses, from all corners, they have 
swam out countless endangered snakes! 


Everyone looked at the half moon that was lying on the corpse, and shook 
his hands to run a white light. He rushed half a month and said: "Let them 
fall back, it is impossible to not listen to you." 


Half a month, the brows are close, seemingly trying to drive away. 
However, there are still more and more snakes appearing, and they are 
entangled and approached. Even if one or two snakes don't kill them, 
hundreds or thousands of them will be difficult to say. Even if they don't 
die, they will probably be difficult to see. Xie pity and his hands were 


about to mobilize Ruo, but they saw that the snakes stopped when they 
were a few feet away from them. They hesitated and formed a weird 
encirclement. 


Thanks for the enlightenment, looked up and looked at Sanlang next to 
him. He was looking at the pigtails with his condescending eyes, and his 
eyes were full of contempt. The appendix snakes seemed to understand his 
gaze, did not dare to approach, and then stepped back a little, and slid 
down his head, and put the sly snake on the ground, a state of surrender. 


However, it seems as if there is any force driving them, and they are not 
allowed to give up the attack and leave directly, so many pigtails turn 
around and swarm. With a wave of swaying, the flame spurted out of his 
sleeve and burned a circle, forcing a retreat. 


But this can't last long. Thanks to pity: "Let's go up first, leave here and 
Say." 


I heard the sound, if the evil slammed, I pulled out. It didn't take long for 
it to slip back. Thanks for the slightest sorrow, facing the white shackles 
that entangled his wrist: "What are you doing back? The array has opened 
up and nothing has stopped you, go go quickly." 


If the evil is wrapped around his wrist, it seems to be horrible on the wrist. 
He regrets that he still has to lick it again. At this time, something fell, and 
he slammed his shoulder. With a swaying hand, this catching look 
changed, and the hand was lifted to the front to see it - the one that 
descended from the sky was actually a pigtail! 


I was unprepared for a while, and after being bitten, I threw the snake to 
the half moon door. Half a month, his hands were tied, and he still raised 
his hand and grabbed it. He grabbed it, and the purple-red snake was 
wrapped around her pale wrist and did not attack. At this time, it was a 
"squeaky" sound, and the second rattlesnake landed on the ground! 


Xie pity probably guessed why Ruoxu refused to go up. As soon as he 
looked up, and then a little moonlight, he barely saw such a scene. 
Hundreds of purple dots are falling from the top of the sinner's pit. 


Snake rain! 


Seeing that the purple-red dots are getting closer and closer, thank you for 
your help: "Shake! Fire! Hit a fire screen and solve them in midair!" 


Shake the palm of his hand, wave his hand, and a blood ball flies upwards, 

turning into a flame barrier that burns and rushes upwards. The fire barrier 
rose to dozens of feet and hanged in the air, and the snakes that met it were 
instantly burned to ashes, intercepting the falling snake rain. 


Seeing temporary escape, Xie pity sighed and said: "Good! Shake it, it is 
thanks to you." 


These spells will inevitably consume a lot of mana. After playing out, the 
face will be a bit blue, turn around and put a circle of fire on the ground, 
burning off the snake below, and said to the half moon: "You still say they 
are not Listen to your words? If it is not your control, how can these 
snakes not attack you?" 


Saburo smiled and said: "Maybe just because you are not lucky? It has not 
attacked us." 


He turned his head and turned his eyes over them. The hunch in the heart 
is terrible, but because there is a bit of a clue in the heart, it is too late to 
sort out, do not want to see them fight first, said: "First figure out what the 
snakes are going to do, rush out." 


Shake and sneer: "What is going on? It’s not this half-month that the 
national teacher is lying, that is, the one around you is playing a ghost!" 


Thanks for a long time, and looked at Saburo again, said: "I don't think 
they are." 


Although his tone is mild, he is very determined. This is the conclusion 
after his thinking, but it must be felt that he intends to cover up. The fire 
was so bright that his face was not good, and I didn’t know if it was anger 
or laugh. He said: "His Royal Highness, you don't know how to be 
confused. Do you still remember your identity? What is the thing next to 


you? I think you should know it well, I don't believe you till now. Still not 
aware of it!" 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 31: Poke the 
ghost king prince for truth 2 


Only the condensation of the air at this moment, thank you for knowing. 
This sentence may not be asked. 


Although these two days come together, the two get along very well, but it 
does not mean that they are close enough to make such a request. Waiting 
for him to answer, thank you and smiled and said: "I just said anything, 
don't be too relieved." 


Huacheng closed her eyes and smiled. "I will give you a chance to see it 
later." 


If someone else comes to such a sentence, it 1s naturally perfunctory, "have 
a chance in the future" is equal to "don't think about forgetting." But it is 
said by Huacheng. Thanks to pity, he said that he said that in the future, he 
will do it in the future. Instead, he will have a bit of interest. He said: 
"Okay. Then when you feel that you can, give me another. Look. Let's rest 
now." 


Tossing into the middle of the night, he had long forgotten the idea of 
cooking, and lay down on the mat. Huacheng also lie down. No one has 
gone to entanglement. Why, after each of them has clarified their identity, 
a priest and a ghost can still lie on the same broken mat, snoring and 
chatting. 


There was no pillow on the mat, and Huacheng pillowed his arm. Xie Pity 
also learned that he was resting on his arm. He said casually: "You seem to 
be very leisurely in the ghost world, don't you report it?" 


Huacheng not only puts his arms on his arms, but also supports his legs. 
He said: "What is the report? I am the biggest. And they are all in power, 
and no one can control who." 


The original ghost world is a group of chaotic unorganized ghosts. Thanks 
to pity: "It turns out that I am also as united as you are in heaven. If you 
say so, have you seen other ghost kings?" 


Huacheng Road: "I have seen it." 
Thanks to the pity: "Is the green ghost seen?" 
Huacheng Road: "Do you mean the low-grade waste?" 


Thanks for thinking: "How does this get me? Is it? Isn't it?" Fortunately, he 
does not need to pick it up. Huacheng said: "Have a greeting, he ran." 


Thanks to the instinct, this "greeting" must not be a normal greeting. Sure 
enough, Huacheng leisurely said: "By the way, I got a number of 'blood 


an 


rain and flowers'. 


It turned out that he said before, he took the other ghost's nest and said that 
it was a green ghost. And this "greeting" is the meaning of blood washing. 
Thanks for your pity, this greeting is really extraordinary, touch the chin, 
and said: "Is there a gap between the green ghost and you?" 


Huacheng Road: "Yes." 

"What is the gap?" 

"Look at him." 

Thank you for your pity and tears. Do you think that you are singled out 
the thirty-three priests because you are obsessed with them? Dao: "There 


is a priest in the heavenly court who says that he has a low grade. He also 
said that even the ghost world dislikes him. Is it true?" 


Huacheng Road: "Really. Blackwater also dislikes him." 


Thanks to the pity: "Who is Blackwater?" Then he reacted. "Is it the 
blackwater sinking boat?" 


Huacheng Road: "Not bad. It is also called Blackwater." 


Thanks for your pity, this black-water mysterious ghost is also a "must", 
and the green ghost is just a close-knit. He asked with interest: "Are you 
familiar with this mysterious ghost?" 


Huacheng is lazy and authentic: "I am not familiar with it. I have not been 
familiar with ghosts." 


Thanks to pity is a bit strange, said: "Is this the case? I thought that your 
subordinates should be a lot. That may be a bit of a disagreement about 
our understanding of 'cooked'." 


Huacheng raised his eyebrows: "Not bad. In the ghost world, it is not 
‘unrequited’ and is not qualified to talk to me.” 


This is a very arrogant word, and he is right and reasonable. Thanks for the 
slightest smile, said: "You are very good in the ghost world, and the 
general is just a few big ones. Unlike the heavens, the gods in the heavens 
can't remember which ones, and the heavenly heavens are just like the 


ocean. 


Huacheng Road: "What is easy to remember? Don't remember, waste your 
brain." 


Thanks to pity: "Haha, if you can't remember the names of people, you are 
very sinful." You know, the officials are very good. Huacheng said: "After 
doing something, you can be offended. It can be seen as a waste of narrow 
mind." 


After chatting for a while, I was afraid that the topic would be more 
sensitive. I wouldn’t talk about the difference between the two worlds. I 
looked at the closed wooden door and said, "The child is half a month, 
don’t know when to come back?" 


When I thought of the screaming "I want to save the people", there were 
many chaotic pictures in his mind, and he was forced to press down. At 
this time, I heard Huacheng said: "That is a good sentence." 


Thanks: "What?" 


Huacheng is a long way: "I want to save the people." 


Thanks for being beaten. 


He turned over and smashed into a shrimp, and covered his face with both 
hands. He just wanted to put more hands and ears on his face. He said: 
".,.Sanlang." 


Huacheng seems to be closer, and he is very authentic behind him: "Well? 
Is there any problem with this sentence?" 


He has been asking, thanking him for being merciful, and turning it back, 
he said helplessly: "Stupid." 


Huacheng said: "What are you afraid of? If you want to save the people, or 
to kill the people, I will admire them. The former is much more difficult 
than the latter. I am certainly more admired." 


Thanks for the pity, he shook his head and flattened his body. He said: 
"Dare to dare to do it, but you can do it." 


He covered his eyes with one hand and said: "Oh. Well, there is nothing. 
It’s already half a month. When I was younger, I said more stupid things." 


Huacheng smiled and said: "Oh? What kind of words, let's listen." 


After a moment of sighing, thanking and praying, he smiled and said: 
"Many years ago, there was a man who told me that he could not survive. 
Ask me what he 1s living for, what is the meaning of living. ” 


He glanced at the flower city and said, "Do you know how I answered it?" 


I don't know if it is an illusion. In the eyes of Huacheng, there seems to be 
a shimmer of light. He whispered: "How do you answer?" 


Thanks to the pity: "I said to him: ‘If you don’t know how to live, just live 
for me.’ 


"If you don't know what it means to live, then please treat me as the 
meaning of your life and use me as a pillar to support you." 


"Ha ha ha..." 


Thanks for thinking, suddenly I couldn’t help but shook my head and said, 
“T haven’t figured it out now. What did I think at the time? Why would you 
have the courage to say what it means to be someone else’s life?” 


Huacheng did not speak. Xie pity continued: "It’s only when I was young, I 
could say this. At that time, I really thought I could do anything, I was 
fearless. Now let me say this, I will never say no. Exported." 


He slowly said: "I don't know what happened to that person. It is already a 
very heavy thing to be the meaning of someone's existence. What is the 
saving of life?" 


In the view of Bodhisattva, it has been quiet for a long time. 


For a long while, the flower city is faintly authentic: "It doesn't matter 
how to save the life of the people. So young, dare to say this, although 
brave, it is stupid." 


Thank you, "Yes." 


However, Huacheng said another sentence: "Although stupid, but very 
brave." 


Thank you, Charles, and said, "Thank you very much." 
Huacheng Road: "You're welcome." 


The two men each stared at the small broken roof of the Bodhisattva view, 
and the flower city said again: "However, the Highness of the Prince, we 


only met for a few days, you said so much to me, no problem?" 


Thanks for the" ", said: "What's the problem. Anyway. Even if you have 
met people for decades, you have to become a stranger in the same 
direction. If you want to say it, you can talk about it. If you want to join, 
you will not be able to vote. In the end, the world is full of banquets, 
everyone just click." 


Huacheng seemed to smile softly. Suddenly, he said: "If you can." 
Thanks for turning his head, said: "What if?" 


Huacheng didn't look at him. He looked at the ruined small roof of the 
Bodhisattva. He thanked only the left half of the boy's beautiful face. 


He whispered: "I don't look good." 
Thank you, "Ah?" 


Huacheng turned his head slightly and said: "If I didn't look good, would 
you like to see it?" 


Thank you for your pity, said: "Is it? Although there is no reason, I always 
feel that your original appearance will not be too ugly." 


Huacheng is half-truth and authentic: "That's not necessarily. In case I 
have a blue face and a slap in the face, the ugliness is like a nightshade. 
What are you waiting for?" 


Listening to him, Xie Pity originally felt a bit interesting: the original 
demon king who is the hegemon of the ghosts and the gods of the gods, 
will also care about his own face. But when you think about it, he doesn't 
feel interesting. 


He vaguely remembered that in the various legends of Huacheng, there 
were rumors such as "small child is a deformed child." If this is the case, 
he must be discriminated against when he is a human being, and may even 


start from an early age. Perhaps for this reason, it is particularly sensitive 
to his own. 


So, thanking the pity for a word, said: "This 1s..." 


In the most gentle tone, he sincerely said: "Actually, I want to see your 
original appearance, just because, you see, we are all like this..." 


Huacheng Road: "Well? What is this?" 


Thanks to pity: "...we are now making friends, then, since it is a friend, of 
course, you must be honest. So, I said that I want to see your true face, 
which is better than yours. Look good, what's the relationship? You ask me 
what to do, of course, it's not very good. You can rest assured that as long 
as it is your true look, I must... What do you laugh, what I said is true." 


Speaking of the last few sentences, thank you for feeling that the body of 
the teenager around him seemed to tremble slightly. Originally, he also 
stunned, thinking: "I really said that it is so good, I am moved to this 
way?" But I am also embarrassed to turn around to see what is going on, 
who knows, after a while, from the side There was a very low laugh, which 
was leaking out. Thanks for the pity, I felt very depressed. I put my hand 
on his shoulder and pushed it: "Sanlang... What do you do to laugh like 
this? Where is it wrong?" 


Huacheng stopped the trembling moment and turned around and said, "No, 
you said it makes sense." 


Xie pity only feels more depressed, said: "Hello, you are not sincere..." 
Huacheng said: "I swear, you can't find a more sincere heart than me." 


Xie Pity didn't want to talk about it, turned over and turned his back to 
Huacheng: "Forget it, sleep. Sleep well, don't talk." 


Huacheng also chuckled for a while and said: "Next time." 


Although I have decided to go to sleep, but Huacheng opened her mouth, 
thanking her, she couldn’t help but pick up the words: "What next time?" 


Huacheng whispered: "When I see you again next time, I will see you with 
my original appearance." 


There are quite a few things to ponder in this sentence. Thanks to the 
question, I should have asked again, but after a night, I couldn’t stop the 
sleepy situation. He couldn’t hold it anymore, so he fell asleep. 


The next morning, Xie pity woke up and got up, and the side was empty. 


Xie pity stumbled and climbed up, and walked in a circle in the 
Bodhisattva. Open the door, and no one was seen outside the door. It seems 
to be true, the boy has left. 


However, the fallen leaves have been swept into a pile, standing next to a 
small clay pot. Thanks for the pity to get the pots in and put them on the 
table. At this time, he suddenly found that there seemed to be something 
more in the empty chest. 


Thanks for raising his hand, he found that under the curse, there was an 
extra thin chain that was loose. 


Thanks for a moment, I took it off my neck. It turned out to be a silver 
chain. Because it was thin and light, he didn't realize that he had more 
things on his body. Under the silver chain, a crystal-clear ring is hung. 2k 
novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 32: Prince of 
the Gods Temple sees the Prince 


Thank you for knowing that this must be something left by Huacheng. He 
took it in his hand and pondered for a moment, thinking: "What is this?" 


When you were a prince, thank you for growing up in the Imperial Palace. 
Xianleguo originally loved beautiful and precious things, and pursued the 
wind. The palace is rich and extraordinary. The gold is the pillar, the jade 
is the order, and there are countless treasures. The children of the royal 
family are often playing various gems as marbles. Play, thank you for 
being used to baby, licking this ring, it is like diamond grinding. 


However, the shape of the ring is beautiful, and the craftsman who is 
skilled in craftsmanship is afraid that it will not be able to polish the 
beauty of this natural beauty. All the diamonds he has seen must be crystal 
clear, brighter and more fascinating, and he will be fascinated. I also can't 
say what it is. 


However, even if it is not exactly what it is, it is definitely a very 
expensive and important thing. Moreover, since it is worn around his neck, 
it will not be inadvertently left by the other party. It can only be a token 
that was given before the flower city left. 


After receiving the token, Xie Pity was somewhat unexpected. He smiled 
and decided to take it away. Next time I met, I asked the teenager what it 
meant to send him this. He only had a small break-through view, no 
treasures, and thought about it. The safest way was to hide and hide, so he 
put the tiny silver chain back on. 


After running back to Junshan and Banyueguan for two consecutive trips, 
after returning, Xie Pity spent a few days in the Bodhisattva view. If not, 
the villagers who were over-enthusiastic from time to time held some 
unsatisfied steamed porridge and came over. I am afraid that he has been 
doing this for a few days. In such a few days, one day, the spirit suddenly 
informed him: Hurry up. 


Listening to her tone, it seems that the big things are not good. I have 
guessed a lot of thankfulness. I have already prepared in my heart and 
asked: "Is it a half-moon?" 


Ling Wendao: "Yes, you will come directly to Shenwu Temple after you 
return to Xianjing." 


Hearing the Temple of the Gods, thank you for your pity, and know that 
Junu is back. 


After playing for the third time, he has never seen Jun Wu. As the first 
martial god, the whole year is not a closed-door in the whole month, it is 
to go out to patrol the world, or to go to Zhenshan Zhenhai. This 
embarrassment is a must, so thank you for not resting for a few days, and 
went to Xianjing. 


The temples of the gods of all walks of life are gathered in Xianjing, and 
they are in groups, and each has its own merits. Here, the carved bridge is 
painted, and the bridge is flowing over there. The four fairy winds are 
floating, and the clouds are filled. 


Xianjing has a main road, Shenwu Street. Although the world has built 
many Shenwu Streets to commemorate Junwu, as mentioned before, many 
things on earth are only imitations and projections of heavenly things. 
Therefore, only this one in heaven is the real Shenwu Street. . Along this 
wide street, Xie Pei walked toward the Shenwu Temple. Along the way, he 
encountered a lot of savage priests, however, no one dared to deal with 
him. 


In fact, in the past, Xie Pity walked in the Heavenly Palace, and no one 
took care of it. However, at that time, "no one took care of it", it means 
that you will not come up with him, nor will you take the initiative to chat 
with him, but basic There is still a courtesy of greetings. Now, if you really 
pretend that you haven't seen him, it seems that if you look at it more, you 
will get into trouble. The person in front of him will go fast, and the one 
behind him will be slow. He only hates to be eight feet away. Xie Pity has 
long been accustomed to it. I don’t think there is anything. After all, he 
just pulled out a hot newcomer, the general, and it’s strange that people 


don’t go far. Who knows that walking and walking, suddenly heard 
someone shouting behind him: "His Royal Highness!" 


I heard the sound, thank you for your pity, and thought that he would dare 
to call him at this time. It is really courageous. Looking back, the little 
priest named Prince Edward was hurried over him, rushing to the other 
person in front, and rushing to the side: "Oh my prince, Prince! You can go 
to the Shenwu Temple to discuss things, how can you put the waist card? 
Also forget, how is this going!" 


Thank you for your reaction. No wonder, this "His Royal Highness" is not 
calling him. In the heavenly court, there were already several princes of 
the Prince, and it was not a miracle to call it. 


However, when he swept over and swept to the other prince of the Prince 
in front, he was slightly stunned. 


The young sword eyebrow star, with a smile. This smile is different from 
the smiles of other priests in the heavens. It is a kind of unsmiling smile, 
which makes his handsome and handsome face bring a kind of 
childishness. If you change the face of a sacred official, such as 
admiration, you will probably say that this is a stupid. 


He is dressed in a suit, and the English is extremely good, but he is dressed 
in his body, but it is not the killing of the sand field, but a bright and open 
royal family. Xie pity stopped and stared at the young man in front. The 
two in front of him noticed that he stopped and looked back at him. The 
little priest saw him at first sight and immediately changed his face. 
Thanks a little bit, smiled at the young man: "Hello, Prince Edward." 


The Prince’s Highness was obviously not a concern for the weekdays. He 
did not know his face. When he saw someone greet him, he immediately 
smiled brilliantly and shouted loudly: “Hello!” 


The little priest next to him quietly pushed him and said: "Let's go, let's 
go, your Highness, and go to the Shenwu Temple to discuss things." 


The young man was unconscious, and did not respond to why the 
subordinates suddenly madly pushed themselves, strangely saying: "What 
do you push me?" 


Thanks to pity, he laughed out, and the little **** official pushed it even 
harder. He urged: "The emperor is afraid that he has been waiting for a 
long time. Let’s go down!" The Prince’s Highness also had to look back 
and wonder. Thank you, go forward. 


After they left, thank you for staying in place. Not long after, the whispers 
of several lower-level priests drifted into his ears. 


"...this is really awkward, where life doesn't meet." 


"All are in heaven, so sooner or later there is such a day. I want to say that 
it is better with General Nanyang and General Xuanzhen." 


"Haha, what are you anxious, isn't this going to be right? I am waiting for 
him in the Temple of God." 


Suddenly, one person said: "Where life does not meet, there is nothing. 
People are more serious than people who are dead. This person is not the 
same as people. They are all under the Royal Highness, and the Royal 
Highness of Taihua is really a god." Qi, if it is him, even if he falls down 
again, he will not do the shameful thing." 


"Yong'an is stronger than Xianle, so of course, the Prince of Yong'an is 
also stronger than Xianle. What kind of people are in the water, how 
simple is it." 


The Wushen sitting in the north is the Mingguang Temple; the Western 
Wushen ts the true power of the Qiying Temple; the southeast Wushen is 
the Nanyang Temple Fengxin; the southwest Wushen is the Xuanzhen 
Temple; and the Wushen in the East is the Taihua The temple is a thousand 
years old. 


Lang Qianqiu, like a pity, is also a Prince Edward. Moreover, he is the 
Royal Highness of the Prince of Yongan. And Yonganguo is the one that 


replaced Xianleguo. The founding ancestor of Yong'an Kingdom is the 
rebel leader who broke the Imperial City. 


When Xie pity wandered in the world, he also went to the East. Naturally, 
the Prince of the Yongan Kingdom also flew up. The same day as God, he 
would have thought that the two Princes would soon be in the sky, so they 
did not feel anything. The little priests who said the words said that they 
were whispers, but they were not too whispered. They might be afraid to 
be heard, but even if they were heard by the pity, they might not be afraid. 
It’s better to say that after he heard it. More exciting. Thanks for 
pretending that I didn’t hear anything, I went straight. At this time, 
another person behind him called: "His Royal Highness!" 


Thanks for your pity: "No, come back?" This time, I really called him. 
There were two dark circles on the face of Lingwen. There were several 
scrolls in his hand. He walked up and said, "When everyone came back, 
they went to the Shenwu Temple to discuss matters. You will be careful 
when you are at the temple." 


Xie pity naturally knows what is going on here, saying: "What is the 
estimated general of Xiao Xiaojun?" 


Ling Wendao: "Exile." 
Thank you for your pity: "That's actually okay, not heavy." 


Exile, as "temporary being shackled", is equivalent to the fact that the 
priest is guilty of a crime, but this is not completely unconsidered, or there 
is an opportunity to reinstate, and when it performs well, it may be fished 
for three or fifty years. There are also one or two hundred years. However, 
he said "good", that is naturally based on his standards, for the generals, 
this is not the case. 


Thanks and pity, I remembered, "I have told you about the spirit, the last 
time I told you, with Junshan, the boy who had a human epidemic, how 
was your investigation over there? Is there any news?" 


Ling Wendao said: "I really can't live, my Royal Highness, there is no 
time, this will be stepped up again." 


Even the gods of heaven, it is not easy to find someone in the vast sea of 
people. The speed is improved, but it means that it takes ten years for the 
mortal world and one year for the heavens. Thanks for the pity: "It’s hard." 
At this moment, just to the end, a majestic palace appeared in front of him. 


The palace has been honed for some years. However, only the vicissitudes 
of life, the old age, and the top layer of glazed gold are glittering with 
dazzling light. Thanks for looking up, under the golden dome, the word 
"Shenwu Temple" is vigorous and powerful. It is still the appearance of 
hundreds of years ago. It has not changed at all, and then bowed and went 
in. In the hall, a number of priests have already gathered, or stand up in 
three or two, or independently. 


Those who can stand in this temple are all sacred gods who have gone 
through the ascent, and all of them are the pride of the heavens, and one of 
the overlords, all of them are full of glory and arrogant, and they are 
dazzled. At this moment, all of them are condensed and sighed, not dare to 
speak loudly. On the throne at the end of the main hall, there is a **** of 
martial arts wearing a white armor. 


This Wushen is handsome and handsome, and is very solemn and solemn. 
Behind it is the Huanghuang Shenwu Temple, and at the foot is the Baiyun 
Temple. After thanking him for coming into the temple, it seemed as if he 
had come to him and opened his eyes. 


The eyes are extremely dark and extremely clear, as if the snow of the cold 
winter has changed. After blinking, the Valkyrie smiled and said: "Xianle, 
you are here." 


Xie pity bowed slightly to him, did not speak. 


The opening of Junwu did not sound, but the voice was quietly resounding 
through the entire Shenwu Temple. The eyes of other priests in the temple 
gathered. He knew it well. 


It seems that this gathering is not intended to discuss the half-month 
closure of General Xiao Yan. The main event seems to be on him. 2k novel 
reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 33: Prince of 
the Gods Temple sees Prince 2 


33(4782) 


A side of the spirit has gone up, standing on the side of the throne, in a 
black dress, not screaming, holding a booklet and said, "The emperor, 
there are several priests outside the patrol, unable to come back." 


Junwu Wei decapitated, said: "They have already notified in advance." 


Ling Wen bowed to the head. Jun Wu turned to thank and said: "Xian Le 
must also know that today, you are called up, what is it." 


Xie pity is still bowing, said: "Probably guessed. However, I thought that 
the generals of the generals have already decided." 


At this time, a man’s voice said: "How to decide on this matter, I am afraid 
it is not easy to say." 


This voice came from behind him, and it was pleasing to the ear. He 
thanked him for looking back. He saw a martial **** outside the hall and 
went to the sword. He went to the front of the temple and passed a step 
before him. The corner of the mouth, said: "His Royal Highness, long- 
await." 


This martial **** is about twenty-seven years old and looks very graceful. 
His actions are very decisive. Looking at his face is more handsome than 
the statue that he saw in the past with Junshan. It is the kind of handsome 
that is very easy to please women. At first glance, it is a romantic person. 
Xie pity has not yet answered, he added: "Our family is really taking care 
of you." 


Thanks and thoughts silently: "This time is really offending this person." 
The mouth said: "Where is it. The general is the long-awaited." 


This sentence is a long time. These days, thanks to the scrolls, I also read 
the legends of famous **** officials. Among them, this is the general of 
Mingguang. 


Although the northern martial art was a man, although he had won the 
battle, the most talked about is the good or bad legends he left in the 
fireworks alley. The beautiful legend has a thousand dollars to save the 
wind and the name of the dust. From this, the infatuation is for the 
gentleman to keep the body as jade and so on. It’s not a good legend. There 
is a good night to run through the city and the widowed woman once and 
so on, to some extent. It is also very powerful. After reading it, thank you 
for feeling that this person has only provoked a Xuan Ji for so many years, 
which is unreasonable. 


Because his battlefield and love field are smug, many opponents and 
colleagues are passionate about cursing him to die. It is best to get sick 
and dead, but this life is very hard. He has never been sick in the flowers; 
he is not willing to die. Still live longer than you. At the end of the day, I 
finally lost my life, and everyone thought hahahaha! It’s **** it! Who 
knows, rumbling, rumbling, on the occasion of this millennium, he soared. 


This time, the opponent who was not killed by him also mad at him. 


After the ascent, he did not change his style, and the stage of hunting 
legends was greatly expanded. Go up to the fairy child officer, down to the 
goblin female ghost, but if there is a little beauty, there is no he dare not to 
shoot. But his favorite is the beautiful beauty of the world. A lot of Yan | 
love Xiao Chuan loves to write with him as the main character. If you don't 
pray for the way to repair, you may ask for a clear look. Therefore, in 
addition to the respect of the northern Wushu, the folks often worship him 
as a man who pays for the peaches. Even many of the priests met him in 
the heavens, rubbed his shoulders, and walked over, but also turned his 
head and worshipped, and wanted to touch the peach blossoms. I have to 
say that although there are subtle similarities, he is much more fortunate 
than the wind letter that has won the title of "Giantyang". 


The gods know that the two people’s "long-lasting" are all in the air, 
secretly holding the belly. After the politeness, thank you: "What do you 


say when you say what you said?" 


The beating of a ring, the center of the hall, suddenly appeared a 
suspended body. 


Strictly speaking, it is a hollow shell lying down. This human form has no 
gods, and it is empty inside, and it is **** from head to toe, and there is 
no difference with a body. Look at the face again, eyes closed, face is 
clear, it is Azhao. Or, it is the division of General Xiao Yan. 


On the temple of Shenwu, there was such a thing in the middle of the 
priests of the Yushu Linfeng. The picture was slightly shocking. I have to 
be brought up. Although he was locked in his body, he was still indifferent 
and bowed his head. Thanks to the pity: "What is this for the general?" 


He walked around for a half circle around Xie, and said: "I am clear about 
Xiao Xiao's ability. Although he is not as powerful as himself, it is not 
particularly bad, and he is a "fierce". I can still do it with a flat hand. 
However, he actually told me that there is one person who beats him to 
fight back. Isn’t that unusual?” 


He continued: "I asked about it. It turned out that at half-month, I was next 
to Prince Xianle, followed by a red boy." 


As soon as I heard the word "red clothes", some of the look of the priests 
began to be somewhat unnatural. The next step was to make them 
unnatural and become unstoppable: "And this boy, in the dark, has killed 
hundreds of half-moon soldiers who are about to become fierce in a blink 
of an eye! 


"--T would like to ask His Royal Highness, this red boy, what is it sacred?" 


Not "fierce", that is "absolute"! And... still a must to kill the murderer, a 
red dress. 


Anyone can guess who this teenager is most likely to be. However, no one 
wants to take the initiative to name that name. Xie pity glanced at the 
silent silence, and said: "Cough, isn't it? This, I really don't remember it. 
At that time, a group of businessmen also fell into a half-month, and we 
generally get along for a few days, maybe It’s one of the caravans.” 


He said: "I don't know, my Royal Highness, I listen to the little sister. You 
are very close to the boy. It doesn't look like you have only been together 
for a few days. How can you not remember it?" 


Thank you for your pity: "No, you are wrong. I am telling the truth. It’s 
really just getting along for a few days." 


His face is still not shocking. At this time, not far from a white Taoist man 
swaying the white snow, said: "General General, you are talking about the 

words of General Xiao Yan, and General Xiao Xiao is guilty, and is still in 
confinement. I’m going to send it to exile. I’m a bit credible when I say it, 
and I need to measure it.” 


He said: "It depends on General Nanyang and General Xuan Zhen. Can you 
help me with a little help?" 


Looking down at his gaze, Xie Pity actually found the wind and the love in 
the southwest and southeast of the main hall. 


Fengxin ts still in his memory. He 1s always tall, standing very straight, his 
eyes are determined, and his eyebrows are always slightly squatting. It 
seems that he has been impatient with him. In fact, he is not impatient. 
However, the feelings of admiration are somewhat different from his 
impressions. Although it is still a white face, the blood is shallow, two thin 
lips are slightly squinting, and the eyes are low, but the whole body seems 
to be talking about the coldness of "not flattering". Hold your arms and 
stand, and your right hand fingers gently tap on the elbows of your left 
hand. I don’t know if it’s calm or not, or more like calculating. 


Although these two people are regarded as beautiful men, they each have 
their own stinging places. Listening to the name, they don’t look at Junwu 
first. Junwu Wei decapitated, the two of them stood out slowly. 


This is the first time that she has met with both of them since the third 
time. At this meeting, he only felt that the gaze that was projected to this 
side became more and more crazy. 


Crazy is also inevitable. It should be noted that this Shenwu Temple is the 
first temple of the Valkyrie, not the priest of Heaven, and is not qualified 
to come to the proceedings. When Prince Xianle first ascended, he had a 
good faith and a feeling of affection. At that time, these two were the 
lower-level priests of Zhongtianting, and they did not even have the 
qualification to wipe the ground. Now, the two young deputies will not 
only be able to stand in the temple of the gods, but also rank higher than 
the former masters. It is really a feng shui turn, thirty years of Hedong, 
thirty years of Hexi. 


Three people, you see me, I see you, look at each other in a mess, and 
quickly pretend to have nothing to do with the face, no one knows who is 
thinking. However, thank you have almost known, I want to ask them for 
help. 


Sure enough, he said: "General Nanyang and General Xuanzhen have both 
handed over to Huacheng. For those weapons, they should have more say." 


He called out Azhao's empty shell, just to let everyone see the wound. The 
wind and the feelings slowly came to the empty shell suspended in the air. 
Thanks for the move, he took a few steps and looked at it. But because the 
blood is too much, many of them are black, so I can’t see clearly. . The two 
men looked at each other for a while, looked up again, and glanced at each 
other, as if no one wanted to speak first. Lingwen is in the seat of Junju: 
"Two generals, how?" 


Fengxin took the lead and said: "It 1s him." 


The feelings of admiration are: "It’s a curvy knife." 


Probably now in the priest of the Shenwu Temple, only thank you for not 
knowing what these four words represent. 


The curving knife is the battle of the flower city dream. When the 31st 
priest is singled out, the martial arts will be beaten by the martial arts, and 
the sickly knives will be broken! 


In the Shenwu Hall, the priests began to whisper in twos and threes, 
looking at the eyes of Xie Pity. Ruan said: "Thank you for the two generals 
to confirm this, then my guess 1s true. If the red boy who is with the Prince 
Edward is really the one, things can be complicated." 


The former white Taoist said again: "General General, do you want to say 
that His Royal Highness and the Devil King are colluding together to form 
a small general?" 


The man uttered twice, and he stood on his side twice, and he was so 
grateful that he would not have to take a glimpse of it. He looked back and 
saw that the eyes of the person were black and white, the white jade was 
the belt, the dust was placed between the arms, the back was carrying a 
long sword, the waist was inserted into the folding fan, and the end was 
graceful and graceful. It’s just that the eyebrows are a little familiar, but I 
can’t remember where I’ve seen such a friend. 


He also looked at the other side, as if he was a bad elder who didn't want to 
care about the children. He shook his head and waved his hand. He 
removed the Azhao empty shell suspended in the air and turned: "It is not 
yet a collusion. Just that It’s only a hand to cover the sky, and it’s the 
ability to make a fool of the Prince’s Highness. 


This means that I want to shape the flower city as a behind-the-scenes 
black hand. Thanks to the pity: "If you believe in me, you should always 
trust the wind master. General Xiao Xiao pleaded guilty to the whole 
process, and the wind masters heard it." 


He took another look at the white Taoist. Thanks to the pity: "And now we 
are all in the Temple of the Gods, I have no trace of the law that has been 
blinded, you can ask the Emperor." 


Sitting on the top of Jun Wu looks calm, which shows that there is no 
problem with thanking him. Thanks again and again: "One yard is one 
yard. And the first boy who is not with me is not a flower city. Even if he 
retreats 10,000 steps, it is indeed a flower city. What is this with the 
generals? It doesn't matter. Although the Desperate Ghost King is 
notorious in the side population, it is not something that can be buckled on 
his head." 


He said the name in a self-confident manner, and a few **** officials in 
the temple were behind the scenes. Ruan said: "In any case, I believe that 
this matter still needs to be reconsidered. It is best for the half-moon 
national division taken by His Royal Highness to be handed over and 
interrogated." 


What is the trial? Is it a trick? Xie Pity hasn't answered yet, but another 
person has spoken. It seems that I don’t want to stay in this Shenwu 
Temple anymore, whispering: "General, nothing." 


Shouted: "What?" 


: "There is nothing to hide the law, it is what I did, let you down." 


He was sinning him. As a result, he came to such a hand, his face was very 
cold, and he said: "What kind of soup did you give to you in half a month? 
Give me a shut up." 


I stayed up and said: "But the general! Xiao Yan will not dare to do it. If he 
is lost, he will not be afraid to end up." 


The stunned face was written with the shock of "You used to be so 
sensible, how suddenly I am sick today." I was about to kick and kick him 
to wake up. Junwu said: "Okay." 


As soon as he made a noise, he took his leg and owed it. Jun Wudao: "The 
half-month-off thing is over. Take a small donkey and go out of your way." 


Silence for a moment, shouted: "Yes." 


Thanks to the pity, he just breathed a sigh of relief and listened to him: 
"But the wound on the empty shell is indeed the one that the machete has 
left." 


Jun Wudao: "Well. This is another thing." 
He said: "Please check it out." 


Jun Wudao: "I will thoroughly investigate this matter. You can rest 
assured. Today is temporarily scattered. Xianle, you stay." 


It seems that I have to thank you for your pity and personally ask for a 
thorough investigation. The gods have nothing to say, owe the first: "Yes." 


Already scattered, the temple went out in twos and threes. When Fengxin 
passed by, he looked at him and said that he would stop talking. He 
thanked him with a slight smile. He went away and went away. If you are 
in love, then you don’t squint. If you don’t have him, you have to go 
through him. 


And the white Taoist people came over with a slap in the dust, a smile on 
their face, they were about to talk, and they just lost their swords, and they 
touched their noses with one hand. They came over and said helplessly: 
"Qing Xuan, look at your brother's share." Don't make trouble." 


The white Taoist smiled and said: "Hey general, you have to take my 
brother to press me. I am not afraid of him." 


"You..." I feel a little bit irritated, and I can't take him. Finally, I pointed to 
him and said, "You, you, Xiao Yan, this time you are miserable. Two 
hundred years of exile. "" 


The white man was mad and said: "That is what Xiaoxiao himself did, it 
has nothing to do with me!" Like he didn't want to talk about it, he ran 
quickly. Xie Li was still thinking about whether he would stay and sneer a 
few words, but he did not, and he left. A large temple of the gods, except 
for the monarchs in the seat and the gratitude of His Royal Highness, only 
one person remains in the temple, and it is actually the prince of the 


Yongan Kingdom. Thanks for the strangeness, why did he stay? Going up 
and seeing, this person actually closed his eyes and stood asleep. 


Thanks to the time, he was so sad and sad that he thought it was really 
powerful. He patted the shoulder of the young man and said, "His Royal 
Highness, His Royal Highness Prince?" 


Lang Qiangiu suddenly woke up and said: "What happened?!" 
Thanks for the pity: "Nothing, it’s gone." 


Lang Qianqiu just woke up, still dizzy, and said: "This is scattered? What 
have you said just now?? I have not heard anything?" 


Thanks to the pity: "If you don't hear it, it's not something important. Let's 
go, go back." 


Lang Qianqiu said: "Oh!" Then he left. Before he walked out of the main 
hall, he looked back at him with a puzzled look and raised his face and 
smiled at him. "Thank you for waking me up." 


Thanks and smiled and waved at him. When everyone was gone, he slowly 
turned around. Jun Wu also took his hand off the throne and walked up to 
him. He said: "Blood rain, flowers, and a knife." 


Thanks to the cat who was brought up by the back neck, he could not help 
but stand up straight. 


Jun Wu said again: "So, what the **** is going on?" 
Thanks to see him, suddenly collapsed. 


His knees had not yet landed, and when Jun Wu reached out, he held his 
elbow and did not let him come true. He sighed: "Xianle." 


Thanks and pity, he stood up straight and said: "I'm sorry." 


Junwu looked at him and said: "Are you wrong?" 


Thanks for your pity: "I know what is wrong." 


Junwu said: "What do you say, what is wrong?" 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 34: Prince of 
the Gods Temple sees Prince 3 


Thank you for your words. Jun Wu shook his head and said: "You don't 
know the amount." 


He was slightly on the side and gestured to thank him for going with him. 
Both of them went slowly to the Shenwu Temple. 


Junwu took the lead and walked and said: "Xianle is now grown up." 


He said so, thanking the pity naturally did not dare to take the call. Jun Wu 
said again: "I told you to go through the music after I let you go down 
eight hundred years ago. Don’t let another person roll in the mud. But 
when you go there, it’s eight hundred years of no news. One person is 
going to die himself. I am tossing in. I have been flying for so many days, 
and I have never come to Shenwu Temple once. If I change my personal 
sorrow and disrespect, the Lingwen Hall can go directly to accountability." 


Xie pity only said "I'm sorry", of course, not only this. Junwu naturally 
knows well and says: "You are sorry for this. If you still apologize for the 
swords that you are swearing, then forget it. If you said it yourself, you 
will forget all about it." 


Thanks a bitter smile: "...how can this be forgotten?" 


Jun Wu whispered: "Look ahead, there are still many things that need 
you." 


Business formation business: "I am less than a dilute at the moment, but 
there is a need for a manpower. It is not necessary." 


Jun Wudao: "Why do you want to be self-sufficient? These two things 
after you came back are not all done very well." 


Thanks and pity pale Panels: "It’s just that you may have just turned back 
and offended the general." 


Junwu said: "There is nothing in Mingguang, I will look at him, you don't 
have to worry. However," Jun Wu turned and said, "Is it still, you are going 
to sneak up on what is wrong?" 


Xie pity and hands up: "Imperial, I swear I really did nothing. Just one day 
on the road, I met a very interesting child, and he had been with him for a 
while, and didn't think much." 


Jun Wu nodded, said: "Occasion, children, ghosts and ghosts. Xianle, you 
know, if the general is to pursue the generals, and you say this in front of 
other priests, what will be the consequences. No one will believe you "" 


Thanks for your helplessness: "Xianle knows. So I would like to thank the 
Emperor for the timely release. You will not really want to judge me? I 
will not collude with the ghosts. I am worried." 


Jun Wudao: "I naturally know that you will not collude with the ghost 
world." 


Thanks to the pity: "Thank you for your trust." 


Jun Wu said: "But I have a job at hand, I am afraid it will not be handed 
over to you." 


Thank you, "What is it?" 


At this point, the two have arrived at the Temple of the Gods. The apse of 
the front hall is separated by a tall mural. The front of the mural is painted 
by the golden temple standing on the top of the sea of clouds. The white 
light is shining, and the back of the mural is a picture of a thousand miles. 
Looking up, this huge map is embedded with many tiny pearls, like stars. 


These are the signs of the human temple of the gods. There is a pearl 
inlaid here, which shows that there is a temple of the gods. Eight hundred 
years ago, when Jun Wu came to the first time to come here, the stars were 


not as dense as they were. Now, on the map, the glittering pearls cover the 
entire field of vision almost evenly, beautiful and shocking. 


Before standing in front of the mountains and rivers, Jun Wu pointed to a 
place in the east. He said: "After seven days, many people saw it with their 
own eyes. In the mountains near here, a fire dragon suddenly ignited." 


Thanks for the calm look. 


Jun Wu held his hand in the back and gently tapped on the map. He said: 
"The fire dragon burned two musk, and it was extinguished. During the 
period, countless people saw it, but no one was injured. You know, this 
represents What?" 


Thanks to the pity: "The law of the fire dragon whistling the sky. Although 
the flame is strong, it does not hurt people, only the giant shape. This is 
for help." 


Junwu said: "Yes. Help, and, is a priest from heaven to ask for help." 
Thanks for the pity: "And, it is forced to go down the road to help." 


Because this fire dragon and the law of the flames are extremely strong, 
but can not hurt people, it is bound to explode part of the mana of the 
priest, a careless, perhaps the entire man’s mana is exploding, directly fell, 
so less than a last resort No one will use this method for help. Since it has 
appeared, it shows that there is a priest who is already ina crisis of 
necessity. 


Thanks to the pity: "Is there any unknown official in heaven that is 
unknown?" 


Jun Wudao: "This time, all the priests have been called back. In fact, it is 
not only for the half-month, but the main thing is to take this opportunity 
to check the whereabouts of the priests. In addition to the few people who 
do not show up all the year round, such as the rain teacher, The geologists, 
other priests responded even if they could not get back." 


Indulge in a moment, thanking the pity: "Is it possible that this is not the 
current official, but which retired priest in the past?" 


Jun Wudao: "The scope is big. Many retired priests have been ignoring the 
news for many years, and it is impossible to infer which one is in danger." 


I am afraid that the civil servants of the Lingwen Temple have been busy 
with this issue with their black eyes and feet. It is no wonder that they 
cannot take care of the whereabouts of the boy with Junshan. Thanks to the 
pity: "I can force a **** official to explode and ask for help. I am sure that 
it will not be small. Is there any devil or ghost nest or gathering place 
nearby?" 


Junwu said: "Yes. It's very exhaustive. Can you know the ghost city?" 
Thank you for thinking about it, "I have heard of it." 


The ghost city is the first bustling place in the ghost world, at the junction 
of the human world and the ghost world. 


All the ghosts gathered in this transaction, the group of magic dance. 
Some alchemists who have been repaired a few times often go in and do 
some business, and they will inquire about the news. Even some of the 
heavenly priests will disguise themselves and enter a journey out of 
curiosity or ulterior motives. Occasionally, there are also people who don’t 
understand anything, and they are not being swallowed up, or being scared 
to death. 


The ghost city has been there since ancient times - but not enough to thank 
the ancients, there are many legends about it, such as this classic ghost 
story: there is a bustling night who sees a hot market in front of him. The 
red lanterns, the lanterns, and the cheerful, went in, but found that the 
people around them were either wearing masks, or wearing hoods, or ugly, 
very strange, but did not think much, bought a bowl of noodles Going 
down to eat, holding chopsticks into the mouth, eating and eating feels 
wrong, and then look, what 1s this face, clearly a bowl of black hair still 
creeping! 


Thoughts pulled back, Junwu said: "After seeing the pillar of fire, I 
immediately sent a priest to search the area, there is no clue, there is a 
great possibility that it will be transferred into the ghost city. But the 
heavenly ghost world has always been clear, no There is enough evidence 
to be hard to beat the ghost city. So, this time, I need a person to secretly 
explore the lower bounds." 


Thanks to pity: "You can't be a stunned snake, so you can't tell the truth in 
the Shenwu Hall and the public officials, leaking the news, right?" 


Jun Wudao: "This is the case." 
Thanks to the pity: "The emperor, Xianle please." 


Jun Wudao: "The first person I thought of was also you. But you can do 
this, I am afraid it is not convenient." 


Thanks to the pity: "What is inconvenient?" 


Junwu said: "First, the East is the land of Lang Qianqiu. If you want to go, 
you must cooperate with him." 


Thanks to pity: "I have no problem at all. Please rest assured." 
Jun Wudao: "Second, you know, who is the ghost market now?" 
Thanks for the slightest sigh, said: "Is it a flower city?" 


Jun Wu slowly nodded. Thanks for the hunch in the heart, suddenly 
thought of something. 


The fire column was called seven days ago. Huacheng, just left the 
Bodhisattva view seven days ago. This time is too tight, and there will be 
any connection between the two things? 


Jun Wudao: "It looks like you have a good relationship with him. This is 
nothing. I am afraid that he is involved in this matter. If you are in trouble, 
you are not forced. But if there are any other suggestions or candidates, 
you can say Say." 


Xie pity still said: "I will go. I think that the **** rain is not a sinister 
spectacle." 


Junwu looked at him and said: "Xianle, I know that you have your own 
sense of proportion. But I also know that you always think of everyone." 


Listening to him, thank you for a smile, said: "Don't you say that I am like 
a little princess who has never been to the door. Now this sentence 1s really 
not suitable for me." 


Jun Wu shook his head and said: "You shouldn't say much about your 
friends, but I still have to say more. Be careful with the city." 


Hearing words, thankful and prudent, bowed and confessed. He should 
have followed the word "yes", and he said "yes", and it is already a good 
way to go. However, this one is "yes", somehow, he does not want to say. 


Jun Wu said again: "Be especially careful about his demon knife." 
Thank you, "How do you say?" 


Junwu said: "The knife is a curse, it 1s a cursed blade, an ominous knife. 
This kind of evil soldier must have a very cruel sacrifice and **** 
determination to make it. Don't touch it, don't be it. Injury. Otherwise the 
consequences are unpredictable." 


I don’t know where it came from. I thought that Saburo should not cut me 
with a knife, but the mouth ts still saying: "Xianle understands." 


Junwu Wei decapitated, said: "I will be the most assured of this matter. I 
am not at all difficult. It is better, but you are afraid of one person. Which 
one of you wants to walk with you?" 


After thinking about it, thank you for your pity: "Be free. However, it is 
better to get along with a better personality. The mana is better, you can 
borrow me at any time." 


Jun Wu smiled: "This is the first article you directly blocked Nanyang and 
Xuanzhen." 


That is, today's style and admiration, who's personality, can't say that it is 
good to get along, thank you and laugh. Jun Wu said again: "How have you 
been with them? Have you said anything yet?" 


Jun Wu never entered any psychic arrays, and naturally did not know what 
they were doing all day in the array. Thanks to the pity: "I have said a few 
words." 


Jun Wudao: "It’s been for so many years, is it just a few words? Right, I 
heard that you have soared this time and have smashed many of the 
Golden Temples of Xianxian, among them Nanyang." 


Xie pity argued: "I have paid off! Eighty-eight thousand eighty-eight 
virtues, I have paid off. This, also thank the emperor, give me the 
opportunity to let me go with Junshan." 


Jun Wu said: "You thank Nanyang in your heart. I listened to Lingwen, and 
he later took the initiative to go to the Lingwen Hall and said that he 
would not have to rebuild the merits of the Golden Temple." 


Thanks for your pity, said: "This... I don't know at all." 


It is no wonder that the 8.88 million merits were paid off when it was paid 
off. It was originally put a lot of water. At that time, the damage of 
Nanyang Temple was the most serious. It was said that the golden top of 
the half was collapsed. Jun Wudao: "Nanyang let the spirit do not tell you, 
you naturally do not know. Since he does not want you to know, you 
continue to pretend that I do not know." 


Xie Pity doesn't know what it feels, sour and bitter, dissolves in the heart, 
a plate of sand, and finally, just sighs silently and thinks about something 
else: "The ‘do not tell others’ in this world, it is all empty talk.” 


Jun Wu thought for a moment, and said: "Nanyang and Xuan really can't, 
then, how about the wind division?" 


Thanks to pity: "The Wind Master is very good, but I don't know if she 
would like to go out with me." 


Jun Wudao: "The style of the wind division is strong, the temper is lively, 
and you love to make friends. It is in line with what you said. I came to see 
me last time. It is also good for you. According to me, it is ok. If you don't 
have More questions, this time with the wind division together with the 
lower bound, go to the ghost market to find out. Also." 


Thank you, "What is it?" 


Jun Wu slowly said: "You can work hard, but don't force yourself too 
much." 


Hearing words, thank you for a long while, smiled and said: "What are you 
talking about, I am not reluctant." 


Jun Wu patted his shoulder and said: "First go back to Xianle Palace, I will 
let people go to the wind." 


Thanks for your pity, said: "I don't have enough merits. I didn't have a 
temple. The former Xianle Palace has already been pushed. Where is the 
Xianle Palace?" 


Jun Wudao: "Give a new one to you, you can't really squeeze into such a 
small view." 


Thanks to the Shenwu Temple, he was taken to the new "Xianle Palace" by 
the small priest in the palace. 


This Xianle Palace is almost exactly the same as his previous one, with a 
red glass wall and a rich and beautiful. But he stood at the gate of the 
palace for a long time and didn't want to go in at all. Tattered immortals 
still live in the tattered view, it is more appropriate, so magnificent and 
proud of the fairy palace, now he can not live. 


He wandered around the door, waiting for the wind master to come to him. 
Who knows, he waited for a long time, did not wait for the white women's 
crown, but waited for a white Taoist. 


This person is very beautiful, and the wind is floating in the wind. It is the 
"Qing Xuan" that is the only one in the temple. He sneaked a sigh of relief 
and said with a smile: "His Prince is good!" 


Xie pity also laughed: "Daoyou is also good!" 


In fact, he would like to ask who is the other party? But I feel that it is so 
rude that I want to sneak a look at the scroll. Which name of the priest is 
called Qingxuan. At this time, the white Taoist people came over and said, 
"Go! Let's go down together." 


Thanks for your pity, said: "Daoyou, I am waiting here." 


The other party listened, put the dust into the robes and turned back, and 
turned and said: "Who are you waiting for?" 


Thanks to the pity: "I am waiting for the wind master." 


The white man was even more strange. He said, "I am not here?" 


Thanks for the brow, he jumped and said: "Are you a wind teacher?" 


The other party showed the folding fan and shook his side: "I am a wind 
teacher. Do you need to doubt? Do you not know who I am?? Have you 
ever heard of the name of my wind teacher Qingxuan?" 


He speaks for granted and is justified, as if he does not know that he is a 
completely impossible thing. The front of the folding fan 1s written with a 
"wind", and the back is painted with three clear winds. Isn't that the one 
that the white female crown shakes that day? 


Xie pity suddenly remembered: I waved and said that some of the gods in 
the heavens were in special needs and were good at changing the law. At 
that time, in the half-month, the south wind also said half a sentence: "The 
wind teacher has always been..." 


Always? What is it? 


Man? ! 


Thanks to the other side, he walked a few steps, but still could not fully 
accept it. "This...the wind master, you and you, why did you play the 
female crown last time?" 


Wind teacher said: "What? Not good?" 
Thanks: "Good-looking? But..." 


The wind teacher smiled and said: "What's the best thing to look at? But I 
can't see it! Of course it's because it looks good, so I have to dress up." 


Having said that, he suddenly remembered something. He took a folding 
fan and looked up and down. He said, "Let's say, this time we go to the 
ghost market, we also want to hide our identity, right?" 


Thankfulness: "???" 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 35: Into the 
ghost city prince every ghost king 


Very embarrassed, until two hours later, thanked the air and sneaked a 
sneak peek at the scroll, which finally cleared the windshield's head. 


The five divisions of the Heavenly Kingdom, all replace the surname with 
the title. For example, before the landlord soared, the real name in the 
world was called Mingyi. After flying up, it was called "Ground Teacher." 
Before the Fengshi Feisheng, his real name was Shi Qingxuan. After flying 
up, he was called "Qianshi Qingxuan". Qingxuan Qingxuan, people like the 
number, temperament like the wind, like to make friends, and generous, 
informal, the popularity of the heavens is very good, from his in the 
psychic array is a hundred thousand merits can be seen . Having said that, 
his brother is the great priest who is in charge of the fortune of the world. 
Naturally, he is generous and unconventional. 


Yes, the brother of Qingxuan Qingxuan is the "water and sky", the Navy 
has no ferry. 


Together, the two went side by side and talked while walking. Thanks for 
holding his arm, he sincerely said: "The two surnames are flying up in the 
second place. It is a strange talk in the world, and it is even more strange 
that you Fengshui Ershi is on the same side." 


It should be noted that in tens of thousands of people, there is not 
necessarily one person who can fly, and there are still hundreds of years 
between the hustle and the hustle and bustle. It is not a direct descendant 
of the shackles, but it was once the brothers of the ancestors. I don’t know 
the grandchildren of several generations. This Navy’s Wudu and Fengshi 
Qingxuan are a pair of genuine blood brothers. This 1s the real one, and it’s 
not surprising. 


Shi Qingxuan smiled and said: "What is this? I am with my brother in the 
same place, worshiping the same teacher, repairing the same road, and 
naturally flying to the same world." 


This point, thank you also know about the evil reel. In the second division 
of Feng Shui, the division did not fly first, and there were not many 
teenagers. Shi Qingxuan also took the day. People often put these two 
priests together to offer, worship with the temple, and sit on the same 
level. It is obvious that these two brothers are really feeling very good. 
Presumably, the Navy is what Saburo and Nanfeng said, and the reason 
why they will not move the wind. After all, is the younger brother of 
Shutyangtian, how can it be easily provoked? 


When I got here, thanked and thought of a section, think about it, or asked 
it out, saying: "The wind master, in the temple of the gods, I listen to the 
generals, he seems to have a good relationship with your brother. You go 
this time Speaking to General Xiao Yan, will your brother..." 


Teacher Qingxuan: "I won't. My brother has long known that I can't 
understand it." 


Thanks to pity: "Knowing is one thing, what 1s done is another matter. Will 
this make the Navy Master and the General of the Generals feel a gap?" 


Shi Qingxuan said: "It’s good to have a gap. I don’t want my brother to 
mix with him and get rid of the three cancers at an early date." 


Thanks for your pity, said: "What three cancers?" 


Shi Qingxuan was shocked: "What! You don't know this? Hey! Well, I 
know that you don't know anything. If you listen, even these three cancers 
are worse in the heavens, but the relationship is bad. A good nickname for 
several priests. It is Mingguang, Lingwen and my brother." 


Thank you for your pity: "I don't pray, thank you, thank you." 


Shi Qingxuan shook the windshield fan and said: "Even if I didn't 
understand him, this time, it was Xiaoxiao's own fault. I wanted to pull the 
half-month master of the country and keep the little sister. This can't be 
done by him. Whether it is a person who 1s a **** or a ghost, he has to be 
responsible for what he has done. What is the trick of bullying a little 
girl?" 


Speaking of the last sentence, he was quite disdainful. Thank you for 
listening, laughing: "The wind master is really chivalrous." 


Shi Qingxuan smiled and said: "You are not bad. I have vaguely heard 
some rumors about half a month off, but I have no time to go through it, 
and my brother has smashed me a few times. I have forgotten more things. 
I listened to you that day. Psychic asked, remembering that there was such 
a glimpse to see, who knows that you not only asked, people have gone. I 
thought, hey, this person is good!" 


This wind teacher is a very straightforward and interesting temper. Thanks 
to the pity, he understands very well why he is very popular in heaven. 
Unexpectedly, this is soaring, actually can be such a sacred officer in 
heaven, he can not help but smile. Who knows, only turned around, and 
when I look back, the white robes around me become a white female 
crown. 


This has become too sudden, and the pity of the soles is almost slippery. 
"Why are you suddenly changing?" 


Shi Qingxuan has a long hair and said: "Oh, Your Royal Highness, it 
doesn't matter. I am like this, the mana will be stronger." 


It turned out that, as mentioned earlier, wind divisions and navy divisions 
are often offered together. However, it also gave birth to a strange 
accident. Perhaps people think that in the same temple, the two priests 
who worshiped were male, as if they had something worse. Men and 
women match, work is not tired, looks like a man and a woman is not 
lacking, so then someone did something, that is, the wind teacher carved 
into a female figure. 


Give him a change of the female image, but also nonsense, to make a 
story, to say that this Feng Shui two gods is a brother and sister, and even 
the version is said to be a couple. After hundreds of years, with many 
rumors, many strange stories were derived. The two priests came up and 
looked for it, and they saw that the chicken skin had fallen off the ground. 
However, this kind of nonsense thing has actually been believed by many 
people. It is often mentioned that the windshield can't figure out the men 


and women, and one bite "the goddess bless me." Therefore, Shi Qingxuan 
also has a nickname, called "The Wind Maiden". 


Although funny, however, such absurd deeds are not too few, and there is a 
similar experience in saying spirituality. Although this spirit is a goddess 
official, she has never been dressed like other fairies. It is usually a black 
and white, clever and neat, and she is driving a bunch of civil servants in 
the Lingwen Temple. Like crazy. Vertically, there are elements of 
character, but there are other reasons. When you come to the world, just 
grab a person and ask: Is the Lingwen Zhenjun male or female? Who will 
firmly answer: male. 


Wenshen, of course, is a man. For this, the spirit has soared at the 
beginning, but I have suffered some losses. She is a **** of literature, but 
many people in the world think that how can women live in the position of 
the gods? How to secure the documentary prosperity? Must not work! 
Therefore, she was diligent and diligent, and all of them were incense and 
cold. Later, several temples were not happy in their hearts. Under one 
breath, they reshaped the spiritual gods and changed them into male 
bodies. They changed the spiritual Yuanjun to the spiritual real, and also 
wrote a set of jaw-dropping legends. Experience. With this change, the 
incense 1s back again. Everyone is full of praise for the spirit and spirit. In 
fact, the priest is still the priest, and the mana is still so many mana. The 
stories circulated are all edited, but people just eat this set. Later, when 
Lingwen went to dream or show spirit, he had to use the male body. 


In the same way, people think that if you have a man and a woman in the 
Feng Shui Temple, you can live in the market, and you have to be a man 
and a woman. Do you know that God is a ghost? People believe what you 
are, what you are like. You are a hundred thousand miles away, and 
everyone is still willing to see what they want to see. This kind of thing, 
the gods of heaven, have long been eccentric. 


As for Shi Qingxuan himself, he did not care much about his observation. 
It is better to say that he is completely happy. Not only did he enjoy it, but 
he was also very keen on others to have fun with him. Others thanked him 
for the true identity of the black girl who was with him last time. From the 
time when Tianjie came here, Shi Qingxuan has been trying to persuade 


Xie Pity to turn into a female, and the reason is very justified: "The 
woman is heavy and it is easier to hide in the ghost city." 


Thanks for thinking, I can only refuse: "I have not enough mana, can't turn 
it." 


Shi Qingxuan is very enthusiastic and said: "I borrow you. Does the 
emperor not let me come for this?" 


Thanks to pity: "Adult, you still borrow me when you fight." 

Shi Qing Xuan Zang is not a success, nor is it stubborn. At this point, the 
two have come to a wilderness. The night was deep, and the old crow 
snarled in the dark woods, and the atmosphere was bleak. Thanks for 
watching for a moment, said: "Let's here. There is a sullen atmosphere 


here, there are large cemeteries nearby, and you will always see one or two 
ready to go out and gather, and then you will follow." 


So, the two men squatted on the side of the grave, waiting for the rabbit. 


It didn't take long for Shi Qingxuan to reach into his sleeve and groan, and 
somehow he took out a jar of wine and said, "Drink?" 


Thanks for taking it, taking a sip, drinking a hot throat, and giving him the 
jar, said: "Thank you." 


Shi Qingxuan came back and drank two, saying: "You can't drink?" 


Thanks to pity: "I can drink. But if you drink too much, you will go crazy, 
or you can taste it. What time is it?" 


Shi Qingxuan Shen Shen for a moment, said: "The time is up." 
Thanks to pity: "Well, it's almost time to come." 


When the voice just fell, the two saw the depths of the woods, and a 
glimpse of a glimmer of light. 


The faint light of this row is getting closer and closer, out of the forest, 
and the two talents see it. This is a white woman with no expression. There 
are old and young, beautiful and ugly, one by one wearing a shroud, 
carrying a white lantern, slowly walking forward. 


These are the female ghosts who are going to the ghost market in the 
middle of the night. 


Thank you for your whisper: "Come on." 


Shi Qingxuan nodded, and after two drinks, the wine was thrown, and the 
jars were thrown up. The two stood up from the ground and followed the 
ghosts if they had nothing to do. 


The two prepared in advance to remove all the aura from the body, like 
two pieces of humanoid wood, without a bit of popularity. The ghosts of 
the women carried white lanterns, followed the black woods, and slowly 
walked, talking quietly. 


One person said: "It’s so happy, the ghost market is open again, I am going 
to do my face." 


Another person said: "What happened to your face? Didn't you do it 
before?" 


First person: "It's rotten again. Hey, the last person who helped me said 
that it can be guaranteed for a year, it won't be more than half a year." 


Xie Li and Shi Qingxuan followed behind them, listening to them chatting, 
not saying a word, listening to funny things, most of the mouth twisted and 
looked at each other. After half an hour, a team came to a valley. 


Deep in the valley, there is a faint red light, and there seems to be a song 
coming from the night. Xie pity is more and more curious, what is the 
legendary ghost city? Who knows, they just entered the valley, the last 
female ghost of the team turned back and found them, wondering: "Who 
are you?" 


This question, the women in front of the pale face turned back, they all felt 
strange, surrounded them, said: "When did they keep up? When we went 
out of the grave, there are no two." 


"Which graves do you live in, how come you have never seen you before?" 


Xie pity and cough, said: "We... came from a distant graveyard, of course, 
have not seen it." 


Shi Qingxuan also smiled and said: "Yes, we are trying to catch up with 
the ghost city, and we have come here for a long time." 


A group of white women spoke without a word, staring blankly at them. If 
they changed two people, they were afraid to be stared and stunned. 
Thanks to pity, 1s not afraid of identity exposure, how can these weak and 
illusory women and ghosts threaten them? However, the ghost market is in 
front of you, close at hand, how can you cause disputes and stunned snakes 
here? 


At this time, a woman stared at the teacher Qing Xuan and slowly spoke. 
She said: "This sister, your face, is well maintained." 
Hearing words, thanking the pity and the teacher Qing Xuan are a glimpse. 


Immediately, the two immediately nodded. Xie Li said: "Fortunately, 
okay." Shi Qingxuan learned his tone: "very good." 


A group of women and ghosts gathered around and discussed: "Yeah, it's 
not bad at all." "Sister, where are you repairing your face?" "Is there any 
secret?" "Can there be a recommended store?" ” 


Shi Qingxuan didn't know how to answer, so he just laughed and said: "Is 
it? I also think my face is very good, haha, hahaha, hahahahahaha..." 


How does he know how to maintain the face of the dead? I can only 
continue to laugh and delay time. At this time, the team turned around, and 
the sight of thankfulness suddenly became bright and clear, and a red 
blush came into view. 


A grotesque world is presented to him. 
This is a long street. 


Unexpectedly long, the two sides of the street are crowded with a variety 
of shops and hawkers, fluttering colorful ornaments and red lanterns are 
high and low. On the road, "people" come and go, and most of them wear 
masks. Crying, laughing, angry, human, not human. If you don't wear a 
mask, you can only use the "odd shape" to describe it. Some of them are 
big and small, some are as thin as bamboo poles, some are flat into a cake, 
they are attached to the ground, and they are complained by the 
pedestrians. 


Thanks for being cautious, didn't step on any strange things, passed a food 
stall, saw the stall owner use a big bone stick to stir a pot of soup, while 
stirring, leaking water from the gap between the teeth, dripping Falling 
into the soup, the color of the soup is floating in the water. Thanks for 
seeing it, suddenly there was a confidence between them. 


On the other side, some weird people are performing acrobatics, a 
squatting man is holding a weak chicken-like imp, a mouth, a majestic fire 
spurting out, burning the little ghost that he is holding on his hand. 
Howling, struggling, and the surrounding observers clapped their hands 
and laughed and cheered loudly. Some people are mad, throwing money 
into the air, and the snow is raging, and the money flutters and falls to the 
eyes of Xie, he stretches his hand and takes a look, it really is money. 


Then go, pass by a butcher shop, hanging a row of squatting heads in front 
of the shop, the heads are neatly arranged from small to large, clearly 
marked, young children meat, money for teenagers, man meat, women 
meat Money, brittle human bones a few dollars. The apron and the hand- 
held butcher knife were busy on the shop. It was actually a black-brown 
wild boar, and it was a thick human leg with a knife and a knife. It was 
still twitching in a bullet. 


It’s really a group dance, carnival hell. 


It is very common for people to cut pigs. Pigs are rarely seen, but Xie has 
no choice but to look at it, but it was discovered by the pig. It immediately 
said: "Look what? You can't buy it?" 


Xie pity shook his head and said: "Do not buy." 


The pig butcher was slashed on the cutting board and smashed with flesh 
and blood. It’s rude and honest: “Don’t buy it, don’t look! Fuck, are you 
looking for something? Fast roll!” 


Thanks for the pity. But he took a few steps and suddenly found that the 
big thing was not good. 


The ghosts of the woman and the teacher Qing Xuan have disappeared 
without a trace. 


Thanks to pity, I immediately thought of being psychic with the wind 
teacher, fearing that he was really dragged by the ghosts of the women to 
repair the face. However, here is the ghost market, and the psychic spells 
of the heavens are also limited here. Psychic has no fruit, he had to look 
for it in the street. Walking and walking, suddenly pulled by people. He 
was very vigilant and immediately said: "Who?" 


It was a woman who took him. He was shocked by him. After seeing his 
face, he laughed and ate. He said, "Oh, this little brother, you are so 
handsome." "" 


The woman was exposed, her makeup was horrible, and the white powder 
was not evenly spread. When she opened her mouth, she slammed down. 
Her chest was sacred, as if filling something in the flesh, it was quite 
frightening. Xie pity gently faded her skinny hand and said: "This girl has 
something to say." 


The woman stunned and immediately laughed and said, "My mother, you 
call me a girl? Is there still someone calling me a girl this year? 
Hahahahaha!" 


The people around him seemed to be very funny, and they laughed. Xie 
pity shook his head and did not speak. The woman rushed up again and 
said, "Don't go! Little brother, I like you, go to work with me for a night, I 
don't want your money." She gave up her mouth. , throwing a wink, said, "I 
am posting you, hehe..." 


Thanks to pity, it is a sin, not a trace but resolutely earning, Wen Wen: 
"Girl." 


Who knows, the woman seems to be suddenly impatient, said: "Which 
girl, who loves to listen to you? Do not talk nonsense, how, you will not 
come?" 


As if to seduce her pity, she suddenly untied the clothes that were 
originally exposed. Xie pity never pretended that she was so bold, did not 
expect to stop, had to sigh, remove his gaze, and detoured. The female 
ghost stopped him from going to the road, and teased and said: "I don't 
like it?" 


However, thanks to the impetuousness of the Emperor's view, the 
abstinence for many years, the body and mind have always been as stable 
as Taishan, to show him what can be like a water stop, see what will 
automatically recite the morals in the mind, completely indifferent. The 
female ghost picks | Can't make it, change his face, and swears: "You don't 
want to post it, you are not a man!" 


Thanks to the gaze of the gaze, said: "Yes." 
Female ghost said: "Then you will prove it to me!" 


Someone laughed at the side: "You are a singer | goods, people are too old 
and ugly to ask you, what are you sticking?" 


Thank you for listening, and I don’t change my face: "It’s not. I have 
hidden diseases. I won’t." 


Everyone stunned, and in a flash, there was a burst of laughter and 
laughter: "Ha ha ha ha ha ha ha..." 


This time, the object of ridicule became pity. I really have never seen a 
man who has the courage to say that he has hidden problems in the face of 


a large audience. Thanks to the pity of this person for his own 


Sure enough, the female ghost 
immediately covered her clothes, no longer entangled, and said: "No 
wonder this virtue. Pig, you, sick, don't say it early! Hey!" 


Not far away, the pig butcher was slashing again and shouted: "Fucking, 
you are a dead man, what do you say? What happened to the pig?" 


The female ghost did not show weakness, and screamed back, saying: 
"Yes, what happened to the pig? You are dead!" 


Many voices on the long street screamed, "The female ghost Lancome is 
making trouble!" "Zhu Butcher chopped the ghost!" The two sides 
screamed so madly, and Xie Li finally got out. He walked out of the way 
and looked back over and sighed. 


Not long after, there was a noisy front, walking and walking, before he 
came to a huge red building. 


This building can be described as extraordinary, pillars, roofs, and exterior 
walls, all painted in a magnificent red color, with a thick layer of gorgeous 
carpet. I really want to say that compared to the palace of the heavens, it is 
not bad, but it is only solemn, but it is more beautiful. The people in front 
of the door came and went, the people inside the door were full of people, 
and they were very lively. Listening carefully, here seems to be a gambling 
house. 


Thanks for the pity, I went up and saw two words hanging on the columns 
on both sides. On the left is "I don't want money," and on the right 1s "I 
want to win." Look at the above, horizontal batch: "hahahaha." 


It’s so rough, it’s not worthy of being called a couplet, and the writings are 
rough and frantic. There is no such thing as a brushstroke. It seems that 
whoever drunk is carrying a big pen and is full of malicious waves, and is 
hurricane. The evil spirits have blown through and become such a virtue. 
Thanks to the former, the king was a king, and the calligraphy was 
directed by a number of famous teachers. This kind of word is in his eyes, 
naturally it is terrible. However, they have been ugly to the point of 
demon, but instead let Xie pity look a little bit like laughing, shaking his 
head, thinking that the wind division should not play here, or go to the 
beauty shop for the female ghost to repair the face Let's go. 


He really should have gone so far. However, the ghost made the difference, 
and did not take a few steps. He turned back and went in. 


The gambling lobby was full, and the crowds were swaying, laughing and 
crying. Xie pity just walked down a few steps, and suddenly heard a 
scream, he fixed his eyes and looked at it. The four masks of the big man 
carried a person and came over. 


The man seemed to be very painful. He was still struggling and arrogant 
when he was carried. He walked along the road and blew his blood. It 
turned out that his legs were cut off, blood flow like a note, and a little 
devil is following all the way, greedily smashing the blood on the ground, 
cleaned up. 


Such a horrible scene, no one in the gambling house looked back and 
looked at it, still shouting, cheering, and rolling. However, originally, most 
of the people who play here are not people. If they are people, they are not 
ordinary people. 


Thanks for the sideways side, let the four great men carry people out and 
continue to go inside. A little girl wearing a smiley face greeted her and 
smiled. "This son, are you coming in to play?" 


Thanks a little smile, said: "I have no money, can you just look at it?" 


In his experience, he usually says this in the store. It is all about being 
bombarded. If you don't have money, what do you do? However, the little 


sly was stunned: "It doesn't matter if you don't bring money. Most people 
who play here are not money." 


Thanks: "Is it?" 
Xiao Yan said, "Yes. Son, please come with me." 


She waved her hand to thank her, and Nana was on her way, thanking her 
with a sigh of relief and looking around. 


Whether it is looking outside or from the inside, this gambling house is 
gorgeous and not exaggerated. It is gorgeous and not glamorous. It can be 
said that it is a very tasteful building. The little sister led the pity to the 
end of the lobby, where there was a long table surrounded by three floors 
and three floors. Thanks to the past, I heard a man say, "I bet I am a hand!" 


There are too many onlookers, thank you for not being able to get in and 
can only stand outside and listen. Suddenly, he heard another person lazily 
said: "No need. Don't say one hand, it is your dog's life, and it is worthless 
here." 


As soon as I heard this voice, my heart was thankful. 
He meditated: "Sanlang." 


It is indeed the voice of the boy who 1s only in the ear. However, it is 
slightly lower than what he remembers. 


However, for this reason, the sound is more pleasant, even in the laughter 
of the four-around view, the voice is also very clear, piercing the gambling 
gambling, and hitting the bottom of his ear. 


Thanks to pity, he found that after the long table, there was a curtain. After 
the curtain, I could see a red figure faintly, leaning leisurely on a chair. 2k 
novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 36: Red clouds 
and flowers 


Although Huacheng’s sentence is full of contempt, it is extremely rude, 
but when he opens his mouth, the man is allowed to laugh at others and 
dare not argue. Thank you for your kindness: "This son, you are really 
lucky today." 


Thanks to the gaze has not been transferred, said: "How to say?" 


Xiao Xiaodao said: "Our city owners rarely come here to play, it is these 
few days, suddenly came to the interest, is this still bad luck?" 


Listening to her tone, it is a great admiration for this "city lord", extremely 
admired, as long as he can see him, it is a great blessing, thankful and pity 
can not help but smile. 


is a gauze, red shadow . This kind of scenery is awkward. Before 
the red curtain, there were still a few beautiful girls standing at the table. 
Xie Li originally planned to stand outside and look at it. After hearing the 
sound of Huacheng, he began to try to squeeze in, but still did not make a 
sound first. He squeezed into the third floor and finally saw the man who 
bet on the gambling table. 


That is a living person. Xie Pity is not surprised. As I said earlier, there are 
not only ghosts in the ghost city, but also many alchemists who have been 
cultivated. Sometimes, some dying people, or those who have a heart and 
soul, will also be mistaken. The man also wore a mask, and the two 
exposed eyes were bloodshot, red like blood, and white lips, as if many 
days without seeing the sun, although it was a living person, it was like a 
ghost than other ghosts present. 


He pressed his hands tightly against a black wood gambling table on the 
table, and for a while, as if he had gone out, he said, "But... why did that 
person just bet on his legs?" 


A girl in front of the curtain smiled and said: "The man was a **** thief. 
He has a good leg and walked south and north. It is the foundation of his 
life, so the legs are worthy of being a chip. You are neither a craftsman nor 
a famous doctor. What is your hand, what do you think?" 


The man bit his teeth and said: "Then I... I bet on me - my daughter's ten- 
year life!" 


Hearing words, thanking me for a sigh, said: "There is really a father who 
will gamble on the life of his child. Is this OK?" 


After the curtain, Huacheng laughed and said: "Yes." 


I don't know if it is an illusion. In this "walk", thank you for listening to a 
sense of coldness. 


He also said: "Sanlang said that he has always had good luck, and the 
lottery is also on the sign. If he gambles with this person, wouldn't he win 
the life of his daughter for ten years?" 


Just thinking about it, I listened to the girl at the long table and said: "The 
double number is negative, the odd number is victory. Once opened, there 
is no remorse. Please!" 


It turns out that Huacheng will not go out to gamble at all. The man 
trembled, his hands slammed against the gambling, and he swayed a little, 
and the lobby was a little quieter. The voice of the scorpion in the 
gambling was even more crisp. For a long time, his movements came to an 
abrupt end, and then, it was a dead silence. 


After a long time, the man picked up the corner of the gambling very 
slowly and slowly, and peeked through the seams, and the bloodshot eyes 
suddenly glimpsed. 


He slammed the raft, ecstatic: "Single! Single! Single! I won! I won! 
Hahahahahahahahaha I won! I won!!!!" 


The crowds around the long table want to see the result of this is not the 
result, they are all "squeaky", the table is up and down, big dissatisfaction. 
A girl smiled and said: "Congratulations. Your business will soon be 
better." 


The man laughed for a while and cried: "And slow! I still have to gamble." 
The girl said: "Welcome. What do you want this time?" 


The man sank his face and said, "I want, the few opponents I want to do 


with me in the same line, all violently | he 


It sounds like a loud voice in the lobby. The girl smiled and said: "If this is 
the case, it is more difficult than what you are asking for. You are not 
considering asking for something else? For example, let your business 
take it to the next level?" 


The man was red and red: "No! I will gamble this. I will gamble." 


The girl said: "So, if this is the case, your daughter's ten-year life, this chip 
may not be enough." 


The man said: "Not enough to add. I bet my daughter's 20-year life, plus ... 
plus her marriage!" 


All the ghosts are stunned and laughed. "This is a mad heart! Selling a 
daughter!" 


"Great, amazing!" 


The girl said: "The double number is negative, the singular is the victory. 
Once opened, there is no remorse. Please!" 


The man began to shake the gambling again. If he loses, his daughter will 
have to lose 20 years of life and a good marriage. Naturally, it is not good; 
but if he wins, will he let all his peers really violently die? But thank you 
for thinking that Huacheng should not let such a thing happen, but after 
hesitation, he still stood a little further. He still hesitated that he should not 


take a shot and make a subtotal. At this time, one person took him. He 
looked back and was actually Shi Qingxuan. 


Shi Qingxuan has recovered his male body and whispered: "Don't be 
impulsive." 


Xie pity also whispered: "How do you change back to the wind master?" 


Shi Qingxuan: "Hey, it’s hard to say a word, that group of aunts and little 
girls, dragging me to run, saying that I want to introduce a good store to 
me. I am so easy to escape, I am afraid that they will be caught again. I 
have to change back. They took me. I pulled a place and put a lot of things 
on my face. I pulled and pulled and shot and hit. You look at my face. Is 
there any problem? Is there anything wrong?" 


He put his face in front of the pity, and thanked him for watching it 
carefully. He said: "It seems to be smoother and more white." 


Teacher Qing Xuan listened, Rong Guanghuan said: "Yes? That's good, 
great, hahahaha. Where is the mirror? Where is the mirror? I look." 


Thanks for your pity: "Let's see it later. This ghost city can't be psychic, 
we must not go away. How do you know that I am here?" 


Shi Qingxuan: "I don't know if you are here. I came here because I have 
made an appointment with Qianqiu. I just came here. I just came here. 
Who knows that when I come in, I just saw you." "" 


Thanks to the pity: "Are you about a thousand years? Convergence here?" 


Shi Qingxuan: "Yes, Qianqiu is Lang Qianqiu, His Royal Highness, you 
should always know this? He is the guardian of the east of the martial arts. 
Let's come here, or compare with him. Ghost gambling is a ghost city. One 
of the most lively and mixed places, the building, the ghosts, the ghosts 
and many people, it is not easy to be suspicious, so I told him before, meet 
here." 


Thank you for your blessing. Looking back, the man hasn't opened his 
mouth yet, his eyes are white, he has words, and there are no other ghosts 
in the casino. He sighed: "This person..." 


Shi Qingxuan touched his face and said: "I know what you want to say, I 
agree. However, the ghost city is the site of Huacheng. The rules of the 
ghost gambler are your feelings, I dare to play, the heavens are the tube. 
No. Let’s wait and see what happens. If it doesn’t work, let’s find another 
way.” 

Thanks for a moment, I thought that Saburo should not let such things 
happen, and wait and see what happened, so I didn’t move any more. The 
man on the table seemed to have finally taken the courage to open the 
gambling, and the result was revealed. Who knows, at this time, suddenly 
one person snatched out, covered with a palm, took the black wood 
gambling, and took a crush! 


This palm not only shattered the gambling, but also smashed the man’s 
hand on the gambling, and took a whole table and was cracked. 


The mask man screamed at the ground with a hand smashed by the bones. 
The ghosts also shouted, some were applauding, and some were 
screaming. And the man made a hand, loudly said: "You, this person, so 
sinful heart! You ask for glory and wealth, but it is all right, what you ask, 


but others are violent | ?! You have to gamble, have the ability to take 
your own The gamble of life, take your daughter's life and marriage to 
gamble? It is not worthy of being a man, not worthy of being a father!" 


This young sword eyebrow star, heroic, although wearing only a simple 
soapsuit, not wearing Chinese clothes, but not hiding its extravagance. 
Who is not the Prince of the Prince of Yong’an? 


Seeing him, Xie Li and Shi Qingxuan were among the ghosts, and they 
held their faces at the same time. 


Thank you for your pity | "When the wind master, you... didn't tell him... I 
have to be careful when I get here, low-key is up..." 


CO CO CO CO CO CO CO CE CE CE CO CO CO CO CO CE CE CE CO CO CO CO 


Shi Qingxuan also 


GO CO CO CO CO CO CO CE CO CE CO CO CO CO " 
woe 


Thanks: "I understand... | understand..." 
At this time, the flower city behind the curtain smirked. 
And the heart of pity, followed by a hover. 


This young boy often laughs when he is with him. Up to now, Xie Pian has 
almost been able to distinguish it. When 1s he really sincere, when is he 
taunting, and when is it murder. 


Just listen to him leisurely: "Go to my field to make trouble, you are very 
courageous." 


Lang Qianqiu turned to the other side and looked at the audience: "You are 
the owner of this gambling house?" 


The ghosts on all sides shouted: "You don't know the children who are tall 
and thick, know who you are talking to? This is our city owner." 


Some people also sneered: "Stop this ghost gambling gambling. This 
whole ghost city is his!" 


Wen Yan, Lang Qianqiu did not react very much, but Shi Qingxuan was 
shocked and said: "My mother, the one behind, is that who?" Blood rain 
flower?" 

Thanks to pity: "Well... it is him." 

Shi Qingxuan: "Are you sure?!" 

Thanks, "I am sure." 


Shi Qingxuan: "Dead is dead. What should I do next?" 


Thanks: "...[ hope he won’t reveal his identity..." 


Lang Qianqiu looked around in a circle, but he became more and more 
angry. He said: "This ghost place is full of smoke and smoldering, and all 
the people are coming. What are they doing? What are you doing? You 
really open this place. There is no humanity at all!" 


The ghosts screamed and said: "We are not people, we want humanity, 
whoever wants to take it!" 


"What are you, come here to tell us about it!" 


Huacheng smiled and said: "My place, it was originally a carnival hell. 
There is a road in heaven, you don't go, there is no door to hell, you come 
in, then what is the solution?" 


Hearing the word "celestial world", Xie Li and Shi Qingxuan instantly 
understood. 


Huacheng really knows where Lang Qianqiu is playing! 


However, Lang Qianqiu did not understand the meaning of this sentence at 
all, but also a palm, kneeling on the long table. He stood at the end of the 
long table. This sly, everyone around the table sneaked away, and the long 
table rushed to the red shadow behind the curtain. But after seeing the 
behind-the-scenes figure, the figure was the same, and when he waved his 
hand, the long table rushed back in the opposite direction and ran into 
Lang Qianqiu. 


Seeing the long table attack, Lang Qianqiu first held it with one hand, and 
then seemed to find that one hand could not stand, and immediately 
changed hands. Standing on top, his forehead gradually floated up the 
shallow blue veins. The original hot lobby was hiding and running, and 
both Xie and Shi Qingxuan couldn't decide whether to help. After all, they 
should still be exposed, and they can help in the dark. I really want to 
jump out and help, and that’s what I’ve caught. 


There was a drink from Lang Qianqiu, and finally pushed the heavy long 
table back again. The shadow of the flower city behind the red curtain is 
still sideways, the five fingers gently gather, and then gently put it. When 


the long table broke, it broke into countless pieces of broken wood chips, 
and flew to Lang Qianqiu. 


These wood chips have a very sharp knife wind, which is more terrible 
than any hidden weapon. If Lang Qianqiu still hides mana and maintains 
the human body, it can't be escaped anyway. So, the next moment, he 
released a layer of shallow aura, Xie Li and Shi Qingxuan immediately 
understood, the heart said: bad, this will be the body! 


However, this layer of shallow aura immediately subsided, probably Lang 
Qianqiu finally remembered that the trip could not reveal his identity, so 
he quickly removed the aura when he was in the midst of a thousand miles. 
However, Lang Qianqiu closed his hand, and Huacheng couldn’t close his 
hand. After the red figure was sitting on the red curtain, the gesture 
changed, and the five fingers came together and lifted up slightly. 


This lift, Lang Qianqiu, the whole person suddenly hangs up, is a large 
font, floating on the ceiling of the gambling lobby! 


After being trapped, Lang Qianqiu did not seem to understand how he 
suddenly floated up, and earned two faces with a blank face. Xie pity and 
headache: "He is locked in mana, and it is not going to be able to make a 
law." 


Shi Qingxuan: "Ghost City is the site of Huacheng. It is also lockable to 
lock." 


Although now, Lang Qianqiu is subject to people, but there is also a 
benefit, that is, his true identity is probably barely to keep secret. 
Otherwise, if he only fights in the fight, and let people know that the 
Eastern Wushen Taihua really ran to the ghost market to make trouble, it 
would not be so simple. After all, for many years, in addition to some 
special events, the heavens and the ghosts are considered to be waters. 


The uninvited guest who was screaming at the gambling house was locked 
up. The ghosts who had escaped from the crowd all turned back, gathered 
under the lobby, pointing to Lang Qianqiu, who was locked in the air 
above, and laughed. Lang Qianqiu had never been affected by this 


dilemma, his face rose slightly red, and he did not say anything, secretly 
forced to break away from the invisible bondage. From time to time, there 
are ghosts jumping up and wanting to shoot his head. Fortunately, 
Huacheng has hung him very high and can't shoot it. Otherwise, this 
humiliation can be big. Huacheng smiled behind the red curtain: "To catch 
such a thing today, let's play it. Whoever is lucky to gamble on a big one, 
whoever takes it back and cooks it." 


Hearing, the lobby is cheering constantly, screaming more than: "Bet size! 
Bet size! The biggest point, take him back to cook!" 


"Oh, this little brother, it looks like a make-up, hehe..." 


"Ha ha ha ha ha haha stupid, let you not know who is on the site to make 
trouble!" 


The four masked men also carried in a new long table. No one cares about 
the mask man who mourns and rolls on the ground. All the ghosts gather at 
the long table and start the next round of gambling. And this time the bet 
is Lang Qianqiu hanging over the sky. Seeing that there was a lot of 
gambling over there, Shi Qingxuan walked around here and hurriedly fell: 
"What should I do? Are we going to gamble him back? Or do you start it 
directly?" 


Thanks to the pity: "How about your hand?" 


Shi Qingxuan: "Of course it is good time and bad, this kind of thing, how 
can it be determined?" 


Thanks to the pity: "Yes. For example, I have never been better." 
Shi Qingxuan: "So bad?" 
Xie pity nodded and said: "I roll the dice, up to two." 


Shi Qingxuan's brow wrinkled, and immediately got an idea. He shot the 
leg: "It's not like this. Since you have a maximum of two points, then you 


are the least number of points compared to others. No one can be smaller 
than you." It is." 


Thanks for thinking, said: "It makes sense, I will try." 


So, he leaned over to the long table and said: "It's better to change the 
rules to see who throws the fewest points? Who wins and who wins?" 


The table is sloppy, some say good, some say bad, thank you for grabbing 
two scorpions, try to throw a hand first. 


He meditated in his heart: "Small, small, small." After the throw, the two 
men came over and looked at it - two six points! 


Thanks: "..." 
Shi Qingxuan: "..." 


Thanks for the brow and the eyebrows: "It seems that the quality of the 
hand is not changed because of the changes in the rules." 


Shi Qingxuan also learned his appearance and frowned, saying: "If we still 
go straight to play." 


At this time, a girl approached the red curtain and leaned slightly. It 
seemed to listen to what the people behind the scene said. He nodded and 
looked up again. He said: "Please calm down and the city owner has 
something to say." 


As soon as she said that the city owner had something to say, the ghosts 
immediately stopped and were extremely quiet. The girl said: "The city 
owner said that the rules change." 


The ghosts said: "The city owner is the rule!" 
"What the city owner said is what it is!" 


"What is it like?" 


The girl said: "The city owner said that he is in a good mood today and 
wants to play with them. You can gamble with him and the person who 
wins can lift the above thing. Whether it is steamed, boiled, or fried. Stir- 
fried and cured, all by the winner." 


When I heard that I was going to gamble with the city owner, all the 
ghosts were hesitant. It seems that Huacheng really never played. There 
are a few bold temptations to try, but no one dares to come up first. Lang 
Qianqiu has been struggling on the top and angered: "What is this thing? I 
am not something. Why do you take me to make a bet?" 


He shouted "I am not something", many female ghosts listened, snickered 
and snickered, staring at Lang Qianqiu, blushing his tongue across his lips, 
as if he wanted to take him to the abdomen. . Thank you for your pity: 
"Hey... this kid. You still have to say a few words." 


Silently sighed, he stood up and said warmly: "If this is the case, then 
please let me try it." 


Wen Yan, the figure behind the red curtain also paused, and then slowly 
rose. 


The girl in front of the curtain smiled and said: "So, please ask the son to 
come forward." 


Inside the lobby, everyone was automatically separated from the open 
space, giving the warrior a way. Thanks for the pity, the girl asked for a 
black and shiny gambling, saying, "You please." 


She used to treat those gamblers, and they all used "you". Although the 
words were peaceful, the tone was not polite. At this time, he used "you" 
and his tone was very smooth. Thanks for accepting this black wood 
gambling from her hands, thank you very much, and coughed. 


He barely touched this kind of thing, holding it in a mess, and pretending 
he was very good. Shaking, looking up, looked at Lang Qianqiu hanging 
above. Lang Qianqiu also widened his eyes and looked at him with his 
eyes, but finally, he did not shout anything. Look at his look, thank you for 


being indifferent and want to laugh, hold back. Shake for a long time and 
finally stopped. 


Countless pairs of eyes are staring at the cockroach in his hand. Xie pity 
also feels that this little gambling has become extremely heavy. I don't 
know what position to use to open it. Just as he was about to uncover the 
results, the girl said again: "And slow." 


Thank you, "What is it?" 
The girl said: "The city owner said that your posture is not right." 


Thanks for thinking: "Is it really correct posture? Is it because I had bad 
luck before, because the posture is wrong?" 


He humbly said: "What kind of posture 1s the correct posture?" 


The girl said: "The city owner said, please come up, he is willing to teach 
you." 


It is said that the ghosts in the gambling are making a sigh of relief. 


Thanks to the sneaky hear: "The city mainly teaches him, this is really a 
mystery, this person is not going to die." 


"The city owner wants to do it? Who 1s this person? Why should I teach 
him?" 


"Isn't that shaken like that?? Is there any correct posture?" 


Xie Li is also thinking about this problem, the girl has been invited to the 
red curtain, said to him: "Please." 


So, thanking the black wood gambling, and before the red curtain. 


The gauze flutters and the red shadows linger. The people behind the 
scenes are standing opposite, between the two, only half-armed. 


Breathing for a moment, one hand separated from the red scorpion, from 
behind the scenes, covered with the back of the pity, held the gambling. 


This is a right hand, slender and pale, with clear knuckles and a red line on 
the third finger. 


Under the dark and radiant raft, the white 1s paler and the red is more 
vivid. Slowly, thank you for raising your eyes. 


After the red silk general yarn, silently stood an 18-year-old nine-year-old 
boy. 


It is Saburo. 


It is still the clothing red wins maple, the skin is white snow. It is still the 
beauty of the handsome, unrecognizable juvenile face, but the outline is 
more clear, faded young people's youth, more calm and calm. Said that 
this is a teenager, but can also say that this is a man. 


The frenzied wildness between his eyebrows and the arrogance. It is still a 
bright, star-like scorpion, twilight, and staring at the pity. 


Just, bright as a star, but only one left eye. 


A black eye mask covered his right eye. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 37: Red clouds 
and flowers are pitiful 2 


The red gauze is only separated by a shallow line. In this position, only the 
pity can see the people behind the scenes. The other people in the lobby 
are blocked by his body. They can't see, of course, they don't dare to look 
around. The left eye stared at the pity, and the pity also stared at him and 
entered God. 


This appearance of Huacheng not only looks like a grown up, but also has 
a higher body. I used to show him pity, and I can barely look at it. Now, if I 
look at him, I have to raise my head. 


Looking at the sun, the flower city slowly opened. 
He sighed: "You are bigger than big, or small." 


This voice is low and sweet, and thank you for this. Anyway, it is the same 
as big and small, no difference, so he replied: "Be big." 


Huacheng Road: "Good. I will come first." 


Thanks to the left hand holding the chassis of the black wood gambling, 
the right hand pressed the round lid above. Huacheng stood opposite him, 
his right hand covered his left hand, shook it with a light, and then opened. 
I saw the top of the chassis, two dice, one six o'clock, one five o'clock. 


Lang Qianqiu, who was hanging above, could see clearly. When I saw it, it 
was so big that I couldn’t help but widen my eyes. I was very surprised: 
"How could this be??" 


Huacheng slightly loosened a hand and thanked him: "Swing like this, you 
try." 


Thanks to him, he learned how he looked and shook it twice. Huacheng 
said: "No." 


Although it is said that thanking the pity is not right, but the tone is very 
soft and extremely patience. Said, Huacheng once again held the hand 
below him, his left hand also explored, over the right hand of Xie pity 
holding the lid, whispered: "This is the case." 


In this way, the back of the hand of both hands is covered by the palm of 
the flower city. 


The skin touches and the temperature is as cool as jade. The pair of 
gorgeous silver wristbands are cold and iron. However, the movements of 
the flower city seem to be careful, and they are not allowed to touch the 
pity. His hands with his pitiful hands shook the black wood gambling. 


One, two, three. 


9 ’ 


The two scorpions are boned, rolling in the black raft, lingering and 
slamming, and the sound is crisp. However, it was such a faint vibration, 
but it was shocking and thankful. And this silky, climbed up along his 
wrist and spread. 


Shaking and shaking, Xie pity unconsciously raised his eyes and glanced 
at it, and found that Huacheng did not look at the gambling, but he kept 
staring at him, his lips curled slightly. Xie pity couldn't help but smile at 
him. Then I remembered that there were still a lot of ghosts and ghosts 
watching from above. I immediately smiled and looked down at the 
gestures that Huacheng played with. He said, "Why?" 


Huacheng’s lips smiled deeper and said: “Yes. Yes, that’s it.” 


Looking at the pity and shaking a few hopes with hope, he said again: 
"Open it?" 


Thanks for the pity, I saw the two white scorpions on the chassis. It was 
two three points. 


Two of the three points are already amazing achievements. The praying 
heart seems to have a spring breeze, and I thought: "Is it really I have 
caught it?" 


However, even if the results are amazing, six points is still smaller than 
eleven. He coughed softly and said: "Sorry, I lost." 


Huacheng said: "It doesn't matter, this is not a bad thing. I am teaching 
you now, come back." 


This sentence comes out, regardless of whether Lang Qianqiu or Shi 
Qingxuan is dazzling. The ghosts in the hall are even more stunned and 
have made a fuss: 


"What happened to the city owner? I thought the city mainly gave him a 
good look. The result is really teaching him??" 


"Is this still not worth it?? Can you still play like this??" 
"This is not counting, when will it be counted?" 
"It seems that the mood of the city owner is really good today..." 


Huacheng picked the left eyebrow and the girl outside said immediately: 
"Please calm down." 


The lobby was quiet again in an instant, but although I didn't talk, my eyes 
were even more unscrupulous. Huacheng smiled and encouraged him in 
his ear: "Come on?" 


Probably because there are too many ghosts in the gambling house, Xie 
Pity feels that the cheek epidermis is a bit hot, saying: "Okay." 


The bones were muddy and bones were shaken, and two more were shaken. 
This time, when I opened it, it was actually two four points. 


Huacheng Road: "How is it, 1s it a little bigger?" 


Although I felt a bit wrong, but thank you for nodding, said: "Yes... a little 
bigger." 


Huacheng Road: "Do well, continue." 


He is so tempting, but somehow, there are many sly laughter and sounds 
that seem to be female ghosts. Xie pity is also unclear, in the end what 
posture is correct. He first began to study how the hand of Huacheng was 
placed, how fast and how to grasp it, but now he just let the flower city 
take it with him. Shaking and shaking, there is a growing trend of more 
and more intense, thank you for thinking: "Sanlang is not yelling at me..." 


Lang Qianqiu has been watching it at the top, probably as he feels, and 
can't help but say: "You, don't shake it. He is clearly lying to you, what is 
the correct posture. He must have cheated!" 


He shouted out loud, and Shi Qingxuan once again covered his face. 


Under the screams, the screams of the scorpion screamed and smashed, 
and they all said: "I don't know, don't talk!" 


"Noisy, big guys are seeing the wonderful place!" 


"The leader of the road is doing the posture of the bishop of our city. The 
result is more than one time but the truth!" 


"Yes! What do you know!" 


Lang Qianqiu angered: "You, this group of people who are blind and 
swearing words... Ah!!" 


He suddenly stopped his mouth and flushed his face. It turned out that the 
female ghosts at the bottom licked the belt he had hanged down and said: 
"The younger brother is going to be noisy again, you can't talk nonsense 
again, my sisters may want to lick your pants. La!" 


Lang Qianqiu has never been subjected to this kind of threat, and he is too 
angry to speak. He said: "You...you!" 


If it was only a group of ghosts, it would be fine, but if he was really 
smashed, he would sit on the side of the **** of the gods, and the face 
would be lost. Now Lang Qianqiu would not dare to say more. Xie pity 
looked up and saw that he was desperate to lick himself with his eyes, and 
he was funny and pitiful. He had to bow his head and whisper to 
Huacheng: "...Sanlang." 


Listening to him shouting, Huacheng smiled and said: "Don't worry about 
him. We continue." 


Thanks for the helplessness, holding the gambling, and shaking two more. 
Unsurprisingly, this time, shake out two "five". 


Seeing the situation, the ghosts are more fun, and they are more and more 
crazy. They say, "Is there no? It is getting bigger and bigger!" 


And thankfulness has long been discovered, this is Huacheng playing with 
him. He is a little bit dumbfounded, thinking that there is no correct 
posture in the world. For him, what posture is wrong, and he can 
completely abandon any transshipment in the future. I am preparing to 
shake the last one on my own, but Huacheng said: "Wait a minute." 


Thanks for feeling that he pressed his palms a little more heavily and 
stopped, saying: "What?" 


Huacheng is half-truth and authentic: "This brother, you seem to have not 
said, what should you do if you lose?" 


Listening to his expression of "cheer brother", the expression of Shi 
Qingxuan and Lang Qianqiu is really hard to say. And the ghosts are also a 
horrible thing, and a few are scared to the ground. 


It’s also embarrassing to say that I’m so anxious, thank you for not 
thinking about the bet, saying: “This...” 


What he originally thought was also to put on his ten-year life. However, 
the life of the official 1s long, and ten years 1s probably nothing. Silver 
money treasure? nonexistent. Mana Spirit? nonexistent. For a moment and 
a half, thankfulness could not think of it. There was something to bet, so I 
had to ask the owner of the gambling house. He said: "Do you think that 
there is something in me that is worth making a bet?" 


Wen Yan, Huacheng laughed. 
He said: "I don't care. What is on your body?" 


Thanks for thinking, I coughed, and told the truth: "I... this time, I only 
brought a **** that I didn't finish." 


Wen Yan, Huacheng sneered out. He smiled, but others wanted to laugh 
and laugh. 


After the laughter was finished, Huacheng nodded and said: "Yes. Just the 
girl." 


This statement is not only a group of ghosts, but even those girls who hold 
the table are shocked. 


Since the opening of this gambling house, there have been countless 
incredible bets. Have internal organs, have longevity, have emotions, and 
have the ability. However, no bet, there is no such incredible today: a 
gimmick that has not finished eating. Even Lang Qianqiu couldn't help it, 
and said: "This... What does this mean? You mean me... I only value one 
girl who has not finished eating?" 


A group of ghosts haha, some people shouted: "What's wrong with a girl? 
You are cheap, you can't stop!" Xie Li listened, and the sound of this 
collapse is the teacher Qing Xuan hiding in the group of ghosts. Just 
laughing and laughing, Huacheng said to him: "Come. Finally, don't be 
nervous." 


Thanks: "I am not nervous." 


The two still maintained their hands and hands on their backs and shook a 
few. Although thankfulness is really not very nervous, but he sticks to the 
gambling hand palm, and the back of the hand of the flower city, it seems 
to have pulled out a layer of faint thin sweat. Finally, the two stopped their 
actions, and at the moment when they revealed the victory, he took a 
breath and opened it. 


Two dice, two six o'clock! 


Thank you for your relief, knowing what is going on, and looking up at 
Huacheng. Huacheng raised an eyebrow and said: "Hey, I lost." 


He confessed to this voice, although he was serious, but he was not 
sincere. The ghosts in the hall are also silent. 


There are still people who say "This is not counting, then when is the 
number", now the answer comes out: until the winner, it is counted. 


This release of water is too mad! 


However, no one will say anything about it. The girl took the black wood 
gambling and lifted it up. "Congratulations, this son, this game, you won." 


Everyone gave a lot of face and shouted: "The city loses and loses 
perfectly! Beautiful!" 


"The winner is not taught by the city owner. It is also good for the city 
bishop to win!" 


"Yeah! Today is an eye-opener, learning the correct posture of shaking the 
dice! Benefiting a lot! Ten years can not be used!" 


Listening to the sound of a group of magical dances around, thank you and 
pity can not help. Seeing that he smiled, Huacheng also laughed and dialed 
ared gauze. At this time, Lang Qianqiu said at the top: "Since you lost, let 
me down!" 


Huacheng still stared at the pity, the smile did not change, the eyes did not 
lift, just raised his hand, and waved, Lang Qianqiu immediately slammed 


down. That loud noise, I heard a lot of gratitude. Shi Qingxuan couldn't be 
exposed, and he couldn't rush over, so he turned and leaned over and 
leaned over to see, "You are alright." 


Lang Qianqiu climbed up and patted the gray on his body. "Nothing, thank 
you. He wants you to go up and definitely wants to cheat and let you lose. 
Fortunately, you are gambling!" 


Thank you for your pity: "This is completely wrong. If he doesn't give me 
water, I will be gambling that I will not win back to you..." 


Just thinking, he suddenly heard a few "squeaky" sounds, and then there 
was a low exclamation. Thanks for looking back, it turned out that 
Huacheng finally came out from behind the red curtain. 


Before the juvenile form, the flower city was full of long hair, but at this 
time it was covered in red, black hair was scattered, and the beauty was 
fascinating. Only a small scorpion on the right side, with red coral beads, 
but with a bit of playfulness. The wristband is silver, the boot chain is 
silver, the belt is silver, and a slender scimitar is hung around the waist. 
The curve is round and smooth, and it is also silver. The blade is slender 
and the person is slender. He leaned on the side of the half-open red yarn, 
holding his arm, and his face looked like a smile, saying: "Brother, you 
won me." 


Of course, thank you for knowing what is going on, but helplessly: "You 
don't laugh at me." 


Huacheng raised his eyebrows: "No. How come?" 
The ghosts in the group are extremely excited. The boiling water is 
generally rolling, and they are all excited. They whispered: "How did the 


city owner change a piece of leather today?" 


"To die, the new master of the city, I am going to die, and it’s fresh and 
strong!" 


"What is dead, you are not already dead, or a mother-in-law?!" 


It seems that because Huacheng has never been able to show the public in 
the past, and frequently change the skin, so that even the ghosts of the 
ghost city can't figure out what he looks like. He thinks that this 
appearance is also a fake skin he wears. However, only the pity and the 
heart know that the face must be the true meaning of the legendary blood 
rain. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 38: Red clouds 
and flowers are pitiful 3 


Xie pity stares at the red boy and says, "You..." 


He wants to say something. However, there are countless pairs of eyes 
looking at this side. The attitude of Huacheng is very embarrassing. It 
seems that he knows him and he does not know him. He does not know if 
he can’t show up in the ghost market. Come out to meet him, intentionally, 
and not much to say, just say: "Thank you." 


Lang Qianqiu said: "Why should you thank him? This place is what he 
opened, and he was uneasy from the beginning." 


"..."" Xie pity whispered, "His Royal Highness, don't say it, go quickly." 


If I stayed there, I still don't know what Lang Qianqiu wants to say. 
Moreover, there are still things in the body. I can't help but stay in the city. 
He looked at Huacheng several times and pushed Lang Qianqiu out. At this 
time, Huacheng said behind him: "And slow." 


I heard the sound, thanked me and stopped, and turned back. There are 
voices in the group of ghosts: "The city owners, can't just let them go!" 


"This person is suspicious and powerful, and I am afraid that it is not easy 
to come. In my opinion, it is time to stay and torture." 


"Yes, I can't say, this is the spy sent from which side, deliberately going to 
our land to make a living!" 


This last sentence, but it is tied. It is indeed from the heavens, but the 
intention is not to make a living, but to intend to explore the situation. Xie 
Pity is not sure whether Huacheng has seen the glimmer of Lingguang 
under the rush of Lang Qianqiu, and he has not fully grasped that he will 
see them and will let them go. The heart is slightly suspended. I listened to 
the flower city and said: "Don't you leave your bet?" 


Thanks for the slightest sigh, said: "Bet?" 


Lang Qianqiu stopped in front of him and warned: "Do you want to go 
back again?" 


Xie pity but thought: "Samuro promised that people can not repent, 
probably has something else?" So, he stood up behind Lang Qianqiu and 
said: "But we only gambled, I have not won. ?" 


Huacheng Road: "It’s true that my brother has won me. It’s true. But don’t 
forget, you lost a hand in front of you.” 


Thank you for your pity, said: "You said it, it doesn't matter, it doesn't 
count." 


Although the gambling loss is not counted, the gambling wins only counts, 
which sounds very cheeky, but thank you for being cheeky. Huacheng 
Road: "The few plates that gamble with me, of course, do not count. I said, 
the first one you bet below." 


Thanks to this, I remembered that Huacheng said that he tried to throw two 
sixs than the hour. 


Lang Qianqiu said: "I said that he was uneasy and didn't plan to let us go 
so cheaply. I won't be locked again this time." 


Hearing that he was ready to play another round, he was eager to try. Xie 
Pity quickly took him and said: "Nothing, don't be nervous, don't need to 
fight again." 


Over there, Huacheng squinted his head and said, "How? Brother, do you 
recognize it?" 


I am willing to gamble and lose, but what about confession? So, thanked 
and nodded, said: "I recognize." 


Huacheng spread his left hand and said: "That, just give me a good bet." 


...say a good bet? 


For a moment, Xie pity put his right hand into the left sleeve, touched it, 
touched half a hoe, and couldn't look at it directly, and daring his hand out, 
saying: "You said... is this? ” 


To be honest, when I took out this half of the gimmicks, Xie pity only felt 
that this face, which had not collapsed for eight hundred years, suddenly 
trembled and could not be hanged. 


The ghosts in the hall have long had nothing to say, and they are quietly 
onlookers. The first time the city owner came out to gamble with people, 
the agreed bet was a gimmick that had not finished eating, and that would 
be the case, perhaps the city owner was having fun. However, the city 
owner actually found someone to recover this half gimmick. Nothing to 
say, really nothing to say. Some ghosts can't help but have a bold idea: 
either the secret is hidden in the half of the gimmick, or the person is 
really the brother of the city! 


Huacheng took it with a smile, lifted it up and took a look, and shook it in 
his hand, saying: "Bet, I received it." 


Seeing that he really took it, thank you for not knowing what to say. For a 
long while, I said: "That... cold. It seems, it is a bit hard." 


Huacheng Road: "It doesn't matter. I don't mind." 


He replied in this way, thanking that there is no room for answering the 
words. He can already say what he said, and turned around and went out. 
The gambling gambling party gave him a clue, and the rush was to see him 
first, a warrior. This time he gave way to him, but he looked at him with 
awe and curious eyes. Thanks for a few steps, I heard a lot of ghosts 
behind me: "The city owner, the city owner, where are you going next?" 


Huacheng replied lazily: "Today is happy, go to the bliss." 


It’s said that the lobby is full of joy, as if it’s a holiday. Thanks and pity, I 
couldn’t help but look back. I saw that Huacheng also turned around. He 
held the half of the **** in his hand and threw a throw. He bowed his head 
casually and his eyes cast aside. 


Seeing this scene, Xie pity soles a slight meal, I do not know why, I feel 
that this place can no longer stay a little longer, speed up the pace, 
screaming Lang Qianqiu quickly ran out. 


The two went out of the gambling house and ran for a long way. On the 
road, they almost knocked down the hawkers stalls. It was easy to get to a 
slightly secluded alley. Shi Qingxuan immediately came out and joined 
them. Shi Qingxuan madly folded the fan, fanned his hair and flew, said: 
"Good insurance, my mother, I was really scared that my face was white." 


Probably rushing too fast, thank you for a heart is also jumping. Lang 
Qianqiu said: "Yeah, Fengshi adults, I think your face is very white now." 


Shi Qingxuan touched his face and smiled: "Is it? Hahahaha, this is not 
scary, this is my birth... cough! Cough, Qianqiu, you are also a **** of the 
city, how can you be so impulsive? This is in their ghost In the realm of 
the world, if you are caught, your identity 1s exposed, and it is the celestial 
priest who disguise himself as a sneak sneak into the ghost market and 
ruin the three worlds. How do we explain to the emperor?" 


Lang Qianqiu bowed his head and honestly said: "I'm sorry, I am 
impulsive." He looked up again. "But those gamblers are too sick and mad. 
If the man opens the cockroach, no matter whether he wins or loses, or his 
daughter. Unlucky, or his peers suffered. When I was angry, I broke the 
cockroach." 


Teacher Qingxuan: "Then you should not rush out directly on your own." 


Lang Qianqiu groaned and said: "What about the wind master, what should 
I do? I don't rush out, and no one else will rush out." 


He asked seriously, Shi Qingxuan was a little nervous and used his fan to 
tilt his temples. He said: "This..." 


Thanks a little smile, said: "Forget it." 


Lang Qianqiu looked up at him. Thanks again and again: "I think that even 
if His Royal Highness Taihua is caught, how to torture and not tell the 


other person's identity. However, in order to avoid the other side's clues 
from the clues of speech, His Royal Highness will still Be careful, don't be 
caught." 


Lang Qianqiu nodded: "Good! I know." 


Teacher Qingxuan: "Don't say it, don't say it. Oh, yes, Your Royal 
Highness..." 


This "Prince Edward", Xie Li and Lang Qianqiu turned to look at him at 
the same time, Shi Qingxuan said: "Oh, I am called this older." 


" " 


Xie pity a little depressed and embarrassed, and said: "Older... Well, it is a 
little bigger, but it is not much bigger. Why do you always say that I am 
talking about an old man?" 


Teacher Qingxuan: "His Royal Highness, have you ever had a face in the 
Shenwu Temple before you? Haven’t you ever said that I will introduce 
you to each other. This is the Prince of the Yong’an Kingdom, Lang 
Chiaki, who lives in the East. This is the prince of the Prince of Xianle, 
thanking him, and accepting... receiving... a priest who relies heavily on 
the emperor." 


The word that he stuck in, needless to say, thank you for knowing what was 
picked up later, and it’s broken! However, if the words are forced to 
change their mouths, even the syntax will not be taken care of. Lang 
Qianqiu listened and looked forward to thanking him. "You are the one 
who has risen three times?" 


It seems that before the Shenwu Temple, Lang Qianqiu really fell from the 
beginning to the end, even he did not remember. If you change someone, 
saying such a sentence in the face of pity, must be ridiculous. However, 
this is said from Lang Qianqiu's mouth. Xie Li fully believes that this 
child really only feels that flying three times is very rare. He smiled and 
said: "Yes, it is me." 


Lang Qianqiu said: "I really thank you for your talents! Otherwise..." He 
remembered something, and quickly lowered his head and closed his belt, 
tied tightly, and looked worried. He obviously didn't think too much about 
the relationship between Xianle and Yong'an. Shi Qingxuan also thought 
that it would be almost enough to introduce it. He said to him: "His Royal 
Highness, is this blood raining flower not knowing you? Why do you want 
it? Put on a look that is not familiar to you?" 


Lang Qianqiu tied his belt and said: "Is that **** rain? Is it the deity?" 


Xie pity has not yet opened, he listened to the teacher Qingxuan: "How 
could it be the deity? Huacheng has to change more than a hundred pieces 
of skin, no one knows what his deity looks like. Last time I went to see 
him half a month, it seems that It’s almost like this, it’s definitely a fake 
skin. It’s fake.” 


Chery has always remembered the phrase that Huacheng said to him in the 
Bodhisattva view. "When I see you again next time, I will see you with my 
original appearance." My heart said: "It is true." 


However, this sentence certainly did not say it. Seeing that everyone else 
thought it was a fake skin, only he knew that it was the true meaning of 
blood and rain, as if he knew a little secret. Then I thought about it again: 
"The appearance of Saburo is not much different from before. It seems to 
be a little bigger and taller. When he said this, when he first saw me, it was 
almost true. Rong Rong. "Inexplicably, there are some little pleasures. 


Over there, Shi Qingxuan said again: "Everyone said that Huacheng's 
temper is strange, it seems to be really weird. It is clear that it is giving 
you water, but also pretending to not know it, I don't know what medicine 
to sell in the gourd. Is it to let Let's relax our vigilance?" 


Hearing words, thank you for a few coughs. Sure enough, everyone can see 
that in the gambling house, the flower city has released water. It is no 
wonder that it is better to say that it is opening the gate, rather than 
releasing it. In fact, Lang Qianqiu still can't see it, frowning: "Is it water? 
Why?" 


The other two patted his shoulders. He chose to explain with him tacitly. 
He left Lang Qianqiu to stand alone and think about why Huacheng should 
give thanks and water, is it because they know each other. The two turned 
around and walked away, thanking the pity: "At the moment, our 
whereabouts are exposed. What should we do next? How about the skin 
change? I don't recommend skin change, it's useless, and Taihua's 
Highness is playing like this." The ghost market should strengthen the next 
round of warnings." 


Shi Qingxuan: "To tell the truth, I thought it would be exposed, but I didn't 
think it would be so exposed." 


Thank you, "I understand, I understand." 


Shi Qingxuan: "If you are exposed, you will be exposed. Since it is 
exposed, otherwise you will be on the ground." 


Thanks to the faint mind, what is called "bright and fair". Sure enough, Shi 
Qingxuan said again: "If you still want to lie, you can only go to the flower 
city with a bright future. Tell him that you are here to see him. He knows 
that you are the **** of heaven. If you know, You brought a few younger 
brothers from the heavens, and it makes sense." 


Who knows, thank you for not answering, Lang Qianqiu listened, but said: 
"No! " 


Shi Qingxuan: "Why not?" 


Lang Qianqiu seriously said: "His Royal Highness, do you know the blood 
and rain? I listen to what you said, you and he are friends." 


Thank you for your nod. Lang Qianqiu said: "Of course it will not work. 
Although I think this ghost king 1s not a good person, but he gives you 
water, it should be because you are a friend. In this case, you can't lie to 
deceive friends." 


Shi Qingxuan has a terrible headache: "Oh, you are a dead brain!" 


Thankful, but nodded with a smile, said: "It's very good. His Royal 
Highness said." 


Lang Qianqiu smiled and said: "You agree with me, are you?" 


Teacher Qingxuan: "Well, what is good, we have three priests. If we come 
out and go empty-handed, we will say that we are less efficient than the 
Lingwen Hall and we are dead." 


Thanks to everyone, I was about to talk, but I heard a cry of ghosts and 
wacks behind me. The three couldn’t help but look back. I saw a group of 
monsters and ghosts chasing and rushing past, and said: "That little 
masked face? That little masked face?" 


Thank you for seeing the other two look alert, "Nothing, not looking for 
us." 


As soon as the voice fell, a screaming scream broke through the ear and 
sharply penetrated into their ears. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 39: 42 Rif 
with the king asked Xianle 


Suddenly heard this scream, the heart of thankfulness suddenly shocked, 
the thoughts have not reacted, the body has already robbed. I saw a group 
of strange monsters and ghosts outside the alley, and they shouted: "Catch 
it!" 


"Kall him again!" 


"Fucking, this little dregs stole how many things Lao Tzu had to eat from 
Laozi." 


Teacher Qingxuan: "His Royal Highness, what happened to you?" 


Xie pity did not answer, step by step toward the other side. He went faster 
and faster, and finally ran up, forced to open a few people outside, and 
suddenly looked at it - was beaten in the middle of the beaten, is a ragged 
teenager, looking at the body 1s only fifteen or six years old, into a The 
group, shivering on the ground shivering. 


Although he held his head tightly, he could still see that the boy’s head was 
tangled with a number of bandages that, like his hair, had become dirty. 


Isn't this the kind of bandage boy who has seen the side with Junshan and 
disappeared without searching? 


It is no wonder that in the past few days, the Temple of the Spirit has said 
that it is fruitless to search for his whereabouts. If this boy fled into the 
territory of the ghost world, how can the spiritual temple of the heavens be 
searched in the world? 


The ghosts who were prayed away were furious and pulled him away. A 
ghost went to the bandage on the boy’s head and said, "This little chop is 
afraid of being ugly than I am, so afraid of people. These things on his 
facese' 


Lang Qianqiu angered: "What are you doing!" When they came up, they 
threw those people away again. Shi Qingxuan simply couldn’t stop it, but 
he had to slam the fan: “Against the good, it’s not going to be impulsive!” 


This time, many people were annoyed by Lang Qianqiu, and yelling at 
"You are a half-way to kill something," they rushed toward him. Lang 
Qianqiu said: "The wind master can't hold it, this 1s the last time!" This hit 
them with their ping-pong. Teacher Qing Xuan could not, called: "Hey! I 
will not go out with you again!" Next, naturally, I have to join the battle. 
They are not good at casting them to expose the aura, they can only punch 
and kick. There is still a small part of the boy who was beaten and prayed. 
He leaned over and tried to help the boy, saying, "Are you alright?" 


Upon hearing this voice, the boy’s shoulder shook and he looked down at 
him. This look, facing the pity, thanked the pity found that the bandages on 
his face were all soaked by blood, black and red, very embarrassing. This 
look is more terrible than the last time they were apart. The two big eyes 
exposed from the gap in the bandage are black and white, clear and clear. 
However, these dark eyes reflect the reflection of the pity, but full of fear. 
And timid. 


Thanks for helping the boy's arm, said: "Come, stand up. It's okay." He 
suddenly yelled "ah", shoved and prayed, and jumped and ran. 


Because this boy had suffered from human immunity, and the relationship 
with Xianle was inevitably irrelevant. Thanks to seeing him, he was 
shocked by the heart, and his heart was inevitably a bit embarrassed. He 
couldn’t help but be pushed away, and even the fight fell on the ground. He 
glanced and said: "Wait!" 


Thanks to pity to chase, the few evil spirits that were only opened by him 
were entangled. The boy fled to the long street, the bustling streets, and he 
was almost a short stature in the group of ghosts. If evil is difficult to find 
people in such places. In a hurry, thank you: "The two adults, here to you! 
We first split the action, you hide the whereabouts, meet here at the latest 
three days later!" If evil erupts, will be a few evil spirits I have to fly to 
the two. He took a short copy, copied the fight, and flew away in the 
direction of the boy's escape. 


He squeezed **** the street, shouting all the way: "Let's borrow! Borrow!" 
And the boy hides and hides in the world all the year round, escapes 
naturally and knows how to get a head, can see a head in a while, and see a 
back in a while, for a while I can't see it anymore, it is getting farther and 
farther. And I don't know if it is an illusion. I feel that this direction is 
getting more and more lively on the street. Everyone is getting more and 
more difficult. Because of my heart disorder, I accidentally knocked over 
several stalls. Xie quickly said: "I'm sorry! Sorry!" 


Ghosts are not so irritating, swearing: "I'm sorry to have a fart? Grab 
him!" Xie pity suddenly felt cold after a cold, seems to have a hand 
grabbed, a palm backhand back, said: "Who?!" 


He was arrested by a tentacle who did not know where to come from. A 
group of ghosts were surrounded. The voices of different heights and 
thicknesses surrounded him: "Hey! Let’s learn the little white face, and 
dare to make trouble in the ghost city. !" 


A large wave of black demon ghosts poured out, and he was about to 
smash him and the boy. Xie pity grasped the tentacle and tried to open it. 
"You are really sorry, it is really unintentional. Can you let me find it 
first?" People, go back and discuss how to compensate?" 


The ghosts don’t care: "Thinking about beauty!" 


Pushing the day, the boy finally disappeared completely. Thank you for 
your pity, really, he doesn't know what he feels. I really felt that I didn’t 
catch the other person’s disappointment, or I felt that my nightmare was 
far away from me. 


Suddenly, the ghost group swayed and automatically separated to the sides. 
It seemed that there was something wrong with it. Thanks to the pity, I saw 
a black man with a long shape and walked straight from him to the 
separated crowd. , said: "Don't be fooled, let go!" 


The black man and many devils and ghosts on the street, wearing a ghost 
face, the look of the ghost face 1s interesting, seems to be a helpless smile. 


The group of ghosts screamed "The next month is coming!" Finally let go 
of thanks. It seems that this is a big man in a ghost city. 


When he saw her pity, he bowed and said: "This road leader, the city owner 
has a request." 


Thank you for your self: "Ah, me?" 


The next month makes the road: "Exactly. The city owner has been waiting 
in the bliss workshop for a long time." 


Surrounded by a sigh of relief: "Is there a customer? I have not heard it 
wrong? The city owner?" "The bliss square? That is the warm blanket of 
the city owner, never invited outsiders to enter!" 


People from another street: "Wait, this person is not the one who won the 
city master in the ghost gambling today, isn't it, the leader who was taught 
by the city owner?!" 


A pair of twins and at least a bell with a big bell stared at the blessing and 
had to lift up the fight, and the next string made the road: "Please." 


Cheer nodded and kept up with him. 


The two sides of the crowd automatically separated a road, and the ghost 
led the way to pray and walk through it. No one dared to keep up with it. 
After a scent, the two left the busy street and went further and worse. 


During the period, the two rarely talked, and Xie pity always felt that the 
next month, when walking and walking, would be hidden in the darkness, 
and consciously followed tighter. And when he inadvertently swept the 

ghost's wrist, he suddenly found that there was a black curse on the wrist. 


This thing, he is familiar with it. 
Curse? ! 


He widened his eyes and was silently shocked. He suddenly heard the 
ghost and said: "This is the place." 


Thanks for raising his head, only to find out that he was led before a lake. 
Many faint wildfires chase the water on the water. At the water's edge, 
stands a splendid tall building. 


The heavens and ghosts have very beautiful buildings. However, the 
Hualou of the Heavenly Kingdom 1s full of glory, and the Hualou buildings 
in the ghost city are gorgeous and flamboyant. Even the three characters of 
"Bei Le Fang" on this high-rise building are full of demon. 


There was a strange song coming from it. Light and fluffy, soft, very 
embarrassing, as if many women are laughing and playing, while singing 
songs. 


Following the song, Xie pity slowly walked in, picked up the bead curtain, 
and a warm fragrance came. He slightly turned his head and seemed to 
avoid this sigh of relief. 


Above the main hall of the bliss, there is a thick layer of carpet. I don’t 
know what the fur of the beast 1s. It is a complete one. Many of the girls 
with good looks are barefooted with white feet, dressed in gauze, 
glamorously stretching their postures and singing and dancing. The songs 
were heard from them. 


The girls swayed as if they were countless roses with stingers and bloomed 
in the middle of the night. When he turned to Xie's pity, he sent his eyes to 
him quite teasingly. If there are late-night pedestrians, seeing this 
situation, I wonder if they will be more fearful, or they will be more 
obsessed. However, when she glanced at the entire hall, the line of sight 
directly penetrated the group. The first thing he saw was the flower city at 
the end of the main hall. 


At the end of the main hall, it is a long couch made of ink and jade. It is 
extremely spacious and can accommodate more than ten people and lie 
down, but only one person is sitting on the couch. It is the flower city. In 
front of him, there are countless gorgeous ghost girls who sing and dance, 
but Huacheng doesn’t even look at it at first glance, just staring at himself 
in front of him. 


In front of him is a small golden palace. A cursory look, like a building in 
the Temple of Heaven. Looking at it again, the palace was actually piled 
up with a piece of exquisite gold foil, and the center of his hand was not 
playing in the ground, it was a piece of gold foil. 


Gold foil is the temple. This game, when I was pity, I used to play in the 
Xianle Palace. The fun of the game, and the civilian children piled up the 
house with small stones, there is no difference. When he was young, his 
temperament always gathered and distracted. No matter what it was, if he 
put it together, he would not want to separate it. If he did it, he would not 
destroy it, so he would not be allowed to break up. Paste it, let 1t never 
change. When you are a little younger, if you see that the piled up house 
has fallen, you will be so sad that you can't eat and sleep. It will be good if 
you want his father to be a mother. Seeing that the palace was layered, 
there were probably more than a hundred pieces of gold foil, and it was 
trembled. It reminded me of a word: a dangerous egg. As if a breeze had 
blown over, 1t would fall, and Xie had no choice but to meditate: "Don't 
fall, don't fall." 


Who knows, after a moment, Huacheng stared at the palace for a moment, 
suddenly smiled, stretched out a finger, and gently flicked over the small 
gold temple - 


Oh, the whole golden temple collapsed. 


The gold foil scattered all over the place. Destroyed such a small golden 
temple, the look of the flower city is a bit pleasant, just like the joy of a 
child pushing down the building block toy. 


He took the piece of gold foil he had in his hand and jumped out of the 
couch. The group of dancing girls quickly retreated to both sides and did 
not sing. Huacheng stepped on the golden pieces of the land and walked 
over to the door. He said: "Since my brother has come, why hasn’t he come 
forward? Didn’t he just leave Sanlang with a few days?" 


After listening to this, Xie pity put down the bead curtain and said: "We 
are only at the gambling house, but Saburo pretends not to know me." 


Huacheng has already walked to him, saying: "Lang Qianqiu is also 
present. If I don't want to do it, I am afraid that I will give my brother 
trouble." 


Thank you for your kindness. It is indeed enough to be perfunctory. Maybe 
Huacheng is also well aware of the teacher Qingxuan who is mixed in the 
group of ghosts. Xie Pity does not hide anything, and said: "Sanlang is as 
broad-minded as that." 


Huacheng smiled and said: "This is natural. My brother, is this special to 
see me?" 


Ask yourself, if you are thankful to know that Huacheng is here, you will 
probably take a trip and visit it, but this time it is not. 


However, Huacheng was not waiting for his answer at all. He smiled and 
said: "I am happy whether you come to see me or not." 


Hearing words, thank you for your pity. He didn't say anything, just 
listened to the girls under the cover and gave a smirk. 


On the side of the flower city, they all bowed their heads and retired in an 
instant. There are only two people left in the Huadian Hall. Huacheng 
Road: "Brother is here to sit." 


Xie pity walked with him, looked at him, smiled and said: "This is your 
true face?" 


At the foot of Huacheng, there was a slight meal. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 40: 42 Rif 
with Jun asked Xianle 2 


I don't know if it is an illusion. She regrets that Huacheng's shoulder 
seems to be so stiff for a moment. Hey, he looked as usual: "I said it. I will 
see you next time, I will use my original face." 


Thank you, Charlie, sincerely said: "It's good." 


It is neither ridiculous nor relieved, naturally. Huacheng smiled, this time, 
the look 1s really as usual. The two walked a few steps, thanked Pity 
suddenly remembered a very important thing, took the silver chain from 
the chest and said: "Right, this, is it that you stayed?" 


Huacheng looked at the ring and smiled and said, "Give it to you." 
Thanks: "What is this?" 
Huacheng Road: "It's not a valuable thing, you have fun." 


Although he said so, thank you for knowing that this thing must be 
expensive and scary, saying: "That would thank Sanlang." 


Seeing that he put the ring back again, there was a shimmer in the flower 

city. Xie pity looked around and said: "When you listen to the bliss in the 

gambling workshop, I thought that the bliss is what the fireworks land. So 
it seems like a song and dance party." 


Huacheng raised his eyebrows: "What my brother said 1s this, I never go to 
the fireworks." 


This is to teach the pity, and said: "Really?" 


Huacheng Road: "Nature is true." The two men walked to the side of the 
ink jade and sat down, and he said: "This place is my play, it is one of the 
residences, there is no time to sway, no time "" 


Thanks to pity: "It turned out to be your home." 
Huacheng corrected it: "Home. Not home." 
Thanks to the pity: "What is the difference?" 


Huacheng Road: "Of course. There are family members in the family. 
Where people live, don't call home." 


Thank you for listening, my heart touched. In this way, he has not had such 
a thing as "home" for more than 800 years. Although there is no lonely 
color on Huacheng's face, but Chery feels that they may be similar. I also 
listened to Huacheng Road: "If it is a home, even a small place like 
Bodhisattva is thousands of times better than my bliss." 


Thanks for the deep pity, he smiled and said: "Sanlang is actually a person 
who is passionate and sexual. But you actually take the view of 
Bodhisattva and contrast here, I am really ashamed of me." 


Huacheng Haha said: "What is this shame? It is not the opposite, my 
brother's view of Bodhisattva is small, but I feel much more comfortable 
than my bliss. It is more like a home." 


Thank you for your kindness: "Is it? If you don't want to give up, if you 
want to go in the future, go live. My door to Bodhisattva is open for you at 
any time." 


Huacheng's eyebrows bent and said: "Brother, this is what you said, then I 
would be more respectful than my life. I will not bother me in the future." 


Thanks: "No, no! Yes, Saburo, there may be something to ask you, I 
wonder if you have time?" 


Huacheng Road: "What? In my place, something is directly said." 


Thanks to the pity: "I have dealt with something in Junshan before. I have 
met a teenager who may have some relationship with my home country." 


Huacheng blinked and said nothing. Xie pity continued: "The boy was 
scared to escape excessively. After searching for a long time, he found 
nothing in the ghost city. Only then did he find that he actually came here. 
Saburo is the owner here. I don't know if I can ask. Can you find it for me? 
The boy’s face is full of straps and he has just escaped from the front of 
this philanthropic house." 


Huacheng smiled and said: "Well, I know. Brother, don't worry, just wait." 
Thankful, he said with a sigh of relief, "I really thank you again." 
Huacheng Road: "What is this. But, you just left Lang Qianqiu?" 


Thank you for your pity, if Lang Qianqiu is there, straightforward, it’s hard 
to say what will happen again, or then merge again. He casually said: "On 
the gambling floor, His Royal Highness Taihua has troubled you, I am 
Sorry." 


There was another kind of smile on the face of Huacheng, saying: "Where 
is it. He is qualified for trouble." 


Thanks to pity: "He smashed something..." Huacheng smiled and said: 
"When you look at your brother's sake, you won't find him for the bad 
things. Don't come to my eyes and let him go."'"" 


Thank you for your pity: "Samuro, there are priests walking around in your 
land, don't you care?" Is it true that Huacheng is so fearless? 


Huacheng smiled and said: "You don't know this. Brother, my place, 
although everyone goes out in the Three Realms, it is a turbid hell, a group 
of magical dances, in fact, everyone wants to sway. It is the many gods in 
your sky, the surface The top is dismissive and disregarding all kinds of 
things, but there are things in private that are quietly disguised to do it 
here. I see it much. I don’t bother to worry about it, and it’s just a matter 
of making trouble.” 


Thanks to pity: "Taihua's Highness is not a slap in the face, just seeing the 
kind of gambling, I feel that it is not stop, I am impulsive." 


Huacheng whispered: "That is that he has too little knowledge. In the ten 
years of letting himself live for ten years and let the enemy live for ten 
years, he chose the latter without hesitation. This is human." Then he 
picked up his arms and said, " Lang Qianqiu, this kind of fool can also fly 
up, it’s really no one in heaven." 


Thanks to pity, I screamed at my heart, and said: "You can't say that, after 
all, I have... soared three times..." 


After hesitating for a moment, he said again: "Sanlang, the next words 
may be a bit overstepped, but I still have to say one more. Your gambling 
house is very dangerous, will it happen?" 


This kind of gambling gambling gambler's life and violent gambling is 
really rumored. And if you have a small fight, if you gamble too much, the 
heavens will not stand by. Wen Yan, Huacheng looked at him and said: 
"Your Highness, you asked Lang Qianqiu, why did he want to rush out?" 


Thanks for the slightest sigh, I don’t know why he suddenly asked. 
Huacheng said again: "I guess he will tell you that if he doesn't do this, no 
one will do it." 


He was guessed to the extreme, and it was obvious that he was a man of 
Lang Qianqiu. Thanks to the pity: "He did say that." 


Huacheng said: "So, I am the exact opposite. If I don't control this kind of 
place, there will still be another person to control. It is better to control it 
in my hands than to control it in others." 


Xie pity always knows how to get along with each other and nods. "I 
understand." 


It seems that although Huacheng is a man of temperament, he is more 
concerned with the power he can control in his hands than he imagined. 
Also listened to Huacheng Road: "However, I still thank my brother for 
your concern." 


At this time, one person outside the door: "The city owner, found to 
bring." 


Thanks to the doorway, I saw that the next string of moons made me stand 
outside the bead curtain, and was slightly squatting. And what he caught in 
his hand was the ragged bandage boy. 


Huacheng did not return, said: "Bring it over." 


The next chord made the boy walk in and gently put him on the ground. 
Thanks to pity, he went to see his wrist and confirmed whether there was a 
curse, but the other person retired as soon as he owed it, and there are 
people who need more attention. Thanks to the young man, "You don't 
want to be afraid. Last time I was wrong, I will never be." 


The boy’s big eyes were in doubt. It may be that there is no strength to run 
again, or it may be that I can’t run, and I smashed him, and I smashed the 
small case on the couch. Thanks to his gaze, he saw a brightly colored fruit 
on the small case. I want to come here. This boy has been hiding in Tibet 
for a long time and has not eaten for many days. Thanks to Shihua, I 
haven't talked yet, Huacheng said: "You are free. Don't ask me." 


Xie pity also refused to be polite, said: "Thank you." Take the plate of fruit 
and hand it to the bandage boy. The boy suddenly took the plate and 
slammed it into his mouth. 


It seems that he is really hungry. Even if he is hungry and hungry like a 
wild dog, he may not have gorged him. Thanks to pity: "Slow down." 
Suddenly, he tried to ask, "What is your name?" 


The teenager, while eating, seemed to want to talk vaguely, but he said it 
was unclear. Huacheng Road: "He may have not talked to people for many 
years, and he will not say anything." 


Indeed, this boy seems to have said a few words with Xiaoying, fearing 
that it is already long. Thank you, pray: "Come on." 


A plate of fruit has been eaten up by his wind and clouds. Thanks for 
seeing the bandage on his face was stained with blood, black and red, 
thinking for a moment, warmly said: "You have a wound on your face, it 
seems very serious, I will help you see it." 


As soon as I mentioned this, the young boy’s eyes showed fear. But Xie Li 
has been persuading, and he sat down. Xie pity took a bottle of powder 
from the sleeve and slowly started to disassemble the bandage that was 
messed up. 


Sure enough, although the boy’s face is already bloody, but the horrible 
faces are all gone, leaving only the scars of bright red. 


The last time I saw Junshan, although there was a burn on his face, there 
was not so much blood on the bandage. This teenager really used a knife to 
cut or smear the faces left by those people. 


Thanks for praying to the teenager's face with powder, while his hands 
were shaking slightly. At this time, Huacheng took his wrist and said: "I 
will come." 


Xie pity shook his head and gently broke his hand, Shen Sheng said: "No 
need. I come." 


Eight hundred years ago, in the city of Xianle, many people infected with 
human epidemics would have no choice but to choose to do so. That scene, 
really is **** on earth. Some of the mistakes were made, the knife cut to 
the place where it should not be cut, and the blood was too much to die. 
Some have removed the human face, but the wound 1s no longer good. 


And thanking him for wrapping a new bandage layer by layer, more and 
more, the younger face and the five senses are actually very correct, the 
nose is pretty, the eyes are black and white, and it should have been a 
young man. It is such a suffocating look now. 


He is also the same as those people. Even if you cut off the deformed 
faces, this 1s still a face that makes you have a nightmare. After that, you 
will never be able to recover. 


It’s easy to thank him for re-wrapping a new bandage. This is what he said: 
“Are you... 1s it a Xianle national?” 


The boy’s big eyes looked over. Thanks again and again, he shook his head. 
Thank you, "Who are you?" 
The boy replied with difficulty: "...Yongan!" 


The human face epidemic broke out only in Xianle. But this boy is 
actually a person from Yongan! 


Thanks to the black eyes, he blurted out: "Have you seen the white world?" 
The white clothes are in trouble. The source of the plague. Ominous. 


He was the nightmare of the gods of the previous generation before the 
birth of the **** rain. If it wasn't for Jun Wu to kill him personally, I am 
afraid that this nightmare will continue to this day. 


This one is "exclusive", wearing a white mourning dress all year round, 
with large sleeves fluttering and wearing a sad face on his face. 


The so-called sorrow and joy face is a mask, the right half of the face 
crying, the left half of the face laughing, like joy and sorrow. As long as 
you see him anywhere, it means that this place is going to be a mess. 


In the last battle, Xie Li stood on the tower of the Xianle Emperor City, 
with a black ash and tears on his face, staring blankly at the bottom. In a 
vague vision, only a white figure stood in the ground outside the city, with 
large sleeves fluttering and clear. Xie pity looked down at him, the white 
ghost also looked up, looking at the pity, waving his hand. 


That sadness and joy is a nightmare that is still lingering after hundreds of 
years. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 41: 42 Rif 
with Jun asked Xianle 3 


The boy didn't seem to know what the "white clothes wrecked" was. He 
only looked at the pity with ignorance. Suddenly, he yelled "Ah!", and the 
original pity grabbed his shoulder unconsciously. The grip is hard. When 
he called, thanked the pity and returned to God, and quickly let go, said: 
"I'm sorry." 


Huacheng Shen Sheng said: "You are too tired, take a rest." 


His voice just fell, a small door on the side of the main hall, Tingting 
came in two girls, took the boy down. He frequently turned back and 
thanked him: "It's okay, I will go find you later." 


Huacheng turned to him and said: "You should sit down and rest, don't see 
him for a while. If you want to ask something, I will open his mouth." 


The phrase "open his mouth" is a bit horrible. He said with a hurry: "No 
need. If he can't say anything, just forget it. Come slowly." 


Huacheng sat next to him and said, "What are you going to do with this 
boy?" 


Thanks for thinking, said: "Leave him with me first, and bring it with 
you." 


Huacheng Road: "He is a ghost, you might as well leave him in a ghost 
city. I don't have a lot of food here." 


Thank you, "Sara, thank you. But... I said that I want to bring him, not only 
to raise him." 


The ghost city is indeed the site of Huacheng. If he is willing to cover it, 
no one can hurt the boy and he will not be hungry. But the most important 
thing is to slowly guide the boy and sort out his mind and words so that he 


can have a normal look. Although the ghost market is lively, it is not 
suitable for this. Except for myself, thank you for thinking that there are 
other people who are willing to spend a lot of patience to guide this boy. 
He said: "You have helped me find this boy. I am very grateful. The next 
thing can't bother you any more." 


Huacheng seems to disagree, but not much to say, said: "No trouble. You 
are here, what you need to say is, where to go where you want to go." 


Suddenly, thanking the pity and detecting the change, the machete at the 
waist of the flower city seems to have suddenly changed. 


He looked down and saw it. It turned out that the handle of the scimitar 
was carved with a silver eye. The pattern of the eyes is composed of a few 
silver lines, but although simple, it is extremely expressive, if there is life. 
He didn't see it because the eye was originally closed and combined. At 
this point it opened his eyes, revealing a ruby-like bead, and the bones 
turned around. 


Huacheng also noticed, Shen Sheng: "Brother, I will leave, come back 
soon. 


Thanks to the pity: "Warning the police?" Could it be that the wind master 
and Qianqiu have the legal body in the ghost city? He also wants to get up, 
"I will go and see." 


Huacheng gently pressed him back and said: "Reassured, not Taihua, they 
are. They can sit, don't have to go." 


He said so, thank you for not having to go with it. Huacheng turned and 
walked outside the main hall, waving a hand far away, and the bead 
curtains were automatically separated on both sides. When he went out, 
the curtains of the jade that were full of curtains were smashed and 
smashed, and they burst into a crisp sound. 


Xie Li sat on the jade couch for a moment, remembered the purpose of the 
trip, stood up, passed through the small door that the two girls retired, and 


saw a flowerbed. The corridors of the red flowers in the flower gardens are 
interspersed and empty. 


Xie Li is thinking about where to go, but sees a black back flashing. 
That back is exactly the next month! 


Thanks to the curse on his wrist, he still cares a lot. Recalling this person's 
movements seems to be very taboo to be discovered. So, thankful and 
silently followed up. 


Around the corner where the man disappeared, Xie pity pressed against the 
corner of the wall, and then quietly looked away, the man really acted very 
fast, and paid attention to the front and rear, it seems really vigilant, for 
fear of being discovered. Thank you for your pity: "This string month 
makes it a subordinate of Saburo. Why is it so sneaky when you go to 
Saburo's site?" 


He suspected that this person might not be good, but also hide his body 
and follow up. The second quarter of the year made the seven bends and 
eight turns, and Xie pity always held his breath and followed him three or 
four feet behind him. 


Turning into a promenade, at the end of the promenade is a gorgeous door, 
thank you for thinking: "If he turns around at this time, there is no place to 
hide." 


Who knows, he just thought about it, he saw the next month and made a 
footstep, looking back. 


When the man stepped forward, he felt that 1t was not good. In a hurry, if 
the evil flies out, he wraps around the wooden beam above the top for a 
few laps, lifting his whole person high and sticking it to the top. 


The second quarter of the month made no return to people, and did not 
expect to look up and look carefully, finally turned and continued to move 
forward. 


However, she still didn't dare to put herself down so quickly, maintaining 
her position on the ceiling, moving forward gently and silently, and feeling 
like a gecko. Fortunately, the other party did not walk for a long time, then 
stopped in front of the gorgeous door, he did not move, wait and see. 


There is a statue of a woman in front of the gate of this small building. Of 
course, from the perspective of pity, the only thing that can be seen clearly 
is her round head and the round jade plate held by her hand. The second 
quarter of the month did not open the door first, but turned to the statue of 
the woman, raising her hand and throwing something into the jade plate. 
Just listening to the "Jingle" two crisp sounds, thank you for speculating: 

" oN" 


This voice he listened to many times today, I am afraid that I will not 
forget it for a long time. Sure enough, the lower chord makes the hand 
move away. There are two scorpions in the jade plate, and both are bright 
red six points. 


The next quarter makes this take up the dice and open the door. The door 
didn't even have a lock. After he entered, he closed the door and thanked 
him for not hearing the lock or the lock. After waiting for a moment, he 
floated to the ground like a piece of paper and studied the door with his 
arm. 


It is reasonable to say that this room does not seem to be big, and there 
should be some voices coming out of what is being done inside. However, 
after the closing of the string, the door was closed, and there was no sound 
in the room. Thanks for making a decisive move. 


Sure enough, after opening the door, there was no one in the room, and it 
was a gorgeous little room that was ordinary. The furnishings in the house 
are clear at a glance, and there is no possibility of hiding the secret 
passage. 


Thanks for closing the door, looking thoughtfully at the statue of the 
virgin, and the jade plate in her hand. 


It seems that the mystery lies in the two scorpions in this jade plate. 


The house is still locked, but it is not a real lock, but a spell lock. 


To open this lock you need a key, or a password. Use the dice to throw two 
"six" on the plate and open the door to see the real destination. 


However, it is absolutely impossible for him to throw two "six" on the 
spot. Xie pity only had to look at the house and sigh, and turned around in 
front of the door for a while, pulling away and going back. After a while, I 
suddenly stopped. On the head, a long-haired red man with a slender silver 
scimitar hanging from his waist is the flower city. 


He held his arm and walked and said: "Brother, you can call me to find." 


What did he look like when he went out, and what it was like when he 
came back, but the scimitar that had been hung on his waist was already 
sheathed, hanging with the scabbard on the bright red hem, and walking 
along the way, it was Arrogant. The silvery eye on the knives of the 
occupant was closed. Xie pity calmly said: "I wanted to see the child, who 
knows that your house is too big, and you are on the road." 


He originally wanted to tell the flower city what he had encountered, but 
when he spoke, he turned and swallowed. 


He came here to the ghost market to explore the whereabouts of the 
missing official. All the clues can't be let go, maybe the missing official is 
locked in this room. 


Or first find a way to enter this door to see. If these two things have 
nothing to do, immediately tell Huacheng his change under this genus; and 
if it is related... 


Huacheng took him back and said: "If you still want to see him, I will send 
someone to send him over, and I don't have to look for it myself." 


It’s probably because there are ghosts in my heart. Thanks to the voice of 
Huacheng, I can’t help but soften it. “Well...have you finished the matter 
so quickly?” 


Huacheng Road: "The treatment is over. But it is another group of wastes 
that are shameful." 


When he heard that he said "waste", his tone was very familiar. Xie pity 
guessed: "Is it a green ghost to make trouble?" 


Huacheng smiled and said: "Yes. I didn't say it. Who cares about this 
place? The waste is not a year or two, but he can only think about it at 
most. The eyes are so tight, so often Send some waste that is worse than 
him. It’s no wonder. Don’t worry, I just have a place to let my brother see, 
can my brother be willing to take a face with me?” 


Thanks for the joy: "Nature." 


The two passed through several promenades, and the flower city took him 
to a large hall. 


The door of the main hall seems to be made of steel, engraved with 
ferocious beasts, which makes people feel chilly. Flower City walked into 
the past, the beasts automatically separated and opened the door. Xie Li 
has not yet entered, he feels a murderous face, and his hands are blue- 
eyed, if the evil is ready to go. 


However, after seeing the situation inside the house, he blinked and the 
defense was unloaded instantly, and his legs automatically took him in. 


Inside the main hall, all kinds of weapons are displayed on the walls, there 
are knives, swords, spears, shields, whip, hammers... actually a weapon 
library! 


Whoever is, as long as it is a man, is in such a weapons arsenal, 
surrounded by all kinds of weapons in all directions, it must be in the 
heavens, blood boiling. Xie pity is no exception, wide-eyed, full of light. 
The last time he showed such a look, he was still in Junwu’s weapons 
arsenal. 


He was still flat on the face, but his heart was already screaming and he 
clicked on it: "Can you... can you touch it?" 


Huacheng smiled and said: "Brother is free." 


Thanks to the pity of the hand, I touched it and lingered among the various 
weapon magic weapons. I was so drunk: "These are all treasures! This 
sword is good. In the battle of an enemy, it is inevitable to play God." 
Technology; this sword is also good! Wait, this knife is also very..." 


Huacheng leaned against the door and stared at his flushed and 
unappealing look. "Brother, what do you think?" 


Thank you for watching the weapons and I can’t bear to look back. 
“What?” 


Huacheng Road: "Like?" 

Thank you, "I like it." 

Huacheng Road: "J like it?" 

Thanks for your pity: "I like it very much!" 


Huacheng seems to have snickered, but Xie has not noticed that his whole 
heart has accelerated, and he took a cold four-footed Qingfeng out of the 
scabbard and was amazed. Huacheng Road: "Can your brother have a good 
eye?" 


Thanks for the glory and glory, "I can see it. I can see it." 


Huacheng Road: "I originally wanted to say that my brother didn't have the 
weapon at hand. If I have a look at it, I will pick it up and play it. Since my 
brother said this, then I will give it to you." Already?" 


Thank you for your help: "Don't stop, don't need it. I don't need any 
weapons." 


Huacheng Road: "Is it? But I see my brother, I really like swords." 


Thank you for your pity: "I don't have to get a hand. I haven't used it for 
many years. Just look at it and I am very happy. Then you give it to me, I 


have no place to put it." 
Huacheng Road: "Simple. I will not give this room to you together." 


Xie pity only when he was joking, said: "I can take it with such a big 
room." 


Huacheng Road: "You don't have to take it away, the land is also for you. If 
you have time, come and see them." 


Thanks to the pity: "Well, the weapons library still needs people to clean 
up and take care of them. I am afraid that I will treat them badly." 


He carefully put the sword back on the shelf and missed the earthly: "I 
used to have such a weaponry, but it was burned down. These weapons are 
rare magic weapons, and Saburo should be cherished." 


Huacheng Road: "It's also simple. If I have time, can I help my brother 
clean up the weapons library?" 


Thanks and smiled: "Then I can ask you not to be able to. How dare you let 
the Lord Ghost King give me a mess?" 


Suddenly, he remembered before the departure, Jun Wu’s warning to him: 
“The demon knife, the cursed blade, the ominous knife. This kind of evil 
soldier must have a very cruel sacrifice and **** determination to make it. 
Don’t touch it. And don't be hurt by it. Otherwise the consequences are 
unpredictable." 


After thinking about it, Xie pity still said: "However, Saburo, these 
weapons, should not be comparable to your machete?" 


Huacheng picked the left eyebrow and said: "Oh? Brother also heard about 
it? I have this knife." 


Thanks to the pity: "Slightly heard." 


Huacheng smirked and said: "I guess, it's not a good thing to hear. Is there 
someone telling you that this knife was made out of the blood sacrifice 


method of the evil door, and used the living as a sacrifice?" 


As always, it is extremely sensitive. Thanks: "It's okay. Everyone has some 
bad rumors, but not everyone will believe it. I wonder if I am fortunate 
enough to see the legendary scimitar?" 


Huacheng Road: "Brother, in fact, you have seen it already." 


He walked a few steps to the pity, whispered: "Look. Brother, this is the 
sin." 


The eyes on the sabre at his waist turned to the heart and bowed. I don't 
know if it is an illusion. Thanks to the pity, this silver eye squinted 
slightly. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 42: Borrowing 
the night to explore the bliss 


So he bent down and said to him: "Hello." 


Hearing his greeting, the eyes were even more powerful. The whole eyes 
were curved into a curved shape. It seemed to be laughing. The big eyes 
turned to the left and turned to the right. It was very lively, as if it were not 
a pattern carved on the handle. It is an eye that really grows on a person. 


Upon seeing it, Huacheng’s lips twitched and said: “Brother, it likes you.” 
Thanks for raising his head, said: "Really?" 


Huacheng raised his eyebrows: "Well. Really. It doesn't like it, it's too lazy 
to take a look. It's hard to get someone who likes it." 


Hearing words, thank you for the embarrassment and laughed: "That 
would thank you." Turned to Huacheng, said, "I like it very much." 


Hearing this sentence, the eyes slammed several times, hanging over the 
waist of the flower city, and suddenly trembled. Huacheng Yizheng 
resigned: "No." 


Thanks to the pity: "What can't you?" 
Huacheng said again: "No." 


The embarrassment was a tremor, as if you could not wait for the sheath. 
Thanks for the pity: "Are you saying no to it?" 


Huacheng said with respect to her gratitude: "Yes. It wants you to touch it. 
I can't say it." 


Thank you, smile, said: "What can't you do?" Then he reached out a hand. 
The embarrassment suddenly widened his eyes, as if he was looking 
forward to it. Thanks for thinking: "You can't touch here, you can hurt your 


eyes." Then he lowered his hand and gently touched it twice along the arc 
of the scabbard. The eye completely smashed into a seam, and it shook 
even more. It seemed to be very enjoyable and enjoyable. 


Thanks for feeling very strange. His physique is still like the animal's 
favorite. I used to touch some furry cats and dogs, and they felt 
comfortable. It was so narrowing their eyes and darting into his arms and 
screaming. I didn't expect to touch a cold silver scimitar now, or the 
legendary cursed blade, which is similar to the feeling of touching a 
puppy. Where is this **** demon knife, ominous blade? 


Thanks to the original, I didn’t believe it. After I saw it, I directly threw 
these evil words into the “untrustworthy” waste paper pile. It is impossible 
to refine such a clever and lovely spirit with the cruel and evil laws of 
blood sacrifice. 


The two men reviewed the famous sword in the arsenal, and Xie pity came 
out with great interest. They also took the hand of Huacheng and returned 
to the bliss. 


After the boy was groomed and sorted, he was sent over, and replaced with 
clean clothes and white bandages. Although it was still densely wrapped 
around his head, it was completely new. He clearly showed that the limbs 
were slender and clear, and it was supposed to be an excellent seedling. 
Today, he is a pair of sloppy, dare not look up, it is a pity. Xie pity took the 
boy to sit down and said: "Little girl sent me to me before her death, and I 
promised her. But I still have to ask you, from now on, are you willing to 
practice with me? ” 


The boy looked at him and couldn’t believe that someone would take him 
to practice, hesitating, and looking forward to it. Business Panels, I am not 
too good to avoid hiding from the east, no matter the case. 


When he said this, he did not find the flower city squinting at the side, 
staring coldly at the boy, his eyes were full of scrutiny. 


Thank you for your warmth: "If you can't think disposed of your name, 
then take another one." 


The boy thought about it and said: "Firefly." 


Xie Li guessed that he was to commemorate Xiaoying girl and nodded. 
"Good. This name is very good. You are Yongan, Yongan Guoguo is Lang, 
if you have a new name in the future, it is called Lang Ying?" 


The boy finally nodded slowly. Thanks for understanding, this is to say 
that he is willing to follow thanks. 


Feast. This is a small feast for Huacheng, but it is not worse than the 
reception of dozens of people. Dozens of beautiful girls hold a jade plate 
in their hands, holding a variety of dishes, beautiful stuff, fresh fruit, small 
dots, jade step fiber and light walking around the hall, each walking 
through the ink jade couch Jade plate is served. Lang Fuangguang was 
watching, but did not start, thanked the pity and pushed a few plates to 
him, he slowly took it to eat. 


Looking at this boy, thank you for showing up in the middle of my mind. 


It was also a teenager with a bandage on his face, dirty, kneeling on the 
ground, holding a plate in his hand, and bowing his head to eat the fruit in 
the plate. 


At this time, a girl in a purple gauze was sent to the wine cellar. Huacheng 
raised his hand and gave him a bow. He said, "Brother, have a drink?" 


Thanks to the pity, there is something in the heart, and the **** is divided. 
At the entrance, I knew that it was wine, and my eyes turned back. Who 
knows, this turn, just to see behind the flower city, the girl who gave the 
wine throws a wink at him. 


He squirted on the spot: "Hey-" 


Fortunately, his sip of wine has swallowed, nothing has been squirted, just 
smashed himself, coughing. Lang Ying was also shocked by him. The 
pastry in his hand fell to the table. He thanked him and coughed and said 
to him: "Nothing. Nothing." 


Huacheng patted his back gently and said, "What happened? But this wine 
doesn't suit my brother's taste?" 


Thanks for your help: "No! The wine is very good. It’s just that I suddenly 
think of it. If you fix this, you have to stop drinking." 


Huacheng Road: "Oh? That's not mine, I didn't think about it, teach my 
brother to break the ring." 


Thanks for your pity: "It's none of your business. I forgot myself." 


He rubbed his eyebrows, turned around, and glanced at the center of the 
hall without a trace. 


The girl who sent the wine cellar back to him, and Nana walked forward, 
the posture of the gait, and the true style. Huacheng only cares about what 
he is doing, or looks at him with full concentration. He doesn't even look 
at these glamorous girls, and naturally he doesn't look at the faces of these 
girls. However, Xie Pian’s unintentional glimpse is to see the score. 


The girl who sent the wine, is it the wind teacher Qingxuan? ? ? 


In order to sneak into the bliss, the master of the wind lord did not hesitate 
to become a woman to mix in... Xie Li was really shocked by that stunned 
eye, and my heart would like to say that you still take the wine, I am 
crushed. At this time, I heard the flower city casually said a few words, 
said: "How to repair the road, I used to think that it is a good and happy. If 
you want to quit this ring, it would be better not to repair. What do you 
think?" 


Xie pity calmly and quickly, if nothing happened, he said: "That depends 
on what is being repaired. Some sects do not pay attention to these. But to 
repair me this way, the practice 1s to quit drinking and smother. Wine can 
occasionally For the latter, the latter is absolutely impossible to ban." 


When he said the word "dismissal", the eyebrows on the right side of 
Huacheng were slightly provoked, and it was not a pleasant expression, or 
a feeling of trouble. 


Thanks again and again: "In fact, there is still the same swearing. If the 
casino 1s overjoyed and sorrowful, it is very easy to give birth, and it 
should be quit. But if you can grasp the mind and win or lose, you don't 
have to quit." 


Huacheng listened, haha smiled: "No wonder my brother 1s interested in 
going to the gambling house to play." 


Wandering around, Xie Li finally introduced the topic naturally to the 
word "gambling", saying: "Speaking, Saburo's gambling skills are really 
gods." 


Huacheng Road: "Without him, luck is good." 


Comparing myself, Xie pity couldn't help but feel sad, he said: "I am 
really curious, Saburo does not tease me, this is a scorpion, is there really 
a secret?" 


If not, in the gambling area, Huacheng will not take a few of them. The 
second quarter will not be able to throw two six. Huacheng smiled and 
said: "Where can I tease my brother? The secret law is natural, but it is not 
a day's work. It is not necessarily that everyone can practice." 


Thank you for your answer. I listened to Huacheng again: "However, I can 
tell you a quick way to make your brother happy and win over." 


"What method?" 


Huacheng raised his right hand. The third finger is tied to the red line. It is 
this right hand. The red line has a small butterfly knot on the back of the 
hand. It is very bright. He thanked him: "Give me your hand." 


Xie pity is not clear, but since Huacheng said to him, then he was given. 
Huacheng’s hand is temperatureless, but it is not cold. He held the hand of 
thankfulness for a while, and he shook, smiled slightly, and threw two 
scorpions and said: "Try it?" 


Thanks to the meditation of the double six, took a scorpion, dripping, it 
really is two bright red "six." 


He wondered: "What is this method?" 


Huacheng Road: "There is no way. I borrowed a bit of luck for my 
brother." 


Thanks to pity: "It turns out that luck and mana can be borrowed?" 


Huacheng smiled and said: "Nature. If the next brother wants to gamble 
with him, come to me first. How much do I have to borrow, and keep the 
opponent for a hundred years and don't want to turn over." 


The two played a few dozen relatives indiscriminately. Thanks for the fact 
that he was so sure, he said that he was a little lacking. The flower city 
first made people to settle Lang Yao, and then personally took the pity to 
rest. 


After watching the red figure swaying away, Xie pity closed the door, sat 
at the table and held his forehead. The more considerate the flower city is, 
the more guilty it is, the more guilty it is, the thought: "Samba 1s really 
impeccable to treat me. I hope that this matter has nothing to do with 
Saburo. To find out the truth, I immediately apologize to him." 


After sitting for a while, I heard someone screaming quietly outside the 
door: "His Royal Highness...His Royal Highness...His Royal Highness..." 


Upon listening to this voice, Xie Pity immediately went up to open the 
door, and the man outside the door suddenly came in, and it was the 
teacher's teacher Qing Xuan. 


She is still the costume of the ghost girl, a thin and light but not flowing | 
the gauze of the stream, the waist is slender, and when it comes in, it rolls 
down on the ground and turns back to the man, yelling at the chest: 
"Suffocation! Suffocation! My mother I am going to be strangled by this 
stuff!" 


Thanks for turning back the door, looking back, the picture is a man 
wearing a purple gauze in a demon, lying on the ground, tearing his chest 
and waist, can not look directly, blink of an eye: "Wind division 
Adults...the wind master! Can't you change back to your original white 
robe?" 


Shi Qingxuan: "I am stupid, I am wearing a bright white robe in the dark 
night, to give people a target?" 


Thanks for thinking: "No... you wear it like this. In a sense, it’s a more 
eye-catching and more want-to-play target!" 


He knelt down and asked: "How do you get in with the wind master? Isn't 
it good to gather after three days?" 


Shi Qingxuan: "Is there any way! I have to ask about it on the road. I said 
that you are sent to the bliss of the Prince. This philanthropic is not the 
ghost king's nest! I am not serious about listening to this name. I look far 
and feel. this is definitely a place full of **** | Cave ah, seductive, worry 
about your safety, so we spent went to great lengths to sneak into this road 
bad luck ah, aunt or sister to do is drag. Face, either tolerate the burden 
and wear it like this, I have never made such a huge sacrifice." 


Thank you for your pity: "You are very happy to be in the adults..." said: 
"His Royal Highness, Taihua, you put him alone, but don't have another 
accident." 


Shi Qingxuan tore off his chest, and finally hesitated, and squatted on the 
ground: "Do not worry! My predecessor's identity ordered him not to 
move again, it should be no longer an accident. Saying, His Royal 
Highness Prince. You are really lucky!" 


"Ha?" thanked the pity: "I? I am so lucky?" 


Shi Qingxuan: "Yeah, I am so miserable in the ghost city, I am either 
hanged up and humiliated, or I can’t find a place to take us in the same 
way as a dog outside. You can eat well. Live well, and **** flowers to 
accompany guests!" 


... such a contrast is very bad. Shi Qingxuan finally got up and said, "So, 
do you still remember the mission of the ghost city?" 


Thanks for the righteousness: "Of course I remember. I was just preparing 
for our mission in the Temple of Bliss." 


Shi Qingxuan wondered: "Is there? What preparations have you made in 
the Temple of Bliss? I only remember that you are playing with the blood 
and rain, and it is not fun. After a while, you touch his hand for a while. He 
touches your hand. What is this new way of playing?" 


"..." Thanks to pity, "You don't want to be so strange about the wind master. 
We are just learning. I found a clue in the bliss workshop and I am 
investigating. I want to check it out and have a little luck." 


He raised his right hand and held it like he could catch something. He 
cried: "I borrowed it." 


The two quietly went out of the door, and after two columns of incense, 
they successfully found the room. 


Xie pity came to the statue of the lady, took out two scorpions that 
Huacheng gave him, and held his breath for a moment. Just listen to the 


" 


" lightly, and sure enough, one is the two bright red "six". 


Thank you for your relief, but I thought that this luck was borrowed from 
the hand of Huacheng in the Temple of Bliss, and my heart was not a taste. 
Seeing his guilt, Shi Qingxuan patted him on the shoulder and said: "I will 
open it now. But if I am you, this time the emperor will ask me not to pick 
it up, so as not to be a man." 


Xie pity shook his head, thinking that Shi Qingxuan did not know much 
about Jun Wu. There is indeed a dilemma in this matter, and Jun Wu also 
knows that he has a dilemma. According to Xie Li's understanding of Jun 
Wu, in this case, Jun Wu would not mention this to him at all, but would 
directly send another priest to perform the task. However, he may know 
that he has a dilemma or ask his wishes. This can only explain one thing: 


Junwu has not found any other suitable person to take this blame. He asked 
him if he had no choice but to do so. 


Moreover, the missing official issued a distress signal seven days ago, and 
the flower city also left seven days ago. This coincidence is very much of 
a concern. 


Sighed, took the donkey, thanked the pity and opened the door. Behind the 

door, it is no longer the small room that was previously unremarkable, but 
a black hole. The first-order stairs lead to the depths of the ground, and the 
cold wind is blowing from the bottom to the top. 


Xie Li and Shi Qingxuan looked at each other and nodded. The two walked 
in the depths of the tunnel in tandem. 


Shi Qingxuan walked in front, gave a snap, and held up a palm of heart, 
illuminating the steps under his feet. Xie pity gently closed the door, after 
the break. 


Stepping down, Xie pity and inquired Shi Qingxuan about one thing: "The 
wind master, the heavens have been in the past few years, are there any 
priests being shackled? I mean except me." 


Teacher Qingxuan: "Yes, but what do you ask this?" 


Thanks to the pity: "Because I saw the hand of the ghost city, there was a 
curse on the hand. This can only be a **** officer in heaven." 


Shi Qingxuan was shocked: "What? Cursed? Bloody flowers and flowers, 
the original priest of heaven is his own subordinates? So arrogant?" 


Thanks to pity: "It's not arrogant. It doesn't belong to heaven, so where is 
the personal choice. I don't have to ask more, but the ghost makes the road 
strange and disturbing, so I want to ask the wind division. Adults, can you 
have an idea about this person's identity?" 


Shi Qingxuan thought for a moment and said: "In recent years, there has 
indeed been a Western martial art being desecrated. At that time, it was 


quite big." 
Western Wu Shen? Isn’t the Western Valkyrie the right one? 


Shi Qingxuan said again: "However, I think that the Highness will not 
come to the ghost world as a ghost! Because the birth is very orthodox, the 
temper is not the kind of erratic." 


In this case, why is it being shackled? Xie pity still needs to be asked 
again. At this time, the two men went to more than 60 stone steps and 
finally stepped on the flat. 


This is a one-way tunnel that can accommodate five or six people in 
parallel. There is only one road. The front is dark and the rear is the stairs 
leading to the ground. The left and right sides are thick walls, so there is 
no need to entangle the way, just go forward. It’s gone. 


However, after extending this tunnel for more than two hundred steps, a 
cold stone wall appeared in front of the two and blocked their way. 2k 
novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 43: Borrowing 
the night to explore the bliss square 2 


Shi Qingxuan: "There is no way? It is impossible." 


He held the flame in one hand and the other hand groped on the wall. He 
wanted to find out what organs were there, and applied a few tactics to 
break the blind eye. The wall did not move. He didn’t swear. "I played it." 
wear?" 


Thanks to pity: "There is too much movement, and the entire bliss will be 
alarmed." 


Shi Qingxuan put his hand on the stone wall and sent out a spiritual power. 
He took a hand and said, "If you want to fight or not, this wall is afraid to 
be at least ten feet thick." 


Thanks to the pity, it is obvious that the next string of the moon is coming 
in here, and it is not so sneaky, just to meditate in such a dead end. There 
must be other methods, so the two looked around. After a short time, thank 
you: "The wind master, you look at the ground, there seems to be 
something." 


He pointed to the ground, and Shi Qingxuan immediately lowered his palm 
and the two men collapsed together. 


This authentic ground is paved with countless square bricks, each of which 
has the size of a small door. In front of the stone wall, they painted a 
picture on the square brick they stepped on. The pattern is not big, it is a 
villain, and I am losing my voice. 


Shi Qingxuan looked up and said: "Is it the same as the method of opening 
the door above, you must throw the correct points to open this stone wall?" 


Thanks for the slightest beggar, said: "It seems like this, but I did not 
come in with the string moon, so I don't know how many points are 


cleared here." 


Shi Qingxuan: "It’s all here, and it’s not practical to withdraw it to explore. 
Let’s throw a look at it.” 


Xie pity also agreed, said: "The wind master, you try, I ... 1 do not know 
the luck I borrowed, can support a few times." 


Shi Qingxuan did not deny it. After picking up the scorpion, he went to the 
ground and said: "How?" 


He threw out a "two" and a "five." The two waited for a moment, did not 
wait until the stone wall opened, thanked the pity to accept the blind, said: 
"Sure enough." 


Shi Qingxuan suddenly said: "His Royal Highness, look at your feet, the 
pattern has changed!" 


Hearing words, thank you for bowing immediately. Sure enough, the 
pattern on the square brick on the ground was originally a small person 
playing the scorpion. At this time, the color gradually faded away, and 
gradually deepened into another picture, which looked like a round black 
fat insect. 


Shi Qingxuan: "What is this stuff?" 


Xie pity guessed: "Dragons? Water scorpions? Looks like a lot, there are 
many in the fields, and I have seen a lot." 


Teacher Qingxuan: "You have seen a lot before you have done it..." 
When the voice did not fall, his whole person disappeared. 


Not only him, but also pity has disappeared. When they said the words 
"fun", the two felt that their feet were empty at the same time, and the next 
moment they fell into a hole. 


It turned out that the stone wall was not the door at all. It was a real stone 
wall, and the square brick they stepped on underfoot was the real door. 


After losing the scorpion, the door suddenly opened and closed 
immediately. Xie Li and Shi Qingxuan fell a moment in the air and fell 
heavily on the ground. 


Fortunately, the ground was so soft that although two deep humanoid pits 
were pressed out, the two did not feel how painful they fell, and they 
immediately stood up. Who knows, this station, the heads of the two men 
both hit the top, "Ah" together. Thanks for pity, one hand groping at the 
top, only touched the same soft and moist soil as the ground under the feet. 


No slate. The stone door has long since disappeared. 


When the party fell, the palm of the hand of Shi Qingxuan was 
extinguished, and at this time he re-ignited and illuminated all around. The 
two discovered that they were actually in a tunnel of earthy roads. 


The hole in the ground is round, and the wall of the cave is all mud, unlike 
the traces of artificial excavation. Shi Qing Xuan squatted on his forehead: 
"Where is this? Is it because I missed the wrong points, are we thrown 
here?" 


Indulge in a moment, thanking the pity: "It is very possible. The stone 
door has disappeared, that 1s to say, we will not give us the opportunity to 
go back. First think of ways to go out and say." 


When the two men negotiated a little, they followed the hole. This hole is 
twisted and twisted. If an adult wants to stand up straight in this hole, it is 
a little difficult. He can only walk on the waist or crawl in the hole. The 
speed is slow and it is quite hard. Moreover, the air in this hole is moist 
and warm, and the soil is also generally difficult to get stuck. 
Occasionally, you will step on the bodies of some small animal plants that 
rot in the soil. Thanks to the pity, the color is the same, but Shi Qingxuan 
is a goose bump. Thanks for the worse, the more I feel that something is 
wrong, said: "The wind master, we are afraid to step up and go. This 
place..." 


At this time, a strange bang of "banging up" came over. 


When the loud noise came, the entire hole was also slightly trembled, and 
the sporadic soil above was shaken. The two looked at each other and said 
nothing, rushing in the opposite direction of the loud noise. 


However, the loud noises and vibrations ran rampant, and the speed was 
much faster than they were, and they were approaching. The two of them 
were shallow and shallow, and they climbed in the winding hole, but they 
never saw the exit of the hole, and there was no light. Not only that, but in 
the direction of their running, there was a sudden loud noise and tremors 
behind them! 


The road ahead was blocked and the two had to stop. Along with the noise 
of the "bang" and the heavy body that was dragged from the soil, the two 
giants squirmed and appeared in front of the two. 


These two giant worms are huge and bloated, purple-black, with slightly 
transparent skin, one part of the worm body, no eyes, no two feet, two 
heads are two meat tips, not two very long dragons, and What ts it? 


The stone door opened, and they were thrown into the nest of a dragon! 


Thanks for raising one hand and stopping in front, if the evil is ready to 
go. Shi Qingxuan did not know where to find the wind fan, but 
unfortunately in this narrow underground can not afford the wind, and 
brought up the wind may even blow himself, so it is difficult to play the 
role of such a magic weapon. At this time, thanking the pity for the dragon 
to be afraid of the heat, said: "The wind master, laborer borrowed me a 
little mana, and then put the palm of your heart up!" 


Shi Qingxuan said, the left hand and his crisp combination, the flame in 
the right hand is a few inches higher. Xie pity also quickly developed a 
bright palm flame. Sure enough, the two earth dragons felt the hot fire, and 
then shrank back and pulled apart. Therefore, the two continued to walk 
slowly through the flames of the flames, while forcing the two earth 
dragons to keep a distance with them, expecting to find an exit. 


However, the cave is narrow, the fire is so burning, not only the two 
dragons are afraid of this heat, for a long time, Xie Li and Shi Qingxuan 


are also hot and sweaty, as if they are in the oven, quite uncomfortable. 
Moreover, what is even more frightening is that although Shi Qingxuan 
tried to bless the flame with mana, the palm of the hand seems to be 
getting smaller and smaller. When the two dragons who realized this were 
retreating, they did not have the circumstance. 


Thanks for a few more steps, I feel that the breathing is slightly 
stagnation, said: "The wind master, this palm 1s afraid that it will not last 
long. Although the soil is wet and loose, but after all, it is still deep 
underground, and soon, maybe The airflow is not working, the fire is going 
to be extinguished, and people are going to faint." 


Shi Qingxuan bit his teeth and said: "That can only be used for a thousand 
miles." 


Although both of them are not able to make a lot of work, the terrain 1s 
extremely unfavorable, but there is no other way. Thanks: "I am looking 
for a flat place." 


Just at this time, he felt a step on the ground that was not so wet, like a 
slate. Thanks for the movement, I immediately leaned over to see. Sure 
enough, this is another stone door! 


This stone door is also painted with a pattern of a little man throwing a 
scorpion. Shi Qingxuan also stepped on it, and he was overjoyed. He said: 
"Quickly, let's lose your voice and open it!" Xie was about to lose, and 
suddenly thought: "Don't let me throw a more outrageous point. Opening 
the door went to a more terrible place." Handed the donkey to him and 
said, "You come!" 


Shi Qingxuan does not say anything, but he will lose it if he catches it. 
Drip, this time, is a "three" and a "four." Xie pity immediately put away 
the scorpion, and the two stood on the door panel. The palm of the hand of 
Shi Qingxuan’s hand has already been smaller, and the two dragons are 
ready to move. Cheering carefully stared at the pattern on the door panel, 
it faded away, and gradually turned into another picture, a forest, a few 
strangely dressed people seem to be dancing around the middle. 


At this time, a ground dragon seems to be unable to hold back, the mouth 
is slightly open, dragging a heavy body, rushed over! 


Fortunately, just when it is only three feet away from the two, Shimen is 
open! 


This time, the two fell into a narrow hole. However, this time the ground is 
hard, narrow and dry. The two fell into a pain, and they smashed into a 
ball. Thanks for their pity and pain, and they didn’t say anything, but Shi 
Qingxuan was stunned. Thanks to him, he shouted his ear and hurt him. He 
worried that he had something wrong. He said, "I am a good man, are you 
okay?" 


Shi Qingxuan head is down, his feet are on, and he said: "I don't know if I 
am good or not. I have never fallen like this before. Your Royal Highness, 
working with you, it is really exciting." 


Hearing words, thank you and pity can not help. He discovered that the 
two fell into a tree hole. 


He first made a difficult step out of the hole, and then handed it to the 
teacher Qing Xuan, saying: "This is really hard for you." 


Shi Qingxuan: "You're welcome." 


He pulled the hand of thankfulness, drilled the hole in the tree, and looked 
at the gray face. The gauze was already ragged, and it was pierced by the 
outside sunlight to make a shaded shelf on the brow. "Where is this?" 


Thanks to pity: "As you can see, a deep mountain forest." He looked 
around and said again, "I slammed this stone door, in fact, it is equivalent 
to a special device that casts a thousand miles. I cast different points. , will 
be sent to the corresponding different places. I do not know if the points 
we voted are correct." 


Shi Qingxuan leaned on two arms and raised his arms, solemnly saying: 
"It takes a lot of mana to display a thousand miles. The blood rain probes 


in order to prevent others from spying on his secrets, even to make such a 
stone gate. It can be seen that its mana is strong and its mind is deep." 


Although he looked serious, but such a bare-chested shirtless look, it is 
really serious, but it is funny. Xie pity hardly held back the smile, but the 
heart of the flower city appeared in the look of the light-shouldered corner 
of the city, shook his head, thinking: "It is better to say that he is not so 
hard, it is just naughty." 


The two had a tree hole and just walked a few steps. After the bushes, they 
suddenly jumped out of a pile of red | naked | body people, jumped around 
them and shouted and shouted: "Oh oh Oh, oh oh!" 


Both were extremely shocked. Shi Qingxuan: "What is this time again!" 


Xie pity and hands up: "Don't be nervous, don't be nervous. Let's take a 
look." 


He took a closer look, this group of people is not really red | naked | body, 
but only wearing the skin of the animal skin, a pair of hairy state, holding 
a Spear with a spear, a sharp stone, a smile, two mouths The teeth are 
jagged fangs. 


The two did not say anything, they ran away. 


Shi Qingxuan runs and says: "My brother used to tell me! There are many 
savage people in the mountains in the south who live for a living! Let me 
not go to this place alone! It will not happen now. !" 


Thanks for the escape, it is a light road, and his posture and manner are 
much more calm than him. He calmly said: "Well, it is very possible! In 
short, look for the door first, look for it and see if there is any stone door!" 


The savage yelled behind them and chased after them. Originally, the two 
teachers could only escape and could not fight back. Because there are 
rules in the sky, if the gods are in the mortal world, they must not use the 


mana to suppress them when facing the mortal. This rule is to prevent the 
deities from defaming. It is a curse. But from time to time, they rushed to 
the two to cast some sharp stones and branches, and they were cold, and a 
branch was rubbed against the cheek of Shi Qingxuan. 


This time, you can touch the big mold. Shi Qingxuan touched his face and 
touched a very **** trace of blood. He was furious on the spot. 


He "snapped" and stopped his steps. He turned and said: "You have seen 
the wild savage people who have never seen the world. When you meet the 
windshield, you are not only unconvinced, but you still dare to mess me 
up!! It is true that this is true!!!" 


After drinking, he violently shakes out the windshield fan, and the brush 
unfolds. Huo’s one--the savage squad takes off on time and is fanned out 
by a few feet, hanging on the tree and yelling. The two finally stopped and 
gasped. Panting, panting, the thought appeared again: "It’s really hard to 
be a priest... a ghost, no one is easier than anyone..." 


Shi Qingxuan spit out a bad breath, and thanked him: "His Royal 
Highness, you saw it, this is what they asked for! It is not that I am 
deceiving." 


Thanks: "Yes, I saw it." 


Shi Qingxuan touched his face and licked a few words, "My brother didn't 
dare", and turned and said: "Let's go to Shimen." 


Thanks for the silence. Seeing the teacher Qing Xuan, I smashed my 
clothes and finished my hair. It was really chic. However, he wore a 
smashed purple gauze, which was inconspicuously mixed with a very 
strange taste. It was truly unforgettable. Thanks to the heart, I can’t help 
but feel a thousand emotions. Looking at the first half of the month, I saw 
the appearance of the wind master, and taught him that this person is 
definitely an inscrutable figure, not a peerless demon is a generation of 
high-ranking people. I knew it after I knew it. This is his illusion... 


The two turned around in the forest without a head, and finally found a 
stone door next to another tree hole. This time, Shi Qingxuan refused to 
lose his throat again. He scratched his head and said: "I don't know how it 
happened. My luck was not good any time, but it was not bad. But I Today, 
it seems that I have a bad luck. I lost two of them. Once I went to the 
Dragon Cave, I met the Savage once. I don’t know what else I will 
encounter next time." 


Xie pity and cough, apologetic: "Maybe because I am next to you, so take 
your hand together and decline." 


Shi Qingxuan: "What to say! How can this wind division be beaten by 
others! But you still come, maybe you have a little left with your luck." 


I don't know why, thank you for hearing "Your Saburo", inexplicably a 
little embarrassed, want to explain something, can think again, is there any 
good explanation? If you want to explain it, but it’s weird, it’s not too 
much to say. Hold your throat and roll it gently. 


Two "six". 


Breathing for a moment, thank you for watching the changes in the pattern 
on the stone door, so that you have a psychological preparation for the 
next thing you want to encounter, but this time, the pattern has not 
changed, the stone door is rolled open. 


Behind the door, it is a black stone step leading to the depths of the 
ground, and it is cold. 


The two looked at each other and thought: "Don't you make a big circle 
and go back to the original place?" 


Even if you wander back to the original place, it is better than the danger 
of encountering more adventures. They have already had enough. So the 
two decisively made the stone steps. The stone door was sinking behind 
him, reaching for a push, but touching a smooth stone wall. 


Thanks for the pity: "You can only continue to go down." 


Shi Qingxuan also said: "Oh, let's take a breath, continue to accompany the 
abominable blood and rain!" 


The two once again walked along this square stone road. Unexpectedly, 
after walking more than two hundred steps, Xie Li gradually noticed one 
thing and said: "Good news, Feng Shi adults, this is not the first way we 
walked. Although it looks like it." 


Shi Qingxuan also found out: "Yes. At the time we walked two hundred 
steps and met the stone wall, but now we have not encountered it." 


Thanks and whispered: "It seems that this time, it is right." 
The voice just fell, and the two stopped at the same time. 
There was a **** smell in the darkness ahead. 
Accompanied by this, there is also a man's heavy breathing. 


The two did not move and did not speak. There was no light and no fire, 
but the other party had already noticed their arrival, because they stopped 
and slammed the cold from the opposite side. 


A man sighed: "No comment." 


Upon hearing this voice, Shi Qingxuan immediately ignited a palm of 
heart. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 44: The blissful 
earth is coming back 


Xie Pity did not expect that he would suddenly ignite, and it was too late 
to stop. The fire was so bright that it reflected the figure of a black man. 


The man in black bowed his head against the stone wall at the end of the 
road. His face was as white as paper and his hair was black and unkempt, 
but the eyes in the hair were full of gods, like two burning ice. Although 
sitting cross-legged, a strong **** smell in the air shows that he was 
really hurt, and he was clearly detained here. He only said "no comment", 
probably as a person who came to torture. 


Shi Qingxuan saw the man's face and said, "It's you!" 


The man seemed to have no expectation of coming, and for a moment, as 
if he wanted to say "yes", but he finally resisted. Xie pity put away the evil 
spirits that secretly accumulate power, saying: "Is the two of you 
knowing?" 


After several twists and turns, I finally found someone here. Shi 
Qingxuan’s face is so happy that he is going to answer the question. Who 
knows that the man is arrogant: “I don’t know.” 


Shi Qingxuan heard great anger and pointed him to him with a folding fan: 
"Do you know what I am so embarrassing? You are not so good at saying 
so, Ming brother, I am your best friend!" 


The man categorically refused: "I have not worn such a friend who runs 
around like this." 


Shi Qingxuan was still wearing a ragged purple gauze, which was really 


unsightly. Thanks to the pity, I thought that someone would really use 
"someone's best friend" to define myself. This is probably the 


characteristic of Shi Qingxuan. Think again, "Ming brother"? Vaguely 
remember, among the five divisions, the name of the master is called 
Mingyi, so he prayed: "Is this the landlord?" 


Teacher Qingxuan: "It is him. You have seen it." 


Xie pity looked at Mingyi and said: "Have I seen it?" He does not seem to 
remember such a character. Shi Qingxuan: "I have seen it." 


Mingyi said: "I have never seen it." 


Shi Qing Xuanzang said: "I have seen it clearly! Last time in the half 
month, you will not forget it so soon?" 


" " 


Looking at the face of Ming Yi from the white to the iron blue, thank you 
finally remembered. At the end of the last half month, there is not a black 
girl around Shi Qingxuan! 


At that time, Huacheng told him that this is not a navy, but it must also be 
one of the five divisions of Lei Feng. Sure enough, Shi Qingxuan is not 
only keen on his own women, but also keen to drag others to join him. It's 
no wonder that the black girl at the time had a very bad face, as if it was 
disgusting. Thinking of this time before entering the ghost market, Shi 
Qingxuan is also arrogant about his "comfort", thank you for your 
kindness and good luck, but fortunately hold it. He said: "Grandmaster, is 
the fire dragon whistling that you sent for help?" 


Mingyi said: "It is me." 


Find the right person. Thanks a little bit, said: "I am afraid that the 
geoscientists are not hurt, and quickly evacuate, after saying something." 


Shi Qingxuan said nothing, and he took down Mingyi and said: "That, let's 
go! " 


The trio returned to the original road, and Shi Qing Xuan side walked and 
said: "I explain that you are not saying that you can play it. We will see 


you when we are separated in half a month. How do you give it in just a 
few days? In this way? How did you get rid of the blood and rain?" 


There is still a little gloating in his tone. Thanks to pity: "Well, this way of 
speaking, not afraid of being shackled, is really a good friend." Mingy1 


seems to be unable to accept the teacher Qing Xuan, three words Out, 
said: "You shut up!" 


However, this question is also forgiving and I want to know. I changed my 
way and asked: "Why do you want to make it difficult for you to spend the 
city?" 


Mingyi did not ask him to shut up, but did not answer. Xie pity side first 
look, he actually closed his eyes. I thought that I was trapped in the 
underground and tortured for a few days. The injury was quite heavy. I was 
relieved to see the rescuers, and finally I could rest for a moment. Anyway, 
if you are not in a hurry, you will not wake him up. The three men ran up 
the steps, and thanked the pity and found the scorpion again. I don’t know 
how to throw a few points in the darkness. I only heard a soft bang from 
the front, and opened a slit. The light shined through the slit. Xie pity 
pushes the door, my heart is thinking: "I don't know if I can't catch up with 
Lang Ying also took it away?" He unexpectedly stepped on his foot, but he 
stepped on it. 


This foot is empty, thank you immediately: "Don't come out!" 


He turned over in the air and fell on a hard thing. I was relieved that I was 
fortunate that I didn’t fall to the sea of knives and mountains. When I 
looked up again, I felt that the knife and the sea might be better. I saw the 
beautiful face of Huacheng, just in the distance, holding one eyebrow and 
looking at him. 


This time, Shimen opened and stepped on the air. He actually fell directly 
to Huacheng! 


Where they landed, it turned out to be the weaponry. At this moment, 
Huacheng was sitting on the seat of the weapons library, wiping the 
machete unhurriedly. Even if someone suddenly landed on his lap from the 


sky, he just removed his hand and stopped the wiping action. He was not 
surprised, and looked calmly at him. He seemed to wait for him to give an 
explanation. Of course, the pity can't give an explanation. He can only 
kneel on his lap and bite his head and look at him. Suddenly, someone in 
his eyes squatted to the side and turned to look at it. The man was actually 
Lang Ying. 


The bandage boy was sitting on the ground, very scared, even holding his 
head in his hands, licking the two people here. Why is Lang Ying also 
here? It seems that Huacheng seems to be interrogating him. In a blink of 
an eye, Xie pity saw a white boot from Shi Qingxuan on the top. In a hurry, 
he grabbed the shoulders of Huacheng and said: "I have offended!" 


After that, the flower city will be thrown down. 


He fluttered the flower city a hundred feet away, and also hit a few rounds 
on the spot. After the roll, he suddenly got up. Shi Qingxuan had already 
jumped down with Mingyi, and landed safely, and was falling in the flower 
city. The place where I used to sit. Thanks to the scalp and turned his face, 
Huacheng was still looking at him. He did not say that he only raised one 
eyebrow. 


Xie pity immediately jumped up, stepped back a few feet, and retired: 
"Sorry, sorry." 


Lang Ying looked at the flower city, as if he was terrified, and threw 
himself behind him. Thank you for your help: "Samuro, let me explain." 


Huacheng Road: "Well, I am waiting." 


Shi Qingxuan: "Wait, what's the opposite? It should be explained to him. 
The disappearance of the priest is all done by him. Your Royal Highness is 
careful!" 


This is really the most unwilling situation to face. He stared at the flower 
city and said: "Sanlang, I don't know what the misunderstandings of the 
Masters are with you. It is better for us to calm down and care about it." 


The best situation is that Huacheng is now letting them go safely. 
Although the geoscientists were injured, they did not suffer any major 
problems, and they did not lack arms and legs. If they stopped, they would 
not intensify the situation. If Huacheng is released at the moment, when it 
comes back to heaven, it will be the face of this, and Xie Pity also wants to 
try to open the side. 


Who knows, Huacheng said: "District? What geologist?" 


Suddenly, said: "Oh, are you talking about the one on the windshield? 
That's just a subordinate of my hand." 


Wen Yan, Xie Li and Shi Qing Xuan are all a glimpse. Shi Qingxuan: "This 
is clearly the priest of my heavenly court. Why do you force the deer to be 
a horse?" 


Huacheng smiled and said: "Then, I don't know why you are a noble priest 
in heaven. Why ts it necessary to conceal your identity, deserve to be 
expensive, come to me to be a ghost?" 


Following the arc of the errand, I wiped out a silvery moon, and the flower 
city said again: "If that person is really a geologist, it can be really 
patience, and it is ten years. In this decade, I occasionally feel that he is 
not right. However, there has been no evidence. If I had to go to the wind 
and walk with him for half a month, I really didn’t have enough 
confidence." 


In an instant, thank you for your kindness. 
That's it! 


It turns out that the missing of the geographer 1s, in the final analysis, 
because he concealed his true identity ten years ago and made a ghost in 
the city of Huacheng! 


- Say it is hard to hear, it is undercover. Although Huacheng occasionally 
felt that the subordinate was jealous, but because there is no evidence, he 


still left him to observe. Just recently, the undercover identity of the 
geographer was dismantled by the flower city. 


In the first half of the next few days, Huacheng saw a geographer who 
traveled with the windshield. 


Although the geographer was smashed by the windshield and turned the 
female phase, Huacheng still saw through this fake skin and found that the 
black girl was the ghost he suspected, and locked his identity into one of 
the five divisions. 


After the half-moon closure, Huacheng left the Bodhisattva view, I am 
afraid it is going to find him. Probably on the way to be chased by the 
flower city, under extreme danger, Mingyi cast a law for help. Then, Jun 
Wu found the pity and let him come to this embarrassment. 


The celestial gods are not good at working in the heavens, but they have 
been posing in the ghost world for decades. This is really a scandal. These 
intrigues and no matter, but if Liu Mingyi continues to be tortured and 
tortured here, it is really dead, and the pillars in the sky and the earth can 
be big, and the situation is not getting more and more chaotic. Until that 
day, no one can be alone. After thinking about it, thank you can only say: 
"I understand. This matter is over us. However, Saburo, I still hope that 
you can open the net today." 


Huacheng stared at him for a moment, whispering: "His Royal Highness, 
in fact, there are some things, you still don't have to involve too much." 


Suddenly, a teacher named Qingxuan: "The wind is coming!" 


When he fanned out, there was a gust of wind in the weapon Curry. Many 
of the weapons on the four sides of the shelf trembled and screamed. 
Thanks to the pity: "Is the Wind Master? We haven't done it yet?" 


Teacher Qingxuan: "I don't think anyone of you will take the initiative to 
take the shot. It's better for me to be this wicked person. The wind and the 
wind are coming!" 


"a loud noise, thank you for feeling the dust falling on the top of the 
head, looked up, actually the roof was pulled up by the wind, and picked 
up a giant seam. 


There are no doors and windows in the weapons library. Shi Qingxuan is 
not attacking. He wants to fly out of the roof directly! 


In the squally wind, the black hair and red clothes of Huacheng are also 
flying in the wind, but others are not moving. They smiled and said: "You 
have a fan, very skillful, and I have it." 


Say, take a fan from the side of the weapon. The fan is small and exquisite, 
and the fan-bone fan is made of pure gold. The color is beautiful and quiet. 
The flower city turns it in the hands for a few turns, and it is a show, and it 
is a Singularity. Turning one hand, a few winds hit a few silver. As soon as 
the three of them avoided, they only heard the sound of a slap in the face 
of a gust of wind. Looking back, there was a row of gold foils nailed to the 
ground. This piece of gold foil is slender and nailed into the ground, 
showing its sharp edge and strength. 


Every weapon in this weapon library is a magic weapon, and it is so 
powerful to take a handful of damage! 


Huacheng turned his hand again, and it was a burst of gold powder. The 
wind of Shi Qingxuan fan is strong, but the stronger it is, the more 
dangerous the situation is. This weapon library is not only a large hall, but 
the area is limited. Some of the winds brought by the windshield fan will 
bounce back and smash in the room. Hundreds of pieces of gold foil will 
be so swayed by the wind. Thanks for worrying about the gold foil hurting 
people, and protecting Lang Ying, said: "The wind master, you stop first!" 


Those gold foils have been rubbed by the teacher Qing Xuan and Ming Yi 
several times, and Shi Qingxuan also wants to stop. However, the roof was 
lifted by his wind, revealing a seam. If it stops, the roof will be put down 
and the front will be abandoned. . At this time, the gold foils that fluttered 
around them suddenly flew above the Qiqi, only to listen to the "clam 
dangling" for a while, one person broke the roof, accompanied by bursts of 
falling wood, and jumped from the top. 


As soon as he landed, the man said: "The wind master can't help, I still 
can't stay still!" 


Shi Qingxuan was overjoyed and said: "The harvest 1s just right!" 


This young man has an epee on his shoulder. The blade is full of the length 
of an adult man. It is Lang Qianqiu. His sturdy gold sturdy, fixed-minded, 
but not a gold sword, just because the sword body sucked those sharp and 
thin gold foil, so densely attached a layer, it seems that this giant sword is 
like gold Built. 


Lang Qianqiu, the iron used in the forging of the epee, is very rare. It is 
taken from the heart of the magnetic mountain and has a strange energy to 
absorb metal. As long as the mana contained in the instrument does not 
exceed a certain limit, he holds the hilt and his heart is activated, so that 
the metal instruments of others can be absorbed and melted and absorbed. 
Sure enough, not long after, the layer of gold foil was sucked in by this 
epee, and the gold layer disappeared. Upon seeing it, Huacheng laughed 
and took a gold foil fan and threw it to the back. He said: "The heavenly 
gods are so poor and have no eyes. If you see gold, you will not let go?" 


If this is to say thank you, he will only pretend not to hear. But what he 
said was Lang Quianqiu. He was a royal aristocrat. He regarded money and 
treasures like dung in his life. He listened to the enemies. Even if he knew 
that he was malicious, he was very angry. The epee was lifted up and he 
went to Huacheng. Huacheng scimitar is in the hand, with a few hands 
holding a few silver flowers, calmly and eagerly attack. 


Lang Qianqiu’s embarrassment has been a powerful force. His newborn 

calf is not afraid of tigers, but thanks to his pity, he has already seen the 
difference in strength between the two sides. If his sword is really going 
down, he will die! 


Even if the teacher who does not use the sword, Qing Xuan can not see the 
specific gap, but also flesh and shock, said: "Qianqiu, don't pick it up!!!" 


However, the arrow is on the string, how can it be a drink? 


Who knows, when the swords and swords are about to meet, a group of 
dazzling white light explodes in the weapons library. 


The white light was so huge that it almost covered the entire arsenal, and 
everyone’s eyes were short-lived. Only one eye-catching white is seen. 
Thanks for being prepared, he was barely able to see it. His right hand 
condensed all the mana borrowed from Shi Qingxuan and turned it into a 
flame, and went out in one direction! 


An empty corner of the weapons library was burned up. Then, thanking the 
pity for the evil, he tied himself, Shi Qingxuan, Mingyi, Lang Qianqiu, 
Lang Ying, and said: "The wind master, the wind rises!" 


Although Shi Qingxuan still couldn't open his eyes, he followed the words, 
and the fan lifted up, violently waved, and a tornado wind rushed to the 
ground, finally breaking the roof that had been crumbling! 


If the evil is tied with a line of five people, it flies straight into the sky. In 
midair, several people finally recovered their vision. Shi Qingxuan saw a 
few fires shining in the sky below. The smoke was rolling, and the weapon 
library was fired. He was afraid that the flower city would catch up again. 
The backhand was a fan. This is the real "hurricane ignition", the wind has 
brought the fire to rise suddenly, the flames have reached other houses, 
most of the blissful squares have burned into a red one! 


Thanks to pity, 1t was easy to catch the teacher Qing Xuan, who was 
desperately shook his fan. He said: "The wind master should not fan! It is 
going to burn out!" 


Shi Qingxuan was arrested by him and said: "If you are so good, don't fan 
it, you can let me go! Your hand is too big!" 


The wind master took the wind, and thanked him for letting go and looking 
down. In this red flame, thank you still saw the red figure. Flying too high, 
can't see the truth, but he instinctively, at this moment, Huacheng stood 
there, looking up at him. 


He didn't catch up, and he didn't go out to put out the flames. He just stood 
there and was raging. 


Screaming on the streets of Ghost City outside the bliss, the crowds fled. 
Xie pity felt a difficulty breathing, his voice was dumb, and muttered: "I 
just want to fire a little, drag it a little, how can it become like this..." 


Not long ago, Huacheng leaned against the gate of the weapons library, 
half jokingly and seriously said that he would give him this weapon library 
and all the weapons inside him, but now they all fall into a sea of fire. It is 
true that many magical treasures are not afraid of fire, but there are also 
many magic weapons that are inherently taboo and inflamed. As a result, I 
am afraid that they will be burned to ashes. And never thought that the fire 
would burn so hard, and burned the entire bliss. 


Even if Huacheng doesn't think it is "home", it 1s also his residence! 


Seeing that he is so collapsed, Shi Qingxuan 1s also embarrassed, said: 
"Hey... I can't live with His Royal Highness! I didn't think too much. I just 
wanted to run quickly. This is something I am wrong. It is true. There 1s 
only a little fire... If the blood rains the next time you find him to pay him, 
you will push me on the head. Rest assured, how much I will pay! Iam 
afraid that nothing is afraid of no money!" 


Where is the problem of not losing money, thank you for closing his eyes 
and saying nothing. And Shi Qingxuan patted him on the shoulder, 
suddenly felt wet, and there was an unusually pungent **** smell. 
Looking back, he was shocked: "His Royal Highness, what is your hand!" 


Thanks to the right hand, it is full of blood. His entire arm was dyed by 
this blood, and the tremor could not be crowned as "slightly". But his 
hands still firmly hold the day, so that everyone will not be blown away in 
the wind. Shi Qingxuan: "What is going on here?!" 


Thanks to pity a little god, barely found back calm, shook his head and 
said: "Nothing... a little hurt, just go up." 


Shi Qingxuan thought about it and said: "When the white light is you? 
Your Highness, Prince, have you separated them?" 


Thanks to the pity: "I am a sword after all." 


Shi Qingxuan guessed well. Fang Cai, just before Huacheng and Lang 
Qianqiu’s swords and swords are about to meet, Xie Pity flashed on the 
front. 


He took a sword from the side of the weapon rack and explored the sword 
and a sword. There were two tricks. 


The first move, first hit the Lang Qianqiu epee, the second move, and then 
block the knife. 


The strength of these two moves 1s not only strong, but also controlled to 
an extremely subtle degree. Although this sword and sword are all blocked 
by the gratitude, they did not rebound the attacker himself. 


Because, thanks to the sandwich, the sword has been used, and one of his 
arms has taken both attacks. 


Lang Qianqiu is also okay with the epee, and the knives of the flower city 

are truly unstoppable. Since the sword that Xie pity took out was collected 
by the flower city in the weapons library, it was naturally a treasure blade, 
so the swords edged together and burst into a huge white light. 


After these two moves, the first hit on the epee of Lang Qianqiu, thank you 
for the sword was shot out of the crack; the second hit on the curved knife, 
directly smashed the bones. 


All the movements are completed between the lightning and the fire, and it 
is almost impossible to see. Shi Qingxuan saw the horror of his right hand. 
He felt that this arm was only vague and bloody. He said: "You are too 
arrogant, too, and you dare to pick them up with one hand!" 


Corolla Wushen, one hand sword, one hand to hold flowers. He used to 
remember only the flowers, but he forgot, and thanked him for flying, 


because of the sword. 


Think again about the talents of the genius, Shi Qing Xuan Xin has a 
lingering sigh: "Fortunately, the Prince's Temple has come down so many 
times, otherwise I don't know if I want to give the blood and rain a few 
cuts." 


The strange thing is that although Lang Qianqiu looks good and innocent, 
but it looks like a scorpion, it seems that the soul is flying, and the teacher 
Qingxuan said: "Qiangiu? Qianqiu? What happened to you? Wake up? 
What happened, eyes are lighted by the light Flashing, it hasn’t recovered 
yet?” 


The pedestrian took this gust and finally flew to Xianjing. Even dragging 
the back, rushing through the flying door, and heading straight to the 
Shenwu Temple. Lang Ying can not enter the temple, was placed in the 
side hall of the side by the gratitude. No one is at the moment, he shouted 
in the psychic array: "Which fairy is there! Trouble you to the Shenwu 
Hall! The situation is urgent, there 1s a priest who 1s injured!" 


He shouted here, and the teacher Qing Xuan made a snap, and finally 
changed back to the white robe. The wave was the 100,000 merits, and 
said: "It is two priests!" 


Thank you for your help: "The wind master should not be excited, talk 
well, don't break the merits. Everyone hears that nature will come." 


Shi Qingxuan said: "No, Your Royal Highness, you have to know that a 
good derby is a hundred times faster!" 


Not long after, a voice far away: "Who is injured?" 


When the voice said "who", still in the distance, when it comes to the last 
word, people have already appeared, it is the wind letter. He entered the 
temple and looked forward to thanking him, and he looked at Lang 
Qianqiu, and his look was stagnation. Thanks to the pity: "I am not a 
problem. I am afraid that the Master of the Division will not be hurt." 


Silence for a moment, the wind channel: "What happened to your right 
hand?" 


At this time, another voice said: "What is the injury? There are so many 
priests in the heavens, and it is not good to go out." 


This sound is very gentle, gentle and gentle, but the words are not very 
beautiful, naturally it is a feeling of affection. When he entered the 
Shenwu Temple, he also looked at the pity and then looked at Lang 
Qianqiu. But his look is very different from the wind, but it is a slight 
eyebrow, a bit like a look at the play. Seeing the wind letter to see the arm 
of Xie Pity, he leaned over to see Ming Yi, said: "This is the geographer?" 


During the period, many other priests came to the scene. The teacher of 
the division has always seen the end of the dragon, and the number of the 
players in the field is almost the first time to see him, and it is inevitable 
to look at it with great strength. Everyone is confused, I don’t know why 
they suddenly summoned them to come here, but they have the merits of 
the windshield, and they have to come over and see. Thanks to the wind 
channel: "Thank you. But nothing, it will be good to put yourself." 


The wind letter did not say much, said: "You pay attention to yourself." 


Thanks and whispered thank you, turned around and saw Lang Qianqiu 
looking at this side and asked: "His Royal Highness, what happened to 
you?" 


Feng Xin also noticed that Lang Qianqiu’s look was not right. “Where is 
there any injury to His Royal Highness?” 


Thanks to pity: "There should be no. I look at it." He said with a hand and 
went to Lang Qianqiu's eyebrows. Who knows, Lang Qianqiu is eye- 
catching, grabbing his wrist. 


Although the look of Lang Qianqiu is still hesitant, it seems that one thing 
has been discovered, but it is not certain, but there is already a flame 
burning in his eyes. Cheering felt a tremor of anger from his arm to his 
arm. 


This time, the four priests were aware of the abnormal situation and 
whispered in the ear. Shi Qingxuan and Mu Qing have stood up, the wind 
channel: "His Royal Highness, what are you doing?" 


Lang Qianqiu finally spoke up. He only said two words, but he could hear 
the heart and soul. 


He gritted his teeth: "...national teacher?" 
Thanks for the slight shrinkage of the pupil. 


Some of the onlookers were ignorant, and they whispered, "Which national 
teacher? Who is the national teacher?" Some of the minds were carefully 
thought out and immediately understood. 


Lang Qianqiu 1s the prince of Yong'an State. With his generation of 
Yongan Guoguo, it is the other of the demon and Taoist divisions. No one 
knows what identity this person is. At this moment, Lang Qianqiu grabbed 
the pity and called him "the national teacher". Isn't this saying that... 
thankfulness is the evil demon of the country--the heart of the country? ! 


However, Xie Li is the prince of the Xianle Kingdom. The Xianle Country 
is destroyed by the Yongan Kingdom. How can he be the national teacher 
of the Yongan Kingdom? 


His Royal Highness Taihua is famous for his cheerfulness and joy in the 
heavens. He has never had a chance, and he has never been embarrassed. 
He has never revealed such a look. It seems like sorrow and anger, like 
hatred. 


Lang Qianqiu was holding on to death, and his chest was ups and downs, 
and he barely said: "You... I clearly killed you personally, and you sealed it 
with you, you... Guoshi, you are really supernatural!" 


It’s awful, today I’m afraid that something big will happen! 2k novel 
reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 45: Black 
country teacher **** golden feast 


Fengxin is standing closest to the two, looking at the pity, the color of 
shock can not be concealed. The feelings of enthusiasm are trepidation, 
and there is faint excitement in the shock of restraint. Shi Qing Xuan put 
Ping Mingyi, said: "Do you have any misunderstandings in the 
millennium? If the Prince is the heart of the country, how can you 
recognize it now?" 


At this time, a man on the side said: "Qing Xuan, this is what you don't 
know. The legendary Fangxin Guoshi has always been a lofty 
temperament, mysterious cold and arrogant, never showing people with a 
true face, always with a silver mask. His Royal Highness should have 
never seen him since then." 


Talking to this person holding his arm, standing far on one side, it is 
awkward. When Shi Qingxuan met him, he was not happy. He said: "If this 
is the case, it means that no one has ever seen the teacher of Fang Xinguo. 
Why should the generals have already determined that the Royal Highness 
is the tone of the heart of the country?" 


When he and his pity, he was so strange that he made people laugh, and 
when he arrived in heaven, he changed his appearance and was very self- 
satisfied. He paid attention to the image every move. At this time, a white 
figure was circled behind the temple. 


When he came, everyone was relieved. The three sacred officials who had 
been talking in the hall quickly stood up and stood up and said: "Imperial 
monarch." 


Jun Wuwei raised his hand and everyone straightened up. Jun Wu trailed 
himself and passed by with Xie, and took a picture on his right arm. The 
blood of the blood was still dripping down the sleeves of the pity, and 
immediately after the filming, it stopped. 


Looking at Mingyi for a moment, Junwu said: "Nothing serious. First 
place the geologists." 


So, the four pharmacists, the priests, came up to help Mingyi and took it. 
Shi Qingxuan seems to want to follow suit, but look at the situation in the 
Shenwu Hall, still can not rest assured, stand still. 


Junwu took the hand back to the top of the throne, this is the way: "Talk 
about it, what happened. Taihua does not let loose music, why is Xianle 
down?" 


Lang Qianqiu looked at him again and saw him. He still said nothing, but 
now he is a **** official. He is not afraid of him to escape. He looses his 
hand and turns to Junwu. He said: "The emperor, this person became 
famous for centuries. Kill my relatives and blame my country. I want to 
fight with him and ask the emperor to be a witness today!" 


In the Temple of Shenwu, even if you haven’t heard of Fangxin’s teacher, 
you can quickly check it out. Do not check, I don’t know, I’m scared. Just 
as the spirit is also required to solve the problem for everyone: "Fang Xin 
Guo Shi, is the savior and the servant of the Yongan Guotai Zilang. The 
reason why he will be listed as one of the demon and double divisions is 
because of the gold The feast of blood washed the famous deeds of the 
Yongan royal family." 


Teacher Qingxuan: "What is the Golden Feast?" 


Ling Wendao: "The wind lord, this golden banquet, was originally a 
banquet popular in the Xianle nobles, because the wine vessels, food 
utensils and musical instruments used in the banquet are all exquisite 
goldware, luxurious and incomparable. Therefore, this is the name." 


After the founding of Yong'an, Yongdi was first announced to the world, 
and the vowed to be ruthless will definitely put an end to the slogan of the 
past, and never repeat the same boat, only one heart and one mind for the 
people to solve problems. However, after a few decades, everything has 
been learned, or it is still the same. 


Lingwen continued: "On the night of the 17-year-old birthday of Prince 
Yong'an, a grand banquet was held in the palace. And the heart of the 
country... is in this golden banquet, holding a sword and killing it. All the 
Yongan royals present." 


The gold cup turned over and the blood was red as wine. 


"Only the long-awaited Yongan Taizi Lang Qianqiu escaped, but he was 
almost destroyed." 


This shockedness is undoubtedly a heavy blow to Yong'an. If it is not the 
people's heart, it will be exhausted. It’s easy to stabilize the situation. The 
Yong’an royal family called the world’s strangers to pursue the murderer’s 
murderer. Finally, he finally won it. Lang Qianqiu personally killed a 
generation of demon sacred hearts and teachers, and sealed his body into a 
triple scorpion. Into the soil. 


However, the Yongan royal family was still badly hurt. Since then, it has 
inevitably gradually declined and was replaced by the next dynasty. 


Lang Qianqiu stared at Xie Pity and said: "Why do you want to do that, I 
never understand. You said that you can't see us sitting in this position. I 
never believe, I don't think you want to be a bit. I am now. I finally know 
why." 


The sects of the people are stunned and screaming. 
"This is revenge!" 


"Isn't it revenge? Xianle is gone, he will kill Yong'an. The Yongan people 
killed his father and mother, so he also killed the father of the Prince of 
Yongan, and returned to his teeth. eye." 


"But it’s not the generation of Lang Qianqiu who killed the Xianle 
Country. His anger is too unreasonable..." 


"I still think that the three worlds are a stupid, but it was a sly character. I 
ran to the enemy country to be a national teacher and secretly mixed the 


water. When I shot, I slaughtered the entire royal family. It was amazing..." 


Thanks to pity, Jun Wu’s gaze projected and closed his eyes. Speaking, just 
listen to Junwu: "Taihua, you believe that Xianle is the heart, what is the 
basis?" 


Lang Qianqiu said: "The person who taught me swordsmanship 1s the 
teacher of Fangxin. When he shot, I can't recognize it?!" 


The dark tide surges even more. 


"It’s not a mess of water, how can you teach the enemy prince 
swordsmanship in one fell swoop?" 


"It's no wonder that after he climbed for the third time, he didn't see him 
touch the sword, afraid of the stuffing." 


Lang Qianqiu said: "This time I went to the ghost city and handed me the 
blood and rain." 


Listening to him talking about the ghost city and the flower city, many of 
the priests are also a scorpion. Lang Qianqiu continued: "I traveled once 
when I was twelve years old, and I was jealous of a group of thieves. The 
thieves grabbed me and fled to the street. There were guards. After 
catching up, I killed each other and played for a while. A street seller with 
a nose and a swollen face suddenly came out with a branch. It was also two 
times. Two swords were opened and I was saved. 


"The group of thieves and the guards struggled with both defeats. The 
busker took me all the way and sent me back to the palace. My father and 
mother were grateful and retained, and found that he had great skills and 
asked him to be a country. Teacher, taught me five years of 
swordsmanship. When he got out of the sword, I was familiar with it. How 
could I admit it?" 


My feelings are soft and whispered: "His Royal Highness, you said that 
you saw a little afterimage, but this residual image seems to be no one 
else, but it is still your side." 


He spoke at this time, seemingly to defend the pity, but actually it is more 
subtle. Because he is sure that the nails have been nailed, the more 
questionable, Lang Qianqiu will certainly prove more truthful, and will not 
help the situation of thanking the pity. Sure enough, Lang Qianqiu said: 
"Good! Work hard to get the sword!" 


Many of the gods in the temple are carrying swords with them. Listen to 
him and drink them. Lang Qianqiu took the sword and arrived in front of 
Xie Pity. He said, "Give you! We are now more than one game, nothing is 
hidden. Let's try our best to see if our swordsmanship is all the way. See if 
I am You taught it!" 


Everyone thought that he would not be chaotic in the temple of Shenwu, 
but he thought of **** banquet, he was the prince of the Prince, and the 
whole family gave him a kill, and he could understand his excitement. Shi 
Qingxuan also remembered the wound of thankfulness and said: "In the 
autumn, the prince of the Prince is only to help you block the flower city, 
the right hand has become like this, how can you compare with your 
sword?" 


After listening to this sentence, Lang Qianqi suddenly extended his left 
palm and made a heavy blow in his right arm. Just listening to the sound 
of the carnival, his right arm burst into a **** fog, becoming bloody, 
softly hanging down. This injury does not need to be viewed and it is sure 
to be extremely heavy. The gods are surprised. Xie pity is also a glimpse, 
said: "What are you doing?" 


Lang Qianqiu said: "The wind master said that it is good. You just hurt me 
because I saved you. I am still with you. But you save me is to save me, 
killing me is also a fact. I know your hands. Can make the sword, and the 
swordsmanship is all fascinating, let's compare it with the left hand, the 
man will pick up the sword!" 


Cheer looked at the sword and looked at him again. He finally shook his 
head slowly and said: "I made an oath many years ago, and I don't need a 
sword to kill people." 


After listening to this sentence, Lang Qianqiu remembered that when he 
rushed to the scene that night, he just saw the scene where the black robes 
took the sword from his father’s mother, and the eyes were red and the left 
hand of the sword was smashed. ring. Shi Qingxuan went into the dust and 
smashed it. He rolled the sword and said: "I see that there is something 
wrong with this. Since the Fangxin Nationalist has always been wearing a 
mask, maybe who pretends to be a victim? What do you say?" 


Everyone turned to the top jade. Jun Wudao: "Xianle." 
Thanks to pity, said: "Yes." 

Jun Wudao: "Taihua said, do you admit it?" 

Thanks for your pity: "Recognition." 


This "recognition" word, cold and cold is completely different from his 
past tone, listening to the wind, the feelings, the teacher Qing Xuan face 
all changes. 


Jun Wu nodded and said: "Is it the heart of the **** banquet?" 


For a moment of silence, Xie pity suddenly looked up and said: "Yes. It is 
me!" 


One sentence, there is no room for change. Lang Qianqiu said: "You admit, 
that's good." 


As I said long ago, in the heavenly court, there are countless sacred 
officials who touch the blood of mortals. But to be honest, there are really 
few because of these old blood debts. Probably because those mortals did 
not have such a stalwart descendant who flew in the sky, and they were 
accountable to the murderer with the honor of the priest. 


Before the squatting of the generals to protect the army, and finally can not 
escape the exile of the mortal, but thank you, but there is no rely on the 
mountains, and now I am afraid that only I can still read the old feelings, 
whether to protect his heart. 


However, the head of the priests has been unable to understand, and what 
is the attitude of Jun Wu to thank you. When Prince Xianle’s head flew up, 
it was naturally favored; but the second time it was soaring, the two played 
one game, and the pity or the sorrow of the sword was won by several 
swords; this third time soared, The two people get along very peacefully. It 
seems that they have forgotten the previous things. Jun Wu also gave Xie 
Pity a new palace view in the best part of Xianjing. It is really impossible 
to teach people. Therefore, several pairs of ears are erected, and wait for 
the top to hear how to fall. 


Who knows, not waiting for Jun Wu to fall, thank you for the first voice. 
He said: "Xianle has an ulterior motive." 


Jun Wudao: "You said." 


Thanks to the pity: "Please ask the emperor to go to my immortality, and 
let me go down." 


Some of the priests were taken aback, but they were slightly admired. 
After all, no one wants to be embarrassed, how easy is it to fly? I worked 
so hard to climb so high, I fell down at once, and I thought I would regret 
it. I dare to say directly to Jun Wu, please let me know, they can't do it 
anyway. However, some priests don’t care. After all, they have already 
made this move. It’s better to decide whether to retreat or not, and thank 
you for being punished twice, and then for the third time, there’s nothing 
for him. It’s a big deal, and he’s used to it when he’s squatting. 


Lang Qianqiu said: "You don't need to be self-satisfied. It is your skill to 
fly. I just want to fight against you." 


Thanks: "I don't want to fight with you." 


Lang Qianqiu said: "Why? You didn't play with me before. This battle has 
never stopped." 


Thanks and pity: "No why. Fight with me, you will die." 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 46: PaPH2#4) 
AZR 


His an understatement provoked a slight sigh of relief around him. Many 
priests thought: You are a broken **** with no mana. How can you say 
that you are going to die with an Eastern Wushen? It’s too arrogant. It is as 
if he was shackled to let Lang Qianqi not see him in general, it is really 
blowing the air. However, Lang Qianqiu did not feel that he exaggerated at 
all, saying: "I said, life and death no matter! I don't need you to let me." 


Xie pity should not be his, to Jun Wu said: "Please enlighten me to the 
lower bound." 


Shi Qingxuan suddenly raised his hand: "And slow! I still have words!" 
Jun Wudao: "The wind teacher said." 


Shi Qingxuan: "Everyone seems to think that His Royal Highness is a 
revenge for revenge, and blood is washed by the Yongan royal family. But 
if he wants to retaliate, why did he let go of His Royal Highness who is the 
Prince of Yongan? It is reasonable to say that If an avenger wants to be the 
most demanding, shouldn't he be the Prince?" 


This section is not unintentional, but they feel that there is no need to take 
the initiative to speak. At this time, the wind master took the lead and said 
that only a few people nodded. Shi Qingxuan said again: "I haven’t had 
much time with my Royal Highness, but I saw him witnessing the slashing 
of the sword for the rescue of His Royal Highness Taihua. If he had hatred 
against your Yongan royal family, how could he take it? Odd insurance to 
block your knife?" 


Hearing the "frontal confrontation of the machete", the wind and the 


feelings of the sorrow were stunned. There is a small voice "maybe 
because of guilty conscience", Shi Qingxuan immediately added a 
sentence to cover the past, said: "That is an ominous evil, cursed blade! 
So! I am suspicious of this matter!" 


Ruan said: "I really admire the imperial prince of the Prince who can get 
the guarantee of the wind master, and swear by the words. We have no 
such blessings." 


Teacher Qingxuan: "You shouldn't confuse the generals. Can Xiaoxiao's 
things be the same? I saw him badly, and I heard him admit it." 


He said: "Isn't that the same today? His Royal Highness sees his evil deeds 
and listens to His Royal Highness, and what is the difference?" 


Shi Qingxuan was furious and wanted to talk to him again. He thanked him 
and said: "The wind master, thank you, I accept your feelings. But no 
need." 


Shi Qingxuan did not expect to refute the shackles for a while, pointing to 
him and sighing with a sigh of relief. 


At this time, Jun Wu finally made a speech. He whispered: "You are a 
little bit safe." 


He didn't make a loud voice, and he was very peaceful. However, every 
sacred official on the Temple of Shenwu heard it clearly and stood still. 
Waiting for the hall to be quiet, Junwu said: "Taihua, you have always been 
impulsive. You can't be violently rushed, you have to listen calmly, and 
identify the ins and outs." 


Lang Qianqiu bowed his head and was taught. Jun Wu said: "Xin Le 
refused to give up the whole request, and asked for self-deprecation. It was 
forbidden to be held in Xianle Palace, and then I personally interrogated. 
Before that, you two should not meet." 


This result is unexpected. 


Jun Wu actually promised to pray that this is not a fragrant, no believer, 
no merits of the three worlds laughing! 


Lang Qianqiu ts sitting in the East of the Valkyrie, maybe he will be 
dissatisfied, it is really a loss of business. But even if you want to protect 


it - 1s it hard to thank you for your pity? ! 


Many priests saw the signs and secretly decided not to mention the words 
"three circles laughing" in any public occasions in the future. Shi 
Qingxuan breathed a sigh of relief and blew a few words of emperor wise. 
Lang Qianqiu gazed at the pity, saying: "What the emperor wants to ask, 
can be tried, but no matter what the final result, I always want to fight with 
him!" 


After that, he turned to Jun Wu and turned to the main hall. Junwu waved 
his hand and several martial arts officials gathered to come and bring 
thanks. When Shi Qingxuan was in front of him, Xie pity whispered to 
him: "I really appreciate you, Master. But if you really want to help me, 
don't have to talk to me again, can you please two things?" 


Shi Qingxuan burned the blissful square because of the hurricane, and he 
was embarrassed. Now he can’t wait to thank him for getting rid of him 
one hundred things. He said, "Let's talk about it." 


Thanks to the pity: "The boy I brought up is in the temple, and I am 
bothered to take care of you." 


Teacher Qingxuan: "One small thing! The second one?" 


Thanks to the pity: "If you want to find a half-month after the general, you 
should also ask the wind master to help." 


Shi Qingxuan: "That is certain. I won't let you get it. Where is she?" 


Thanks to pity: "She was hidden in a pickled jar in the Bodhisattva. If you 
are free, take it out and blow it." 


" " 


Thanks to the wind, the two priests took him to the Xianle Palace and 
respectfully said: "Please come under the Prince." 


Thanks for the first time: "There is work." 


Stepping forward, the door closes behind. Thanks for looking down, and 
sure enough, not only the appearance, but even the facilities in the temple 
are exactly the same as his former Xianle Palace. The last time he passed 
by here but didn't come in, I didn't expect to come in for the first time, but 
it was forbidden. This sign is really not good. 


These days have been ups and downs, and I am very tired. She prays and 
falls to sleep. 


There are many things in my dreams. 


He seemed to be closing his eyes and meditating, and found himself sitting 
in front of a book. The black robes were layered on the ground, and the 
face seemed to wear a cold, heavy mask. 


Bowing down, a teenager lying on the bottom of the book came into view. 
The boy was fourteen and five years old, and he was very happy. He was 
alive and well. 


He shook his head, walked over, leaned slightly, knocked on the book in 
the knuckles, and said, "His Royal Highness." 


I don't know if it penetrated a layer of cold mask, and even the sound was 
cold. The boy finally woke up, looked up and saw him, scared to jump up 
and sit upright: "Guo Guoguo!" 


He said: "You are asleep again, and you punish ten times of morality." 


The Prince was shocked: "Don't go to Master, it's better for you to punish 
me for ten laps around the Imperial City!" 


He said: "Twenty times. Copy it now. Write a good word." 


The prince seemed to be a little afraid of him, and he sat up and began to 
copy. He sat back and continued to meditate quietly. 


In fact, everyone in the palace is a little afraid of him. This is caused by 
the alienation and oppression that he deliberately created. 


But the Prince’s Highness may be too young, and the fear of him can’t last 
long. After copying it for a while, he said: “Master!” 


He put down the book and said: "What." 


Prince Sidao: "I learned all the swords that you taught last time. Should I 
teach me new swordsmanship?" 


He said: "Yes. What do you want to learn?" 

Prince Edward said: "I want to learn the trick you saved me!" 
He thought for a moment and said, "Is that trick? No." 

Prince Edward: "Why?" 

He said: "That is not practical. At least not for you." 


Prince Edward does not understand: "Not very useful? A sword to the 
strength of the two swords! You used that to save me." 


Prince does not understand, it is normal. He said: "His Royal Highness, I 
ask you a question." 


"ask! " 


He said: "There were two people who were hungry and bloody, and wanted 
to **** each other's food, so they beat each other. This time, the third 
person came, he wanted these two people not to fight again, you think this 
time, light Is it useful to persuade?" 


"useless. They want food, right." 

"Yes. Because the root cause has not been resolved, no one will listen to 
the principle of your persuasion. So, this third person wants them to stop 
playing, there is only one way, that is to give them what they want. Open 


the pocket, take Give your own food to them." 


Prince Edward does not understand. 


He said: "The reason is the same. You must know that once the sword is 
out, someone will be injured. If the power is sent, there must be something 
to bear. 


"So, you said that I have gone to the strength of the two swords. It is not 
right. It has not been changed. It is only that they have endured their 
attacks. It is a very stupid move to stop the injury. If it is not helpless. Will 
not be used. 


"You are a nobleman of the Prince, you don't need to learn that." 


The prince continued to copy the scriptures, but after a while, he still 
looked thoughtful. He said: "Do you have any questions?" 


After a moment of hesitation, Prince Edward said: "There is one point. 
Master, if, the third person's food is not enough, what should I do?" 


The prince said again: "If the two people have food, but they want more, 
because greed is even more fierce, and they are constantly looking for 
food, what should they do?" 


He said: "What do you think?" 


The Prince thought about it and said, "I don't know... maybe, I shouldn't 
intervene from the beginning." 


The hall is golden. Everything is golden, but at the moment it turns red. 


Every golden banquet table collapsed a person. A sword seals the throat, 
and the death is fierce. 


The hand of his sword could not stop shaking, the handsome king of the 
country was covered in blood, his eyes were bright red, and he was sore 
and hateful. The back of the leg was the body of the queen. 


He took the sword and walked over step by step. The king of the country 
looked up and saw him, and he was very wrong: "National division? 
You...?!" 


A cold sword is stabbed in the past. 


At the same time, he noticed something and jerked back. The young Prince 
of the Prince was standing in the body of the guards at the door. 


The boy’s eyes were empty, and he seemed to be suspicious of what he saw 
as areal or a dream. He took a step forward and was almost stumped by 
the door and lost his soul. He pulled the sword out and the blood splashed 
on the black. 


The prince was not stumbled by the door, but was stumped by the body on 
the ground. He threw himself on the head of the country and finally he was 
able to call it out: "Father! Mother??" 


The Lord will never speak again. The prince couldn't shake him, and 
suddenly looked up and rushed to the side, his eyes round and said: 
"Master! What are you doing? What have you done?! National teacher!!!" 


For a long time, he heard his own dull voice - 


"You deserve it." 


Thanks for the bad sleep, I woke up. 


He blinked his eyes and found that he didn't sleep for a long time, and he 
did a very bad dream. Fortunately, there was something in his arms that 
woke him up. After sitting for a while, he found something in his arms and 
spread his hand. There are two scorpions in the palm of your hand, the two 
that came out of the bliss. 


There was a fire in his mind. The picture is blurred, but a red figure is very 
clear, staring at him in the flames. Thanks, I sighed and thought: "Sararo's 
bliss workshop doesn't know how much is left. I will be smashed again 


this time. I don't know if I can afford to pay for it. For decades, hundreds 
of years, It’s not a big deal for him.” 


After watching them for a while, thank you for your hands and hands 
together, holding the two scorpions in your hand for a while and throwing 
them to the ground. The scorpion bones rolled a few times and settled. 


Sure enough, Huacheng’s luck with him has been spent. This one, he 
thought that there are two more six, but the scorpion will land, but the 
result is two. 


Xie pity couldn't help but smile, shook his head and heard a footstep 
behind him. He has a certain shape, and he smiles with his face and two 
scorpions. 


This footstep is not Jun Wu. Jun Wu's foot sounds calm, not too slow. 
Although Huacheng walked a little inadvertently and irregularly, and often 
lazy and scattered, but the two people in the pace of the bamboo in the 
chest is completely consistent. This footstep is slightly light, and Xie pity 
looks back and glances, saying: "It's you." 


A man with a black shirt, his face is white, his lips are thin, his look is also 
weak, and he is very cold, clearly a Valkyrie, but like a civil servant, not a 
lover and a lover? 


He saw thankfulness and slight surprise, and raised his eyebrows: "Who do 
you think is? Fengxin?" 


Not waiting for the answer, he put a black dress and walked into the 
threshold, saying: "Where the wind is believed, probably will not come." 


Thank you, "What are you doing?" 


Admiration: "The emperor is only forbidding your feet, not letting Taihua 
Temple down, and not saying that I will not let me come." 


He did not answer the question of thanking him. If you don't answer, you 
won't answer. You are not curious about the original pity, so you don't ask. 


Mu Qing looked around in this brand-new Xianle Palace, his eyes fell on 
him, and for a moment, he suddenly threw something for him. A blue 
afterimage flashed through the air. Thanks to the left hand, he took a look 
and was actually a celadon vial. 


It is a medicine bottle. The feelings are faint: "Your right hand is so 
bloody, and it looks ugly." 


Thanks for holding the pill bottle, and looking at him in turn. 


After playing for the third time, he treated him with a feeling of 
admiration. He could only use one word to describe: "Yin and Yang." As if 
waiting for him to be shackled for the third time and then say the words in 
the wind. However, at this time, thankfulness may have to be smashed for 
the third time, but he suddenly and cheerfully, and specially gave him 
medicine. This turned a big bend, but he was not used to it. 


Seeing him not moving, he smiled slightly and said: "You love to use it, no 
one will send it anyway." 


This smile is not a smile, can not see, he can see that he is really good at 
the moment. Although thanking the pity does not feel the pain in the right 
hand, there is no need to make it hurt like this. Before Jun Wu took a shot 
on his right hand, it was better to have an emergency treatment. So he 
opened the celadon vial and fell absently to his right arm. It wasn't the 
powder pills that were poured out of the bottle, but a light blue smoke. The 
smoke slowly flowed and wrapped around his right arm. The smell was 
fragrant and cool, and it was really good. 


Suddenly asked: "Lang Qianqiu said that it is true? You really killed those 
royals of Yong'an?" 


Thanks for looking up at him. Even though the feelings have been very 
forbearing, but thanks to his eyes, he saw a sigh of restraint. He was very 
interested in the details of the blessing and **** feast, and said: "How do 
you kill?" 


At this time, another heavy footstep came from behind. The two returned 
together, and this returning visit was actually a wind letter. As soon as he 
came in, he saw his feelings in the hall, and stood next to him with a 
smile. He frowned and said, "What are you doing here?" 


Thanks for raising the celadon vial in his hand. Admire the slightest smile. 
He just said to thank you that the style will not come, and the wind letter 
will come immediately, of course, not funny. He said: "This is not your 
temple. Can you come if you can come?" 


Fengxin did not care for him and turned to thank you. He still didn't speak. 
He said with pity: "If you two are asking the same question, then I will 
answer them in unison. I don't need to believe it. Today, I said at the 
Temple of the Gods, the sentence is not empty." 


The windy face is faint and whitish. The feelings of admiration are the 
most unfortunate for him. He said: "I have to take it, and now you have 
such a sad face and who to do it." 


Feng Xin glanced at him sharply and said: "I didn't show it to you. Get 
out!" 


Admire the feelings: "You are qualified to call me to roll. The mouth said 
that much more loyal, for a few years? Still not ran." 


The wind and the amount of the blue gluten rose. Xie pity pre-feels that 
the dialogue is developing in a bad direction, and the karate: "Hold it. 
Stop." 


Is the feeling of love being a temper? Sneer laughed: "Everyone said that 
you can't bear to see the old master and fall into the deep and 
righteousness. You don't want to find a good excuse to pretend. If you say 
that you don't want to follow a waste person again?" 


Feng Xin punched out and said: "Do you know a fart?!" 


" 


"the feelings gave him a punch and hit his face. He is a standard little 
white face, greeted with such a slap in the air, and it is like a persimmon 


smashing on his face, blood flowing. But he was very hard-headed, and he 
was not embarrassed. He said that he also called back with a punch. After 
they both flew up, they all had their own weapon weapons, but when they 
got angry, they had to have a good time. Fengxin and admiration were 
similar to force eight hundred years ago. After eight hundred years, it was 
still indistinguishable, and the boxing and the flesh were loud and 
difficult. Fengxin anger said: "Do you think that you don't know what you 
think, you can't wait for him to do something bad, you are happy!!" 


Mu Qing said: "I know that you have always looked down on me, I really 
laughed at you, you look at yourself! What are your qualifications to look 
down on me. Fifty steps to laugh a hundred steps!" 


Lang Qianqiu and Xie Pity have not yet fought, and the wind and the 
feelings have been fought first. The two have been complaining for a long 
time, playing a group, each of them, even the other party’s snoring is not 
listening, who still listens to thank you? Xie Pity still remembers that 
when they were three years old, their love speech was whispering and 
whispering, and they were not confronted with people. If the wind letter 
was hit, it was all thanks to him to fight, let the fight stop. Just stop, but 
now it is not the case. Xie pity dragged an arm and rushed to the door to 
quickly ask a few priests to pull the frame. Who knows, I have not yet 
taken the hall, only listening to a loud noise in front. The wind and the 
feelings of the wind were also shocked by this loud noise. Both of them 
stopped and watched, and they looked at the place where the loud noise 
came. 


The gate of Xianle Palace was opened by a person. Beyond the gate, it is 
not the wide and open Shenwu Street of Xianjing, but a dead darkness. 


In the darkness, countless silver butterflies rushed to the surface. 2k novel 
reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 47: Robbery 
Palace trilogy scares the gods 


Silver flashes, not thinking, thanking the first reaction is to cover the hand, 
the wrist is wrapped in evil, when the situation is critical, it will 
automatically meet. However, those silver butterflies did not attack him at 
all, but bypassed him and threw himself at the two men who had just been 
tweaked behind him. 


Fengxin and admiration have already eaten the big loss of this dead 
butterfly, knowing how powerful they are, how can it be careless? Almost 
instantly, I raised my hand and shouted: "Shield is open!" 


Thousands of silver butterflies rushed toward them, flapping their wings 
like a blast, and were blocked by an invisible wall in front of them. The 
rainstorms generally squeaked and slammed into the intense white light, 
like Mars. It turned out that they had a two-faced shield in front of them. 
However, even if these dead butterflies are blocked by the shield, they are 
unstoppable and endless. For example, the moths are burning, and the 
madness is extremely extreme. Even if the shield is opened, the two are 
also faintly retreating by this artillery-like butterfly rain. The trend. 


At one time, the intention was taken over by the first opportunity. If you 
don’t open the shield, you should be close to the dead butterfly. If you 
open the shield, you can’t pull out the weapon. The wind and the feelings 
are secretly bitter and support your teeth. Fengxin glanced at Xie Pity and 
bowed his head in front of him. He immediately shouted: "Don't be careful 
not to stand there, come to the shield!" 


Who knows, thank you for your turn back, unharmed, frowning: "Ah?" 


The two looked at each other and almost flew out a **** spot on the spot. I 
saw a thankful hand holding a dead butterfly, and my face was a little 
embarrassed. When the raging butterfly wind smashed, one of them flew 
very slow, could not keep up with the brigade, and fluttered a few times in 
front of the pity. Thanks to pity, 1t seems to be extraordinarily hard, always 


feel that this little silver butterfly is not flying fast, and then involuntarily 
stretched out the palm of his hand, imaginary underneath it. The silver 
butterfly slaps cheerfully on his palm and doesn't leave. Upon seeing it, 
Fengxin’s forehead burst into blue veins and said: “Don’t touch the stuff 
with your hand!!!” 


At this time, Xie's wrist suddenly became tight, but someone grabbed him 
and pulled hard. His whole person was pulled into the darkness behind the 
door. 


However, despite being in the dark, he has no uneasiness or vigilance. This 
darkness seems to be a layer of gentle armor, but there is no crisis, but it is 
inexplicable. 


Although the person behind the darkness has not yet appeared, but the 
silver butterfly has arrived, who is the person who is coming, will not 
know? Unfortunately, "You are so bold, you dare to go to Xianjing to make 
trouble, it is too mad!" 


A voice laughed: "Is each other, are you not too mad at my place in 
heaven?" 


Even if I had already expected who was holding on to myself, I heard that 
this familiar voice came from a sigh of relief, and thankfulness was still a 
shock in my heart. Even listening to the wind channel: "Flower City, the 
emperor is in Xianjing, you put people down!" 


Huacheng said: "That depends on whether you have this ability." 
The voice landed, and the door was closed! 


Xie pity felt that Huacheng held his hand tightly on him and took him all 

the way. Black and white in all directions, the ear is the clear sound of the 
silver chain on the black boots, the heights of the feet are undulating, it is 
not the bright and bright Xianjing Street, but a wilderness valley. 


Huacheng must have connected the gates of Xianle Palace to the valley 
with a thousand miles. However, it is not so easy to connect a certain place 


of Xianjing with other places. It is impossible for at least a non-celestial 
priest to do it. I don't know how he did it. Thanks to pity, I want to speak, 
suddenly burst into the air: "His Royal Highness! Where are you?!" 


This angry drink is a wind letter. Although the voice is in the ear, the 
person is not in front of me. His voice was smashed in the psychic array. 
Xie Pity was stunned by his eardrums, and many of the priests were also 
blown up. He was shocked and said: "What happened to General Nanyang! 
What happened?" 


Mu Qing also entered the psychic array, said: "There is something wrong! 
Where is the spirit, please inform the emperor, thank you for running!" 


He usually speaks softly and gentlely, but at this time he has a sigh of 
anger. Ling Wendao: "What? I went to Xianle Palace to see!" 


Some of the priests were shocked: "Three... The Prince's Highness ran 
away? Isn't he forbidden at the Xianle Palace?!" 


Shi Qingxuan also entered the spiritual circle, and said: "I just saw that a 
lot of heavenly gods outside the Xianle Palace are watching. They can only 
enter and cannot go out. How can they run?" 


The wind and the letter said: "Not ran, it was robbed! Your Highness, you 
still can't hear us talking? Where are you now?!" 


When I heard that it was robbed, everyone was even more shocked: "This 
is Xianjing, who is so arrogant!" 


For a time, everyone must speak loudly, and everyone asks for an answer. 
Fang Xinguo’s work with Lang Qianqiu has not been cleaned up. Jun Wang 
banned the pity of the pity, but the people are gone. Isn’t this a 
regenerating incident and a lot of swearing? In any case, hurry to find it 
and talk about it. So Lingwen went to check the situation, and explored the 
position of Xie Pity at this moment. The wind and the feelings shouted 
loudly in the array, and the Wushen officials who could vacate their hands 
came out to pursue, and Shi Qingxuan scattered several waves of merit. 
The people in the Psychic squad turned over and screamed, and they 


couldn't get in. They took a deep breath and were preparing to scream and 
please calm down. The flower city suddenly turned and explored two 
fingers. The cold knuckles gently placed on his temples, and Huacheng 
smiled and said: "Haha, I haven't seen you for a long time, how are you?" 


He took the **** gently, and through the pity, he entered the psychic array 
of heaven. This self-satisfied sentence was not only heard by the pity 
around him, but all the priests who were in a hurry in the heavenly psychic 
array also heard it, and after hearing it, they fell into a dead silence. 


In the hearts of everyone, a silent roar. 
No wonder so arrogant, who is my way, it turned out to be this one! 


Huacheng said again: "I don't know if you think about me. Anyway, I 
didn't think about you at all." 


" " 


There are indeed many priests in the world who are secretly thinking about 
him every day, but once they hear that they didn't think about them, they 
silently recited the sacred sacred blessings. Thank you, thank you, please 
don't think about us. At this time, Huacheng said: "However, I have been 
very busy lately. If someone is too busy and wants to talk to me, it is very 
welcome." 


" " 
In this case, he said this, the meaning is no longer obvious. 


"Whoever dares to catch up with you, I will go to find this person 
challenge next time." 


This challenge will not only be lost, but will not be swept away. Is it a 
red|naked|naked threat? ? 


When Fang Cai heard that Xie Pity actually ran or was robbed, the psychic 
circle was so full of boiling. After all, it was a rare riot, and he was 
extremely concerned. Several martial arts officials had already responded 
actively and were ready to join. Chased. As a result, Huacheng finished the 
three sentences and disappeared in an instant. If Junwu issued an order to 
delegate to the front to pursue, then there 1s no way, public affairs, but now 
things have just happened, 1s in chaos, naturally no one wants to go to the 
body. No one wants to remember the flower city. So while pretending that 
they were not there, they erected their ears and paid close attention to the 
development of the situation. At the same time, the heart was filled with 
turbulent waves: this **** rain was too unscrupulous, and actually ran up 
to heaven to rob people, and the robbery was still the three worlds 
laughing. Is there any hatred or hate? ? ? 


There was silence in the other side, only the wind and anger were 
screaming again and again, and when the flower city finished speaking, 
they removed the **** and thanked them: "Don't ignore them." 


Thanks to pity: "Sanlang..." 
Huacheng released his hand and said: "It is not far from Xianjing, go fast." 


His voice is low and he can't hear emotions. And his movement to let go of 
his wrist is extremely fast, almost like a split. Thanks for the moment, 
when I remembered the scene when they first met him but was opened, 
they stopped on the spot. 


He wanted to ask the flower city, why did it suddenly appear? Although I 
didn't think about it, I was vaguely thinking that it might be to save him. 
So when I heard Sanro, I was a little happy. Can Huacheng be so lost, 
thank you for reacting suddenly: Why do you think Huacheng 1s to save 
him? Not to mention that Huacheng will pay close attention to his 
movements. However, he recently burned the bliss square and escaped 
from the ghost market. Isn't it more likely to come to him to ask for blame 
and accountability? 


The landlord went to the ghost world undercover, and it was not false to be 
caught by the flower city. But this was originally the case for people who 


went to undercover to others. And he sneaked into the ghost market, dig 
three feet in the bliss square to find people everywhere, and put a fire. 
Although in the end most of the bliss workshops burned because Shi 
Qingxuan brought the wind and added fire, but the first fire of the original 
weapons library was still from him, otherwise maybe someone else could 
not think of setting fire, how can he say that he has to bear main 
responsibility. 


The two walked one after the other, thanking the more they wanted to be 
more apologetic, the more they wanted to be more embarrassed, they 
couldn’t help but say: "...Sanlang, I am sorry." 


Huacheng suddenly fell to his feet and said, "Why are you saying sorry?" 


Xie also pity paused, and said:. "I went to the ghost city, was originally to 
investigate the disappearance of the division of the matter, did not tell the 
truth to you before your hospitality, but I burned your bliss Square I was 
really exceedingly sorry. . " 


Huacheng did not speak. Xie pity also know that his sentence "exceedingly 
sorry," really do not have much weight, feel more ashamed, Qing Ke cry, 
and said: "But I guess soon be banished, and then down, I will make every 
effort to make amends, to see how can ...... : 


Flower City has said: "Why did you give me apologize?" 


His tone somewhat stiff, as if could take it no longer, suddenly turned, and 
said: "You forgot my knife arm is a concussion you hurt me you're not hurt 
me, do you? Want to pay for my crime?" 


Xie pity did not feel how painful his right hand, now it is almost 
completely forgotten that this hand has been hurt, and then he remembered 
it and said: "You said the right hand? My right hand is fine, it will be very 
soon. And I will go to attack myself and become like this. I wouldn’t have 
complained about you?" 


Huacheng was determined to look at him, and the light in his left eye was 
extremely bright. And thankfulness suddenly realized that he seemed to be 


shaking. 


After a while, he discovered that it was not the flower city that was 
shaking, but the curving knife at the waist of the city was shaking. 


The silver scimitar hangs over the red dress and trembles. The eye that is 
outlined by the silver line is also. If it grows on the face of a child, then 
the child, at this moment, must be crying in wow. 2k novel reading 
network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 48: Linglong is 
only for one person. 


When I saw it, Xie pity involuntarily reached out and wanted to touch it. 
He said, "What is this?" 


Huacheng was slightly sideways, avoiding his hand, and took a palm on 
the handle. He said, "Nothing. Don't ignore it." 


The Curse of the Curse of the Heavenly Immortals, the cursed blade of the 
curse, was beaten by his palm and shook even more. At this time, thank 
you and listen to the wind letter in the psychic array: "Why can Huacheng 
use a thousand miles in Xianjing?! How can this door be opened?!" 


Teacher Qingxuan: "Nanyang General! I, I, I! I probably know how to 
open. Before I went to the official residence of Prince Edward, I ate the 
flower city. This is a lot of pain. You first take two dice and throw it at the 
door, then open the door. Give it a try." 


Thank you for your pity, just before, is he inadvertently throwing two dice 
in the hall? He and the teacher Qing Xuan are still vivid in the dragons and 
savage in front of the dragon caves and savage savage, if they really open 
the door, I do not know how many crises, busy: "and live! Do not! be 
careful!" 


However, his voice did not pass into the psychic array. I am afraid that in 
Xianjing, there is no time to replenish the mana. Now the mana is 
exhausted and can only be heard. It cannot be said. And even if it can be 
said, it is probably too late. The wind letter seems to be done according to 
what the teacher Qing Xuan said, but what did he know? Because of the 
next moment, Fengxin broke through in the psychic array and broke up. 
When he is excited, he will be embarrassed. If he is a person, he will be 
particularly uncomfortable. He will not repeat it for the sake of the net. 
The gods and officials can pay close attention to this matter, and they are 
busy asking: "General, what are you doing!" 


The voice of the affection came, and it was extremely stunned: "Where is 
this?" It seems that he also entered the door with the wind letter. Shi 
Qingxuan: "You are careful! The places where the points are different are 
different. How many rolls did you roll?" 


Admired: "He lost four!" 


Thanks to the wind and the snoring, there was a trace of panic and fear that 
was extremely difficult to detect, and they were worried that they had 
encountered a very dangerous situation. His voice couldn't pass into the 
psychic array, but he remembered that the master of this spell was in front 
of him, and he couldn't wait for anything else. He asked: "Sanlang, what 
did the scorpion open after opening the door after four points?" 


Huacheng Road: "Random. The person who rolls the dice feels the most 
terrifying place, and wherever the door is opened." 


The voice just fell, only listening to the cold feelings: "Let you rush to 
throw, throw a female bath! Give me me!" 


Hearing the "female bath", thanked him for covering his face. 


Fengxin used to be respectful to women. It is like a flood of beasts. For 
him, the women’s bathhouse is really the most horrible place in the world. 
It is more unfathomable than the Tiger Cave. It sounded like a successful 
encounter with the scorpion, and thanked him for a sigh of relief. 
However, for a moment, the two were screaming again. Shi Qingxuan 
collapsed into the tunnel: "Two generals, what are you seeing this time?" 


There was no answer there, only a strange sound of " "as if both 
of them sank into the water. Everyone breathed and sighed, half a sigh, and 
the wind letter suddenly slammed a few mouthfuls, as if they had broken 
the water, spit something, and shouted: "Black Marsh Giant Crocodile!" 


It turned out that the forefoot of the two men fell into the wild and fled the 
steaming female bathhouse, and the empathy lost this, and the hind foot 
stepped into the swamp. The mud had not passed the waist in an instant, 
and it drowned through the mouth. After the force rushed out, there were 


dozens of crocodile groups that were extremely long. These crocodile 
strips are more than four feet long, and they are eating people all the year 
round. They have all built their hands and legs, and they are smothered. 
The two people are disgusting. The crocodile blame, hit and fight, the 
wind letter can not stand the authentic: "I am coming, give me the 
scorpion! You are not lost!" 


The feelings of love are never willing to admit defeat, blasting a white 
light, said: "The crocodile is good, the crocodile has a female bath injury, 
who knows you will throw another thing. Give it to me!" 


Fengxin angered: "Fuck, I haven't given it to you just now?! Scorpion?!" 


The two completely forgot that the gods are still connected with the 
psychic array. They all disliked the bad luck of the other side, and they 
began to fight with the ping-pong, and the scorpion did not know where to 
go. The priests listened to them in the psychic array, and they watched the 
lively confrontation. It was not too big to see the excitement. It was 
wonderful and wonderful. The two generals finally ripped their skins, and 
they laughed and endured madness, and some even In his own temple, he 
threw a throne, and he hated not to go to the scene to cheer and cheer. 


Although the wind and the feelings of luck do not seem to be very good, 
but they are the respect of the Valkyrie, these wilderness will only add 
some trouble to them, so that they can not pursue, it is not a big crisis. Xie 
pity only hopes that they will give up earlier and get rid of it earlier. At the 
same time, they will be glad that they have lost a lot of points. They did 
not throw out the monsters. When they lost, they threw out the flower city 
and walked and said: "The scorpion I just thrown out. There are two 
points. Is it possible to see you as long as you cast two points?" 


Just finished, I immediately realized that this question sounded a bit 
strange, it sounds like he really wants to see the flower city, the micro- 
feeling is not appropriate. Huacheng said: "No." 


Xie pity felt a sigh of relief, rubbed his cheek and said: "Oh, it turned out 
not. Then I got it wrong." 


Huacheng walked in front of him and said: "If you want to see me, you can 
see me no matter what time you throw it." 


Hearing words, thank you for a move in the throat, and even forgot to say. 


He didn’t have time to chew it. It’s a few meanings. I heard a person in the 
psychic array screaming: “I am coming!” 


After the man said this sentence, not long after, a dazzling white light 
across the sky, an earth-shattering golden stone crack, the flower city and 
the pity of the two people were blocked. 


When the white light gradually cooled down, and gradually faded away, 
Xie Li finally saw it. This came from the sky, and it was a sword in front 
of them. 


The sword was slender and slender and inserted obliquely into the ground, 
and the blade was still trembled. The sword 1s like a black jade forged, 
deep and sleek, smooth and victorious. If someone is close, it can shine a 
clear reflection on the sword. Only the thin silver of the sword heart runs 
through most of the sword. 


The name of the sword is called "heart". 
A figure fell in front of the sword and said: "This is your sword." 


After the death of Fang Xinguo, his sword was left by the Prince of 
Yongan. It’s Lang Qianqiu who throws this heart sword and intercepts the 
two. 


It seems that the wind and the love have failed, but Lang Qianqiu has 
successfully thrown the correct points. I really don't know if it is his luck, 
or the misfortune of thanking him. The only thing that can be said 1s that 
although these two are the same as Prince Edward, the luck of Lang 
Qianqiu has always been much better than thanking him. 


Huacheng has a hand in hand, and the face does not change color. Only the 
figure is slightly moving. When he moved, Xie Pity immediately raised 


his hand to stop him, whispered: "I am coming." 


In the middle of the valley, Lang Qianqiu was on the road, dragging his 
epee in his hand and said: "I just want to go all out and fight with you. No 
matter what the outcome, even if I kill you, I will never I need you to 
repay anything. I don't need you to ask the emperor for self-confidence. 
My swordsmanship is what you teach, you may not be able to win me, why 
not want to fight with me?" 


I don’t have to say it, but I also know that he will definitely go all out. 
However, if he goes all out, he will have to deal with it seriously. If you do 
this, no result will be what you want to see. But if he does not fight with 
him, he will never give up. 


For a long time, thank you for your gentleness and said: "Okay." 


He took a few steps, went to the sword, pulled it out of the rock, and 
whispered: "This is what you are looking for." 


After a few hundred years, Fangxin finally returned to the master's hands. 


It gave a low humming sound on the pity. Not far away, the dawn of 
Huacheng was also stunned by the swords that could not be heard. 


The long sword is in the hand, thanking him for waving it, the tip of the 
sword leaning against the ground, cold and authentic: "This war, no matter 
what the consequences, you should not regret it." 


Lang Qianqiu loudly said: "Never regret!" 


His scalp seemed to be blasted out, holding the hilt of the epee in both 
hands, concentrating on his breath, holding his breath, and his eyes fixed 
on the black-skinned sword front, and did not dare to care. 


Thanks for shaking the blade, a rushing forward. Lang Qianqiu’s eyes were 
condensed, and he was about to meet. Suddenly his limbs jerked stiffly, as 
if he had been **** by something, he fell heavily on the ground. 


He looked down and found out that he was really **** by the five flowers. 
I don't know when, a white white scorpion has wrapped around countless 
laps around his body like a poisonous snake! 


Lang Qianqiu taught the swordsmanship from the Shaomeng Fangxin 
national division, and had a deep awe of the national teacher. Even if the 
golden banquet flowed into the river, the awe was not diminished. Single- 
mindedly staring at all the actions of the other party, did not notice, there 
is actually a day, and the ghosts have long lingered behind him, screaming 


at the moment he fully attacked. How can there be such a shameful thing? 
aes 


Seeing that if the evil is successful, the expression and mood of the 
gratitude and tension are relaxed in an instant. 


He suddenly lost his heart, and he took a long breath and said: "Good 
insurance, good insurance." 


Lang Qianqiu 1s lying on the ground and struggles. Who knows that this is 
a bad thing, the more it struggles, the tighter it is. He angered: "National 
division, what are you doing! Let me go and let me fight!" 


Thanks for the sweat on his forehead, saying: "We just decided to fight a 
dead war. Now it is one of my magic weapons that is wrapped around you. 
You have lost." 


"..." Lang Qianqiu said, "How can this be counted? I said that it is 
necessary to decide a dead battle. Of course, it is necessary to use a sword 
to decide a dead battle! Is a man using a sword, what is the use of a white 
sneak attack? So mean!" 


He really felt that the sword was the ancestor of the hundred soldiers, and 
did not think much, but it sounded like a male priest who discriminated 
against the white magic. But don't say thank you, don't be like a man, he 
has worn through the women's dress, and I don't want to open my mouth. 
Which one would care about this? 


Thanks for praying down on his side, saying: "This is something you don't 
think about beforehand. You didn't say you must use a sword. Let me drill 
a hole. Who are you looking for?" 


Suddenly, he said seriously: "Yes, I sneak attack, how about the sneak 
attack, I got it; yes, Iam mean, mean, how I win. If your opponent is not 
me, but someone else, you are now already dead." 


Huacheng stood not far from the two, smiled silently, and looked around 
with arms. Lang Qianqiu was shocked. 


When this person was a teacher of Yong’an Guoguo, his teachings were 
always bright and upright, going forward and going all out. He couldn’t 
think of it. One day, he would actually hear from the old teacher’s mouth. 
Sneak attack, how about sneak attack, I got it; yes, I am mean, how mean, 
I won." This kind of words, the whole person can hear it one by one. 


After thanking him, he stood up and said, "Let's think about it yourself. 
Next time, don't do this other people's way." 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 49: Linglong is 
only for one person. 


Seeing him go, Lang Qianqiu immediately said: "You stand!" 


Xie pity really stood still. Lang Qianqiu bit his teeth and said: "You... I 
have to give me an account." 


Thanks for your pity: "What do you want to explain?" 


Lang Qianqiu said: "The first generation of grievances, the country hates 
family hatred, you hate Yongan, I can't understand. But..." 


After he squatted for a while, he could barely say it and trembled: "But the 
National Teacher - after my father and my mother, is it not good for the 
benevolent people of Xianle? I am a good friend with many Xianle people. 
I, I have been doing my best to protect them." 


What he said, the sentence is true. 


After Xianle's destruction of the country, many of the old people's 
survivors never forgot their identity. Even if Yong'an founded the country 
and began to rule, this part of the people and their descendants still lived 
in Xianle, and often clash with the new people. 


The first generation of Yongan royal family were suppressed by high- 
strength policies, killing many remnants of Xianle who were recalcitrant. 
In turn, there are also many Xianle people who form alliances, plan to 
assassinate Yongan's princes and nobles, and succeeded several times. In 
this way, the grievances are getting deeper and deeper. 


It is possible to go to Lang Qianqiu and his parents, and they have taken a 
very different attitude towards the survivors of the former dynasty. They 
have been trying hard to integrate the new dynasty and the old people, 
even disregarding the opposition. They have considered the ridiculous 
measures of the descendants of the royal family, and they only show their 


sincerity and treat each other with courtesy. Lang Qianqiu himself has 
never had any prejudice against Xianle people because of the resentment 
of these predecessors. 


At that time, the Fangxin Guoshi was extremely mysterious. He never had 
his own identity. No one knows who the murderer of this **** golden feast 
is. However, Yongan and Xianle are too deep, and no matter which side of 
the two sides is going on, they will find that the other side is behind the 
scenes. The Yongan royal family and the courtiers who have escaped from 
the robbery believe that there must be a force behind the people of Xianle. 
Control, so many people have entered the words, hoping to use this as a 
reason to thoroughly pay the people of Xian'an. However, these words 
were rejected by Lang Qianqiu. 


His resoluteness has saved the lives of countless innocent people, so that 
they will not be caught in a disaster, inexplicably being slaughtered. Just 
now, when I think about it again, how good it was at the beginning, now 
there are many grievances. 


Not feeling worthless, but feeling wronged. Doing the right thing will 
never be worthless. However, if you pay for goodwill, but you don’t get 
the corresponding goodwill from others, you will inevitably be wronged. 


Lang Qianqiu’s eyes were red, and asked: “National teacher, where did I 
do it well enough? Where did my parents do something wrong? Let you do 
this to me?!” The more he wants, the more he is unwilling, the more evil 
Under the restraint, he lifted his upper body and said: "Don't you feel that 
you have to give us an account?!" 


Thanks, "I can't give it." 


He replied simply, and hurried back to Lang Qianqiu, saying: "National 
division, you have changed a lot. You used to be like this." 


"..." Xie pity refers to the frowning of the eyebrows. "I remember I said it 
to you a long time ago. You should not give me a sacred monument in my 
heart. I am not thinking about it." That's the way it is. In the end, you are 
still disappointed." 


Lang Qianqiu lay back on the ground and muttered: "...you and the present, 
who is the real one, I have not understood." 


Thanks to pity: "It's all me. But you used to be only seventeen years old. 
You are so big now, and the things taught to you are naturally different." 


Lang Qianqiu closed his mouth and suddenly said, "Is it because your 17- 
year-old is a hurdle, so you have to turn my seventeen-year-old into a 
hurdle?" 


Thanks for not speaking. 


Seeing that he did not answer, Lang Qianqiu was angry and suffocated, and 
he said, "If you are the one who saves, I will not be as good as you!" 


Hearing words, thankful and prudent eyes are slightly enlarged. 


Lang Qianqiu can't stand up, but his eyes are bright and his voice is 
stunned. It seems that there is white flame burning in his shackles. He 
seems to be angry, but also like to declare war, and sighs: "If you want me 
to become full of resentment like you, I am not! If you want to force me to 
give up like you, I will never. Never. Never. - No matter how you treat me! 
I will never be like you!!!" 


This rhetoric, listen to the whole person must stay. For a long while, he 
only slammed and finally laughed. 


Lang Qianqiu’s tears filled his eyes, and he was so hot that he was so high 
that he was stunned by this laughter. Xie Pity is laughing at the side while 
laughing, the more laughter, the louder: "Good!" 


He couldn't remember the last time he smiled so openly. It was easy to 
stop. He blinked and nodded. "Good. Remember what you said today. You 
will never change. Be like me!" 


Huacheng has been holding his arms and watching. Thanks to this 
sentence, the sound just fell, suddenly, a burst of red smoke in front of 
you! 


Cold did not prevent such a bombing, thanked the pity and was shocked, 
thinking that Lang Qianqiu made a strange trick, quickly avoiding, 
concentrating on alert. However, although this explosion is loud, it seems 
to have no lethality. Only after the smoke had dispersed, Lang Qianqiu had 
been lying in the place where the figure disappeared, leaving only a 
tumbler standing on the left and right. 


This tumbler's head and body are round and round, like a big gourd, a long 
eyebrow and a black eye, a tiger head and a tiger's head, and a sly state of 
sorrow. At this moment, his eyes are squinting, and his back 1s full of a 
wide bladed sword. It is very ecstatic. Lang Qianqiu's appearance, but 
turned into a big toy that the doll can't put it down. Thanks for the smile, 
said: "Qianqiu?!" 


If the evil has not been tied, he wanders back to his wrist. Huacheng 
walked over idlely and bounced on the tumbler. He smiled and said: "This 
person is really so stupid." 


Thanks for the tumbler, and he laughed and said, "This... this... Sanlang, is 
this a thousand years? How did it become like this? Don't play with him, 
let him change back." 


Huacheng said: "No. Take him along." 
Thank you, "Where are you going?" 


At this time, the two had come to a narrow cave. Huacheng did not answer, 
a scorpion thrown, fell on his palm, looked down and took the lead to enter 
the cave. 


Turning people into tumblers, this spell is really naughty, very flowery 
style, but it is also very difficult to understand, anyway, thank you for 
being uncomfortable, and can't guarantee that other gods will be able to 
unravel, and have to take the hands of the tumbler. In, you have to catch 
up. Suddenly I remembered that my heart was still on the ground, and I 
quickly turned back and took the sword. I went back to the back and 
followed the flower city and went in. 


He wants the flower city to solve the spell, but the flower city is not okay. 
The two walked in the cave for a while, the narrow cave at the entrance 
was wider and wider, and the footsteps echoed in the empty caves, with 
faint sparks and singing coming from the front. 


When Xie pity found the bliss in the ghost city, he also heard a song first. 
However, the songs of the geeks of the blissful squares seemed to be the 
whispers of the gentle township, which made people fascinated. But this 
song is like a group of devils, but also messy and ugly, the two can not be 
the same. Thanks for your pity: "Sanlang, what is this place?" 


Huacheng whispered: "Hey." 


The voice that was originally thankful and polite was also very light. 
When I heard this, I just had to hold my breath. Soon, he found out why he 
was quiet. From the opposite of them, a few green faint flames floated. 
When the flames of these groups were approaching, he only saw it. It 
turned out that this was a few ghosts dressed in Tsing Yi. 


These little devils all have a group of lights on their heads, and they seem 
to be a big blue candle from head to toe. There is nowhere to be avoided in 
this cave tunnel. It is the narrow road. Thanks to the backhand, I was going 
to hold the heart on my back, but I immediately remembered that he 
should use the evil and let go of his hand. 


Who knows, the little devils glanced at them and they ignored them. They 
continued to whisper and walked forward. It’s not like you didn’t see them, 
it’s like seeing them, but it’s not strange. Thank you for looking at the 
flower city, standing next to him, where 1s the handsome and unusual red 
ghost king? It is also a pale imp. 


It turned out that I don’t know when, Huacheng has changed a fake skin 
for both of them. Thanks to pity, I thought that at the moment I must have 
a green light on my head. I couldn’t help but touch the top of my head and 
said, "Why is this suffering..." Why bother to make such a strange look? 


Although he did not say it clearly, Huacheng clearly understood what he 
meant and said: "What about the green ghost? I said that he has a low 


grade. The little devil under his hand, but all must be dressed up." 
Unexpectedly, Huacheng actually took him to the site of the green ghosts. 


Before listening to the heavens and ghosts, I would like to ridicule a few 
words about his low grade. Xie Li does not understand why. Now I know 
that his little devils have unified this dress, and finally understand. 
Listening to the verdict of "green light night tour", there are also a few 
elegant styles. However, if it is such a simple and rude literal "green" 
"light" night tour, then it is still a little different from what he originally 
imagined. . Thanks to the pity: "Isn't his cave house long been used by 
you?" 


Huacheng Road: "It's the end, but he fled. After spending 50 years, he built 
a new nest." 


Thanks to the Lang Qianqiu tumbler into the arms, watching no one 
around, whispered: "Sanlang, are you here to find the green ghost? Or else 
first solve the curse of the thousand, let him go first, I will accompany you 
again?" 


Huacheng refused to refuse the authenticity: "No, you take him. I want 
Lang Qianqiu to see the individual." 


Xie pity is strange, look at the flower city reaction, clearly is not much to 
see Lang Qianqiu, will specifically let him go to see someone? It’s hard to 
say both sides, and it’s hard to say. After a while, the two finally got out of 
the cave. After the face was suddenly open, more caves appeared in front 
of the two. 


The mountain has been dug in all directions, the cave is connected to the 
tunnel, and the cave is connected to the cave. Each hole has a demon 
monster with a blue lamp on top of it, like a huge hive ant. If you are 
willing to walk alone, you will not be able to remember the road. 
However, if Huacheng is in his own home, he does not hesitate to shuttle 
through the caves. It is as easy as it is to be familiar with the route. 


Both of them were covered with the skin of the green flames, and they saw 
no one blocked them. Xie pity sighed. Huacheng thought he sighed and 
said, "What happened?" 


Thanks to the pity: "No, I thought that you would face the mountain, I 
didn't expect to be lurking in. I was not very good at fighting, so I was 
relieved." 


He said that "not very good at fighting" is from the heart. Although the 
fight is good, the aftermath is not good. When Huacheng heard it, he 
seemed to smile. Then he said: "The last time I was on the front of the 
mountain, I could tell the news and ran away. This time I am looking for 
him, naturally I can't detect him." 


Thank you for your pity: "Is it true that the people who want to see the 
millennium are the green ghosts? What do they have to do with each 
other? Hey, I don't know what he wants to do. In the end, let him go with 
him, and slowly ask him to solve it. The curse of Qian Qiu is also there." 
Because he still remembers that he burned the bliss of the flower city, it is 
inevitable. Just thinking, just listen to the flower city and said: "This waste 
can not do anything, the vigilance is very high. The devil can not be near 
his body, his heart is not good disguise. To be close to him, there is only 
one way." 


At this time, the four devils talked and laughed and came face to face. 
Huacheng slowed down and thanked him for slowing down. I saw that the 
four Tsing Yi little ghosts were dragging a row of living people with a 
rope. 


This group of living people are ragged and dressed in luxurious clothes. 
They are all young men and women under the age of 30, and there is also a 
small child, holding a young man’s cloak, about a pair of people caught. 
Father and son. They were bound by their hands and walked in this 
magical cave. All of them looked terrified and fainted. Huacheng passed 
them by, and then turned around without a trace, and followed the end of 
the team. He only gently touched the elbow to thank him, and thanked him 
for keeping his synchronized movements. Looking at the flower city, he 


changed his skin in an instant. This time it was a handsome boy, probably 
himself. type. 


The team turned around and walked through the cave. The few young 
ghosts in front seemed to be very satisfied with this errand. They always 
remembered to show their authority. They rushed to the group behind them 
and said: "All honest, don't cry! Cry face The nose is full of tears, and the 
appetite of our nobles is poured, and you are taught to know what ts better 
than death!" 


The so-called four major evils in the ghost world, the other three must 
have never heard of them eating people, only the green ghosts can not give 
up, no wonder they have to be mocked by their peers and the enemy at the 
same time "can not get on the table" Can't see the eye." Fang Caihua said 
that there is only one way to get close to the green ghost and not be aware 
of him. It seems that it is mixed into the ingredients. Thanks for walking, 
while walking to catch the hand of Huacheng, I caught it for the first time. 
I felt that the flower city was a stiff and seemed to want to take a hand. 
Xie Pity is not unaware, but at this time, the situation is not much thought. 
He clenched the palm of Huacheng and gently wrote a word in his hand: 
"Save." 


Since he was allowed to see it, then this group of people could not be 
saved. This is the action that Xie Pity wants to take after telling him. 


After writing this word, Huacheng gently closed his fingers and held the 
palm of his hand. After a while, the team went out of the tunnel and 
entered a huge cave. 


As soon as he entered the hole, a black pressed thing caught his eye. He 
thanked him for not blinking. He felt that Huacheng had caught his wrist 
in the backhand and wrote a few words on the back of his hand: "Be 
careful. Don't touch. ” 


First of all, Xie Pity thought that there were many rags hanging above the 
cave. Who knows that the eyes are shrinking, and what is the rag? It is 
clearly a large group of black-pressed, dense people with their feet up, 
head down, and hanging in midair. 


Hang up the corpse forest! 


However, although there are hanging corpses, there is no blood rain, 
because these are all dry corpses, and there is no blood to flow. The 
expression of the corpse was extremely painful, with a long mouth and a 
layer of snow-like crystals on his face and body. That is salt. 


In the deepest part of the cave, the lights are bright, there is a huge chair, a 
long table, a golden cup of jade, its magnificent, not like a deep mountain 
cave, but rather a palace banquet hall. A little farther away from the long 
table, there is a huge iron pot that can accommodate dozens of people 
swimming in the water. The boiling water of the red pass tumbling in the 
pot. If anyone accidentally falls down, I am afraid that it will be instantly 
It will be very hot! 


Four little devils rushed to a group of people to go to the pot. Some people 
saw it, and they were so scared that they couldn’t stand it. They beat and 
slammed, and thanked the pity. Suddenly, they felt that the Huacheng arm 
was hard and stopped. . 


He turned to look at it, only to see the flower city still holding the face of 
the handsome young man, but his eyes have already ignited the anger of 
the sky. 


Although Huacheng 1s always laughing, but Xie is very clear, his emotions 
have always been well hidden. Xie Li has never seen the color of such 
anger in his eyes. He looked down at the sight of Huacheng, and the next 
moment, his breathing was stagnant. I saw the front of the gorgeous giant 
chair, next to a person. 


At first glance, it is a person. When you look at it again, you know that it 
is actually a stone statue of the same size as a real person. This stone 
statue is very strange, carved into a squatting posture, back to him, 
downcast, at first glance, the live detachment 1s the portrayal of the words 
"the dog of the funeral home." It is conceivable that the only purpose of 
carving such a stone statue is to humiliate this person. 


And Xie Pity does not have to turn over the front of this stone statue, but 
also know that this stone like a human face must be exactly the same as 
him. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 50: Linglong is 
only for one person. 


It stands to reason that people will not know what their backs look like, 
however, they are different. He is familiar with his own back. 


When Xianle was broken, people burned his prince's temple in order to 
vent their anger. They overthrew all the statues of the princes, stole the 
gemstones, and scraped the gold on the clothes. But they still don't hate, so 
someone gradually came up with a new trick, which is to create this kind 
of stone statue. 


The princes of the Prince who had been enshrined in the past were molded 
into a sinful pleading position, placed in a crowd of people, and when they 
rushed past, the stone statues of the wood were spit or smacked twice to 
remove the suffocation. Or even further, it is directly molded into a 
squatting head, which is used to replace the threshold and is used by 
thousands of people to step on the 10,000 people. In the 20 years after 
Xianle's death, many towns and villages can see these stone statues. How 
can she be unfamiliar with what is the back of her own kneeling? 


At this time, the voice of a young man said: "When the little hyena is 
holding the dog's leg of the stallion, it is really a few pounds. Now he is 
just being exiled. The wild dog, dare to break my business, I taught him to 
be dried up and no one dared to take it!" 


The people have not arrived yet, and they will come first. Xie pity looked 
at him and saw a graceful green shirt man coming in. At some reason 
worth mentioning, Xie pity couldn't help but look at his head at first sight, 
seeing him wearing a mask, no lights on his head, and even feeling 
disappointed. A group of Tsing Yi devils embraced the Tsing Yi people, as 
if a circle of candles surrounded the middle man. Presumably, this is one 
of the four major evils in the legendary ghost world. 


From the first time Nanfeng mentioned the name of Grace, Xie Li left a 
hint of meaning, thinking about whether this "sentimental" is the kind of 


grace he knows. But because of the customary concept: demon and ghosts, 
they will hide their real names and hide their past lives. Yes, he thinks that 
they may not be the same person, but the pseudonym is the same. 
However, it seems that he has eight points and nine points. Because, if it is 
not the kind of grace that he knows, how can there be another graceful 
attachment to the prince? How can the sound be slightly familiar with an 
opening? 


The group of Tsing Yi devils shouted loudly around the king, screaming, 
thanking and listening. It turned out that this sentiment sent a few 
confidants to the ghost market, making trouble, and playing the city of 
flowers, so he is ready to fight again. Who knows that this second round 
has not been released yet, on the road, I have encountered exile. Although 
he was decentralized to the world, he was once a priest, and there was 
nothing else to do. When he encountered it, he cleaned up a wave, and he 
gave it away. 


In a short period of time, I lost two waves of confidant. When I heard the 
news, I was furious and cursed: "There will be ancestors who have their 
ancestors, and this dog breeder with the lower body sore, it is necessary to 


marry him and The rotten hang of the hang hangs in front of their 
temples, whoever worships them will follow the same steps as they do!" 


Thank you for listening, there is a kind of impulse to cover your ears. The 
same 1s a curse, the wind is excited, and it is too unbearable, but he can't 
listen any more, but he can clearly feel that he is just a breath of blood, 
there is no real curse intention. The law of grace is not the same, and 
people listen to it without any doubt that his heart is really hoping that the 
person who cursed him will die as dirty as he 1s, and that he will not attack 
the people in three ways. It is simply indecent. 


The group of Tsing Yi devils echoed loudly. Grace is probably remembered 
by his powerful subordinates, and said: "It’s a pity that Xuan Ji is sucha 
strong and good woman, and this shameless dog has been caught by 
Tianda’s grievances. Not coming out!" 


Thank you for listening, not agreeing. Although Xuan Ji has a sad point, it 
is not as if they say it is all the fault of the general. After all, the dozen or 
so brides are the ones she took the initiative and she killed herself. Strong 
and not fake, good women are waiting to be discussed. In front of him, he 
was holding a squatting general's thighs and flying up. This kind of 
gratitude does not dare to agree. After so many years of going up and 
down, there is a saying that he dares to say: If you have the ability, you 
may not be able to soar; but if you fly, you must have his ability. If you 
don't have the strength, how can you ask for help? You can't pass the 
catastrophe. At most, you only have to have a "same official". Although 
there are not many intersections between Xie and Yu, he can see that the 
force of Xiao Xiao is faintly above Lang Qiangiu. However, how much 
skill does not mean how high the status can be, and fortune is also one of 
the elements, otherwise it would have been a single hall. 


However, grace does not consider these. He was screaming, as if he had 
not entered the ground, he didn't want to die. Smashing stallion, small 
squatting thigh, Junwu false, Jingwen dead |_ , Lang Qianqiu idiot, right 
one true shit, navy black heart and liver, wind teacher woman - he 
probably does not know Shi Qingxuan is actually a man. If you didn't hear 
it, thank you for not being able to imagine how a person would have so 
much grievance. In the end, the focus is on the city of Huanhua and the 
low-key black water sinking boat that dares to look down on him, but it is 
the two districts, and one day they will let them kneel down. Because I 
couldn't imagine this unrealistic mysterious picture, thank you for being 
angry, but unfortunately only felt funny, couldn't help but glance at the 
flower city. Huacheng himself did not react very much, but his eyes were 
still staring at the stone statue of the earth. Finally, thank God, grace is 
like a comfortable, turn the subject, said: "What happened to you last 
time? Is it true that the right and the horses are fighting?" 


He said that he squatted back and sat down on the magnificent bench, his 
feet lifted, and a pair of boots were placed on the shoulder of the stone 
statue. It is actually taking this stone statue as a footstep. 


Xie Li has been catching the arm of Huacheng, feeling that he took a step 
forward and quickly pulled it. I also felt that the light was not enough, so 


he wrote another word in his palm: "Thank." 


Huacheng recognized the word, first bowed his head, looked at him, 
thanked him for his gratitude, but thanked him for his kindness. 
Immediately, he shook his head slightly and wrote a "listening" and a 
"day" in his palm. 


Listening to the sad words, it seems that he sent people to do something, 
and the two **** officers in heaven, and it is not a good thing, thank you 
must listen to it. As for the statue to give people a footstep, think about 
him and even the threshold has been used, naturally feel no flaws, anyway, 
it is just a stone, and it is not himself. Although only wrote a short three 
words, but the two eyes looked at each other, thank you for knowing that 
Huacheng understood his meaning. Huacheng slowly grasped his hand and 
turned his head, unable to see his face. 


A young man in Tsing Yi said: "According to my king's words, I have 
already spread the news that I want to support the Western Wushu in the 
west. Now the matter is getting bigger and bigger. Let's take this excuse 
and dress up. The believers in Qiying Temple have more than 100 
Mingguang Temples in the north. No one doubts. Hahaha! You don’t know, 
many believers can be stupid. When we look at them, they can’t keep up. 


yy 


Grace praised the authenticity: "Continue to give them a fire! Right can 
really bear, I will not believe that the stallion can bear!" 


Regardless of whether they preached rumors or not, such a rumor was 
originally a bad heart, not to mention the ill-conceived virtues of smashing 
the merits of the sacred temples of adults, the blame of the waters, the 
sorrows of the minds, and the strangeness of the heavenly courts. Grace 
said that he was not very big but very annoying. Xie pity secretly wrote: 
"If you have a chance to tell me, I will tell you that the two priests are 
arrogant." 


The head was finished, and lying back, a pair of long legs rested on the 
stone shoulder and changed position. The little devils know what to do, go 
to the crowd here, pick and choose. The child in the team was less than ten 


years old. He was not very sensible. He was blind and held his father’s 
clothes. He was afraid of it and kept groaning. The young man’s face was 
gray and he kept saying: “Don’t be afraid, don’t be afraid.’ However, he 
was afraid of dying himself. 


A young man in Tsing Yi saw that there was a child, his face was bright, 
and his arm was stretched to catch him. The young man screamed and 
jumped up. I still don't know what he wants to do, thanking him for his 
physical movements. At this time, he felt a flash of people. Looking back, 
Huacheng stood up. 


He is looking for a green ghost. At this moment, he sees grace and should 
be disguised. Xie Lihao does not doubt that with his own power, he can 
kill the Quartet here, no one can stop it. However, Huacheng did not 
produce the prototype, but still draped in the skin of ordinary teenagers, 
and walked slowly. 


Several Tsing Yi devils showed their weapons and warned: "Stop! What 
are you doing?!" 


Grace tilted his feet and wondered, "What happened to this kid? Take 
him." 


Huacheng smiled and said: "The Xianle royal family is here, are you not 
going to pay a bit of respect?" 


Hearing words, not only sad, but even pity, but also stunned. 


Swearing, Grace Huo Ran stood up, and the mask snorted, as if angered 
and laughed: "Hello big dog! Come to me to make such a joke?! You are 
talking about, where are you from the Xianle royal family? Which one?!" 


Huacheng calmly said: "Anle Wang." 


Suddenly, thanking the feelings of Lang Qianqiu Tumbler in the arms, it 
seems to struggle to stun. 


Anle Wang is the descendant of the royal family of the same generation 
with Lang Qianqiu. Anle Wang himself, and Lang Qianqiu can be 
considered a friend. 


Graceful sneer came from under the mask: "Anle King? I see you are 
looking for death! Who told you to come to me to find something? The 
person who told you did not give you a history book? Anle King is already 
a royal family." There is a blood in the deposit, but this one has already 
died! What are you, dare to pretend to be a Xianle in front of me?" 


Huacheng raised his eyebrows: "Oh? It’s dead? How is it dead?" 
Grace shouted: "Get it! Take this weird boy!" 


Under the order, dozens of Tsing Yis were pouring in from around the 
cave, and they couldn’t stop drinking. In the group dance, Huacheng 
smiled slightly. 


The moment before, his face still seemed to be a breeze. The next 
moment, a layer of frosty frost covered his expression. I don't see how the 
figure 1s erratic, and it instantly appears behind the grace. 


He grabbed the head of Grace with one hand, as if he was holding a ball 
played by a child, and went to the next shot, saying, "What the **** are 
you? Dare to find this kind of death in front of me!" 


Just listen to the loud noise of" ", before the gorgeous long seat, when 
the sandstone flutters, the smoke 1s rolling. Xie pity kept the child behind 
him and blocked a few small stones. When the smoke dissipated, the grace 
disappeared. After a closer look, it did not disappear. However, his entire 
head was taken by the palm of the city and deeply captured into the 
ground. 


Everyone in the cave screamed and shouted, thanking the pity: "Don't run 
around!" In case of surprise, the ghosts in the cave, killing people, how is 
it good? Of course, as usual, no one will listen to him. Xie pity took back 
his hand and was helpless. But now he can't take care of others. Over there, 
Huacheng slowly squatted down, grabbed the sad hair with one hand, 


pulled the **** head out of the cracked ground, and lifted it up and 
observed it for a moment, as if it was very interesting, haha laugh it out. 


Although he was laughing, his kind of eyes, the real mismatch of 120,000 
points, was horrifying. If the evil flies out, he knocks over a few blue- 
lighted devils who have slashed their swords to the escaping living 
creatures. Thanks for their pity, they instinctively perceive the bad, saying: 
"Sanlang? Saburo!" 


There were a few cracks in the mask on the face, and the pieces fell off. He 
spit out a blood and shouted: "Come on! Stop him! Come over and stop 
me!!" 


Huacheng was still beating him to death, but now he seems to be very 
leisurely talking to him about some of the world, some of them are not, 
and they said: "Ah, you don't know? Some things in the world can't stop. 
For example. The sun sets in the west, for example, the elephant steps on 
the ants, such as --- I want your dog!" 


Speaking of the last sentence, the color of his face is revealed, and the 
whole body will be held in his hand, and it will be slammed again! 


Another loud noise, the graceful body on the ground, fell into a beach than 
the mud is not as good as the stuff. The mask on his face slammed and 
shattered, revealing a half face. 


Anyone who comes to see this half face will find an amazing fact: 
The green ghosts, and the Prince of Xianle, this ghost is a god, the 


difference between the two, even grow so similar! 2k novel reading 
network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 51: 34 FA FA FA 
Pl Fl Fl A 


The author has something to say: It's not a pure back pot, it's not purely 
awkward, it's boring. The pits will be filled, don't worry. 


However, when the other half of the mask is also dropped, the entire face 
is exposed, and you will find that it is not like it. Although the contours of 
the nose and jaw lines of the two populations are similar, the eyebrows are 
quite different. Thankful eyebrows, calm and gentle. The graceful 
eyebrows are high and the eyes are more slender. Although it is definitely 
a handsome boy, when you look at this aspect, you know that such a person 
must be extremely difficult to deal with. He was beaten with a pair of 
blood and blood, so it was easy to open it, but it was vague to see that the 
person who captured him was another appearance, vaguely a red boy. 
Although I have never seen the true city of Huacheng, I saw it in red, and I 
was shocked and angry: "It is you. It is you!" 


Huacheng has already shown the truth, saying: "You haven’t answered the 
question yet. How did Anle Wang die?" 


Because his eyes are really stunned at the moment, Xie pity rushed 
forward and said: "Sanlang!" 


Everyone in the cave has been scattered seven or eighty-eight, and Xie pity 
grabbed him and said: "What's wrong with you? Don't be angry, don't be 
angry, nothing. You calm down first, nothing..." 


He gently stroked the shoulders of Huacheng, and the sound was lower and 
lower. When she was young, she was angry or sad. Her parents were like 
this. While he was caressing on his back, he softened his comfort. 
Therefore, he used this method on Huacheng. Unexpectedly, when it was 
really effective, there was a trace of chaos in the eyes of Huacheng. After 
he had been swayed for a while, his lips moved slightly and finally cooled 
down and precipitated, revealing the clear. 


Seeing it, thank you for your relief. Who knows, the breath has not been 
loose in the end, the next moment, Huacheng suddenly shot, also patted his 
shoulder. 


Under this shot, thankfulness gave the body shape. 


He did not guard against the flower city and would do it for him, so he was 
fixed. He didn't know what Huacheng was going to do, but he didn't worry 
about himself. He only worried that Huacheng would be out of control like 
he was. Zhang mouth wanted to ask, but found that not only can not move, 
but also can not speak, can not help but slightly feel bad. 


Although the sadness was completely impossible to fight, one mouth was 
very hard, and it was full of blood: "You are a sinister dog with a madness! 
I am eating at home to provoke you?!" 


Huacheng with a smile, once again took his head into the ground. After the 
filming, I lifted it up and said, "How did Anle Wang die?" 


Graceful words: "What the **** is it about you..." 
Huacheng is another palm, saying: "How did Anle Wang die?" 


Repeatedly, Huacheng always maintained a decent smile, taking his head 
as a ball and smashing it into the ground nearly ten times. Although it is 
such a shot, Grace can't die, but it is because it can't die, so it is enough. 
Even if it is a cast iron skull, it can't stand this way. The grace can't help it. 
It changed: "You have nothing to do." Will it be a history book?!" 


Huacheng sneered: "If everything is written in history, I will ask you what 
this waste is doing?" He said that he raised his hand again. Grace shouted, 
said: "It is Lang Qianqiu! It was killed by Lang Qianqiu!!!" 


The tumbler in the blessings shook, and then swayed violently. 


He was so swaying too much that he couldn't push him down, and finally 
he watched the fall of the tumbler fall out and squirmed on the ground. 


Huacheng did not return, but it was a spell. A burst of red smoke exploded, 
and Lang Qianqiu’s figure jumped from the fog. 


He is a noble day, and he has never suffered from this in his life. He said 
that he is angry and said: "What do you do with blood and people, and you 
will come? I am a friend, and you say who killed him!" 


When I saw him suddenly, he was shocked and said: "You are Lang 
Qianqiu? How are you **** here?!" 


Lang Qianqiu also couldn't figure out why he would be brought here, but 
he was just overwhelmed by the accusation of Grace. He had to tell him 
clearly: "The king of Anle is obviously sick, why do you inexplicably say 
that I killed him!" 


Huacheng looked at it with a cold eye. He didn’t take his head as a racket 
again. He also smacked it with him. He said: “The shit’s death is only your 
letter. It’s not long before the golden feast, he died, definitely You 
assassinated! It’s not that you killed the old dogs that you Yongan killed." 


He was so snarled, Lang Qianqiu was so angry that he said: "No wonder 
everyone said that the green ghosts are inferior. When you see them today, 
you are really inferior." 


He blurted it, but it just touched the scale of the grace. After the fame of 
fame, hundreds of years have been ridiculed by all the gods and ghosts, 
and they hate this festival. They hate this festival and immediately change: 
"I am inferior, it is better than you are stupid. Zhang mouth closed friends, 
what is peaceful coexistence, fairy Musicians and Yongan people can 
become friends? There is peaceful coexistence? You are as jealous as your 
aunt! 


Listening to his irony of his parents, Lang Qianqiu angered: "Stop! My 
father and mother are a sincere, they are not awkward, you can not insult 
them!" 


Grace said: "But after a group of rebel thieves, a big dog face! Where is 
Chi Cheng? To the Xianle people to seal the king's land? Good shameless, 


holding something stolen from others to give others. You Everything that I 
have is all ours!" 


Lang Qianqiu was not good at rebutting, saying: "You! You..." was actually 
stuck. When I saw him, he was so angry that he was very happy. He 
decided to make him more awkward. Haha said: "But even if you kill the 
happiness, the child will die and earn, and Xianle will die, and you will 
lose one." Golden Temple. It’s a pity that you didn’t kill you together, and 
taught you to taste the aftertaste!” 


Wen Yan, Lang Qianqiu stayed, said: "...What do you say?" 
Thanks to the heart, secretly complained. 


He couldn't wait to jump up like Huacheng to take the picture back to the 
ground and let him shut up. However, Huacheng settled his figure, and he 
couldn't earn this spell. Lang Qianqiu said: "What is it that didn't kill me?" 


Grace asked him to comment on his inferior revenge, and he proudly said: 
"What kind of life 1s what kind of life, your stupidity spans a hundred 
years, which makes me open my eyes. You don't want to think about it. 
Xianle people can die of your Yongan." If there is any one who does not 
hate you, then it is not worthy of being a Xianle person! You are really a 
good person in the royal family and will be handed over to your future 
Yongan royal family?? It is just to set the bottom of your palace, 
convenient layout plan, blood wash Your birthday banquet!" 


Xie pity is still struggling, Lang Qianqiu is the whole person is stunned. 
For a long while, he was very arrogant: "...Anle King, and the National 
Teacher, is it all the way?" 


He only used the teacher and his friends to collude and bully him. He was 
full of grief and anger. Who knows, but calmly said: "National teacher? 
What do you say that demon and heart? Who is with him?" 


Lang Qianqiu listened to him and asked him, and confused: "You...you 
said that you want to wash your golden banquet, but you can wash your 


golden banquet. It is obviously a national teacher. Isn't they all the way? 
I..." It is. 


Graceful said: "Ghosts know what the demon road is, and shut him down! 
Lang Qianqiu, you listened well: Your Yonganguo's golden banquet is a 
ek Wash of Xianle people! Originally, Anle has already put the dog on 
the banquet as planned. The rebels are killing the light, who knows that the 
strange Chinese teacher suddenly came in. Anle thought that things were 
revealed, and hurriedly fled back to ask me what I saw when I saw it. Who 
knows that I heard the **** golden banquet that night. It’s your national 
teacher, and it’s already wanted all over the country.” 


Lang Qianqiu took a while to react and said: "If this is the case, then why 
didn't you say it earlier??" 


Grace said: "Do you have a problem with your brain? Why should I say it? 
Is it good for someone to help the top pot? Can I raise this lie and you can 
do it?" When he said it, he gloated: "Oh, I understand." You dare not 
believe it? I heard that you later nailed your master to the coffin, 
hahahahaha, you are confused, you kill the wrong person!" 


Thanks for closing his eyes, listening to his full of vicious laughter, his 
heart snorted. 


Lang Qianqiu gave him a sizzling bang, saying: "...false!" and turned 
sharply, rushing to pity: "If it is true, even if he does not say, then you? 
Why why not? Say?!" 


Grace spit out a broken tooth and said: "Who its this fucking? Are you so 
many people coming to my house to open a party?" 


No one cares about him, Lang Qianqiu asked for pity: "If you didn't do it, 
you clearly didn't kill, why do you admit it?!" 


At this time, thank you for being loose. 


Huacheng finally unlocked the spell that fixed him. However, I am afraid 
that it is already a little late. Lang Qianqiu waited for his answer, thanked 


the pity slowly, stood up, lived the bones of the living wrist, half awkward, 
spit out a few words: 


"A nonsense!" 


Originally, Lang Qianqiu thought that he would say "really, that is what he 
said." However, thankfulness only said these words in a cold voice, but 
completely denied the statement that Grace said that he was in his favor. 
Grace is not happy, said: "Who do you say nonsense?" 


Thank you, "You." 


He looked down at the grace and said: "Through it, it’s all empty, what 
evidence does you have to prove that the **** banquet is a descendant of 
the royal family?" 


Grace seems to be funny, saying: "If you kill it, you will kill it. What 
evidence is there? And this has been going on for hundreds of years. What 
evidence can there be?" 


Thanks to the pity: "So I said that you are a nonsense. Xianle and Yongan 
are both old dynasties. They have already disappeared. So now you still 
have the old things to provoke, what is the point?" 


He sighed with a sigh of relief, as if he remembered something and raised 
his eyes. Xie pity turned to Lang Qianqiu, and the tone was peaceful and 
plain: "I killed your father, you saw it with your own eyes. At that time, I 
was not stunned for a second time, my heart was unwilling, and I made a 
big mistake. It is mine." However, I thought that there is no need to 
involve irrelevant people. This person is arrogant, and he does not hesitate 
to pour dirty water on Anle Wang, but it is necessary to retaliate against 
you and say that he 1s inferior." 


It would be funny to teach others to listen to this conversation. The 
murderer title of a cruel murder case is still vying for contention. I don’t 
know if I think that the **** banquet is a great achievement. Lang 
Qianqiu’s thoughts were chaotic, and he thought for a long time, saying: 
“Yes...you are not others.” 


It is clearly what he saw with his own eyes. That night, he rushed into the 
Golden Temple, and saw the national division of the black man pull the 
long sword from his father's chest. At that moment, his father, the king of 
Yong’an, also extended his hand to him, not yet mad. It was after he 
rushed to the scene that he dropped his hand. 


At this time, the grace lying on the ground suddenly said: "Prince cousin, 
is it you?" 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 52: 34 FA FA FA 
WE ME 2 2 


The eyes of thankfulness fell back to him. Gazing for a moment, thanking 
the pity: "It looks graceful, you have lived wonderfully over the years." 


After he finished speaking, Huacheng went to the skin that he disguised. 
The three people who saw the door coming to the door finally showed their 
true meaning, and the eyes of the graceful eyes grew bigger and bigger. 
Lang Qianqiu said with a sigh: "Cousin?" 


Although he had heard "We Xianle" in the words of Rong Rong, it has 
already been guessed that the identity of the Green Ghost was Xianle, but 
he did not think that he had such a relationship with Xie Li. Grace staring 
at the face of Cheer, slowly glance up and down, it is a strange and greedy 
strange look. When his glance point fell on the back of the heart of the 
sword, suddenly burst into a burst of laughter, said: "The original, this is 
the case! Heart is you, you are the heart. Hahahahahahahahahaha!" 


Although I don't know why he laughed, Lang Qianqiu felt extremely 
uncomfortable and angered: "What's so funny?" 


Graceful and sinister: "I laughed at my good cousin, doing your best! I just 
said that your stupidity spans a hundred years, I am sorry, I apologize, you 
are a teacher, you are a teacher, you are smart." Where are you going?” He 
turned to thank you. “You ran to Yongan as a national teacher. When you 
were finally killed by your apprentice, it’s not wonderful? Isn’t it funny? I 
said that you deserve it? You are really guilty! ” 


He said that the word "criminal", the flower city is the Thunder. Grace was 
very resistant to the game. After seeing the show, she was even more 
excited and excited ten times. The face was slammed into the ground and 
shouted relentlessly: "False! Be guilty! Be guilty!" 


Every time he said, Huacheng made a palm on his back. The scene was 
extremely bloody. Xie pity intercepted the hand that Huacheng had not yet 


fallen. He said: "Sanlang, forget it!" 
Huacheng Li said: "Why do you forget?!" 


Thanks to pity: "Nothing, don't care, this person is just sick, difficult to get 
around, I will deal with it. You don't care about him." 


He patted the shoulders of Huacheng. For a long time, Huacheng finally 
whispered: "Good." 


Grace pulled the head out of the ground, and rolled hard to the side, 
shouting: "What kind of fake heart do you pretend? I really don't want him 
to beat me, you should stop him from the beginning! Now let him count 
No one will praise you generously!" 


Thanks to pity: "I stopped him just because I didn't want to dirty his hands. 
Are you mistaken?" 


Hearing the words, the **** face flashed a trace of anger. Immediately, he 
smiled slyly and said: "Oh, my cousin, your relationship with Huacheng is 
good? I said why the younger brother of the Chinese New Year is going to 
visit you, but the subordinates who sent it did not come back. It turned out 
that you are on the flower city!" 


Xie pity did not know at all, and Yu Rong had sent a subordinate to find 
him. On the night of the Mid-Autumn Festival, he just met the Flower City 
and brought the boy back to the Bodhisattva. Those subordinates who 
wanted to come to Grace were solved by the Flower City. Thinking of this, 
he could not help but look at the people around him. Grace again said: 
"Also called Saburo, hey, really familiar. Cousin, you are the great priest 
of heaven, how to hook up with this monster, not afraid of humiliating 
your identity? After all, you are so perfect, So pure and innocent, your 
holy light shines on the earth, hahahahahahaha..." 


Most of the priests in the heavens feel that they are a bit yin and yang, but 
if they let them listen to it now, they will see what is really yin and yang. 
In the past, they were really envious. And the grace is not only read, he 
still does, he holds the heart: "The cousin of the prince, for many years, 


the younger brother is really thinking about you all the time. You see the 
stone statue I made for you, I will leave it At the side, you can always see 
your heroic posture, how, plastic is good, do you like it? It doesn't matter, 
don't like it better, I will give you more plastic, hahahahaha... ... 


When he mentioned the stone statue, the face of the flower city was chilly. 
If it wasn't for the pity, he would discourage him. I was afraid that he 
would step on it. Xie Pity is very clear about the temperament of Grace. 
This person is very sick. The more intense your reaction, the more excited 
he is. The more he jumps, the more he must do it. He smiles and says: 
"Plastic Ok, it’s not so good, it’s hard for you.” 


Sure enough, Grace immediately pulled down his face and said coldly: 
"Follow you, I will still look at you in the past, who will give you a copy? 
You can fly again this time, mostly Holding Junwu's thighs, crying and 
licking your knees. Just look at the heavenly court, which sergeant is not 
more decent than your scenery? Flying for two hundred years can put you 
under your feet, almost eight hundred years old. It’s a failure to mix 
people like this." 


Xie pity smiled and said: "Cousin is quite a failure. It is no more than a 
cousin, only eight hundred years is fierce." 


Thanks to pity, it is too clear how to cure him. Huacheng laughed at the 
side, and the face of Grace was really green. He glanced between a few 
people and suddenly said: "Look at this posture, you should not ask for a 
flower city to come to the whole house today, to give you an outrageous 
thing?" 


Thanks for your pity, think about this posture and feel that it cannot be 
refuted. Graceful said: "Hey, listen to me, you are not good, wow, he is like 
this. Isn't it being influenced by the holy light above your head, blinking? 
Oh, I found out, he seems to have been Eyes! Hahaha..." 


The voice did not fall, his eyes were black, his cheeks were sore, and his 
blood was so mad that he was beaten again. However, this punch 1s not a 
flower city, but a pity. 


Thanks for the quick shot, cold and cold: "I have never beaten you before, 
it does not mean that I will never fight." 


This punch is awkward, so long, and the grace can finally come out. He lay 
on the ground like a fury dog, laughing and laughing: "Prince cousin, you 
hit me, you actually beat me! God, we are noble and kind, sad and 
sorrowful, helpful, even the ants are reluctant to step on the death of His 
Royal Highness Prince. He gave me a look, he still beat people, he actually 
hit someone! It’s awful, it’s incredible!!!” 


He is so excited that he is so mad. Lang Qianqiu has never seen anyone 
who is so strange in his words and deeds. When he saw his one-man show, 
the whole person was shocked and muttered: "This... is this person crazy?" 


Thanks for being pity, I don’t think it’s strange, saying: “You heard it, this 
person is crazy, his mind 1s not normal, and what he said is not credible.” 


At this time, the graceful laughter stopped abruptly, suddenly and 
positively, sneer: "You don't rush to tell people that I am crazy. I ask you, 
how the Anle King died!" 


This question is only asked by Huacheng, but now he is asking for pity, 
and Lang Qianqi suddenly cares. 


Thanks for your pity, I didn’t answer it immediately. Grace slowly climbed 
up and sat down against the stone statue. "After euthanasia, I cut down his 
body and looked at his belly. His internal organs were shattered by the 
extremely fierce sword. There is no trauma, but coughing and vomiting 
blood. This method, the ordinary swordsman can not do it. I originally 
thought that it was the Yongan thief who invited the alien alchemist to do a 
good disguise as an euthanasia. Now think about it, there is another 
person. Do this kind of thing. This person, of course, is my good cousin of 
fairness and justice. After all, our Captain Valkyrie, the Prince of God, is a 
holy and wonderful Tianshan Snow Lotus..." 


Huacheng stepped on the foot, and the sadness was so screaming. Lang 
Qianqiu only felt that his head was going to be blown up. He held his head 
full of blood and said: "Shut up! What do you want to understand? Who is 


the murderer? What happened? What happened to Anle Wang? What 
happened?!" 


Graceful words: "How can you still think about Lang Qianqiu? I can take 
care of seven seven eight eight eight. It seems that you really don't know 
what your master is. I come here, I will give you a good cut. Cousin: The 
predecessor of the former fairy country, Prince Edward, ran to you, 
Yongan, as a national teacher, and taught you five years of 
swordsmanship..." 


He said a few words, thanked the long sword, and did not go forward, Lang 
Qianqiu’s epee stopped in front of him and said: "Let him finish!" 


Thanks to pity: "I know that he is a madman, you still listen to him 
nonsense!" 


The heart of a sword swayed, the sword body is distinctly slender, but it is 
a shock to get a few slashes. Who knows at this time, a curved silver front 
picks up gently and skillfully, hooks his sword, and opens it. Thanks for 
his pity, said: "Sanlang!" 


Grace saw that Xie was not willing to let him say more. He didn’t want 
Lang Qianqiu to listen more. He just wanted to go back and seized the 
opportunity: “The King of Anle is a good man of our music, he listens to 
me. If you are willing to make a good deal with you, the Golden Temple 
will end up with a thief's dog life in Yongan. You will be hit by your 
master and run away. And you will arrive at the Jinjin Hall and order the 
national ancestral home. This is the preface, absolutely That’s right...” Xie 
pity tried to block his mouth several times and was stopped by Huacheng. 
Thanks for your compliments: "Sanlang!" 


However, Huacheng did not say a word, just did not let him go. The more 
you thank you, the more you want to grab it. The faster you can, the faster 
your mouth is: "But my sage cousin, seeing the murder of the sage, I will 
definitely think: How is this done? This 1s not right. So I went to find the 
King of Anle, I want to Education and education, he found it unreasonable, 
and the plan of peace is great, not only to assassinate such thieves, 
education can not, his heart is a cross, he personally killed the only blood 


of his own royal family! - Finally, you seized your master and nailed him 
to the coffin. My cousin's magnificent national career was finally over. 
Cousin, I am right?" 


He snorted at the foot of the stone statue at the foot of the earth, saying: "I 
still don't know you! You love to do this. The ancestors are on, look at 
what kind of children and grandchildren have given birth to you. It’s not 
only that there’s nothing left in the world, but it’s still a great grandson in 
this world! Thank you! You are the star of this family, you are a god! Your 
birth is the greatest misfortune of Xianle, why are you not dead, why are 
you still alive? In the world???" 


Lang Qianqiu said: "But I saw him killing my father with a sword. How 
can this be explained?" 


Graceful said: "If it wasn't for your old man's eyes and water, I could only 
think of an explanation. That is, Anle did indeed kill you, but he didn't 
die." 


Lang Qianqiu said: "He...has he added a knife?" 


Grace screamed: "What are you talking about! I am a good cousin, but a 
good person, how can I make up the knife right away? After he goes up, he 
is definitely embarrassed to make up the knife immediately. I must 
definitely mean something, first save people. Oh, I am afraid that you have 
hurt yourself." 


Lang Qianqiu said: "What makes you harm yourself?" 


Grace said: "What is the next thing to do immediately after a person who 
was almost killed was rescued? After you saw so many people in the 
Golden Temple, what was the first thing to think about? ?" 


Lang Qianqiu has not completely figured it out, saying: "...take the 
murderer." 


Graceful said: "Isn't that right? After my good cousin saved your son, your 
old man will take a breath and will definitely say this: 'National division, 


fast, is the king of Anle, go kill me. Anle Wang! 'No, no, no, no, he must 
have said something more powerful, such as: "National teacher! Call the 
millennium! Call everyone! Let me kill the people of the country. I want 
them to be buried!!!" 


He imitated the violent and desperate tone, and it sounded so horrible that 
Lang Qianqiu’s face was white. Grace continued: "Even if you don't kill at 
the time, your aging mother still has a nest of thieves and relatives who 
can teach him to kill him in front of him. In the future, he will have to take 
other domestic Xianle people in the future. Your good master one I can't 
listen to it, I don't think about it. No, this old boy can't stay. Of course, he 
will slap a sword and give him a cool heart. He is such a person, a pair of 
saints who can't tolerate the sand, but Laogan is doing something that 
harms others and harms others; wants to please both sides, and the result is 
not falling, hehe, hahahahaha..." 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 53: 34 FA FA FA 
ME ME 3 3 3 


Thanks and pity: "Let you shut me up!" 


Lang Qianqiu suddenly turned his head and said: "Why do you want him to 
shut up? So what he said is the truth? You and Anle both moved in the 
Golden Temple, one kills all my relatives, one fills my father, you all Are 
you kidding me?!" 


Thank you for your pity: "Don't listen..." Grace robbed him: "Of course I 
am lying to you! You are so stupid, don't you lie to lie to you? If you don't 
want to hang a bar, when you are 12 years old, Xianle people Can you take 
your dog's life, but also let you live so big and soar?" 


Lang Qianqiu said: "Twelve years old?" A big event that happened when 
he was twelve years old was that he was robbed by the thief and saved by 
thanking him. Lang Qianqiu said: "The thief who broke into the palace that 
year was sent by Xianle people??" 


Graceful words: "Crap! You think that there are ordinary assassins who 
can rob their princes in the face of hundreds of royal warriors. Isn't it for 
me to help me?" 


Lang Qianqiu nodded and said: "Help? Well, I understand. So, so my 
friends are fake. You Xianle people don't care about our goodness. You are 
a good-hearted king. You are all bad at heart. Life is coming." 


He turned to thank you again and said: "So, what you said is also fake." 


Grace makes a novelty, saying: "Come and come, let me hear what my 
sage cousin said to you?" 


Lang Qianqiu simply ignored him. He only said to him: "You said that 
Yongan and Xianleben are a country. There is no festival in the royal 
family. It has nothing to do with the people. The people on both sides were 


originally a family. In our hands, we can have some Change. As long as the 
people have a good royal family name, it doesn't matter. Both sides can 
resolve the enmity, they can re-integrate, and they are all fake. They are all 
nonsense, shit, lie!" 


The last thing that thanked me for hearing is this kind of words. 
Immediately said: "No! Not fake. You think about it, isn't it really changed 
in your hands?" 


Lang Qianqiu received the words and his chest was undulating. Thanks to 
pity: "Are you not doing very well? Later, are the people of Xianle not 
well integrated with Yongan people? There are fewer and fewer disputes in 
later generations. How can it be fake?" 


Half a word, no words, Lang Qianqiu said: "But...but my father and 
mother? The combination of Yongan and Xianle was originally their 
biggest wish, so the last person of your family was the King of Anle. Their 
wish is to be completed. But what is their end?" 


Grace said: "You are crying and crying, but it 1s exactly the same as my 
sage cousin! You are looking for our old man, my mother has not yet 
found your ancestor to Laozi. What is the wish? It’s the fusion of the two 
sides, so it’s good for you. It’s good to say, and it’s fun. When you’re in 
front of you, you can’t see it. Is this what your Yongan dog means to step 
on the head of Xianle’s life?” 


Thankful and angry: "Sorry, you are less sick!" 


Lang Qianqiu, while screaming with tears, stared at the sadness and said: 
"Kill my relatives, are you behind the instructions? What about the golden 
feast, do you have a share?" 


Graceful and authentic: "Yes, I have a share, I have a good time, and your 
master also has a share. We all have three talents. Hahahahaha..." 


Who knows, he laughed half, Lang Qianqiu epee suddenly went down. 
With a sigh of relief, the whole person was smashed for two! 


This scene is very bloody, graceful two and a half body rolling on the 
ground, his upper body said: "No pain, no pain, no pain at all, compared to 
the palm of the cousin, you can be far away! Hahahaha Haha!" 


Lang Qianqiu did not speak, grabbed his head and lifted it up. Grace is still 
sarcasm, thank you for seeing that Lang Qianqiu’s expression is a bit 
wrong, saying: “You can’t say a few words if you want to die!” 


He treats people with gentleness and courtesy. However, this person can't 
be treated with common sense at all. He knows this reason well, so every 
time he goes to him, he will not want to be polite, and he will be rude. 
Lang Qianqiu dragged the upper part of Grace, and came to the big pot 
boiling in the mouth, saying: "Do you usually eat this pot with people?" 


Grace was dragged all the way, drawing a thick blood mark on the ground, 
saying: "Yes. What do you want?" 


When he had just finished answering, Lang Qianqiu would let go. 
"Ah, ah, hahahaha-" 


I don’t know if the sadness is screaming or laughing, being thrown into the 
big pot, and it’s hot and hot. Xie Pity did not expect that there would be 
such a scene, the pupil suddenly contracted, and said: "Qianqiu!" 


Lang Qianqiu sighed: "What's wrong? Green ghosts, how many people 
have eaten, can't you teach him to taste cooked? He is my genocide, can't I 
let him suffer?!" 


Of course. Therefore, thank you for nothing to say, he did not have any 
position to say. However, whether it is a prince of a mortal country or an 
Eastern martial **** in heaven, Lang Qianqiu has never done such a thing. 
He always wants to kill and kill, and disdain to use such cruel means, 
which is quite different from Lang Qianqiu, who knows what he knows. 


Grace was thrown into the boiling water by him. After a while, when he 
fished it, he was not adult. He was cooked into something that seemed to 
melt the whole body. Some places even showed the bones of the forest, 


which was very embarrassing. But he seems to be very happy, still 
laughing, said: "Cousin, congratulations! You look at your good deeds, the 
wings are hard, will torture, will torture people!" 


Lang Qianqiu was a loose hand, and the grace was once again put into the 
water. After throwing it this time, it seems that even the skeleton has been 
smashed by the soup, and the grace has never floated up. There are only a 
few pieces of Tsing Yi left floating on the water. Thanks for a long time, he 
couldn’t see him, and couldn’t help but say: "Sorry!" 


His cousin, who used to open his mouth to the cousin, has praised him and 
praised him. However, after the breaking of the country, it turned out to be 
a madman. Take the lead to burn his temple, smash his temple, and build a 
stone statue of the squatting earth and the threshold of the prince. In order 
to make him suffer, he can do anything at any cost. For his behavior, 
thankfulness has always been tolerable and tolerant. If it involves other 
people, it will try to stop it. In the end, if you can't bear it, you can only 
hope that you will not see each other. Later, the two did not meet again for 
many years, and he thought that the sadness had already passed away. Who 
knows how long it has been, suddenly encountering an old man in this 
world, seeing the face that is similar to him, can't really tell if there is any 
trace of nostalgia in the heart. After all, the Xianle royal family who still 
lives in the world, only two of them are left. It didn't take long before I 
saw the face, and suddenly I saw him dying in front of him, and Lang 
Qiangqiu, who was not willing to use it with even a stick, was killed by this 
cruel means. In a short period of time, the ups and downs were too big, I 
don’t know for a while. What do you think about it, it’s a mess. Lang 
Qianqiu stood beside the cauldron and bowed his head. At this time, 
Huacheng said: "Not dead." 


Lang Qianqiu looked up at him. Huacheng Road: "You shouldn't think that 
you will avenge this? You at most have killed him a point | body. If you 
really want to kill him completely, you have to find the ashes of grace." 


Lang Qianqiu coldly said: "Thank you for reminding me, I will definitely 
grab him and use his ashes to pay homage to my father and mother. After 
that, I will find you again to make a knot. Guoshi, you don't want to run 
again. !" 


After he finished speaking, a sword fell, cracking the cauldron, and then 
left and left. The boiling water rushed out and the broken bone residue in 
the pot rushed to the ground. Thank you for pursuing, but I understand that 
it is useless. 


He stopped the steps and stood there, with nothing to say. Huacheng 
walked up and said: "He just knew the truth and it is better to let him calm 
down." 


Thanks to pity, said: "Why do you want to let him know? What is the truth 
is important?" 


Huacheng Road: "It's very important. He has to understand which ones you 
do and which ones are not. Why do you want to do this." 


Thanks for turning and slamming, cold channel: "Do you know what it is 
so clear? If you have killed a few people, what am I going to do?" 


Huacheng is not spoken. In the chest, a burst of anger suddenly rises, and I 
don’t know who I am angry with. He blurted out: "What do I have to bite? 
His father wants to integrate the two races. Did I kill him? Anle King is 
the last blood of my family. Did I kill him? I am also alive." Is it not good 
for me to be alone? I am afraid of anything, even if I am all over, I can’t 
die! It’s just a good thing for me to do alone. I am a curse. Now it’s the 
Anle King. Rong also counted, all the Xianle people counted. Is it better to 
hate a person than to hate a group of people? Is it necessary to let him 
discover that the things I taught him in the past are all fake and empty? Do 
you mention the nonsense of ghosts?!" 


Huacheng just looked at him quietly and did not argue. The two looked at 
each other for a moment, and thanked him for suddenly covering his face. 
"I'm sorry. Saburo is sorry. I am afraid of being crazy. Sorry." 


Huacheng Road: "Nothing. My fault." 


Thanks: "No, you are not wrong. It is my problem." 


He sat down on the ground and hugged his head, saying: "A mess. A 
mess." 


Shou, Huacheng sat down beside him and said, "You are right." 


Xie pity does not speak, Huacheng Road: "Kill Yongan Wang, Bao Xianle 
survivors. Kill the Anle King, protect the two races no longer disputes. 
Finally, died in the hands of Lang Qianqiu, the murderer Fuxi. Three lives, 
for several Taiping The most cost-effective, but I do the same. Listen to 
me." 


He was undecided and said: "You are right. No one will do better than 
you." 


Silence for a long while, thank you: "I just don't think so." 


He slowly raised his face and said: "I just think that a person has paid 
goodwill, but did not get good results. I think it should not be like this. 


"Even if it is fake, I want to remember it. He is good to Xianle, and Xianle 
will be good to him. Doing the right thing is going forward. Instead of 
doing it now, I think he told him that he had believed before. All are fake, 
lie, deceptive. All **** is nonsense! I am just..." 


He raised his right hand and looked at the hand and said: "...If you have 
enough, you don't want others to be taken again." 


Huacheng listened quietly. Xie pity and consciously said another rude 
saying, "I am sorry. But you look at the things in this world, how funny. 
Yongan previous generations, the reverse of the application is not how to 
die, to Lang Qianqiu parents here, I am thinking Doing something good 
and doing something big is the end of the game." 


The Yongan lord respected him as a national teacher. He has always 
respected him for five years. Even at the last moment of life, it 1s with the 
color of trust that has not faded. Thanks for looking straight ahead, 
whispered: "I really can't forget... When I stabbed a sword, the expression 
on his face." 


Huacheng whispered: "Forget it. It 1s the fault of grace and peace." 


Xie pity shook his head and buried his head between his knees. He said: 
"... everything is fine." 


Lang Qianqiu's father was in the throne, and changed the style of the first 
generation to suppress the people of Xianle. Xianle people and Yongan 
people have been peacefully coexisting for decades. Seeing that there is a 
turning point, a precursor to integration, and the hope of staying away 
from the dispute, Anle Wang has chosen to be **** at this time. 


On the way to the sneak, he found the night of Anle Wang. He wanted to 
warn him not to start the incident again. Who knows, the only descendant 
of his family, after learning his true identity, took him happily and asked 
him to join the revenge. And the great cause of rejuvenation. His eyes 
were frenzied, his voice was soaring, he was so creepy, he vowed to wash 
the golden banquet first, and then ruined his ancestors, and smashed 
Yongan’s earth-shaking, even if he broke the two batches of people who 
had already begun to release goodwill from each other, even if they 
sacrificed all of them. The remnants of Xianle, as long as they can pull the 
Yongan royal family and the Yongan people to the same hell, they are not 
hesitating. 


However, killing is killing. Even if there are reasons for re-emphasizing, 
there is no more "forced", the fact 1s that he personally killed a Ming Jun 
who really wants to accommodate dissidents, and the last blood of his 
family to stay in the world. 


Therefore, he deserves it. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 54: Cannibal 
Nest Ghost King 


Thanks to turning his head, looking at the downcast stone statue of the 
earth, not far away, said: "It is quite right to say something. I am quite a 
failure." 


Huacheng whispered: "You can also believe in the kind of waste. If he runs 
fast, he can still get something. He hasn’t even been able to mix it for 
more than 800 years. dirty." 


Thanks for the pity of the mouth, I thought, can't run fast, isn't he the 
same? Didn't he mix for more than eight hundred years, and only mixed up 
like this? 


Originally, Lang Qianqiu was ascended to the east as a **** of war, and he 
was in the heavenly court. He was still in the same way as he used to be. 
He still went straight and went to sleep on the boring meeting. He was 
quite pleased. However, from now on, I don’t know what changes will 
happen to Lang Qiangqiu in the future. He went after the pursuit of grace, 
after chasing it, how will he come back with him? 


Xie pity stood up and walked slowly to the side of the stone statue. Going 
to the front of the stone statue, the face was exactly the same as him, but it 
was carved into a crying look, full of tears, crying five senses, ugly. 
Staring for a while, thanked the pity and sighed, put his hand on it and 
poured it with a force. 


Then he moved his hand and the two cracks creeped up on the cheek of the 
stone statue. Then the crying face shattered. The stone statue collapsed and 
turned into countless small stones. It fell to the ground and could no 
longer be put together. 


When Xie Pity turned around again, it was already the gentle and calm 
face of the past. He rubbed his eyebrows and said: "I am afraid that there 


are still a lot of living people hidden in this nest. I am looking for them 
and letting them out." 


Huacheng also stood up and said: "Let's go." 


Only after a burst of chaos, the blue-light little devils in the nests escaped, 
and if they did not escape, they hid in the dark and did not dare to come 
out. The two searched four times and grabbed a few unlucky ones, forcing 
them to lead the way and found several caves for storing "fresh 
ingredients." Roughly, the number of living people who have come to 
prepare to eat is not less than three hundred, or it is a nearby villager or a 
traveller who crosses the road. 


The two walked all the way, opened the door all the way, let go of the 
trapped person. Doing these things on hand, thanking the pity for a little 
calmer, plus now there is time, and Huacheng idle a few words, thought 
about it, or said: "Right, Saburo, there is something, I still want to ask you 


wn 


Huacheng Road: "What?" 


Thanks to pity: "How do you know that it is graceful to tell the story of the 
Golden Temple behind?" 


Even at the beginning, he didn't know what Huacheng took him and Lang 
Qianqiu to come to the Green Ghost Nest, and now he knows. The purpose 
of Huacheng is to let Lang Qianqiu hear the truth of his own confession of 
the Golden Temple. 


Thanks to pity: "I am a heart-warming thing. I don't know what it is. If he 
knows, he will go to entanglement long ago. Although I found out that the 
old royal family secretly did a lot of action, but I don't know the 
manipulator behind it. It’s sad. Why do you know? How long ago did you 
know?” 


"Not early." Huacheng took the hand and walked side by side with him. "I 
have dealt with him a few times, and I know his details. I was a Xianle 
person when I was alive. I was extremely hated by Yongan. I used to use 


it." Means, the hurricane ignited the cause of the incident. Yongan’s 
several assassinations against the royal aristocracy were all manipulated 
behind him, but they have been well hidden.” 


Xie pity shook his head and said: "It turned out that he had a criminal 
record. He was hidden. If he was not well-hidden, the person who gave 
him to heaven knew that he had intervened in these human affairs, and he 
could not spare him." 


Huacheng Road: "Blood wash the Golden Temple, it 1s in line with his 
usual style of action, so I always believe that the mastermind behind this 
scene is him, the heart of the national division is his person. However, 
Lang Qianqiu is in the heavenly court to identify the heart of the country 
It’s you, then, the heart and the grace can’t be one.” 


Thanks for the slow pace. It seems that Huacheng 1s clearly not in the 
heavens, but it is very familiar with what happened on the Temple of God. 
And, not only that, he is also very clear about the relationship between pity 
and grace. 


Huacheng said again: "But I still tend to be the main messenger of this 
incident. It must be at least his first move. The ordinary Xianle survivors 
have greatly improved their situation after Lang Qianqiu’s father was 
elected. I haven’t thought about revenge and resurrection all day long. The 
only thing that might have thought of something 1s the Xianle royal 
family. At that time, the only descendant of the Xianle royal family, there 
was only one Anle King. If you want to blame anyone for chaos, it must be 
him. It is a coincidence that this person happens to be inexplicably ill after 
a golden banquet, and he has no medical history. This 1s not an obvious 
embarrassment." 


Thanks for your nod. Huacheng Road: "So he is mostly killed, and the 
reason for being killed is related to the golden banquet. The preliminary 
speculation is that the Yongan royal family did, but if they were, then they 
did not see the benevolence of the benevolent people being implicated and 
unreasonable. Think about it, I can only infer the conclusions that have 
appeared." 


Thanks a little smile, sighed: "There are so few clues, but you can push 
eight | nine are not separated." 


Huacheng Road: "It's not difficult. You have enough knowledge of the 
people involved in advance." 


Thanks to pity: "I really understand it. However, there is a very important 
premise in your inference. I don't understand it very well." 


Huacheng Road: "Which one?" 


Thanks to the pity: "Why do you believe so, the golden feast must be the 
first hand to move?" 


Huacheng Road: "I don't believe that he must have done it. I just believe 
that it must not be done by you." 


Hearing words, thanking the pity and smiling. 
After a moment of silence, he asked: "Why?" 


Huacheng Road: "If you admit that the **** banquet is using other 
reasons, then it is possible that you did it, I believe. But the Yongan lord 1s 
politically diligent and won the hearts of the people. Lang Qianqiu said, 
you were then The reason for him is 'can't see them sitting 1n this 
position'." 

He said: "This is indeed a very standard declaration of the squatter. But if 
it is from your mouth, it is a bad self-destruction." 


I heard the word "self-contamination" and smiled silently. "Is it self- 
stained? You never thought about it. May I really think so in my heart? 
Maybe I still have a few grievances in my heart." What?" 


Huacheng Road: "What about you? You won't do that." 


Thanks for closing his mouth. For a long while, he said: "Sanlang, in fact, 
I am not what you think." 


"You--" He shook his head and closed his eyes, as if he didn't know what to 
say. Huacheng Road: "You said, no problem." 


For a while, Xie pity still said: "I feel that people in this world, do not 
want too much hope for anyone." 


Huacheng “Oh” said, “What do you mean by ‘too much hope?’ 


Thanks to pity: "Don't imagine someone too beautiful. If you don't meet 
each other for a lifetime, look at an illusory shadow from afar, but it's all 
right. But if you get to know each other, you will gradually know each 
other, and one day, you will find this person and I don’t think it’s the same, 
or even the opposite. At that time, I will be very disappointed.” 


Huacheng said: "Not necessarily. I don't care if others are disappointed. 
But for some people, someone who exists in this world is hope in itself." 


Although he did not specify who "some people" are, who "someone" is, the 
tone 1s also plain, as if it is just a refutation, but the heart of thankfulness 
is suddenly floating, floating. 


He paused and couldn't speak for a while. After a short while, suddenly 
said: "Sanlang, who are you?" 


Huacheng also stopped and looked back at him. 


Thanks to him and he looked at him seriously: "You know who the grace 
is, and know his details. You know who I am, I will paint the picture of the 
Prince. You know me very well. You know a lot. Maybe more." 


Huacheng raised his eyebrows: "Do I always know a lot?" 
Xie pity shook his head and said: "Not the same." 


He held his right hand elbow in his left hand and rubbed his right hand in 
his right hand. He said: "I always have a feeling that I am an old person. I 
should have known me since I was a long time ago, maybe it was my first 
time. When it's flying, no, maybe earlier. But... I don't really remember 
when I saw someone like you." 


People like Huacheng have seen one side, and absolutely never forget it. 
Xie pity did not break his head and lost his memory. If he saw it, there is 
no reason not to remember. 


Xie pity stares at him, slightly confused: "Who are you? Have I seen you?" 


Huacheng did not answer, just smiled. Thanks for the immediate reaction, 
this question is really extremely inappropriate. 


The real name of a ghost is generally a secret. Unless it is a patient who 
cannot be speculated by common sense, is there any reason to tell others? 


He is busy: "I'm sorry, don't care, I just ask casually. You don't have to 
answer me. It doesn't matter who you are." 


At this time, Huacheng’s eyes were slightly stunned. Thank you for your 
observation and look back. Just listening to a cave in the cave not far 
behind them, a clear woman voice said: "I said, turning a woman is not 
only stronger, but even better! You still refuse, How do you see it, this 
time it’s right!” 


It is the voice of Shi Qingxuan. Thanks to pity: "The wind master!" 


Sure enough, a white female crown ran out of the cave, and when she saw 
her pity, her eyes brightened and she said, "I found it, my Royal Highness 
is here!" 


However, immediately she saw the flower city behind her, and her face 
changed, and then she jumped back and put the windshield in front of her. 
Xie pity had not had time to talk. At this time, a man’s voice came from 
the cave and said, “Is it found? How?” 


A foot sound approached, and the figure flashed, which was actually a 
wind letter. He held a black long bow on his left, and when he saw the 
flower city, he immediately opened the silver-white bowstring and entered 
the alert posture. Huacheng laughed and did not make any comment. 
Thanks for your help: "There is something to say, first to receive 
weapons." 


The four met in the nest of the green ghost, and they were opposite each 
other. The wind letter pulled the bowstring full, and a glimmer of light in 
his right hand became a feather arrow, aiming at the flower city. He took 
the lead in speaking, Shen Sheng said: "His Royal Highness, you come 
first." 


The letter of the wind is given by Jun Wu, called the Fengshen bow, which 
is a magic weapon. Thanks to him, he was afraid that he would really put 
an arrow in the front of Huacheng. Who knows, Huacheng pulled him 
behind him, and thanked him for being pulled back. 


This pull, both of them are shocked. Shi Qingxuan immediately raised his 
hand: "Flower City! Blood rain and flowers! You, you, don't mess. Your 
bliss, is accidentally burned, if you have any dissatisfaction, discuss it, let 
us go to heaven to pay you." The emperor is still not able to afford to pay. 
Put the Prince of the Prince, everything is easy to say." 2k novel reading 
network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 55: Cannibal 
Nest Ghost King on Tianguan 2 


Thanks to pity and laughter, but also grateful, said: "The wind master, you 
are afraid of misunderstanding. In fact..." 


He wants to explain that Huacheng 1s not looking for him to ask for sin for 
the bliss, but Shi Qingxuan is secretly glaring at him, as if to tell him not 
to talk. Huacheng did not argue. He only said: "I haven’t liquidated the 
things that I have put on my eyes under my hand. What do you want to talk 
to me about?" 


Thank you for your understanding. Shi Qingxuan has already seen that 
there is no malice in Huacheng, but it is necessary to pretend to be a 
flower city in order to blame Xianjing. If this is said, it can be avoided that 
someone is passing on maliciously. Huacheng also understood his 
intentions and then matched his sentence. However, she refused to do this, 
saying: "Well, don't play it. People originally wanted to save me and go to 
Xianjing. Saburo is kind, why bother?" 


Shi Qingxuan said: "I don't play it. I have already passed the two sentences 
to the psychic array. You don't understand it. It will be passed down to 
good intentions. It will be better than the beginning. It’s malicious.” 


Huacheng raised his eyebrows: "Understand people." 


Shi Qingxuan was proud to say: "That is. Otherwise, how does the wind 
division mix in the heavens? General Nanyang, let go of the bow." 


The wind letter is still pulling the string seven points, holding his breath. 
Shi Qingxuan shot him: "Let's put it down, people are familiar, not 
malicious." 


Fengxin Shen Sheng said: "His Royal Highness, you are next to you..." 


Seeing his hostility is not reduced, the bow and arrow are not down, Shi 
Qingxuan suddenly "squeaked" and slammed into his elbow. 


At that moment, the face of the wind letter was really 10,000 times more 
horrible than the ghost, and shouted, and the right hand half-condensed 
and condensed, the spiritual power collapsed, and the smoke disappeared. 
His face was pale and a long list of screams, and at the end of the crash: "I 
fuck! What do you want!!!!" 


It turned out that Shi Qingxuan was only used to hit the hand that held his 
arrow. It was actually a chest. It seems that this collision 1s really 
frightening. And Shi Qingxuan is a dusty, and the fairy bones can't see 
what has happened to him just now. "I haven't asked what you want to do. I 
said that the blood rain is to save the Prince. You I also took the arrow to 
the person. If I want to fight, I will not accompany the wind master 


anyway." 


The wind letter suddenly retreats to the distance of 100,000 miles. It 
seems that he is completely afraid to approach her. He screams out loudly: 
"You don't want to do this again! Don't do it again! Hear no!" 


Seeing him as a snake, Shi Qingxuan, who is very confident in his own 
Yushu Linfeng, could not help but be depressed. He said: "Do not do it. 
You don't lose it? What is your attitude?" As if I felt that I had lost my 
face, I turned back to the male phase and turned around and said, "Hey, 
what about the ages?" 


Wen Yan, Feng Xin finally recovered a little wisdom, looking around. 
Thanks for the "ah", said: "Is he not in the psychic array?" 


Shi Qingxuan: "No! He lost his throat and walked the right way. After that, 
he didn't say anything. I asked him how many times the correct points 
were. He didn't respond to me. In the past, he talked quickly with him. The 
answer is that even the little **** officer of Zhongtianting asked him that 
he never put it on hold. It’s amazing.” 


Thanks a little and sighed, "Taihua Temple goes down and looks sad." 


The two of them came together and said: "What is it?" 
Thanks for your pity: "Yes. This is the nest of Grace. Oh, in short..." 


Wind channel: "Wait. Why does His Royal Highness Taihua go to chase 
after the sadness? Isn't he coming to chase you?" 


Huacheng said: "No. He chased the murderer of the **** golden banquet, 
but the prince of the Prince only wiped his **** to the murderer. When 
Lang Qianqiu learned the truth, he went to chase the real murderer, and 
nothing more." 


A glimpse of the wind, said: "The real murderer? Really?!" 


I couldn’t explain it once again. I couldn’t explain it for a while. I shook 
my head and said, “It’s not that simple. Go back and talk about it.” 


Shi Qingxuan didn't know the inside story, and said: "Sure enough, there is 
a misunderstanding. This wind teacher 1s really a god-like thing. If you go 
back, you shouldn't close it." 


The wind letter said: "Okay!" It looked like it was a big sigh of relief, and 
the bow was closed, and the vigilance that was expressed was also reduced 
a lot. Huacheng was sneer. Thanks to the wind channel: "You know, grace 
is that grace." 


Wind channel: "What is that??" He stunned. "The one we all know?" 
Thanks to pity: "Sure enough, you didn't expect him to be true?" 


Fengxin's face was black, and said: "No. I haven't dealt with the green 
ghost myself. I always thought it should be a coincidence. How can there 
be a real name on the head of the ghost, and it is not sick?" After that, he 
immediately thought that this person was really sick, and immediately 
looked at it with respect and pity. 


As long as the two had not soared, the wind letter was extremely unhappy 
with the grace. Grace is the son of the mother who thanked her mother, the 
queen of Xianle, and she was raised in the royal family since childhood. 


She was wrapped up in the whole day, and she was a guardian of pity, and 
she often saw him. This person is young, not sensible, not listening to 
advice, energetic, extreme behavior, the worst is that you are a royal 
family, no one dares to discipline, it is conceivable, how much is lawless. 
What he used to hang most often is "The cousin is perfect!" "How is my 
cousin?" If someone is disrespectful to the pity, or brings a little bit of 
trouble to the pity, no matter who it is, the grace must put the man out of 
the sack, and there 1s no thought in his head to respect the old and love the 
young. Xie Li once rescued a child who was only ten years old from under 
his hand. He was so **** that he could not see the human form. It was 
terrible. Thank you for his pity, and he felt that he was really pointing to 
himself and never taught him. However, if he only talks or swears, he will 
continue to teach and change his mind. It is a headache. The wind is 
straight, the voice is rushing, not as patient as the pity, the number of 
times against the grace, defying his orders, causing grace to be extremely 
disgusted with him, always changing the way of the embarrassment. 
Moreover, after the blessings, the grace has intensified, and sometimes the 
other party has no intention of losing. For example, in the front of the 
Prince’s Temple, he spits a spit, and he will put a red charcoal in his 
mouth. In order to prevent him from overdoing the wind, the wind letter 
often goes to the lower bounds to wipe the buttocks, but he can bother him. 
He often said to the pity: "I am sad that this person is sick, and sooner or 
later, I will make a big deal!" 


Wind channel: "It's not really strange to be him. It's not surprising." 

Shi Qingxuan Qi said: "Why, do you know the green ghost himself??" 

Xie pity nodded and said: "My cousin." 

Shi Qingxuan was shocked and hugged his arms: "Great." 

Thanks to pity: "He is quite powerful." 

Teacher Qingxuan: "I don't mean that he is powerful. It is said that you are 


powerful. Your Royal Highness, you see, the southwestern Wushen 
Wushen ts your old knowledge, the Eastern Wushen 1s your apprentice, the 


blue light night tour 1s your cousin, blood rain flower It’s your brother who 
is a brother, and this wind master is your friend. Isn’t that amazing?” 


Thanks for the slightest smile, I thought that the wind teacher can be a real 
person, and when the wind comes out, the haze will be blown away. When 
Huacheng and Fengxin heard that "Blood and Rain is the brother of your 
father," the look seems to be less recognized. Flower City is picking a 
brow, and the wind letter is frowning. Hey, he said to the pray: "If there is 
nothing else, you will quickly return to Xianjing. Only then will the 
trouble, the rest of the priests do not know what is going on, and are still 
waiting for it. The emperor should also know Now, what the **** is going 
on, you have to have an account." 


Wen Yan, Huacheng laughed. Wind channel: "What are you laughing at?" 


Huacheng Road: "I thought that your temper is really straight. It turns out 
that you also like to talk and turn around. You just want to let the Prince of 
the Prince do not mix with my demon and ghosts. Why don't you dare to 
say it? ” 


Xie pity and cough, said: "Sanlang..." 


Fengxin cold channel: "He shouldn't have been mixed with demons and 
ghosts, you know." 


For this sentence, Huacheng is not okay. And thank you for calmly 
plugging in | came in, and said to the wind letter: "I will give an account, 
but now there is something else to do here. Grace has hidden more than 
300 lives in his lair. People are ready to eat, and thanks to the help of 
Saburo, they have saved these people. There are still a few devils left, and 
they have to be dealt with slowly. I will go up after I finish processing." 


Wind channel: "It’s too long to drag. Give it to me." 


Huacheng nodded: "The efficiency of the above heavens can be dealt with 
in the next month." 


Wind channel: "It’s as if you can make a knot in a flash." 


The two were actually **** for tat. Shi Qingxuan asked Xie pity with his 
eyes: "Do they have hatred?" Xie pity shook his head. Still waiting to be 
transferred, Huacheng did not know where to take an umbrella. This 
umbrella umbrella is red as maple, and it is as bright as fire. The flower 
city has one-handed umbrella, and the umbrella face is above him and 
thank you. It reflects the cheeks on the cheeks. 


Presumably, this is the one that was supported by the **** rain of Junshan. 
However, now it has not rained, thank you for being a little bit strange, 
said: "Sanlang, what are you doing?" 


Huacheng confronted him and moved the umbrella to the side of Xie, and 
smiled and said: "Wait. It will soon be changing." 


The voice just fell, and it rained down from the sky! 


The rain is screaming, screaming, and suddenly, the whole person is 
jealous. However, he stayed at the bottom of the umbrella of Huacheng, 
and did not drench a little raindrops. However, standing on the opposite 
side of the pity and Huacheng is unguarded, pouring the rain from head to 
toe. 


More unfortunately, this rain is bloody, so, in this way, the wind letter has 
become a **** red man, and there are only a pair of big eyes on the body. 
The white eyes are white. Because Shi Qingxuan was just standing in a 
cave, he had never been ravaged, and his eyes were stunned. 


The blood rain came quickly, and the journey went fast, and the rest of the 
time returned to calm. The wind letter is easy to react, wiped his face, his 
face is still a **** blush, no improvement. Thanks: "This..." 


Huacheng received an umbrella, haha smiled: "In an instant. How?" 


Between the five words, he walked a few steps leisurely, it is a long 
distance. Xie Li’s head was originally looking for a cloth towel in his 
sleeve. Shi Qingxuan took a few white hairs from the dust and contributed 
to the silent letter. When Huacheng left, Xie Pity immediately noticed that 


there was one less person behind him, and turned and ran a few steps, 
saying: "Sanlang, are you going back to the ghost market?" 


Huacheng turned back and said: "Are you not going back to Xianjing?" 


He half jokingly said: "However, if you want to go back to the ghost 
market with me, I welcome it." 


Thanks and smiled, said: "Next time." He sincerely said, "I will definitely 
go to the ghost market next time. You will rebuild the bliss, I will give you 
a brick." 


Huacheng Road: "It doesn't have to move bricks. It's good to sit and 
watch." 


Thanks for the gentle smile, said: "Things of the autumn, thank you for 
anyway." Suddenly, he said, "I don't know how it 1s right, maybe it's not 
bad." 


Huacheng is faintly said: "Think too much." 


Thanks for a pity, a slight slap in the head. Huacheng Road: "You just do 
it." 

When he finished, he turned and waved his hand. 

Not long after, the figure of the red dress, gradually, in front of the 


mountain, in the moon, in the eyes of pity, disappeared without a trace. 2k 
novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 56: Looking 
for traces and going to Tai Cangshan 


I don't know why, suddenly, thankfulness seems to have another courage. 


After Lang Qianqiu left, his pace has been somewhat sluggish and his back 
has been bent. And this courage did not know where to come from, and did 
not know where to go, so that he could not stand upright. He stood still, 
and Shi Qingxuan came up and patted his shoulder and said: "This person 
is quite interesting. Your Royal Highness, I don't know how you made it, 
but you are lucky." 


This is the first time that thank you for hearing someone say to him, you 
are lucky. He glanced at Shi Qingxuan and smiled. He said, "Is it? 
Probably. I think." 


Behind them, Fengxin continued to silently wipe his face. As soon as they 
turned around, they saw his face covered with white hair, so hard to hold 
back. Thank you, "I'm sorry." 


This is an apology instead of Huacheng. Fengxin finally pulled the white 
hair down, saying: "Technology is not as good as people. There is nothing 
to say." 


The three men searched again in the nest to determine that there were no 
more trapped living people, and there was no fish that slipped through the 
net. This took a gust of wind and returned to Xianjing again. 


After flying over the gate, I saw that many of the lower-level gods in the 
middle heavens were stuck in the street, coming and going. As the enemy 
was on, they were inspected in every palace on both sides of the street. 
And they came to the Temple of the Gods, the temple has already been 
filled with the gods of heaven, and there is a controversy in the distance. 
The first sentence they heard was: "Huacheng actually slammed and said 
that we went to heaven to insert eyeliner in the ghost city. This is really 
ridiculous. We need to insert eyeliner under his hand?" 


Wen Yan, Xie Li and Shi Qing Xuan are gently coughing. 80% of the 
things that are placed in the ghost market are not fake. If things are not 
clear, I can’t wait to be embarrassed. If there is something wrong, 
wouldn’t I lift my rock and lick my own feet? 


Three people entered the temple, and Shi Qingxuan walked in the front. 
When everyone looked at him, he greeted him: "Is the Wind Master 
coming back?" "It’s been hard work!" The eyes were all staring at the pity. 
I still have to ask again, but then I saw behind the two people as if they 
had just climbed out of the blood pool, and they came in with a calm face. 
Everyone was frozen in an instant and they turned their eyes away. After 
all, no one wants to hear the snoring of the long sky in the quiet hall. Only 
the feelings of admiration, not only do not evade, but deliberately look 
here, carefully revealed. 


Thanks for raising his eyes, I saw that Junwu was sitting on the top, 
holding his forehead in one hand, pressing his temples, closing his eyes, 
and it seemed to be slightly tired. Thankfulness is very understandable. 


In the past, it will not be necessary to open a meeting in a month or two. 
Recently, accidents have occurred frequently. In a short period of time, the 
Shenwu Hall has been filled several times, as if everything is going on 
every day. It is thanks, he is tired. Moreover, there are many people who 
want to express their opinions. A sacred official said: "He said that he 
came and connected the Xianle Palace to another place. This is really 
terrible. Now he can easily take away the imperial concubine of his prince, 
and tomorrow he might be able to put it in other temples. The priests took 
it away. This matter cannot be tolerated and must be stopped in time!" 


If you change to an adult room, it 1s equivalent to a certain anti-thief dug a 
tunnel in the palace, come and go freely, of course, it is disturbing. It is no 
wonder that the priests of the heavenly courts in the group should be fully 
martial, and they should be investigated. The focus of the love is not here, 
faintly said: "There are so many flower city believers, sitting in a ghost 
city, a bliss in the district, burning it, what can it be for him? Not 
necessarily because of His Royal Highness It’s offended him to marry 
Xianjing." 


Shi Qingxuan immediately said: "General Xuan Zhen, you are not right. 
Everyone can hear that Huacheng has admitted it. It is said that this month 
is the turn of the generals. The gate of Xianle Palace gives People have 
tried to connect to other places, and they have no awareness. Is this 
considered a dereliction of duty?" 


Hey, he was standing on his side with his arms, and the old **** was not 
talking. He heard this and said, "I." 


Shi Qingxuan was mistakenly mistaken. He thought it was a feeling of 
affection, and the result was awkward. I did not shirk my responsibility, 
saying: "I am on duty this month. It is indeed that I have lost my job." 


The priest who had made a good deal with him immediately explained: "In 
my opinion, things are still coming one by one. Let's figure out the **** 
golden banquet first!" 


At this time, the spirit that stood in front of the temple suddenly said: 
"There is news under His Royal Highness." 


Jun Wu finally opened his eyes and said: "What did he say?" 


Lingwen waited for a moment, saying: "He said that the Yongan Guozhen 
Golden Feast has another insider, he will find his own Prince to solve the 
problem, no need to intervene. But please do not let the Prince Edward 
self-successful, this is two things." 


Mourning Emotion: "What is the inside story?" 
Lingwen said: "Nothing more, no news." 


I didn’t expect to see the big battle at the touch of a war. A hammer 
slammed down, but it floated down, and all the officials were inevitably 
disappointed. Lang Qianqiu is a bitter Lord. The bitter Lord does not seek 
the murderer to collect debts. What other people are there to look good? 
Moreover, Lang Qianqiu does not say, thank you for not seeing it, this 
thing is really no more chews. 


Next, Jun Wu gave a letter of truth and admiration, let them help to 
strengthen the alert, and arranged some other things, and waved their 
hands, so that everyone was scattered. Thanks for the pity, I faintly heard 
someone talking: "Sure enough, every time he took out something, the 
emperor said that he was going to judge, and finally he didn't have 
anything to do..." 


"I don't know Taishan. I used to be a big Buddha. I will talk carefully in 
the future." 


When the people were scattered, Xie pity walked up to the temple and 
owed: "IT will trouble you." 


Jun Wu said: "This is not a problem. If you have been biting the blood and 
washing the golden feast, it 1s you." 


Hesitating for a moment, thank you for your own account of everything. 


After listening to it, Jan Wu commented: "Xianle, you have done this 
really, you are not thankful, and people are not inside." 


Thanks for the first time, said: "I know." 


Junwu said: "But it. You have always been like this. Taihua is now shifting 
his attention and chasing the green ghost. After he catches up, he will 
definitely come to you, how to deal with it, do you think about it?" 


Thanks to pity: "I didn't think about it. But for now, I still want to order 
something else." 


Jun Wu smiled and said: "What do you think? Is there something 
interesting, let me be happy too." 


Thanks to the pity: "Is the guru going to the undercover of the ghost city, 
are you sending it?" 


Jun Wu calmly said: "Yes." 


Thanks: "Why is this?" 


Jun Wu slowly said: "Because, it is the flower city that first inserted his 
eyeliner in the heavens." 


Thank you for your pity. Junwu stood up and said: "For many years, the 
news of Huacheng was too fast. Moreover, some people should not know, 
he also knows clearly. For what can be done, what can not be done, where 
It is the bottom line, how to rub the edge and press the line, he grasps it 
too accurately. This time, he directly opened the passage to your Xianle 
Palace, which is equivalent to indirect proof. The heavenly court does have 
his internal insert. Otherwise it 1s not Maybe this is done." 


In fact, on this point, thankfulness is somewhat aware of it. After all, 
Huacheng really knows too much, so it is not unbelievable that Junwu said 
it. He said: "Do you have evidence?" 


Jun Wu slowly shook his head and said: "It is suffering from no evidence, 
but it is repeated, and I let Ming Yi mix into the ghost world. I did not 
expect that the ghost inside the heavens has not yet come out, and Ming Yi 
fell into his hand. Although it was not in his hands, he saved you back, but 
it is even more difficult to find his eyeliner." 


Thanks to the pity: 'The question is whether the heaven or the heaven is?" 


Jun Wudao: "It's hard to say. You can be a person except you. Maybe there 
is only one, maybe, more." 


It is no wonder that Junwu did not send other people to the ghost market to 
investigate the whereabouts of Mingyi. If anyone except him 1s possible, 
thank you for thinking: "Is it possible for the wind master, the young man, 
the wind to believe them, all?" 


At this time, Junwu said: "Xianle, I know that you must have a good 
impression on Huacheng now. You have your own size, making friends, 
and others should not say more. But when necessary, you should be careful 
about some flower city, don't put any end I have given it to him." 


Hearing words, thanking the pity and contemplating the thoughts. Jun 
Wudao: "Being able to become a singer, all of them have experienced the 
pain that ordinary people can't imagine. Either flying in the sky, or dying. 
The two imperial ghost kings, the black water and the flower city that 
came out of the Copper Mountain, are far more than you think. It’s 
terrible." 


Thanks for the low head, not refuting and not reconciling. Jun Wudao: "I 
don't know what his purpose and direction are, but he is clear about the 
purpose and movement of heaven. This is very unfavorable." 


Hearing him said, "This is very unfavorable." Xie pity looked up and said: 
"Sanlang he..." Seeing Junwu coming, he paused and changed his mouth. 
"Huacheng, he should not do anything too hot." After all, you think, with 
his strength, if it is to be chaotic, can it not be overwhelmed? Since it will 
not be, then as long as there is no major event, I will not do it in the 
future." 


Jun Wudao: "I hope so, but you know, I can't take risks." 


Out of the Shenwu Temple, thank you for walking slowly on the streets of 
Xianjing. 


When he passed by the Xianle Palace, he stopped and looked for a while. 


This is the palace view that Junwu gave him, gorgeous, brand new, and at 
the same time, very strange. Zhu Hong’s door was lined with nails, but he 
had already stamped two seals filled with mantras, forming a huge cross, 
which was shocking. 


Shi Qingxuan said to him before leaving the Shenwu Temple, because this 
door was cast by other places, your palace was temporarily sealed, you can 
go to my temple to rest. However, she looked at this "Xianle Palace" for a 
while and suddenly turned around. He didn't go to the Windshield's Hall, 
and he didn't want to do what he was going to do, but he went straight all 
the way, and went out to fly the door and jumped. 


Passing through the sea of clouds, the place where he fell is in the Tai 
Cang Mountain. 


On this Mount Tai Cang, there was the royal trajectory of the ancient 
country of Xianle, the Imperial View. 


The Emperor's View is an extremely large group of Taoist temples. It is 
spread throughout the temple of Taicang Mountain and is dedicated to the 
gods and gods. The Lord God is the Emperor of God, and the Golden 
Temple is at the highest peak. The Prince's Hall, which 1s located at the 
second peak, has also been a hit. 


Eight hundred years ago, the mountains of the Cangshan Mountain were 
like fires, and it was a famous scenic spot. In the middle of Fenglin Road, 
it was full of people who were moving and lingering. Later, the country 
was broken, and many believers in the past rushed to the mountains to 
burn the Prince's Temple, but they led the mountain fire and burned the 
entire Tai Cang Mountain to a large amount of scorched earth. 


The burnt land, like the land where the dead are buried, seems to be more 
fertile. Later, on this piece of scorched earth, the seeds were dropped and 
new trees were grown. A few hundred years later, it was the lush greenness 
of the mountains and the wild, but it never saw the red leaves again. It was 
totally different from the 800 years ago. 


Previously up the mountain, there was a wide and flat bluestone mountain 
road. From time to time on the mountain road, you can see the pilgrims 
who worship the mountains, or the priests who pick the water and the 
firewood. Now, this mountain road has long since disappeared. The rock 
falls in the mountains, the branches of the grass are buried, and it is buried 
deep in the ground. Thanks to the road, the mountain is relying on a pair of 
legs. When encountering the thorns, the sword is removed and the weeds 
are cut off. 


When climbing to the middle of the mountain, she was a little tired, 
leaning against a dead tree and wanting to take a break. Suddenly, a black 
and sloppy thing fell from the tree, and even the "Takaka" strange sound, 
greeted him. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 57: Looking 
for traces and then going to Tai Cangshan 2 


Thank you for your help. He first thought that it was a broken branch or a 
bird's nest in the tree. He fixed his eyes and saw that it was a long piece of 
rotten that could not be seen as it was, full of rust and rust, with iron 
chains at both ends. For another person, it is difficult to tell what this is, 
but thank you for seeing it, this 1s a swing. 


In the past, many swings were hung on the Mount Tai Clan, both for play 
and for practicing. When she was just remembering, she once came to the 
emperor to pray for blessings with her parents. I saw a group of priests 
tumbling on the swings. It was wonderful and beautiful. After the kingdom 
of the country, it was interesting to see, and thank you for applauding and 
cheering. Parents rewarded the group of priests, and since then they have 
buried the impression that "the people of the monks are powerful and fun." 
As for when I grew up, I really went into practice, but it was not because it 
was fun. 


Take a break and thank you for continuing to climb. As you go up, the 
vines are getting denser and denser. From time to time, there are animals 
flashing through the bushes, leaving only the shadow of a fluffy big tail, 
and the squirrels huddled in the trees, while the pine cones are on the side. 
Peek into this uninvited guest. 


The thorns stopped, scratching his clothes and hands and feet, but thank 
you for not paying attention. It was not until three hours later that he 
finally came to Prince Edward. 


Of course, Prince Edward was originally not called Prince Peak, because 
the Prince Temple was built here, which changed its name. Among the 
clumps of weeds, there is a ruined turtle in the east and west, and a large 
black stone base. That was the foundation of the once hall. Going through, 
the broken walls, the glazed rubble, and a gap in the ancient well. 


Looking up from the top, this ancient well has already died, just a few feet 
away from the bottom of the well below, all seeing mud. Thankful, he did 
not hesitate to lift his foot and jumped. 


He did not fall on the mud, but he passed through this illusion, fell a few 
feet, and touched the solid land. 


I couldn’t see my fingers and looked up. I didn’t see the sun above. It 
seemed to be blocked by a curtain. He groped at the bottom of the well and 
touched a few stone bricks, pressing them in a specific order. Hearing the 
sound of "rolling", he opened a very low door. Thank you for your pity. 
Follow the passage behind this small door and slowly climb inside. When 
I first entered, I heard that the small door was "rolled" behind him. After 
half a musk, I finally climbed to the end. Xie pity straightened up, snapped 
a finger and held up a fire. 


After the small flame of this group brightened up, it seemed to be 
responding. Not far away, there was also a faint glow that lit up, as if it 
was a pearl, woke up from a deep sleep and opened the alum. 


Needs, more and more pearls illuminate, and become a piece, the 
surrounding is getting brighter, you can see the score, here is an empty 
palace hall. On the top of the main hall, there are thousands of stars inlaid. 


It is hard to imagine that the imperial tomb of the ancient country of 
Xianle was hidden under the Tai Cang Mountain, which was burned by the 
fire. Those twinkling stars are the night pearls and diamonds embedded in 
the ceiling. The night pearls are bright when they meet the light, and the 
diamonds reflect the brilliance, which is like a dream. It is like shrinking a 
galaxy and hiding it in the ground. 


Each of these pearls and diamonds are worthy of a city. As long as you 
have one, you will enjoy the prosperity of your life. However, she did not 
look at it with a glance, but went straight through the hall of the 
underground palace and went to the last tomb. 


Compared with the main hall, this burial chamber can be said to be 
extremely simple, because it has not been completed yet, so there are no 


gorgeous furnishings in the tomb, only two skeletons. In the middle of the 
cockroach, there stood a man, dressed in a Chinese costume, wearing a 
golden mask on his face, and a sword was handed out, and the sword was 
bright and bright, pointing to him. 


However, this person only maintains this position and does not move 
further. Xie pity also came in and took care of himself, completely 
ignoring him. However, it is because of the gratitude that there is no face 
after the golden mask. Under the Chinese costume, there is no one. Some 
are just a wooden hay rope, which can be faked. 


For many years, only this one and a mask replaced him, accompanied by 
these two solitary. There are a small golden plate placed on each of the two 
plaques, but the things in the golden plate are somewhat out of place: 
shrinking to dryness, there is only one nuclear fruit left, moldy black to 
not see what the hard block is. After thanking him, he took the things on 
the plate and threw them into the corner of the tomb, and touched them in 
his arms. There was still half a **** on his body, but the **** was given to 
the flower city, and nothing was left. So, he said: "Father, mother, can't 
help, I forgot to bring something to see you." 


Naturally no one will answer him. Thanks for the pity, he sat in front of it 
and slowly sat down on it. 


After a long stay, he said: "After the mother, I saw grace." 


"There is no death, he is a ghost. I really don't know how he came over for 
hundreds of years." 


Xie pity shook his head and said: "He... killed a lot of people. Now 
someone is going to kill him. He probably can't spare him from heaven. 
Hey, I really don't know what to do with this person." 


He still has to say, suddenly, from a very close place, there was a faint cry. 


Thanks for the pity, the look is changing rapidly. 


Listening and listening carefully is not an illusion. Really crying. This cry 
is very low, very small, if you don't hold your breath, you can't hear it. 
Moreover, this voice is very thin, not a child, but a woman. 


The cry was really too close to him, as if it was just a thin wall, it was just 
like him. Thanks for turning his head and finally confirming it - this voice 
is leaking from the cockroach he leans on! 


In the horror of the panic, the first sentence of thanking the pity came out 
of joy: "Mother, is that you?!" 


However, he was awake and his expectations were impossible. His mother 
died a long time ago, eight hundred years ago, and broke away from the 
bitter sea, never turning into a soul. And the emotion in this cry is not sad, 
but scared. 


At this moment, who is hiding in his mother's coffin crying? ! 


You can't wait for a moment, and the left hand will slam the cover and the 
right hand will squat. Who knows, after he saw the things in the coffin, the 
sword was stopped. 


Lying in the shackles, there 1s no second person, only a person with a black 
body and a face covered with a face towel. 


This human figure should have been his mother, but the person lying down 
now is absolutely impossible. Because this figure is too short, the height 
of the figure is completely wrong. The most important thing is that this 
person is still shaking, it is a big living person! 


Thank you for opening your face towel. Sure enough, under the face towel, 
is a child's face! 


For a moment, his heart was cold, and the child was grabbed and stunned 
and added: "What about my mother? My mother! Where did you get the 
body behind my mother?!" 


This black-clothed Chinese costume can't be seen in any peculiarities. 
However, it is woven with a very rare worm. The silk is tribute from a 
small foreign country, and the garments must be processed through several 
processes, and then combined with herbal sacs, sealed into the sputum, can 
protect the body for thousands of years of rot, the legacy is like a living. 
However, at this moment, wearing this different silk sweater is the child, 
where is his mother's body? What did it look like? 


Xie pity did not dare to think about it. He could only grasp the 
inexplicable child and asked him: "What about my mother? Who are you? 
Why are you here? Where did you get my mother?" 


However, how can a scared crying child answer these questions? I can’t 
say anything scared. Xie pity dragged him out of the embarrassment, and 
suddenly found that from this different silk clothes, he shook some gray 
powder. 


He looked pale in the face and found that the bottom of the skull was also 
covered with a layer of powder. When I was awkward, I turned to the sky 
for a while. I felt that my heartbeat would stop, and my hand was loose. I 
let the child go and the six gods slammed into the side. 


He didn't dare to touch the powder with his hands, and he didn't dare to let 
them be so scattered, just like burning incense. Although he was not 
willing to admit it at all, he knew in his heart what these were. 


A body that has been sealed for eight hundred years, was forcibly stripped 
from the silkworm, and what will it become? 


For a moment, thank you for your confusion, and you couldn’t think of 
anything else in your head, holding your head and squeaking in your ears. 
Who knows this, suddenly the back of the cold. He instinctively perceived 
the danger, jerked back, shot like lightning, a grip, holding a sword front 
with bare hands. I saw a person stabbing behind him. And this sword 
stabbed him, turned out to be the wooden fence that has been standing still 
since he came in! 


It turned out that some people had lurked in before him, put on this 
Chinese costume, put on a mask, disguised as an inanimate wooden frame, 


and waited for him." ", Xie pian hand folded the sword front into two 
paragraphs, full of blood but no change in color, smashed a foot, squatting 
in the man's abdomen, stepping him firmly on the ground. The man’s chest 
was firmly slammed by the pity, and the backhand hugged his boots to 
struggle, but it was impossible to move, as if nailed to the ground. Thanks 
for bending, a palm mask flying on his face, revealing the face of a young 
man. Thanks and pity: "Who are you?! Tomb thief?! How did you come 
in?!" 


At this time, the child shouted at the side: "Hey!" 


He shouted, thank you finally remembered. This big and small, both of 
them are familiar, is it just the pair of fathers and sons who were almost 
cooked in the nest of the green ghosts? ! 


Thanks for the moment, it’s clear what happened. Immediately, the 
Thunder punched the young man’s jaw and angered: “Look, come out! I 
want to kill you!!!” 


The man vomited blood and smiled: "Prince cousin, so happy, meet again! 
Hahahahahaha!" 


Although this is another face, can this maddening smile, not a sad person 
or who? He turned into a virtual body and attached to this young father! 


Needless to say, it must have been thrown into the pot by Lang Qianqiu to 
cook the body, in order to avoid its pursuit, to escape into the crowd, and 
attached to the young man's body, came to the Emperor Xianle 
Mausoleum. Otherwise, how can an ordinary person know the secret 
mausoleum of the Xianle royal family? How could it come over in such a 
short time? 


He took the child, perhaps for food preparation, perhaps to hide the child 
in the shackles like a genius, to transfer the gratitude, so that the sneak 
attack behind the machine. Xie pity gave him a punch, and he refused to 


grieve, and cried his face: "What is your cousin doing so angry? I will tell 
you that you will not die, hehe!" 


Thanks for the " "is another two punches, red eyes, said: "How is my 
mother to you?! You are like this to her?! So the bones of her?!" 


Grace said: "My aunt has already died. People are gone. Is the body a 
different kind of powder? But it is a corpse that has changed its 
appearance. Isn't it still? You are so crying, it was under the comfort of the 
first time. I got a pickpocket. Good cousin actually has two faces, hehe!" 
After he finished, his face suddenly changed. He said, "Why am I doing 
this to her? Isn’t it blaming you? You don’t know how to reflect? It’s your 
fault! You are a god, and you have a face to the Emperor’s Mausoleum to 
cry!” 


Xie pity, slamming his feet, screaming, and screaming in the mouth, but as 
if he was more excited, his hands clasped his blood-stained white boots, 
screaming: "Yes, yes! That's it, this is You! Fight, fight, kill, smash! Fight! 
Kill a sage who has the grief of suffering and suffering, and sees people 
dying, vomiting!" 


The child climbed over and cried: "Wow! Hey, what are you doing!" He 
couldn't understand what was going on, only knowing that his father was 
being beaten. In his view, the pity at this time is simply a fierce devil, but 
he is afraid that the only father will die, and he will not retreat, trying to 
remove the boots of the devil stepping on his father's chest. The young 
man vomited blood, the child was scared to death, and his hand was used 
to lick his father's mouth, as if he thought it would stop bleeding. Seeing 
it, Xie pity calmed down a little, thinking that this physical owner is 
innocent, and received a little strength, the heart is pointing, the tip of the 
sword against the cheek of the grace, Sen Ran said: "Sad, you, give me a 
roll Come out! Don't come out, don't believe me, take your tongue and pull 
your soul out!" 


In theory, pulling a person's tongue out of the roots can indeed pull out the 
ghost attached to him. Graceful said: "I don't roll. I just don't roll, how? 
You oh, come here, kill me? I am very angry now, you killed this person 


with me, I will probably die with it. Don't miss this good opportunity, or 
you won't want to find my ashes forever!" 


He even took the initiative to squirt his tongue and vomited as if he could 
not thank him for putting the threat into practice, and dragging his soul out 
of the flesh in this **** way. He screamed: "The person I am possessing 1s 
just a mess. You don't know anyone, no one will care, and the holy glory of 
your Prince will not be damaged." Look! I have crushed your mother into 
gray, don't you kill me? Hahahahahaha..." 


The child couldn’t move his cheeky boots, hugged his legs and cried, 
saying, “Don’t kill me! Don’t kill me!” Xie pity breathed more and more 
anxious, dizzy, shivering, can’t wait The palm of the hand smashed the 
scent of the heavenly spirit, but it could not be handed. Graceful 
handkerchief: "Hahahaha, the cousin, failed, what failure!" 


Xie pity lifted him up, raised his fist, slammed his fist on his face, and 
slammed his fist: "Shut up! Shut up! Shut up!" 


However, the more he is angry, the more happy he is, even if the price is 
that he has to be beaten, he can pull the other side to hell, and the grace is 
also infinitely bright, his eyes are shining, saying: "Look! Show your true 
face!" Celebrity cousin, is there someone in the world who knows you 
better than me? No. You can now step on your feet even though a funeral 
dog, but I am too clear, but in your heart, you are still so proud, you can 
never tolerate others. Say you fail! I said that you failed, you must hate me 
in your heart? Is it that your heart is bleeding? Come on! Or you have to 
tell me loudly that this person is innocent, so you will not want to Kill me 
and hurt him? Come! Let me see how you do it!" 


In this seemingly provocative, smug-stricken laughter, thankfulness can 
no longer be tolerated. 


" "the heart is out of the sheath. 


Sensen black blade, a wave down! 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 58: A glimpse 
of Shenwu Street 


This sword stabbed, passing the demon through the heart and killing it on 
the ground. 


"The devil is demon, the heavenly blessing!" 


On both sides of Shenwu Street, the waves of the waves are louder than a 
wave. In front of Zhu Hong’s palace gate, in the round field, the two 
Taoists who played the gods and demons gave a circle of ceremonies 
around them and squatted back to the sides. After watching the fighting in 
the warm-up field, the atmosphere of the people was soaring. Not only 
were the streets crowded with water, but even the roof was full of bold 
people, clapping, shouting, cheering, dancing, and carnival. 


This kind of grand occasion, it is really empty. In the history of Xianleguo, 
if you want to talk about which Shangyuan Festival tour is said to be 
unprecedented, then it must be today! 


Above the high platform, a row of banquets and robes of the princes and 
nobles, all with a decent smile, overlooking the bottom. Within the palace, 
a long queue of hundreds of people is waiting here. The bell rang loudly, 
and the national teacher smashed the long beard that did not exist. He said: 
"Open the warrior!" 


"in! " 

"Jade girl!" 
"in! " 
"Music!" 


"in!" 


"cavalry!" 
"in! " 


"demon!" 


"We 


1N. 


"Yue Shenwu!" 


No one answered. The brow of the national teacher frowned and found that 
things were not right. Turned his head and said: "Yue Shenwu Warrior? 
Your Royal Highness?" 


Still no one answered. The "demon" that only answered the words paused 
and took off the mask of the green face and fangs, revealing a white face. 


The boy is about sixteen or seven years old. His skin color and lip color 
are very light and clean. His eyes are like a pair of obsidian. It is bright 
and flickering. The hair is soft and the tiny hair is scattered on the 
forehead and cheek side. It looks quiet and well-behaved, in stark contrast 
to the sly mask of the demon in his hand. 


He whispered: "His Royal Highness left." 
The national teacher almost did not faint. 


It’s good to remember that big things can’t be dizzy at the moment, and 
they’re stunned. The liver and gallbladder cracked into the ground: “This?! 
How did this leave?! When did he leave? His righteous guards will go out 
of the palace door, and Huatai will pull out. I only saw that the demon did 
not see the gods, and I couldn’t swim out of the old bones with one bite! 
Why didn’t you stop you?!” 


Mu Qing began to say: "I want to tell you before the Prince's Highness, 
saying that you don't have to worry, all the procedures can be as usual, he 
will come soon." 


The national teacher was in a hurry and said: "How can you not worry? 
What is coming soon? When is it? What if I don't catch up?" 


Outside the palace gate, the people who waited for a few hours from the 
early morning to the present have long been unable to hold back and 
shouted. A Taoist rushed in and said: "National Master, the Queen's poor 
man came to ask you, why 1s the honor guard still not starting? Ji Shi is 
almost coming, and then not leaving, it will pass." 


After listening to it, the National Teacher only wished that the rebels had 
suddenly entered the city at this moment and had ruined the Shangyuan 
Festival. 


Actually, at the crucial moment of this fate! 


If this scorpion changed his personal, he would have been furious, and it is 
not surprising that the sword is murderous. This person is his most proud 
baby apprentice, or the most noble baby son of others. You can’t beat it, 
you can’t, you can’t kill it. Instead of killing him, it is better to commit 
suicide! 


At this time, one person passed through the dark palace gate and rushed 
into the palace. Lang said: "National Master, why didn't you go out? The 
time is coming soon, everyone is waiting outside!" 


The person is also a 16-year-old boy. His posture is very tall, his head is 
extremely high, his skin is gray, and he has a black long bow and a white 
feather arch behind his back. His lips are tight, his brows are tight, his age 
is shallow, his eyes are firm. When the national teacher saw the boy, he 
grabbed him and said: "Faithful! Your Royal Highness Prince!" 


As soon as he was convinced, he seemed to understand what was in his 
eyes, and his eyes were filled with anger and anger at the side. And the 
love has been re-appeared with a demon mask, not seeing his god. Fengxin 
Shen Sheng said: "Now you have no time to explain it to you! Let's go 
now, your Royal Highness will not let you down!" 


no solution anymore. When Huatai pulls out, there is no pleasing god. The 
warrior is dead. If he does not go out, he will die. The national teacher 
waved his hand in despair, saying: "Playing music, starting!" 


With the order of the orchestra, the long line of the long queue, a hundred 
royal warriors sang in high voice, took the pace, led the mighty guard of 
honor, and set off. 


The warrior is in front, symbolizing the thorns in the world. Followed by 
them, they are all the virgin girls who choose one of them. They are quiet 
and beautiful, and they carry the baskets with their hands, the flowers of 
the goddess are scattered, the mud is turned into mud, and the dust is 
scented. The musicians sit on the gold car built by gold. Upon exiting the 
palace gate, they were amazed and everyone rushed to grab the flowers. 
However, these verticals are gorgeous, re-spreading, and grand, and they 
are just the foundation of the main event. Huatai, the last Huatai, is 
coming out. 


Thirteen horses and white horses moved through the deep palace gates, 
slowly appearing in front of tens of thousands of people. On the stage, a 


black demon, wearing a skull mask, will be a nine-foot —_| Ma | knife 
across the front, deepened the posture. 


The heart of the national teacher was tense and looked forward to a 
miracle. However, the miracle did not appear. The crowd is in vain. On the 
high-rise, the aristocrats of the princes frowned slightly and looked at each 
other. They said: "What happened? Why are the sacred warriors not on the 
stage?" 


"Isn't your Royal Highness not present?" 
"What about pity brother?" 


In the middle of the high-rise building, there is a handsome man with a 
handsome face, and a noble woman with a soft complexion and a gentle 
eyebrow. This is the king and queen of Xianle. Did not see the person who 
should appear, the emperor looked at the head of the country with a 
worried look. The lord took her hand and calmed her eyes, indicating that 


she would change her mind without worrying. But the crowds on both 
sides of the street were no one to appease, and they were even more fierce. 
The shouts seemed to overturn the roof. The national teacher only hated to 
have the courage to commit suicide on the spot. However, the admiration 
above Huatai is very calm, the opponent is not, still meticulous, self- 
contained to complete his task, the "squeaky" of the long knife, slammed 
on the ground, standing in front of him. 


In a chill, this black boy completed the opening as a "demon". 


Look at the face, look at the figure, and the feelings are as thin as a literary 
student, but such a huge nine-foot knife, in his hand, is light and 
incomparable, as if there is no weight. Dozens of Taoists who played the 
sorcerer jumped on the stage one by one, and another one was knocked 
down by him and ousted. In all fairness, the knife is heavy, and he plays 
very well and looks good, so some people cheer for him. However, more 
people are not coming to see the scene of "the devil and the evil man", and 
they have screamed: "What about the gods of war?!" 


"Where is Your Royal Highness?" 


"What we want to see is the Emperor Wu of the Temple! The demon is 
back!" 


On the high floor, a voice angered: "My cousin? What kind of ghost is 
this?! Who wants to see these things? Fuck, my cousin?!" 


You don't have to look at it. This is the loudest voice. It must be the 
Xiaojing Wang. Sure enough, many people looked up and saw a young 
Chinese dressed in a light blue brocade and a collar with a neckband 
rushing to the edge of the high platform. The anger slammed the fist down. 
This boy had only fifteen or six years old, and his face was very eye- 
catching, but his face was full of suffocation, as if he had to jump over the 
railing and jump down to beat people. But this building is too high, and if 
you jump down, you have to break your leg. So, he grabbed a white jade 
tea and dropped it. 


The tea squirt quickly flew toward the back of the demon. Seeing that it 
was fainting on the spot and blood flowing, who knows, the demon is 
slightly wrong, and the long knife is slanted, and the tea stalk is picked at 
the tip of the knife. 


The trembling teacup stood firmly on the tip of the knife, causing a wave 
of applause. Mu Qing will once again have a long knife, the tea pot flies 
down, and is caught by a Taoist priest. He continues to play his own 
demon, dance knife and swearing. Grace 1s furious, and I am still waiting 
for it. The Queen is asking people to come up and pull, so it is easy to pull 
him down. However, the look of the royal family is getting more and more 
dignified, and some can't sit still. 


The Yue Shenwu people suddenly disappeared before the Shangyuan 
Festival, which is not a fun thing! 


At this time, a burst of violent slogans broke out in the crowd, which was 
much louder than any previous cheers. I saw a snow-white figure falling 
from the sky and falling in front of the black demon! 


The man landed, and the heavy white dress was paved into a huge flower 
shape on the Chinese platform, and a golden mask covered the face. He 
held the sword in one hand, and the other hand slid gently on the Sen 
Jianfeng. "Oh," he said, it was nice. And this action is very calm, as if you 
don't put the black demon in front of you. The demon slowly pointed the 
blade at him, and the white warrior slowly stood up. 


Grace looked bright, his face turned red, jumped up, loudly: "Prince 
cousin! Prince cousin is coming!!!" 


Upstairs and downstairs, everyone is stunned. 
This debut is really like a heavenly person, bold and extremely! 


The city building said that there are more than a dozen feet high. The 
Prince’s Highness is the body of a thousand gold, but he jumped directly 
from the tower. In an instant, countless people thought that it was true that 
the gods had fallen, and now they reacted, and it was inevitable that the 


blood was boiling, the scalp was fried, and they tried to clap their hands. 
Grace is shouting at the side, taking the lead to applaud, shouting out loud 
and screaming, and his hands are red. The head of the country and the 
empress smiled at each other and took a picture. The rest of the royals 
were also brows, and they sighed and sighed. On both sides of Shenwu 
Street, there are even more crowds, hundreds of thousands of people, 
excited to hate to break through the barriers of the warriors rushed to the 
crowd to shout. 


On the top of Huatai, two black and white figures confront each other, and 
the gods and demons each waved their weapons and finally got on the 
battle. 


Seeing that I finally caught up, the National Teacher’s hanging heart was 
put down, and this was on the high platform. After a circle with the 
colleagues around me, I found a seat to sit down and watch. The lord 
smiled and said: "National teacher, how did you think of such a shocking 
debut? It was wonderful." 


The national teacher wiped the sweat and smiled: "It is indeed wonderful. 
It is just a fear, this is not the thought of the younger brother, it should be 
the idea of His Royal Highness." 


The Queen took a slap in the face and said: "This child is really chaotic. 
He even screamed and jumped from such a high place, scared me to 
almost stand up." 


Guoshi can not help but faintly bring a little pride, said: "This Queen 
Empress can rest assured, Prince Edward, martial arts superior, not to 
mention the area is more than a dozen feet high, is a few times higher than 
the tower, he can also lightly close his eyes Easy to loose, easy and easy." 


The empress of the emperor is bright, and he sighs: "The national teacher 
has a good teaching." 


Guoshi Haha said: "Where is it. Prince Edward's prince of heaven, talents, 
talents, talents, heaven, and other princes can teach the temple, it is a good 


fortune. The minister has a hunch, and there is a prince," Today will surely 
make the most wonderful Yue Shen Festival in the history." 


He said four "days" in succession, and he slid to the extreme. The head of 
the country smiled and turned to look at it. "I hope so." 


In the Yuan Festival, the Yueshen Warrior and the Demon Warrior are the 
two most important characters. Both must be savvy teenagers. In 
particular, the sacred warrior, the crown shape is strict, gorgeous and 
extraordinary, after the equipment is completed, the head-to-foot line often 
weighs forty or fifty pounds. Under such a heavy burden, the warriors 
must spend a few laps around the city and complete at least two hours of 
performances. There must be no bad pools during this period. Is it 
necessary to have martial arts superiority? 


Fortunately, these two teenagers are extremely good. Knife and sword, you 
come to me, fighting is good-looking, and very measured, I am afraid that 
it has been practiced countless times. The country owner said: "Who is 
playing the demon and the prince?" 


Guoshi coughed aloud and said: "Your Majesty, that is a small road of 
Emperor Pole, named Muging." 


The Queen softly said: "I am playing this kid is also good, only a little 
weaker than the emperor, probably about the wind?" 


Listen, the national teacher looks disapproving. Grace has been squatting 
on the knees of the Queen to eat grapes, busy spit a grape skin, said: "Hey! 
No, no! The weak is not a little bit, far worse, but no one can compare with 
the prince of!" 


Hearing the words, the Queen smiled and touched a few of his heads. A 
group of nobles laughed and leaned forward, and laughed and said: "Junger 
is really entangled in his cousin, and he doesn't exaggerate in a day." 


In the crowd below, shouting through the clouds: "Hit! Hit him! Kill him!" 


"Kill the demon!" 


This tide is getting more and more turbulent. Grace is also in it, hands 
clasped to the mouth, than a trumpet-like, haha smiled: "Prince cousin, on! 
You can beat him with one hand, give this kid a color look !" 


Suddenly, the demon on the stage was slashed, and the warrior’s sword was 
against the grid, but it was “hmm?”. 


It is reasonable to say that in the festival tour, the fight is only for the gods 
and performances, and the maximum score is seven points. However, after 
he took the knife, the sword in his hand almost flew out. Obviously, it took 
only one knife and the other party used 10% of the force. 


Thanks for the slightest rise in the first, Lang said: "Muscle?" 


The boy who played the demon opposite did not speak, but it was a knife. 


Thanks for the pity and innocence, " "and" " took a few knives 
and said: "This is more fun than it is." As a result, the spirit has also come 
to the fore. 


As aresult, the voices rushed to the sea, and the weapons sparked. The 
more intense the playing on the stage, the more thunderous the audience 
is. Suddenly a scream of screaming, white light dazzling, everyone "ah!" a 
voice, breathless. It turned out that the demon's nine-foot long knife was 
actually picked up by the thin sword of the Yue Shenwu, and it was thrown 
out and nailed straight into the stone pillar on the side of the high 
platform. If there is a good person to pull the knife, it 1s actually trying to 
make the power of the nine cows and the tigers still moving. It is 
impossible to say: "What knife is this, how strong is this!" 


On the top of Huatai, the Yueshen warrior shakes the long sword and is 


gently flicked on the sword front. The sound of" " was clear, and a 
chuckle came from the golden mask. 


Thanks for being calm and pleasant: "Played well. However, you still 
lost." 


The demon lost his weapon, half squatting on the ground, silently 
speaking, but clenched his fist. Xie pity took a sword flower, in the cheers 


in all directions, is about to stab this last sword, "killing" the demon, who 
knows, but at this time, screaming above! 


Thanks for the pity, he received the sword and looked up. He only had time 
to see a vague figure falling from the wall. 


In an instant, he had no time to think about it. The electric light stone fire, 
the sole of the foot, jumped up and fluttered up. 


He flew up and his sleeves were like wings, squatting, and light as white 
feathers. The hands were solid and hugged, and the feet were solidly 
stepped on the ground. Thanks for a sigh of relief, then I looked down. 


In the arms, a young child with a bandage and a dirty body was curling up 
in his arms and staring at him. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 59: Shenwu 
Street, a glimpse of 2 


The child is only about seven or eight years old, and it is really thin and 
small. Falling down from such a high place, the little body shivered in his 
arms like a newborn baby. However, in the gap between the bandages, a 
huge black eye was revealed, and a white shadow was reflected in the eyes, 
staring at him without hesitation, as if nothing else could be seen. 


I only listened to the sound of air-conditioning in a round and a round, and 
thanked me for raising her head slightly, but a heart sank. Because, the 
corner of his eye suddenly swept to the ground, not far from the ground, 
there is a golden thing. 


The golden mask covering his face fell. 


Thanks for falling in the center of Shenwu Street, the guard of honor is a 
few feet behind him, not yet swimming | here. The shocking | sudden 
change, the steady pace of the warriors was disrupted by this sudden 
accident, the jade women who were scattered flowers also showed the 
color of fear, the golden car was stagnant, several tall white horses 


screamed, There are a few discordant bombs. Some people left, 
some stayed, and they failed to unify quickly. The scene seemed to be 
uncontrollable. The crowds on both sides of the street have not yet reacted. 
The Xianle Lord on the high-rise building stood up and looked at his son's 
figure. He looked worried and dignified. 


When he stood, where did the rest of the princes and nobles dare to sit? 
They have stood up in vain. Guo's **** just took the stool to sit hot, and it 
was cold again. I was thinking about whether I should immediately blame 
myself on the five bodies, but I had already jumped on the railing and 
picked up my sleeves. What happened? How was the team messed up? 
What are the wastes doing? Can you not even eat a white horse?!" 


The back of the emperor was pale and his eyebrows were scorned. He 
quickly pulled people down. Seeing that the crowd began to faintly 


commotion, a big mess would have to break out. At this time, thank you 
for getting up. 


On weekdays, the honorable Prince Edward is buried deep in the palace, or 
hidden in the royal dojo, there is almost no chance to show up before the 
people. This is the first time in the world. Therefore, everyone is attracted 
to him by involuntarily and looks at the past. This hope, but also 
involuntarily slight breath. I saw that the young man’s long-browed eyes 
and eyes were beautiful, and he was full of glory, dazzling and dazzling, 
making people afraid to look at it. He held the child in one hand, and the 
other hand held the sword slowly, pointing to the top of Huatai. 


The demon was originally on the stage overlooking the situation below, 
seeing this move, for a moment, suddenly a little bottom. 


The crowd exclaimed, the figure of the demon was like a black cloud, 
passing through the air, flying to the pole where the knife was pulled out 
and nailed, holding the handle, pulling it out with a crack, and then 
jumping over. It fell to the center of the street, before the warriors. 


Seeing him instantly understands what he meant, and came over with it, 
thanking him with a low voice: "Good love!" 


This time, the Yue Shenwu and the demon have all gone down. A black 
and white, a knife and a sword, finally met again, everyone rushed up, and 
once again boiled up. On the high floor, the nobles' faces were soothing 
and soothing, and finally they looked better. 


The demon is going to take care of the young children in the arms of the 
warrior, holding the knife in both hands, and crossing the knife with a long 
knife. The two men dismantled a few times and slammed them back to the 
Chinese platform. Fengxin’s attention shifted, and he rolled over from the 
street, grabbed the mask, and rushed into the ceremonial squad and 
whispered: “Don’t mess! Don’t mess! Just don’t happen, go on! Finish this 
circle and go back to the palace!" 


In the ceremonial array, several people quickly converge and regain their 
position and regain their vigour. On the other hand, on the stage, the 


empathy was more fierce, and thanked the " " for picking up a number 
of knives. At this time, he listened to the child in the arms, "ah", and 
thought it was wrapped in the sword. , scared badly. Xie pity left his hand 
and hugged him, Shen Sheng: "Don't be afraid!" 


Hearing the words, the young child grabbed the clothes on his chest. Xie 
pity holds a child in one hand, and the other hand makes the sword more 
comfortable. After a split, he felt that the child in his arms trembled and 
raised his hand. He hugged his shoulder, as if holding a straw, and said: 
"Nothing, there will be nothing to hurt you." ” 


After that, he sighed low: "Muscle!" 


The demon on the opposite side couldn't check the head a little, and 
thanked the pity for a sword. 


So, before the public eye-catching, the Yue Shenwu finally put the demon 
sword in the heart and killed it on the spot! 


Mourning with a demon mask, licking the "wound", squatting back a few 
steps, struggling for a moment, finally "snap" fell to the ground, 
motionless. 


Grace laughed upstairs and patted the palm: "Dead! Dead! Prince's cousin 
kills demons and ghosts!" 


At the same time, the mighty team of the sacred safari continued to march 
and sailed to the palace. It has already closed its tail and is ready to enter 
the palace gate. Because the remedy was timely and the plot was 
stimulating, only such an unexpected episode had emerged. Instead of 
complaining, the people were more enthusiastic. Numerous people shouted 
"His Royal Highness" and shouted "God". After following in Huata1, 
thousands of people rushed toward the palace. Several soldiers had to send 
more than a few warriors and soldiers to intercept these overly aggressive 
people. However, after all, it was unable to stop, and the crowd broke 
through the line of defense and swarmed. 


The king of Xianle said on the high building: "Guards! Samurai!" 


Just at this time, hundreds of people from the entire guard of honor have 
entered the Gongmen Road. Zhu Hong’s door was rolled and closed behind 
Huatai, and the banner of the exhibition was no longer swaying. The 
people rushed to the door and slammed the door and cheers loudly. 


Within the closed palace gate, above the Huatai, there were two sounds of 
"Dangdang", the white enchanted warrior and the black-faced demon, both 
throwing their weapons and falling to the ground. 


Thanks for being sweaty, tearing apart the layers of gorgeous costumes, 
and exhaling a long breath, said: "Good risk, good risk. I am exhausted." 


Mu Qing also took off the heavy demon mask, exhaled breathlessly, but 
did not cry. 


He turned his head and saw Xie Pity holding the young child in his hand 
and frowning. The wind letter chased Huatai below and ran on the side: 
"His Royal Highness, what did you bring this child into?" 


The young boy was kneeling in the chest, stiff and small, and he did not 
move. Xie pity sat up and said: "If you don't bring in, are you left outside? 
The street is so chaotic, so small, let go of it for a while." 


After that, he picked up the young boy and touched two small heads on the 
small head. He said casually: "Children, how old are you?" 


The child’s eyes were stunned and his mouth was silent. Xie pity continued 
to ask him, shouted: "How did you fall down?" 


Admiration: "His Royal Highness, this child is afraid to talk, scared." 


Thankful and touched the young boy’s head, I felt that the child’s stay was 
not interesting. I didn’t touch it. I commented: “Stupid. Fengxin, you will 
find someone to take him out from the side door later. Is he hurt, and his 
face is bandaged?" 


Feng Xin reached out and said, "Okay. Hand him over." 


Thanks for the pity, he took the child up and handed it over. Who knows, 
but did not hand it, the wind channel: "His Royal Highness, why don't you 
let go?" 


Xie pity said: "I let go?" Then look down and look at it, but 1t was the 
child's hands. He grabbed his clothes tightly and didn't let go. 


A few people stunned and immediately laughed. Xie pity in the emperor's 
view of practice, how many good men and women believe, or to see a 
strange, or because of the belief in the heart, to see the Prince's Highness, 
racking his brains, trying his best, seeing him, I want to see the second 
side, I want to talk to him. It is good to be a Taoist together. I did not 
expect this child to be young and quite popular. There are a lot of priests 
who are guarding the Fa in the Huatai side, and they laughed: "His Royal 
Highness, this child does not want to leave!" 


Thank you, haha, laughing: "Is it? It can't be done, I still have to do my 
own thing, the children go home." 


It was said that the child finally loosened his hand and stopped grabbing 
his clothes. The wind letter immediately caught him. The young boy was 
put in the hands of the wind, and a **** hair was still straightforward. 
This kind of temperament is like a ghost possessed. Upon seeing it, many 
people have made a fuss in their hearts. Xie pity did not look at the child 
at all, only on the wind channel: "You don't want to mention him with 
tears, scaring people." 


The wind letter put the young boy on the ground and said: "Don't laugh. 
The national teacher is going crazy, and you still want to be good at your 
highness. How can you explain it later?" 


I heard that everyone did not smile. 
After half an hour. Emperor pole view, Shenwufeng, Shenwu Temple. 


The clouds are lingering, and the sounds of the chanting are bursting. The 
National Teacher and the three deputy national divisions sat on the side of 
the main hall, and they were filled with clouds and faces in front of them. 


Thank you for your pity. However, there is no one in his direction, just the 
golden statue of Emperor Wu. The wind is from the Lord, behind him. 


The national teacher picked up the carefully carved golden mask, and 
sighed with a sigh of relief: "His Royal Highness, Prince Edward." 


Even if it is squatting, thank you for being straight and arrogant, "He is." 


The national teacher was very upset and said: "You can know that in the 
history of Xianle, there have been so many days of the Yuan Festival 
sacrifices, and there has never been a trip. The pole stand has only been 
three rounds around the city. Three circles!" 


Every ritual and every place of the Shangyuan Festival tour has its 
meaning behind it. A circle around Huatai symbolizes the country's peace 
and security for the country for a year. Therefore, how many laps in the 
last Shangyuan Festival tour, there is no need to hold such a huge event for 
many years. Not only is the sign good, but it also saves money. Three laps, 
don't you say that you can only keep it for three years? ? ? 


Moreover, it is terrible that the golden mask on the face of the Yue Shen 
Warrior fell on the way to the ceremonies. 


Since the ancient times, Xianle people have believed that the aura of the 
human body is gathered in the five senses. The head is where the soul of a 
person is. It is necessary to give the best to heaven. Therefore, on the way 
to the ceremony, the warrior must wear a golden mask. Cover your face, 
because his face can only be appreciated by the gods of the heavens, and 
mortals are not qualified to see. 


The national teacher hates iron and does not become steel. He said: "In the 
past, there were at least five laps of guarantees for the sacred warrior. At 
most, it was only fifteen or six laps. What about you? You can walk fifty 
laps with your eyes closed! One hundred laps As a result, you yourself 
succumb to death on the third lap - why don't you kill your master first? 
This is good, your prince is going to be famous, and I will accompany you 
to name it!" 


No one dared to speak in the hall. Cheer, but look calm, calmly said: 
"National division, you should look at it like this. If the child is killed, no 
one picks up, the blood in the sky tour is on the spot, is it also an ominous 
sign? Is the festival not interrupted? Now, at least the end is more decent, 
it is already the best result. It can only be said that this is an accident." 


The teacher’s language was plugged for a moment, and said: "You are a 
child! There are so many royal warriors present, can you still pick it up? If 
you are not sure, you may break your arms and legs, but you can’t fall. 
You go forward a little more. Step, play pretty, and no one will care about 
what has just fallen." 


Xie pity is an eyebrow, said: "National division, you know. In that case, 
except for me, there is no second person to react, nor will there be a 
second person who can receive it without any injury. Live him. Don't pick 
up, die one, pick up, die two." 


He is a matter of course, very determined. The teachers of the whole 
country are also clear that he is telling the truth, so he cannot refute. 
Seeing that he was kneeling in front of the gods, he was completely ill- 
fated, curious, funny, and proud. This baby apprentice Jin Guier, who can't 
get angry with him, can only lick a few hairs, and cover up the sadness in 
his heart with the pain of the scalp. After a pause, the national teacher 
said: "And!" 


Thanks to pity, he bowed his head and said: "The disciples are listening." 


Guoshi said: "You are playing today, doing a good job. No matter how 
good it is, you can't greet you and suddenly change it without first hitting 
it. Today, your majesty and the sissy are scared enough. You know that if 
you can't catch up, What will it become?" 


Thank you for your long eyebrows and awkwardness. "The national 
teacher, this thing, I didn't ask you before today?" 


The national teacher is also a glimpse, said: "You asked me? Before today? 
When?" 


Hearing words, thanking the pity, looking at the side, said: "Music?" 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 60: Red beads 
are not intended to cause red eyes 


At this time, the sorrowful sorrowfulness behind Shen Xie said: "Your 
Highness has indeed said the day before." 


Everyone looked at him, the wind channel: "In recent days, His Royal 
Highness has been pondering over the days of the heavens. I had a whim 
yesterday. I thought that I would jump from the tower, and I would like to 
go to the heavens. Other arrangements do not need to be changed. But at 
the time, His Royal Highness is still reviewing. The ritual process, can not 
get away from the body, so I let the admiration for the national teacher, 
asking this move is not feasible." 


As soon as he looked up, his eyes were slightly angry. He said: "Muqing 
came back and told His Royal Highness that he had informed the National 
Teacher, so His Royal Highness thought that the National Teacher had 
allowed it. Today he did it. Where did he expect the National Teacher to 
know nothing? Is it almost a big deal?" 


The public roads face each other. Guo Shidao: "Who has heard of this?" 


The other three deputy national divisions shook their heads again and 
again. The national teacher turned to him, and his face turned into anger, 
saying: "Muscle, do you know this intentionally?" 


His words and expressions have clearly identified that it is a kind of evil in 
which to engage in ghosts. Thanks to the thin boy who stood next to him 
without saying a word, thinking for a moment, said: "National division, I 
think, this should be a misunderstanding." 


Hearing his words, he looked at him slowly and his eyes looked dark. 

Thanks to pity: "If you deliberately conceal and do not report, after a little 
bit of quality, the tricks will be dismantled, who is responsible, no one can 
escape. The feelings are not short-sighted, not to make such a decision. In 
addition, the Yue Shenwu absent What good is it for the demon warrior on 


the same stage? I also hope that the national teacher will listen to him and 
then make a final conclusion." 


After that, he said first: "Make it, what's going on." 


The feelings fell down and whispered: "My Royal Highness told me 
yesterday, I said it." 


Guo Shi frowned: "You said nothing, we still don't know? When did you 
say that?" 


Mu Qing said: "Yesterday, half a hour after the evening class, when the 
four national teachers were resting in the Sixiang Palace, the disciples 
reported outside the window." 


The national teacher turned to the other three colleagues and wondered: 
"After finishing the evening class yesterday? What were we doing at that 
time?" 


Just after asking, he remembered, his face involuntarily brought a bit of 
green. The three deputy national teachers also coughed a few times, 
including vaguely: "Nothing. Nothing... rest, rest." 


Seeing several national teachers and supporters, everyone immediately 
became radiant. 


In the view of the emperor, everyone is quiet and clear, and basically can't 
play any games. There are only a few little fun, and they are talking about 
entertainment. Among them, the most popular one 1s the brand. 


It is playing cards. Moreover, you can only sneak up and not teach others 
to see. Several national teachers have been panicked in the emperor's view 
all the year round, and they are poisonous in the deep. As long as they play 
cards, it must be ecstasy, intoxicated, hysterical, and the outside voices are 
inaudible. If the admiration happens to be notified outside the window at 
that time, can you be heard a few words? 


A deputy teacher said: "Oh, that...maybe too many people, the voice is too 
small, I didn't understand it. Hey, didn't hear it." 


The national teacher suspected: "Have you really visited the Sixiang 
Palace yesterday?" 


Admire the feelings: "That is true." For the proof, he said that the clothing, 
appearance and accent of the guards outside the door were not bad. The 
national teacher had to believe, and then frowned: "Then you went to the 
four elephants. The palace can let the children outside the door report it, or 
go in and say, why do you have to shout out the window? Do not ask if we 
heard it?" 


The sorrowful whispered: "The disciple did not try. The disciple asked the 
brother who guarded the guard outside the door. But I don't know why, the 
brother must be embarrassed with me, neither let me go to the palace to 
inform, I don’t want to send a letter to me, or even... ridicule and drive me 
away." 


After a pause, he said again: "The disciples have no choice but to go to the 
other side of the Sixiang Palace and inform the teachers outside the 
window. After the disciples finished, they heard a national teacher 
shouting 'know. "Retreat and retreat," the disciple thought that this was the 
idea of agreeing with His Highness, so he went back." 


The national teachers are silent. 


When this card 1s in full swing, where will I listen to what people say 
outside? ? ? When you hear something, you will scream "I know". In fact, 
I am afraid that even the sound is sent from where I don't know! 


Thank you for your brow: "Is there still such a thing? Which Taoist child is 
so embarrassed? It is not rude to the people I sent. It is not small." 


Although Xie Pity is very close to the Emperor's audience, he almost never 
puts on the shelf, but after all, he 1s the emperor's esteem after the 
emperor. At this moment, although he is kneeling in front of the statue, 


there is no humility. A moment of seriousness, not angry. Everyone is 
ashamed, and the faces of the national teachers become subtle. 


Thanks: "Why didn't you tell me about this when you came back 
yesterday?" 


Mu Qing turned around and bowed to him, whispering: "His Royal 
Highness, please don't want to pursue the brother. I didn't mention it to you 
yesterday, I don't want to make trouble. It was not a big deal. If you come 
out for me, it will hurt the same door." 


Xie pity did not agree, and suddenly said: "What is this the same door and 
anger? Insulting the same door and used to ventilate?" 


It is said that the faces of the national teachers are more subtle. 
In the end, this happened because the national teachers did not like it. 


They don't like it. The Taoist children who are serving around naturally 
understand their minds, and the self-love is not very pleasing. Therefore, 
the same doormen don't give him convenience. It is normal to be 
inconsistent. Of course, this golden noble disciple did not deliberately 
satirize them, but they did tie them up. 


In the words of admiration, the words are constantly retreating, but the 
wind letter can no longer be heard. Suddenly, "It is really not a big deal, 
but it is so complicated by you. If you directly say to the doorway boy, you 
are the predecessor of Prince Edward." When he came to pass the message, 
did he have the courage to report it? Also, before the departure, the 
National Teacher asked you where the Prince’s Temple went. Why did you 
deliberately answer the ambiguity? You will not directly say that your 
Highness is on the tower. Waiting for the team to leave?" 


The feelings immediately and resolutely retorted: "I thought that the 
national teacher had already known the matter. I didn't expect the National 
Teacher's Association to suddenly ask questions, so I stopped for a while. 
But then I told the national teacher that the Royal Highness had already 
been accounted for. All the procedures are as usual, and the Highness will 


come soon. His Highness was not present at the time, but there are still 
many people who heard it. Why did it deliberate? Why is it ambiguous?" 


Fengxin glared at him. I can think about it carefully. At that time, I was 
really saying this. It was just that the national teacher was in a hurry. I 
didn’t dare to start rashly. I really wanted to pick it up. I couldn’t pick a 
big mistake. It can prove that he was guilty. At this time, thank you: "Well, 
okay. Yin wrong, misunderstanding, it is bad luck, don't argue." 


The wind and faith look is not very happy, but because of his identity, he 
dare not squat in the Shenwu Hall, and then does not speak. The national 
teacher also does not want to entangle on this issue any more. After all, 
really, do they count, they are not mistaken for playing cards? Then he 
waved: "Hey, let's talk about it! Let's take a look at it and look back and 
see how it should be remedied. You all go down and take off your clothes. 
What to do." 


Thanks for the slightest sorrow, he immediately stood up. The wind and 
the feelings of the enthusiasm and the ruthlessness of the first time, this 
time before getting up, followed by the patience and ready to retreat. 
Thanks to the footsteps, and listened to the national teacher behind him: 
"His Royal Highness." 


Thanks for turning back. Guo Shidao: "Today, the Lord and the Empress 
Dowager have asked you a lot. You are free these days, go back and see." 


Thank you, please, "The disciple knows." 


Out of the Shenwu Temple, the three passed through the large mountain 
peaks and returned to the Taoist Palace, which was built for the Royal 
Highness of the Prince. This prayed to remove the Chinese costumes used 
in the ceremony. 


The head first said that in the Yuan Yuan Festival tour, the sacred warrior's 
clothing crown is strict, almost every thing has its own meaning, can not 
be chaotic. For example, the foreign service is white, the word "pure 
holy"; the Chinese service is red, the word "orthodox"; the golden crown is 


bursting, the "king power" and "wealth"; the white feathers in the arms, 
"winging the wings"; It means “to bring people to live”. Various kinds. 


It can be imagined that this body, whether it 1s wearing or leaving, will be 
extremely complicated. However, thank you for being a prince, naturally, 
you don’t need to do everything yourself. He just opened his arms in the 
cool aroma of the house, and spoke to the wind, while waiting for him as a 
close friend to help him stack this layer. The stack of pleasing sacred 
clothes is taken off, and this will do. 


The whitish white dress has excellent texture and fine texture. The edge is 
embroidered with extremely delicate light gold and dark lines. It is 
gorgeous and not extravagant. Compared with the black suit of the demon, 
it is a difference. . The martial arts suit that has been esoteric in his own 
body has not been removed. In the hands of the pleasing gods that took off 
the body, the knuckles were pumped, and the knuckles were smothered a 
few times. 


Aside, take off the golden crown of the hair, thank you for the long hair, 

sit on the edge of the sandalwood bed, kicked two feet, smashed the white 
boots, waiting for people to wear new clothes. After waiting for a while, I 
saw that I couldn’t move. He licked his head and said, "What happened?" 


The feelings quickly returned to the gods and said: "His Royal Highness, 
this pleasing **** suit seems to be dirty in some places." 


Thanks for the "ah", said: "Take me a look?" 


Sure enough, on the white military uniform, two small black handprints 
were printed. Cheer looked at it and said, "Is it made by the children who 
fell on that day? I remember that he was holding my clothes and refused to 
let go. The child was still wearing a bandage on his face. I don’t know if it 
was wrestling or what happened. Fengxin, have you seen him?" 


Fengxin 1s packing the sword and_ | |knife used in Yueshen, and he is 
depressed. "I didn't see it. I took him out of the palace. I asked him to look 
at his face as you said. As a result, he kicked me on the knee. Mom is quite 
painful." 


Xie pity fell on the bed and pointed to him: "It must be because you are 
murdering him. Otherwise, why didn't he kick me, kick you?" 


Wind channel: "No! This little broken child has been attached for a while 
and then ran away, or I will carry him up and scare him to cry." 


The feelings turned over and turned over, and said: "The child is not a 
beggar. The body is too dirty. If you grab it, it will be black. Under the 
Highness, Yueshen is not dirty. I heard that the sign is not good. ” 


Thanks for lying down on the bed of sandalwood, he took the book from 
the bed and covered the lower half of the face. He said: "Three rounds 
around the city, the name is beautiful, the sign 1s already great. Dirty is 
dirty, wash Just wash it." 


After a pause, my feelings faintly said: "Well, I will try my best when I 
wash." 


Thanks for turning over the book, it just turned to the page with the knife 
method. I remembered the fierce tricks on the Chinese platform today and 
smiled and said: "Muscle, you are playing on the stage today, playing 
well." 


The feelings of the shoulders are slightly stiff. 


Thanks again, "I found out today that you made this knife better than you 
made the sword." 


This feeling is a loose, turned, and his face is a little smile, said: "Really?" 


Thanks for your pity: "Well! However, you are afraid that it is a little 
anxious. It is very different from using a sword with a sword. You see..." 


On the martial arts, thankful and pity will be interested | Bo | hair, than the 
national divisions to play cards, but also ecstasy, shoes do not wear and 
then jumped out of bed, with a hand as a knife, on-site demonstration. 
First of all, the look of admiration is still a bit complicated, thanking him 
for giving him a while, he will look at it seriously. The wind letter waved 


the wrapped 


Xie Li was on the head of Xingtou, but he was rushed back to the bed after 
he rushed the ducks. He said: "Know it!" He said, his hands were close 
together and he was ready to tie up, and then he gave me a message. 
Suddenly, his brow wrinkled and said: "Weird." 


Wind channel: "What's wrong?" 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 61: Red beads 
do not intend to cause red eyes 2 


Thanks for pinching the earlobe, said: "There is a drop ear that is gone." 


Xianle people believe that the Taoist practice to the ultimate perfection is 
"yin and yang" and "hermaphrodite". The gods are infinitely changing, 
naturally not subject to gender, but men and women. Therefore, this 
concept is also reflected in the design of Yueshen. Every generation of Yue 
Shenwu, costumes and attire have both the form and details of men's and 
women's wear, such as earrings, rings and so on. When Xie Pity played the 
Yue Shenwu, he wore his ear and wore a pair of earrings. 


It is a pair of extremely magnificent crimson coral beads, Minghua 
circulates, shiny and radiant, extremely rare. However, only when she 
thanked her, she discovered that the original pair of red coral beads had 
only one left. 


When he said that he was lost, the face that had been stretched out 
suddenly suddenly became a bit stiff, but the other two did not pay 
attention. Fengxin first found a pass inside and outside the house. The 
empty hand came in and said: "You just lost everything, and you can't see 
anything on your ears. The Xianle Palace didn't see this. I went out to find 
it. Don't lose it when you worship the sky." 


Xie pity is also strange, but does not care, said: "It is possible. If you can't 
find it, if you lose it, you will lose it." 


However, he took the broom that he swept the ground on, and whispered: 
"The beads are precious, can find or find it. See if it is at the bottom of the 
bed." Then he swept it up. Thanks to the pity: "Or else ask a few people to 
come in and help find it." 


Fengxin said casually: "There are many people, and there are no other 
things to find, and they are stolen and hidden." 


Mu Qing originally checked the bottom of the bed silently. After listening 
to this sentence, suddenly his face flashed a trace of white, violently got 
up, and the broom in his hand "squeaked" and folded into two paragraphs. 
Thanks for the moment. 


After coming out of the Shenwu Temple, Fengxin was quite vocal about 
the feelings, but there was no attack. At this moment, seeing the feelings 
of the first episode, the fire said: "What do you do suddenly? What is it 
that provokes you?" 


The feelings are cold and cold: "If you want to say something, just say, 
what do you do with the insinuation? The beads are gone and it is not my 
business." 


Fengxin has always been blunt, but the first time I heard someone accuse 
him of innuendo, he laughed and said: "Why don’t you say this to 
yourself? What did I say? I didn’t say that you stole, you I bumped into 
the knife and I have a ghost in my heart?" 


Thanks for the resentment, the heart is not good, sit up from the bed and 
say: "Faith, don't say it!" 


Mu Qing’s forehead burst into three or four blue veins. The wind letter is 
really not much thought, inexplicably said: "What happened?" 


Xie pity is not easy to explain to him, I had to first admire the feelings: 
"You don't misunderstand, and the letter that he said casually is not for 
you." 


The sorrowful fist clenched and loosened, and eventually did not continue 
to attack. It’s just that the eyes are getting red, turning to pity, staring at 
him word by word: “You...no words.” 


Thanks: "No, I don't!" 


Mu Qing closed his mouth and took a few breaths. He glanced at the wind 
and grievances, and then said nothing, and took the door. Xie pity jumped 
out of bed to chase, and after a few steps, he was caught. Wind channel: 


"Your shoes are not worn by your Highness! What does it look like when 
the hair is out?" 


Thanks for your pity: "Help me stop him!" 


Wind channel: "You wear clothes and shoes first, tie your hair. Whatever it 
is, this person 1s usually yin, who knows which string he touched, 
inexplicably." 


The feelings of the early morning were gone, and I couldn’t catch up with 
it. I had to take the root rope and rushed, and sighed with a bunch of sighs: 
"He is not sick, but you happen to accidentally say the wrong thing." 


From the closet, Feng Xin took out the white robes that Xie Pity wore on 
weekdays and threw them to him. He said, "What am I wrong?" 


Thanks to the boots on the side of the foot: "I can't tell you. In short, you 
go to see me with me, and make it clear that it is a misunderstanding, not 
for him." 


Fengxin frowned: "What can you tell me?" 


Thank you for your silence. The wind and the more skeptical, and thought 
of the feeling of resentment, suddenly said: "He really stole your things?" 


Thanks for the hurriedly, he said, "No! No!" 


Seeing him like this, the wind letter is more certain, said: "It turns out! It's 
no wonder that his face suddenly changed, it turned out to be a heart. 
When did he do this kind of thing?!" 


Thank you, "You don't want to be so loud!" 


The wind letter lowered the voice and said: "With such a thing, you don't 
tell me! Just say." 


Seeing that he has already suspected that even if he goes down again, he 
will be found sooner or later. Thanks for his helplessness: "I don’t think 
it’s stealing, but... Hey, I’ll start from the beginning, you still remember, I 


just entered the emperor two years ago. Soon, on one occasion, lost a piece 
of gold foil?" 


Hearing the words, Feng Xin’s eyes widened and he shot his thigh and 
said, “When?!” 


Three years ago, Xie pity soft and hard foam, and finally asked his parents 
to allow him to enter the Imperial Palace before the weak crown. After a 
year, after the completion of the Xianle Palace, he finally came up happily. 


Thanks to the mountain, the luggage is not too much. Two car books, two 
hundred swords. But Empress Dowager loves his son, for fear of his 
silence in the mountains. He is so bitter, and later sent 20 servants to 
Taicang Mountain, and the four car princes loved the fun of the weekdays. 
On the Mount Tai Cang, this includes a set of a total of one hundred and 
eight gold foil temples. 


The gold foil is a game that 1s popular among the Xianle nobles. At that 
time, this wave of luxury things went up the mountain, sparking a little 
discussion. In the emperor's view, they are all well-behaved Taoists. They 
are not familiar with the temperament of the Prince. Although they don't 
dare to say anything, they are behind the scenes: Is this Prince of Principal 
coming to practice, or 1s it to play? What is the fun of the royal family? 
What can I build? 


Fengxin heard the voice of these arguments and refuted it. He thanked him 
for leaving him alone. He smiled and said: "It is human nature. In the 
future, they will naturally know whether I am playing or not, and who is 
the emperor. The first person in this generation of children." 


However, after a while, one thing happened. 


Thanks to the servants and the four cars that the Queen had arranged for 
him to send them back, and when they checked their luggage, they found 
that one hundred and eight pieces of gold foil were missing. 


After the gold foil all the way to the road with the Cangshan Mountain, it 
has never been to Xianle Palace, not lost on the road, or was stolen. I didn't 


find it on the road, and thanked me for giving me a sentence with the 
national teacher. When the National Teacher thought that it might be 
stolen, the Emperor’s view might be so irritating that someone made a 
mistake for the gold foil temptation. If you dig into the ground, you should 
find out where the gold foil is. If you find it in someone, you will be 
severely punished. As a result, the entire Emperor's view of more than 
3,000 people did nothing else, was caught unprepared, and suddenly all 
were rushed out of the entire team, one by one to check the house. 


After a lot of fanfare, I was tired and tired. Who knows, when I searched 
for more than half of the time, Xie Li suddenly changed his mouth and 
said that I was embarrassed, and added trouble to the same door. He 
suddenly remembered that this set of gold foil temples seems to be in the 
palace. He was lost by him. In other words, there were only one hundred 
and seven gold foils. 


In order to check where the missing gold foil is, the night of Huangjiguan 
can be described as a big expense. When people are overwhelmed, the 
grandfather of the Prince suddenly came to such a sentence, and the 
former work was abandoned, which inevitably caused many of the same 
students to complain. So, for a moment, I secretly said that who taught 
people to be His Royal Highness, what is it, just looking forward to the 
next memory is better, can remember such an important thing before the 
inventory check just fine. Feng Xin sighed and listened to his anger, but he 
refused to let him go, waiting for the future. In the future, Xie Pity really 
rolled down the 3,000 disciples and became the first person to be 
deservedly emperor. Because he is indeed quite friendly, he does not take 
power, and gradually, in the public opinion between the public and the 
private door. The acquaintance is better. If the letter does not remember, it 
will forget the original paragraph. Who knows that once again, he 
suddenly realized that he was shocked and angry: "That piece of gold foil 
is taken away?" 


Thanks for your pity: "Hey!" 
Determined no one around, he said: "The piece of gold foil was smashed 


down the mountain road, admiring the water passing by, picking it up in 
the grass. He collected it, didn't think about how to deal with it, the result 


was night The national teacher suddenly attacked and drove everyone out 
to search for a house. I didn't know him at the time, but I saw a messy 
face. I was sitting outside, and he privately whispered to me when he came 
up with tea. I only know what happened." 


Wind channel: "Get it without reporting, this is not stealing? So you want 
to help him to hold on to this matter, tell people that the gold foil was lost 
in the palace?" 


Talk, thank you for finishing, and go out: "That's it." 


The wind was half-dead, and he followed the door and said, "Your 
Highness, do you know that you just came to the emperor, how many 
people are talking about the three?" 


Thanks for your pity: "You whispered. He was really bad at the time, pale 
and pale. The other people of the Royal View did not want to see him. If I 
said that I went out, he would not be finished in this life? I am with him. 
Different, the situation in this case is different, and the consequences can 
not be compared." 


At this time, several trails came face to face, courteously praying, but his 
face was smiling, and said: "His Royal Highness!" Xie Li also smiled 
back, and the two people passed by. Also on the wind channel: "Look, I 
said that I will wait for the future, now I am not getting along well with 
you? Who else dare to make irresponsible remarks?" 


The two went to the Taoist house, did not see anyone, and retired to find. 
Wind channel: "I was wondering at the time, I never knew that you lost a 
piece in the palace. You didn't tell me for two years, but told me that you 
met him when he was sweeping the floor. !" 


Thanks to the pity: "He later asked me not to tell others. Since I promised, 
of course, no one can say, even if you can't say it. Now you know, it is 
already my loss of faith. But you must not tell other people." 


Wind channel: "This is a loss of faith. It is not what you told me. It is his 
own thief's guilty feeling that he has been caught by me." 


Xie pity threatened: "No, no, you swear, this thing will never pass. 
Otherwise I will break with you, and you will not be able to find a wife." 


Fengxin sprayed, said: "You broke off with me! On the second day of the 
holiday, the people of the country will know one thing: when the Prince's 
Highness wears clothes, he is stunned by his garter--nothing. Who is he? 
Mom is interested in chewing the tongue." 


After a pause, he still said: "He might have thought that I was targeting 
him because I knew that he took the piece of gold foil. In fact, I just don't 
like him. A big man wants to think about it all day long. I suspect that you 
told me. The nephew in the palace did not have so many thoughts about his 
twists and turns, and he looked annoyed." 


Thanks to the pity: "There is no such thing as you said. Emperor Esoteric 
never heard of anyone who lost something, indicating that he was the first 
to commit. In the final analysis, it was because of his mother... Hey, he and 
I have repeatedly guaranteed it. I will never do this again in the future, and 
it is not an exaggeration to give an opportunity. He also did it. Besides, 
when the child fell, the feelings of the family would not match me, and the 
ending of the festival was not so good." 


Fengxin said: "In any case, you have been in the past three rounds, and the 
name is a good history. Of course, he no longer needs to continue to add to 
you. Your Highness, I tell you, what he said at the Shenwu Temple today, I 
don’t believe a word. Who doesn't know that when the national division is 
playing cards, the six parents don't recognize it? He said at that time, and 
he refused to say who ordered him. It seems that he can't do it." 


Xie pity but shook his head slightly, and said awkwardly: "Actually, this 
thing, I probably have a place that I don't think well. I know that I am not 
waiting to see you. I meant to let him do more for me. People know that he 
is My attendant, I will naturally be polite to him. But I did not expect 
others to be unkind to him to this extent, not only did things not do well, 
but also called the people under the hand to be angry. You change the side 
to see, It will be found that his temper is justifiable." 


Fengxin did not agree with him. "That is his strangeness. What are you 
doing to yourself? You are the Prince of the Prince, who are you to lift, but 
who is not owed? I really don't understand why you value him so much. "" 


Thank you, smile, said: "Wind letter, you know, many people in this world, 
in my eyes, are hard stones." 


Unbelievable. Thanks to pity and hand, said: "The stone is easy to get, the 
jade is hard to find. Over the years, above the martial arts, I have only seen 
two people, can be called a beautiful jade. One piece is you. One piece is 
he." 


He suddenly stopped, looked back, his eyes were very bright, said: "I 
really feel that, love, is a very talented person. Such a piece of jade, is it 
because of the origin and temperament, it 1s necessary to smash the jade, 
Can't be beautiful?" 


Xie pity decided: "No! I thought, this is not right. You ask me why I value 
him so much? I value you as a reason. I must let him shine when I shine. 
And, I don't believe it. Goodwill will bring bad results." 


Fengxin also stopped, listened, scratched his head and said: "Anyway, you 
know what you want, how to do it is your business." 


Thanks for your pity: "Well. So, where did the love go?" 


At this time, there were a few trails on the front, holding the basket in 
their hands and playing all the way. Seeing the pity, they are all joyous, 
and they screamed in unison: "His Royal Highness!" 


Xie pity also responded with a smile. The few people greeted him and 
presented the basket to him. He said with joy: "Is the priest eating 
cherries? It has been washed in the spring water, very clean and very 
sweet." 


The basket is full of red cherry blossoms, very cute. Thanks to the pity and 
the wind letter to pick a few to eat, sweet and incomparable. The little path 
asked: "I just came to vaguely hear the highness of my Highness asking 


for him. Is it looking for him? Let's come over from the cherry forest, as if 
I saw him there." 


Thanks for your pity: "Is this the case? Thank you for your advice." 


So the two rushed toward the cherry forest. On the Mount Tai Cang, in 
addition to the maple forests that are full of mountains and plains, there 
are many fruit trees, peaches, pears, oranges, etc., as well as cherry trees. 
The fruit trees are nourished by the mountain springs, bathing the 
mountains and the sun and the rain, and the fruits are rich in aura. In 
addition to being donated to the palace, the extra ones are only used by the 
disciples who are obsessed with the practice to pick and eat. It is hard to 
find outside the emperor. The cherry trees are one by one, and the new 
green leaves are hung with a string of red coral beads. It looks great. 
Thanks for the fortune and the wind letter for a while, looking for love in 
the woods, not long after, but seeing the faint voice in front of the dispute, 
could not help but live. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 62: Red beads 
do not intend to cause red eyes 3 


The author has something to say: I am sorry that everyone has waited! ! ! ! 
Yesterday, there was a special situation, but before the computer was 
locked by the small black house, the notice was posted at 11:00, I hope 
everyone saw it! Today (17th) evening is still updated as usual! Today, the 
young flowers will come out! 


I saw four or five white clothes in front of me. Everyone was carrying a 
basket. It seemed to be the fruit. But now they are not surrounded by fruit 
trees, but they seem to be surrounded by people. Although separated by 
far, with two people's ears, it is able to clearly collect the content of the 
dispute. A young man said: "No wonder I feel that there are fewer fruits 
seen in the woods recently. It turns out that someone is hiding here to steal 
fruit all day." 


A gentle voice said: "The fruit forest on the Tai Cang Mountain, as long as 
it is a disciple in the Guanzhong, everyone can pick it, why do you say 
'stealing'? Moreover, there are hundreds of fruit trees in the forest, and I 
am alone. And it will not make the fruit less." 


This voice is a kind of affection, seeing the corner of his clothes from the 
crowd, it seems that he has taken off the black dress of the demon, and 
replaced the plain robe worn on weekdays. The man snorted and said: "If 
it's just a part of you, of course, it won't be much less, but you don't just 
pick one of you, you have to sneak down the mountain to eat for others. 
This is shameless." 


Thank you for your understanding. It’s also the look of the same door. 


The family is poor, and the mother 1s very tight in the capital of the 
mountain. In the past, she could only do some needlework for the day. 
Later, when the eyes were broken, the needlework could not be done. Only 
then, the son could take some hard work from the mountain. Supporting 
the family. Sometimes he picks up some of the fruit from the Cangshan 


Mountain and takes the mountain down to the mother to taste the taste. 
This is no big deal, because there 1s no stipulation that it is not allowed to 
do so, but it is still somewhat shameful. It’s even more embarrassing to get 
satirical on the countertop. The voice of the affection brought a chill, 
saying: "I wish my brother, I haven’t communicated with you very much, 
but you have targeted me twice. Yesterday, you also told me not to enter 
the Sixiang Palace to inform the teachers. Message, I don't know where I 
got you?" 


The young man who wished the surname was the Sixianggong path that 
served the national teacher. When he heard this, he came to the air and 
said: "You have not used your heart to pass the words and almost missed 
the big thing. Instead, blame me for coming. Just blame you for covering 
yesterday. Covering the cover and making the others think that you are 
trying to misbehave. If you said what you did, why are you doing this? It’s 
a big deal for the Prince’s High School today, and I’ve been called by the 
National Teacher for a good idea!” The basket was thrown away, and other 
people were asked to encircle. Xie pity can't stand it anymore, said: "And 
live!" 


The few Taoists heard the sound and were taken aback. When they looked 
back, they said, "His Royal Highness!" 


Thanks to the pity and the wind letter came up, the feelings of the past had 
been caught by the brother-in-law, and the collar was stuck in the tree, and 
it was not yet played. If you really fight, you will definitely have the upper 
hand in a pair of 20s. However, if he wants to stand on the top of the 
emperor, he will never be able to fight. 


Xie pity smiled: "You brothers and sisters, what is this doing?" 


I wish that my brother is a decent and white-faced youth. I admire the 
Royal Highness of the Prince. I heard a word and quickly threw away my 
feelings. "This, this, we..." 


Xie pity continued to smile and said: "Although I don't know why you are 
arguing, but my feelings are my close friends. What he does is generally 


out of my instruction. I don't know how to let him come to pick some fruit, 
but it seems to have committed. What blame?" 


Several Taoists repeatedly groaned and said: "No, no! It turned out that 
you are the one who asked him to come, it is our misunderstanding!" 
There is a tree leaning against a tree, listening to him saying that he let 
himself come, first Then he took care of the collar and bowed his head. 
The few people were cold and sweaty, and they apologized and politely 
apologized. Finally, they finally hurriedly took the basket and escaped 
from the cherry forest. Thanks for seeing the feelings brought by the 
basket was thrown aside, bent over and handed it to him, said: "Do you 
want to help?" 


The love did not pick up the basket, just looked up, and looked at him in a 
complicated look for a while, half a sigh, said: "His Royal Highness." 


Thanks: "What?" 
Admire: "Why do you always appear at this time?" 
Thank you: "?" 


The wind letter is not fast, and said: "What do you mean by this? Is it not 
good to come out to help you save the field?" 


He looked at him and took the basket. At this time, the wind stalked the 
neck, hard state: "You listened well, just now, I am not right. I did not 
target you, just say it casually. You don't have to think about it, doubt this 
doubt. I don't care about the things of the Prince Edward, and I don't have 
the interest to chew the tongue. If you do this, you are less awkward!" 


"Hey!" Thanks to pity, he felt that his tone was too rushing, but he could 
hear the last, inexplicably funny. The feelings of love are also humiliating, 
and Xie pity is waving: "Well, well. The wind letter is telling the truth. Cut 
off the paragraph just now, nothing happened." 


Swearing, sulking and sulking: "The red coral beads, I look back and look 
for it. Maybe it's down the street." 


Thanks for your pity, I don’t care too much, and said: "Well, if you have 
time, you will work hard. But if you fall off the street, it is estimated that 
you will be taken away." 


The feelings seemed to have nothing to say, and the few bunches of 
cherries that fell on the ground were thrown into the basket. He didn't take 
a few strings at all, so he was ready to go outside the forest. Thanks to pity, 
he looked up and saw a lot of bright red cherries. He took a few strings and 
put them in his basket. 


A little bit of love, thank you for your pity: "The next time you pick the 
fruit and bring it to your mother, you will say that it is taken by my order, 
then no one will say anything. The national teacher let me return to the 


next few days. Palace, I plan to leave tomorrow, or you will go down the 
mountain tomorrow? Go back today." 


For a long while, the feelings of the end are whispered: "Thank you for 
your Highness." 


On the second day, Xie Li took the wind and the love and fell down. 


Before going down the mountain, before the tall mountain gate, I saw a 
golden carriage, a neckband collar, a young man holding a whip, lying in 
front of the car, high-pitched Erlang legs, cocky. Upon seeing the pity out 
of the mountain gate, the boy jumped up and rushed to the side, and he was 
very happy to say: "Prince cousin!" 


This boy is naturally sad. Only when he has time to go empty, he will 
come to the Cangshan Mountain to wait for the rabbit to block the pity. He 
stepped over in two steps and said happily: "I am finally waiting for you!" 


Thank you, Charlie, stunned his head and smiled: "The grace is growing 
taller? How do you know that I am going back to the palace today?" 


Gracefully, "I don't know. I just keep it. Anyway, you will always come 
out. I don't believe that I can't." 


Thank you for your helplessness: "You are really idle. Have you studied 
hard? Have you practiced the sword well? If you let me check your 
homework, I will not help you to say good things." 


Graceful eyes and bones turn around and jump up and say: "Don't worry 
about those! You see my new car! The cousin comes up, take my car back 
to the palace!" He took his thankful hand and took him to the car. Pull, 
thank you only feel very dangerous, said: "You drive?" Fengxin and 
admiration also followed, and it is reasonable to say that the attendant is 
going to take the car, but grace has pulled down his face and raised the 
whip. "I let the cousin get on the bus and didn't let you come up. The two 
squatters also want to touch my golden car, not to roll!" 


Thanks and whispered softly: "Sorry!" 


Fengxin has seen the grace several times. He knew that he was such a 
virtue that Zhangkou’s mouth shut to death, but he had not yet entered the 
palace, and naturally he had not been in close contact with the little mirror 
king. Grace is very wronged, but seeing the pity seems to have to go, had 
to reluctantly promised to let these two squatting things on his baby car. 


I knew that when I got on the bus, all three people regretted it. It’s a 
madman to drive, it’s a madman, a whip is in his hands, and he doesn’t 
know what to say. He’s screaming at the white horse and screaming on the 
street, shouting and shouting. Non-stop, several times almost knocked 
down pedestrians and stalls, thanks to the wind letter and admiration in the 
front, from time to time to take a reins on the cliff, but all the way to at 
least to lose 20 lives. When I arrived at the palace, the wheels finally 
slowed down, and the three people who were grateful for their love and 
compassion were relieved. Thanks for the cold sweat, the wind and the 
feelings have been drawn by the graceful ones, and the hands are all whip 
marks. And Grace stood up and stepped on the tall white horse's butt, 
proudly said: "Prince cousin, how, my car is not bad!" 


Thanks to the car, said: "I want to tell the father and mother, confiscated 
your car." 


Graceful shock: "How is this!" 


Xianle Guofeng, one loves gold, two loves gems, three loves beauty, four 
loves music, five loves painting and calligraphy. The Xianle Palace is the 
pinnacle of melting all these favorite things. Passing through the vast 
square and walking through the corridors of Zhu Hong, what you see is not 
all the extravagant golden jade. You can see beautiful paintings and 
calligraphy all the time, and the sound of music is heard from time to 
time, like a fairyland. 


The palace is a home of pity, he grew up here. Feng Xin was selected as a 
bodyguard at the age of fourteen, and it has long been strange. Only the 
first time I saw this kind of building, I was amazed. However, the more 
shocked, the more careful, the more afraid you are to be seen, the more 
you dare not take the wrong step. 


Xie pity first went to see the Queen. The Queen is in the Qifeng Palace, 
leaning against a few small items, I have already heard people telling the 
return of His Royal Highness, and I am so happy that my son has not 
reached the end and stretched out his hands. He said: "I am finally willing 
to come back to see my mother? ” 


The wind and the love were kept outside the hall. Xie pity and grace 
entered the temple. They walked over and took the mother's hand and said, 
"I didn't come back two months ago?" 


The Queen blamed: "You have a very unconscionable child. You also know 
that you have to spend more time with me. You are not happy to be home 
for two months." 


Thanks and smiles: "Where is the mother old? It is also a few decades old! 
It looks like I am the same generation." 


The Queen listened to the beauty. Although she has such a big son, she is 
still a noble lady because she is pampered and well-maintained. However, 
she still screams in her mouth: "Spoiled." The thing exudes a strange 
fragrance, and wonders: "What is this?" Then he took it, but the Queen 
said: "Don't drink! That can't be drunk." 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 63: Red beads 
do not intend to cause red eyes 4 


Thanks for the pity: "What can't you drink for me?" 


The queen pinched the little jade cup, poured out a little on the scorpion, 
and swept a few times on the face. "There were a lot of fresh fruit on the 
Cangshan in the past few days. I don't like cherries, but there is a party." 
The child said that he was able to lick his face and squeeze his face. He 
used it to play, and it was useless. He was preparing to let people down. 
Which one can give people a drink?" 


Thanks to the smile, but suddenly remembered yesterday. The mother of 
the love can not eat cherries a few times a year, and the sensation of 
picking a cherry on the Tai Cang Mountain will be poked a little bit. It is 
inevitable that some emotions, fearing the feelings of the bad feelings, 
will transfer the topic with a smile, saying: "There is What can I give to 
eat?" 


The Queen smiled and said: "What you said, the outsider listened and 
thought that I was hungry. You actually picked up your mouth when you 
were young. I didn't raise fat. | went up the mountain for so long. What do 
you want to eat today? Don't pick and choose." 


The mother and son said for a while, the Queen asked about the accident 
on the day of the tour, quite worried: "Listen to the meaning of the 
national teacher, this thing seems quite big, I don't know what to do? You 
will be punished?" 


Xie Pity has not yet answered, and Grace has already rushed: "Hey, this is 
not the fault of the prince's cousin. It is not him who falls from the wall. 
Even if he wants to be punished, he should punish the little one." 


Thanks for thinking: "What 1s it that is not dead?" He has not corrected his 
sadness, and the Queen has already laughed. At this time, she noticed two 


people outside the temple, saying: "Who is the child next to Fengxin? It is 
the first time I saw more people around you." 


Therefore, Xie pity said with joy: "This is a feeling of love. Yesterday, he 
played the demon on the stage." 


Hearing the words, the graceful eyebrows are slightly vertical. The Queen 
said: "Hey? Let him come up and see. The wind letter also comes in." 


Therefore, the wind and the feelings came into the temple, half a mile in 
front of the emperor. The emperor's back end was full of affection for a 
while, and thanked the pity: "I saw him playing well yesterday, but it is a 
child of an individual face. Looking at this face, it looks like a Sven Prime 
Minister. I didn't expect to use a knife to get the momentum." 


Thank you, Charles: "Is it? I think he is very good." 


At this time, the grace is cool and succinct: "Oh? Was that the demon was 
him yesterday?" 


Thanks for listening, I didn’t know what it was, and sure enough, the next 
moment, the sudden burst of anger, grabbed the jade cup on the little one, 
and shook his face and poured it on the head of the feelings, saying: "This 
is to reward you!" 


Xie pity eyes quickly fell his hand, this did not let him pour on the face of 
admiration, he picked him up and said: "Sad, what are you doing!" 


Grace gave him a lift, and he was still screaming and saying: "Cousin, I 
am helping you to teach this restless person! When you didn't come there 
yesterday, he was happy to play there alone, one I am going out of the 
limelight. What kind of thing, when I am the protagonist of the festival? I 
want to turn the sky!" 


The Queen simply stayed, saying: "Ren, you... what are you doing?" The 
feelings were not poured to the head, but they were poured into the 
clothes, but because the queen did not call him up, he was still on the 
ground, looking white. Gloomy. Xie pity handed the grace to the wind and 


said: "Don't let him beat people." Feng Xin single-handedly suppressed the 
grace, but grace even kicked him and shouted: "What are you, so Big dog 
gall, I dare to touch me with your hand!" 


Thanks for the headache, "I am more and more hustle and bustle!" and said 
to the Queen: "After the mother, I forgot to say something, you took his 
golden car." 


Suddenly, he shouted: "Don't! Nothing! It's the birthday gift that my aunt 
gave me!" 


Thanks to pity: "What is also what you have to get. Just be on the street 
and almost accidentally, don't touch it before you can drive." 


The Queen said "ah" and said: "Something is going on? What happened?" 


Thanks to pity, he confessed the madness of driving and driving, and his 
eyes were so angry that he said: "Prince cousin yells at me! I know that no 
one has hit!" 


Xie pity and laugh, said: "That is because someone ts holding you!" 


Grace suddenly earned from the pity, and ran out of the Qifeng Palace. The 
Queen shouted several times and did not come back. He had no choice but 
to say: "I will tell him to take over the car tomorrow. Hey, this kid wants a 
car for a long time. He passed the birthday a few days ago. I saw that he 
really wanted to be tight, and he sent him. Who knows this? I knew I 
wouldn’t give it." 


Thanks to pity: "What does he want to have a car?" 


Queens Road: "When you say this, you can go to Tai Cangshan at any time 
and pick you up." 


Thinking of him is a good intention to himself, thank you for your silence. 
For a moment, he said: "You still have to find a teacher for him, so I will 
give him a temper, and then go on like this, but it will not work." 


The Queen sighed: "Where is there any teacher who ruled him? He has 
always listened to your words. It is difficult to ask him to go up the 
mountain with you to cultivate his body. The national division will not 
accept him as a disciple." 


Thanks and pity, I felt so funny and terrible. I shook my head and said, "If 
you want to enter the emperor, you will be afraid of the whole dog." 


Both the mother and the child have a headache for this problem, can't 
think of a way, and put it aside for the time being. In the evening, thank 
you for seeing your parents, and shortly, you have to leave the palace. 


Everyone knows that the Prince's Temple is obsessed with the cultivation 
of the Tao. Since it was on the Mount Taishan, it has always been more and 
less separated from its parents. In this regard, the king of the country did 
not say much, but the empress was always reluctant. Leaving the palace, 
Xie Pity walked freely in the Imperial City. By the way, according to what 
he said yesterday, he went back to his home. 


Zhumen Gaohu and the slums of the poor are often separated by a lane. 
The original home of the love is the dark alley in the most prosperous 
place in the imperial city. 


When the three people just came to the alley, they had five or six ragged 
children, and they all said: "Brother. My brother is back!" 


Xie pity also first felt strange, how to see a stranger to be a brother, and 
even found that this group of children called "brother" is not him, but the 
feelings. The child called him sweetly, but he did not care. He said, "This 
time there is no. Don't scream." 


Although he is a wooden face, his tone is not really cold. After saying it, 
he said to him: "Don't mind, my librarian, this is a nearby child." The 
children were obviously familiar with him. They used to play happily on 
weekdays. They were completely afraid of him and smiled around them. A 
dirty little hand, looking for something to eat. In the end, I still took a 
bunch of ruby-like cherries from the bag and gave them points. 


Upon seeing it, Feng Xin was quite surprised. It seems that it is very rare 
to feel like doing this kind of thing. It's no wonder, after all, the feelings of 
a little white face that looks extremely cool, the passers-by starving in the 
face of the rations. Thank you for being pitiful. Originally, he also wanted 
to find out what to give to this group of children, but he did not have candy 
all the year round, so that the wind letter directly to the point of silver 
money, and it seems as if you are swearing, it is not appropriate. Who 
knows, at this time, suddenly listening to the screaming, a long string of 
horses humming, the street came up with a scream. 


A few people looked a glimpse, thanked and grabbed the alley. On both 
sides of the street, the east and the west were turned over, the people 
turned over and the horses fled, and the red apples and yellow pears rolled 
over. I haven't seen what happened, I listened to a young boy laughing and 
laughing: "Let's let go, let it go! Who doesn't look at it with long eyes, I 
don't care if I step on it!" 


The wind snorted and said: "It 1s sad again!" 


Sure enough, Grace stood on his gorgeous golden car, his face was 
suffocating, holding a whip, and he was screaming and screaming. Thanks 
for your pity: "Block him!" 


The golden car whizzed past them, and the wind channel: "Yes!" This 
rushed forward. Xie Pity is going to see the pedestrians and stalls that have 
been knocked over by the graceful car, checking that no one is hurt, but 
suddenly feel that something 1s wrong. Looking back, I saw a tall, golden 
rope and dragged a thick hemp rope. At the end of the rope, there is a sack. 
There seems to be something in the sack that is still struggling inside. It 
seems that it 1s a person. 


For a moment, thanking me for feeling creepy. The next moment, he 
rushed to the top. 


The white horse was stunned by the gracefulness, and the carriages also 
flew around the wheel, and the wind letter went to the front to stop the 
horse. It was afraid that it would not stop for a while. And thanked the 
three steps to catch up with the carriage, the sword is out of the sheath, and 


the sword is squatting. The hemp rope was cut off, and the sack fell to the 
ground. It rolled twice and did not move. 


Thank you for watching. This sack didn't know how long it had been 
dragged on the ground. It was worn to the ground, and it was so dirty that 
it was dirty and bloody, as if it were a sinking bag. He was a sword again, 
breaking the rope tied to the sack, opening it, only glanced at it, and there 
was a person inside. Moreover, it is a young child! 


Thanks for tearing the whole sack. The young boy curled up in a group and 
held his head tightly. The dirty clothes were not too big for him. It was 
blood, and the hair was **** and tangled. It was obviously painful. A 
meal, I can't see anyone. Looking at the figure, but only seven or eight 
years old, a very small one, shaking like a strip of skin, I really do not 
know how to survive after being beaten and mopped. 


Xie pity immediately went to explore his neck with his hand, and found 
that the pulsation was not weak. He breathed a sigh of relief and 
immediately hugged the small body. He turned back and sullenly yelled: 
"Faith! Let me stop the grace." !!!" 


He never really thought that this can happen in Xianle. Under the broad 
daylight, on the street, a nobleman, put a living person in a sack and drag 
it behind the carriage! If it wasn’t seen by him, would this young child be 
killed alive today? ! 


In the distance ahead, there was a roar of screams and screams, and the 
voice of the roaring voice was high: "Blocked down!" 


Thanks for a few steps to catch up, just in time to catch up with a scream, 
anger: "You are a daring man, dare to hurt me, who gave you the 
courage?! !" 


It turned out that the wind letter could not stop him, he went to grab the 
reins of the horse. Of course, the grace was not given to him. When he 
snatched and snatched it, he was pushed down by the wind and the 
unintentional accident. He fell to the ground and made a few rolls, his 


knees smashed his mouth, and he was surrounded by onlookers, only to 
feel angry and embarrassed. Thanks for the pity: "I gave it to him!" 


Grace opened his mouth and said: "Prince cousin!" 
Thankful and angry: "Look at what you are doing! Grace, I am..." 


At this moment, he suddenly felt that the young boy in his arms had 
shrunk. He seemed to slowly loosen his hand and peeked at him from his 
elbow. 


Thanks for the immediate anger, and bowed his head: "How do you feel? 
Is there any special pain?" 


The young child was still awake, didn't faint, didn't stun, and shook his 
head. Thanks for seeing the small half of his face, bloody, want to see if he 
hurt his head, who knows, the young child is holding the other half of his 
face, and he will not show him. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 64: Red beads 
do not mean to cause red eyes 5 


Thanks for mercy: "Don't be afraid, nothing, I just want to see your 
wounds." The younger boy was getting tighter and tighter, only showing a 
big dark eyes, showing a horrible color. But this fear is not like being 
afraid of being beaten by him. It is just like being afraid of what he found. 


Looking at the little half of the face and one eye, thank you for suddenly 
seeing where I saw this child, blinking slightly. Seeing his face is 
extremely ugly, graceful said: "Prince cousin, this little do not die 
yesterday, broke your grand code, I help you out. Rest assured, I left a 
measure, can not die." 


Sure enough, the child he was holding in his arms was the young child who 
fell from the tower on the way to the Yuan Festival on the Yuan Festival 
yesterday! 


It’s no wonder that the more you look at him, the more familiar you are. 
The child didn’t even change his clothes. It’s still yesterday’s body. It’s 
just because of punching, kicking, and mowing. It’s more dirty than 
yesterday. It’s the same piece. It is even more invisible to be the same 
person. Xie pity can't help but said: "Who told you that I want to ventilate? 
What is this child? It is not his fault!" 


Grace is plausible, saying: "Of course it is his fault. If it weren't for him, 
how would you be accused by the national teacher?" 


This wave is very troublesome, and the crowds around the four gather 
more and whisper. Coincidentally, at this time, the feelings also came up, 
and the graceful screaming at him, the look of disappointment with a hint 
of arrogance, said: "There is still your next person. This person knows that 
he is uneasy and self-defense at first glance, if you are not good at treating 
now In the future, he will step on the head of your master sooner or later. I 
will help you teach him, but you will protect him and sue me. Now my 


uncle has taken me a good idea and confiscated my gold. Car. Cousin, that 
is my birthday! I have been looking forward to more than two years!" 


The feelings of love are not yin and irritated. Thanks for the pity and 
laughter, said: "I don't need you to be like this for me. Are you giving me a 
breath, or are you giving yourself out?" 


"..." Grace said: "Cousin, why do you say this to me? Then I am facing 
you, what am I doing wrong?" 


Thanks to him, he said no to him, "You can listen to it. From now on, you 
can't move this child anymore. You can't hear a finger, you can't hear it!" 


At this time, Xie pity neck suddenly tightened. He was on the sigh of 
relief, bowed a little, looked down and saw that the young child buried his 
face in his arms, his hands tightly wrapped around his neck. Xie pity feels 
that he is very trembled, thinking that he hurts, busy: "What?" 


The young boy was mixed with dirt, gray sand, blood, dirty, and all of 
them were stained on the white clothes of Xie, but he did not care, and 
patted his back to show his appease, Shen Sheng. : "Nothing. I will take 
you to the doctor now." 


The young boy did not answer, but he circled him even tighter. I don’t 
want to hold it, as if holding a straw. Graceful look at the pity, not to 
accept his love, and to the outsider, and see the child, the **** muddy 
stuff has been picked up on the body of the pity, anger and heart, the whip 
is raised, it is going to the child's brain Take it up. Fengxin always stood 
by, and suddenly he flew out and kicked his arm. 

’ ” screaming, the whip fell to the ground, the right arm was bent at 
an abnormal angle, and it was softly hanging. And he still looked 
unbelievable. After a long time, he slowly raised his head and stared at the 
wind letter, word by word: "You, actually, dare to discount my arm!" 


This sentence, Sen cold bones. After the wind letter was finished, I reacted 
to what I had done and my face changed slightly. The face of admiration 
has become much more powerful than him. 


It is one thing to hate the sadness on their backs on weekdays. However, as 
a bodyguard, I lost my hand for a while and discounted the arm of the 
imperial family. That is another matter! 


I only thanked the child, though both hands were holding the young child. 
Behind them were onlookers. It was not easy to dodge, but if he wanted to 
dodge, it would be a breeze. It’s just that the grace is coming, and it’s 
suddenly violent, and the wind letter is too late to think about it. Now it’s 
the situation is chaotic, not catching up with the block, and don’t care so 
much. His chest clothes have been soaked in blood, fearing that the child 
will die again. Thanks for taking the initiative and taking a breath, he said: 
"You, if you are involved today, if you are involved, what is the loss, 
remember Next, I will be responsible for it, and I will never shirk it!" 


Immediately, he said to the wind: "Save the child first. Take the sadness 
away, don't let him continue to mess around!" Then, holding the young 
child, he turned and headed for the palace. The wind was so sure, the look 
returned to normal, and the anger was lifted, and he followed the palace 
and rushed to the palace. The soldiers in front of Gongmen Road saw the 
Prince's Highness and left for an hour. Then they rushed back. Although 
strange, they naturally did not dare to stop. Therefore, Xie pity rushed to 
the Royal Medical Office, let the wind and the feelings of the sorrow and 
keep the outside, and went in. 


It is rare for His Royal Highness to return to the palace. It is rare to order, 
and the medics are naturally rushing. Xie pity put the young boy on the 
chair and said: "There are people who have worked hard. This child was 
beaten by several adults, and was put into a sack, dragged on the ground, 
and helped me to see his head first. Nothing hurts, this is the most 
important thing." 


Although several royal doctors never saw the royal aristocrats carrying a 
dirty wild doll and rushed in to let them heal, they also knew what they 
were going to do, and Nono should. One person: "Children, let go of your 
hand first." 


However, the young boy was dragged in by the way, and the road was very 
good. At this time, he died and squatted, holding his right half face and 


saying nothing to let go. This royal doctor can no longer bear the disease, 
the patient does not cooperate and there is no rule of law, and the royal 
doctors hope to pray: "His Royal Highness, this...?" 


Thanks to pity, he said: "It may be afraid of life. Nothing, I am coming." 


The young child sat in a chair, and could not look flat. He leaned over and 
bent over. He asked, "What is your name?" 


The child stared at him with a big eye, and the dark eyes reflected a white 
reflection. This kind of look, if you want to describe it, 1s as true as the 
wind and believes - "like a demon, a ghost possessed the same", should not 
appear on a child. 


For a long while, he bowed his head and said: "...red..." 


His voice was low and small, a bit vague, as if he didn't want to say it, and 
he seemed a little embarrassed. Xie Li only heard a "red" word and asked: 
"How old are you?" 


The child said: "Ten years old." 


Xie pity is just asking questions, trying to dispel his vigilance, listening to 
him slyly answering "ten years old", but it is a glimpse, thinking: "I 
thought it was only seven or eight years old, actually ten years old? This 
child is really thin." 


After a pause, thank you for a slight smile, said: "Now doctors help you 
see the injury, don't be afraid, let go, please?" 


The young child listened, but hesitated and shook his head. Thanks: "Why 
not?" 


Silence for a long time, he said: "Ugly." 


He answered such a word, no matter how embarrassed, and refused to let 
go. Xie pity swears that it is not ugly, he does not look, he does not turn 
around. Little age, but extremely stubborn. Helpless, the doctors had to ask 
him a few questions, let him identify a few hands than the numbers, to 


confirm that he is neither dizzy nor headache, see things and things are 
clear, this will first give him first treatment The injury. 


Governing and curing, several doctors seem to be very confused, 
singularly surprised. Xie pity has been guarding and screaming, "Where, 
how?" 


A royal doctor couldn't help but say: "His Royal Highness, this little friend 
really beaten a person and was dragged into the sack and dragged all the 
way?" 


Thanks for a moment, said: "There is still a fake." 


Yu Medicine said: "That is very ... great. I have never seen such a 
tenacious person. Broken five ribs, one leg, all kinds of injuries, add up, 
actually can still be sober, sitting and standing Dialogue. Adults are still 
difficult to do, public opinion is still a 10-year-old child?" 


Thanks for your pity, the injury is so serious, and the heart is full of anger. 
Looking at the young child again, sitting in the chair seemed to feel no 
pain at all, but he still used the big, dark left eye to look at him secretly. 
After he was arrested and thanked, he immediately turned his head. 2k 
novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 65: Red beads 
do not mean to cause red eyes 6 


When I saw it, Xie Pity felt that he was funny and pitiful. He said: "Can 
this child's injury be restored?" 


A royal doctor re-wrapped the layer of bandages on the head of the young 
child and said: "It is inevitable." 


Thank you for letting go of your heart, nodding your head and saying: 
"There is work." 


At this time, there was a notice from the palace, and the Lord and the 
Queen drove. The royal doctors immediately got up and greeted them. Xie 
pity took the young child to the bed and said: "You lie well, rest first." 
Think about it, this child is afraid of life, and sometimes there are more 
people who may scare him, and put down the bed curtain, and then get up. 


A group of attendants and the palace people embraced the king and the 
queen and stepped into the temple. The back of the emperor was white and 
said: "Why did the emperor return in a hurry after leaving the palace? But 
what hurts outside?" 


Thanks to the pity: "Mother please rest assured, I am not injured. The 
injured are others." 


At this time, Grace shouted in the corner: "Auntie, save me!" 


The empress discovered that Shen Rong was firmly holding the wind letter 
and was beside him. She was anxious about whether her son was well- 
behaved, and did not pay attention to anything else. At this moment, she 
saw the square: "What is this about Rong?" 


The head of the country frowned, said: "Faith, why do you take a small 
mirror king like a prisoner?" 


Under the squatting, the wind letter should be immediately and other 
people, and other people generally bowed immediately, but because he was 
stunned, he could not get out of his hand and the situation was slightly 
embarrassing. Thanks to pity: "I let him take it." 


Grace held his right hand and said: "Auntie, my arm is broken." 


The Queen has not had time to feel distressed. Thanks to pity: "You have 
folded an arm, but what about the child inside?" 


The country owner said: "What child?" 


Thanks to pity: "A ten-year-old child. The strength of the hand without the 
chicken, the original physical weakness, Grace sent his men to encircle 
him. If it is not the child's life, I am afraid that the corpse is on the spot, 
give him early. Killed alive!" 


Grace seems to have heard a joke, blink of an eye: "A ten-year-old child, 
the strength of the hand without a chicken? Physical weakness? Cousin, 
you do not know, this little immortal is fierce, more brutal, more powerful, 
He pretended to be pitiful in front of you. I called five or six people, but I 
couldn’t catch the little devil, and gave him punches and kicks, teeth 
biting, and bloody. If he didn’t provoke me, why did I put it? He dragged 
behind the carriage?" 


It is said that both the Lord and the Queen have changed their faces. Xie 
pity took a deep breath and said: "Stop! Are you doing these things very 
glorious?" 


On the weekdays, it’s not that I don’t like to show up, so arrogant and 
arrogant, the people in the imperial city have invisible reason? After 
seeing it, why don’t you talk about it after a meal? 


The head of the country looked at the queen and looked at the emperor. He 
said: "With the small mirror king, go to the royal doctor and give him a 
good arm. The golden car is taken back, the forbidden thoughts, and it is 
not allowed to be released for one month." 


The waiter behind him should be immediately, go forward and take him, 
and the wind letter will let go. It’s indifferent, but it’s no longer awkward. 
“I’m going to collect it, I’ve known that it’s the last time I’ve run today.” 


Listening to his no regrets, the Queen sighed. Thanks to pity: "It seems 
that it is a ban on thinking for a month. He is afraid to commit another 
crime next time. You need to be disciplined." 


Graceful, airway: "Prince cousin, you..." Immediately, his eyes turned and 
said: "Oh. Then I admit, this is something I am wrong. Your Majesty, no 
matter what you punish, Do not shirk." 


In the next sentence, he turned his head and said: "However, the prince's 
cousin's men, should also punish it? My father, my arm, can give this wind 
to the wind!" 


Hearing the words, the lord immediately looked forward to the wind letter, 
and his face was horrified. The wind letter bowed slightly, and the feelings 
were not easy to detect and moved two steps. 


The Lord 1s cold and cold: "Faith, you are the servant of His Royal 
Highness. The Prince really treats you very well. Could you forget your 
identity and be arrogant? Your duty 1s to serve your Highness, you are Is 
this the service of him? The cousin of the Prince Edward, the little mirror 
king, dares to do it." 


The wind is heard, ready to kneel down. Thanks for your pity: "You don't 
have to kneel down." 


The first letter of the wind is definitely to listen to the pity, even if it is 
under the command of the majesty, he only gives priority to the command 
of His Royal Highness, so he immediately stops the situation. When you 
see it, the look of the Lord is more and more unpleasant. 


Thanks to the pity: "The wind is a broken arm that is not fake, but the 
reason is to protect the Lord. And it is to be guilty of the crime, he is not 
wrong, why bother?" 


The king of the country said: "No matter what he is for, he has offended 
the little mirror king. The master and the servant are different, and there is 
a distinction between honor and ignorance. Don't say that the lonely king 
let him kneel down, that is, the lonely king will immediately punish him 
for one hundred. There is nothing wrong with it." 


Although the Lord is not as generous as the Queen, but grace is also a 
royal family, inviolable. Grace is very clear about this, and squinting: 
"There is no need for the stick. After all, he is the cousin of the prince. I 
don't want to be too embarrassed. I only need to discount his arm and then 
kneel down and give it to me." Three heads, I will not pursue anything." 


The head of the country slowly nodded and seemed to think that the move 
was feasible. Xie pity said: "If you want to punish the wind, you will 
punish me first. He is my servant. When he comes to him, he has not done 
anything wrong. Second, he has listened to my orders. I accepted him on 
his behalf. ” 


Listen to him saying that the anger of the head of the country flashed. 


The father and son who are under the sun must experience such changes. 
When his son is young, he will regard his father as the greatest hero in the 
world, his role model, and worship. When the son grows to a certain age, 
he will gradually begin to doubt his father's everything, and even gradually 
resent, and eventually both parties refuse to recognize each other. 


Xie pity on Tai Cangshan to clean up, the fundamental purpose, of course, 
is because Xi Wu seeks the way is his heart. However, in fact, he is not 
obsessed with where to ask and what to ask for. 


The so-called "Tao", seeing the meaning of words, is "the way people walk 
on the road." As long as one person is bent on the road and wherever he is 
practicing, he does not necessarily have to do the form, and he is bound to 
go up the mountain. The reason why Xie Pity is soft and hard, must insist 
on going up the mountain. There is another reason, because he feels that he 
can't talk to his father. 


You are the Prince of Xianle, and when Xie Pity was born, Xianle’s lord 
made a smooth plan for his life. It’s okay when I was young, little people, 
no troubles, thank you for the only need to accompany the parents to pile 
up the gold foil temple, play and play. As he grows older, Xie Pian is more 
and more aware that his father is not only a father, he is still a national 
lord, and many of his ideas and practices cannot be used. For example, the 
so-called royal majesty is one of the things that Xie Pity does not like 
most. 


Since it is impossible to run in, it is still far away. Every time he returned 
to the palace, he talked with his mother very much and never pushed his 
heart with his father. The two sides also rarely take the initiative to talk 
with each other, the second time the Queen is reconciled. 


The father and son had been deadlocked for several months. At this time, 
the pity and persistence persisted and refused to give in. The king said: 
"Okay, then you have received it on his behalf, and you can't do it!" : "Of 
course!" The Queen saw that their father and son were up again, and 
hurriedly said: "Why is this suffering?" 


At this time, the unspeakable wind letter suddenly raised his left hand and 


squatted on his right arm. " ", everyone was shocked, looking at the 
sound, I saw his right arm and the same grace, hanging down softly. 
Thanks for the pity and anger, said: "Wind letter!" 


Fengxin’s forehead was cold and sweaty, and the second thing was not to 
say that he was stunned, and he slammed three heads, and Xie’s pity did 
not stop. Grace is quite proud, haha smiled: "Well, this king will barely 
forgive you. Isn't it so good?" 


Although his arm was broken, he was refreshed when he left, as if he had 
won a victory. And the wind letter is still on the ground, looking at this 
scene with a look of enthusiasm, the look is faint, I don't know what I am 
thinking. Xie Pity turned to his father and angered: "You!..." 


Fengxin left him with his left hand and said: "His Royal Highness!" 


The Queen also took hold of him. Thanks to the heart, Fengxin followed 
himself at the age of fourteen, and was greatly favored by the Queen. He 
could not bear to see his father and son arguing, which caused the Queen 
to be sad. This is the case. If he is attacking now, it is tantamount to 
confession and confidence. He has to forcibly endure it, but his heart is 
already burning. The face of the country’s face was slightly relieved, and 
the face was calm. 


The Queen has always liked the wind letter and sighed: "Hey, good boy, 
wronged you." 


Wind channel: "Please don't say this, the Queen is responsible." 


After listening to this sentence, the sorrowful eyes flashed, and it seemed 
to sneer silently. Xie pity closed his eyes and said: "Mother, if you really 
can't control it, just shut him down." 


The Queen sighed and nodded. She shook her head and left. 


Xie pity invited a doctor, let him handle the right channel of the wind 
channel, said: "Wind letter, can't help." 


As soon as the person next to him left, Fengxin immediately changed his 
face and said: "What is this. I dare to beat him, are you afraid of revenge?" 
Suddenly, he persuaded: "His Highness, your lesson." Naturally, it’s right, 
but don’t let it down. Your Majesty is the head of the country and the 
character of the older generation. It’s different from what we think. Your 
father and son quarreled, and the queen looked unhappy. She was also ina 
dilemma. "" 


Why don’t you know that the mother has a dilemma? 


The mother of Grace is the Queen's sister, the sister 1s deep, and she is not 
sensible when she is young. Love | Dou Kaikai, single-minded pursuit of 
freedom, listening to sweet words, ruining the marriage, and a guard in the 
government | Who knows how to marry a non-human, the body of a 
thousand gold has been in a kennel-like room for half a year, the guards 
exposed their nature, spent a lot of time, and after the birth, he even 


punched and kicked his wife. In the end, the mother and the child couldn’t 
keep going. When she was five years old, she took the child home. 
Because he has already become a scandal of the nobility, he can’t close his 
door, he is unhappy for life, and he only loves his only son. 


One move|chaos, the mother of Grace was unfortunate in the rescue of the 
Queen, and before her death, she entrusted her to the mother of Xie. 


The Queen is doing her best. However, the sons of others are always very 
embarrassing. It is not easy to manage, but the management is more 
severe, as if it is harsh, and the friendship 1s unbearable; it is not good, no 
matter what, if it is less, it will become the virtue of the present. If it is not 
restrained, it will only intensify in the future. The Queen is often puzzled. 
It is clear that she has the same approach to look after her pity and grace. 
But why do the children born, the temperament differ so much? 


At this time, Xie pity suddenly remembered that there was a child who had 
been lying in the bed. He picked up the curtain and saw that the young 
child did not know when he sat up again, as if he was squatting out of the 
gap. Thanks for a curtain, he lie down again. Thanks to pity: "Is it just 
outside the quarrel, scared you? Don't care, it's none of your business." 


A royal doctor said: "His Royal Highness, the child's injury has been dealt 
with, just need to rest." 


Thanks for the first time: "There is work." 


Bend again and asked the young boy: "Where is your home? I will send 
you back?" 


The young child shook his head and said: "There is no home." 


The wind trusted his arm that was lifted up and said: "There is no home? Is 
it really a small beggar?" 


It is not impossible to see that the child is thin and small and the clothes 
are dirty. If there is no home, you can't throw him in the palace or throw it 


on the street. Thank you for your pity, saying: "If that's the case, then take 
him and come back to Taicang Mountain with me." 


Who knows, the feelings suddenly said: "He lied." 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 66: People are 
everyone 


Thanks for turning around and asking, "How do you say?" 


Mu Qingdao said: "The homeless street children in the Imperial City are 
all a group. I often come to my house to ask for food. I know all of them. I 
have never seen this child." 


The young boy snorted and snorted. Fengxin suspected: "Who are they 
looking for to eat? You? You are willing to give?" 


He admired him and said: "I am so entangled, don't you have any way?" 
Fengxin still felt incredible, did not speak, said: "Oh." 


Thank you for watching them, looking at them and laughing. He also said: 
"And there are several patches on his clothes. It must be that the adults are 
newly added. There is at least one older person in his family. Maybe the 
family is not good, but it is definitely not a child." 


Xie pity naturally never pays attention to the pin of the patch, and can't 
understand whether it is supplemented by the adults, but the empathy was 
once the affair of the emperor, and the work of the piecemeal at home was 
much more, a closer look, and sure enough Asked: "Do you have an adult 
at home?" 


The young boy shook his head and admired: "There must be. He does not 
go back. At this time, most of the family members are rushing to find." 


The young boy said: "No, no! No one!" As if he was afraid of being sent 
back, he said that he would open his arms and seemed to want to hold his 
thanks. He was still mixed with mud and blood, and the wind letter could 
not stand any more. He said, "What is your child doing? You just have to 
worry about it. Now you are not sensible. This is His Royal Highness, Your 
Highness, Prince, do you understand?" 


The young boy suddenly retracted his hand, but still looked forward to 
thanking him. "The family quarreled and was driven out. After a long 
walk, there is no place to go." 


The three faces face each other. For a long while, the wind channel: "What 
should I do?" 


A royal doctor suggested: "If you are in a dilemma, you can put him here. 
It is enough to take care of several palaces." 


For a moment, Shen Qi shook his head slightly. 


After all, he was afraid of sadness and sneaked out, and he sneaked out to 
find trouble. "I see, I will look after it first, wait for him to hurt. It seems 
that his family is afraid that he can't take care of him. Wind When the 
letter went back to deal with the stalls that had been knocked over, by the 
way, a few people looked for where the parents were, and told them a little, 
so that they didn't have to worry." 


Fengxin nodded: "Good." 


He still hung with one arm and the other hand wanted to mention the 
young boy. Thanks and smiled: "You have this injury, forget it." 


The wind letter did not take it seriously, saying: "It’s okay to break another 
one. I just folded both hands, and I can bring him up the mountain with his 
teeth and his collar." 


The feelings secretly turned a blank eye and said: "But, or I am coming." 
But he took a step, and the young child jumped out of bed and said, "I can 
go by myself." 


The color of the face resisted in the words, and the second step of the 
feelings became extremely embarrassing. I wonder if it should continue. 
Look at this little friend broke five ribs and one leg, actually still so live 
and live tiger, thank you really do not know whether to laugh or should be 
distressed, said: "Don't run around!" After that, he bent over and hugged 
him. 


The three took a child and went out of the palace gate. Because Rong Rong 
only made trouble on the street, disturbed the pedestrians, knocked over a 
lot of stalls, thanked the pity and felt guilty, and saw the people of the 
imperial city, the pedestrians were dingy, dare not show their faces, and 
clasped the path go. Along the way, the young child’s nest was very 
stunned in the blessing of his arms. He kept him silent, and he said with a 
sigh of relief: “This kid kicked me yesterday, but today it looks like this. 
Serve." 


The feelings of admiration are: "Where is the Prince Edward, naturally it 
is much more popular than the average person." 


I don't know why, even if he is a good person, the words and phrases are 
always a bit uncomfortable. The wind letter does not want to care about 
him now. After a while, the wind channel: "No. I still feel that you can't 
hold a child who is unclear in this way." 


Thanks to the pity: "What's the big deal?" 
Wind channel: "You are your Royal Highness Prince!" 


He said, he saw a broken car in front of the alley, and said, "Let the child 
drag it there!" 


The feelings immediately said: "First, I will not drag this thing up the 
mountain." 


Wind channel: "No one expects you to drag." Then he reached out and took 
the young boy out of his gratitude. Once in his hands, the young child 
began to struggle again, thanking the pity: "Forget it, forget it. This car 
may still have someone to ask!" And the wind letter has put people in the 
car. At this time, one person suddenly said: "You are this... Prince?" 


Someone immediately shouted: "Yes! It is the Prince! Yesterday his mask 
fell, I saw his face with his own eyes! It is him!!!" 


"catch him!!!" 


The three hearts were screaming. Although she did not think that she had 
done wrong in yesterday’s festival tour, she also knew that others had not 
decided the same. The break of Yue Shenwu was a great ominous sign. The 
royal aristocrats were jealous. The people passed the excitement of 
yesterday. Afterwards, they returned to the past. Asking what the accident 
represents is probably not tolerant. In addition, today, the sadness of the 
street in the streets, causing complaints, at this time if it is surrounded, it 
is not very good. I haven't thought about it yet, and I am eager to see him, 
saying: "His Royal Highness, run!" 


Fengxin also dragged the cart to urge him: "Your Highness, I broke an 
arm, can't stop these violence | people, go!" 


However, outside the alley, the people on the street had already surged in 
excitement and blocked all the way. The four people had no way to retreat. 
Seeing the innumerable eyes of the big cockroaches blocked, thanking the 
scalp and thinking: "I can't be beaten up, I won't be back!" 


Who knows, although the crowd has come up, it is not as general as 
expected, but the 17th and 8th hands stretched out, throwing him up and 
cheering in unison: "His Royal Highness!" 


Xie Pity was thrown up and down several times, still maintaining a very 
calm description. Everyone said with a sigh of relief: "His Royal 
Highness, you jumped on Shenwu Street yesterday, it is really wonderful!" 


Some people admire: "That jump is also very good! Really, I thought it 
was the Emperor Shenwu, and the goose bumps are up!" 


Someone affirmed: "His Royal Highness is not wrong! The life of others is 
a life, isn't it a life for the children of the poor people? If I do that too!" 


Someone was angry and said: "Yes. I heard someone say that the next hall 
is a bad thing. I can’t listen to it. If you fall down, it’s a royal family. ’'m 
afraid those people won’t say that. Never mind this kind of person!" 


"His Royal Highness is really what we think about..." 


From the beginning of the guilty conscience, to the hustle and bustle of the 
way, to the end, was infected by this passionate face. The crowd will 
embrace the pity and go to the street to gather more and more people. The 
wind, the feelings and the young child are far apart from the outer layer, 
completely unable to come in, can only follow the long team, followed by 
the tour | This person's mountain and sea potential is actually no smaller 
than yesterday's festival tour. Every time I have to go, I will be forced to 
go back and once again reach the top, but I will not let him down. 


Xie pity can't help but be funny, but also peace of mind: "The opinions of 
the people and the national teachers are completely opposite. It seems that 
I am right." 

When I returned to Tai Cangshan, Xizhao was burning as strong as the old. 
Passing through the tall mountain gates, on the long bluestone mountain 
road, there are people who are carrying buckets and carrying firewood to 
run up and down. They greet each other with Xie Pian, and many of them 
are surprised to see this strange. Four people and one car. The wind letter 


is holding the car, like a diligent young black cow. Xie pity and admiration 
first smiled and succumbed to death, but later it was just casual. 


The maple forest is long and the wheels are slow. When climbing, thank 
you for pushing the car behind. Because he was in a good mood, he asked 
the younger child: "Children, what is your name? What is red?" 

The young child stared at him and whispered: "I... I don't have a name." 
Thanks for your pity, said: "Have your mother did not give you a name?" 
The young child shook his head and said: "My mother is gone." 

Thank you for your pity, "Why did your mother call you before?" 


The child was hesitating for a moment and said: "Red child." 


Thanks a little smile, said: "You little name is pretty cute, then I called 
you." 


The red-red child seems to be talking to him and bowing his head. At this 
time, the twilight has come, and in the distant mountains, the lights of the 
various palaces are illuminated in clusters. Among them, the brightest is 
the highest peak of the Tai Cang Mountain, Shenwu Peak. 


The Shenwu Temple on Shenwu Peak is as bright as white, and the bright 
lights of the stars gather at the summit. Looking at it, thank you for a sigh. 


Sighing is not because of hurting, but because the scene is too beautiful 
and spectacular. Every light is a light that is enshrined in the Temple of 
God. Every lamp is the most sincere prayer of a believer. The more the 
lanterns in the temple, the stronger the mana. In order to provide a lamp in 
the Shenwu Temple of the Emperor's View, it is hard to find a thousand 
dollars. Rich, entitled, capable, affectionate, and affluent, one of the five 
must be able to enter the light. However, there are more people in the 
world who are not in the world. 


The four people stopped and looked at the glory of the glory of the ruins of 
the gods. At this moment, I heard a slightly familiar voice shouting: "His 
Royal Highness!" 


Thanks for turning back, I saw a white-faced youth rushing to him, but it 
was the goalkeeper of the Sixiang Palace. He said: "I wish the brother, 
what is the hurry?" 


I wish the brothers to see the feelings behind him, the face is slightly 
flawed, pretending not to see him, said: "The national teacher has invited, 
looking for you for a long time, now in the Shenwu Hall, waiting for you." 


Xie Li heard a glimpse of it, most of his mind was for the accident of the 
Tianhang Festival yesterday, saying: "Well, there is a brother." 


Let Fengxin and Muging first go back to Xianle Palace with red children, 
and Xie pity went to Shenwufeng. 


Outside the main hall, Xiang Ding's lingering clouds of smoke dyed the 
entire temple of the gods as if it were a fantasy. On both sides of the 
fragrant tripod, a row of long lanterns floated and floated, and the whole 


yard became a light wall. On each of the lanterns, the name and pledge of 
the lampman are written with the dignity of the end. Into the hall, the two 
sides of the main hall are also rows of rows of hanging lights. The lanterns 
for the temples are more precious than those for the temples. 


In front of the big temple, the main country teacher 1s fragrant in front of 
the statue of Emperor Wu, and the three deputy national teachers are 
behind him, admiring the gods together. 


After thanking the pity, Wei Yi owed the head and said: "National 
division." 


After several national teachers had finished worshipping, they turned back 
and signaled him to come forward. So thank you for the past, took the 
incense, and offered it with sincerity. 


For a long while, the national teacher said: "His Royal Highness, we have 
discussed a few laps, and there are only two solutions to the worship of the 
sky." 


Thanks for your pity: "Guo Shi, please." 


Guo Shidao: "The first way 1s to find the child who destroyed the 
ceremonies. I will wait for the opening ceremony, at least, to seal his 
feelings, as a redemption." 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 67: People are 
for everyone 2 


Thanks for raising his head, said: "No." 
He repeats one sentence: "Absolutely not." 


The national teacher nodded and said: "I also expected that you would 
answer this question. So, we are considering the second method." 


Thanks for the awkwardness: "Please speak." 


Guo Shidao: "This second method is that you should repent of your own 
princes before you celebrate the people of Xianle, and ask for sin from the 
sky, and then face the wall for a month." 


Thanks for your calmness: "No." 


The national teacher said, "I don't really want to think about anything in 
your face, as long as it means... cough." He suddenly remembered that this 
was still in front of the statue of Emperor Wu, and quickly changed his 
mouth, saying: "As long as there is enough sincerity Yes." 


Xie pity is still saying: "No." 
National Teacher: "Reason?" 


Thanks: "National division, I am going down today. Do you know what I 
saw? The people in the Imperial City not only did not blame the accident 
for the worship of the Tianyou, but they were very appreciative. It shows 
that our nationals feel that they choose to save the child. It is right. 


"And if you follow what you said, a right thing is to be punished as a 
mistake. What do they think? This is not to tell everyone that saving lives 
is not only a quest for a seven-level battalion, but also a reversal. Do you 


want to bear the sin? How do they think about it from now on? How to do 
it?" 


Guoshi said: "This is not really important. It is now that you must choose 
one of the two paths. There is no such thing as the best of both worlds. 
Either the child is jealous or you are jealous." 


Thanks to pity: "It is very important to be wrong. If you must choose, I 
will choose the third road." 


The national teacher stunned his eyebrows and said: "This is why... Your 
Royal Highness, I am blunt, what do you want to do with them, how do 
you think about it? They think so today, think about it tomorrow. You don't 
have to cling to such small details. Believe me, what should I do after the 
past, will not be touched by you, nor will you follow your example. It is 
more important to be careful to wait on the top." 


Silence for a moment, thank you: "National teacher, in fact, since the self- 
appreciation into the emperor, the more you cultivate, the longer you 
think, there is always an idea, not dare to speak." 


Guoshidao: "What thoughts?" 
Thanks to the pity: "Would we like to worship God like this?" 


The national teacher was speechless for a moment, saying: "They don't 
worship God, do we drink the northwest wind? It's hard to be, Prince 
Edward, do you think that thousands of thousands of believers believe in 
the official, and believe it wrong?" 


Xie pity shook his head and thought for a moment, saying: "It is true that 
you believe in nature. Only the disciples think that they should not bow 
down." 


He looked up and pointed at the magnificent and magnificent statue of 

Emperor Wu of the gods. He said: "People are flying up to become gods. 
The gods are people, they are ancestors, they are mentors, they are bright 
lights, but they are not masters. For this, thank you very much. I can also 


appreciate it, but it is not worship. Just like the Yuan Festival, I thought 
that the correct attitude should also be thanks, fun, not fear, pleasing, 
tremble, and even put yourself in the position of slave." 


The national teacher stood up and said that the three deputy national 
teachers were somewhat unable to sit still and turned back. 


Xie pity continued: "There is an accident, nothing to help. I am willing to 
give the lamp a thousand miles, and shine through the night, even if the 
moth is burning, there is no fear. But I don't want to bow because of the 
right thing. What have I done? What happened to others? It 1s like being 
evil, and punishing the evil letter is to be punished. What is the truth? If 
God has eyes, he will not sin for this. ” 


The national teacher looked away and said: "His Royal Highness, I ask 
you, if you really sinned? At that time, you apologize and do not 
apologize?" 


Thanks to pity: "If this is the case, then it is the wrong day, I am right. I 
am against the sky, against the end." 


Hearing the words, the national teacher looked slightly changed and 
smiled: "His Royal Highness, you are very courageous when you say this." 


The three deputy national teachers looked at him and talked about it. At 
this time, suddenly there was a loud alarm outside the hall. It seems that 
many bells are ringing at the same time. This time, the four national 
teachers could not sit still, and at the same time rushed out and rushed to 
the back of the temple. 


Thanks also followed, and followed them through several buildings behind 
the Temple of the Gods, to a dark octagonal hall. I saw that the black 
temple door was wide open, and countless gray smoke flew out of the door. 


The national teacher screamed and said, "Would you like?" Where did you 
die? What happened?!" 


Several guards rushed over, among them, the one who wished the brother, 
said: "National teacher! I am here! I don't know what happened, this door 
is well locked, just suddenly opened!" ” 


The national teacher pulled his hair and said: "Quickly take a new soul- 
blocking pot!" 


Thanks for the direct rush. This black hall is in all directions, with 
different sizes and patchwork of sandalwood lattices. There are various 
kinds of clay pots, porcelain bottles and jade boxes on the grid. Every 
container has been placed well. Red stopper It was tightly packed, and the 
mouth of the bottle was sealed with the yellow characters of the Zhu Zi. At 
this time, it was smashed a lot, and it was still automatically falling off the 
shelf, and the ones that did not fall were also swaying. 


The containers of these souls are sealed with a demon ghost and ghosts in 
each of them. Such a black temple, after every temple on the Mount Tai 
Cang, turns the door to suppress them with the spirit of Qing Sheng. I don't 
know what happened, but suddenly it was violently|moving, all ran out! 


Thanks: "It's too late!" 


He finished his foot and put the door on it. The original iron locks outside 
the door were broken by the grievances who broke the door. He pulled out 
the sword and the sword tip wrote a few words in the air. He took more 
than two hundred to go up the mountain, and changed his hand to wear it 
almost every day. Every one is a famous sword in the world. The sword 
was slanted on the ground, and the door really couldn’t be opened 
anymore. Only a group of grievances in the black hall could be heard. 


And the black hall was withdrawn, and looked up. On the peaks of the 
temples, black clouds were set in the black temple behind the different 
temples. Those grievances rushed to the sky and gathered in a certain 
direction. I wish An Dao: "Where is it? How do you fly there?" 


Guo Shi said: "You are fainting, there is Xianle Palace!" 


When a group of people walked in the wind, they immediately arrived at 
Xianle Peak. On the Tai Cang Mountain, countless temples on countless 
peaks fluttered with black smoke, rolling toward the other side, forming a 
huge swirling cloud array above the Xianle Palace. Guo Shidao: "What 
happened to your Xianle Palace?! The monsters and monsters in the black 
temple have been attracted. What is there in your place?!" 


Xie pity is also awkward, said: "Nothing! Only..." 
What is it? Thanks for the fierce thought: the child! 


At this time, I wish the brothers and sisters: "It is not good for the national 
teacher!! There is a fire on the side of His Royal Highness!" 


Sure enough, the corner of Xianle Palace has already burned up, and the 
fire is shining, reflecting the dark clouds above it. However, under the Tai 
Cang Mountain, the people who have not yet fallen asleep in the Imperial 
City have seen this scene. They don’t know that the big things are not 
good. They are also excited to pull people to see the strange: "Wow! The 
gods on the fairy hills practice." It’s so beautiful!” 


In a blink of an eye, the pedestrian has arrived at Xianle Palace. Thanks 
for not leaving too many servants here, dozens of people who came from 
elsewhere are struggling to get the water out of the well. Xie Pity did not 
see the two attendants, and rushed straight in. The grievances in the 
various black temples on the entire Mount Cangshan are gathered here. 
The Xianle Palace is almost dark and stretches out. Xie pity vaguely saw 
two figures in the center of the main hall, shouting: "Fengxin! Mourning!" 


The two guarded a protective array, which did not invade the evil spirits 
and supported it. Sure enough, the sound of the wind letter sounded up: 
"His Royal Highness, don't come in! This child is weird, and those things 
are coming to him!" 


Thanks to this, I noticed that after the two figures, there was a small black 
shadow, which seemed to be holding his head on the ground, saying: "Not 
me!!!" 


After a moment of observation, thank you: "You don't support it, let go!" 


Admiration: "Can't put it! If you let go, these things will go crazy, wait for 
me to find the most inside of them..." Xie Pity said: "Not afraid. Put! 
Now!" 


Mussy loves a bite, and at the same time with the wind letter to withdraw. 
Sure enough, those grievances have lost the power of containment, 
screaming all the way, going crazy! 


However, the next moment, thanking the pity for reaching out, it was like 
a lightning bolt that caught a black smoke. 


When I really didn't look at it, I smacked a black smoke directly and held 
it firmly in my palm. After he seized this grievance, the grievances of the 
entire Xianle Palace were all slowed down. 


Outside the Xianle Palace, everyone nodded secretly. 


When many grievances are still in chaos and are flowing in the same 
place, they will instinctively follow the strongest one. 


As long as you catch that one, the rest of the leader will lose direction. At 
this moment, the pity is to see which one 1s the strongest at a glance, and 
to hold it, do not give it any chance, the micro-force, this grievance is in 
his palms. 


Then, the four national teachers raised their sleeves and called: "Come 
back!" 


The group of grievances who lost their heads in the Xianle Palace seemed 
to have been chaotic for a while, and finally they were helplessly resigned. 
They reluctantly returned to the sleeves of several national teachers. 
Dozens of Taoists put out the remaining flames, and the thick black smoke 
in the temple gradually dissipated. Thanks to this, the three people looked 
at it. 


The wind and the feelings of love are on the ground, and the shock is 
undecided. Behind them, the child is still holding his head and does not 
speak. Several national teachers walked in and asked at a glance: "Where 
is this child coming from? Fengxin just said that all the grievances are 
coming to him? What happened?" 


Thanks to the pity: "This is the child who fell from the wall when Shang 
Yuan sacrificed the sky." 


The teachers of the country were shocked. Guo Shidao: "How do you bring 
him up?" 


Xie pity shook his head, could not explain, asked the wind letter: "What 
did he do to bring the grievances in the black temple?" 


Fengxin also hung an arm and stood up and said: "I don't know what he 
did! But when he went up the mountain, it didn't take long to enter Xianle 
Palace. Suddenly this pile of dark things was from another. The hills flew 
over, all of them went to the temple, surrounded him, and the more they 
gathered, the more they could go out." 


Thanks to the hope that the surrounding is burned to a blackened column, 
the pillar is the pillar, the wall is the wall of the Xianle Palace, said: 
"What about the fire?" 


The face of the feelings is all black and gray, saying: "We can't get out, we 
have to draw a line of guards. This group of grievances led to the 
candlelight, burned the gauze, and tried to force us to move out of the 
array." 


Wind channel: "Fortunately, your high-ranking princes will catch them, 
and they will catch them. Otherwise, they will burn for a while, and even 
the people will burn." 


Hearing his words, he closed his eyes and bowed his head slightly. And 
over there, several national teachers have surrounded the young child and 
looked at it in detail. 


Thanks to the pity: "National teacher, this child, can there be something 
wrong?" 


If there is something wrong, for example, being demoned by a demon 
ghost, thank you should be able to see it at a glance. In the years of 
emperor practice, he specialized in refining his eyesight, and few things 
can pass through the sea in front of him. However, he did not see any 
problems with the child. The national teacher shook his head. He should 
not be able to see it. He asked the young child: "What is your birth 
character?" 


The red-red child seems to be very alert to everyone, full of hostility, just 
swearing at him and not talking. Thank you for your kindness: "You say, 
the national teacher is going to look at you for life, it is for you." 


As soon as he spoke, the red child whispered his birthday. The National 
Teacher frowned, and the fingers began to count. A few people looked at 
him for a while, whispering for a while, and the look became more and 
more dignified. Seeing that thankfulness is getting more and more 
dignified. 


Although the National Teacher is a slick youth who seems to be only in his 
early thirties, but the most pity, his master can sit on the top of the 
emperor, how much skill. Mei Nianqing, the chief national teacher of 
Xianle, has a reputation for the word "calculation". Xie Pity and several 
national teachers learn the sword learning method, but they have never 
seen the fortune telling to the teachers of the main country. Just because 
the national teacher said that this is the technique of the rivers and lakes, 
he is the body of the prince, and he does not need to learn this, plus him. I 
am not interested in it, I have never been involved in it, but as long as the 
national teacher shoots, it is inevitable. 


Half a sigh, counted, the national teacher's forehead is getting more and 
more cold sweat, muttering: "No wonder... no wonder... no wonder the 
sacrifice of the heaven tour is ruined by him. The sorrow of the black 
temple is excited when he smells it. Le Palace is also burning, 
this...this...this is really..." 


Thanks: "How is it?" 


The national teacher wiped a cold sweat, and suddenly he retired from the 
distance of eight feet, saying: "His Royal Highness, you are really 
awkward to go up the mountain! This child is very poisonous, he is a **** 
The life of the star is extinct, the favorite thing of the evil thing, who is 
bad luck, whoever is killed!" 


The voice did not fall, only heard a scream, the red child jumped up and 
slammed into the head of the country. 


Although his voice was immature, this scream was filled with anger, as if 
he was full of endless pain and despair, and he heard all the vibes in the 
hearts of the people. This young child is clearly injured, but even tears and 
tears, it is like a red-eyed mad dog, really fierce. Several deputy national 
teachers stopped the red-red children, and the national division retreated 
backwards and retreated. "Let him go down the mountain, let him go down 
the mountain! Don't touch him. I said really, this life is too poisonous. 
Don't touch it!" 


Several deputy national teachers quickly escaping with him, and they did 
not know whether to move or not. Seeing others avoid him like a snake, 
the child stunned and beaten more fiercely. He bit his side and said: "I am 
not! Iam not!! Iam not!!!!" 


Suddenly, one hand stopped his waist and circled his body. A voice above 
his head said: "You are not. I know you are not. Ok, don't cry. I know you 
are not." 


The young child was close to his mouth, and his hands were covered with 
white sleeves on his waist. He held up for a long time, and finally he 
couldn’t hold back. The black eyes that had been rounded suddenly rolled 
down a tear and burst into tears. stand up. 


Xie pity glared at him from behind, surely said: "Not your problem. Not 
your fault." 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 68: People are 
people for everyone 3 


The red child turned sharply and threw his face in the pity, screaming 
loudly. 


This call has no words, no meaning, even crying is not, but it is creepy. If 
you don't see who you are, you can be vented as an adult on the verge of 
collapse, or a little beast that has been cut open by a knife is dying, as if it 
is his liberation only if he dies immediately, anyone can issue this. The 
sound, but not alone, should be issued by a 10-year-old child. Therefore, 
he shocked everyone. 


For a long while, the national teacher said: "I said really, let go." 


The wind letter has come back to God, saying: "His Royal Highness! Let 
go of it, be careful..." However, in the end he still couldn't bear to say it. 
Thanks for your pity: "It's okay." 


The one who wished the brothers was very concerned about the safety of 
His Royal Highness, and saw that the red-eyed children smashed the blood 
and tears on the white robes of the pity, and went to the young children, 
and said, "Children, can't!" 


Who knows, the more he pulls, the young boy yells, screams, does not let 
go, hands and feet, the more hug and tight. The three or four people who 
came up with the seven hands and feet could not pull him down. Instead, 
let him be like a little monkey, and the whole person was hung on the pity. 
Xie pity is funny, but also pitiful, holding a red child in one hand, appease 
his thin back, and raise another hand, saying: "But. Don't worry, let him do 
this." 


After a pause, I felt that the young children in my arms didn’t smoke, and 
gradually calmed down. I thanked the poor and asked the others: “There is 
no fire in Xianle Palace, no one else hurts?” 


Admire: "No. Stay in the house, just a few of us." 


Since Xianle Palace has been burned into a blackened wall wreck, Xie Pity 
can't wait any longer. 


After confirming that it was just burning the house and not hurting people, 
the people who had caught up with the peaks began to clean up the scene 
and turned to the golden residue and the blackened gemstones. They were 
heartbroken, but they did not care much. 


In addition to the exquisite things he used every day, he did not put any 
valuables in the Xianle Palace. The most valuable thing is that he collected 
more than two hundred famous swords. However, the real gold is not 
afraid of fire. These swords are all forged in the fire, and they are safe and 
sound. After personally turning them out, Xie Pity temporarily stored 
them in the Sixiang Palace of the National Teachers. 


As for the red child, he held his thanks and prayed for a while, crying 
tired, and slept. Xie Pui wanted to take him down Tai Cangshan and find a 
place to be placed. The national teacher asked him to go to the Sixiang 
Palace first, so Xie Puli took him with him. 


Put the young boy on the couch, thank you for giving him a slap in the 
corner, put down the curtain, and with the wind and the feelings retreat, 
said: "National division, the child's life, is it so terrible? ” 


The national teacher snorted: "You are not as good as yourself, what 
happened after he appeared?" 


Three people are silent. When the young boy came out, he fell out of the 
city wall and forced the three-day break of the Shangyuan Festival. Come 
out again 1s to let him out of the air to drag the ground, the street disturbs 
the people, so that the wind and the broken arm, thank the pity and the 
country conflict, the queen tears. Now, the resentment that has been 
suppressed by the entire black temple on the Tai Cang Mountain has been 
printed out, and the Xianle Palace has also been burned. If it is really bad 
luck, it will follow. 


Xie pity asked: "Is there any way to solve it?" 
Guoshidao: "Resolve? What do you mean? Change your life?" 


Thanks for your nod. Guo Shidao: "Your Highness, you don't have 
academic numbers with me, so you really don't understand this. If you 
understand, you won't ask." 


Thank you for your pity, and you are sitting in danger. "I want to hear the 
details." 


The national teacher took the teapot on the table and took a cup of tea. He 
said, "His Royal Highness, you still remember that when you were six 
years old, your Majesty and the Queen called me into the palace for your 
divination. Have I asked a question?" 


Looking at the cup of tea, thank you for thinking, said: "You mean, two 
glasses of water?" 


In those days, in order to give the Prince a pity to calculate the 
numerology, the National Teacher asked him many questions. There 1s a 
solution to the question, there is no solution to the question, thank you for 
answering a national teacher, he changed his style and praised him. He 
heard the king and the empress smile, and there are many questions and 
answers. However, there was a problem. After thanking the pity, the 
national teacher did not make any evaluation. The outside world was not 
familiar with it. Even the wind letter was not very clear, and the feelings 
were never heard. The problem is "two cups of water." 


Guo Shidao: "The two walk in the desert, the thirst will die, only the cup 
of water. The drinker is born, the drinker does not drink. If Joel is God, 
who is the glass of water? - You should not talk first, I ask others, Look at 
how they answered." 


The latter sentence is said to the two people who are standing not far away. 
Admiring the situation for a moment, cautiously replied: "Can you ask the 
national teacher to tell them, who are these two people, what is the 


character, how is the merits? You must know the roots before you can 
make a decision." 


The wind letter said: "I don't know! Don't ask me, let them decide for 
themselves." 


Thanks for the pity, the national teacher said: "What are you laughing at? 
Do you remember how you answered yourself?" 


Thanks for the smile, the color is correct: "Give another cup." 


Hearing words, the wind and the feelings turned a face, a bow, seems to be 
unable to listen. Thanks for turning back, a serious and authentic: "What 
are you laughing at? I am serious. If I am a god, I will definitely give 
another cup." 


The teacher’s hand gently waved over the cup of tea, and the tea slowly 
flowed in the cup, if there was life. He continued: "The air transport under 
this day is good or bad. There 1s a fixed number. Just like this glass of 
water, there are always so many. If you drink enough, others will not have 
to drink. One more person, Everyone else is less. Throughout the ages, all 
disputes are ultimately due to the fact that there are many people, there is 
only one cup of water, and everyone has a reason. Want to change your 
life? Although it is difficult, it is not impossible. But if you change The 
life of this child, the number of others will be changed and increased. You 
said that you want to give another glass of water, just like you said today 
to choose the third road, meaning open source, think very Beauty, but, I 
tell you, basically impossible to do." 


Listening silently, thanking the pity does not agree, but not too much 
refutation, said: "Thank you for teaching the national teacher." 


The national teacher drank the tea, and slammed it, saying, "That's not 
necessary. Anyway, you will not listen to it." 


"..." was grateful to see through, thank you, "National division, today in 
front of the Shenwu Temple, disciples feel a moment, speech collision, 
more offensive, but also look at the national division Haihan." 


The national teacher clasped his sleeves and smiled slightly. He said, "You 
are my proud disciple, and my Royal Highness, can I still have a sea 
culvert? Your Highness, I can say that you are the most unique person I 
have ever seen." 


I don’t understand what I want, thank you for listening. The national 
teacher said: "You have the talent, the ambition, the willingness to work 
hard, the hard work, the nobleness, the kindness and the benevolence. No 
one is worthy of the word of God." But I still don't trust you. I am afraid. 
You can't pass that level." 


Thanks for your pity: "Do you feel restless?" 


Guoshi said: "Although you have reached such a height, there are still 
some things that you still don't understand, and others can't teach. Just say 
that today at the Shenwu Temple, what you are talking about should not 
worship God or anything. Although it is rarely thought of this reason, you 
are thinking about it at a young age, not bad. But you should not think that 
you have been thinking about it since the beginning of the day." 


Thanks to pity, the national teacher said: "What you said today, people 
thought about it decades ago or even hundreds of years ago, but it can't be 


a general trend, the voice is small, so few people heard it, this is Why? 
Have you ever thought about it?" 


Slightly sinking, thank you: "Because those people thought of it, they did 
not do it, and they were not strong enough." 


Guoshi said: "What about you? Why do you think you are firm enough?" 
Thanks to the pity: "Guo Shi, do you think I can fly?" 


Guoshi looked at him and said: "You can't fly, no one can fly. Time is 
coming soon." 


Thanks a little smile, said: "So, please look at it." 


He pointed to heaven: "If one day, I will fly, I will definitely let everything 
I said today become the general trend!" 


The wind and the enthusiasm were behind him, and he was all in his ear. 
The two did not consciously squint. The corner of the wind and the mouth 
is slightly raised, and the bright color in the gaze is exactly the same as 
Xie. The national teacher nodded: "Oh, then I will look at it - but I don't 
think it 1s good to fly too early. I ask you, what 1s it?" 


Thanks to the poor, said: "You said, people walk on the road, that is." 


Guoshi said: "Yes. But you have not traveled enough. So, I think it is time 
for you to go down the mountain and go." 


Thanks for your eyes. Guo Shidao: "You are also seventeen this year. You 
are now allowed to go down to Cangshan Mountain and go out to travel." 


Thanks to the pity: "So just right!" 


When he was in the Imperial City, he thought that the country, the grace, 
and so on, there would be some stagnation. In addition, such a gorgeous 
Xianle Palace was burned, and it was necessary to have more 
entanglements with his parents. If you want to go further, you should 
concentrate on yourself. road. 


At this time, the National Teacher said: "His Royal Highness, for many 
years, there has been a word of mouth, which has always been taken for 
granted, but in fact this sentence is wrong, but it has never been 
discovered." 


Thanks for your pity: "Which sentence?" 


Guo Shidao: "People go up and become gods; people go down and become 
ghosts." 


Thanks for thinking, said: "Where is this sentence wrong?" 


Guoshi said: "Of course not right. You remember: people go up, still 
people; go down, still people." 


Xie pity is still chewing on this, the national teacher patted his shoulder, 
looked back and said: "In short, this child... you don't want to be too 
reassured, people have their own lives. Many times, not you want to help 
There is a way to help. If there is anything, go back and talk. Let's go out 
and have a good time. I hope that when you come back, you will grow up." 


However, everyone did not expect that night, the child escaped from the 
emperor's view overnight and disappeared. 


What is even more unpredictable is that after this trip, the 17-year-old 
Prince of Xianleguo thanked the pity and defeated the unknown ghost in Yi 
Niangqiao. In this way, he flew in the thunder and lightning. 


The three circles are sensational. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 69: Fishing 
Xian Qiang will meet Prince 


"open--" 


With a long sigh of breath, the red brocade fell to the ground. Thousands 
of people, bursting out of the sky to cheer. 


This is a statue of the Golden Prince. One hand smashing the sword and 
one hand smashing the flowers means “sitting the power of the world, not 
losing the heart of flowers”. The face of the gods is soft and beautiful, 
with long eyebrows, good lip lines, and slightly raised lips, like laughing 
and laughing. To say passionate and not contemptuous, the road is ruthless 
but not indifferent, it is a compassionate and beautiful face. 


This is the entire eighth thousand Prince Hall in the country of Xianle. 


Three years in the sky, there were 8,000 temples on the ground. Such an 
unprecedented pursuit of enthusiasm is absolutely unprecedented, no one 
after the end, a single. 


But the Eighth Thousand Temple is not the most luxurious statue of the 
Prince. On the Tai Cang Mountain, the mountain that was inhabited by His 
Royal Highness under the Prince’s Principality has now been named 
“Prince Peak”. It was there that the first Xianle Palace was built. After the 
first statue of the Prince was cast, it was also there, and was unveiled by 
the Lord. That statue of the Prince is up to five feet, and the craft is more 
expressive. The whole body is made of pure gold, which is a real "golden 
body". 


In the Xianle Palace, the pilgrims are lingering and breaking through the 
threshold. The zen ding in front of the temple is full of short and short, and 
the merit box is taller and more honest than the general merit box in the 
temple, because if it is not done bigger, it will often be filled for worship 
in less than a day. Later people I can't vote in it. As soon as I entered the 
view, there was a pool of clear water, which was also filled with coins. The 


shimmering light shimmered, and several old turtles in the pool were 
beaten by the coins of the pilgrims on the stone bridge every day. Dare to 
poke in, how the Taoists discourage visitors is useless. The high red walls 
of the palace are filled with plum blossoms, and the branches are bound 
with countless bright red blessings, a flower in the sea, the red belt 
fluttering in the wind, and the city is bustling. 


Within the hall, Xie Pity is sitting underneath his statue and overlooking 
everyone. No one can see him, but he can sit and watch the pilgrims talk 
about it: 


"Why didn't there be a futon in the temple of the Prince?" 


"Yeah, the Lord also said that you can't be jealous. This 1s all open. Can't 
you think what is going on?" 


One person said: "You are the first to come back to Xianle Palace. The 
Xianle Palace is like this. After I heard that my Royal Highness has 
soared, I dreamed of giving many temples a wish, watching the Lord, and 
saying that the other person does not have to be jealous. So, in the Prince’s 
Hall, There is no place to worship." 


Although everyone could not see him, but thank you for nodding. Who 
knows, the other few people laughed: "What is the truth? Isn't the gods 
brought in?" 


Thank you for your pity. I heard someone agree: "Yeah, you must be 
jealous. If you look at it, you will be sincere!" 


"It doesn't matter if there is no futon, let's kneel on the ground." 


So, one took the lead, and immediately, a large piece of the surrounding 
was followed by the ground. Hundreds of thousands of people crowded 
outside the temple hall, facing the gods, bowing bye, one after another, 
with words in the mouth, secretly wishing to pray. Thanks for the silence, 
he quietly hid, and said: "Well, take it slowly." 


In the next moment, countless noisy vocal waves rushed toward him from 
all directions. 


"Seeking high school! High school! This year must be high school! In the 
middle of the year!" 


"Travel safe!" 


"My girl who is fancy is looking at my brother, please make him ugly, beg 
you." 


"Fuck, I don't believe that I still can't give birth to a big fat boy!!!" 


... Ask for anything, thank you for listening to the head as big as a fight, 
and quickly compare it to a slap, to isolate the sound. Here he was quiet in 
his ear, only to hear a scream, a black man rushed out from behind the 
temple with his hands on his ears and snarled: "What are these ghosts!!!" 


The pilgrims also unaware of the appearance of this person and continue to 
bow down. Thanks apologetically, patted his shoulder and smiled: "Faith, 
hard work." 


The incense of Xianle Palace is so strong, and the pray that can be heard 
every day is more than a thousand. In the beginning, he also stormed with 
a novelty, no matter how small, and personally, and then there were too 
many people to pray, and part of it was thrown to the wind and love. 
Which ones are within his responsibilities and which ones can be ignored. 
After the two have finished, they will be screened out and given to them. 


After the love is over, he will report it to him. He never complains, but the 
wind letter can't always understand. Why do some people love to beg, and 
even the house|harmony is also coming to Xianle Palace. Xie Li is Wu 
Shen, where can I manage this kind of thing? In the long run, other priests 
have also made a lot of opinions, alluding to the fact that they occupy the 
pits. If you can't control, you still have to believe in the past. There is 
nothing to say. The hand that keeps the ear on the wind can't let go, 
although it is useless to rub the ear. He said: "His Royal Highness, why are 
you so many female believers!" 


Thanks to the hands and sleeves, sitting in the fragrant clouds, smiled and 
said: "How many female believers are not good? Beauty is like a cloud, 
pleasing to the eye." 


The wind is stunned: "It's not good at all. Female believers seem to have 
no other desires than to ask for a good son to marry a son all day. Nothing 
is serious. I saw them hurting my brain!" 


Thank you, you are going to pick up the words. Suddenly, the crowd is 
commotion. The two looked out of the temple and only heard someone 
press the voice: "The little mirror king is coming, go quickly! The little 
mirror king is coming!" 


When I heard the words "Little Mirror King", everyone seemed to hear the 
"Great Devil", all of them were shocked and stunned. In the twinkling of 
an eye, like a tornado crossing, the pilgrims who were originally 
worshipping the gods escaped seven or eight. Shun, a young man dressed 
in a cloak and a luxurious attire, holding a glass of glazed lights in his 
hands, stepped past the threshold and swayed in. I don’t look at those eyes. 
This boy’s appearance is similar to that of thanking me. When I look at 
those eyes, I feel that he is too open and beautiful, not who is sad and who 
is it? 


Today, the grace is also seventeen and eighty years old. He has opened his 
face and has been suffocated, and he has a few noble men. He entered the 
door, but he did not allow his followers to come in. He held the lamp in his 
hands and stepped into the temple. He smashed the cloak and smashed it 
on the clean ground. He lifted the lamp over his head and worshipped it a 
few times. The two men on the top of the platform looked at each other, 
and Feng Xin snorted, thanking him for understanding the impatience in 
his eyes. 


Three years ago, when Xie Li left the Imperial City to go out for a cloud 
tour, Grace was still in confinement. After returning, he did not have time 
to see this cousin. In the night of his sleep, he flew in a boom. Within 
these three years, Xie pity gave parents, national teachers and other people 
a lot of dreams, and also asked for grace once, telling him that he must be 
kind to others from now on, astringent, can not be nonsense. Therefore, 


Grace was very active in participating in the construction of the temple 
and temple, donating merits and offering lamps. 


Although he worked hard and was pious, he still got some trouble from 
time to time. He was so tired that he would go down and clean up the 
mess. Therefore, thank you can understand why the letter is impatient. 


Over there, Grace finished, and complained a bit: "Prince cousin, this is 
the fifth hundred lights I gave you. I am so loyal to you as a younger 
brother. When will you come to see me? Give me another It’s okay to have 
a dream. The uncle’s aunt also reads you tightly, and you ignore us. It’s 
really high and cold.” 


He did not find the wind letter and stood next to him to remind him: "You 
must not pay attention to him. The emperor told you that it is not a major 
incident, the official must not show the spirit in front of the mortal. The 
relatives must especially avoid." 


Thanks to the pity: "Reassured, I naturally know." 


Grace held the lamp and stood up, took a pen, and bowed down to write the 
words on the lamp. Xie and Feng Xin had a psychological shadow on him, 
and couldn't help but look together to see what he wrote. Seeing that it is 
normal, the Guotai Min'an winds and rains, not praying for a certain 
family to be beheaded at the door of the vegetable market, both of them 
breathed a sigh of relief. Looking at the grace of writing a regular rule, 
thankful can't help but think of another thing. 


When Rong Rong came home with her mother, once, a group of nobles and 
nobles accompanied the Tai Cangshan to pray. The mother of Grace is the 
one who fled back to the people. I didn’t dare to come out to meet people, 
but I also wanted to pray for my son, let him have a long experience, not to 
be in a place with his own, and become a frog at the bottom of the well, 
then he would like to call the Queen. On the face. 


Although it has been as low-key as possible, the scandal of the nobility has 
always been faster than the arrow of the wing. Which of the imperial cities 
does not know what happened to his mother and son? Therefore, the 


aristocratic children on the road consciously excluded the grace and did 
not talk to him. Thanks for seeing the swing running up to play, all the 
children of the same age played with him, taking turns to help the 
Highness of the Prince to push the swing, and take pride in it. When 
praying to the highest place, when he bowed his head inadvertently, he saw 
the sadness hiding behind the shadow behind his mother, exploring a head 
and looking up at him with envy. 


When they arrived at the Shenwu Temple, the adults sold the lights. They 
first asked the national teachers to sign, unsign, and talk, leaving a group 
of children to play in the Shenwu Temple for small lights. Grace first met 
the Queen, I do not know that the Queen has helped his mother and son for 
a trip, see those lights are exquisite and beautiful, but also want to pray for 
the lights. He is young and doesn't know much. He asks people how to 
write a blessing that wishes the mother. A few children of the same family 
with the graceful family often hate him at home. They are influenced by 
their elders and feel that their mother and son have lost their faces, so they 
deliberately deceive him. Thanks to God, I wrote my own lamp, put down 
the pen, and heard someone laughing and laughing in the back. I laughed 
very badly. When I looked back, I saw a handful of ink, and I held a lamp 
like a baby. The land is ready to be supplied. On that lamp, he twisted and 
wrote the nine words "I wish to return to heaven with my mother." 


Thanks to the scene, he fell off the lamp and thundered. 


He was not big at the time, but he scared all the aristocratic teenagers to 
the ground and did not dare to speak. After the fire broke out, Xie Pity 
personally wrote a light to Grace, and no one dared to break it. Later, when 
he went down the mountain, he went to play the swing again. This time, 
Grace ran out from behind the Queen and took the initiative to push him 
behind the swing. He was shorter than Xie, but he pushed it very hard, but 
he looked up to him below, but his eyes changed from envy to worship. 
Later, it became the tail of the pity, and all the day was followed by the 
"Celebrity Cousin". 


It must be admitted that the once gracefulness is still a relatively normal 
person, and I don’t know what is going on, the longer it is. However, in the 
past three years, there have been too many people and things to be 


concerned about, and I have no time to pay attention to the old people. I 
don’t know if he has grown up. 


Thinking of this, Grace has already finished the lamp and is ready to quit 
the temple. Who knows, retreating, but hit a person behind him. Graceful, 
awkwardly turned, and looked at it without looking at it: "What stuff? You 
blinked or stood dead and didn't know how to let it go?" 


This mouth, thank you and the wind letter both plaques, the heart said: "No 
change. Still the same!" 


Perhaps it was because I lived with my father before the age of five, and it 
was inevitably contaminated with the temperament of the city and the 
temperament of my father. Even if the Queen later patiently taught the 
grace, he was excited, in the words of the national teacher - Still "the 
original shape 1s exposed." Blocking the sadness 1s a ragged youth, twenty- 
four, carrying a simple bag, a pair of straw shoes almost no end, no dust, 
no servant. However, although the young man looked pale, his lips were 
dry and his cheekbones were slightly sunken, the facial features were very 
lenient, thin and not weak, and his eyes looked awkward. "Where is this 
place?" 


Grace said: "This is Xianle Palace, Prince Hall!" 


The man muttered: "Prince's Temple? Prince? Is this really the palace?" 
He saw the statue inside the temple, and was reflected in the clear gold, 
and asked, "Is this gold?" 


He actually saw that the palace was too gorgeous and regarded the temple 
as a palace. There was a waiter who came forward to drive away. "Of 
course it is gold. The Prince's Hall is the Prince's Temple, not the Prince's 
Palace of the Royal Palace! You don't even know where this is, where are 
the wild people?" 


That person said: "Where is the palace?" 


Grace squinted: "What do you ask for this?" 


The other party seriously said: "I am going to the palace to see the king. I 
have something to tell him." 


Grace and a few waiters laughed, and the face was scornful. "Where is the 
country, what do you want to go to the palace? See you again, you will see 
you when you say it? At the palace, you I am afraid that even the door will 
not enter." 


The man did not move for ridicule, saying: "I try. Maybe you can." 


Grace laughed and said: "Then go and try it." As he raised his hand, he 
deliberately pointed him in the opposite direction. The humanity said: 
"Thank you." He carried his back bag and turned and walked outside. 
Going to the stone bridge, suddenly stopped and looked down. Through the 
clear pool water, you can see the layers of coins at the bottom of the pool. 


The young man seemed to think for a moment, and the next moment, he 
turned over the bridge and jumped off the pool. 


He was very strong in his hands. After jumping into the pool, he bent over 
and grabbed the coins at the bottom of the pool and stuffed them into his 
arms and pockets. Because I have never seen anyone who dares to grab 
even the money of God, I can see both the pity and the wind. The grace 
was also a glimpse, and then I was so angry that I rushed to the bar and 
shouted: "I|/Fuck|! What are you doing?! Hurry up and pull him up! I am 
really fucking|!!!!" 


Several attendants quickly jumped into the water to pull the people. Who 
knows, this young man 1s a skill player, punching and kicking, but no one 
has won him. Grace is violently thundering on the top, and a group of 
people in the middle of the road are helpless. The young man took a heavy 
coin and prepared to climb the shore with his bag. Who knows that 
stepping on the moss, the soles of his feet slipped, and he slammed into 
the water and slammed into the sky. The waiters took the opportunity to 
stop him and twisted to the shore. Graceful legs are one foot, shouting: 
"You dare to steal this money!" 


When you lift your legs, the wind letter stands by, optimistic about the 
timing, and the first gear is so strong that this foot is fierce, but actually it 
is not heavy on the other side. Although she couldn't see him beside him, 
she always felt that something was wrong. It seemed that she was being 
crushed by a ghost. It was such a feeling that she was kicking seven or 
eight feet. It was a bit depressed. The young man did not know if he had 
smashed the water and coughed a few times. He said: "This money is also 
placed in the pool. Why can't I take it to save people?" 


Grace did not play very well, finally annoyed, said: "Who are you saving? 
Who are you? Where are you coming from?" 


He asked this question, but he wanted to give this young man a crime and 
invest in the prison. The young man was a solid eye and replied: "My 
name is Lang Ying, I live in Yongan, there is a drought, there is no water, 
the crops can’t grow, everyone I have not eaten, no money. There is water, 
food, money, gold statues, and money in the water, why can't we give it to 
us?" 


Yong'an is a big city in Xianle Country. Xie Pui stood up and looked 
dignified. He said: "Fengxin, recently there was a drought in Yongan? Why 
didn't I hear?" 


Fengxin turned back and said: "I don't know, I haven't heard of it. Would 
you ask me later?" 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 70: The golden 
statue will bury the bitter 


Thanks to pity: "Call him immediately." 


Fengxin and his **** in the right hand food, against the temple, and the 
feelings of the spirit went. Over there, Grace said: "It turned out that 
Yongan was running around. It was really a poor mountain and a bad man. 
Can the poor get the money of the gods?" 


Lang Yingdao: "Then I won't rob. I am now worshipping this **** for you. 
I will give him a slap in the face and ask him to give me money to save the 
lives of my hometown. Will he save us?" 


Graceful for a moment, if you say something in your heart, this person 
should not climb up the line and hold the money and run away? Then said: 
"His Royal Highness is a god, the gods are too busy to die, whoever you 
are empty!" 


Wen Yan, Lang Ying slowly nodded and said: "I don't think it will be 
reasonable. We have not asked for it, 1s it not useless? Damn it will die." 


Thanks to the shock, a Taoist said: "You, this person, said such 
disrespectful words in the temple, not afraid of heaven to sin!" 


Lang Ying said: "It doesn't matter. If you sin, you will be guilty. You are 
not afraid that he will not be saved. Are you afraid of his sin?" 


With a wave of grace, a group of waiters waiting for a long time swarmed 
up and kicked around the young man. The wind letter saw the stitches in 
the inside, and the strength of their fists and feet was changed. It was 
because Lang Ying seemed to be beaten, but he was a stunned face. He did 
not evade. He only occasionally raised his hand to protect the bag on his 
back. Grace also grabbed a handful of melon seeds and shook his legs 
while squatting. "That, give this king a slap!" It was a full-fledged wicked 
person. Hearing his self-proclaimed, Lang Ying looked up and said: "You 


are the king? What king? Do you live in the palace? Can you see the 
king?" 


Graceful mouth snorting: "I am your grandfather! You are also counting on 
seeing the lord of the country? Your Majesty, whoever has time to deal 
with you." 


Lang Ying twisted his neck and asked stubbornly: "Why didn't you care 
about me? The gods didn't care for me, and I didn't have time to deal with 
me. Who is there for me? Who should I go to? The Lord knows that 
Yongan is dead." Many people? Does the people of the Imperial City 
know? If you know, why would you rather lose money in the water than 
give us?" 


GO CO CO CO CO CO CO CO 


Although there are some reasons for this, it is really not appropriate at this 
time. Xie Pity is trying to find a way to seal the mouth of Grace. At this 
moment, a black-shirt boy hurriedly turned out from behind the temple 
and said: "What is your call to me?" 


Thank you for your help: "Come on you. Come on the prayers you 
received these days, can you hear the news of the Yongan drought?" 


The feelings are also a glimpse, said: "I have not heard." 


In the busy schedule, he blurted out: "How could it be? The refugees there 
have escaped from the disaster!" 


His tone is too calm, and his face is a bit stiff, and he is bluntly: "I am 
telling the truth, it really is not. Do you mean that I did not report it 
intentionally? Did you receive it? If there is a Yongan person praying for 
drought The Prince's Hall is a single month, I am on duty, you are on duty 
for two months, and not all drought-related blessings are gathered in a 
single month, you are not aware of it at all." 


As soon as I think about it, I think it is so reasonable. "I didn't say that you 
were deliberate. You think too much." 


Listening to them seems to have to squabble again, thanking the pity for a 
"pause" gesture, said: "Well, the wind letter does not mean this. They 
immediately stopped." 


The two immediately stopped talking. It happened that Grace finally 
looked at his hands and beat Lang Ying to look tired. He took a small bag 
and put the seeds on the shell. He said: "Take the stolen thief to the big 
prison." The servants said: "Follow!" From Lang Ying. Thanks to pity: 
"First solve the problem at hand, save this person, and then I will ask him 
about Yong'an." 


Admiration eased the color, cautiously said: "How do you want to solve 
your Highness? You can't show your spirit at will." 


After flying up, a rule that thankfulness is very incomprehensible ts this. 
The priest said that he would like to live in the same life, but he would 
have to stand on the shelf, above the sentient beings, and not to show his 
spirit at will, so that he often became very troubled. Fortunately, there are 
many countermeasures for thanking him. He does not think about it, he 
does not return his head, and he pushes it. The people in front of them 
noticed that the shadows on the ground were faintly shaking and turned 
around in confusion. The next moment, the screams screamed: "Prince 
cousin -" 


Thanks to this, it is actually to push down my god! 


The golden image of the sword and the gentleman and gentleman will not 
fall, and slowly go to one side. Graceful face seems to see the liver and 
gallbladder of the mother-in-law hanging on the stool, completely 
ignoring Lang Ying, rushing past and holding the statue of the thigh, 
tenaciously, tearing heart: "You waste What are you waiting for! Help me 
hold him! Don't let the cousin fall!! He can't fall!" 


He was heartbreaking, but he prayed and looked at him with a sigh of 
relief. He took the Prince's Palace, and his face and feelings were split. For 


a long while, Feng Xin said: "His Royal Highness! That is your god!" 


It’s like this kind of thing, the sign 1s not good, more or less will be a little 
taboo. In this way, the **** official who pushed his own image is really 
unheard of, and the three realms are wonderful. Thanks to pity: "A big 
piece of gold. Only then their attention will not be transferred. You are 
going to press the golden image, don't let them pull out, I will go to meet 
this person." 


Although the wind and the feelings are speechless, they can only listen to 
them. Standing next to the statue, one person stretches a finger and presses 
the statue. They only need to make this effort, it is enough, a few people 
make it out of the food | milk can not help, can only barely stalemate, 
gnashing his teeth: "...not true gold, two pounds really!" 


Lang Ying, who was sitting outside, saw a group of people no longer 
paying attention to him. He stared at the golden statue and watched it for a 
while. He stood up from the ground, patted the gray on his body and ran 
out with his bag. Thanks to him behind him, waiting for him to run out for 
a while, into a lush forest, looking around, just sitting under a tree to rest. 
Xie Pity hid behind the tree, pinched a shackle and turned a white trail. 


After turning the shape, he looked up and down, determined that there 
were no flaws, and that he was thinking about how to appear, but he did 
not see it, but he saw Lang Yingjun to the side of a otter beside the tree, 
burying his head and using his hands to dig a hole on the ground. 


" " 


The young palms are wide and the palms are shovel down, that is, wide 
and deep, and the pits are flying to the ground, like a lean black wolf dog. 
Xie pity was wondering why he suddenly dug the pit, but he saw that he 
wiped the dirt on his trousers, and then he took a handful of water in the 
leeches and sent it to his mouth. 


Seeing it, thank you for not being able to escape, and quickly went out, 
stopped his hand, took a kettle from the sleeves and handed it to him. 


Lang Ying already had a sip of water in the puddle, and swallowed the 
gang to swallow it. Looking at the sudden appearance of the little priest, it 
was not surprising, and he did not quit. After taking it, he drank it. Hey, all 
went down. After drinking, I said, "Thank you." 


Since it has suddenly appeared, thank you for not paying attention to any 
natural opening remarks. He tried to make the dusty sacred bones and 
trustworthy. He said: "This friend, where are you from, where are you 
going?" 


Lang Yingdao: "We came from Langer Bay in Yongan City. It was 
originally going to the palace. Now I have changed my mind and I am not 
going." 


Thank you for your pity, saying: "We?" 
Lang Ying nodded and said: "We. Me, and my son." 


The more pitiful the pity, the slightest chill in my heart. I saw Lang Ying 
untied the back pack and opened it. He said, "My son." 


The bag wrapped in his back pocket is actually a child's body! ! ! 


The child's body is very small, it seems that it is only two or three years 
old, his face is yellow, his cheeks are concave, his head is covered with a 
few thin and thin yellow hairs, and he has some scorpions. The little face 
smashed into a strange expression, and it seemed that I was crying and 
crying. It was very uncomfortable. The eyes are closed, but the mouth is 
open, but no sound can be heard anymore. 


Thanks for the sudden reduction of the pupils, the shock of the heart, can 
not speak. No wonder he always felt that this young man had a bad mood. 
It’s strange to say no, it’s not like ordinary people. Speaking and doing 
things, as if not considering the consequences at all, rampage, regardless 
of head and tail. Now it seems that this person, what are the consequences 
still need to be considered? 


Lang Ying showed him his son, wrapped his child back, and carefully cut 
the corners. Looking at his focused look, Xie pity was uncomfortable. He 
was the first to see the body of such a small child, stuttering: "You...how 
did your son die?" 


Lang Ying had a good bag and said: "How do you die... I don't know how 
to die. I am thirsty, hungry, and sick. It seems to have a little bit." 


He scratched his head and said: "When he just walked out of Yongan, he 
would cough a few times, yelling at me in the back. Then he slowly 
screamed, coughing. Then he coughed and coughed. I thought he was 
asleep. When he found something to eat and wanted to call him up, he 
couldn't get up." 


The child turned out to be on the way to escape. 


Lang Ying shook his head and said: "I will not take care of the children. 
My wife wants to know that my son is dead and will kill me." 


After a moment of silence, he said again: "I miss my wife and can marry 
me." 


His expression is always dull, like a dead tree, a dark pool, can not afford a 
little bit of life and waves. Thanks for a moment of tightness, a little sigh, 
whispered: "You...you... buried." 


Lang Ying nodded and said: "Well. I want to pick a good place. It's good 
here. There are trees blocking the sun and water. When I'm done, I will go 
back. Thank you for your water." 


He coughed a few times and bent down again, continuing to dig the hand. 
Thankful, he murmured: "No. Don't thank me... don't thank me, don't." 


At this time, the wind letter and the enthusiasm also arrived, and the two 
of them saw a digging hole and a daze, all of which were inexplicable. Xie 
Pity didn't have much mood to say, and he repeated a few words. It took 
only a long time to think about it. It was not enough to give water. This 
person had to go back to Yongan, so he reached into his sleeve and touched 


it for a long while, finally found a thing. Handed him: "You take it this 
time." 


Lang Ying stopped moving and looked at the things in his hand. It is a 
deep red bead with a small nail size. The color is smooth and smooth, and 
the magnificence is shocking. Even if you don't know what it is, just look 
at it and know that this little thing must be worthless. 


This is the only remaining pair of red coral bead earrings worn by Xie Pity 
when Shang Yuan sacrificed a three-year trip. Mu Qing is impressed by 
this bead, and his face changes slightly at first glance. Lang Ying did not 
deny it. He seemed to have nothing to do with the courtesy and concerns of 
a normal person. He reached out and said, "Thank you." 


He carefully collected the beads in his belt, took off his back bag and 
gently put it into the pit. He said, "He will come back to see you soon." 


When he finished, he used his hand to push the soil seriously and covered 
the cloth bag. Thank you for your fortune and close your eyes. After a 
while, the young man went in a big stride, and the wind shouted: "His 


Royal Highness, what is he buried? He said‘ ’? Is this buried?” 


Mudging is concerned about other things, said: "His Royal Highness, I only 
checked it, things have been clarified. Yongan is not rich in the past, the 
temple temple is less repaired, and there seems to be local regulations, no 
The worshippers can't enter the palace to pay homage, so the people who 
go to the Prince's Temple are rich, and the poor who are affected will not 


go..." 


Thank you for your pity, Shen Sheng said: "You, go to Yongan, look at the 
situation. I, go to see the national division, ask what is going on." 


His face was ugly as never before, and the second waiter didn't dare to care 
about it. He should be in unison and immediately set off. And thanked the 
pity and turned to the direction of Tai Cangshan. 


It seems that Yongan’s disaster is afraid of being big or small. However, 
even if he can't hear the voice of blessing, the palace is over, but it is 


impossible to not know! 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 71: Heavenly 
gods 


Tai Cangshan, Prince Peak. 


By this time, tourists on the mountain can no longer stay, and have been 
asked to leave the mountain gate and leave the emperor. In the Xianle 
Palace, there are more than a thousand Taoist people who are doing 
evening classes, and the four national teachers are presiding over the 
golden statues that are up to five feet. 


Inside the Prince's Hall, both sides are praying lights that line up from the 
ground to the ceiling. Thanks for falling from the sky, falling lightly onto 
the platform of God, just sitting in front of his god. 


As soon as he waved his hand, there was a breeze on the ground, and 
countless lights slowly rotated. The lights are blurred, and all the people 
have looked up, singularly, and there is a whisper. Guo Shi originally 
squatted on the chair with his eyes open and suddenly opened. He said, 
"This is the end of the day. Go back." 


The people got up and retired. Although the other three deputy national 
teachers could not see the pity, but they also guessed that something had 
come, and they retired and closed the door of the temple. When the high 
door was closed, thanking the pity could not wait to speak. He said: 
"National division, do you know about the drought in Yong'an? There 
seems to be no movement on the other side of the father's emperor. Is it 
something going on in the middle? Or is he not clear about the specific 
situation?" 


The priests must not manifest themselves in the presence of mortals, 
except in one case. That is in front of the high-level monk who 1s a teacher 
and a teacher. These high-ranking people are the spokespersons of the 
priests in the mortal world. Therefore, thanking the pity can directly talk 
to the national teacher. The rule of "the Prince's Temple cannot be 


worshipped" is that the pity is conveyed by the mouth of the national 
teacher. 


He thought that there were any special circumstances that led the innocent 
people to deal with the disaster in Yong'an, and they had no choice but to 
know that the country had not reached the point where the dead had 
reached the dead. Who knows, the national teacher said: "The Lord is still 
safe. No major events have been made, and I know very well about the 
Yongan disaster." 


Thanks for your pity, said: "Why did the father come to the emperor every 
time, I have not heard him pray for Yongan? How can I even mention it?" 


Although he did not agree with his father all the year round, he also knew 
that the lord was not a sinister king. Although self-sufficiency is the 
emperor, it is more important than honour, but it does not indifferent to 
the victims. Guo Shidao said: "This is not a matter for the Lord. It is my 
suggestion that he and the Queen should not mention Yongan when they 


pray." 


Thanks: "Why?" 
Guo Shidao: "Because it is useless." 
Thanks for your pity: "What is useless?" 


After a pause, his mind turned and he said, "You mean, because I am a 
‘ee Of war, and can't manage the drought, so it is useless to me? But you 
forgot, I am not a **** of war, I am still Prince Xianle. My nationals are 
now deeply immersed in the heat, how can I sit back and ignore?" For a 
moment, he said, "The urgent task nowadays is to treat the victims of 
Yongan. I am tired of asking you to speak to my father. What temple 
temples have been repaired, and there are too many Princes’ temples in the 
whole country. I don’t need them. There are also those golden statues that 
can be melted and funded for disaster relief. In the west, Yong’an is 


suffering from drought and water, and then a river is dug. Leading the 
water in the east, irrigate the crops, nourish the land..." 


As he said, the national teacher shook his head and muttered: "It is too 
early. It is too early." 


Xie pity said: "What are you talking too early?" 


Guoshi said: "Why do I say that you should not fly too early, do you 
understand now? Because your nationals have not yet died." 


'..." Xie pity eyes wide open, screaming and angry: "National teacher! 
You... What are you talking about? What is it... What is my nationality 
still not dead?!" 


Guoshi said: "You are already a god, but you must not forget your identity 
when you are a mortal. You can't even get rid of the dust. But you are in it, 
but you can't do anything, and only a mess." 


Thanks for sitting on the platform of the gods, the national teacher stood 
under the platform of God. It is clearly that he looked down on him. But 
when the national teacher said this, it seemed that he was the one who was 
high above. Thanks to pity: "How can you be powerless? If you do it, you 
will have a reward. It is a little bit to save a little, even if it 1s just to save 
someone, it is better than not to ask. If you are not willing to represent me 
to the father Communicate, then I will go find him." 


Xie pity Huo Ran got up, the national division grabbed his clothes and 
shouted: "Come back! Do you know why the shrine can't show the spirit in 
front of the mortal? The rules set for thousands of years, naturally have his 
reason, don't be stupid! ” 


Thanks and pity, he turned back and said, "What can I do? I can't, then I 
can't, can't, Guoshi, now in my land, many people are going to die! Isn't 
God just because it can save the people? Is it God? If I can't appear at this 
time, then when will it appear?! What is the meaning of my ascent?!" 


The national teacher grabbed him and sighed: "His Royal Highness, hey, 
Your Royal Highness. You know, what did I see?" 


Calm and calm, Shou, and pity sat down again, said: "Please say." 


The national teacher stared at him and said: "I saw your future, it was 
dark." 


Thank you for not squinting: "You may have read it wrong. I only love to 
wear white." 


Guo Shidao said: "I am afraid that you will not be able to save your 
nationals. Instead, you will be dragged down by the people of your 
country." 


Thanks to the pity: "My nationals are not like that. They can distinguish 
between big and bad. If I can't save them, it would be meaningless to stay 
in the altar." 


Half a sigh, the national teacher sighed: "While your father can't say that it 
is right, but you can't say it is wrong. You said that you have to allocate 
funds for disaster relief. In fact, your father is not dialed, you can see how 
it works. You said you have to dig the river to divert water. Look at the 
river yourself and see if you can do it." 


Thank you for your blessing, "I understand. Thank you, Master." 


After leaving Tai Cangshan, he went all the way west to Yongan City in 
Xianle Country. 


For twenty years, Xie has never felt that the sun is so hot and deadly. 
When he stepped on the first step of the land, he felt dry. The heat was 
unbearable, and everything in the air seemed to be distorted. When the sun 
is shining, the earth 1s split into pieces of broken clods, old and horrible. 
There is a deep ditch on the side of the road. It seems to be a river course, 
but it has seen the bottom due to drought. The black river bed emits a 
strange stench. After walking for a long time, he actually did not see a 
field. Maybe, but, I must have seen that it was originally a field. 


Thanks to pity and walked around and looked around, the hot wind blew 
his long hair messy, but he did not have the mind to sort out. At this time, I 
suddenly heard a person cried behind me: "His Royal Highness!" 


Thanks for the pity, seeing the two black figures rushing in, it 1s the wind 
and the feelings. Thanks for the straightforwardness: "Is there any 
information?" 


Fengxin shook the chest and clothing fan wind, said: "Yes. The whole west 
is short of water in the past two years, this year broke out. Yongan is the 
most serious here, the river is dry, the rain is not enough, the land can not 
be planted. The rich people Well, as long as you have money, you can get 
water and food from afar. However, most wealthy people have already 
moved their families to the east. The rest are either poor or unable to run." 


Thanks to pity: "The national teacher said that my father was not doing 
anything, but also ordered disaster relief. Why is it still so serious?" 


Mourning cold channel: "Put 10%, the next layer, peel one layer. Stripped 
to the end, there is no left. Naturally it is so serious. As I see it, instead of 
sending it to the locusts, it is better not to dial." 


Breathing for a moment, thankful and strong, anger and anger: "I want the 
locusts to spit out and eat them." 


Mu Qing reminded: "Your Highness, you have forgotten, this 1s not what 
you should be. The priest can not intervene in the mortal. The frozen three 
feet is not a cold day, the lord of the Lord is dedicated to human affairs, 
this is him He can't manage his duties. You still have the pledge of 
countless believers. How can you cope? You want to manage this, and you 
want to manage it. In the end, you will be tempted to get rid of it. 
Moreover, this is only a temporary solution. "" 


Fengxin used his hand to shade, saying: "If you want to cure the problem, 
you still have to have water. Otherwise, your Highness will let the national 
teacher tell the king of the country to transfer the water to the west to 
evenly?" 


Xie pity shook his head and said: "I only said this idea with the national 
teacher." 


Wind channel: "What do the national teachers say?" 


"..." Xie pity a bit, said, "Probably just can't say it. However, I have found 
that it is not very feasible. To divert water, we must first dig the river. 
However, the river will be levied on the people. I don't know how many 
years it will take, and the people will not be able to afford it." 


Fengxin nodded and said: "Also. Far water can't save the fire." 


Indulge in a moment, thanked the pity: "However, if the path of the mortal 
can't be solved, maybe you can try the path of the heavens. I heard that the 
rainer changed the previous years, and a new rain teacher was raised. 
People are very lonely. Can you come to visit and ask if you can use the 
form of rainfall? 


After the rise of thanksgiving, in addition to seeing Jun Wu, he did not 
actively visit any of the priests, nor did he deliberately draw a close 
relationship with him. He was treated equally in the psychic array. It is a 
very strange thing that he is going to visit which official. Mourning but 
said: "No." 


Thanks for turning his head, said: "How?" 


Admire the feelings: "Your Highness, I only carefully checked the details. 
In fact, in the past two years, it was not Yongan or the lack of water in the 
west, but the entire Xianle country was short of water. Only Xianle East 
relied on the sea, the lake, and the river. It's not so obvious, so it's not a 
disaster at present. But the overall water volume and rainfall are a lot less 
than before." 


Thanks to pity and big eyes, the enthusiasm continued: "If you really dig a 
river, or move the water in the east to the west by the law of rainfall, then 
Yongan may definitely ease this, but it can't be completely saved. They 
can only say that they have given a sigh of relief. At the same time, there 
will be great possibilities for the east of Xianle, and there will be drought." 


Xie pity a heart tightened, said: "And the prosperous area of Xianle and 
the vast majority of the population are gathered in the east, which is more 
than three times that of the West, especially the Imperial City. Once there 
is a drought here..." 


The wind letter also immediately responded: "The consequences are 
definitely more serious than Yongan, and more people will die!" 


The emperor nodded and looked calmly: "The resulting movement will be 
even greater." 


Taking a deep breath, thanked the pity: "So, this is what the national 
teacher said, my father has not done the right thing, but it 1s not the reason 
for the mistake. But it is a choice." 


Admire the feelings: "So, Your Highness, no one 1s coming to your temple 
to pray for Yongan. It is a good thing. You will give it to the Lord and 
choose it." 


Thank you for your pity, and I turned back. 


Along the way, everyone he saw was dark skinny, men and children were 
bare-chested, the ribs on the chest lined up in a row, clear and extremely, 
the woman had a dead skin and no eyes. Everyone didn't want to move, 
and they didn't have the power to pneumatic. Everything exudes a dying 
stench. People want to scream and escape from this dying land, and 
immediately return to the prosperous kingdom of singing and dancing. 


For a long time, he said: "You will stay here to help me, how much water 
can be shipped and how much. I think about it." 


Wind channel: "Good. You think slowly, think about telling me how to do 
it." 


Xie pity patted his shoulder and turned away. The feelings of love are 
faintly behind him: "Your Highness, you should think about it. We can 
help ten days and twenty days, but it is impossible to help one year or two, 
and we can save 100 people, but we cannot save hundreds of thousands. 


After all, you are a Valkyrie, not a water god. Even if it is a water god, you 
can't make water out of thin air. If you can't solve the fundamental 
problem, it's not a way to go down. It's a lot of money." 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 72: 
Everywhere in the world 


Hearing the words, thanking him for a slight meal, he finally did not look 
back, waved his hand and walked forward. 


Returning to the Imperial City of Xianle, Xie Pi went to the palace first. 


He doesn't know why he is going, not to see his parents. It is not only the 
fact that the priest can not manifest himself in front of the mortal. More 
importantly, the longer he is, the longer he stays from home, the more he 
does not know how to talk to his parents. This 1s all the children in the 
world. the same. Therefore, he concealed his figure, and in a palace he was 
familiar with, he turned around. He did not see the king of the country in 
other places, and finally came to the Qifeng Palace. Only then did he see 
his father and mother. 


The two screened off the palace and were talking. The queen was sitting on 
the couch and holding a golden mask in her hand, which was the one she 
wore when she went to the Yuan Festival three years ago. The face and the 
facial features of this golden mask are carefully carved according to the 
face of Xie Pity. Therefore, when she wears it, she is very veneer, and she 
does not feel different. She sees it in other people's hands, but she is 
somewhat amazed. The king of the country said to him: "Don't play that, 
let me put it on my head." 


Although the Lord and the Queen did all the rules before the people, 
however, Xie Pity saw the most clearly from a young age, and his parents, 
but a pair of ordinary couples who would also come and go. The emperor 
finally put the mask down, sat down to help the king of the country 
smashed his temples twice, and suddenly dialed his hair, saying: "Your 
hair is white again." 


Thanks for the sake of looking at it, and sure enough, his father’s two eyes 
were slightly white, and there was no more three-point old. He thought in 
his heart: "Isn't the father and the emperor went to the emperor to pray for 


a while before? At that time his hair was still black, how could it suddenly 
become white?" 


The queen took a bronze mirror to show the king. The king said: "I don't 
look at it. It will be darker before I go to Tai Cangshan next time." 


Thank you for your reaction: "His hair is not white. It is white, but it is 
black before every time I go to see me. And I listen to the believers all 
day, rushing, running very little. I took the initiative to come back to see 
them, so I didn’t realize it." 


Thinking of this festival, he was very embarrassed. At this time, I was 
very fortunate that my parents could not see him present. The Queen gave 
the head of the country to the head of the country, and counted the number: 
"I let you rest early every day, you don't listen to me, and say that I am 
reading you all day. Look at it so ugly, see the pope. I don’t want to care 
about you any more." 


The lord said: "Your emperor has grown up, his wings are hard, and he has 
ignored me." That is what he said, but he couldn’t help but sneak a peek at 
the bedside bronze mirror and said: "There is no How ugly, isn't this face?" 


Thank you for your gratitude. He did not expect that his father had such a 
side behind him, but he would be sour to say his "bad words", and now he 
couldn't help himself. The Queen is also like, laughed and said: "Good, not 
ugly. The body is bigger than the sky, rest early today." 


The head of the country shook his head: "The rest is not allowed. This 
time, a lot of Yongan people came to the imperial city. Come here, it will 
be everywhere, it will make people feel heartbroken and tricky." 


It turned out that his father's hair was because of the drought in Yong'an, 
and he couldn't tell the uncomfortable feelings. The Queen nodded. "I 
heard the child say, he also met a Yongan person today. It is said that he 
would steal money in the temple, so scary." 


The lord condensed the sacred man: "Yeah, swearing. It’s okay to come to 
dozens of hundreds, but in case they have more than a hundred thousand 


people, all of them are in the imperial city, and the consequences are 
unimaginable." 


The Queen hesitated for a moment, saying: "That may not be the case. If it 
is the rule of duty, come over and come over." 


The king of the country said: "How can a king of a country take the risk of 
‘not necessarily?’ and they must never come over. It is not so simple to 
raise a few more people, it is so complicated. You don't know, don't say it." 


Queens said: "Well, don't say it. You said this, I didn't understand it. If the 
emperor is still there, at least I can worry about you." 


The lord shouted again: "He? What can he do? It would be nice not to give 
me any trouble." 


When he mentioned the pity, he seemed to have come to the spirit and 
said: "I will not say that you are a royal, a teenager, and he is like a 
princess. He knows it is useless, and he is annoyed. He still Fly well in the 
sky, don't know the best, do his own thing, now he 1s not a prince, the 
world is not his business, love flying to let him fly enough." 


Thanks for listening to his father’s countless numbers, the Queen smiled 
and pushed the head of the country: “You know now that he is a princess. 
Isn’t the princess still raised from childhood? I still want to beat me. "Isn't 
it?" said and sighed again. "This child is good, just don't go home. It used 
to be like this in the emperor's view. It won't come back for a few months. 
Now it's soaring, it's even worse." I can't see one year. I don't know when I 
can see it." 


When she complained, the king of the country turned his back on his 
thanks: "What do you know about the woman? The national teacher said 
that the rules of heaven are like this. How can you treat him as a mortal? 
You call your emperor back, not to drag him. Back legs?" 


The Queen was busy: "I just talked casually. I will not presuppose this 
requirement in front of him." She said to herself, "Look at the statue is 
also good, almost, his statue is everywhere. "" 


After reading this for a long time, Xie pity chest sorrow and grief, what 
seemed to be stuffed in the throat, the stalk was extremely uncomfortable, 
only I felt that I could not stay. But he can't appear again. Not afraid of 
breaking the rules, but he did not know what to say. For Yong'an, he can't 
give any good solutions for the time being. It suddenly appears, and it will 
only make parents feel helpless. 


He quickly withdrew from the palace, went outside, and took a few deep 
breaths, which calmed his mood. Set the mind, cheer up, and think that 
sigh is not as good as action, pinch the shackles, turn a shape of a plain 
clothes, ran in the Imperial City, and measured and recorded around. 
Going east, he was busy for a day, and he finally got a definitive answer. 


The water surface of all rivers and lakes in the city of Xianle is really 
lower than before. During the Emperor's view, he sneaked down the 
mountain several times and rafted through the Lehe River, the largest river 
running through the country. At that time, the water surface was only 
slightly shorter than the embankment, but now it 1s a few feet shorter. . 
Moreover, the residents of the city have long been like this, not the recent 
situation. Xie pity did not pay attention to it before. At this time, I noticed 
that all kinds of signs were shocking. He originally expected that the 
information on the facts was wrong, so he personally came to confirm, but 
now he has to admit that the feelings are still not letting him down. 


After confirming this fact, thank you for standing on the bank of the river, 
thoughtfully. From time to time, pedestrians walk past him, or smile nod, 
or curious, and more are happy to do their own things. I don't know how 
long I have stood, the clouds are gathering in the sky, and it is dripping 
around. It is actually a light rain. 


The pedestrians on the road looked at the sky and said: "It's bad luck! It's 
raining, hurry back!" 


"Yeah, hate!" 


The raindrops replied, hitting on the face and on the body, he reacted and 
said to himself: "It's raining?" 


The people of the imperial city are raining and avoiding it. Heaven knows 
how many people are thirsty at the other end of the country. I am so happy 
to come to such a heavy rain. Several people ran across the umbrella, 
seeing the pity and the rain, pulling him a hand, urging: "This little path, 
you still don't run? The rain is getting bigger!" 


Thanks to the pity, he ran up and ran to a long house. The few people took 
the umbrella and laughed at each other. "Fortunately, I went out to see the 
cloud with an umbrella today, or I will change the soup." 


"It’s been raining for a long time. It’s just a long time, it’s big.” 
"Oh, look, it’s really big! It’s going to be raining!" 


The raindrops fell to the ground and shattered. These people's accents are 
very gracious, and even more grateful to understand, here is where he was 
born and raised, these are his familiar people. 


Chatting and chatting, the rain gradually became a little smaller. Several 
people said: "Hey now it’s a little small, hurry up!" After that, they all 
went out of the eaves, but they still stood still. Several people looked back 
at him and discussed a few words. One person came over and handed him 
an old umbrella in his hand. He said with politeness: "Is this little 
roadmaster unable to go back? I think this rain is still a little big. If you 
want this umbrella, take it for you." 


Thank you for your return, and said, "Thank you. What about you?" 


A few people in the rain in front of the tunnel said: "We still have 
umbrellas, we can squeeze, go and go!" 


Listening to the companion urged, the man ran into the umbrella and 
thanked him. A few people stepped on the water, and Xie Pity held the 
umbrella and stood for a while. Suddenly, he saw an inconspicuous little 
temple not far from the front, and he propped up the umbrella and walked 
forward in the rain. Going to the front, see the front and back of the small 
temple, the two sides of the couplet are written "In the infinite" and "the 
heart in Taoyuan", and finally confirmed that this is a Prince's Temple. 


Between the three years, there are 8,000 palace views. Naturally, it is 
impossible for every one to be as gorgeous as the one on the Cangshan 
Mountain. The bloggers are amazed, and many of them are folk grassroots 
who have built up to make up the fun. There is no merit box, no temple 
wishes, only a clay statue, a few plates for some snacks and fruit. If you 
are interested in cleaning up occasionally, you can be a temple. 


Hidden in this inconspicuous corner is such an inconspicuous Prince Hall. 
Still not in, thank you to see the statue of the Prince who can almost be 
said to be embarrassing: the bells and whistles of the clothes, the white 
face, the silly big smile, is a big doll. If it is not a matter of heart, he must 
have laughed out. 


In the past three years, the prince who has seen the pity has not said that 
five thousand and three thousand. I have never seen a prince who is 
exactly the same as himself. The most like is only seven points. The rest is 
not too ugly or too beautiful. . Most of the other priests are too ugly, but 
the other is just the opposite. Some are beautiful and beautiful, and he is 
embarrassed. He didn't look at the clay statue carefully. He swept it over. 
Who knows, but in this eye he caught a slap in the snow, and the line of 
sight swept back. 


The left hand of this rough clay statue is holding a bunch of white flowers. 


The petals are white, with a little crystal dew, delicate and delicate, and the 
fragrant fragrance floating in the air is very cute. The standard posture of 
the celestial prince is "a sword in one hand and a flower in one hand". 
However, the flower of the left hand is of course a golden flower, a gem 
flower, a jade flower, which is the first time you see it. If there is a real 
flower in his hand, he can't help but get closer. 


When he looked closely, he discovered that the left hand of this clay 
sculpture prince should have taken a mud flower. But I don't know if the 
master of the statue is poor, the flower is lost, or it is taken off by a 
mischief. Today, there is only one small hole left in the left hand. The 
bunch of small white flowers is just inserted | in this small hole. If anyone 
specifically picks up to fill the left-handed vacancy of this clay sculpture, 
it is really heart-warming. 


Just thinking of it, thank you for hearing a rush of footsteps. He didn't look 
back. He first concealed his figure and took the umbrella and flew it to the 
platform. Then he turned and looked down. I saw a young boy in the gray 
rain outside the temple. 


The boy was only twelve or three years old, soaked in his body, his body 
was dirty and old, and his face was a dirty bandage. The right hand 1s 
firmly on the left fist, as if protecting something. After rushing into the 
temple, he slowly opened his hands. 


A bunch of small white flowers bloomed quietly in his hands. 2k novel 
reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 73: Everything 
in the world 


Thanks for thinking about something, and gently snoring. 


The face wrapped around the layers of bandages inevitably reminded him 
of the little child he met three years ago. But he 1s also not sure. 
Pessimistically, after the young child escaped from the Cangshan 
Mountain, can he still live for another three years? 


At this time, the boy came over, picked up his toes, took off the flowers in 
his hand, and put on the bundle in his hand. Thanks to pity, sitting on the 
platform of the gods, I can see clearly that the newly replaced bouquet of 
flowers, the petals are more delicate, full, watery, and the aroma is more 
mellow, must have been just picked. Could it be that he came to this 
humble temple every day and put a bunch of freshly picked flowers on the 
left hand of this clay figurine? 


Moreover, after the flowers were given, the young boy stood under the 
statue of the clay prince, and he closed the palm of his hand and prayed 
silently. He did not scream indiscriminately like other people, and he 
really listened to the words of thankfulness. 


Three years. So many believers who have visited the pity, there are nobles 
and nobles, there are celebrities in the world, and there are shocking 
talents. However, it is such a 12-year-old child that Xie Li really feels 
"intentional". Moreover, it is a child who is dressed and chilled, and those 
who are not allowed to enter the golden temple, so they can only go to the 
grassroots temple to pay homage. 


This is really not a taste. 


At this time, there was a rush of water on the doorstep of the temple, and a 
group of children supported the umbrella and rushed. Originally, I thought 
that they were just passing by. Who knows that this group of teenagers ran 


back and ran back, as if they had discovered something unusual, clapping: 
"Wow, wow, ugly and ugly!" 


This group of teenagers is similar to the young believer in the temple, but 
all of them are taller than him. It seems that they are well-fed by their 
parents. Probably the festival is approaching, wearing new clothes and new 
shoes. They stepped on the water at the entrance of the temple, and the 
smile was innocent and lively, without a trace of malice. It seemed that 
they did not feel that "ugly and ugly" was a bad word, and they did not feel 
that their words hurt people. They just really felt so funny. The boy 
clenched the fist, but the fist was too small, no shock, and shouted outside 
the door: "The ugly ugly is going to sleep again today, be careful to go 
home and your mother killed you!" 


Thank you for frowning. One of the eyes exposed under the boy's bandage 
was covered with bloodshot eyes, and the fists roared: "I don't have a 
home!! I don't have a mother! She is not my mother! It's rolling! Rolling! 
Call me to kill you!!!" 


The children were afraid of it, and spoke up: "You dare to beat us, be 
careful, let us tell you again, let him teach you." 


Some of them are squinting and say: "Yeah, you don't have a mother, 
because your mother doesn't want you. You don't have a home, your family 
people dislike you. So you can only be in this temple..." 


When I got here, the boy suddenly yelled and rushed over. 


Although he was small, his momentum was full, and he violently 
screamed and scared several children to run. However, the boy who was 
twirling with him shouted: "What are you afraid of! We have many 
people!" So they all came back, seven hands Go to him and beat him. 
Thanks for the pity, I couldn’t stand it anymore. With a wave of hand, a 
sudden burst of power in the air separated the two children. Immediately, 
the ground flew up a splash of water, and the group of teenagers smashed. 


After all, it was a child, who was inexplicably slammed into a weird fight, 
and took a sip of dirty mud. The new clothes on the body were all wet, and 


they became dirty and ugly than the objects they laughed at. Wow, I cried, 
got up from the ground, cried and grabbed the umbrella and ran away. 


Xie pity shook his head. He is a **** of martial arts, a devil and a devil, 
and keeps his line safe. He is the first to intervene in this kind of child 
dispute. Even if he runs away from the bad side, he has no sense of 
accomplishment. He looked back at the boy and gave a slight glimpse. 


In the chaos, the bandage of the boy was pulled off halfway, and the half of 
his face was covered with bruises and purple, apparently not being beaten. 
Xie Li had not had time to look at it, he wrapped his bandages in a hurry, 
holding his knees and sitting at the feet of the clay statue. 


Thanks for coming to this Prince Temple, the intention is to be close, to 
gather the wind and the feelings here, to order the deliberation of the 
matter, who knows that met such a child, could not help but care, after the 
completion of the call, they le next to Staring at him. After a while, the 
voice of the boy’s belly came. There are several fruit snacks in the plate. 
Although I look at it, it is not delicious, but it is better than nothing. 
Thanks to pity, he chose one and gently dropped it on him. 


The boy was shackled by the fruit, and his hands clenched his head, 
huddled together, showing a defensive posture, as if a stone was thrown 
onto him, and there would be more stones coming soon. For a long time, 
looking around, I found that it was just a fruit, and there was no second 
person present. He hesitated for a moment, picked up the fruit, wiped it 
twice on the clothes, put back the offer, and actually refused to go hungry. 
Eat the dishes in the dish. 


Then he went to the door and looked at the heavy rain outside the temple. 
He seemed to want to go out and find something to eat. But the rain was 
too big. I didn't want to shower anymore. Then I came back and slept down 
at the feet of the clay statue. 


At this time, the wind letter and admiration arrived. The two turned out 
from behind the temple, and the wind was depressed: "His Royal 
Highness, where did you find a small Prince Temple? Why are you here to 


order?" A bow, suddenly saw a group of people shrinking to the ground, 
almost Stepping on it, blurt out: "How do you have a baby?!" 


Mu Qing also bowed his head, carefully looked at his eyes and 
immediately asked: "His Royal Highness, is this child who ran from Tai 
Cang Mountain three years ago?" 


Xie pity shook his head: "I'm not sure. I don't know what his name is, and I 
don't know what his face looks like." 


The trio said a few words around a child who was unaware of the fact that 
the boy was tossing and turning on the ground and wiping his face. It was 
actually bleeding from the corner of the mouth and nose. Seeing it, thank 
you more and more, he felt that he could not let him continue to lie down. 
He said: "Let the child leave first. The sky is dark, this temple is not a 
good place to spend the night." 


Wind channel: "Is there a place to go? If so, I am afraid I can only stay 
here." 


Thanks to pity: "He has a home, but the family may not be very good. But 
the temple is not good. Just leave before you can find him. This child is 
still hurt." 


Enthusiasm said: "Your Highness, I am blunt, there is no such thing as a 
small thing. You call us, but what decision?" 


The priest of Heaven’s court, no one has ever received all the prayers of all 
believers. It is necessary to know that there are thousands of believers in 
the world. Everyone is in charge. It is not bothersome and annoying. 
Therefore, sometimes one eye closes one eye, and some insignificant or 
subtle prayers pretend not to hear, and many can be saved. trouble. 
However, it is probably too late to be too young and energetic, and it 1s not 
yet time to recognize this flexibility. He thought about it, carrying the 
umbrella that the passer-by gave him and went outside the small temple. 


Thanks for the slow opening of the umbrella, the raindrops slammed on 
the umbrella. The boy on the ground heard the voice, thinking that 


someone was approaching and moving slightly. But I may think that 
someone came or not, and lay back. Thanks to the open umbrella at the 
door, the boy’s voice never disappeared. It’s finally strange. When he got 
out and saw it, he saw a red umbrella slanting on the ground in the rain, as 
if it were a lonely red. The flower was immediately stunned. 


Seeing that the boy rushed over and picked up the umbrella, he said: "His 
Royal Highness, you can do it at this step. If you do it too clearly, he will 
discover more." 


Who knows, thank you have not answered, then the boy rushed back, 
screaming behind them: "His Royal Highness!" 


The three people were shocked and looked back. I saw the boy holding an 
umbrella, red-eyed, excited, and shouted to the clay statue: "His Royal 
Highness! Is that you?!" 


The wind believes that he had helped him to drive away a group of 
children and lost his fruit. He said: "This child is quite agile, but he was 
discovered by him." Muqing seems to have guessed the prospect, and 
looked at the pity. . 


The boy said: "If you are here, please answer me a question!" 


Sitting on the altar above the high, thank you for hearing countless times 
every day, "Please show your spirit." Any sound will be numb if you listen 
too much. However, whenever he hears such a voice, he still can't help but 
pay attention to it and stop for it. Admiration reminded me: "His Royal 
Highness, I don't care." 


Thank you for your words. The teenager held the umbrella tightly in his 
hands and gritted his teeth: "I am very painful! I want to die every day, I 
want to kill the people of this world every day, and then kill myself! I am 
very miserable. !" 


A 12-year-old child shouted out loudly, and the picture was really 
ridiculous and pitiful. However, in that little body, there was an explosive 
thing that supported his anger and embarrassment. 


Fengxin frowned: "What happened to him? Killing the people in this 
world, is this what the children will say?" 


The feelings are faint: "It's too small. When he grows up, he knows that 
what he has experienced is nothing." 


When he paused, he looked at the pity and said: "There are too many 
people in the world who are suffering. Just say Yong'an drought, which 
Yongan people are not more painful than him. Your Highness does not 
have to care. What to do." 


Thankful and whispered: "Maybe." 
The pain of one person 1s probably a trivial little worry for another person. 


The young man looked up at him. One of his eyes was very red, but he did 
not shed tears. He held an umbrella in one hand and stretched out with one 
hand. He grabbed the clothes of the clay statue and asked, "Why am I still 
alive in the world? What does it mean?" 


Silence for a long while, no one answered, the boy seems to have already 
expected this result, slowly lowered his head. 


Who knows, suddenly, a voice broke the silence and sounded above him: 
"If you don't know how to live, then live for me." 


Thanks to the kindness and admiration of the pity, he did not expect that he 
would answer it, and it was still the answer. They all looked up and said, 
"...His Royal Highness!!" 


The boy jerked up, but did not see anyone, only heard a soft and squeaky 
voice from the clay statue: 


"I don't know how to answer this question. But if you don't know what it 
means to live, then it's better to think of me as that meaning." 


The face of the wind and the feelings of the love were split, and both 
reached out to block the pity of the pity, and shouted: "Don't say your 
Highness! You have violated the rules! Violation!" 


Before being caught by them, Xie pity still rushed and shouted: "Thank 
you for your flowers! Very beautiful, I like it very much!" 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 74: Rain is 
hard to ask the rain teacher to borrow rain 


The boy was completely stunned. 


The wind and the sympathy of the two people can't wait to give birth to the 
seven hands and feet to block him. It is easy to drag down the pity, but 
they will wave the two of them, saying: "Know it! Don't say it! I know If 
you violate the rules, you all pretend that you haven't heard it. As long as 
you don't say it, no one will know it. Only once. Don't say it, hear it?" 


Mu Qing looked as if he was forced to eat the expression of a sock, 
shaking his head and muttering: "How come you will be like this... Just 
say "I live for me", really..." 


Thanks to pity, I didn’t think there was anything at all. When he said this, 
he felt that there was something, and he had a big red face. Feng Xin 
immediately said with a face: "Oh, your high school can't say anything, 
what do you do?" But he twitched. Xie Pity can't stand it any longer, and 
argues: "What do you do, my words are very useful. Look." 


The boy sat for a while and didn’t hear the voice of thankfulness again. So 
he rubbed a few faces, took off the table and held it in his arms, began to 
eat the dried fruits and snacks, chewed and chewed. , eating a small animal 
like a pitiful and fierce. Thanks for bending over to look at him, showing a 
smile, to the other two people: "You see, useful. He just didn't eat, now 
eats." 


Admiration: "Walk, useful. You are a god." 
Feng Xin also said: "Yes, useful. You are a god." 


" " 


Thanks to the righteousness: "Yes, I am God. Call you, really because I 
have a decision." 


When I arrived here, I was relaxed and relaxed in a moment. The wind 
letter asked: "How to do it?" Mu Qing said: "Is it still?" 


Thanks for your pity: "The tube. It's very simple. If the water in Xianle is 
not enough, go to a country other than Xianle." 


Suspicion: "Going to other countries? Is it too far? I am afraid to borrow 
some magical methods of water law, and the officials of other countries in 
the town may not be willing." 


Xie pity naturally took this into consideration, saying: "I will try it first. It 
is better than doing nothing. You should stay in Yongan first, first in a 
serious place to help the disaster, I will go back to heaven, is there a 
problem? ?" 


Wind channel: "No problem. I am standing behind." 


When I thought about it, I asked, "What about the pledge of the believers 
in the Prince's Palace?" 


Thanks to pity: "This is also what I want to say. You only need to be eager 
to solve it, and solve it for me. If it is not very important, you can suppress 
it." 


Although the feelings are not very optimistic, but still said: "You are your 
Royal Highness, listen to you. However, I suggest not to press too long." 


Thanks for taking a shot of the shoulders of two people, the wind and the 
love of the line, this will retreat. In the land of the small temple, there is 
only Xie Li and the child. Thanks for walking out of the temple, looking 
back and looking back, no more stay, went straight to Xianjing. 


He was originally scheduled to visit several water law priests, but the 
strange thing is that the first few happened to be in the Jingjing House, 
leaving only one rain guard, not the Xianjing. Xie Li was in a hurry on the 
streets of Xianjing. He walked over and came over with a black female 
civil servant carrying a few files. He said, "You can count it as your Royal 
Highness." 


Thank you for your help: "Nangong, you are coming right, you know 
where the rain guards are?" 


The black girl named Nan Gongjie is a lower-level civil servant in the 
lower heaven. After the blessings, many miscellaneous things were handed 
over and handled by her. Therefore, people are well-informed and do 
things well. Thanks to her, she is very fond of her. Nangong Jiedao: "The 
Rain Master has not yet built a good house, and temporarily resides in the 
Southern Rainmen." He was pointed to the location of the Yushi residence, 
and said: "What do you want to find the adult?" 


Thanks for the pity: "Immediately, thank you." Just wanting to leave, 
turned around again, coughed, and embarrassedly said: "Namong, you are 
familiar with these gods in heaven, can you tell me, Rain Master has 
Nothing...something you like?" 


Generally speaking, after a new priest is soaring, the savvy one will visit 
all the temples of the priests who are in the same position and give gifts. 
This is to give face. This is almost an unwritten rule, but thanks to the 
sudden rise of the flight, no one led him to teach him when he first went 
up. Later, after the National Teacher reminded him, one has already 
missed the best opportunity, and the delivery is very awkward. Secondly, 
this kind of thing is inevitably reminiscent of human greed. The official 
walks behind the door. As a prince, thankfulness is not good. In the end, I 
decided to let it go, and there will always be opportunities to draw closer 
to the immortals in a sincere and legitimate way. 


At the beginning, the posture was beautiful, but now I am in the opposite 
direction. I take the initiative to ask a priest who likes something, as if to 
prepare for bribery. However, there is no way to do this. The few people 
who lived in Jingjing had spoken at the Tongling Array at least. What 
conditions can be discussed? The rain teacher did not have any 
intersection at all. The first time he visited the door, Xie was always 
embarrassed to think that he wanted to borrow the magic weapon. 


Nan Gongjie immediately understood, said: "Hey, I am afraid that I can't 
help the highness of my highness. The rain teacher is a low-key person, let 


alone me. I am afraid that no one in the whole heaven knows the private 
preference of this adult. Live it." 


Thankful face 1s a bit red, said: "Nothing, don't worry, thank you." 


Nan Gongjie said again: "However, if you have something to look for, you 
may wish to visit directly. According to the temperament of the 
rainmaster, you will not see you." 


Thanks again, thank you again, as she pointed out, all the way south, came 
to the temporary residence of the rain teacher. 


It was a small village with green mountains and beautiful scenery, but he 
was completely unintentional. Walking through the fields, I finally saw a 
stone tablet engraved with "rain." It is reasonable to say that after the 
passage of this monument, it is the site where the rain guard temporarily 
resides. The activities here should also be subordinates of the rain teacher. 
But Xie pity walked all the way, the four fields are green fields, there are 
roaring cows in the fields, there are waterwheels with bones turning, there 
are hard-working farmers, there is a crooked thatched cottage on the edge 
of the field, there is no fairy. The image of the wind tunnel bones makes 
Xie pity simply suspect that he has gone the wrong place. Isn't this just a 
broken farmhouse village? 


Just as he doubted, the black cow in the arable land suddenly screamed and 
screamed. The man stood up, the two front stalks stretched, and he took 
the plow himself. The strong body is getting narrower and narrower, and 
the long cattle nose is getting shorter and shorter. In a twinkling of an eye, 
it turned out to be a red-breasted black cow and turned into a shirtless 
farmer. 


The farmer was tall and strong, his body was well-defined, his face was 
hard, his nose and the cow were wearing a bright iron nose with a grass in 
his mouth. The rest of the farmers saw this change in the eyes of the 
people, but they still continue to work as usual. Thanks to this, it is certain 
that there is no mortal here. Going forward, holding the fist: "I would like 
to ask this Taoist friend, is the Yushi adult temporarily staying here?" 


The farmer who turned into a black cow pointed to the shore and said, 
"Hey. Rain Master, I live there." 


Thanks to seeing it over and over again, I finally determined that the 
direction he pointed to was only the thatched cottage that seemed to be 
able to fall and the rain would leak. 


Even his most chilling grassroots prince temple, compared with this 
cottage, is also more decent. Thank you for your pity. People say that the 
rainmaster is flying like him before him. It is the descendant of the Yushi 
nationality. It is because of this that he did not bring his rare gems directly 
as a gift, and wanted to feel the feeling of this kind of thing, the rain 
teacher and him. The same, it will not be rare. Why will it fall behind after 
flying? Probably, it is also a way of cultivation. 


His rituals were not short, thanked the farmer, approached the hut, and 
sang in the outside: "The rain sorcerer, the prince of Xianle, thanked and 
pity, and did not inform in advance, please forgive me." 


There was no sound in the room, and the farmer dragged the plow and 
went up and said, "Oh? You are the 17-year-old Prince of the Virgin?" 


Thanks for your pity: "Hey." 


The farmer said: "There is nothing to be true, the truth is. However, the 
rain master does not like to see people, and he has been injured recently. I 
am afraid I can't come out to see you." 


Thanks for listening, I was disappointed, but I still hold the heart of my 
test: "Can you please send a message on your behalf? If you have 
something to do with it, if the rainmaster listens, there is inconvenience, I 
will never reluctantly." 


The farmer smiled and said: "I don't need to tell me, we all know what you 
are doing. Xianle has no water, and the taste is not so good?" 


Hearing words, thank you for a moment, said: "Do you know the affairs of 
Xianleguo?" 


The farmer said: "Of course I know. Not only do we know that these nests 
are poor in the ravine ditch. You know that the country is very difficult. 
Who else is not clear today? You don’t know what you are, but others stare 
all day long. You are more clear than you, maybe you are still happy, haha. 
Are you asking the rain guard to borrow the magic weapon to help with the 
disaster?" 


It was said by his words that Xie Pity was aware that the **** officials in 
the heavens were not all right, but they were clear to him, deliberately 
closed their doors, or had long since avoided. Drowning. He sighed and 
thought: "Is it really necessary to visit every big temple at first, and to 
meet in the future?" I was a bit frustrated and whispered: "This is the case. 
If the rainmaster is an adult." Inconvenience, never entangled in the next." 


The farmer said: "Why don't you entangle? Do you want to face? This is 
you|National survival, you shouldn't be stalking? You can't stand it if you 
let go of the body? Young people can't stand it. It’s irritating. It’s not good 
to say that Rain Master is helping you. It’s a duty not to help you. If you 
are in a good mood, don’t lend it to you and you won’t complain.” 


Xie Li knows that what he said is justified, but it is already awkward, and 
the tone is not very friendly. It’s a little bit of rushing, and it’s righteous: 
“T’m clear about what you said, and I’m definitely not Back to the ground, 
why do you want to imagine me in advance? I said that I won’t be 
entangled, but I don’t want to be in vain, but I also let the Rain Master be 
embarrassed. But if the Rain Master is not embarrassed, I can borrow it if 
I am entangled. The magic weapon is to let me confuse the eight thousand 
palaces, and then it is difficult to slap you one hundred heads?" 


The farmer laughed and said, "Is it angry? The child is tempered. Then!" 


He lost it, thanked him for his hands, and received a cyan bamboo raft, the 
one that the farmer had originally carried on his back. Thanks: "Is this?" 


The farmer said: "What you want to borrow. Before you come, the rain 
master will let me hand it over to you. Be careful, let us break you, we 
can't spare you." 


Thanks to pity, he said, "Why?" 


The farmer said: "Why didn't you say it? Lending you is in a good mood. 
Other **** officials don't borrow you. Rain Master is going to lend you. 
What the rainmaster wants to do." 


Thanks for your voice: "Thank you! Thank you!" 


The farmer said: "You don't be too happy, Prince Edward. Although the 
rainmaster is flying faster than you, the believers are not as much as you, 
the mana is far less than you, plus the injury, except to borrow this. 
Something for you, the rest can only rely on yourself. Far from being able 
to hydrolyze thirst, this rain teacher can only move rain, can't make water. 
The water of Xianleguo is not enough, can only go to other countries. To 
borrow, other countries are not determined, only the Yushi country is 
redundant all year round, but there is still a surplus. But this mountain is 
long and watery, every time you use it will consume a lot of mana, you 
have more mana, after all, there is exhaustion." 


It’s clear that thanking you, it’s not easy to lend your magic weapon to 
irrelevant people. He was deeply involved in the thatched cottage, saying: 
"The rainman is willing to help, and it 1s very grateful. I don't thank you. If 
there is a place I can help in the future, please ask the rainmaster. Despite 
the dispatch. Leave a message!" 


He borrowed the magic weapon. When he found a lake in the south, he 
took a lot of lake water and crossed the miles. He returned to Xianle 
Yongan and found the most arid village, Langer Bay. Turned over the fight. 


When it was time, there was a light rain in the sky. Xie pity jumped into 
the clouds, and the feet touched the ground. Those villagers who were half 
dead and unwilling to believe, some rushed out the door to go to the rain 
and cheered, and some hurriedly pushed the big basins and wash basins to 
wash the rain. 


Seeing it, thank you for a sigh of relief, this shows a smile. At this time, I 
heard a voice and shouted: "His Royal Highness!" 


As soon as he turned around, he saw his face half-faced and turned from a 
tree. Seeing his face is not good, thank you for knowing what is not good, 
said: "What happened, what happened?" 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 75: Closed City 
Gate Yongan Life 


Admiration: "His Royal Highness, how come you are so many days?" 
Thank you for your pity, "I have been away for a long time?" 


Going to come, going to the world, picking up the lake, going to the clouds 
and raining, day and night, has been spent a lot of time, but he 1s unaware. 

Admiration: "A few days! The prayers of the believers in the Prince's Hall 

are backed up." 


At this time, thank you for feeling that the rain was weak, and reached out 
and said: "I have not explained it, let you deal with it first and foremost?" 


We admire the feelings: "We can handle them naturally, but... there are 
still many pledges, we are not qualified to do the same level of work. So I 
have to let your Highness not to press too long, come back soon." 


After he finished speaking, the rain stopped. This rain lasted longer than 
Xie Pity imagined, and he couldn't help but feel dignified. In the air, the 
dark clouds scattered slightly, and a bamboo-green bucket was laid down. 
Xie pity reached out and took the hand. He said, "You can see this 
situation, and I can't open it here." 


Mourning Emei: "His Royal Highness, you borrowed the magic weapon of 
the Rain Master? Where is the water that moved from?" 


Thanks to the pity: "Southern Rainmen." 


Admire the feelings: "So far? How much mana do you want to move once? 
And each time the rainfall range is small, it is not long-lasting. If you 
consume it, how do you cope with the prayers of the princes?" 


Not to mention him, thank you 1s also clear. He is the Valkyrie, and the 
believer in the Prince's Temple is the foundation of his temple and the 


source of mana. This move is tantamount to diverging. If you are not 
careful, I am afraid that both ends are not good, but what else is there? 


Thanks to pity: "I know. But if you go on like this, if there 1s a movement 
in the Yongan area, the Taizi Temple will be affected sooner or later." 


Mourning but said: "It is about to erupt!" 
Thanks for being pity: "What?" 


After listening to the love message, he quickly returned to the city of 
Xianle. When I came to Shenwu Street, I happened to meet a group of 
royal soldiers. I was armed and armed with a weapon, and I was holding a 
crowd of people with ragged clothes and heads. On both sides of the street 
are the people, all face anger. Fengxin hand-held black bow, waiting for it, 
seems to be guarding against the violence on both sides. Thanks and pity: 
"Wind letter! Who 1s this bet? What is it going? Where are you going?" 


Fengxin heard his voice and strode forward, saying: "His Royal Highness! 
These are Yongan people." 


The men in the column are tall, thin, tall and thin, with a deep complexion 
and dozens of people. The soldiers who escorted them were followed by a 
few old men, as well as some women and children who looked fearful. 
Thanks to the pity: "Is this all behind?" 


Admiration: "All are." 


It turned out that in the past few months, the Yongan drought, the people 
who originally settled in Yongan continued to flee to the east. Dozens of 
groups are still not obvious, but before and after, there have been more 
than 500 people. These more than 500 people gathered together, and the 
black-pressed head is very impressive. 


This group of Yongan people are unfamiliar with their lives. They have 
nothing to do, and they have exposed the accent of foreign accents. They 
come to a strange and prosperous city. They naturally want to warm 
themselves together. Therefore, they are looking for everywhere in Xianle 


City. Finally, I found an uninhabited green space. I was overjoyed and set 
up a shack here as a resting place. 


Unfortunately, this green space is indeed uninhabited, but it is a white 
moonlight in the hearts of the imperial city. Xianle people are used to 
enjoying and enjoying. The people in the Imperial City are especially 
popular among them. Many people go to the green space to go for a walk, 
dance, practice swords, poems, paintings, and gatherings. Yong'an is 
located in the west of Xianle. The land 1s barren and it is poor. The 
temperament and customs of the people are also different from those of 
Xianle. Compared with them, the people of the Imperial City are often 
more aware that they are orthodox. "Xianle people." Nowadays, the old 
and elegant place has been occupied by such a large group of refugees. All 
day, sputum, crying, washing, and burning, stinking and smelling of sweat 
and leftovers have made many nearby people unbearable. Many 
complaints. 


Several elderly people who are leading the elderly in Yongan understand 
that they want to move elsewhere. However, the Imperial City originally 
had a large population. Wherever it moved, it was crowded with people. 
No other place could accommodate so many people, let alone five 
hundred. Many people still have old and weak women and children who 
are sick and sick. They should not be moved frequently. They have to pay 
attention to their care and are cheeky. Although the people of the Imperial 
City are dissatisfied, after all, they are both the people of one country, and 
they are both dead and forbearing. 


Hearing here, the soldiers were holding dozens of Yongan men at the door 
of the market, and ordered: "Your Majesty!" 


Those Yongan men are not convinced on their faces, but the knife holder is 
on the neck. Those onlookers of the imperial city saw them sighing in 
disarray, and some sighed and some deflated. Thanks to the pity: "As you 
said, the hatchback is enduring. What is going on today?" 


The wind and the feelings have not yet been answered. There are women in 
the crowd crying and robbing the earth: "You are a group of savage 


thieves! Stealing the chicken and touching the dog also made me like that, 
and I can't climb it. If he has something, I will follow. You are desperate!" 


A few people were busy comforting her, and others accused: "I have left 
my hometown and went to other people's sites, and I don't know how to be 
safe!" 


"Yeah, when you get to someone else's house, you are welcome, steal 
something!" 


A young man with Dai Zhen couldn't help himself. He argued: "I have said 
that it was not stolen by us! It is not us who started first! And we are also 
injured here..." An old man stopped drinking. :"do not talk!" 


The young man was angry and shut up. Wind channel: "There was a person 
who lost a dog in the Imperial City. Because the Yongan children were so 
hungry that they had eaten the ducks, so they were suspected that they 
were caught and burned by Yongan people. They ran to them. Go ask, say 
nothing, fight up." 


Xie pity only feels unreasonable: "Just because of a dog, so big, catch so 
many people?" 


Wind channel: "Yes, just because of a dog, it is so big. Both sides have 
endured for a long time, and small things have become a big deal. Both 
sides swear that the other side is the first to do it, the other side is not, 
messed up one fight, I don’t know how to get bigger." 


For the first soldier said: "Gathering people to make trouble, severely 
punish not to lend! Put on the shackles to show the public, can not be 
guilty again!" After the retreat, the next moment, many people began to 
rush the leaves of this group of Yongan men, rotten eggs. Several seniors 
walked around and said: "I can't help you, everyone, I can't help it." 
"Please also show your mercy and be merciful." 


Although she feels that the fuss is too big and ridiculous, she can probably 
understand it. "So, is it because they stole it? Is the dog looking for it?" 


Fengxin shook his head and said: "Who knows. After eating the bones and 
scum, who can find it? But looking at the look, I don't think they are 
stealing." 


However, the Imperial City soldiers, of course, the ruling is biased 
towards the people of the Imperial City, no matter whether they steal or 
steal, they must be defeated. Imperial especially more men love having 
fun, not as good as Wing man play, want to come back to this stranger was 
hit badly, face lost big, Liang also a big knot. Xie pity shook his head and 
glanced over it. Suddenly, he found that in this row of Yong'an men, a 
young man with a head in the middle was very familiar. It was the young 
Lang Ying who was buried in the woods. 


Thanks for the moment. At this time, some people in the neighborhood 
complained: "How do I feel that there are more and more Yong'an people 
in the Imperial City in the past few months, and today I dare to beat 
people." 


"They shouldn't all come over?" 


A man in the shape of a businessman waved his hands and said: "The Lord 
will not be allowed! My house was stolen by the Yongan people a few days 
ago. If they all came over, would they still have it?" 


It was said that Lang Ying, who had been squatting for the first time, was 
suddenly looking up and said, "Have you seen it?" 


The businessman didn't expect the person to actually talk to him and 
replied: "What?" 


Lang Yingdao: "When the Yongan people stole your home, did you see it 
with your own eyes?" 


"..."" The businessman said, "I didn't see it with my own eyes, but I used to 
be good. I have been stolen since you came. Do you have any relationship 
with you?" 


Lang Ying nodded and said: "It turns out. I understand. Before we came, 
we were all stealing things. After we came, everything was stolen..." 


The voice did not fall, a rotten persimmon flew in a whirlwind, squatting 
on his mouth, as if vomiting a big blood. The businessman’s screaming 
laughter, Lang Ying’s eyes were indifferent, and he closed his mouth and 
said nothing. 


Xie pity went to the sharp stones that were thrown at them, so that this 
group of Yongan youth would not be ruined. This show was carried out 
until the evening, when the onlookers gradually dispersed, and the soldiers 
felt enough, and this was proudly opened, warning that there would be no 
more troubles in the future, otherwise it would not be light. Several 
seniors have been nodding their heads and losing their smiles, 
guaranteeing that they will not commit another crime. Lang Ying has a 
dull look and walks away from home. Thanks to seeing him alone, looking 
at the timing, flashing from behind the tree, stopped his way. 


When he flashed out, the young man first looked at him. In an instant, he 
seemed to be licking his throat. After seeing the people in the light stone, I 
received the hand that had not yet been explored. "I am you." 


It is the shape of the little priest who is pity. He was slightly shocked by 
Lang Yingfang’s unexplored one. He thought, “This man’s skill is a bit 
powerful.” Road: “I sent you that bead, why don’t you take it back to 
Yongan?” 


Lang Ying looked at him and said: "My son is here. I am here too." 


After a pause, he took the coral bead from his belt and said, "Do you want 
to take it back? Give it to you." 


He handed the bead to the hand, and there was a scar on his face. Silently, 
thank you for not accepting, said: "Go back. It is raining today." 


He pointed to the sky and said: "Tomorrow! It will rain. I promise, it will 
be." 


Lang Ying shook his head and said: "No matter whether it rains or not, I 
can't go back." 


Looking at the back of his departure, thanking him for a moment, only 
feeling troubled. 


When I didn’t fly, I didn’t seem to have any troubles. What he can do, 
what he can do. Who knows that after the ascent, it seems that suddenly, 
surrounded by endless troubles. There are other people’s troubles and their 
own troubles. To do one thing, it is so difficult, stretched, and unable. 
Thanks a lot of sighs, but also turned and left, returned to the Prince's Hall, 
to deal with those who have been backlogged for many days to pray. 


However, he is not the most troublesome person. The Lord is. 


The worry of the Xianle Lord has become a reality. These more than 500 
Yongan people are just the beginning. 


Thanks to the borrowed Yushi, he frequently traveled between the north 
and the south, relying on his own strength to practice rainfall. Every time 
it rains, it takes at least five or six days and a lot of mana. If it weren't for 
him, I am afraid that no one else can hold back and forth. Of course, 
except for Junwu. However, the land under the jurisdiction of Emperor 
Wuwu is wider than him. The number of believers and territories that 
require energy is far more than that of Xianle. How can he ask for the 
distraction of Junwu? Moreover, only a small part of the land in Yongan 
can be moistened at one time, and it will not be cured even if it is relieved. 
Thus, a month later, Yongan people began to formally migrate to the east 
in groups. Originally, it was a group of dozens of people. Nowadays, there 
are hundreds of people and thousands of people, and a large number of 
them are gathered together into a river. 


After another month, the lord of Xianle has issued a command: in view of 
the constant disputes in successive months, the fighting is frequent, and 
the Victorian City is stable. From now on, the original Yongan people who 
have lost the Xianle King must withdraw from the emperor. city. Each 
person is given a certain entanglement and goes to other towns to settle 
down. 


In front of the mighty people from the vast East, the door to the Imperial 
City of Xianle was closed. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 76: Closed City 
Gate Yongan Life Machine 2 


"Open the door!" 
"Let us go in!" 


The soldiers retreated into the city and the gates closed. The people who 
were expelled from the soldiers by the soldiers rushed back like black 
tides and slammed on the gate. The soldiers on the tower of the city 
shouted: "Retreat! Retreat! You can get on the road with the collar, go east, 
don't stay!" 


However, these Yongan people left their hometowns and fled all the way to 
the nearest Imperial City. The gates of the imperial city are closed to them. 
If you want to live, you have to bypass the imperial city and go further 
afield to the more east city. 


However, all the way to here, it is already difficult and dangerous, and 
there are countless deaths and injuries. How can we continue to move 
forward? Even if each person distributes some wraps, water and dry food, 
how many days can they stay on the road? 


They are all gray-faced, some dragging pots and pans, some carrying dolls, 
some carrying stretchers, helping the lie, lying down, no longer moving, 
sitting in front of the wall in pieces On the ground. The young men were 
still angry and angered, hammering the city gate and shouting: "You can't 
do this! You want us to die!" 


"It’s all Xianle people, do you want to kill them so much!" 


A man shouted and his voice was dumb: "If you drive us out, I won't go in, 
but let my wife and children stay, can you?!" 


Like the banyan tree, the city gate does not move. 


Thank you for standing on the top of the tower. White hunts and flies, he 
crossed the female wall and overlooked the bottom. Outside the Imperial 
City, what you see is a slow-moving head, black-pressed, dense, like the 
ant colony that he saw when he was playing in the Imperial Garden when 
he was a child. 


At that time, he curiously, looked at a few more eyes, extended a finger, 
wanted to sneak a poke, and immediately the palace man shouted: "His 
Royal Highness, this thing 1s dirty, can't touch, can't touch!" Hurrying 
over, a few feet crushed the ants. 


When the ants are alive, apart from being dense, there is nothing to look 
at. It’s not a good thing to be trampled to become a muddy slag. It’s 
nothing to look at. 


Within the imperial city, Wanjia’s lights are shining and Clarion is 
awkward. A wall separates two distinct worlds. 


Later, the Yongan people could not enter, but the original inside was also 
rushed out. Although it is chilly, thank you for knowing that this is 
because, for several months, the people of the Imperial City and the people 
of Yongan have become more and more frictional, leaving a group of such 
men in the city, fearing that they should be outside and in a mess. 


However, one thing, he thinks it is still arguable, and he said: "Why do 
women and children have to withdraw as well? Some people inside have 
already gone far." 


The wind and the sympathy stood behind him. Admiration: "If you want to 
withdraw, you have to withdraw together. If you don't suffer from 
unequalness, you can't treat it differently, otherwise it will inevitably 
irritate people. Why can they stay if they can stay?" 


Wind channel: "You think so much." 


The feelings are faint: "There will be people who think so. And if the wife 
and the children are not gone, those men will not be willing to leave, 


sooner or later, they will come back. Staying in the city is to leave 
behind." 


These Yong’an people refused to go, and the soldiers in the tower could 
not go. They said, “Oh, it’s so consumed!” 


Since the lord of the country has given orders, do you think that it 1s useful 
to sit here and use it? Energy consumption for a day or two, is it still 
energy consumption for one or two months, one or two years? 


The soldiers and the people of the Imperial City think so. Some Yongan 
people have accepted their lives in desperation, decided to gamble, and 
continue to travel east, but not many. Most of them are still sitting at the 
gate of the city, looking forward to the imperial city to open the door and 
let them in, at least give them a little repair and then continue on the road. 
More new Yong'an people came. Although they saw the city gate closed, 
they were very disappointed. But seeing so many people guarding, they 
also joined the big forces with the heart of waiting and expecting. 


Then, three or four days later, the more people gathered at the gate of the 
city, the tens of thousands of people camped here almost, forming a 
spectacular spectacle. They rely on the state to distribute water and dry 
food to support, but it is reaching its limit. 


This limit is on the fifth day. 


In the past five days, Xie pity has been used three times a day, one for the 
Prince's Temple, one for the rain, one for the Yongan people outside the 
city, and the other is the wind and the helper. Sometimes I feel 
overwhelmed and unable to do so. On this day, just when he did not stay 
outside the city, under the scorching sun, a scream was suddenly heard in 
front of the city gate. 


The scream is a couple holding a child. Everyone has surrounded the past 
and said: "What happened to this child?" "Hungry or thirsty?" Swearing, 
exclaimed: "Everyone will bring some water, this child can't look!" 


The woman cried and fed the water to the child with a small face, but the 
water was all spit out. His father said: "I don't know what happened, he is 
ill, doctor, doctor!" 


He rushed to the front of the city with his son and slammed the doorway: 
"Open the door, open the door and help! Someone is going to die, my son 
is going to die!" 


The soldiers inside the door naturally did not dare to open the door. 
Whether or not someone really wants to die, there are tens of thousands of 
people outside the door. If you open the door, you don't want to close it 
again. Only dare to inform the superiors. The weather was hot, and the 
soldiers who had been on for a few days were also somewhat upset and 
perfunctory: "Give him water and food." So he used a rope to hang a little 
water and food. The man said: "Thank you, thank you, Brother, but we 
don't want water and food. Can we help us find a doctor?" 


This is very embarrassing. Neither can he let him go to the doctor, nor can 
he hang a doctor down to him. God knows that outside the door, what will 
the hungry people who have been hungry for four or five days do? So, 
several generals said: "Forget it, don't worry, ignore it, you can't die. If you 
ask again, you will report it, and you have already asked the Lord to kneel 
down." 


The Lord has been very annoyed for the things of Yongan in the past few 
days, and he is often angry. No one really dares to disturb him for this 
little thing. Several soldiers answered as they answered, and the man was 
reassured, and even thanked him, thanking the country, and swearing. 
However, one hour and one hour passed, and the shadow under the 
scorching sun moved from one side to the other. The doctor did not appear, 
and the child in his arms became hot. 


The couple were holding their children's hands and shaking all the time. 
The man was cold and sweating and muttered: "Is there anyone coming? 
Open the door for me?" 


He finally couldn't help it. He shouted loudly above the Chongcheng 
Tower: "Generals, I can't help, I want to ask... Doctor?" 


The soldier replied: "I have already asked the Lord to kneel down, you can 
wait." 


There are people under the bottom who can't stop it: "I said it before two 
hours, why haven't you come back now?" 


The soldiers listened to the instructions from the superiors and ignored 
them. Under the wall, everyone was angry, helpless, and sad. Around the 
child, they began to doubt: "Do they really inform the Lord of the Lord? 
Wouldn't it be a lie?" 


The child’s father couldn’t wait any longer, and he took his heart and tied 
his child to his back and confessed to his wife. The woman took off the 
amulet on her neck and put it on her husband's neck. The man rushed to 
the wall and tried to climb up. 


The outside of the city wall was extremely difficult to get started. He 
grabbed a few and could not climb up. The rest of the man said: "I will 
help you!" Dozens of people, stacked up Luo Han, sent him to the high 
ground. At this point, the man can barely grasp the rope that is used to 
hang water and food and continue to climb. The tens of thousands of 
people underneath were nervous about him, and they dared not cheer for 
him, fearing to find it. The soldiers on the city tower kept for a few days. 
This group of Yongan refugees did not make any big troubles. It was 
inevitable that they were a little lax. When the man climbed halfway high, 
they suddenly found a person on the wall and shouted: "What? Do not 
climb the wall! The climber kills innocent! If you hear no, the climber 
kills innocent!" 


They threatened, the man also said loudly: "I am not malicious! I want to 
take the child to see a disease, nothing will be done!" While shouting and 
continuing to climb. A general was originally eating, and when he heard 
the matter, he was extremely angry. If this person climbs up safely and 
opens up this precedent, is there not a myriad of Yongan people to follow 
suit? Must be blocked! So he strode out and shouted down the wall: "Don't 
you kill it! Go straight down, no longer can't spare you!" 


And the man has climbed to a very high place, and after halfway through 
it, he can go up with hard work and naturally refuse to stop. The general 
was in the military camp, and no one dared not listen to his orders. Who 
dares not listen, it is very simple. He came to the wall and pulled a sword, 
and the rope broke. 


The man held the broken rope and fell from the air. In the screams of 
countless people, they fell heavily on the hard land outside the city gate. 


Thanks to pity is at this time. 

The man was carrying his back, and he had a child on his back. " Ba 
was crushed into a burst of bolognese, a **** flower splashing a few feet. 
His neck was also broken, his eyes were round and round, and a talisman 
slipped in his twisted neck. The word "Xianle" was written in the middle, 


and the gold thread embroidered with patterns, which was the opening 
amulet from the Prince's Hall. 


Before he climbed, the man and his wife used to hold the amulet and 
silently prayed for the blessing of His Royal Highness. Therefore, thank 
you for hearing their voice of pledge and coming here. 


However, after all, he is not the heroic protagonist of the legendary words. 
Every time he can appear in the moment before the knife falls, he will be 
left behind under the knife. The woman did not open her husband's body to 
see what kind of courage the son had become. He screamed and didn't look 
at it. He ran forward and slammed into the wall. He slammed and fell. 
Moved. 


Just before the eyes of the pity, under the wall of the Imperial City, there 
were three more bodies in an instant! 


He has not yet reacted, but the people outside the city gate can no longer 
stand it. 


Someone opened it: "Death, a family of three, dead! Look, this is a good 
general for our lords to do things! Don't save us, but push us to death!" 


"Don't let us go in and don't give people out, what do people do? Three 
**** nNeople look at you!" 


"It is said that Yongan people have to withdraw from the imperial city. 
How can the rich people not see and withdraw together? If we have no 
money and no power, we should die and die? I am seeing it!" 


"I can't stand it... I can't stand it. There is no less tax on the tax every year. 
Where did you go when the disaster occurred?" 


"I would rather take the money to feed the locusts to repair his son's 
temple without relief to the victims. Just give a little water and dry food. 
When we are? Faint, faint!" 


The soldiers shouted loudly on the tower, and the generals had never seen 
it, and they did not care. However, the situation has been eclipsed. 
Thousands of angry hands are pushed to the door, and others use their 
heads and hit them with their bodies. This time, they are no longer banyan 
trees. 


The city gate moved, and even the entire tower was trembled! 


I have never seen such a situation since I was born. The people he saw 
were kind, happy, rich and lovely. These distorted faces, crying and 
shouting people, let him come to another completely strange world, can 
not help but creep. Even if he is facing the most horrible evil spirits, he 
has never felt this way. At this time, there was a roar at the top of the 
tower. 


He jerked back and saw a tall, thin figure, glaring at the general who cut 
the rope and caused the three men to die under the wall. The slamming 
sound of the slamming sound broke his neck. 


A group of soldiers did not know how this person suddenly appeared, 
shocked, screaming and holding a sword around: "Who?!" "How come you 
come?!" 


Xie pity quickly noticed his hand, and his hands were already bloody. This 
man actually used a pair of flesh palms and grabbed the wall that barely 
had a gap. And the figure turned around, it really is Lang Ying! 


Lang Ying, who was surrounded by soldiers, was not chaotic. He turned 
over the female wall and threw the general's body to the next floor. He also 
stepped on the body and used it as a stepping stone for the buffer and 
jumped. 


The moment before he jumped, he looked straight at him. But the hope is 
not to pity, but to penetrate him, and to see the palace in the center of the 
Imperial City. 


From this day on, Xianleguo was completely chaotic. 2k novel reading 
network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 77: Xianle 
chaotic prince returns to the world 


With the people of the displaced people in Yong'an, wanting to fight 
against the Xianle Imperial City army is tantamount to hitting the stone 
with an egg and smashing the arm. 


However, there is no way to retreat, that is, the courage to use the egg to 
hit the stone and the arm. After a riot, tens of thousands of Yongan people 
finally left the city gate, evacuated a distance, and changed places to 
camp. 


They just refused to go. Walking on the road may also die, and it is 
probably dead here. What is the difference? With the water and grain 
distributed by the former head of the country, the bark, weeds, vegetable 
roots, insects, snakes and ants in the wild, and the grievances and 
unwillingness of the backlog for many days, these people are screaming 
with unrelenting vitality. A few days later, thousands of people who 
hurriedly picked up some hoes, nails, stones, and branches, and they came 
back to fight. 


Although this game was a mess, the loss was a failure, more than half of 
the deaths and injuries of more than a thousand people, but it was not 
nothing. Lang Ying rushed into the tower, smashed a few large bags of rice 
and several bundles of weapons to go back. Although the wounds were 
heavy, it inspires the fighting spirit of the desperate. 


At this time, their nature is closer to the robbers. Once, twice, three times. 
The soldiers of Xianle found that this group of "robbers" is making rapid 
progress. 


The inexperienced scattered attackers gradually figured out the way, the 
people who came were more difficult than once, and the people who went 
back were more than once, and there was a new wave of victims who came 
from all over the world. Grow their team. Xianle has been arguing over 


how to solve these "robbers", and after five or six games in such a 
ridiculous battle, Xie Pian can no longer be a wall. 


He did not go to heaven to report for many days. This time, once again, 
Xianjing, silently went straight to the Shenwu Temple. When I entered, 
Junu sat on the top, and all the priests were bowing their heads and seemed 
to be negotiating things. If in the past, thank you will choose another day 
to revisit, but now, he can't wait, single-handedly, and said: "I will go back 
to the world." 


All the priests were shocked, and then they didn’t want to cover their 
emotions. Jun Wu thought for a moment, stood up from the throne, Wen 
said: "Xianle, I probably know what happened, but you calm down first." 


Thanks to the pity: "I am here, I am asking for advice, but to inform. My 
people are in deep water, please forgive me." 


Jun Wudao: "The world has its own number. You know, if you go on, you 
are banned." 


Thanks to the pity: "If you ban you, you will be banned!" 


The words of the gods suddenly changed. It’s really no **** official, dare 
to be arrogant and vocal. Even if Junwu once again favors the young 
Prince Xianle who is soaring, he is too bold. 


Immediately, Xie pity bowed his head and said: "Please open the net and 
give me some time. It is already in the battle, and the death and injury are 
inevitable, but if I can calm the war, let the least people die, keep things to 
a minimum. Within the scope of the war, after the war, I will voluntarily 
come back to plead guilty, and then let you deal with it. Whether it is to 
crush me in the mountains for a hundred years, a thousand years, 10,000 
years! - I will never regret it." 


After that, he maintained his posture of bowing his head and retired from 
the temple. Jun Wudao: "Xianle!" 


Thank you for your next meal. Jun Wu looked at him and sighed: "You 
can't save everyone." 


Cheering slowly straightened up and said: "Can you save everyone? I have 
to try to know the answer. Even if I say that I must die, the sword will not 
pass me through, and I will not be able to play on the ground." I am still 
alive, I will still sigh and struggle to the end!" 


This time I returned to the world, unlike every time in the past. Xie Li felt 
that something was left behind. Some are easy and some are heavy. In the 
first step, he could not wait to return to the palace. 


After the king and the queen were in the royal study, they looked tired and 
whispered. Xie pity came outside the door, first a little nervous for a 
moment, then calmed down, picked up the curtain, went in, said: "Father." 


Both the Lord and the Queen turned back and they were all in vain. After a 
short while, the empress first stood up and said, "I am a royal!" 


She extended her hands and came over to meet him. Xie pity helped her. 
The ridiculousness has not yet receded, and suddenly the head of the 
country sank his face and said: "What have you done!" 


Thanks for a smile. 


Before I heard the conversation behind my parents in the palace, I felt that 
his father still wanted him, not as much as he had on his face. I thought 
that when I came back, the king of the country would show some 
happiness, and in that case, he would definitely be soft and attitude. Who 
knows that the lord is so responsive, there is no good color, so 
thankfulness and pity also came up, and said: "Why am I down, not 
because of you? Yongan has today's chaos, you ask yourself, is it certain? 
responsibility?" 


The look of the Lord changed greatly, and sighed: "My responsibility? Is 
this what you should say to me?!" 


He was so angry that he even claimed to pay attention. The Queen shed 
tears: "It’s all like this, what are you doing?" 


Thanks to pity: "It's not a noisy, it's justified. Even if you are the lord, it's 
my father, but if you have the responsibility, what can I say? Why don't 
you try your best? Even if the disaster is swallowed by layers, Why don't 
you rectify corrupt officials? If you are resolute and aggressive, and you 
can do one, and which locusts are daring, isn't the situation better than 
now?" 


The head of the country’s forehead burst into blue veins and patted the 
case: “Stop! You are a bottomless hole in the national treasury. How many 
gaps are there? If you do one, you can do it one by one. If you are so easy, 
you will be able to make a quick and violent experience. Why are the 
corrupt officials of the dynasties? The filth has never been rooted? What 
do you know, ignorant children, talk to me about the country!" 


Thanks to pity: "Well, I don't understand. If there is no place for the 
victims in the Imperial City, it is inevitable to withdraw. But why don't you 
give these victims some trouble? Why are you not soothing, send troops to 
ek them? Move east?" 


The lord of the country is full of anger, pointing to heaven: "Roll. Flip! 
Roll back to your heaven! Look at you and get bored! No more!" 


Thanks to the blood, I saw the first side of my parents, but I heard my 
father let him roll back to the sky, and he did not say anything, and he fell 
back. The queen chased him and pulled him, saying: "The emperor!" 


Thank you for your kindness: "After the mother, don't worry, I just go to 
the king to go and see what is going on." 


The Queen shook her head and said: "I am not aware of these national 
events, but I understand your father. How he is a lord, I have seen it for so 
many years. You can feel that he is not doing well. Sometimes, I think so, I 
just don't say it. But you don't want to say it in person, he is your father, 
after all, you said that he doesn't have to worry about it, really worried." 


Thank you for your pity. Queens said: "While you are a prince, you have 
never been a lord. Governing the country is different from your 
cultivation. When you first entered the emperor's view, the national 
teacher said that the monastic only cares about the heart, is that so?" 


Cheering slowly nodded, the Queen held his hand and said: "But there are 
many other things in the world, only useless is useless, you have to have 
the ability; not only you have the ability, the people under your hand must 
have Ability; not only have the ability, but also have a heart with you." 


Thank you for your silence. For a long time, he said: "Is the national 
treasury bad? I don't need a temple, let him not give me so many temples, 
those golden statues, all pushed." 


The Queen reluctantly said: "You are a child... The temple has the 
selfishness of your father, I want to give you good, I want you to be in the 
sky. But, you know, in the Eight Thousand Palaces, it is really your father. 
How much is the emperor's repair? You don't know." 


Xie pity really does not know. He thought for a moment and said: "...half?" 


Queens said: "If your father's money in the national treasury has repaired 
more than 4,000 Princes' Halls, and before the Yongan people get up, the 
Imperial City will first make trouble. Since the treasury 1s empty, where is 
the money repaired? You The father had repaired more than 20 people. The 
others followed his style and followed suit. He wanted to please him and 
please him. Should these count on him?" 


Thanks: "TI..." 


The Queen whispered: "Your father is not good enough, but he...do his 
best. It is just that the things in this world are not enough." 


After a pause, she said again: "You are watching the poor people of 
Yong'an now, so blame your father. But all of them are people. Are we 
bullying them? Actually..." 


Halfway through, the lord screamed in the royal study: "You do so much 
nonsense with him, let him hurry back to heaven!" 


The queen turned back and sighed: "The emperor, you... don't come down. 
You still go back." 


Leaving the palace, Xie Pui walked along an alley on the side of Shenwu 
Street, just as the wind and the feelings came. When the feelings came, I 
couldn't believe it: "His Royal Highness! You have asked for it? You went 
to the Shenwu Temple and the Emperor said??" 


Thanks: "Well." 
Admire: "Why don't you talk to me first?" 


The wind letter is strange: "What do you mean. Do you have to explain to 
your predecessors beforehand?" 


The feelings are somewhat ruined. "Why not? We are his people. We are 
tied to him now. Every move ts closely related to our situation. I want to 
know what he is going to do. What is wrong? ?" 


Wind channel: "What do you have to do under the Highness? We have to 
do anything, God is going to the ground, he has his own idea, what are you 
afraid of?" 


"You!" Mu Qing said: "I am not afraid! I am just..." 
Thank you for your hand: "Enough. Don't make a noise!" 


Fengxin and admiration immediately shut up. At this time, a group of tour 
and line teams passed through the street, and hundreds of people shouted: 
"Yong'an does not divide, the country has no Ningri!" 


"Indiscriminate disease, deception is too much!" 
Xianle people have never had such a strong aggression on anything, and 


they have done such a vigorous and exciting tour. The wind letter frowned: 
"How can there be a woman inside?" 


Sure enough, in the tour | line team, a girl rushed to the forefront. The girl 
is Slim, her skin is white, her eyes are black and bright, her cheeks are red, 
but she is not shy, but her anger is very eye-catching. At this time, the 
feelings have adjusted the mood, and said coldly: "Does your Highness not 
know her?" 


Thanks for your pity: "I don't know." 
Fengxin frowned: "Is it a bit familiar?" 
Admire: "That is one of the sources." 
Thank you for asking: "What source?" 


Admiration: "Before the source of the situation is not the same. Before, 
because there are more and more Yong'an people in the Imperial City, 
some are still not good to stay together, and there are rumors around, and 
the DPRK is discussing the expulsion, the wind has long been passed. 
Going out. There is a Yongan who wants to stay, don't want to go, and take 
risks. One night, sneak into a wealthy family and take the daughter away." 


He said this, thank you for listening and have not yet reacted: "Why don't 
you want to go to the daughter of a rich family?" 


He looked at him with a smile and said: "I want to marry her. But if you 
don't rely on strength, there will be no daughters of the Imperial City who 
will marry Yongan people." 


He did not say it, but thanked him for understanding. 


He never thought that it would be like this. There are such people in the 
world. This kind of thing happens, and suddenly there is a vomiting 
impulse. The wind letter came out on the spot and said: "Disgusting!" 


At this time, a group of aunts and urchins rushed up, and the monkeys 
wanted to pull the girl down. It seemed that she was not paying attention 
to her own ran out. The girl did not follow, said: "What are you afraid of? 
What am I doing? It is not my fault!" 


Feng Xinqi said: "This girl is very strong." 


Mu Qing said: "Yes. Her mother is not an ordinary family. Her father is a 
middle-class minister. Her mother is a wealthy merchant in the imperial 
city. She refuses to eat this squandering loss. It is even more impossible to 
marry someone for her face. The Yongan people were killed. Soon, the 
wealthy businessmen and celebrities in the city jointly wrote a book, 
which listed the sins of the Yongan people since they entered the city. They 
asked the lords to put all these people in prison and severely punish them. 
What are the positions of the ministers? Not to mention." 


After a pause, he also underestimated the truth: "I heard that the woman's 
father had wanted to send her to the palace, and to fight for the position of 
the Prince. His Highness should have seen her a few times before, but she 
did not recognize it." 


Xie pity finally found that everything was more complicated than he 
thought. 


Outside the city, it has already been inconsistent. The subjects are full of 
anger and anger. They only hate to be able to kill them all by one net. If 
the decision of the country is still biased towards Yongan people, isn’t it 
the face of their own people? In the end, I decided to allocate a sum of 
money from the dry treasury to give them a entanglement. Although it was 
cold enough, I am afraid that it will still cause a lot of people's 
dissatisfaction. 


More terrible than the enemy's dissatisfaction is the dissatisfaction of the 
subjects. Although they were all subjects of Xianle, now, I am afraid that 
few people think so. 


He is high above, and he has long been ignorant of human affairs, and his 
father is still in the world. As a country's lord, how can he use money, use 
people, where he is, what he is under pressure, and who needs to be 
scrupulous and reconciled? Just like the foreign Yongan people occupying 
land, squatting, stealing, etc. in the imperial city, it is probably a small 
matter for a **** of martial arts living in the temple. It is not angry with 
it, and it is forbearance. But for the people in the imperial city, it is a real 


crisis, a lingering day, an intolerable torture, and a crisis that may break 
out at any time. I feel simple or insignificant, but because he is in that 
position, it is not him. 


Thanks to pity, I can't help but think that the two lords of the lord are more 
powerful than the last time. The last time I said it was going to be dyed, I 
am afraid I would have no more energy to dye it. 


When he was a child, he firmly believed that his father was the greatest 
king under the sun. The more he grew up, the more he discovered. This is 
not the case. His father, although a lord, couldn't talk about wiseness, 
sometimes a little pedantic, often made mistakes, and took away the 
privileged identity, but it was a mortal. 


The more you understand, the more disappointing it is. The Lord is aware 
of his disappointment, so he is increasingly intolerant of every disapproval 
of his eyes, disapproval of words, and, most intolerable, his failure to see 
himself. 


No father in the world would want his son to see his failure. My father 
hopes that in front of his son, he will always be tall. And he appeared at 
this time, rebukeing his father: You are doing really bad! I can only help 
you to save the field - whether as a national or as a father, how can you 
feel good when you hear this? 


After all, the girl was pulled back by the servants of her family, and the 
rest of the people continued to march, shouting and shouting, nothing 
more than a thing: kill! Go to war! Let the Yongan people outside the city 
look good! 


Half a sigh, admire the feeling: "Your Highness, you still apologize with 
the emperor, go back. Things have reached this point, the weather, the 
land, the people, and lost." 


As Jun Wu said in the temple of the gods, thank you for the pity: the world 
has its own number. This sentence, is not to tell him: your Xianle country 
has exhausted, go with him. 


Even the Queen, his mother, hopes and hopes at night, only looking 
forward to seeing him. I can really see him, but tears let him go back, don't 
worry. I don’t know how to pray, they don’t want him to face this 
difficulty, he would rather be a wall-viewer, and he will be better off. 


But how is this possible? 
Thanks for the silence: "No!" 


After that, he strode out. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 78: Prince Ping 
Yongan on the battlefield 


The morality and admiration behind him were all shocked. "Oh, Your 
Highness!" immediately rushed out and guarded him around his side. 


However, the people on the entire Shenwu Street have already seen the 
white teenagers appearing in the middle of the main street. The tour team 
was confused for a while and reorganized. Thousands of people were 
surrounded by layers of politeness. The first person was not sure about the 
authenticity: "You are... are you the Royal Highness?" 


The second person hesitated: "It is not that the Highness of the Prince has 
soared. It has not been a mortal. How could he appear here?" 


The third person sighed: "It's him! When I went to the Yuan Festival three 
years ago, I saw it with my own eyes, it is His Royal Highness!" 


More and more people recognize the **** of the gods they worshipped 
day and night, and thanked slowly: "It 1s me. I am back." 


So people are crazy. 


"The gods come to the world! This is the living **** who came to the 
world!" 


"Heavenly people are gone!" 


"It must be because we can't bear to see us being bullied by thieves, and 
my Highness 1s down!" 


Someone immediately asked with hope: "His Royal Highness, will you 
lead us to defeat the Yongan people? Will it be? It must be like this!" 


After a moment, thank you for calmly saying: "I am coming back to 
protect the people of Xianle and protect my people." 


The voice and admiration around him listened to this sentence, and he was 
not sure what it meant. However, the **** nationals understood the 
meaning of this sentence with wishful thinking. And thankful has his own 
thoughts, his heart beats more and more, a bite, said: "... believe me!" 


He clenched his fist and said: "Your faith will give me more strength. With 
this power, I will swear to protect the fairy, protect the people. Please 
believe me!" 


What people are waiting for is this moment. What he wants 1s his 
guarantee. He immediately cheers and sighs and squats down to the center 
of the Prince. He said, "Go to follow you! Follow your Highness!" 


"Defend the fairy music!" 


The people of the Imperial City heard about the saying that "the gods are 
descending", all of them came out from the streets and alleys, only for a 
miracle that had not happened in this millennium. Even the imperial 
guards who heard the news did not dare to let go and joined the worship. 
Column. The three people were caught in the middle of the street, and the 
wind and the feelings had to work hard to maintain order. They said, 
"Don't squeeze, don't squeeze!" 


However, it didn't make much sense. Everyone wanted to squeeze into the 
place closest to His Royal Highness and touch the corner of the **** man 
from heaven. It seemed to light the whole person. In the end, the king of 
the palace was alarmed, and several generals were sent out with armed 
soldiers, which drove away the fanatics. 


After everyone had dispersed, on the ground that left the messy footprints 
and flying dust, thanked for seeing something. He approached and leaned 
over to pick up. 


That is a flower. It was trampled by many people and almost turned into 
earthy color. Only a few pieces of residual petals, a glimpse of the original 


white color. 


The faint fragrance was not as good as it was, and it soon disappeared. 


After thinking about some things, this time, thanking the pity and 
returning to the palace, the attitude towards the country is much softer. As 
a result, the king of the country has also eased his color a lot, and the 
father and son have each stepped back, which is a temporary peace. The 
national teacher seems to have expected that the pity will come down and 
say nothing. 


Forgiveness has always felt that it is a matter of course for a country to be 
single-minded and a big event at present, everyone listens to the country. 
However, when he really sat down and participated, he realized that the 
country is a troubled place. The ministers of the first dynasty will actually 
be divided into many small factions. Each faction has its own plans. It is 
possible to argue for seven days in the final analysis of how to decide on a 
major event. Every person in each faction calls himself a country for the 
people. In fact, he does not necessarily think so. 


For the Yongan people who are stationed outside the city and formally 
intend to fight against the court, their opinions cannot be unified. Some 
people advocate that the army should be directly annihilated. If there are 
not enough heads, they will make a few more deductions. Some people 
will not. 


The chaos of Yong’an began in the natural disasters and broke out in **. 
The family of three who fell to the gate of the Imperial City was really a 
bad introduction. If it wasn’t for the general who cut the rope, it was 
already pinched by Lang Ying. Neck, he is also going to be punished. It’s 
hard to hear, even if the inside is complicated, there are many reasons. On 
the surface, it seems that the official is against the people. At this point, 
the troubles are raging, and the crimes are slammed. It will only be more 
resentful, and the reasons for the compilation are unstoppable. If you send 
troops to annihilate and set the headless, it is difficult to call the teacher of 
righteousness. The mouth of the anti-people is more than the anti-chuan, 
once it has left a brutal reputation, not only can not serve the people, but 
also fear that other countries nearby took the opportunity to play for the 
banner of the day. Think about it again, what are the fears of this group of 
Yongan people? They are nestling in the wilderness of the mountains and 
forests. How long can they be without weapons? 


Therefore, the ultimate advantage is the latter: If Yongan people dare to 
commit crimes, come and kill once; if they don’t commit crimes, let them 
kill themselves, and don’t have to spend a lot of money on them. I will run 
out of myself. 


As a **** of martial arts, thanks to the pity, naturally, it must play a role 
on the battlefield. Therefore, the military must not vigorously advocate: 
the party with the Prince Edward 1s the party of justice, and the army with 
the Prince Edward is the army of the gods! 


For a time, a large number of young men from all over the country joined 
the army. In just a few months, the number of Xianle’s team doubled. The 
movement is so big, and Yongan seems to have got news. Originally, their 
activities were fairly frequent, and a small group of small and small, 
suddenly there was a dumb sound, as if there were some jealousy, they 
were secretly accumulating, and the soldiers on the side of Xianle were 
also very nervous, and they spared no effort to thank Describe how terrible 
it is to "every time that always rushes to the forefront." Hearing this name, 
remembering the corpse of the child that he saw on that day, Xie Pity 
always felt a complicated mood. 


Two months later, the Yongan people who had been living for a while 
finally finally launched the attack again. 


This time, Xie Li only took a light sword and did not even wear armor. 
Less than half an hour, the battle is over. 


In the overwhelming **** atmosphere, the remaining Yongan soldiers lost 
their helmets and ran away. The soldiers of Xianleguo have not responded 
at all, and they have seen all the figures that have fallen to the ground. No 
enemy can stand. And their prince, the Prince, slowly put the sword into 
the sheath, and the cloakroom was not stained. 


For a long while, they confirmed their overwhelming victory, jumped up, 
raised their swords to the sky, and shouted. 


On that night, the Xianle soldiers opened a celebration feast on the city 
tower. 


The soldiers have not been so proud of their eyes for a long time, cheering 
and cheering, and toasting the Royal Highness Prince. Xie pity pushed all 
the wine, and one went to the corner of the tower to blow the night wind 
and wake up. 


He clearly did not drink a cup of wine, but he could feel the face burning, 
the face flushed, and the tip of his finger still shivered. 


This is the first time that Xie Pity’s life has killed. For the first time, he 
killed thousands of people. 


Ants. 


In my mind, these two words appear repeatedly. Before his power, the 
mortal was vulnerable, and no one could withstand his gentle grip. It is so 
easy to take away the lives of others, just as the palace people trampled on 
the ants, making him lose the awe of the sword. 


Thanks to the female wall, took a few deep breaths, hoes, licked the noise, 
and stared at the burning light in the distant mountains. Soon, the two 
footsteps approached. 


Don't look back, he also knows who the person is. Thanks for your pity: 
"Don't you have a drink to celebrate?" 


Mourning feelings said: "What is good, the situation is not optimistic." 


Hearing words, thanking the pity and turning around, said: "Do you also 
see it?" 


It is really not very optimistic. Although this game is a win, in fact, this 
attack is stronger than any previous attack by the Yongan people. 


Not only are there more people, but their formations, weapons, and 
dispatching all have a qualitative leap. Even many people are equipped 
with armor. Although it is simple and chilly, it 1s already the size of a 
regular army. It is hard to imagine that this is actually a group of grass 
roots. 


Mu Qing picked up his arms and frowned. "The extremely hard 
environment really makes people grow fast. But no matter how hard and 
difficult, it will not produce materials out of thin air. Things are not right." 


The wind letter is more direct and succinct: "They must have foreign aid." 


Thanks for your nod. Admired: "I don't believe that these soldiers are not 
seen. But they still celebrate, just because there is you here, they think 
they will win." 


Thanks to this, I feel that there is nothing. "I won the first beating. I am 
happy if they are happy. It 1s to boost morale." 


The wind was hesitating, or said: "Your Highness, your face is not very 
good. Are you still raining in Yongan?" 


Thanks: "Well." 


Mu Qing’s face is not unexpected and does not recognize it. “I’m blunt, 
now the rain is no longer useful. It’s a bottomless pit. Your Highness, even 
if the drought in Yong’an can be completely alleviated, this group of 
people outside the city may not Will retreat." 


Thanks to the pity: "I know. But I went to the rain, not to let this group 
retreat, just to prevent those who are still in Yongan from dying. And this 
is my original purpose, not because of anything. ” 


Fengxin is still not at ease, said: "Can you hold it?" 


Xie pity patted his shoulder and said: "Reassured, I have eight thousand 
palace views, and there are enough believers, of course, no problem. 
However." 


The other hand took the shoulder of his affection and sighed: "I have two 
of you to help today, thank you for accompanying me." 


On the battlefield today, his two attendants were much more bitter than 
him, and he was covered in blood. Wind channel: "There is no need to say 
this again." Mu Qing is vaguely "squeaky". 


Thanks to the slightest effort on the hand, the relationship between the 
three people was brought closer, and sincerely said: "Not only today, I 
have always thanked you both. I hope that the three of us can fight side by 
side. ” 


After a short while, the wind letter laughed. It’s incredible to say: “I found 
that you can always speak out something very... very true...” He shook his 
head and said, “But it.” 


The corners of the pity are so easy to rise slightly. How long did it take to 
laugh, suddenly looked awkward and said: "Who?!" 


" ", thanked the long sword out of the sheath. He picked it up and picked 
a black shadow out of the corner of the women's wall. 


The man was hiding in this corner for a long time, and his breath was so 
unconscious. Thanks to pity, I just wanted to hang him up with a sword tip 
to scare him. Who knows that he killed himself on the battlefield today, 
his arms have been shaking slightly, and his shots have been somewhat 
lost. This pick is not strong, too hard. Directly took the man out of the 
wall. 


In the moonlight, in midair, all three people saw that this person was 
wearing his own soldier's clothing, and his figure was like a fifteen or 
sixteen teenager. After the moment, it fell and disappeared. Seeing that 
one person is going to fall under the city tower, thank you for your poor 
feelings, flying out and jumping out. 


He hooked the edge of the female wall to the edge of the female wall, and 
the body fell down, and he quickly pulled out his hand and pulled the other 
arm. The young soldier hung himself in the air, swaying back and forth, 
looking up. This hope, through a faint moonlight, thanked him for seeing 
his face, could not help but look at his eyes. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 79: The back of 
the prince 


Thanks to this flying body, there are some stunned people, but the two 
attendants naturally know that this is nothing to him. It is because the 
feelings are not moving, but the wind letter is still pulling. Thanks to the 
slightest effort, the little soldier was brought up, and the two men landed 
on the city tower. Thanks to the man, "Who are you under the soldiers, 
how can you hide here?" 


The soldier had a bandage on his hand and his head. The bandage was still 
immersed in a little blood. It seemed to be very painful. This is not 
surprising. In today's big battle, many soldiers were injured and wrapped 
up in such a way. But he kept hiding in the shadows and it was suspicious. 
Admire the feelings: "Don't be the spy of the Yongan people, grab it and 
review it." 


Xie pity also has this suspicion, but the imperial city is strictly guarded, 
the enemy is unlikely to be mixed in, unless it is Lang Ying, and this small 
soldier is clearly a half-large child. At this time, the wind letter is strange: 
"Your Highness, you do not remember this kid? In the day he always 
rushed in front of you, that is the front of the formation." 


Thanks for your pity, said: "Is it?" 


In the daytime, he did not pay attention to anything else. He only knew 
that someone had raised his sword and killed him. He attacked the sword 
and did not pay attention to the wind and the feelings. How could he pay 
attention to other soldiers? 


Fengxin affirmed: "Yes. I remember this kid, he is very awkward and lives 
like a life." 


Listening to him, thank you for looking at the young soldier. The boy stood 
up inexplicably and looked up, as if he was a bit stiff and seemed to be 


standing. Admire the feelings: "Then he shouldn't be hiding here. Who 
knows if he came to voyeuristic or eavesdropping?" 


Although this is said, in fact, he also put aside his guard. Because the 
Xianle Army vigorously advocated the so-called "God of Heaven, the fate 
of the destiny", many young people joined the army to follow the 
gratitude, including many such teenagers, and many of these are faithful 
admirers of thanksgiving. I grew up worshipping his gods and listening to 
the famous name of His Royal Highness. I wanted to sneak up, and I didn’t 
look at Wushen twice. It’s not unusual. 


Thanks to pity: "Okay, a false alarm." Weng said to the young soldier, "I 
just scared you, sorry." 


The boy did not have fear, but stood even more straight, saying: "His 
Royal Highness..." 


Who knows, the voice has not fallen, and the change has suddenly 
occurred. The young soldier was not finished, and suddenly he prayed for 
it! 


Xie pity thinks that he wants to sneak attack, the wrong body flashes, 
raising his hand will be a hand knife. With his power, this knife went 
down, and the boy was undoubtedly killed on the spot. Unexpectedly, he 
suddenly felt that the vest had climbed coldly, his hand slammed in the 
middle of the road, and his backhand intercepted a cold arrow that was 
shot from behind him. 


It turned out that the boy rushed to him because he saw the cold light of 
the flying arrow in midair. Thanks for the fact that she was standing 
against the female wall. She was attacked behind her, and she did not fear. 
Instead, she jumped onto the wall and looked down. I saw a large piece of 
empty flat land in front of the city gate, faintly about one person 
independent, because he was wearing dark clothes and blended with the 
night, it was extremely difficult to detect. The wind letter quickly came to 
the side of the pity, and the bow was an arrow. But the man actually 
calculated the distance early, deliberately stood very far, shot an arrow, 
attracted to thank him, and waved his hand, did not turn around and left, 


very fast, the wind and arrow Already old, it is a few inches behind his 
feet. The wind and anger screamed at the wall, and the gray stone fell, 
saying: "Who is that?!" 


Who else can it be? Thanks: "Lang Ying!" 


The Xianle soldiers also found out that they were screaming and 
screaming and running around, but because they were vigilant, they did 
not immediately order the opening of the gates, but went to the superiors. 
Lang Ying took a shot and waved away. It was like a special greeting with 
Chee, and he frowned: "What is he doing? Demonstration?" 


Fengxin anger said: "Today, Yongan was beaten, and he barely escaped 
from the bottom of his temple. What is good to demonstrate!" 


Xie pity touched something on the cold arrow, and took it to the side of the 
fire. It was a piece of cloth, which seemed to be torn from a cyan robes. 
There was still wet blood on the cloth. When I look around, I am actually 
twisting and writinga" ". 

Xie pity immediately pinched the cloth and said: "What is it? Isn't it in the 
palace?" 


Fengxin said to the soldiers on the side: "Come into the city to confirm!" 


The soldiers are busy. This is indeed the corner of the robes that grace is 
most loved to wear. Lang Ying is also a famous god. The possibility that he 
is really taken away by him 1s not small. It is not too late, thank you: "I 
keep up. Take a look." Seeing the wind letter also came over, said: "You 
keep the city gate steady and do not move, beware of the tiger away from 
the mountain." 


Fengxin took the bow back and said: "Why don't you bring anything?" 


If Yongan does not make a big intrusion first, Xie Li does not want Xianle 
to take the initiative to send troops. If the grace falls into the enemy, he 
can bring it back alone, and if he takes a soldier to go, he will make a big 
move, and there will be more than one or two people who die. Now, thank 


you still want to keep things in the smallest scope, said: "No. They can't 
help me." 


After that, his hand slammed down the wall and jumped down the tower, 
fluttering down to the ground, and quickly chased away from Lang Ying's 
evacuation. After a while, I listened to my footsteps and caught up. I 
looked back and saw the young soldier. Xie pity rushed to him: "I don't 
need people to help, you go back!" 


The boy shook his head. Thanks again and again: "Go back!" The pace of 
the foot accelerated, and the boy was suddenly squatted and could not be 
seen. 


Going out of the five or six miles and entering a hill. This mountain is not 
steep, it is more like a slope, so it 1s also called the back slope. According 
to the investigation, after the withdrawal of Yongan people, large forces 
and civilians are nestled here. The vegetation on the back **** is dense, 
and it is dark at night. The black lacquered forest is surrounded by strange 
sounds, as if there are countless living things lurking. Thanks for the depth 
of the mountain, holding the breath for a long time, suddenly saw a long 
human figure hanging on a tree in front, and fixed his eyes, said: "Sorry!" 


It is grace. He was hanged upside down on the tree, and it seemed to give 
him a violent blow, fainting, nosebleeds, and his eyes were green. Xie pity 
pulls the sword out of the sheath, breaks the rope, catches the fallen grace, 
and pats his face. Looking back and waking up, when he saw him, he said 
loudly: "Prince cousin!" 


Xie Pity is giving him a loose tie, and the vest is cold, and the long sword 
is backhanded. Looking back, I saw Lang Ying holding an epee in both 
hands and coming to him. 


The two men dismantled a few tricks. After a few blessings, they shot 
Lang Ying’s sword. On his calf, he slammed Lang Ying. The sword tip 
reached his throat and ended the battle. He said: You know that you are not 
my opponent, don't fight." 


Today, they handed over their hands on the battlefield. Anyone who rushed 
to thank you was killed by Xie, and only Lang Ying, who had been 
subjected to his sword, survived and dragged his injured body back. 
Anyone can see that Lang Ying is the leader of this group of Yongan 
people. Thanks for letting him "don't fight", meaning more than one layer. 


Thanks to the pity: "As long as you do not take the initiative to commit 
crimes, I guarantee that the soldiers of the Imperial City will never attack 
you. Take water and food, leave." 


Lang Ying lay on the ground and looked directly at him. The gaze looked 
at the bottom of the heart. He said: "His Royal Highness, do you think you 
are doing right?" 


Thanks for a stiff look. A look at the side is shouting: "Crap! Do you know 
who the cousin is? He is the **** of heaven! He is not right, is it true that 
your group of treason dog thieves are right??" 


Thanks and pity: "Sad, stop!" 


Lang Ying asked him what he said, he could not answer. In his heart, he 
actually felt that what he did was wrong. However, this is the best way he 
can think of. If he does not protect Xianle and resist the intrusion, can he 
let the Yongan rebels attack once and even enter the Imperial City? 


Two people rushed to him with a sword, and he could stun until the point. 
But the sword on the battlefield is ruthless, and he can't have the energy to 
stun one by one. He can't just think about it, then he swings his sword. 
Lang Ying asked this question, and it just evoked the voice in his heart: Do 
you think you are doing right? 


Grace is not as entangled as he is, saying: "What did I say wrong? Cousin, 
since you have come, just kill this group of dog thieves! They dozen me to 
beat me!" 


He flew in the Imperial City on weekdays, and the people who hated him 
were naturally numerous, and they took the opportunity to retaliate. Of 
course, there are also many people who hate him. Thanks for the lack of 


time to deal with him, to Lang Yingdao: "What do you want? To rain, 
Yongan will still rain. To gold, I pushed the golden image to you. To eat, I 
... find a way. But Don't provoke a war again. Go find a solution together 
and go to the third road. OK?" 


These words are thankful and unwilling to blurt out. Lang Ying may not 
know what is the "third way", but he did not hesitate to answer: "I don't 
want anything. I don't need anything. I only want it." That is, there is no 
more fairyland in the world. I want it to disappear." 


His tone 1s flat, but the words are chilling. Half a sigh, thank you for your 
silence: "...you have to bring someone to fight, I can't stand by. You have 
no chance of winning. Even if the Yongan people who follow you will die, 
do you have to do this?" 


Lang Yingdao: "Yes." 


He replied so calmly, so determined, thankful that the bones of the bones 
creaked, but there is nothing to say. Lang Ying said in a word: "I know that 
you are a god. It doesn't matter. Even if you are a god, don't let me stop." 


Xie Li knows that Lang Ying is true. Because of the things in his tone, 
thank you for being familiar with it again - that is the determination of a 
person who has no hesitation. When he said to Jun Wu, "Even if I want to 
die," the determination, and the determination of Lang Ying at the 
moment, is exactly the same! 


Lang Ying’s remarks are tantamount to proclaiming that he will continue 
to call on countless Yongan people to continue their attacks and never 
stop. So, thank you for what you should do now, and then you can be clear. 


Xie pity has always been holding a sword, and now it has been changed 
into two hands. As his hands trembled, he was about to stab in the throat of 
Lang Ying, and suddenly there was a strange noise behind him, and a 
sudden sneer. 


There was a silent person behind him, and she was shocked and surprised. 
Looking back, she was wide open. 


At this time, the most likely is the enemy soldiers, perhaps countless 
swords have been aimed at him, but did not expect that behind him, it 
would be such a weird person. 


The man was in a white mourning, with a pale mask on his face, a half- 
faced face crying, half-faced smile, and weird. He sat on a tree vine 


hanging between two big trees. The sound of " " was when he 
swayed the tree vines back and forth, and it seemed to be swinging. He 
saw thankfulness and turned back, raised his hands, and slowly applauded 
and screamed, and sneered out from his mouth. Thanks for the 
inexplicable bursts of creeps, screaming: "What are you?" 


He used "something" because of his intuition, this must not be a person! 


At this time, Xie Pity suddenly felt that the tip of the sword was not right, 
and the grace shouted. Turning his head and seeing, the land in front of 
him was cracked into a long pit. Lang Ying, who was originally lying on 
the ground, was swallowed by this crack. Go in. The soil quickly closed, 
thanking the subconscious and stabbing into the heart. I felt that the tip of 
the sword was all muddy, and there was no stab in the flesh and blood. He 
only reacted. This sword did not kill Lang Ying, and I did not know 
whether it was regret or glad. At this time, the white man sneered again, 
thanking him for throwing a sword to him. 


The sword went like lightning, and the long sword passed through the body 
and nailed to the tree. The man slammed into the ground. Xie pity grabbed 
the front to check, but only saw a group of white clothes on the ground 
wilting, the dressing people were gone out of thin air! 


The appearance and disappearance of this person are very different. 
Thanks for a burst of horror, not dare to carelessly, one hand raised the 
sadness, said: "Go." 


Grace said: "Don't go! Cousin, set fire to the mountain cousin! There are a 
lot of Yong'an in this mountain. Those who are sitting on the gates of the 


city are hiding in the mountains, giving them a fire. It’s burned!” 

Xie pity dragged him for a while, feeling that the yin was getting heavier 
and heavier. There seemed to be countless pairs of eyes looking at them. 
He said: "How strange 1s this person, you didn't see it? This place should 
not stay for a long time. "" 


Graceful words: "What about weirdness? You are God, is this little demon 
still afraid of them? Dare to get in the way and kill directly." 


Thanks to pity: "Go back and talk." 


Seeing him perfunctory, he refused to burn the mountain, and his eyes 
widened. He said, "Why? This group of people has made me like this, we 
have to be right with us. Just now you heard it. He said that he would 
destroy Xianle! To destroy our country! Why don't you kill them, just like 
you did today on the battlefield!" 


"..." Xie pity breathed a stagnation, anger said: "Why are you always 
thinking about killing the light and killing the light! Can civilians and 
soldiers be the same?" 


Grace asked: "What's the difference? Not all people, who is not the same?" 
Thanks for being poked at him, and a **** rush came up: "You...!" 


At this moment, he suddenly felt ankle tight, looked down, actually there 
was a bloated hand from the dense bushes, and grabbed his boots! 


At the same time, the front of the "squeaky" number, the tree rains and 
falls generally seven or eight figures, kneeling on the ground can not 
climb. Although it is human, it is not as good as it is, like countless large 
worms, slowly creeping towards this side. Grace lost the voice: "Who?!" 


Thanks for a sword and a broken hand, Shen Sheng said: "Not a person, is 
a Slave!" 


Once upon a time, thank you have never heard of any such thing on the 
mountain near the Imperial City. Even if there are any monsters and 


ghosts, they will soon be leveled by the emperors. Then, this group of 
slaves is only possible. Who was deliberately put here? 


Xie pity did not expect that this war, there will be non-human things 
involved. Looking back at all kinds of clues, he increasingly felt that the 
other party and Lang Ying were a group of people, and they robbed him of 
his grace. He just wanted to lead him out, but he couldn’t care about it at 
this time. Every time he swings his sword, he can put seven or eight slaves 
neatly into two sections. However, once the slaves appear, they are all in 
droves. Sure enough, the four bushes and shrubs are ringing. Shaking more 
and more, more and more obscure flesh-colored human figures have 
climbed out, and the source 1s constantly pouring into the pity, and only 
flocking to pity. He killed ten of his swords and immediately rushed to 
twenty. Just as the blessings of the sword were inexhaustible, the slaves of 
a tree smashed the back of the pity, and threw it from the air! 


Who knows, it is not close, it is cut off by a cold light. Grace did not bring 
weapons, naturally it is impossible for him to cut off, thank you for 
looking back and found that the sword is actually the young soldier! 


He was prayed in front of the city gate and couldn't see the figure. He 
actually followed and found them. The boy took a broken sword and 
brushed a few times and licked a few slaves. It was useful. These things 
climbed and divided on one side | very sticky body|liquid, screaming and 
disgusting, stepping on a few feet on a slightly weaker slave, and found 
that this thing 1s not terrible, wondering : "Not so bad?" 


He did not know that the slaves often appeared in conjunction with other 
fierce evils. Thanks for biting his lips, his right hand was stained with 
blood and smeared on the blade. At the end, I put the sword into the hand 
of Grace, and said: "You two will take this sword first! There will be no 
things to dare to approach you. Don't look back when you hear anything on 
the road. Remember, never look back!" 


Grace: "Cousin! I..." 


Xie pity interrupted: "There 1s a strong behind, if you come later, you will 
not be able to take care of you. It is better to go back and report!" 


Grace did not speak again, took the sword and ran. The sword in his hand 
has been prayed for the light, and along the way, the slaves and other evils 
are not close, unimpeded, and disappear quickly. And the young soldier 
still did not leave, Grace has taken the lead to leave, Xie Li did not have 
the second bodyguard sword to him, only Yi Jian for the palm, and even 
bombing, plus the boy also worked hard to cooperate, a musk After that, 
all the slaves were finally cleared. 


Mud and corpses in one place, endless. After confirming that there was no 
omission of a slave, he thanked him for his calmness and turned around. 
He said to the boy: "Your sword makes it good." 


The boy clenched the sword and was still slightly gasping. He stood up 
again and said, "Yes, yes." 


Thanks to pity: "I am not ordering. What do you say to me? When I 
ordered you to go back, why didn't you say 'yes'?" 


That boy said: "Yes." It was strange when I finished talking, and stood 
even more straight. Xie pity shook his head, thought about it, suddenly 
took a corner of his mouth, said: "However, you are more suitable to use a 
knife." 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 80: Gentle 
hometown wants to Keep the golden body 


The boy stunned and said, "Why?" 


Thanks in the mind, he played back a trick of killing the slaves. He said: 
"You haven't tried using a knife? You make the sword, the sword is swift, 
although it is fast and absolutely, but It seems that there are some hands 
and feet that can't be opened. If you haven't used a knife, it's better to try it 
next time. I think the power might be stronger." 


Every time he sees people have wonderful things, they can't help but want 
to exchange a few words. They don't mean to be arrogant, but they want to 
actively discuss with each other with interest. Because his combat 
experience 1s too rich, he often wants to know it without thinking about it, 
but he can't say it for a while, but he feels that it must be like that. Most of 
the others will listen to him and he will rarely listen to it. He said that 
there is no reason. The boy is listening carefully, as if thinking, and 
looking at the sword from time to time. Speaking a few words, suddenly 
the forest in the darkness of the four wild is a sound of the sound of the 
cable, as if something has climbed quickly, thanking the pity and 
remembering that it is still in crisis, this is a bit out of place, and 
immediately regained its true color: I don’t know if there are any other 
evils on this mountain. I have to clean up completely." 


The boy nodded hard and put the iron sword in his hands and hands. Xie 
pity shook his head and said: "You can protect yourself. You can't leave, 
you can't go now. I try to protect you, you must be vigilant." ” 


At this time, I saw the grass tremble, and what was flying fast, thanking 


the pity, the hand was a palm, hitting it, the scream of the thing" ", not 
moving. Thanks for the smell of blood, it is not strange: if they are slaves, 
they are all exuded and come out with slimy body fluids. They are very 
sticky and will not give off this **** smell, so look forward. Putting out 
the grass, it really is a big-headed slave, has been beaten by his palm, but 


it is not it, but the thing that squats in his mouth - a broken scalp with long 
hair ! 


The slaves made a living by eating the residue. It seems that there are 
already living people killed. It climbed all the way, a little bit of blood 
dripping on the grass, and Xie pity immediately followed the blood to go 
forward, the young soldier followed him. The more you go forward, the 
thicker the blood, the heavier the blood, and soon, I heard a cry of 
powerlessness. 


The little soldier lifted his sword to the front of Xie, and thanked him for 
pulling him behind him. Turning over a flowering shrub, a half-large cave 
presents the eyes of two people. 


This cave was probably a temporary place for some people. Now, the 
corpse is full of land, and twenty or thirty slaves are squatting on the 
ground. There are five or six, and there is a **** the ground. The girl 
looked painful, was opened and laparotomy, the internal organs flowed to 
the ground, but the people were still alive. She seems to be still simple to 
dress, wearing a lot of bright red flowers, bright red blood lined with her 
bright red flowers, especially cruel. 


And the group of slaves, who are licking her steaming internal organs, are 
ready to open their mouths, and suddenly hear someone approaching, 
brushing their heads back, and rushing toward them. Xie pity eyes do not 
turn, a palm of the hand, killing all, immediately check the body. These 
corpses have men and women, old and young, all of them are gray-faced, 
and a simple cloth, undoubtedly all Yongan civilians, thank you for being 
shocked. 


He thought that the monsters and monsters that suddenly appeared in the 
mountains were all brought by the strange white people. The white man 
saved Lang Ying, and most of them were with him. But why do these 
slaves feed on Yongan civilians? Non-human things will not be alliances 
with others for no reason. Could it be that this is the exchange condition of 
Lang Ying? Take the life of someone who follows you as a bargaining 
chip? ! 


The girl was sore and scared, her mouth was bleeding, and she whimpered: 
"Don't kill me, I haven't done anything bad, don't kill me!" 


Thanks, I can’t help but think of the family of three who died under the 
wall that day. What bad things have they done? Leaning over, the tone is 
softer and softer, saying: "Don't be afraid. Nothing, I am here to save you." 


The little soldier pointed the sword at the girl and said: "His Royal 
Highness, beware of the deep mountain fairy." 


Xie pity naturally knows that there is such a possibility, and it is very 
likely, but after he has considered it, he still feels that he can't ignore it. He 
gave the girl a moment, turned over her palm prints and fingerprints, 
quickly determined that she was a living person, and never practiced, the 
hands of the chickens, then immediately began to treat, remove the 
medicine bottle from the sleeve, screw Open the plug, a faint light white 
smoke filled the air, the smell is fragrant. 


This medicine can not only alleviate the temporary symptoms of all kinds 
of poisonous, but also has a miraculous effect on the wound. Thanks for 
not cherishing the elixir, a bottle is used up to her, and said: "Is it better?" 


The girl was extremely hurt and was terrible. After inhaling the smoke, her 
face recovered a little blood, and she nodded weakly. Thanks to pity: "Are 
you a Yongan person? How can this be?" 


The girl shed tears: "...Yes, I am. I don't know why. Originally, hey, it was 
good. Suddenly, I was dying, my brother was dead..." 


Xie pity patted her shoulder and said: "Who is killing their murderer? Or 
something?" 


The girl choked: "The murderer who killed them is... is... you are!" 


She said the last sentence, suddenly her face was dark, her eyes were 
soaring, her arms wide open, and she hugged her thanks! 


The young soldier had been vigilant and reacted so fast that a sword 
stabbed her vest. The girl had been seriously injured, and he was stabbed 
in it. It was definitely not alive. However, she laughed happily, and she 
refused to let her go. She did not let go and maintained this position. She 
was too tight, and the young soldier could easily drag her body out and 
said, "His Royal Highness! How are you?" 


Xie pity also thought that this girl finally wanted to attack. But she didn't 
have a weapon, she didn't even have a bite, just hugged him tightly, as if it 
was satisfied, and she didn't let go. He lost his voice: "I am not good, I..." 


The voice did not fall, as if ridiculing him, a sudden stun. 
The little soldier raised a black eye and said: "His Royal Highness!!!" 


Xie pity only felt a bitter heartburning, unable to speak, and did not want 

to talk, but did not want to listen to people, shook his head and raised his 

hand. At this time, surrounded by four sides, there was a burst of laughter 
from the woman. 


"Hahahaha...... 7 
"Hahahaha...... a 


The two were shocked and found that there was no third person around. 
The laughter turned out to be those bright red flowers! 


Thanks for the moment, I understand that he has fallen into a trap - 
"Tender township"! 


This gentle township is not a gentle town. Gentle township 1s a kind of 
flower demon who loves to live in a concentrated way, taking the man's 
essence|gas essence|blood for a living. Their scent is not a good thing, 
thank you immediately: "Take your nose and mouth tight, don't **** the 
fragrance of the flower!" 


The young soldier had a strong bandage on his face and filtered a layer, so 
he did not inhale the aroma, heard the tight bandage, and reacted to the 


unobstructed object, tearing down the whole body. Clean sleeves, smashed 
hard, patted, cleaned, hands to him, thank you but said: "No. No use." 


He treated the girl, although she was prepared, but she did not guard 
against the smell, and she was very close. She did not know that she was 
wearing a "gentle township". Before she died, she still hugged her thanks. 
Make sure nothing is wrong. In other words, Xie Pity has long been 
unknowingly taking a few mouthfuls of gentle fragrance, this time, can be 
regarded as a real "sentimental". 


After the gentle fragrance enters the body, the man will be impetuous. No 
power, no more arrogance. Now it’s soft and it’s like being sucked up. 
After a while, it’s going to become a barrel of explosives. If the strange 
white man appears again at this time, Xie Pity really does not know how 
much he can handle. He originally couldn’t understand the other party’s 
ability. The first reaction is to touch the medicine bottle. However, it’s 
only to think of it. The medicine has been used up to save the girl. 
However, people did not live in the end. 


He glanced at the body next to him, and the girl smiled at herself with a 
smile, as if she had been able to see the enemy before she died and was 
finally able to see her loved ones. It’s strange to blame the **** scene to 
dilute the dangerous colors of the flowers, and the blood 1s diluting the 
strange floral fragrance. He never imagined that a girl who is only fifteen 
or sixteen years old will have this kind of grievance to the extreme look. 
This is a decisive thing. 


Over there, the flower demon are extremely excited, hehe: 
"Get hooked." 

"Catch it." 

"It’s the Prince Edward." 

"It's him." 


"Good Jun... my roots, my roots can't be controlled, climb out of the soil!" 


The young soldier slashed his sword and flattened a piece of flowers. 
However, the flower|stem was so flexible that the broken sword was 
smashed once, and then the sputum was somewhat blunt. The flower 
demon screamed and screamed: "Ah! This little brother, who has no hair, 
is very fierce! People are going to bloom soon, how can you pay me?" 


The young soldier was angry in his eyes: "Looking for death! I burned you 
with a fire!" 


The flowers and demon's green leaves are forked on the stems and cried: 
"It's so powerful! We didn't provoke you, what are you doing so!" 


Xie pity also said: "Do not burn! They are demon, burned ... will produce a 
poisonous suffocation. Can not pull!" The boy immediately stopped the 
hand to pull, thankful and pity, "the stem is all Stinger..." 


The flowers demon are very delicate: "Oh, my Royal Highness is gentle, 
thank you for protecting us. Wait, we will soon be the result! It will hurt! I 
love you, hehe..." 


"The man who repaired the boy's work from a young age is not much. 
Although he broke his body, the mana is going to drop a layer of realm. 
However, he has to grieve, oh..." 


The flowers of the gentle township rubbed against each other, giggling and 
smirking, and the sorrowful feelings were exposed. The young soldiers 
were stunned for a long time. What "boys", "broken bodies", "realms" 
seemed to be half I don't understand, but I also heard that this is not a good 
word. While struggling to sway the sword and swearing, I want to 
overwhelm the laughter and let me hear it. Xie pity is that the two-finger 
festival is in the middle of the car. 


That's it! 
It turned out that this series of tonight is really to deal with his special set. 


Just robbing a person, it is to calculate the pride and consideration of his 
Xianle Wushen, will certainly choose to pursue it alone, the big things 


become small. The seriously injured girl was in order to consume his 
elixir, so that he could not alleviate it after inhaling the gentle fragrance. 
The demon ghosts and the living people cooperate with each other only to 
wait for him at this step. 


This way of repentance is indeed a requirement that must be the body of a 
boy. After the descendants of this vein have ascended, the people who 
came to visit the shrines are also convinced that the gods they worship 
must be extraordinary and unappealing. Therefore, if you do not hold on, 
you will undoubtedly cause the believer to collapse and the mana will be 
greatly damaged. Although it will not be serious enough to fall directly 
from the priest to a mortal, after a few years of hard work, I still have the 
opportunity to repair it again, but at this juncture, there is still room for 
him to work for a few years! 


The Emperor's view of the Qing Dynasty is strict and strict. As the best 
person in the world, Xie Li has never broken the ring and the moment. He 
thinks that he has already been repaired like a stone. The wind can't blow 
his heart and waves, and he has experienced many such tests. Every time, 
you can pass the perfection. However, although the heart is like water, but 
after all, the young face is thin, at this time there 1s a little soldier on the 
side, listening to those **** who can not even count these hints, swearing| 


| The flowers are wrapped around the flowers | cotton, bloody, heart- 
thirsty, thankful and pity, a little bit of shame, a touch of twilight on the 
face, partial hate, is not standing. 


Now I can barely support it. If this group of gentle townships 1s really 
fruitful, then it will be a big problem. The best way is of course to quickly 
return to the imperial city, let the wind and the love of the law, but thank 
you, now even stand up and have a soft foot, all helpless, only to the small 
soldier said: "you ... come over." 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 81: Gentle 
hometown wants to keep the golden body 2 


It was said that the young soldier’s back was suddenly stiff and slowly 
turned, but he did not dare to come. At the moment, the situation is urgent, 
see him hesitate, thank you for a rush of anger, and endure the dryness: 
"You don't be afraid, I won't be like you. Come over!" 


Finally, the boy took a step. I rushed to the front of the body, and slammed. 
Breathing and taking a breath, he extended a hand to him and said, "...help 
me up and take me away." 


The young soldier carefully held the hand. As if the dying person finally 
found a reliance, thank you for the moment the whole person relaxed and 
fell to the boy. 


As he was immersed in the gentle township, his body temperature rose and 
he was already hot. However, the boy’s palm was actually hot with him, 
and he was still shaking. 


Thanks for a while, and after a little effort, he took a sigh of relief and 
stood up. He did not want a person who was shorter than himself to 
support himself. He walked slowly under the help of a few steps. Who 
knows, but listened to the flowers and demons: "Don't, Your Royal 
Highness, don't leave. 'He' Just waiting for you on the road, if you leave 
here, you will meet 'he'." 


"he"? 
Thank you, "Who is ‘he’?” 


When it comes to this person, the gentle towns seem to be slightly chilly, 
stagnate for a moment, and must be ashamed, muttering: '"‘He’ is ‘he’.” 


The flowers nodded to each other and said, “‘He’ is ‘he’. It’s the one who 
brought us here.” 


Although they did not dare to say the name or identity of the person, thank 
you for your pity, and immediately appeared the half-smile and half-smile 
mask. He said: "What you mean is that if I go back now, the person who 
digs you here will kill me on the road; if I stay here, he will not come to 
me, is it?” 


The flower demon are very satisfied and nodded. Thanks for the 
namelessness in the heart. 


Don't kill him, just trap him here, limited to such a difficult situation, this 
is deliberate to play, he still wants to? ! It’s better to just come out and die! 


Slightly calm, he pressed the annoyance. It seems that the other party did 
not intend to defeat him in the face. It seems that he only wants him to 
lose his mana, lose his realm and lose his faith. 


These sacred devils are not necessarily true, but even if it is not the truth, 
think about it, even if the boy is holding or carrying him all the way, they 
may not be able to go back safely. If the other party deliberately throws 
down a few women halfway, the situation is even worse. 


Weighed a moment, thanked the pity for a hot breath, closed my eyes and 
said: "Take me to the cave over there." 


The young soldier followed his words and helped him through the corpse 
of a land and went to the cave. Thanks and whispered: "Stop." 


The little soldier stopped. Xie Pian even raised his hand and trembled, 
saying: "What about your sword?" 


The teenager supported him with his left hand and freed his right hand to 
lift the sword. Thanks for giving a hand, pulling up the sleeves, revealing a 
small half of the arm, under the white moonlight, like a cold fat jade, the 
boy breathed a stagnation, but pity but did not pay attention, whispered: 
"Stabbed me a sword." 


Holding the hand of the broken sword immediately hanged down, thanking 
the pity: "Don't be afraid, you only have a thorn, a deeper thorn. I have to 


set up a line, there is no other magic weapon at hand, you have to see 
blood." 


The young soldier said: "Your Highness, please use my blood!" After that, 
he raised his arm and took the sword and cut it. He did not retain his 
strength. He said: "No! Your blood..." Catch up, a deep gap has appeared 
on the boy's arm, when bloody. Thank you, pray: "Oh... you..." 


His blood is an invaluable treasure that can be opened. How can a mortal 
blood compare with it? But seeing this soldier is sincere, can't bear to say 
that he is doing nothing, just saying: "Thank you, but still need some blood 
for my introduction." So, I took the sword, my hands trembled, cut a few 
After the second time, he was in the center of the arm. The red blood of 
Yin Hong flows down the white arm, and the two drops of arc in front of 
the cave are like two barriers. It can be described as a violent thing. Xie Li 
also specially mixed the blood of the boy. After the painting, he became 
more dizzy and said: "...Go in." 


The black hole in the cave, the boy took a fire from his arms, polished it, 
and the fire was bright and bright. 


The young soldier’s face was blocked behind the bandage, and it was 
covered with sternness. Cold sweat, hair slightly messy, **** lips, 
swelling and reddish. It was the wound that was only left when the lips 
were broken and the sword was opened. The fire tingled with pity and the 
eyes hurt, and the heat wave also caused him to be uncomfortable. Xie pity 
immediately said: "Do not ignite, destroy." 


The boy immediately lost his fire and stepped on it, and he fell into the 
darkness. Xie Li was helped by him into the cave. In a meditation and 
meditation posture, he sat on the ground and slowly said: "There is a task 
to be handed over to you now. Can you finish it?" 


'..." The boy was half-squatting on the ground and said to him, "Don't 
die!" 


Thanks for the temper of breath, and forced to calm down: "Before this 
cave, I set up a barrier, a total of two. Outside, it 1s not to let outside things 


come in; inside, is not to let people out inside. 


Breathing a few breaths silently, he continued: "Between the two barriers, 
there is a space for people, you are there, keep the hole. Don't go out if you 
hear anything outside; the same, no matter what you hear What happened 
to me inside, and I must never come in." 


The boy was slightly stunned: "His Royal Highness, are you alone?" 


Thanks: "Yes. I don't know what I will do... In short, you can't come in 
anyway." 


At this moment, he can't go back. And waiting for the rescue, Grace is 
estimated to be on the road now, just run back to the Imperial City to have 
a good time, waiting for him to move to save the soldiers, I do not know 
when. Only lock a site first, stick to the position, and think of ways to turn 
the gentle fragrance. He sighed: "The demon results, the power of charm is 
very strong. Most of them will soon mature..." 


At this time, the aroma in the air suddenly rose and interrupted his words. 
That soft and soft 


"The fruit is ripe!" 


Smell the scent of the extreme, thank you for feeling the heartbeat, the 
blood straight into the brain, bite his teeth: "Go out! Don't inhale the 
aroma, if they are close, don't be afraid. Anything is too There is no blood 
line, but as long as your feet are still stepping on the line, you can kill 
them with a sword." 


The young soldier glanced out, forced his head and ran out with a sword, 
stuck between the two blood lines at the hole. Outside the cave, in a 
corpse, the clusters of flowers are more and more beautiful. And the whole 
piece of flowers is faintly trembled, as if the roots underneath it will break 
out. Soon, something really broke out - it was a woman's head! 


The head of the "woman" grew out of the soil and breathed into the fresh 
air on the soil. It seemed to be extremely intoxicating, and the eyes 
became a seam. Immediately, the exposed soil was half a round shoulder, 
and an arm climbed out. 


The fruit of the gentle fragrance is tied under the roots. And the fruit that 
grows after their maturity is the female figure of all kinds. 


At the time of maturity, countless naked girls | body girls broke out, they 
picked up the bright red flowers on their heads, bathed in the moonlight, 
and stretched their limbs. Those who originally scented the aromas were 
those little flowers, and now they are the enchanting women. They took 
pictures of the soil on the body of Feng Yu, and they took a long hair and 
walked toward the cave entrance. They smiled and said: "His Royal 
Highness, we are coming!" 


Inside the cave is also full of rich aroma, suffocating, thanking the pity 
and sitting in the hole, the heart of the meditation of morality. However, it 
didn't make much difference. Those who sang the demon did not know 
how to be ashamed. There were countless screams of Yan language 
whispering outside the cave. What kind of babies, brothers and brothers, 
and a screaming, called him upset, so he changed his mind. Alum: "Five 
colors make people blind and whispering. It's fascinating to catch up with 
the madness of the goods. It's awesome... The victory wins the cold, the 
heat is quiet, the world is right... The good ones, the good ones, the good 
ones..." I didn’t pay attention to the verses that flowed back and forth on 
weekdays. The banshees outside the cave clap their hands and smiled: 
"Good prince, good heart, my lord, you are not a monk, what you read... 
oh!" 


Just listening to the screams, it seems that the young soldier did not say 
anything, but under the hand, he made a slap, and the sword slashed, 
causing the group of banshees to flee, saying: "kill the demon!" 


Some of them are far away: "The dead monster you killed this day, the 
little monster that burns the flowers with a hot hand! I don't know how to 
pity the jade!" 


"Scared to death, scared to death, so big, people are so embarrassed! When 
you grow up, you still have it!" 


This group of flower demon eagerly squeezed into the cave. The partiality 
was not squeezed in. The time was not to see the bloodline on the ground. 
It was thought that there was a person blocking the cave. After discussing 
for a while, gathered in the distance, not far away, said: "Little brother, 
what do you want to stop here and not let us go? We are not doing bad 
things, just want to find the Prince Edward to be happy." 


"Small generals, don't bother us to find the good things of the Prince." 


"This little brother is quite aggressive, but unfortunately, it is too small 
and tender. He probably doesn't even know what ‘good things are!’ 


In the sneer of the flowers and demon giggles, Xie pity blinked slightly, I 
saw the mouth of the cave, standing with a dark silhouette, it was a boy 
with both hands holding a sword, as if he would die. . Suddenly, a female 
demon said: "I said little brother, you don't want to be here with a stick. 
What are you doing? Or else, come with me to be happy and happy? What 
do you like? I How about this?" 


The young soldier still did not say anything. The banshee thought that he 
had to go through the barriers when he entered the cave. He tried his best 
and made a slap in the face: "What about me?" 


"How about this? You see, I can't see?" 
"Do you like me, do you like it?" 


However, from the beginning of the laughter, to the later complaints, to 
the final curse, the boy is always the same, far away, not swearing, close to 
cut. Thanks to the pity, before the gentle township was unearthed, you 
could freely fabricate your own appearance in the soil, and wanted to make 
a sound reminder, but did not dare to speak for some reason. It’s easy to 
get through the bursts of hot, tide, he said: "Don’t look at them..." 


The light resists the bloodyness of the brain, which has exhausted him. 
Therefore, the voice is extremely light and extremely low. The young 
soldier suddenly heard it. Immediately, he said loudly: "Yes! Your 
Highness, you... How are you? Already?" 


Thanks for your pity: "No problem. If it is difficult, seal your eyes and 
nose and mouth..." 


The young soldier had not answered yet. At this time, a female demon 
suddenly laughed and said, "I know! Children, I guess, your favorite, must 
be like this?" 


It seems that there is another new gentle township that has broken ground. 
Outside the cave, suddenly there was a silence. And the young soldier 
seemed to hold his breath at once. 


The next moment, the stunned laughter of the banshee almost turned over 
the whole person. 


They clapped their hands and screamed: "Hey! You can’t do it anymore, 
it’s incredible!" 


"My mom! How did you come to mind? It’s absolutely hahahahahahaha... 
Look at it! This kid is all gone, I see eight achievements like this!" 


"That's right! I thought this dead devil is a stone. Who knows it is wrong, 
little age, so bold!" 


"Ganbai downwind, sweetly go down the wind! How about children, such a 
fragrant | Yan beautiful, still not coming over to be happy?" 


"Through this village, you can't have this store. At this time, you don't 
come, you just want to eat it for eight hundred years! Or, let us help you? 


Right now... oh... ..." 


The young soldier was completely irritated, and the voice brought the 
meaning of Sen Han: "...you, find, die!" 


At the same time, the politeness in the cave is reaching its limit. 


He only felt that there was chaos in his ears, he was still sitting still, and 
his body was dumping forward. Fortunately, his hands barely supported the 
ground. However, this is down, the teeth are not clenched for a while, and 


the lips are leaking a painful and unbearable |. 2k novel reading 
network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 82: Gentle 
hometown wants to keep the golden body 3 


After the sound was released, Xie pouted and slammed his mouth. 
The young soldier turned suddenly and said: "...His Royal Highness?" 


Thanks for the pity, one hand to the ground, one hand screaming, the 
breath is disordered, the shoulders are twitching. Just listen to this voice, 
look at this back, I am afraid that most of them will think that he is 
weeping. 


Thanks to this life, no matter how steep it is, no matter how fast it is 
before flying. It is much harder than the most rigorous cultivation in the 
Emperor. His hands on the ground did not work, and the whole body fell to 
one side, lying on the ground and seeing the boy like to come in, thanked 
and said: "Don't come over! I said no matter what you hear, don't come 
over!!!" ” 


The boy stopped. Thanks to pity, it is easy to turn over the body, face up, 
breathing is barely smooth, and the body's rushing in the limbs is a wave 
higher than a wave. The banshee outside the cave listened to his tossing 
and turning, and the fire was so strong. They clap their hands and smiled 
and said: "Good temple, why is this coming! You are afraid of losing 
believers today, don't come to enjoy this happy life; Minger you are afraid 
of losing believers. I don’t dare to do anything else. This is a sacred 
official. Isn’t this a bitter prisoner who has been shackled by your 
followers? Such a god, if you don’t do it, you have to lose it, why not 
make yourself happy? Come and go, let him know what to do!" 


Thanks to the forehead, a few shallow blue veins floated, and the emotions 
were out of control. The anger said: "Shut up!!!" 


The banshee was naturally not afraid of him at this time, and he laughed at 
the little soldier: "Little brother, do you have any reason to say it? 
Hahahaha..." 


"Hey... are you standing here, uncomfortable?" 


Cold sweat has already soaked him all over the body, thanking him for 
being extremely irritated, reaching out and tearing open his chest clothes, 


only to ask for a little coolness. Just listening to the sound of " "he 
suddenly reacted: How did this hand suddenly come up with a little 
strength? Although the strength of the force was fleeting, it was soon gone, 
but he felt a little sense, and sure enough, the numbness passed, and the 
strength was gradually rising. However, thanking one heart was sinking. 


Into this gentle township, it is first numb, and then arrogant. The 
numbness has passed, and after a while, it is a madness. Although he 
specially set up two barriers in front of the cave, the road inside was to 
stop himself from losing his senses and rushing out, but he did not know 
how to stop. This moment of waking is not easy to come by, thank you for 
your time, and your mind is turning and thinking about the corresponding 
Strategy. 


Suddenly, he thought of a section: The episode of gentle township is very 
fast. It can be said that the **** brain is out of control. Why does he 
support it now? Is there any other reason besides his determination? 


Thinking of this, Xie pity took a deep breath and bowed slightly to the 
head of the boy who was unable to get into the hole. "You... come in." 


It was said that the young soldier seemed to want to rush to him 
immediately. After a few steps, he remembered that he was angry and said, 
"No matter what you hear, don't come in." I don't know if I should go in. 
Thanks to the change of mouth, but also helpless, said: "You are advanced 
to say." 


The boy did not hesitate and rushed in. 


The wall was long and narrow, the hole was warm and humid, and it was 
dark. It stretched out and could not see the five fingers. With the patience 
and pressure, the young man groped into front of him and thanked him: 
"You put the sword down... on the ground. Beside me, don't go too far." 


The young soldier said: "Yes!" This handed over his only self-defense 
weapon, and placed it near the corner. Thanks again, "Please help me up." 


The boy was half beside him, reaching out to help him. Who knows, he 
took a hand, the fingertips touched not the fabric, but the warm skin. 


The hands immediately retracted. Xie Pity was also cold and could not be 
burned by the hands of a hot teenager. Only then did he think that he was 
upset and broke his shirt on the ground. The original man had nothing to 
do with the upper body, but it was a bit embarrassing to put it in this 
situation. But there is no need to point out what to do and what to do. The 
boy probably understood, and waited for the pity to open his mouth. He 
reached out again and pulled his red|naked shoulders to lift quickly, then 
immediately withdrew. Thanks for leaning on the wall of the cave, the vest 
was attached to the cool rock, slowing down, and I noticed that the other 
party had retired two steps and said: "Wait, don't go out!" 


He said that this young soldier immediately did it and immediately settled. 
Thanks for your pity: "You cut a small amount of my hair down. I am 
useful." 


The boy answered his hand. However, in the darkness, the object was 
unclear, and the long hair was neatly bundled behind him. He could not 
touch the hair of the pity, but he accidentally touched a piece of skin with a 
pity, smooth and flexible. Thin sweat, slippery and slippery. Xie pity 
originally endured uncomfortable. This boy was too touched by the place. 
The chest seemed to have a passing current, and the feeling of numbness 
spread to the whole body. 


In an instant, both of them were stiff. 

And the group of flowers and demon outside the cave can not wait to erect 
their ears and listen, where will they miss? They all said: "Ah, what is this 
inside?" 


"Don't die." 


"Don't listen." 


When they are laughing at their own hard work, thank you for your 
gratitude: "You...!" 


Listening to his anger, the young soldier was too busy to withdraw his 
hand and did not dare to touch it again. Xie pity naturally does not bite his 
teeth. In his eyes, this soldier is just a child. I thought that I was afraid of 
offending him. I thanked him with a soft tone and said, "Don’t panic, you 
continue, ignore them." 


The other party dumbly said: "Yes." However, it seems to be flustered. I 
haven't touched the place where I touched it for a long time. When I found 
out that I was wrong, I shrank my hand. Finally, I had to go along with the 
chest and go all the way. Thanks for the misery, I can’t wait for the back of 
my head to smash into the hole, and I’m fainting. Finally, the boy touched 
the throat that gleamed and trembled, and then went back and caught him 
with a strand of hair. He only took a very thin glimpse, carefully cut the 
sword and cut it, and immediately said: "His Royal Highness, well!" 


At this time, thank you for some strength, and the hand can be lifted up. 
He said: "Give me your hand." 


The boy raised his hand. Xie pity took the thin hair from his hand and 
made a knot on one of his fingers. The boy stunned for a while, trembled: 
"His Royal Highness, is this?" 


Thanks and pity: "The demon fragrance is going to enter the second 
weight. I have to use your sword. If there is anything to hurt you later, you 


can raise this hand and protect your life. Now, Go out soon." 


For a long while, the young soldier withdrew from the cave. The group of 
flowers demon screamed: "Come out?" 


"It’s always calculated." 


"Keeping us out, you have gone in. Children, you can't do this kind of 
thing!" 


At the same time, thank you for feeling more energy on the limbs. He took 
a deep breath and grabbed the broken sword left by the young soldier in 
his right hand, fixed his mind, raised his sword, and stroked his left arm. 


When you are stunned, it 1s like pulling out the fog in front of you, and the 
five senses are slightly clear. 


Sure enough! 


Thanks to the left arm, blood and cross-flow, but in my heart, it seems to 
have caught a line of life in the chaos. 


The aroma of the gentle township makes people feel awkward and evokes 
the desire of people to sleep at the bottom of their hearts. The more severe 
the depression in the past, the more the rebound will be after inhaling the 
aroma. And the pity that has been suppressed in the past, in addition to 
"love | desire", is "killing". 


This "killing desire" cannot be to kill the devil. Because the devil and the 
ghost have killed a lot in the past, can not be suppressed. The object of 
"killing" must be a person, or a god, so that there is a sense of "forbidden". 
Before entering the hole, Xie pity set up his own sword in order to set up a 
sword. At that time, he saw blood, so it played a relief role for the gentle 
township, because it kills himself and is also killing. 


In the end, "love | desire" and "killing | desire" are extremely aggressive 
desires, thoughts, and even pity has also been heard, some people think 
that the two are essentially the same. Then, based on this, you can find an 
alternative way to get through the difficulties. 


Determined this point, thank you for not hesitating to put a sword on the 
left arm, each stroke of a sword will feel a little clear. I am very happy, but 
I don’t know if the gentleness of the gentle township is blaming in the 
body. In the moment when "killing|satisfaction" is satisfied, there is a 
surge of enthusiasm in the body. 


This wave of enthusiasm swept through every inch of his head from the 
top of his head to the toes, and it was easy to break the barriers that he had 


been struggling to resist. When he realized that he was scorned, he had 
already scorned. 


If there is only one person in the cave, Xie Pity can't believe that the voice 
was from him. He scared him with a sly look and widened his eyes. "It is 
clear that this method is feasible. How can this be?" 


Looking at the sword again, I suddenly remembered that the young soldier 
used this sword to cut the roots of the flower, and also killed the adult- 
shaped banshee. The blade was already contaminated with the juice of the 
gentle town. He used this sword to seek relief from the injury. The first 
sword was stabbed with two points. The second sword had to use the three- 
point force to achieve the same soothing effect. Is it not drinking and 
quenching thirst? ! 


It is also that he is fainting, otherwise he has already noticed this. Xie pity 
to sneak into himself, this is the end of the matter, had to tear the left 
sleeve crazy to wipe the sword, then tore the right sleeve, stuffed into his 
mouth, biting, and restrained. 


This scorn was forced to break between his teeth and his teeth. However, 
the caves spontaneously echoed, and all the subtle sounds were overlapped 
and amplified. Moreover, the young soldier listened to his instructions and 
had blindfolded his eyes. He could only listen to the sounds and the ears 
were more sensitive. Are you aware of the abnormality? He couldn’t hold 
back anymore, trembled: "His Royal Highness?" 


Such an embarrassing situation 1s really a shameful shame in life. It is 
hard to imagine how sorry it would be if he was hit by someone else. Even 
if it was dark in the cave, he couldn’t stand it. He said, “Don’t come in!!!” 


However, he still bite Buze in his mouth, and it sounded like a sigh of 
relief. It was extremely pitiful. The young soldier listened and was even 
more anxious. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 83: Gentle 
hometown wants to keep the golden body 4 


Thanks to the left hand has been stabbed bloody, but after all, it is only 
"injury", did not "kill", desires and hopes will never be fully satisfied. That 
Bussel couldn't bite, and fell from his mouth. He started to squat and the 
next sword stabbed into his left leg. This sword is quite deep, and the 
blade is sharp. The young soldier can't help it anymore. Hearing the 
footsteps of the embarrassed, scared and thanked again and again, 
retreating to the back of the wall and desperately shrinking back, said: "No 
no no! Don't come, don't, don't..." 


The second blood line at the entrance of the cave was specially designed to 
stop himself. He couldn’t stop the boy. He could still hide back in the safe 
area. But now the gentle fragrance has begun a second round of attack, as 
long as the boy comes in, thank you for the fate of his life on the spot, 
where will he let him escape again? He was afraid that he would kill the 
child by hand and could only avoid it. The young soldier heard the fear in 
his tone and said: "His Royal Highness..." 


Killing | The meaning of abuse is in the blood of the gods. He rubbed his 
hand and mentioned the broken sword. He heard a voice in his heart: "I 
won't die, I won't die, I won't die!!!" 


The next moment, when the opportunity is decided, reverse the sword 
front. 


In the darkness, the young soldier faintly flashed through the cold light 
and shouted: "His Royal Highness!!!" 


And thanking the pity has been a sword down, passing himself through the 
belly, dead and nailed to the ground! 


A sharp and sharp pain exploded from the abdomen and spread to the 
whole body, dispelling the heat and tide. Thanks to both hands, holding the 
hilt tightly, his eyes wide open. With a soft cough, the lips shed a trace of 


blood, and even the breathing was stagnant, and it did not move. The 
young soldier seemed to be stunned, and he "slammed" and squatted 
beside him. 


At this time, the screaming outside the cave: "Who!" 


The flower demons are very squeaky and screaming, but some people are 
more harsh than them, overshadowing all their voices: "What the hell!!!" 


Hearing this roar, thanked and suddenly took another breath. 
Wind letter! 


Another voice is sulking: "Tender township. Don't want to take a shot and 
hurry." 


This is naturally the feeling of having covered my nose and mouth. Feng 
Xin squinted his face and seemed to see something again. He screamed 
and said: "That is... Your Highness? Your Highness?! I | Fuck! I am really 
fucking!! This is what I want to do!" 


Mu Qing also "snapped" and said: "I really don't become a system, it's too 
disappointing!" However, the tone is not as angry as Feng Xin, but it is a 
bit like listening to a poor joke. Xie pity lies in the cave, I do not know 
what they are saying, probably guessing that they are dissatisfied with the 
banshee in front of themselves in the red | body | naked | body, there is a 
cold. Fengxin continued to scream, saying: "Hurry it! Don't be seen by 
others!" 


Then, just listening to a raging fire, burning sound, in the blazing flame, 
the screaming curse of the banshees gradually disappeared. Admire the 
feelings: "Burn clean, this banshee aroma is poisonous, leaving the seed 
grow up to be a bad thing." Xie pity to wait for the sound, only coughed, 
the two heard his voice, Chongshan Cave shouted: "His Royal Highness, 
are you inside?" 


Thanks: "...I am here..." 


Although he tried to keep his voice as smooth as possible, he was still 
weaker than usual. The two immediately passed, and they were blocked by 
the blood line at the hole. However, because they were familiar with the 
habit of forgiving, they also knew how to solve it. The wind trust took a 
palm of heart and took a few steps. It did not illuminate the deepest part of 
the cave. Suddenly said: "Who?" 


The feelings are also vigilant: "Is there other people in the hole?" 
Thanks to pity: "Nothing. A small soldier." 


The two were relieved and walked over. The bright fire reflected the warm 
orange color of the whole cave, and the pity lay on the ground, the long 
hair spread, the top of the coat faded, and a long sword passed through his 
abdomen and nailed him to the ground. 


See you, both of them are horrified. Feng Xin leaned over: "Who did it?!" 
Thank you, "I am myself." 
The feelings are awkward: "What happened?" 


Xie pity shook his head and said: "Don't mention it, it's so helpless, come 
out with this strategy. Get me out quickly." 


When the feelings came forward, he frowned and pulled the sword out. He 
was thrown aside and was picked up by the young soldier. Fengxin helped 
him to sit up and gave him a coat. Thanks to this, he said that he had met 
the night of the horror of the gentle township. He said: "You are coming 
faster than I thought. Grace?" 


Wind channel: "The grace was gone to the palace by the king. He was 
always swaying outside the city, so it was so easy to be seen. But when he 
went back, he knew that he had to find us first, but he was clear. "It can be 
seen that although the grace is extremely annoying to thank the two 
attendants, they also know that they are powerful. The two originally 
wanted to stay with one person to defend the city, but because of the 
sneaky ghosts and ghosts, they also held a sword with a blood of 


thanksgiving. The danger is beyond expectations, or they are coming 
together. This band in the back **** is very heavy, not difficult to find, 
and soon came over. 


Although Xie Pity is a soaring body, the ordinary sword can't hurt him at 
all. So he will never die if he is a sword. However, in the past two decades, 
he has almost never lost in real battles and life-and-death fights. After a 
while, this is the first time he suffered such a heavy injury, it is inevitable 
to slow down, so the wind letter back his preparation to return to the 
Imperial City. There was a strange pain in the abdomen. Xie pity 
frequently frowned, but tried to restrain and said: "You haven’t 
encountered anything on the way to you?" 


Admired: "No." 
Xie pity took a breath and said: "Beware, there are inhuman things..." 


He wanted to say something about the white-faced man who was crying 
and smiling, but because he was exhausted, the young man was holding the 
blood-stained iron sword behind him, and he was relieved. This closed his 
eyes. Recharge your batteries and sleep. 


Since he asked for his own time, Xie Pity has not closed his eyes for 
nearly a month. The backlog of the day has broken out, causing him to rest 
for three days. After three days, I suddenly woke up and found myself 
lying indoors. The ceiling above the sky was magnificent, it was the 
palace, and I sat up at once: "Fengxin!" 


Fengxin tried the bow outside and heard the sound coming in, saying: "His 
Royal Highness!" 


Thanks to the abdomen's wounds, he had already healed and immediately 
got out of bed. "Is it a long break? What can happen?" 


Wind channel: "Relieve. For a few days, there are no enemy incursions in 
these few days. If there is, I will not call you? Go to bed, you have no 
shoes." 


Thanks for this, I just let go of my heart and sit back on the bed. After a 
pause, he asked: "What about love?" 


Mu Qing also came in, holding the clothes he had prepared for him, 
saying: "Here." 


He served under the command of His Royal Highness, and the wind was on 
the sidelines: "However, although we did not fight these days, we found 
something." 


Thank you, "What is it?" 


Mu Qing said: "I didn't say Yongan over there. Do you suspect foreign aid? 
We went to the back and explored the situation. We saw several people. 
Although they were dressed by their own country, the accent was very 
strange, not like Xianle. I personally caught it, and sure enough, other 
countries are secretly supporting them, quietly transporting grain and 
armor." 


Otherwise, so many living people in Yong'an are crowded in a barren 
mountain, and it is impossible to peel the bark by eating wild vegetables 
until now! 


Fengxin said: "Mom's usual fakes are good, now that this time is stirring 
up the water, I want to be more and more chaotic!" 


The land of Xianle is rich in minerals and rich in gold and jewellery. The 
surrounding countries have been coveted for many years. Xie Pian has 
already expected this festival. He bowed his head and thought of another 
thing. He said: "What about the child?" 


Wind channel: "Which? That little soldier? That day was busy taking you 
to see the national division to see the situation, no one cares about him, 
probably returning to the team." 


Thanks for putting on his clothes, putting down his arms and sitting on the 
bed, he said: "The child is a good man. I think he is a good material for 
making a knife. If it is a good one, it will be amazing when you grow up. 


Come back and remember to take him. Find out, settle down, and mention 
it." 


Xie pity this person is to see the good hand and love, must mention that it 
is beautiful every day, this is not the first time, but he is still the first time 
to evaluate a child. He loved to listen to his praise for "the perfect material 
for making a knife", "growth must be amazing" Yunyun, the look is a little 
subtle, the hair that was replaced by thankfulness was made in the hands, 
turned and thrown aside. Feng Xin said: "I see that the kid is only 14 or 


five years old, too small, can mention what to do." 
The feelings are also faint: "Not very suitable. Not in the military." 


Thanks to the pity: "The gods are still able to go down, and the military 
still pays attention to so many rules." And praised, "You should really look 
at the child's killing slavery, beautiful." 


Speaking of the slaves, the strange white man flashed in front of his eyes. 
Wind channel: "His Highness, why is there such a female demon in the 
gentle town on the back slope? I have never heard of it before." 


Xie pity stood up and said: "This is what I wanted to tell you that day." 


He got emptied and finally said the thing of the crying mask. The three 
people buried a few words to discuss a few words, they did not dare to care 
about it, and they all felt that it was better to report to the heaven court. 
So, thanks to the door, first hurried to see the king and queen, and then on 
the temple of the gods of the Tai Cangshan. 


In the past, thankfulness will definitely return directly to Xianjing, and I 
will tell Junwu in person. However, at present, the situation is different. 
He took the initiative to leave Xianjing, which is equivalent to taking the 
initiative to hand over the keys. Now he has to go back and can't open the 
door. Plus, the day is too urgent, the voice of Shenwu Temple is awkward, 
and it feels like there is no to Jun. I am so embarrassed, therefore, he only 
paid a few tribute to the gods of the Emperor Wu of the gods in the 
Shenwu Temple, and he heard it when he was empty. However, there are no 
more than 10,000 and thousands of daily tribute to Junwu. There are 


countless backlogs, and some of them are big believers. When will they 
hear it, it really depends on the fate. He did not dare to pull out for too 
long, immediately returned to the battlefield and continued to defend the 
city. 


Perhaps because the first battle was too much, the foreign aid was cut off 
by the wind and the love. The Yongan side changed its strategy and no 
longer slammed. After a few months, I played a few games on a small 
scale, and the loss was not too bad. Compared to the first game, it was a 
small fight, and the strange white people did not appear again. Therefore, 
the Xianle Emperor City gradually relaxed, and the pity also rarely went 
down from the front line to the imperial city. Take a break and relax. 


He passed a small stone bridge, dialed a bridge and weeping willows, and 
saw the red squid in the water flowing under the bridge, swimming with 
his tail and happily swimming, very envious. After a while, I suddenly felt 
that someone staring at myself behind me, but turned around, but did not 
see people, quite strange, but did not feel murderous or malicious, do not 
care. 


After getting off the bridge, I walked slowly along Shenwu Street. All the 
way people went to him or excitedly or respectfully or delightfully. They 
called the Highness of the Prince, and thanked and prayed for a while, and 
walked for a while, feeling the eyes behind the man’s eyes. coming. 


This time, he had a plan in his heart, and suddenly looked back, and sure 
enough. After seeing a willow tree, I flashed back half a figure. Xie pity 
went up, and when he reached out, he was about to catch people, but he 
saw a bandaged teenager hiding behind the tree. He couldn’t help but say, 
"You are...?" 


The boy was covered with bandages, but his arms overlapped his face. He 
only showed a dark eye from the patched sleeves and said dryly: "Too, 
Prince Edward, I didn't mean it." 


Xie pity said to him: "You were that night..." 


The voice did not fall, he immediately remembered what happened on the 
night of a few months ago, how embarrassed he was. The picture in my 
mind was turbulent, my face was red, and my face was awkward. I quickly 
coughed and said: "It turned out to be you. I have been looking for you 
before, and I have forgotten too many things. Cough, are you not a soldier 
in the army? How is it in town?" 


The boy heard a sigh of relief and said: "I am not in the military now." 
Thank you very much, said: "Ah? Why not?" 


The boy was more surprised than him, saying: "I... was thrown out, Your 
Highness... you don't know?!" 


Thanks to the faction, "I know what?" 


He clearly said that he was a good girl. He is a good seed, and he should 
settle down and mention him. After the special smashing, this boy was 
taken out of the army? ? ? 


The boy was like an excitement and a happy one. He put down his arms 
and said: "You didn't know your Highness! I thought... I thought..." 


Thank you for listening to the more strange, said: "Come, come and tell 
me, how did you get it out? Who are you? Why do you think I will know? 
And, why are you?" 


The boy took a step toward him and did not speak. At this time, on the 
Shenwu Street, there was a horrified scream: "Ah-!!!" 


Xie pity looked back and saw that one person squinted and stumbled and 
rushed toward it. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 84: Human 
face epidemic unearthed 


The man was a tall man, madly rushing, the pedestrians on the street were 
knocked down by him several times, and they were dissatisfied: "What are 
you doing!" "What the fire of the hot days is running so fast..." "It's really 
the head." I saw walking without a face." 


As he spoke, several people laughed, but they were not really angry. Who 
knows, the man ran rampant, hitting a tall and gorgeous carriage, 
splashing blood on the spot! 


He fell to his back, and the passers-by who were originally joking 
screamed. The owner of the carriage was also shocked and sneaked out: 
"Who hit? Who hit?" 


Suddenly, thank you for having to put the boy down and ask: "What 
happened?" 


The man slammed into the hard-drawn carriage, and seemed to faint, and 
blocked his face in a mess. Many people were watching carefully. Without 
waiting for the pity to approach, he suddenly jumped again and screamed: 
"I can't stand it! Kill, kill! Who is coming to kill me!! Come!" 


There are a few big men in the passers-by who can't stand it. They said, 
"Which is the epileptic who didn't shut it out, and went back to go back..." 
They wanted to go to the person, who knows, just surrounded As soon as I 
saw the face of this madman, I yelled and hurriedly avoided: "What 
monster 1s this!!!" 


The madman rushed to them and yelled, "Crash me!" 


The few people were so horrified that they just prayed for it. When they 
saw him, they were His Royal Highness, such as Meng Da, who rushed 
behind him. Thanks for thinking, the leg is a foot, the madman smashed 
into the air, and fell a gentle dog mud. Several people pointed to the 


ground and said: "His Royal Highness! This person... this person... He 
has... He has!!!" 


Without them, thank you for seeing it too - this person has two faces! 


To be precise, it is a face and another face is grown. This second face 1s 
crowded on the half of the madman's cheeks. The size of the adult's palm 
is a young man. This face is like a crumpled little old man, ugly! 


Thanks a lot of horror, all the thoughts are a sentence: 
What is this monster? ! 


He immediately took the sword at the waist and pulled it out. This sword 
is the sword sent by Emperor Wu of the Gods - red mirror. Ever since he 
saw the white geek, he took the sword with him, so that he could take a 
look at what day, and maybe one day he could see the true face of the 
thing. Right now, it just comes in handy, the sword is out of the sheath, and 
the sword is better than the snow. However, when you look down, the 
scene reflected by the blade does not change at all. Still this person, or 
these two terrible faces. In other words, this madman is not any of the 
devils and ghosts, he is a person! 


But is there really someone in the world who will grow up like this? If it is 
a natural appearance, in the city of Xianlehuang, why have you not been 
able to spread it for so many years? Xie Pity is being amazed, suddenly, 
one person screaming and arrogant: "He... How did he become like this?" 


Thanks for listening, put the red mirror blade into the sheath, and turned to 
say: "Do you know this person? Was he not like this before?" 


Several people said: "Know, we work with him. Of course not like this, he 
used to, face...where there is this!!" 


Seeing that the onlookers gathered more and more, almost blocked the 
street, thankful and calm, and sighed: "You, don't get close, nothing, let 
go!" The bandaged teenager helped him separate the crowd, thank you. Did 


not pay attention. He is busy with the wind and believes in psychic: "Snow 
to the Imperial City Shenwu Street!" 


Putting down his hand, and seeing someone swallowing in the side, a very 
hesitant look, thank you for taking the initiative and saying: "Do you have 
anything to say?" 


When the Prince asked, the man finally got the courage and said: "His 
Royal Highness, there is one thing, I don't know if I should say it..." 


Where is the blessing, there is still time to wait for him to chill, and 
succinctly said: "Speak straight!" 


The humanity said: "A few days ago, I had a few small pits in my chest, 
three big ones and two small ones. I didn't feel anything, it didn't itch, but 
it was quite comfortable. I was not big. I care, but I saw this brother, I 
have a little bit of heart... a little bit of what I am doing, haha." He laughed 
and untied his clothes, and confessed his chest. "You see me... no 
problem?" 


As soon as he undressed, everyone was silent. This person's chest, where is 
the "several small nest"? Clearly known as the five senses, can see a vague 
woman's face! 


The man looked down and was shocked: "How could this be?! It was not 
so clear before... so..." Is it lifelike? So vivid? No matter which word you 
use, it 1s full of horror! 


Wherein all of them are very glutinous. 


At this moment, the wind letter and the feelings received the psychic, and 
came over from the tower. Seeing both of them frowning, Fengxin said: 
"Get up, what is the trouble?" 


I can't wait to explain, patted the man's shoulder and appeased: "Nothing. 
You are calm." He said that he was calm and calm, and that person thought 
he was well-informed. He believed that this little thing was easy for Prince 
Edward. Get out of my heart. However, the pity is not a small wave. 


This kind of "human face" is actually growing up! And there is this 
symptom - let's call it a symptom, more than one person, then, is it still 
possible to guess, in fact, there are more? 


He immediately outlined the words of the wind and the feelings, saying: 
"Issue the palace, the order is passed down, the whole city asks, there is no 
similar thing in the body, it must be one!" 


Since this thing is too horrible, the king of the country paid great attention 
to it after receiving the news, and sent a large number of people to conduct 
search and inventory, which was extremely efficient. It was confirmed in 
the middle of the night: the entire Xianle Emperor City, there are already 
five people who have a clearer face. These five people either saw that they 
were not doing anything, or that the "human face" grew up in an 
undetectable part, and it was not itchy, so it was not noticed. In addition, 
there are more than a dozen people who have already had shallow pits and 
bulges on their bodies, which are suspected to be "human faces" that have 
not yet been formed. 


Among the more than 20 people, women and teenagers were mostly sent to 
the courtesy of the pity, and they were all uneasy, greeted each other and 
comforted each other. Xie Li was originally telling others about things. 
When I noticed this section, I was slightly wrong. I asked, "Do you all 
know?" 


The official who had been busy for one night looked at the booklet and 
said, "His Royal Highness, many of them live on the outskirts of the 
Imperial City. They live nearer. It may be that there are some contacts in 
the weekday neighborhood." 


Many live in the same place? The feelings are awkward: "Do you have a 
human face in a group of people who live close to each other? Is this thing 
contagious?" 


Xie Pity is thinking faster than him, but he is not as good as he said, 
immediately said: "Separate! Deportation of the crowd, no one should 
shake around. Find a place, all the people here!" 


"There are strange diseases, they will be infected." These six words leaked 
out, more than what was dismissed, the soldiers team will be useful, and 
the crowds on the crowd will be scattered? Most of the houses on the street 
are empty. Thanks to the pity, the officers and soldiers who had been 
deployed by him were fully armed and protected. With these 20 people, 
they came to the wilderness of the imperial city where some of them lived. 


There are large tracts of wood near the suburbs, calling for a secluded 
forest. The ministers intend to build an area here to temporarily house the 
"patients." However, into the woods, other people are busy camping, but 
the more they walk, the more they are ignorant. The wind and the feelings 
of nature are also discovered. Fengxin took the lead: "His Royal Highness, 
this is not that Lang Ying..." 


Thanks to the hand, Shen Mei said: "Yes. It is here." 


This piece is not a secluded forest. It 1s not the place where Na Langying 
personally digs the pit and buried his son's body! 


The three were aware of this festival and looked at each other. Although it 
is unclear what it is, there is a conjecture in the vagueness that drove them 
to start looking around for the place where Lang Ying was buried. 
However, it has been a few months since that day, not to mention that there 
are SO many trees in the secluded forest. Where do you remember where 
the trees were buried under the Qing Dynasty? 


Just at this time, an unspeakable stench drifted away. 


This stench is somewhat like a rot of a corpse but smells, but it is more 
suffocating than that smell. It only takes in one bite, and the whole person 
seems to be fainting. The rest of the people also smelled, and they retired, 
and the nose fan said: "What is there?" "What is going on! It’s stinking 
after being marinated for ten years in the sauce jar..." 


Thanks for stealing and robbing, along the terrible smell all the way 
straight, I found a familiar neck tree, the next land of the tree slightly 
bulged, forming a gentle small earth bag. The soldiers raised their swords 


to protect him, and thanked them for raising their hands to block them. 
Shen Shen said: "Beware. Ordinary people don't come over." 


The letter of the ordinary people is not copied by the shovel. A few shovel 
went down, the earthen bag became a pit, and the stench became more and 
more intense. He became more careful when he shoveled. A few more 
shovel, a little black thing turned out under the soil, seems to be slightly 
creeping. 


He slowed down and the soldiers were on the verge of enemies. Suddenly, 
the soil was arched high, and a huge, swollen, inflated figure broke out and 
was exposed to the crowd holding the torch. 


The rancid smell suddenly skyrocketed, and many people spit out on the 
spot. The pity of the pity has also narrowed down. 


That thing can't be described by "people" at all. Everything is like human 
beings. No one can see it. This corpse, which can be described as "large", 
was once a thin child! 


A vomiting urge rushed into his throat, thanking him for looking sideways. 
The wind and the feelings were also shocked, and they all quit: "What is 
this?!" "Is this a curse or a simple body decay??" 


No matter what, thank you for knowing what to do now, saying: "Retreat! 
The farther the better! Burn this thing clean!" 


After that, he raised his hand and a flame spurted out. The fire is shining, 
and the smoke is rolling. At this time, the distant horn of the distant city 
building is screaming, and it reminds me! 


The three men looked up at the same time. This 1s a signal from the 
enemy. The wind screamed: "Mom, it is at this time!" 


The sorrowful face is calm and the sun looks uncertain. "Maybe, are they 
deliberate?" 


Xie pity decisively said: "Music love left to deal with here. Fengxin you 
go with me, first repel them, remember not to let them see a little flaw!" 


It was night, and the two rushed out of the city and hurriedly played. 


Although this one was caught off guard, it still won; although it won again, 
but including the pity, all the Xianle people have no joy of victory. 


This sudden "strange disease" was called "human face disease", and in the 
city of Xianle Emperor, the speed of the thunder was not overwhelming, 
and it made people feel heart-wrenching. 


The lord also considered blocking the news, but the first patient rushed out 
on the street. The number of witnesses on the scene was countless and 
could not be stopped from the beginning. Moreover, the spread and 
episodes of human face epidemics were extremely fast. In just six days, 
suspicious symptoms were found in more than 50 people. 


At the same time, Yong'an's offense is also frequent. Under the multi-party 
attack, Xie pity almost innocently pulled to Yongan rainfall, the original 
mana and energy used to do these, most of them are consumed in the 
Imperial City isolation zone. 


In the cool, not secluded forest, there are large tents and shacks with large 
patches of advice. Thanks for walking through the patients in a place. This 
quarantine area has evolved from the beginning of more than 20 people to 
the scale of nearly 100 people. It is getting bigger and bigger. Every day, if 
you have time, you will come here, and use the mana to relieve the 
horrible things for the patients here. symptom. It can be relieved that after 
all, it is not the cure. What people are looking forward to is that he can 
cure himself. Xie pity walked, a young man lying on the ground suddenly 
raised his hand and grabbed his clothes and said: "Your Highness, I will 
not die, right?" 


Xie Pity is about to talk, but I feel that this person is a little good. Looking 
at it carefully, isn't he the passerby who gave him an umbrella on the day 
when he learned that Xianle was short of water and the Imperial City was 
raining? 


I remembered that day, the rain, the umbrella, thank you for the warmth of 
the heart, and slammed it down, patted the back of the man's hand and said 
seriously: "I will do my best." 


The man seemed to have hope of life, his eyes flashing with joy, his voice 
was good, and he lay back again. It can be seen from the eager eyes of 
these people that they deeply believe that he can do it. Therefore, every 
time they look at their eyes, they will give themselves some self-blame 
and want to find a solution faster. 


After walking through the quarantine area, Xie pity found a place to sit, 
and the feelings raised the bonfire, and he sat and meditated. In the 
distance, there were a few small chores who left the stretcher and 
whispered, but they did not know that they had been prayed for their ears: 


"Is this the first few?" 
"The fourth or the fifth." 


The patient on the stretcher is not a patient who died in the jungle. In fact, 
human face disease is very difficult to die. However, it is terrible not to 
die, not to die. That is to say, in the future, you will have to carry this kind 
of thing in your life. It is a great loss of courage to think about it. 
Especially for some young women, I love the face. If I grow up on the 
face, I will eventually choose to die. 


One person sighed: "Hey! When 1s it a head lice." 


Another person said: "With the Prince Edward, you will not be defeated, 
rest assured." 


The original person complained a little bit: "I am not worried about 
defeating you, but now this situation, is it not useful to lose it? We are not 
good at this kind of people, oh... forget it, I am not here. Complaining. You 
didn't say it when I didn't say it." 


If the letter is here, it will definitely be a curse. And the feelings looked 
gratified, and continued to make fire, and did not speak, until the two 


completely went far, only faintly said: "It is really a small people's 
opinion, it will only blame the people. Do you want a martial art to do 
everything?" 


Thanks, but he shook his head. That person said, there is some truth. He is 
a ***** of war, and there is an army in which he ts, and there is no victory. 
However, at this time, what is the use of light? The establishment of the 
army was originally to protect the people, but the people in the rear were 
attacked by plague. Did the original advantage become a joke? 


At this time, the bonfire swayed, and one person sat down to thank you, 
but the wind letter came back. Thanks for the moment: "How?" 


Fengxin shook his head and said: "It’s the same as the result of your 
previous exploration. You can’t find Lang Ying on the back slope. You 
can’t see any strangers in white clothes. I don’t know where to hide. I 
can’t verify whether they are there. Ghosts. Also, Yongan people are very 
good, no one has got a human face." 


The emperor sent a fire and said: "The imperial city and the back **** are 
so close, and no one can be infected anyway. Obviously, they must have 
done the wrong thing." 


Many people think so in secret, and it makes sense to think so. However, 
even if they know that they are Yongan people, or that they are clear, Lang 
Ying is engaged in ghosts, but the other side is extremely deep and cannot 
grasp the handle. 


They suspected that the human face was caused by a curse, and the body of 
Lang Ying’s son was the source of the curse. However, if it is a curse, this 
curse 1s really beautiful, and there are no traces that will allow them to go 
back and forth. What can prove this suspicion? No. Who knows if this 
human face epidemic will be just a new plague born naturally? Unless you 
grasp the object of their suspicion, thank you for the way to determine 
what the human face is. 


He also rushed to inform the heavens of his own conjecture. However, as 
soon as I said, thanking the pity is to ban the ban, now is not the same as 


before, what to report in the past, directly into the Shenwu Temple directed 
at the ears of Jun Wu loudly told him is, but now it is to come according to 
the routine. It should be noted that the so-called routine, good luck, these 
merits can pass, passed to the priests; bad luck, maybe will be forced to go 
through a very complicated and complicated program, infinite delay. After 
the end of the walk, it is nothing more than a disguise to deal with, and 
thank you for being a **** official. Except for Jun Wu, the right man in 
the heavenly court can not exist. The sentiment of the **** officer does 
not necessarily have him strong, the burden of the monarch So heavy, 
using a word in the world to call the day, it is impossible to help him 
personally. Therefore, this notification is only symbolic and does not 
really hope. 


However, it is not these, but another question. He said: "If it is said that 
Yongan has issued a curse in order to fight the Imperial City, then the most 
effective attack should be to attack the army. As long as the army is 
defeated, is it equal to the opening of the city gate? But in fact, the human 
face disease It did not spread to the military at all." 


The army is not without human face disease patients, but in relative terms, 
the number ts really extremely small, but after three or four people, and 
sent to isolation, the situation was immediately controlled and did not 
spread. Fengxin has always thought of what to say, saying: "Maybe 
because they feel that even if they have defeated the army, you will be 
defeated, and you will not deal with the army and deal directly with 
civilians." 


Hearing words, he smiled and laughed, the wind channel: "What are you 
laughing at?" Mu asked: "Nothing. You can always make very reasonable 
opinions, I have no opinion." 


The wind letter is the most annoying. He wants to stab his mouth, but he 
always wears the style of Sven. He ignores it directly. He said: "If they 
really get it, I will look down on it. I have the ability to see the real 
chapter on the battlefield, and some sinister tricks." What is the innocent 
people?" 


Hearing words, thankful and pity, he sighed and said: "These days, I have 
been thinking about how to be infected. How to conceive how to 
contagious, I have to control." 


Wind channel: "Is it not very clear? Closer, more contact, drink water, eat, 
sleep or something, it will be contagious." 


Thank you for your pity, and said: "On the surface, this is true. However, it 
is better to take the military. The soldiers in the army are also drinking 
water and sleeping together. The contact with ordinary people should be It 
is to be closer and more frequent, but why are there fewer soldiers 
infected?" 


Mu Qingqing said: "What you mean is that under the same conditions, the 
constitution is different, some people will be infected, some people will 
not. What you want to ask is what kind of person can resist the human 
epidemic." 


Xie pity looked up and said: "Muscle understands me. This 1s the case. If 
you can find out this, there is a way to break the spread of human face 
disease." 


Appreciate the nod, saying: "That's good. We will look back, what kind of 
people are more likely to get people's face disease. What kind of people 
are the most in these patients?" 


Thanks to these days, I have gone through countless times in the isolation 
zone of the secluded forest. I can answer it with my eyes closed. I 
immediately said: "Women, children, teenagers, the elderly, and young 
men who are not very tall." 


The wind is suspicious: "Is it a weak body to be infected? Is it necessary to 
ask the king of the country to order, and call on all the imperial city people 
to exercise hard?" 


Both pity and admiration looked at him and didn't seem to want to pick up. 
After a pause, Feng Xin said to himself: "No." 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 85: Human 
face disease unearthed not in the forest 2 


Obviously wrong. Because the first person who rushed to Shenwu Street 
was a strong and strong individual, it was untenable. 


Compared with other soldiers, the soldiers who suffered from human 
epidemic were different. Thanks to many possibilities, they also verified 
many kinds. On all sides, they have no obvious differences with others. 
Among all the affected people, the appearance, physique, even identity, 
and personality are all varied, and there is no fixed law. Could it be that 
who dyes who is not dyed is really just a matter of luck? 


Xie politely said: "In the end, what did the soldiers do to resist the spread 
of human epidemic? In other words, what is happening is that civilians do 
less and soldiers do much..." 


Having said that, he suddenly had a big eyes and his face was white. 
Listening to his voice stopped abruptly, the wind channel: "What happened 
to His Royal Highness? What did you think of?" 


Thank you for your thoughts. He thought of a reasonable speculation, and 
at the same time, it was a terrible speculation. 


He stood up at once and blurted out: "No! No, it shouldn't be like this. 
There is no such thing." 


The wind and the feelings of the moment also stood up and said: "What?" 


Thanks for the forehead, walked back and forth a few steps, and said: "You 
wait, I have a very ridiculous guess. It should not be true, but I need to 
experiment." 


Admiration: "What guess? In the end, how do you experiment? Would you 
like me to find someone to try?" 


Xie pity immediately vetoed: "No, can't find a living person to try, what if 
I guess wrong?" It is better to say that he hopes that he guessed wrong, and 
that he is wrong. Mourning frowns: "His Royal Highness, if you want to 
know if your guess is wrong, you must use a living person to try. This is 
the best way, and it is useless to worry about it." 


Fengxin also frowned. "You didn't watch him bother, don't say this when 
you are in the mouth." 


The feelings turned and said: "Odd, what did I say? Isn't that what I said? 
To this step, hesitate and entangle, what is the use?" 


Fengxin resented: "Is there anything to be used to measure it? You are a 
living person, hesitating without hesitation, are you too calm?" 


Admire: "Calm? You don't want to say that I am cold-blooded." 
Xie Li also did not have the patience of moderate mediation in the past. He 


said: "You two, you can fight for one sentence, what kind of system! Give 
me a scent here, no one in the scent Old rules." 


As soon as you hear the word "old rules," the wind and the feelings are 
slightly discolored. Xie pity waved: "Heavenly blessing. Start." 


For a long while, Fengxin gnawed his teeth: "... Fuxing is shining." 
Mu Qing also bite his teeth: "... according to the text." 
Fengxin 1s hard to say: "Ke... section..." 


He is still thinking about how to pick up, thank you for turning and 
entering the forest, looking for the three sick soldiers to ask questions. 


The so-called old rules are a way of thanking and thinking to divert their 
attention. Fengxin and admiration have nothing to do, but they have to stab 


the other side. The starting point is not too big or small. At the beginning, 
thankfulness will make them stand up and scent, and they will not talk to 
each other until they calm down, but the effect is very small, so later 
Thanks to the decision to change their idioms to the dragon, there is a 
battle of victory and defeat, so, they have no time in their minds to 
entangle the quarrel, but to rack their brains to pick up the dragon, find 
ways to win the other side. After discovering this good method, Xie Li felt 
that the world was peaceful and quite satisfied. At the moment, they have 
to go through the old rules again, and it is barely let everyone relax. 


However, this ease did not last long. After a scent, thank you back. He 
looked extremely bad and told him: "Give me the same soldiers who live 
with the sick soldiers who are living together. I have something to ask 
them." 


The two had already gotten their cards several times, each had a victory, 
and finally they didn’t have to pick up the dragon. They were all relieved. 
Admire the feelings: "Also. But such a roundabout verification, may not 
guarantee the full accuracy of the results." 


Fengxin turned to execute his instructions, and thanked him again: "Wait! 
It’s late at night, now I’m asking too much action, and I can’t call many 
people at once, attracting attention. I can’t ask a little bit if I want to ask. 
The wind is so stunned." 


Fengxin said back to the question: "What should I do? One by one, with 
you in the past, privately?" 


Thanks to pity: "It can only be like this. Tomorrow, the soldiers who are 
close to the few people will be brought to my house one by one. I can't let 
them know that they have been asked each other. You remember that they 
are absolutely not allowed to tell. Others. Otherwise..." 


He took a sigh of relief and sighed: "Forget it, you still threaten it. If you 
pass it out, you can kill it. The better you get better." 


Admire the feeling: "When asked one by one, when did you ask?" 


Thanks to the pity: "Whenever you ask, you have to ask, ask more than one 
to determine a point. This thing... I don't know what to do, there must be 
no half-point mistakes." 


So, on the second day, Xie Pity sat in a room on the tower that was 
temporarily given to him, and personally asked more than 300 soldiers. 


In the face of his questions, these three hundred people gave the same 
answer. Every time I ask, the face of thankfulness sinks a point. After the 
incident, the wind letter and the feelings went into the house, seeing the 
pity sitting at the table, one hand to help the amount, not talking, for a 
long time slowly said: "You hold the gate, I go to the Cangshan." 


Fengxin hesitated: "His Royal Highness, have you asked what is coming? 
Is it a curse or...?" 


Thanks a little bit, said: "Ask it out, it is a curse." 
The feelings are awe-inspiring: "Is it convinced?" 


Thanks to the pity: "I am sure. I know that what kind of people will be 
infected, what kind of talent will not." 


Although it is said, however, there is no half of his face to finally reveal 
the joy of the mystery, and the situation of feelings and admiration is not 
so simple. Thanks to pity, they did not take the initiative to say that they 
were naturally not as good as their subordinates, and the two hearts sank. 


Tai Cangshan, Emperor View, the highest peak, Shenwu Temple. The 
national teacher worships the incense in the clouds, and Xie pity enters the 
temple and opens the door to see the mountain road: "National division, I 
want to see the emperor." 


The National Teacher finished the fragrance and turned back: "His Royal 
Highness, the door of the heavens, has not opened to you." 


Thanks: "I know. But now, I have found out that Xianle is suffering from 
an unprecedented curse. This is not a natural disaster. It 1s a non-human 


thing." Please give me a hand, please Come to the emperor to drop the 
spirit and inform the news directly to him. Maybe he will know what is the 
source of all this, maybe find a turn." 


Since he returned to the world, he has visited the Shenwu Temple three 
times. However, the first two times are not intended to ask for help, but 
the routine has gone through the game. Only this time, I really want to 
seek help. The national teacher sat in the chair and said: "I don't want to 
help you, Your Highness, just, it's not necessary. Even if I help you, the 
emperor will drop the spirit, attach it to my body, you talk to him, get the 
answer, It will only disappoint you." 


Thanks for the slight change of color, said: "Do you know what? The white 
man wearing a crying mask is something, you know?" 


Guoshi said: "His Royal Highness, do you still remember the words I told 
you? The air transport under the sun, good or bad, is fixed." 


Thank you for your pity. Guo Shi said: "In the past, many Yongan people 
are already dying. You are carrying rain and rain, giving them a sigh of 
relief, but they can't completely save them from the drought and resettle 
their future, so now they are on the back slope. In the Yongan army, you 
must earn a future for yourself. 


"Original city has already fallen into a downturn. You have personally 
turned down the situation and used one's own power to instantly reverse 
this situation and give the Imperial City a sigh of relief. However, you 
have not decided to rebel the Yongan rebels. Killing, scribbling the roots, 
but allowing them to survive to this day, like a group of crickets, the 
stronger the fight." 


Guo Shi strangely said: "Your Highness, I can ask, what are you doing? Is 
it difficult, you are still waiting for the two sides to repent, change their 
self-improvement, and return to a country?" 


Thanks for the inexplicable feeling of shame in the heart. However, it soon 
became confused and thought: "It is really strange. Whether I save people 
or protect people, it is because those people are innocent civilians, and sin 


does not die. Everything I do is clearly I seriously thought about the 
choices I made after struggling. Why did I talk about it in other 
populations, but it sounds so ridiculous? Why does it sound like I haven’t 
done anything, so... failure?” 


The word just emerged in his mind and was immediately removed by his 
thick ink. The national teacher said: "You intervene in the human body 
with the body of the gods. The number of Xianleguo is upset by you, 
messed up. In order to balance, naturally there will be other things, and the 
track that you are biased Go back. I don't know what the thing 1s, but I can 
be sure that it was born for you." 


Thanks for the swaying figure. Guoshi continued: "I can also confirm that 
Shenwu Emperor met you and will tell you the same thing, because this is 
why he did not let you down. But I think, even then he told you Most of 
you will still come down. The teenagers are like this. If they don’t listen, 
don’t wrestle, they don’t believe they can’t walk.” 


Xie pity said incredulously: "What do you mean, is the cause of this 
person's epidemic, is it me? So according to the so-called fixed number 
theory, what does the thing that does not cry or laugh, do I deserve it? So, 
heaven is fundamentally Will you care about this?" 


Guoshi said: "You can say this, you can not say that. After all, if you really 
think so, you can blame your father and mother, because if they don't give 
birth to you, you won't fly, you won't go down. And so on, you can blame 
your ancestors for generations. Therefore, it is meaningless to discuss who 
made the cause. 


"As for the last sentence you asked, yes, no. Because, the death of Xianle 
is originally inevitable. Since you reached out and disrupted this game, 
then you must have another hand and be beaten by you. Put the chaotic 
pieces back in place." 


Xie pity took a deep breath and didn't want to discuss with him whether it 
was an inevitable problem, and closed his eyes for a moment. "Well, 


please ask the national teacher, if I disappear now, will this thing disappear 
with me?" 


Guoshi said: "I am afraid not. Please God is easy to send God, demon and 
ghost, and there is no difference." 


Thanks for your nod and bluntly: "Good. Thank you for pointing." 


He knows that it is useless to say more. He can only rely on himself. He 
worshipped the national teacher and said goodbye, ready to leave. The 
national teacher said in his back: "His Royal Highness! The way forward, 
how are you going?" 


Xie pity lowered his head and said: "Since I am disappearing now, it will 
not help, then, and fight against it in the end, this is my only way." 


After a pause, he headed again and said: "I don't care if it is a hand or 
something, but the people I protect will never be its pawns." 


After half a month, Lang Ying led the Yongan Army and attacked again. 


After countless battles of countless times for several months, the current 
Yongan Army can finally be called an army. They are no longer the 
grasshoppers, but a regular and powerful army! 


Lang Ying seems to have evaporated from the world for a long time. This 
time, thank you and see this man on the battlefield. Waiting for a long 
time, he flew directly over the crowd, and deceived himself. He slammed 
his sword and said: "Where is the white man?" ” 


Lang Yingge took his sword, did not answer, and seriously 
counterattacked. Thanks to step by step, he said: "You know who I am 
talking about. I have limited patience!" 


Cold, Lang Ying stared at him: "His Royal Highness, you have not said, 
will Yongan continue to rain?" 


Xie Li did not expect that he had such a question, his heart trembled, 
Zhang Shuyu said: "I..." 


He did guarantee that Lang Ying would have been, and Yongan would rain. 
However, during this period, the number of people infected with human 
face disease in the Imperial City has increased several times, and there are 
already nearly 500 people. The five hundred people are crowded into the 
jungle. The isolation area is not enough. The officials are negotiating to 
move to a farther and bigger place. Thanks to most of the mana used to 
alleviate the illness of these 500 people, there is no way to go to Yongan 
rainfall. Since he couldn’t use the rain teacher, he was too embarrassed to 
keep the other people’s temple magic in his hands. In desperation, he sent 
a letter to the rain-stricken country and returned the rain teacher to the rain 
teacher. thank. 


Xie pity a sword stabbed out, angered: "That rain is my fall, why stopped, 
you do not know in your own heart?!" 


The more he became angry, the more calm Lang Ying said: "It’s none of 
my business. I only know that even without this human face, your mana 
will not last long. Just like your rain, Yongan can’t live a few more people. 
It’s all useless. Your Royal Highness, why do you think that what you can 
do with what you want to do? Instead of giving your own destiny to you, I 
choose to give it to myself." 


I don't know which sentence was stabbed, thank you for killing. 


His blade turned slightly, and his left palm was dark, and there was a voice 
in his heart called "Scrapping this person, Yongan Remnant, not afraid!" 


This is his first time since he met, and he is really determined to kill Lang 
Ying. Who knows, he sent it out in the palm of his hand, hitting Lang 
Ying’s chest and hitting him with a mouthful of blood, but he did not pass 
through his heart, but was shocked. 


Under this shock, Xie pity is unbelievable, back a few steps, said: "You?!" 
What is shocking him, thank you for being clear. 


There are powerful people in the world, such as kings, wizards, and 
righteous men. Whenever they are in a critical situation, they will give 


birth to the body of the body and protect the person from harm. Most of 
these people have the potential to soar. Lang Ying is just a grasshopper, but 
he also gave birth to this kind of amulet, and it 1s still very rare - the 
power of the king! 


Xie pity did not dare to think about what it meant in the end. Suddenly, the 
chest was cold, but it was Lang Ying’s sword. He stabbed him and passed 
him through his chest. 


This time, the two sides did not have a win or loss. 


Yongan Fang, who came to invade, died a lot of people, but this time there 
was not much better in the city of Xianle. If you change someone else, you 
can actually say that it is a triumph, but for the pity, this is definitely a 
defeat. 


This is his first defeat, and although Lang Ying still lost his gratitude, he 
finally evacuated, but many people saw Lang Ying stabbing him. Xie pity 
can almost guess, at this time, how many soldiers in the army are talking 
about the back: His Royal Highness is Wu Shen, how can it be stabbed? 
Are we not the soldiers of the gods? Why didn’t this year be as big as 
ever? However, he has completely ignored these small voices, because the 
admiration told him that today, not the forest has sent more than 100 
people to the epidemic. 


In just one day, it is more than one hundred! 


Now, the first batch of people who have been infected with the epidemic 
have become extremely serious. There is no place to look at the whole 
body. They should be covered with thick white cloth, otherwise they will 
look at them at a glance. However, through the white cloth, you can also 
faintly see the uneven things on the outline of the body. 


Xie pity four downstream to go to the rescue, it is easy to finish a round, 
the wind letter pulled him to the side, whispered: "His Royal Highness, 
how is it going on the battlefield today? How can you stab the monk?" You 
later hit him several times, why not kill him?" 


Xie Pity didn't want to tell him that Lang Ying had a layer of kingish gas 
that even the priest couldn't break, but he couldn't help but smile. Where is 
he does not want to kill, it is already impossible to kill. The mana 
contained in his offensive was all gasified by this layer of kings and 
completely ineffective against Lang Ying. After he discovered this, he 
immediately switched to a real knife and a fist, but this Lang Ying was 
thick and thick, and he was very tight! 


At this time, a person in the distance suddenly screamed: "His Royal 
Highness saves me!" 


Xie Pei was taking over a bowl of water that Feng Xin had handed him. He 
just took a sip and screamed out as soon as he heard the screaming. He 
rushed to the past without a break. The screaming was the young man who 
sent him an umbrella that day, because Xie Pity was particularly gentle to 
him, and the young man was especially diligent in calling him for help. At 
first, the part of this human life was the knee. Thanks to the control of the 
cast, it did not spread the epidemic. Therefore, he only had a human face 
on his left leg, and he was kicking the leg and died. Thankful to hold him, 
he calmed and said: "Don't move! I am coming!" 


The young man was terribly scared, grabbed him, and said, "His Highness! 
Your Highness, save me! I just thought that my legs were itchy, as if there 
was any grass in it, then I, I looked down, I saw those things... their 
mouths One by one, moving, moving! They are eating grass!!! They are 
alive!!!" 


Thank you for your time. He looked down, and sure enough, the young 
man’s left leg was packed with dozens of faces, and several mouths were 
covered with blades of grass, and some were still chewing and hunger! 


Many patients screamed, and the crowd rioted. It was all relying on the 
wind and the feelings of the soldiers and the suppression of the soldiers. 
Thank you for holding the young man and asking the person on the side: 
"Can he still move this leg?" 


The guards who are not in the forest must be fully armed. The bandages 
and cloaks are wrapped around the whole body. They can’t see what they 


are doing. They have answered the words and listened to the voice. It 
seems to be a teenager. His leg has been abolished, and I don’t know what 
it’s still growing. It’s as heavy as lead, and it’s dragged. The epidemic has 
been crawling up and crawling out of the leg and spreading to The waist is 
coming." 


Xie pity has tried his best to save the law. However, the young man’s leg 
can be said to have been ill, and almost lost the consciousness of normal 
people. At this time, a doctor whispered: "His Royal Highness, in my 
opinion, the only way I haven't tried at the moment, is to cut the part that 
grows the human face and see if it can stop the spread..." 


There is only this way of thinking in the heart of the pity, saying: "Take 
him cut!" 


The young man was busy: "Don't!" He was afraid that he was really cut 
off, but he did not dare to hug his deformed leg. He was extremely painful: 
"My legs are not scrapped! Maybe it will be good... Your Highness! 
You...you have no other way to save me?" 


Xie Pity no longer wants to answer the words "I try my best" and "I work 
hard". It is black in front of me and says, "I'm sorry, I don't." 


The first time the Prince Edward actually said this, this is the first time, 
and countless people are shocked. Someone was out of control on the spot 
and called out: "No? You are Your Highness, you are God, how can there 
be no way? We are here waiting for you how many days, how can you have 
no way?!" 


The person who said this immediately did not know who was pressed and 
did not make a sound. However, it was not blocked by the wind and the 
feelings. It seems that the feelings of thanking the pity are too frank, and 
they have not been able to appease the crowd. They are frowning, and the 
wind letter is drinking a few extra-high patients in the distance. Xie Pity 
has been devastated for a long time. The long sword has never been 
sheathed, hanging over the waist. The blade is close to the leg. A "human 
face" feels cold and Jianqi, suddenly stops chewing, a mouth, a pointed 
Call it up. 


This thing, it actually screamed! ! ! 


Although the sound is weak, it is undoubtedly emitted from this leg. The 
young man yelled, almost fainting and stunned, holding his thanks, and 
said: "His Temple saves me! Save me!" At the same time, his leg is close 
to the waist, and three small depressions are faintly born. The pit. The 
doctor was shocked: "His Royal Highness, spread, spread! The epidemic is 
going to climb out of the legs!" 


It took a lot of mana, and after all, thanking him for failing to control the 
condition of this young man. Seeing that these horrible things will spread 
to the whole body of this young man, this proliferation will no longer be 
able to be recovered. Is it sitting still? 


Thanks for a bite, said: "I ask you, in a word, this leg, do you still want it? 
I will not be able to guarantee it after I have no legs. Don't you nod, just 
start; don't nod if you want , let's see again!" 


The young man gasped, and it was scared to empty eyes, almost demented, 
like nodding, and seemed to be shaking his head. The faces on his left leg 
began to scream one after another, as if welcoming the newly joined 
"companion." Oops, you can even see their pleasant expressions, and the 
tiny red tongue is shaking. It is hard to imagine what kind of scene in the 
interior of this young man's left leg has become a boarding place for 
something. 


Can't drag anymore! Thanks to the doctor, "Take him off." 


The doctor even waved his hand and said: "Your Highness is forgiven! I 
am not sure. I don't dare to cut the knife in this place! Everything can't be 
done... Don't take risks!" Darkly, I have nothing to say, guns are shot. The 
head bird, almost put on a scary errand, fled back to the crowd and did not 
speak. The young man muttered: "His Highness saves me, Your Highness 
saves me!" And there is a blank in the mind, and there is a desperate voice 
in my heart: "- Who will save me...!" 


There is noisy around, and there are all shouts. Those distorted little 
people were also screaming underneath, and for a moment, thank you for 


seeing him see hell. 


He seems to be staring at this hell, and he seems to be staring at nothing, 
cold sweats, wide eyes, arms raised - 


The sword fell and the blood rushed. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 87: Gold- 
plated body 


Thanks to pity and anger, the sword that pulled out his chest was about to 
stab a sword, only to find that there was no trace of blood on the sword. 
Suddenly, his heart was bright, and he turned to Jianfeng, and the sword 
smashed the head of the white boy. Chad is a breeze, but after the skull and 
the body are separated, both sides quickly smash down and turn into a flat 
skin. 


This body is actually an empty shell! 


Seeing this thing twice, he used the fake body, and the real body never 
came out once. Although it is not unexpected, but the pity is still hate, the 
long sword in this soft head and body scribble, sharp sword gas will smash 
a skin capsule he still does not hate. The wind letter could not stand any 
longer, and stopped him: "His Royal Highness! This is the shell." 


However, this shell looks exactly the same as when she was praying for a 
boy, so it seems that it is like thanking him for cruelly slaughtering 
himself, and the picture is somewhat uncomfortable. Thanks for the gasp, 
a few mouthfuls, throwing the sword, sitting on the ground, said: "I know! 
But he dared to use my face!" 


He was so discouraged that both of them were kneeling in front of him, 
silently, and the wind was confident: "His Royal Highness, is it better? 
Don't take the fart of this thing seriously, and make fun of it." 


Who knows, thank you but said: "No, he said something, but he didn't 
make fun of me, just..." 


Fengxin was taken aback: "Does he tell you how to lift the curse?!" 


Xie pity grabbed his right hand into his hair and said: "He didn't tell me 
how to solve the human face epidemic. What he told me was... the way to 
make a human face!" 


Both of them are ashamed: "Made?" 


Xie pity nodded, looking at the four wild, I still don't want to stay in the 
back slope, decided to leave first. He did not want to see the soldiers 
hiding their eyes now, and did not want to hear the mourning and 
dissatisfaction of the patients. So he went back to the imperial palace in 
the palace. 


After closing the door, Xie Pity barely calmed down his mind and sat 
down. Shen Sheng said: "The 'human faces' that grow on people are all the 
dead souls of Yongan people. Some of them are dead on the battlefield, a 
bigger part, It died in the drought." 


The love is not unexpected, said: "It is no wonder that Yongan people are 
insulated from people's epidemics, and of course they do not fight 
themselves." 


Fengxin frowned: "Those who died in the drought were not killed by the 
people of the Imperial City. Even if there is resentment, shouldn’t they be 
sent here?" 


Thanks a little sigh, said: "That said, but you know that when people die, 
the soul 1s chaotic." 


For a period of time after the death, the soul is like a new born child, 
ignorant, half-awake, I don’t know who I am, where I am, what I am 
doing, the duration is short, all look at each person. And the opportunity, 
this state, is called the "chaotic period." 


In this case, their loved ones or loved ones can guide these souls or 
influence them. The folks’ first seven souls and other customs are based 
on this principle. 


Thanks to the pity: "He... tell me that Yongan soldiers have a strong 
resentment and attack on the Imperial City side, and many of their parents, 
wives and children have died in the drought. 


"These souls have no basis to rely on, and they will be infected by the 
emotions of their loved ones. He is using the sharp will of these soldiers to 
infuse the souls of the dead into the hostility of the imperial city, and to 
drive them to stay on the living, to compete for the living. Nutrients. 


"Because, the souls of these chaotic periods have been repeatedly told a 
thought: without them, you could have survived." 


Wind channel: "What is this ghost? Who is supposed to be alive, who is 
damn??" 


Xie pity grabbed his forehead and said: "Lang Ying had no intention of 
burying his son's body in the Imperial City. This became the introduction 
of his practice. I told him to tell me the solution. He said it for a long time, 
but it was This set of cursing techniques tells me. What does this mean?" 


I don't know how to break the curse. The wind is screaming: "It's just 
teasing you. What's the gadget, I | Fuck!" 


The feelings are: "He is not teasing you. He has already told you the way." 
Xie pity and Feng Xin a look up, a turn to the head, said: "What?" 
Admiration: "The solution!" 


His eyes brightened, as if he discovered something secret, saying: "The 
curse of Yongan can be effective because they have resentment against 
Xianle. But, on the side of Xianle, there is no resentment for Yongan?" 


Thanks for the slightest blink of an eye, the breathing is slightly 
stagnation. He also said: "Since he told you the method of cursing, then 
you can use the same method to make a tooth for a tooth and an eye for an 
eye to create a human epidemic that only infects Yongan people! Think 
about it, make people When the curse of the epidemic comes into effect, it 
must be supported by the living. As long as they are infected with the 
plague, even if there is no one living, is it not broken?" 


Xie Li never thought about this method, listened to him and talked for a 
while, suddenly, half awkward, blurted out: "Absolutely not!" 


Admire: "Why not? Don't forget, the one who cursed the first step 1s 
them." 


Xie Pity Huo Ran got up and said: "No, it doesn't work. Also, you are 
wrong. Yongan's soldiers must also be very difficult to infect the human 
face, just like the soldiers of Xianle. Don't ask me why, I..." 


The feelings are extremely fast: "So even if you only infect civilians, it is 
good! They do not have the complete protective equipment and manpower 
of the Imperial City. Once the human face epidemic breaks out, the 
epidemic will inevitably spread faster and there is no power to fight back! 
The safety of civilians threatens to stop cursing and surrender. They are 
even more affordable than the Imperial City!" 


Xie pity immediately vetoed: "Not even better! Don't forget that when 
they attack the innocent civilians of the Imperial City, how do we say 
them? Despicable. If we do the same thing with them, we will not become 
our own mouth. Despicable people? What is the difference between 
them?" 


Mu Qing sent a sense of excitement and said: "Your Highness, don't forget, 
to seduce you in the gentle township. It 1s the ‘innocent’ civilian in your 
mouth.” 


As soon as this sentence came out, thank you for hesitating for a moment. 


To be honest, it is impossible to not care. But in the end, he still said: "Yes, 
there are people like that. But that's because such people tend to rush to 

the front, the most fanatic, so you only see such people in your eyes. But 

in fact, more civilians I don’t know anything at all. If you go to the back of 
the slope, you will know. Many people don’t even know why they want to 
fight. Wherever they have to eat, go where they want to go. Ask for a 
living. You are suggesting me now. The thing to do is to save a group of 
innocent people and kill another group of innocent people. I..." 


He sighed and said: "I still think about other ways." 


The mood 1s a bit bad, and it is a bit ridiculous: "What do I have to go to 
the back **** to care about how the enemy people live. Forget it. Your 
Royal Highness, you think about it for others, but others have never 
considered it for you." Not a big head?" 


Xie pity, a boring heart, bowed his head, but in his mind, there was a leg 
that was full of faces and was still twitching after being cut. For a long 
time, in the end, he still shook his head and said: "In the final analysis, I 
am not thinking about others, even if we only consider it for ourselves. 
The curse is itself a double-edged sword, hurting others. In order to curse 
others, live. The people must be full of grievances, and the dead people 
can't rest in peace. They suffered all the pain during their lifetime, and 
they still lived on other people's sins after death, and became the kind of 
monsters. You saw the things on the person's legs that day, those How 
much better than the infected person? The curse is one day and will not be 
able to get back." 


After being vetoed again and again, the feelings of love are quickly losing 
patience. "You can't get a good end because you don't get a good end! You 
don't have a third road, you can't find a second glass of water." Wake up 
your Highness! You have no time." 


Xie pity felt a bit hot, closed his eyes and said: "... Don't say it, let me 
think about it." 


" " 


The feelings finally couldn’t help but muttered. "You are really a man...the 
pain is also entangled with you. Now the methods are in front of you. You 
are not willing to do it. You are really...you have Endless, this devil looks 
like someone is annoying. Your followers are really **** for eight 
lifetimes!" 


The wind smacked and listened to them arguing for a long while, because 
they couldn’t get any good ideas and never interrupted. At this time, 
suddenly raising their hands was a palm, and said: "You are finished!" 


Mu Qing was taken a few steps back by his palm, thanking the pity: "Wind 
letter?" 


Wind channel: "Don't you ignore me!" And he said to him: "What are you 
upset about? You said, what troubles do you have? I have been holding you 
for a long time, but today I can't help it. I am really fucking. I really can't 
understand you like this. It's obviously a vice. I don't know how to drink 
the northwest wind. Why are you always the smartest, the best you 
understand, the way you are stronger than him? You must be so capable. 
How come you didn't fly to your Highness and soar?" 


Admiration: "I...!" 


Xie pity pulled him: "For the sake of the wind, the feelings are also 
anxious..." 


Fengxin interrupted: "He is anxious! My Highness, I tell you that he just 
wants to find a chance to teach you. Everything can show that he is better 
than you. He will not let go, because he really feels that he is better than 
You can bear it! It’s so thin and cool that I don’t even see him love the 
country, this time I know what’s going on?” 


After that, I turned to the feelings: "When you can't see it, you feel that 
your Highness 1s a fool. Usually, the yin and yang sneak up and blindly 
turn my eyes. I have to endure. I have never stood in the position of the 
station. I also endure it. You love it now. Anyway, it’s not the first time, 
OK, let you do it, anyway, you can’t turn it around, and your high school 
doesn’t care about you. I’m too lazy to care about you. But since you’ re all 
on your face, don’t blame me! : You like to use that despicable means, I 
am not surprised, but His Royal Highness is His Royal Highness, no 
matter how he does it, you give me respect, less fingertips, less geeks can't 
recognize who they are!" 


During the words of Fengxin, Xie pity stopped several times, but probably 
because he had been squatting for too long, he couldn’t stop it, and he had 
all his brains. Every time I listen to the feelings, my face will be a little 
white. I originally thought that I still want to do it. When I heard the last 


one, I didn’t say a word, and my eyes stared at the wind. Thank you for 
your anger: "Is it finished? Is it for me to take both of you down!" 


The wind is full of redness, and at first glance, it is bloody, and the neck is 
stalked: "Hey, I don't care. The official is a fart! If it is not the next point, 
Lao Tzu is not rare. But I am being shackled. Going down to be a mortal, I 
am still loyal to your Highness, you say that I am the first to go up, I most 
look down on the white-eyed wolf! But this person, if he can't touch your 
light, can't be a **** official, may not be happy Follow you, I don’t think 
there’s a good word. Finish it!” 


The love was originally swearing, and for a long time, I couldn’t help it 
anymore. I replied: "Don’t touch your mother! You can really put gold on 
your face, you know what!" 


Thanks for being crazy, said: "Give me shut up! Shut up!!!" 


The two barely shut up. This time it was too loud, I was afraid that the 
Solitaire could not be saved. Thanks to the pity, it was easy to stop the 
anger, and the headache was: "... In short, the curse is never feasible." 


The sneer sneered, but still said: "Well, the decision is in you." 
The wind letter is concise and succinct: "Listen to you." 


The feelings of love regained a faint expression, saying: "What are the 
consequences, and your Highness must be your own." 


The wind is not a word. Then, thank you: "Nature. I have already thought 
of..." 


At this time, the three people felt a fierce tremor, and the figure was 
shaking. Thanks for the pity: "What?" 


The wind letter first reacted, saying: "The ground is moving!" 


Once the ground moves, there must be death and injury. Thanks shouted: 
"Save people!" 


Who knows, the three are about to rush out, but they see a busy person 
rolling out under the bed and say: "Cousin! Don't forget me, my cousin! 
Bring me!" 


Thank you for seeing this person, even more shocked: "Sorry, how are you 
in my palace?!" 


Where can he understand the daily life of a strange life, that is, to search 
for everything related to pity all day long. I don't know how long he 
sneaked and sneaked here for a long time. At the moment, he was in a 
critical situation and he couldn't wait to ask again. Thanks to the pity, he 
ran away, and went out to the open space. He saw the chaos in the palace, 
and countless palaces from the carved palace. Screaming and rushing out, 
he screamed: "Is there anyone injured! Is anyone trapped!" 


Fortunately, after a while, the ground motion stopped, and it seemed that 
there was no death or injury. But he hadn't let go of his heart, and suddenly 
he heard a scream, and many people raised their fingers behind the sky 
behind him. Thanks for turning a head, the pupils swelled. I saw the center 
of the palace, there is a tall and gorgeous pagoda, slowly leaning to one 
side. 


The tower is going to fall! 


This Tianta, the full name of the "Tower of Heaven and Man", has 
hundreds of years of history and is one of the symbols of the Xianle 
Palace. It is also the tallest building in the entire Imperial City. It is 
located in the heart of the Imperial Palace and the Imperial City. A place 
of interest. When the tower collapses, there will be countless deaths and 
injuries. The palace people in the palace and the pedestrians on the palace 
street will escape more crazy. Thanks for seeing it, the right hand quickly 
turned out a few law, and shouted in the direction of Tai Cangshan: 
"Come!" 


The tower continued to fall slowly, and when it fell a third, the crowd 
suddenly felt another tremor. 


This vibration is also uploaded from the earth. However, unlike the 
vibration of the ground, this tremor has a meal, has its own rhythm, and is 
getting faster and closer. When the tower was tilted a little, the crowd 
finally found out that the vibration was the footsteps of something. 


A huge golden statue of more than five feet high, one hand smashing a 
sword, one hand holding flowers, is wearing a Xiaguang, striding toward 
the palace side! 


Someone immediately exclaimed: "This is not the image of the Prince in 
the Imperial Palace in the Imperial Palace!" 


Sure enough, more and more people recognized: "Really! That is the 
golden statue! You see, it is running down from the Cangshan Mountain!" 


The golden figure took a few feet at each step, but did not step on one 
person. Hey, hey, flying generally entered the palace, and in one fell 
swoop, he supported the falling tower and stopped the downturn. 


Under the sunset, the golden light circulates, and the golden canopy raises 
his hands, and with his own strength, he struggles to withstand the tall 
pagoda that is about to fall. This 1s really a wonder of God, and it is so 
many people who are stunned and amazed. Xie pity slowly took back his 
hand and looked up at the statue. He looked at the beautiful and calm 
golden plastic face, and his heart was a little confused. 2k novel reading 
network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 88: Never 
forget not to forget 


This is the first statue that people have set for him, and it is also the most 
magnificent and solemn statue. 


In the past, looking at such "self", thankfulness and compassion are all 
taken by the people, and I don't think there is any problem. But at this 
moment, he feels that this golden statue is very strange and can't help but 
think: "This is true. Is it me?" 


Over there, the wind and the feelings are in the split to see if they are 
trapped and undetected. Thanks to the heart, the fascination flashed past, 
and the crowd gradually settled down and let out a sigh of relief. 


But this tone has not been loose to the end, suddenly felt a pressure from 
the body, thank you for a heart and immediately tightened. 


That tower is too high and too heavy. 


The statue seemed to be sensational, his hands trembled, his feet fell, and 
the tall golden body was bent a little, only the smile remained the same. 
Thank you for your pity, and immediately call the law. It can be smothered 
by the law, but it is a cold in the heart. The golden image is not only 
unfortunate, but it is bent down a little, and it seems that it is impossible 
to hold on to the faint. 


The hands of thankfulness also trembled. He has never felt this way. In his 
cognition, which mountain he wants to play, which mountain will fall 
down; he slams his feet and wants to shake the place. And this thing he has 
never felt is called "power is not good". 


As a last resort, Xie pity a bite, flew up, sat down at the foot of the huge 
golden statue, and violently raised his hand again to call the law. This 
time, he took the lead, and the golden image really rose again, and he 
jerked his head and re-emerged the tilted tower. 


Although it is hard to squat down, but the pity and the heart are already 
cold sweats. There are countless people inside and outside the palace who 
don't know that he has a hard time. He has already bowed up and 
worshipped this strange golden statue. He called: "The national disaster is 
the head, and the Prince Edward is showing up!" 


"Please sire to save us!" 
"Save the people! Protect the people!" 


Thanks for a while, he said, "Please come up, go back, go back a little, 
don't stay here, I..." When he said it, he found himself in a bad mood. His 
voice was smashed in the high tide of the tide, the more he wanted to 
zoom in, the more he found his own small. Xie pity took a deep breath and 
was about to drink. One hand suddenly caught his ankle. As soon as he 
bowed his head, he was very sad and said: "Sorry, let's go down and tell 
everyone not to be around here, beware!" 


This sentence is blurted out, and thanking the pity to realize what he said, 
a burst of creeps. 


In the past, let alone say this, even this kind of thought will never exist. 
Even if the innocence is going to fall, he also believes that he will be able 
to withstand. And now, he found a terrible thing: don't believe it. 


Not only do people not believe him, but even he himself can't believe 
himself! 


Grace is casual: "How could it collapse, not with you?" 

After listening to this sentence, thank you and pity is another shake. Grace 
did not pay attention to his slightly blue face, his eyes green, said: 
"Cousin, I will help you." 


Thanks for your pity, said: "You help me? How can you help me?" 


Grace does not hesitate to say: "You are not saying that you know how to 
make a human face disease? You tell me that method, I will help you curse 


Yongan people. I will help you kill them!" 
... He really hid under the bed and listened to the words of the three! 


Thank you for your pity: "You... you are fooling around! Do you know 
what a curse 1s?" 


Grace doesn't care about the earth: "Know it. Don't curse it? Cousin, I told 
you, I am very talented in this respect. I often curse me. I suspect that he 
was cursed by me. You ...... . 


'..."" Thank you for listening, and said: "Let's go." 


Graceful and busy: "No! No! Well, you don't tell me how to curse, then 
you tell me... How can we avoid the human face?" 


Thank you for your pity, and calmly said: "Do you know? You know why 
soldiers don't get infected, right? Cousin, you tell me why, okay?" 


There are still many palace people gathered in the vicinity, I do not know 
how many ears are listening, thank you for fear of leaking the wind and 


what is going on, shut up. But if someone couldn’t hold it, he looked up 
and said, "His Royal Highness! Is this true?" 


“Do you really know how to cure the human face?!” 
"Why don't you say that?" 


The green light that appeared in those eyes and gracefulness, thanked the 
pity and closed his mouth, and smashed a few words between the teeth: 
"No! I don't know!" 


The crowd has a small commotion, but it is not big. At this time, the wind 
letter came back, and when I saw it, I said, "I am doing something!" 


Xie pity immediately said: "Wind letter, take him down!" 


The wind came from the voice, but the grace suddenly grabbed the pity 
and eagerly said: "Cousin, you will surely defeat the Yongan people and 


drive them away! You will protect us, you will!" is not it?" 


If a few months ago, perhaps thank you will still whispered loudly: "I will 
protect you!" But now, he dare not. Graceful expression is extremely 
excited, thanking him for his fascination. Because he is very clear, grace is 
not the kind of person who will worry about the country and the people. 
Even if the country is in danger, he should only be afraid of being in the 
majority. Why is it so exciting? Hey, he suddenly remembered one thing. 
Grace father, it seems to be a Yongan person. 


Seeing that he didn't answer, the sad voice suddenly screamed: "Prince 
cousin! You don't really just let it go, don't you? Let's just let others do 
this and humiliate? Is it not that we have no way? ?!" 


After listening to his questioning, thank you for a sorrow. Because he 
found that there was nothing wrong with the sadness, in the face of such a 
situation, he really... no way! 


Wind channel: "I will ask the king to shut him down again." 


The grace was taken by him and he was still struggling. He shouted: "You 
must stand up. You must not fall!" 


Can't fall! 


Xie pity also knows that he can't fall. Even if the nearby people have 
withdrawn, the tower can't be poured. If it is down, not only is the palace’s 
century-old monument destroyed, but the mainstay of Shenwu Street, as 
well as many people’s houses, will be ruined. Moreover, this tower is also 
sealed with rare rare treasures and centuries-old scrolls left by ancestors of 
the past dynasties. At one time, it is impossible to transfer all of them. 
When the tower collapses, it will be gone. And the spirit of the kingdom of 
the Xianle Kingdom that it is guarding 1s completely broken. 


However, his mana, like the water source of Yongan, seems to be drying 
up. To support this huge golden statue, he can not leave here for the time 
being. He can only hand over the city to the wind and the feelings, stick to 
the place, and meditate calmly. Because this five-footed golden body was 


originally the image of the Tai Cangshan Emperor, and Xie Pity called it 
here. The original believers did not have the gods to worship, but they also 
swarmed here and prayed for it under the open air. . Although it is a royal 
palace, outsiders should not be allowed to enter. However, the cave can be 
collapsed for a while. Secondly, the situation of the Imperial City is 
confusing, not enough for people to control, and the third is also afraid of 
attracting public anger. Start | chaos, have to put them in. 


Thanks for sitting in one place, the Lord and the Queen came here to visit 
him every day. After a few days of squatting, he supported the tower that 
day, while accumulating strength, and he would withdraw from the 
standby. The lord is no more relaxed than him. His hair has been spent in 
vain, and he is clearly a good old man, but he seems to be half a hundred 
years old. Father and son meet and talk without words, but more 
harmonious than before. 


The Queen grew up watching the pity and grew up. She had only seen the 
graceful posture of the beloved son and the state of heaven and man. At 
the moment, he saw that he was swearing by it, and he was so cold that he 
was too reluctant to rely on it. Close to him, his heart is sour, personally 
under his sun, he umbrellas. For a while, thank you for fear that she stood 
tired for a long time, said: "After the mother, go back, I don't need to. You 
don't want to be near here, don't be close, I am afraid..." 


What he fears is ultimately a matter of words and stops. The Queen's back 
to the believers gathered here, for a long time, could not help but cry: 
"Hello, you suffer. You ... how you are so sin!" 


In order to cover up the color of the cockroach, the Queen's makeup is 
very thick, this tears, washed up the makeup powder, more revealing that 
this is just a woman who ts no longer young. She distressed her son and 
cried for her son, but she did not dare to cry loudly, for fear of being 
discovered by the people behind her. The Lord supported her shoulder, and 
she looked at her with respect. 


When a person suffers at any time, the first time he thinks of the person 
who loves him the most. For the pity, this person is undoubtedly his 
mother. Perhaps it is useless, but tired and devastated, cut to the present 


with a knife and a knife, this moment, he really wants to change back to a 
10-year-old child, and rushed into his mother's arms and cried. 


However, all the way to this day is his own choice. The situation of parents 
is very difficult. So many people are watching him below. He must not 
show a trace of weakness. If he can't stand it, who else can stand up? 


Therefore, thank you for your heart and soul: "After the mother, don't 
worry, I am fine. The baby is not bitter at all." 


Hard and not bitter, only his own heart is clear. 


Several palace people helped the king and the queen, and after a step back, 
Xie Pity was exposed to the scorching sun, and his eyes narrowed. I don't 
know how long it took, he opened his eyes, the sky was bleak|falling, the 
sunset was ruined, and there were few believers left. 


But as soon as he bowed his head, he saw that there was a small flower in 
the distance. 


Xie Pity is not very sure when there is a flower, freeing a hand and picking 
it up. 


It is a tiny flower. Snowy flowers, green cockroaches, thin stems, still dew, 
like tears, very poor look. The faint fragrance is like a deja vu, but it is 
inconspicuous but refreshing. 


He couldn't help but hold the flower tightly and stay close to the heart. 


At this time, a burst of **** smell masked this quiet flower. Thanks for 
raising his head, his eyes are all flowers, and a figure screamed at him: 
"Why! Why!!" 


Cheering, I waved the man and shouted, and reluctantly said: "Who!" 
The man was waved by his sleeve and rolled over the floor for several 


laps. Xie pity still supported the five-figure golden statue, did not dare to 
get up, did not dare to approach, but he suddenly recognized who this 


person is. This man has only one leg - the young man who gave him an 
umbrella and was cut by his own hand! 


The young man was covered in blood, and his hands were covered with 
blood. It was actually all the way to the hands and feet and climbed over. 
There was still a **** mark on the ground. He barely sat up, thanked and 
pity: "How come you, how come you? Are you not in the forest?" 


The young man did not answer him, and he used his hands and feet to 
climb towards him. Because he only has one leg, it seems very horrible, 
thank you: "You...!" 


The young man slammed the remaining leg of the right leg and said, 
"Why! " 


Take a closer look, on his right leg, it is a twisted face! 


One of the most worrying things about pity at that time really happened. If 
he was not sitting, he was afraid that he would fall. The young man yelled: 
"Why did you cut my leg! I still relapsed! My legs are gone! Why? You 
still have my legs! You still have my legs!" 


On the day of the umbrella, the young man’s smile when he put the 
umbrella in his hand was vivid, but it was like a madness. The contrast 
was too fierce, and the pity was chaotic, confused, and trembling: “I...” 


For a long while, he reacted and said: "I... I help you!" 


After that, immediately cast a spell to suppress the evil spirits on the 
young legs. Who knows, there was a mourning sound around, and three or 
four people rushed over, and they all cried: "His Royal Highness saves 
me!" "His Royal Highness saves me!" 


"His Highness, you look at my face, I cut half of my face, why didn't I 
heal, why? How can I cure it!" 


"His Highness, look at me, look at what I have become!" 


The **** picture took a scene and forced him to plug in front of him. Xie 
pity his eyes straightened, his hands didn't know where to wave, and 
muttered: "Don't look, I don't watch, I don't want to watch!" 


It turned out that after the people in the secluded forest had a collective 
recurrence, they finally burst into a big mess, and they broke through the 
soldiers and doctors who took care of them. They all ran out to find him! 


Since they have already ran out, if they do not quickly suppress the 
epidemic of this group of people, I am afraid that the human face will 
spread faster. Thanks for closing his eyes and forcing his capacity, he 
wanted to help these people to suppress the epidemic and delay the illness. 
However, as soon as this side was pressed, more people came to him soon: 
"His Royal Highness, and me! Help me too!" 


Surrounded by more than a dozen people, Xie pity felt that the golden 
statue above seemed to be a little crumbling, and his heart was awkward, 


saying: "Wait a minute, wait a minute! I..." 


One can't help but say: "I can't wait, I don't want to wait any longer, I have 
been waiting for too long!" 


"His Royal Highness, why did you rule him, don't treat me?" 
Gradually, the sound that surrounds him has changed: 


"Why didn't you cure him? It's all gone. It's not much to cure me? Are you 
not God? Why 1s it so unfair! I want to be fair!" 


Xie pity argued: "No, I am not unfair, this is not my problem, it is your 
illness is different..." 


"You don't want to help, you have to help, and you want to help the end. 
Now, what do you mean by doing the burden? Is it because of you?" 


Thanks a little bit of breathlessness, said: "I am not going to bear the 
burden, I am just... I have to wait..." 


"Do you know how to cure this disease?" 


Thank you for opening your mouth: "J..." 
"You know why you are not willing to tell us?!" 
Thanks and pity: "I don't know!" 


"You lied! I have heard people say, you know it clearly! I have seen you, 
you are not willing to tell us, just want us to always ask you like this, to 
deceive our offerings! Liar, you are a liar! ” 


"What is the method, you are going to say, you still don't say!!!" 


Xie was pale, his eyes were empty, and he was pushed and pulled by 
countless hands, and some of his hands had already smothered his neck. So 
the most funny scene appeared. He is clearly a god, but at the moment 
there is a weak voice in his heart: "...help!" 


It seems that some people are pulling these hands, but they don't seem to 
be. He is not very clear. He only knows that these people with **** faces 
and lack of legs seem to tear him apart into pieces. I don't know how long 
it took, and there was a horn in the distance. Everyone only cares about 
crying and tearing, regardless of the horn, but pity is a fierce spirit. 
Because he knows that it is the horn of the victory of the Yongan people! 


He couldn't sit still anymore, or he couldn't hold on anymore, his body 
tilted and he slammed in front. At the same time, the five-footed golden 
body that he had supported for a few days, and his movements were 
exactly the same, and instantly lost his life and collapsed. 


With a loud bang, the tall and heavy tower was pressed down, and the 
golden statue was broken! 


The golden body itself will not be broken. However, thanks to the pour of 
too much mana on it, I hope it will hold the tower that day, it has become 
extremely vulnerable. The sick people who did not escape from the forest 
fled, died, and wounded. The palaces and the streets are crowded with 

madness, and there are fragments of the towers that hide from the towers. 


Thanks to both hands and hoes, stumbled and ran all the way to the gates 
of the Imperial City. 


The tower of the city fired, the black smoke rolled, and Xie pity grabbed 
the stairs and passed by the soldiers who had retreated from countless 
wolverines. He didn't know what to do on the castle floor. He could only 
look at the black ash and the tears that didn't know when it ran down. In 
the blurred vision, the corpse is full of land, and only a white figure stands 
in the battlefield, with large sleeves fluttering. That figure 1s not a 
teenager, but a young man. When he looks back, he looks at him from afar. 
As achic beckon, he seems to be drifting away. 


See you, thank you for your voice: "Don't go!!!" 


I saw him twice before, he used the fake skin, but thank you for your 
intuition, this time, it must be the real body! So, he did not hesitate to turn 
over the wall, jumped up and jumped down the tower. 


In this life, thankfulness has jumped from extreme heights many times. 
Taking advantage of his high mana, martial arts is perfect, every time, he 
can land safely, every time, he is proud and cozy, every time, is a standard 
myth in the appearance of heaven. This time, he is no longer a myth. 


As soon as he landed, he did not stand still, but instead turned to the side, 
and a burst of pain suddenly spread from the legs throughout the body. 


He broke his leg. 


I broke my leg, but it didn't matter. It will be good soon. However, since 
that day, thankfulness seems to have become another person. 


He seems to have lost his soul, and there is no longer the original glory. 
Lose the first game, there is the second game, the third game... He does 
not want to play the sword, and does not want to go out, but because no 
one else is in front of him instead of him, he can only bite the scalp. On 
the battlefield, he did not have a negative slack, but he did his best, but I 
don’t know why, even if he was just the age of the weak crown, the hand of 
the sword has already begun to tremble like the old man. . 


Hey, full of fear, and he himself can't tell, exactly who is and what makes 
him fear. Later, the soldiers who had respected him very much gradually 
lost patience to him. 


Xie Li knows that many people have begun to circulate this saying: What 
is this martial art, clearly it is blasphemy! 


But he can't refute anything. Just because, thank you for being skeptical: 
Could he really become a god? 


If it is only that, it will be fine. For Xianle, the real disaster is the human 
face, and it is completely out of control. 


Five hundred people, one thousand people, two thousand people, three 
thousand people... Later, thanking the pity has not dared to ask, how many 
people have been infected today. 


As if to issue a final verdict on him, this day, Tianjie finally opened the 
door to him and conveyed a message to him: His Royal Highness, who 
should go back to heaven. 


It’s self-evident that this trip back and waits for what he will be. The wind 
and the love are rare and a little uneasy. Xie pity is to remember 
something else. He said to the two people: "Before I go, I want to go to 
another place to see." 


Wind channel: "Where to go?" 

Thanks to the pity: "The Emperor." 

Silence for a moment, the wind channel: "Don't go." 

Xie pity has already gone out of his own way, the wind channel: "His 
Royal Highness!" Can not stop him, but also had to keep up with the 


feelings. 


The three walked up the hill. 


Huangyjiguan, this 1s the place where the first temple of Xie Pui has risen, 
and it is also the place where his first statue was completed. However, at 
the request of the national teacher, the three thousand disciples have 
already been dismissed down the mountain. The current view of the 
emperor is just an empty view. 


Going halfway up the mountain, thank you for looking down. I saw the 
bright fire in the city, surrounded by a cluster of bright lights, reflecting 
the stars, very beautiful. Fengxin was extremely angry and shouted: "This 
group of madmen!" 


Xie pity is fixed on the fire, and the wind letter once again said: "Don't 
look! What's so good!" 


During this time, the wind letter has been thankful for countless times: Do 
you like to find yourself bitter or what? But in fact, thank you for not 
knowing what you want. He only knows that as long as he has a palace 
view burnt and smashed, he can't control himself, so he must look at it 
personally. I didn’t talk when I saw it, and I couldn’t stop it. I just stood by 
my eyes. What catches your eyes? He doesn't know either. 


At this time, there is also a fire on the Prince Peak. The wind horror was 
horrified, saying: "How come they even let the emperor not even let go?! 
These people are dug up the graves or..." 


When the voice did not fall, he closed his mouth. Because he remembered, 
the suffering of many people in Xianle now is only more powerful than the 
jokes of "digging the graves." 


However, this fire was not big. It took a while and it went out. It seems to 
be extinguished. This time, the wind letter is shocked. Because these days, 
only people dare to set fire, no one dares to fight. If someone persuades or 
stops the group of wicked people from letting go to the temple, they will 
be equated with the "God of God" to pity themselves and fight in the dead. 
For this reason, the three have long dared not show up in front of mortals, 
and they are all hidden. 


The three people heard the ping-pong sound of the ping-pong on the way 
to the Taizifeng. Sure enough, the Xianle Palace was already dismantled in 
seven or eighty-eight, leaving only one hall and four walls still in the hall. 
There is no **** on the stage of the gods, and a group of people in the 
same hall are smashing in the door of the broken hall. They yell and say: 
"You dog hybrid! Dead devil! You **** here to give your wife a break. 
How is it still, this broken view is your life is not a success?!" 


When you look at it, you know that this group of people must not come to 
the temple because of anger. It is just a group of people who are afraid of 
chaos in the world, or they are robbing the fire, or simply making a fun, 
they will burn the temple. But nowadays, he doesn't care much about who 
is in the temple. At this time, in this violent chaos, a fierce voice of a 
young boy penetrated the night sky: "Roll!!!" 


Listen carefully, this is actually a person being beaten with this group of 
people. Moreover, this talented person is a half-year-old child, but he does 
not want to show weakness or fall. But after all, one-to-many, the boy is 
already bloody, his face is blue and purple, all are scars, his face can not 
see clearly. Wind channel: "This kid, when grown up, must be a hero!" 


At this time, suddenly there was a man who had a glare, and when he 
moved a big stone on the ground, he would turn to the young man's brain. 
When he saw it, he waved his hand and the stone that the man had lifted 
bounced back to his own face, screaming a nosebleed. The boy stunned 
and turned his fist back and it was an all-night beating. The posture of his 
beating was terrible. He scared away a group of adults and ran away and 
pointed at him. He bluffed: "Mom! Wait! Wait for Laozi to bring people to 
clean you up!" 


The boy sneered: "Don't come, I want your dog!" 


The group was scared and ran faster. When the boy finished, he rushed to 
the fire that had been extinguished on the side and stepped on a few feet. 
He stepped on the grain of Mars, and then he went into the hall and picked 
up a piece of paper from the ground and carefully healed it. Hanging in the 
air, finally, relying on the Shentai, sitting on the ground and fascinated. 


Thanks for the pity, he went to the Shentai, and found that the teenager was 
hanging in the air. The pen is tender and tender, and at first glance, it is 
painted by people who have never studied painting. However, all the 
strokes are taken seriously, and it is a picture of the Prince. It seems that 
this is used to replace the statue that was called by him. Wind channel: 
"Draw well!" 


For so many days, Fengxin was so easy to see a person who was willing to 
defend his pity, and then he was so excited that he couldn’t wait to help 
him fight. Now, this teenager naturally feels that everything is good. The 
feelings of coveted, flashing eyes, seem to think of something, but did not 
speak. Thanks for raising his hand and gently touching the painting. 


It is not so obvious, just like a breeze. The boy slammed his head from his 
knees, and a scarred face seemed to be lit up in an instant. "Is it you?" 


The wind was shocked: "How is this kid so thief?" 
Admire the feeling: "Go." 


Thanks for the slightest bite, I was about to turn around. The boy threw 
himself on the edge of the platform and breathed a little. He said, "I know 
itis you! Your Highness, you don't want to go, I have something to say to 
you!" 


It is said that all three are a glimpse. The boy seems to be extremely 
nervous, clenching his fist: "Although your palace view is burned, but ... 
don't be unhappy. I will make you more, bigger, more gorgeous, no one 
can match you in the future. Palace view. No one will compare with you. I 
will!" 


The three were silent. 


This boy is ragged, gray-faced, with a bruised face and a horrible face, but 
he is so arrogant and arrogant, I don’t know what to think. As if afraid that 
his voice could not be conveyed to the other's ears, he put his hands on his 


lips and shouted at the picture on the platform: "His Royal Highness! Have 
you heard it? In my heart, you are God! You are the only one." God, you 
are the real God! Have you heard it?!" 


He was so vocal that the whole Tai Cangshan echoed: - Did you hear it! 


Thanks for a sudden, haha laughed. This laugh was too awkward, and I was 
shocked by the wind and the feelings. Thanks for the pity and shaking his 
head, the boy couldn’t hear it, but he seemed to feel something, his eyes 
widened and he looked around. Cold, a drop of cold water drops on his 
cheek. The boy slammed his eyes sharply, and in a flash he reflected a 
white reflection in his eyes. When you blink your eyes, the reflection 
disappears. 


Seeing that Xie Pity actually appeared for a moment, the wind channel: 
"His Royal Highness, you just..." 


Xie pity lost: "Just? Oh, my mana is not working, I just didn't control it for 
a while." 


The boy stood up straight and took a look at his eyes. He seemed to be 
trying to retain the fleeting shadow. Xie pity closed his eyes, half 
awkward, said: "Forget it." 


I finally got the echo, but it was such a three-word. The boy first looked 
bright, his mouth rose, and then it was a glimpse. The curvature of the 
corner of his mouth gradually fell, saying: "... What? Forgot what? 


Thanks a lot of sighs and sighed at him: "Forget it." 


The boy is swearing. Xie pity and said to himself: "Forget it. Anyway, no 
one will remember soon." 


Hearing this sentence, the boy's eyes widened, and suddenly his eyes shed 
a tear in his eyes, and a pale trace was washed on his face. The throat in 
his neck moved and said: "I..." 


The wind letter seems to be a little unbearable, saying: "Your Highness, 
don't say it. You have been banned." 


Thanks to pity: "Well, don't say it. However, anyway, it has been banned so 
much, not bad." 


In this sentence, he did not let the boy hear it again. The three went down 
to the platform and walked outside the broken hall. The night wind hit 
people, thanked Shaman and shook his head. 


He is still a priest now. For the sake of reason, it 1s impossible to feel 
"cold". However, at this moment, he really felt the cold of the bones. 


Who knows, the boy who was left behind by them suddenly muttered in 
the hall: "No." 


He clearly could not see the pity and other people, but he found the right 
direction accurately and rushed out, rushing to their backs: "No!" 


The three turned back and saw that the boy’s eyes were in the dark, bright 
and touching, a scarred face, like anger and sorrow. 


In the raging tears, he said: "I will not forget. 


"I will never forget yours!!!" 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 89: Moonlight 
Festival Mid-Autumn Festival 


"clang!" 
Spark splash. 


The blade is deep | insert | into the stone paving, thank you both hands 
holding the sword, bowed his head, his forehead deeply against the hilt, a 
tooth seems to be bitten by his own teeth. 


"waste!" 


Grace haha laughed: "You waste this! I know you don't dare to kill me! Let 
me humiliate you, how can you toss you to death, as long as I put the knife 
on the neck of others, you can't help me. You are a useless coward, do God 
like you, what are you still alive!" 


However, thankfulness has completely calmed down. He looked up and his 
eyes were cold: "You don't be too happy. I can't help you, naturally 
someone has won you." 


Grace said: "Do you want to hold him on the thigh of Junwu and ask him 
to be the master? Don't dream, did you care for you? Well? Now I still lick 
my face and mix with him, you can't be a Idiot." 


Xie Li stripped down the solemn and gorgeous Yueshen costume on Grace, 
called out the evil spirits, and bound him to the side, and said: "You better 
shut up and say less." 


Grace said: "I am not afraid of you, why do you threaten me?" 
Thanks to the pity: "Are you afraid of the city?" 


Graceful smile finally caught for a moment. This moment, thankful and 
whispered: "I told you in advance, in case I am in a bad mood, maybe I 


will hand you over to Huacheng, ask him to help me think of a cure. So 
you give me some care. ,Did you hear that?" 


Hearing words, Grace can't laugh out. He stunned: "Fucking, you are so 
vicious! You can't figure it out! You might as well give me to Lang 
Qianqiu!" 


Thanks to pity on the ground, began to use the little bit of the hand to rub 
the ground and the bottom of the rough particles of different sizes. In fact, 
he will not hand over the grace to Heaven. The reason is Lang Qianqiu. If 
it is handed over, Lang Qianqiu knows that the grace is falling, and 
immediately he will raise the sword and rush to kill him. Let not let him 
kill? Headache; what if the next step is killed? Also a headache. Therefore, 
Shang Tianting is currently not allowed to pay. 


In this case, it seems that it is a good choice to go to Huacheng to help. 
But in fact, he just took the flower city out to scare the grace. After all, he 
has been disturbing the flower city for too many times. Every time he has 
something to think of, he always thinks that he is too foreign to be an 
outsider. It’s just that I’m moving out of him to scare me. I’m sorry to 
have been embarrassed. 


Grace turned around and spit in the other direction. The child pitifully 
reached out and touched his forehead and said, "Hey, are you okay? Are 
you hurting?" 


Grace seems to be very happy to enjoy this father-son game, yin and yang 
strangely said: "Son  ~ Dad is fine~ Hahaha." 


Thanks to the redness of the eyes, while holding the powder, carefully 
placed in the Yueshen suit. The child sneaked over and helped prayed a 
little. Thanks to see this pair of small hands, looked up at him, the child 
whispered: "Brother, can you not beat me, let us go. We will not come to 
your house to steal things." 


Thanks for the acidity, forbearance, and said: "Children, what is your 
name?" 


The child said: "My name is Millet." 


Xie pity gathered all the ashes, wrapped them in the clothes, put them back 
in the coffin, and put them on the coffin, which slowly said: "Muzi, there 
is not you, there is another person, he is a ghost. I am possessed. It is a bad 
person now." 


The child can't understand his words and confuses the truth: "Another 
person? No, I know, that is me." 


Grace applauded: "Not bad, I can't get a cheap son! Hahaha... Hey!" But 
thank you for kicking the past. 


Millet is still young and has always been dependent on his father. He is 
extremely dependent on the body that looks graceful. He will not be 
willing to leave. He regrets how to put him in the air, so he has a heart 
sword and two He has repeated three heads. The left hand was holding the 
grace, the right hand holding the millet, leaving the Tai Cangshan, and 
rushing to the village of Bodhisattva. 


After leaving for many days, when I came back late at night, the view of 
the Bodhisattva opened wide, the clouds were rolling, the incense burners 
on the platform were filled with incense sticks, and some tributes were 
piled on the table. Thanks for the pity, I took a look at it and took two buns 
from the table. One gave the millet, and the other rudely smashed it into 
the mouth. After all, this body is still a living person. Before thanking him 
for studying how to take it out of this person, he must eat well. It’s a bit 
uncomfortable to squirt the buns and it’s a bit uncomfortable. “I said! You 
shouldn’t really give me to Huacheng??” 


Xie pity sneered: "Are you afraid?" Too lazy to listen to him nonsense, 
turned and went to the ground on a pile of pickles jars to look east. 
Graceful mouth: "I have something to fear, I am afraid that you, as a 
priest, actually hooked up with this kind of hook. You..." He said, he 
suddenly looked at him, locked in one place. It turned out that Xie pity 
bent over and slipped out of the same thing in his underwear. 


It is a crystal clear ring. This is what this 1s. 


Xie Li did not notice his gaze, but his grace was behind him, revealing the 
color of doubt. After a while, he said: "Prince cousin, what is your 
chest??" 


Xie Liben did not intend to pay attention to him, but the ring mentioned by 
Grace was something he cares about a lot, so he turned and put his finger 
on the thin silver chain and said, "This? Do you know what it is? ” 


Grace said: "You take it, give me a look, I will know." 
Thanks for your pity: "Know it. If you don't say it, shut up." 


Graceful, said: "You are always excited about the people you are familiar 
with, and have the ability to shake your prestige." 


Xie pity put the silver chain back into the chest and put it on the meat. He 
said, "You have the ability to continue. Say one sentence, I will score one 
point, and you will be one step closer to the knife of Huacheng." 


Unknowingly, he was very familiar with the flower city. Grace sneered: 
"You scare me less, you may die someday, who is under the knife! You are 
not trying to know what this is? One of the four evils tells you that this is 
the curse , ominous things! Don't hurry to throw away, you dare to bring 
this thing to the body, is it because you have lived long?" 


Hearing the words, thanking him for getting up, said: "Really?" 


Graceful words: "Crap! If you give this thing, whether it is a person or a 
ghost, you will be unwilling." 


Thanks and pity: "Oh." 
Grace: "What is ‘oh’?!” 
Xie pity does not return, faintly said: "Oh, it is your words, you are a 


ghost. I chose to believe in the person who sent me this thing. I decided to 
wear it all the time." 


He is always gentle to others, but he is extraordinarily cold. It’s half-dead, 
screaming, and thanking me for not hearing anything. He found that he 
couldn't find the jar with half a month. He said: "Is the wind teacher 
already here, took her away?" 


Listening and listening, he suddenly felt a slight misunderstanding. 


It’s really weird. The grace is clear that the flower city is afraid of death, 
but why dare to continue to stimulate him, it is like... It is just like 
deliberately trying to attract his attention! 


Thinking of this, thank you for a sudden attack, cold and uncomfortable, 
and sure enough to see his eyes flashing, sneaky. An inexplicable instinct 
drove the gratitude to look up. As soon as he looked up, he saw the top of 
the beam that was not too high. A black man clung to the back of the 
ceiling and fell on it like a huge bat. 


Cheering backhand is a heart-throwing sword. The man put his back on the 
beam, and to evade the sword, he turned and fell. 


Guzi was scared that the buns had fallen, and he wowed. When Rong Rong 
just shouted, he was sealed by Ruo, and dragged to the corner to bundle it. 
Xie Pui originally thought that this was a helper for the ambush, but 
quickly made a few hands, only to feel that this person shot fast and 
embarrassed, inexplicably familiar. He can responsibly determine that this 
virtue is tolerant, and he has no ability to control such a subordinate. He 
also sees what the other person holds in his hand, and looks at it with a 
black lacquered jar. And that jar is the one with half a month! 


The wind master has not taken the half moon yet? Thanks for the moment, 
remembering who this person 1s, and blurted out: "Little!" 


It turned out that I had been stealing for half a month. I know that I was 
just hit by the thankfulness. I had to hide from the beam. Because I was 
bound by the evil spirits, I was lying on the ground. I saw the hiding place 
on the top. He didn’t know. Who is this person, only thought that it is 
unfavorable to thank, that is to his advantage. He was afraid of praying 
that someone was ambushing on it, deliberately continually interfering 


with the noise, and it was expected that he was still prayed. Thanks for the 
two curses, the shacks are exiled, and both have no mana, so they can only 
fight hard. Thanks for the eight hundred years, they all worked hard 
together, and they couldn’t help but live in it. After a dozen moves, they 
won him and said: "The jar is still here!" 


Originally, he just shouted at the mouth. Who knows, he actually gave the 
pickle jar to him. Thanks for your pity, I thought about how to make it 
back. This little general is really simple. Generally, I don’t want to die and 
not pull for a long time. But when I heard the shackles throwing out the 
jar, I whispered, "Go!" 


Listening to this tone, I was really anxious. The jar had not yet fallen in 
the air, and Xie was about to reach out to pick it up. It suddenly turned 
abruptly and flew out the window. The next moment, a few people listened 
to the voice of a man far away: "You really taught me to be disappointed." 


The hustle and bustle changed, and said: "...General!" 


Thanks and he rushed out of the Bodhisattva. Sure enough, the man who 
stood in a room far away was jealous. He didn't wear armor, he was 
dressed in a uniform, and his body was very long. The jar flew to the side 
of the body and floated, but he held the sword at the waist, and said to the 
following: "Men's husband, the overall situation is heavy, the cause 1s first. 
You are the one who wants to do something big, now What is going on, for 
a little girl to mess with it? You are not a hairy boy?" 


I stayed down and said nothing. He said: "You can get to this position in 
two hundred years. Is it easy for you? I have paved the way for you, it is 
easy to go down, it is not easy to get up!" 


The so-called high place is not cold. This is where the gods are going to go 
down, generally they like to stand tall, the higher the more convenient to 
overlook the people below. Thanks to pity, there was such a stinking 
problem. Of course, after he fell once, he felt that his leg was faintly 
painful when he stood up to the heights. The problem was cured. However, 
the tallest building in the entire Boao Village is the village head's house, 


and the village head's family is also a simple small tile house, so the 
generals standing here are very succumbing. 


However, this is not the point. The point is that if you look at this 
situation, you will know what is going on. Last time, I was willing to pull 
a half-month to sin and give him a top sin. Although it was because of Jun 
Wu, it seemed to give up on the surface, but did not give up. This time, 
Xie Li was turned out of the golden banquet and other broken things, it is 
difficult to protect itself, the wind review will inevitably fall, the general 
will probably feel that it is time to revisit the old things, so find a place to 
stay with him and half a month Going to the heavens and trying to turn the 
case, it is really a hundredfold. However, it seems that he is not very 
active. He sighed and said: "General, this is still..." 


I looked at the sky without a word, and hated iron. It’s also annoying, and 
I’m dissatisfied with the pity. I’ve been reprimanded in front of me. For a 
long while, he suddenly said, “I’m going to see what kind of strange 
woman is, let me cultivate it.” It seems that I want to break the jar. This 
kind of method of opening the altar is originally no problem. The problem 
is that half a month of injury does not know how to raise it. If it is not 
cured, it will be broken. It will be miserable, thank you for your change, 
and you will fly. : "Don't fall!" 


Who knows, the pickpocket has not yet arrived, but the jar has a loud bang, 
and it has exploded. 


In an instant, the sky is full of crunchy taste of pickles. 


The nearest pick from the jar was unfortunately hanged with pickles, and 
the whole person was shocked by the salty cabbage rain. Immediately, a 
clear woman’s voice was in the air: “The general is really good and 
bright!” 


A white man turned out from a small jar. He had only a fist that was a little 
bigger. He turned over a few laps and turned over. He looked at it with a 
glance and said: "The wind master!" 


Hidden in the pickles jars, it is not half a month, but the teacher Qing 
Xuan. She hid in the jar and couldn't prevent the pickled pickles, but she 
still fluttered in white, not stained with dust, and landed safely, saying: 
"Fortunately, fortunately, I will send this little girl to someone else 
somewhere earlier." Go, otherwise, I am afraid that I will not be able to 
escape the general's long arm." 


I have always been self-satisfied, no matter what it 1s, the style must be 
there. At this time, it is a gas of pickles. Even if it is against the female 
form of the teacher, the good manners will be depressed: "Qing Xuan, why 
are you doing this right with me?" 


If he changed his personal, he estimated that he had already started to 
scream, but unfortunately, when he thought of the brother of Shi Qingxuan, 
he could only clean up the pickles, rationalize his hair, cut his teeth, and 
shook his head: "...you You better not let me know where you sent the little 
girl, otherwise I will come to visit in person." 


His words are no different than saying that whoever stays for half a month 
is just right with him, he will definitely go to trouble. Shi Qingxuan is 
clapping: "Well, let's say it, it's okay to tell you where you are, I'm afraid 
you don't dare to visit. Listen well - that little girl 1s now in Yulongshan, 
Yushi Dongfu, under the rainman's seat!" Do you dare to go?" 


Hearing his words, his face changed slightly, but he was not as 
emboldened as he was. He gathered the color and suddenly became 
serious. He said to the wind teacher: "Qing Xuan, you are still young and 
young, and this is the only thing you like to fight. I just hope that you will 
come back to the day and think back to the present, don't regret it!" 


When he finished, he jumped off the roof and his body shape disappeared. 
Thanks for the slightest feelings, I always felt that there was something in 
his words and asked: "The wind master, his last sentence...?" 


Shi Qingxuan 1s not interested in the tunnel: "Bulky." 


Shi Qingxuan patted him on the shoulder and said: "Small __, this time 
you know to stop your general, it’s still kind. I’ve changed it underneath. 
have a chance to tell you good things in heaven. ,Do not worry!" 


— 


I stayed silent for a moment and said: "Thank you an adult. However, I 
always feel that you are a little misunderstood. In fact, he is not like this 
on a regular basis. It is just because of the past, he is too worried about 
me. Also, you know, Rain Master..." 


In the end, it seems that I still feel that I have said more, shook my head 
and said, "Farewell." 


The two watched him go, thanked and said: "The wind master, only you 
said the rain master, but the rain teacher?" 


Shi Qingxuan turned around and said: "Exactly. The rain teacher has not 
changed for hundreds of years. How come you know? Is there old?" 


Xie pity shook his head and said warmly: "Although I have never had the 
privilege of seeing it, | am very grateful to the Rain Master for being kind 
to me." 


Shi Qingxuan smiled and said: "That is. Although I know very little about 
the Rain Master, as long as I know it, I have never said that the Rain 
Master is not good. Oh, except for you." 


Thanks to pity: "Can there be any festival between the two?" 


Shi Qingxuan: "The festival is natural. People who have been in the 
heavens for so many years, who have not yet had a holiday or collusion. I 
told you that the rainmaster is a shadow in his heart." 


"..." thank you, "shadow?" In his heart, I always feel that the rainmaster is 
a farmer. Shi Qingxuan: "Hey, you know, there are a lot of descendants. 
There are children and grandchildren everywhere. Before Xiaoxiao, there 


was another deputy **** in Mingguang Temple. He also ordered him to 
come up and then soared. a descendant." 


Thanks to the pity: "The descendants of the generals are really talented." 


But no one can take the ascendant as a "home study source." Shi Qingxuan 
has shown the fan: "The talents are counted as talents, but they all follow a 
virtue. They are big and have a big problem. The deputy **** often 
commits crimes on other people's sites, but he is arrogant. No one dared to 
say anything. As a result, one day, he committed the former Yushi State. 


"The Rain Master is almost out of the ordinary, only planting in the deep 
mountains, so there is a famous name called the deep mountain Lao Nong 
Yu Shi, who knows that when he comes out, he will directly hit the next 
man to go to heaven, and finally I was thrown to the emperor and 
sentenced to exile." 


Thanks for thinking: "How does this story seem familiar?" 


Shi Qingxuan went on to say: "I was thinking about it, exile and exile. It’s 
nothing to fish again after a hundred years. But how many things can 
happen in a hundred years in the world? Every year, even every day, there 
is new The strangers appeared, like a lantern, dazzled, waves and waves, 
one wave after another. Only after ten years, the original believers have 
converted to other **** officials; after fifty years, the deputy officer I was 
forgotten for a long time. After a hundred years, I never got up again. At 
that time, a young man with a light future was so abolished, no more. Until 
a small embarrassment came out, he regained his mind. Find the deputy of 
your heart." 


It is no wonder that the generals have to use the means to catch the small 
scorpion. It turns out that there is a precedent, and it is afraid that it will 
be scrapped. Although the method is not right. Thanks for the pity, a sigh, 
said: "Human." 


Shi Qingxuan also said: "Yeah, after staying in the world for a long time, 
they will all be lost to lose their aura and fighting spirit." 


The two nod each. The difference is that Xie Pity is unconsciously 
unconsciously nodding, and Shi Qing Xuan is exaggeratingly nodded 
autonomously. After a while, Xie pity remembered an extremely important 
person and called: "... Lang Fire! That child!" 


A series of things happened too fast and the stimulus was too great, so he 
never remembered the child. Shi Qingxuan: "You said the child you 
brought back from the bliss? The child has seen the emperor, now I am 
there, come back and bring it to you." 


Thanks to pity, the Bodhisattva Guan Guan is still closed to another child, 
but can not let others see, said: "How can I be so happy, or I will go up." 


Shi Qingxuan nodded happily: "The same. Just a day to the Mid-Autumn 
Festival, you don't miss it once a year, this year my brother will come 
back, I will introduce you to you." 


This tone is full of pride for my brother, and I can’t help but smile. I 
thought, “Mid-Autumn Festival...” 


Every year, the Mid-Autumn Festival, the gods of the heavens must set up 
a Mid-Autumn Festival to celebrate, overlooking the joys of the hundreds 
of people in the world. In addition, there is a very important "game" at the 
banquet. It can be said that it is the finale of the Mid-Autumn Festival 
banquet - "bucket lights". 


A praying lantern is available to ordinary people. In the Mid-Autumn 
Festival, the Baishen fighting lights, the day of the Mid-Autumn Festival, 
the subjective of each of the priests, how many devotees can be received 
by the believers. 


Although everyone said "it's just a game", "I don't want to be serious." "I 
just play, I don't care." In fact, how many hearts can really care? Most of 
them are secretly screaming, looking forward to this year the believers 
give themselves a sigh of relief. If there is any indisputable one, then there 
is only Junwu, because, of course, every year, the fighting lights are the 
victory of the Shenwu Temple, and it is higher every year, so he really 
used this game as a game. God officer. As for the rest of the priests, the 


first is not the first, the second is the second, and the situation is extremely 
fierce. 


When the incense of the Xianle Palace was at its peak, the Mid-Autumn 
Festival was also the second in the limelight. It was far ahead of the 
Shenwu Temple, and the other gods were far behind, but now it will be 
difficult to read. Xie pity does not have to guess to know how many 
blessings will be spent this year - certainly not at all! 2k novel reading 
network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 90: Moonlight 
Festival Mid-Autumn Festival 2 


However, even if it is ugly, it is best to go. He is not a sanctuary that has 
been done for hundreds of years like a rain teacher. It is not like a 
geologist. It is because there are secrets to be in the body, and it is not like 
the navy, just to do what you want for me. If anyone else, No, it always 
becomes a special case. If you don’t want to attend, you won’t attend 
anything. In the long run, others are dissatisfied and talked about it. Even 
if he doesn’t think it is anything, Junwu 1s not good at it. Therefore, the 
current should bear the teacher Qing Xuan: "Well, I will definitely be there 
at that time." 


During the few days, Xie pity tried several methods, and could not succeed 
in letting the soul of Grace and the body of this man separate, and the 
grace became more and more proud. Fortunately, there is a millet who has 
always refused to give him a "squeaky" feeding, otherwise thank you for 
not wanting to stuff anything into this mouth. On the day of the Mid- 
Autumn Festival, Xie Pity had a peripheral appearance in the Bodhisattva 
view, and locked the door, leaving Ruo to continue to bundle the grace and 
go to Xianjing to report. 


The poem cloud "Heavenly white jade, the 12th floor of the five cities. The 
immortal man cares for me, and ends with a longevity." Bai Yujing here, is 
said Xianjing. Mid-Autumn Festival, Xianjing sent a new atmosphere, in 
addition to the street, the promenade, near the tower, thank you have seen 
a lot of guards, I think that after the flower city came up once, 
strengthened several times the alert. The banquet was set up in the open air 
months, and the fragrant fragrant scented, the scent of the scent of the 
clouds, the flowers like the snow, can be a feast for the fun, while watching 
the moon. Enjoy the moon on the world, hold the thumb and index finger 
to pinch a circle, and the moon is at most just in this circle. However, in 
the Jingjing River, the moon is white and white, as if it 1s a huge jade 
curtain standing not far away. It seems that it can catch up with it in a few 
steps. It is really a beautiful sight that people can't see. 


At the head of the banquet, it is natural that Junwu does not need to say. 
But the rest of the people how to sit, a variety of hidden secrets, order and 
location are pay attention to, sit high is naturally impossible, sit down, 
probably the gods are not willing. Xie pity does not matter to this, but the 
Mid-Autumn Festival feast is to be dressed in formal suits. That is to say, 
it is best to wear what you look like in the world, what you wear on the day 
of the feast. Thanks for the fact that there is no **** at all, so it is still a 
shame in a white robes, but it is not shabby, but there is no better clothes. 
This attire is also very eye-catching, so he feels that it is still a hidden 
point. 


Who knows, he had just found a corner to sit down, and looked up, but saw 
the wind letter came over. Both of them hesitated for a moment, slightly 
nodding to the other side, it was a greeting. After a few steps, Fengxin 
went back and asked, "What are you doing here?" 


Xie pity thought that he was sitting wrong, stood up and said: "I thought I 
could sit anywhere." 


The wind letter is about to open, but the pity shows that Shi Qingxuan is 
waving at him in front. Shi Qingxuan was a female woman at this time. 
Feng Xin looked back and saw that he had seen the shadows. He was 
shocked and lost his gratitude. He quickly left. Shi Qingxuan also called: 
"His Royal Highness, here!" 


The wind teacher is the big red man in the heavenly court. The position 
she is sitting in is naturally very good, and it is closer to Junwu. This trick 
was called, many of the priests looked over, and the original swearing of 
the prince also saw the pity, and nodded slightly to him, thankfulness had 
to pass. Along the way, I did not see Lang Qianqiu. It is said that he pushed 
the Mid-Autumn Festival early in order to find the whereabouts of the 
sadness. Shi Qingxuan gave a pity to find a position next to him. Feng 

Shui is excellent. Xie Pity feels that it is not suitable. However, the wind 
teacher is very difficult, but he has already sat down according to him. You 
go to the child. The ugly is ugly, but it's quite awkward." At this step, he 
had to thank him. Turning around, the two people sitting near Mingy1, he 
is boring his head to play a jade cup, the hand of the cup is even whiter 
than the jade cup. Look at his face without any serious problems, it seems 


that the wounds in the ghost market have been raised, thank you: "Grand 
Master, don't come innocent." 


Mingyi’s head does not seem to want to talk. Shi Qingxuan is the opposite 
of him. Everyone knows, and can say two words before and after, even one 
hundred and eighty thousand miles away. Xie pity admire him to 
remember the names of so many size officials. Sitting next to him is a ten- 
year-old boy with high nose and deep eyes and black hair. Xie pity did not 
know him, he did not know the pity, the two looked at each other for a 
while, they were inexplicable, and finally ended up with a thank-you. 
Looking back and forth, the two people, the wind and the love, opened up 
incomparably, and the three priests were sitting opposite him and talking 
very well. 


On the left 1s a black man civil servant, the eyebrows are arrogant, the 
generous and graceful, the five fingers in the speech gently tap on the 
table, the expression is calm and inexplicable; the middle is of course 
already very familiar; the right 1s A white-shirted son, with a paper fan in 
his hand, a fan on the front of the fan, and a waterline on the opposite side. 
The eyebrows are similar to the teacher’s six-pointed sacred, but the 
arrogant and arrogant state. Cross-birth, swearing at Sven, but clearly in 
his eyes, he would look down on him. Who is it besides that "water and 
sky"? 


Thanks to the heart: "Three cancers." 


The black man civil servant, presumably is the strongest male form of the 
spirit and mana, and sure enough. The three people rushed to the ground 
and changed their designs to each other. They heard the teacher Qingxuan 
frequently whispered: "hypocrisy. The hypocrisy is extremely." Xie Pity 
feels quite interesting. At this time, he saw a gorgeous small pavilion in 
front of the banquet, covered with red curtains on all sides, and asked: 
"What is that?" 


Shi Qingxuan smiled and said: "Oh, you don't know, this is also a very 
popular game in heaven. Come and show you, it's already started!" 


The voice just fell, and there were a few thunders coming from outside the 
sky. Jun Wu looked at the sky, took a glass of wine and handed it down. So, 
in the thunder burst, the priests at the banquet began to smile and 
screamed and greeted the glass of wine, saying: "Don't give it to me! Don't 
give it to me!" "Handed over to him!" 


Just look at other people's play, thank you also roughly clarified the rules, 
the heart said: "It turned out to be a drum and spread flowers." The people 
sent each other the wine that Junwu handed down, can not be sprinkled, 
can be passed to anyone, but can not be passed back . When the thunder 
stops, who is in the hands of the wine glasses, who will take the fun. Just 
don't know what to enjoy. This game is not very friendly to thank you. 
Whoever you pass the wine glass to is who you want to play, so you will 
usually hand over several people who have a good relationship with 
yourself. But he and most of the priests in the room are not familiar with 
each other. How can I just play around with others? It can only be handed 
to the wind division at most, but who knows if the wind division is the one 
who gave him the wine? 


Thanks for thinking: "It is best that no one will pass it to me. But maybe it 
is my own passion." He has not spoken yet, and the first round is over. The 
wine glass was stopped in the hands of the cockroaches. It seemed that the 
cockroaches had become accustomed to it. In the screaming sound, the 
wine was drunk, and the gods clapped their hands and shouted: "Get up! 
Get up!" 


In the joy, the gorgeous pavilion slowly pulled up the curtains on all sides. 
I saw a tall general standing on the stage, striding forward, and being 
prosperous. He didn't seem to see the priests at the end, nor did he see the 
strange scenery outside the pavilion. He took a few steps and began to sing 
words. 


It turned out that the wine cup was passed to the hands of the gods. This 
pavilion will bring up the drama about the **** official and show it to 
everyone. Because people love to make a lot of fun, and know where they 
will compile what kind of drama, and whether they will just be drawn, this 
game 1s very shameful and thrilling. But fun is here too. It is important to 
know that the general’s play is wonderful because the female characters 


are different each time. Sometimes it is a fairy, sometimes a banshee, 
sometimes a show, a female horn is a beauty of the game, the story 1s a 
more unconcerned, the gods look eager to look forward to the female horn. 
Sure enough, not long after, a young lady in black was on the stage, and 
her voice was like a scorpion. The two sang for a while, and the songs 
were quite picky. The more people look at the two people, the more they 
feel wrong, they ask: "What is the name of this play?" "Who is this woman 
who is hooked up by the general?" 


At this time, the "General General" on the stage said: "Jie Qing -" 
Under the stage, Yan and Lingwen both sprinkled a drink. 


Who is Jie Qing, the real name of the spirit is called Nan Gongyjie. The 
gods were shocked: How do these two actually have a leg? ! 


Lingwen wiped the lips with a cloth towel, and said: "Don't think about it. 
Edited." 


Although the two parties are a little depressed, but fortunately, the face is 
thick enough, the stage is screaming, they will not see it. The teacher did 
not cross them but did not let them go. The fan smiled and said: "This play 
is very exciting. What do you think?" 


Lingwen said: "There is nothing to think about. This play is very old. At 
that time, my **** is not like this now. Folklore, you think about it, 
folklore, but 1f you are a woman, there are a few old people who haven’t 
hooked up. ?" 


Everyone is deeply impressed. He said: "Hey, you can't say that, I have 
almost hooked up the folklore. I really don't have this. I don't want to 
marry anyone." 


Lingwen said: "As you said, folklore, I have more male priests. I haven't 
hooked one of them yet. It's not like a needle." 


Since the Lingwen has been clicked, the folklore has always been told that 
it was because of the hooking of a certain priest. This is one of the reasons 


why the early days of the spiritual temple were deserted and unmanned. It 
is said that the protest was fierce. The dog is bloody, and often someone 
throws a dudou and a monthly cloth into her merit box. If a man's priest 
has such rumors, he can get the name of the romantic, and still enjoy it. It 
can be seen that although the situation 1s similar, there are differences 
between men and women, and the end is very different. 


Just thinking about it, the next round started again. The teacher did not 
even laugh, this time it was his turn, and two poisonous tumors beside him 
to make a gesture of congratulations to him: "The present report, please 
pick it up." 


The teacher did not cross the brow and drank the wine. The curtain rose 
slowly again and did not rise to the top. There were two long calls inside: 


"Lang Jun -" 


With love and veins, twists and turns, it turns lingering. Therefore, the 
bottom of the pity saw with his own eyes, Shi Wudu and Shi Qingxuan 
lived a half-body goose bump. 


Shi Qing Xuan bounced up: "Brother -! Get rid of it!" 


The teacher Wu Duo immediately shouted: "Let's put it down! Let me put 
it down!" 


I don’t have to look at it, I know that the one I got this time is definitely 
the folklore of the husband and wife of the Navy and the Wind Maiden. 
Love|Desire and hatred are always the favorites of people when telling 
stories. There is the best, no better, you can just make it. It is reasonable to 
say that the things that the priests themselves do are authentic myths, but 
sometimes when people look at them, they have to admire them as true 
myths. When the teacher didn't make a speech, the curtain actually fell off. 
The gods wanted to laugh and didn't dare to laugh. They worked hard, and 
thanked the politely and asked: "Why are the wind masters, how can they 
still call the curtain?" ” 


Shi Qingxuan has a lingering sorrow and said: "Yes, small meaning, 
donate 100,000 merits!" 


In the words of pity, the third round began. This time, the thunder did not 
bang for a long time, the wine glass was passed to the boy who thanked 
him. 


Seeing this result, the reaction of the gods is somewhat strange. Not very 
enthusiastic, but not very cold. It seems that there is interest in watching a 
movie, but I don't want to be too obvious. The boy seemed to have no 
interest in the game, but he still drank the wine. He put down the glass and 
the curtain pulled up again. 


I saw two people standing on the stage. One was a young teenager, with a 
curly hair like a stone lion. Although it was extremely exaggerated, it was 
also awesome. It should be the young priest. The other is a sharp-nosed 
monkey. Describe the ugly horns, jumping around on the stage. When the 
boy faced him, he pretended to be serious, but it was very greasy and made 
people more disgusting; when the boy turned around, he snarled in the 
back and sneaked with a sword, which is undoubtedly a face-to-face set. 
The role of a despicable villain. 


The harlequin played very exaggeratedly, as if it was a burlesque, the gods 
saw it and reacted differently. Xie pity noticed that the priests who were in 
the lower position were laughing, and the officials on the top of the 
position, such as Shi Qingxuan and Shi Wudu, were mostly stunned and 
not funny. At the same time, he also found that the young man's hand next 
to him suddenly burst into the blue veins, and his heart was vigilant. 
Although he could not understand what was on stage, he could probably 
guess that he was insulting another person. And even if I don't know who 
and who, it feels that this arrangement is extremely uncomfortable. Seeing 
that the boy seemed to be attacking, he took a chopstick on the table and 
threw it at the rope that hangs the curtain. 


The sharp chopsticks flew over the rope and actually broke the rope. When 
the curtain fell, the gods were shocked and said: "How can this be?" "What 


is this?" They all looked forward to praying, and some stood up. Thanks 
for the desire to speak, the next moment, something in the ear is fried, but 
the boy crushed the white jade wine glass. 


He seemed to be furious by this play, throwing a handful of jade cup 
pieces, jumping up, jumping on the table, squatting on the bottom of his 
foot, and squatting on the pavilion and entering the curtain. Several priests 
rushed to open the red curtain, but there was no one inside. The crowd was 
shocked: "It’s not good, and the Highness of Qi Ying goes down and hits 
people!" 


Thanks to pity: "Qi Ying? Qi Ying Temple? Western Wushen right?" Busy 
asked the teacher Qing Xuan: "The wind master, how is this going? What 
is the story of His Royal Highness?" 


Shi Qingxuan returned to God and said: "Beating people 1s... hitting 
people. Cough, maybe you don't believe it, but Qi Ying often beats his 
followers." 


For the first time, he heard that a priest would dare to beat his followers, 
but this would make the priests fall in the hearts of believers. He still 
wants to ask again, but he listens to the gods who are not pleasing to the 
eye: "The right person is too ignorant. Everyone is having fun, he doesn't 
know how to cooperate. Who hasn't been teased?" Did the generals and 
Lingwen Zhenjun not be teased? It’s not him who makes fun of it. What do 
you do with such a big fire?” 


"Yeah, this person is really taking himself seriously. It is a fire in the heart, 
how can it be sent at this time? Good party, which is a special trip to see 
his face? Really..." 


"Okay, okay, the hairy boy is a hairy boy. He is gone, and he is more fun 
than he played." 


Hearing words, thankful and thoughtful. The banquet was only a little 
messy, and the spirit seemed to send people to deal with the right thing. 


After several sacred officials came out to appease for a while, the banquet 
and the game continued. So, in the thunder burst, the fourth round of 
drumming began. 


Xie pity was originally just watching other people play, can not get in, but 
also happy that others do not look for him, just want to talk to the teacher 
Qing Xuan, who knows, at this time, but suddenly reached a hand, handed 
the white jade wine glass Gave him. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 91: 
Qianduanguan Changming night 


Xie pity never imagined that someone would actually hand him the glass. 


Blame him for reacting too quickly, picking up without thinking, and 
picking up. However, looking at the person who handed the wine, the other 
party is also squatting - actually it is Mingy1. 


It turned out that Fang Cai's wine glass was passed to Shi Qingxuan's hand, 
and Shi Qingxuan was deliberately handed to Mingyi for fun. And Mingyi 
boring his head to drink and eat, if he doesn't look at it, he will spread it by 
hand. After passing it, he will react to what happened, and it is speechless. 
At the same time, the thunder also stopped abruptly, leaving only two 
people face each other. 


Although it was thanks to the wine glasses, everyone’s eyes were on the 
wind and the feelings. It is not difficult to understand the reason. Xie Pian 
has been silent for more than 800 years. Eight hundred years ago, there 
were naturally many books about his beauty, but it has been lost since now, 
and no one is going to be today. This day, he specially performed for him. 
Therefore, if you are looking for a play with the character "Xianle Prince", 
then there is only a drama with a wind letter or a passion. 


Because folk dramas occasionally use the pity for the two gods to compose 
stories, usually let him be a foil, run a dragon, and even more to make the 
play more exciting, directly Thanks for changing into a traitor, and 
arranging some paragraphs such as bullying, ignorance, or love. If you 
really played this kind of drama in the Mid-Autumn Festival, no matter 
the protagonists of the story are not happy, anyway, the rest of the visitors 
will be happy. Thanks to the small jade cup, a priest has already rushed: 
"His Royal Highness, come and come, do it!" 


There were a few more reminders, and Feng Xin said far away: "The 
Prince of God cannot drink alcohol." 


Everyone said: "It's just a cup! It's fine." 


Jun Wu has always had a hand, and he did not speak a word. At this time, 
he got up slightly and seemed to speak. Shi Qingxuan also asked at the 
side: "You can't do it? If you can't do it, I will help you out 100,000 
curtains." 


"..." Xie pity that he really spit out 100,000 merits, even if it is bold, it is 
not such a bold method, and he has seen it no matter what the drama, 
nothing to pay attention to, busy, "do not need, a cup It should be no 
problem." After that, he drank the wine. 


Joan brewed into the throat, and the place where it slipped was cool and 
hot, and the pity was a little dizzy, but it took a moment to smother it. The 
curtains on the four sides of the small building slowly pulled up, and 
everyone shifted their gaze and prepared to concentrate on watching the 
drama. 


At first glance, I saw that there were two people standing on the stage. A 
person in white, if the face is covered with powder, covered with dust, and 
carrying a fight, it 1s definitely a pity; another person is red, black hair 1s 
lacquered, handsome and smart, looking forward to God, a long snake in 
the hand, was "Thank pity" snatched, the red man immediately took the 
snake's hand and took it away, holding the hand of "thank you" will not let 
go. That look 1s really like his heart has been poked a knife. 


This time, the priests who are waiting to watch the show are all stunned. 
Of course, it is also embarrassing to pity yourself. At this time, Jun Wu, 
the first banquet, smiled and said: "What is this book? How has it never 
been seen?" 


Lingwen immediately asked people to check, and said: "This play seems to 
be called "Half Moon National Travel Notes", which is newly edited, so I 
have never seen it before, and it is the first time to perform in the world 
tonight." 


Shi Qingxuan said to him: "It was the last half-month of the merchants in 
the country who went back and found someone to write it. The provincial 


merits, no need to pull the curtain." 


Thank you for your pity. The world can only know the things of the half- 
moon country, only the merchants. He remembers that there is a natural 
boy in the caravan who really said that he would like to thank him or to 
worship him. If this 1s a play, it is born with money. Please write? 
However, he did not tell his own name, a young boy may not be able to do 
this. 


On the other side of the stage, although the gods did not see the imaginary 
drama, but the play in front of it 1s of course more exciting. After all, if 
the rumors are true, then the red man plays, it is the flower city! 


There are many people in the world of blood and rain. However, it is often 
the case that "the red-winged ghosts burned thirty-three temples and 
burned out the heavens and farts and did not dare to put them." "Blood rain 
and flowers, the forehand, the backhand, one hand, the martial arts god", 
which made the heavenly people watch the silent tears. The code, I don’t 
know what this book will be written like? Anyway, the protagonist is 
thankful. For this, everyone always has a sense of incompatibility, and did 
not put him into the scope of the "self" of the heavens, so it 1s no problem 
to look at it. Moreover, this stage of the play is exquisite, well-made, and 
the people in the play are very good at it, and they are simply conscience. 
Therefore, it’s hard to be addicted to the bottom of the heart. 


"Really? Edit it, where is the flower city talking to people like this!" 
"Nonsense, just nonsense!" 


"What kind of drama did the flower city make? Wake up! It’s not the wind 
and moon, this is really dare to edit!" 


After all, it was specially written for him, and Xie Pity also looked at it 
seriously. Frankly, this is a good show. It’s good to play, play, but he, as a 
person to be played, has a small opinion: the two protagonists seem to be 
too intimate. 


Playing his own, his skills are very good, but he always shouts "Sanlang", 
although the tone is not so ups and downs, but the feelings of the pity are 
like "the wind maiden" shouting "the Navy master" "Lang Jun" and "Fo 
Jun" are even more difficult to sit on. Moreover, the small movements 
seem to be too many points, hook hooks, shoulders, and hugs, always feel 
that it is not appropriate. 


However, if you think about it, he shouted Huacheng. It was indeed so 
shouting. These actions did seem to have been done. At that time, I felt 
that there was nothing wrong with it. Now, I should reason that I should 
feel that there 1s nothing wrong with it. Again, other priests, although they 
were talking nonsense, they still looked at it with gusto, and they kept 
their eyes on it, and they had to shut up. Looking at it, suddenly, the 
teacher did not cross the road: "What are the two little sisters behind?" 


When you heard the word "small shackles", the wind and the feelings were 
not easily noticeable. 


Lingwen said: "That is not two small sisters. It should be the two small 
military officers of the Heavenly Court. At the beginning, they had been 
recruited from Nanyang Temple and Xuanzhen Temple to give imperial 
relief to Prince Edward." 


Nanyang Hall and Xuanzhen Hall actually have people who give thanks 
and help. This is really an anecdote. It sounds like a derogatory and 
reluctant rejection of the beautiful woman who sent him a gift. It’s 
incredible, and the gods are looking forward to it. past. Lingwen added 
another sentence: "They volunteered to go." 


Thanks and smiled, said: "Forgot to ask, is the south wind and the swaying 
them okay? Why didn't you see them out today?" 


Wind channel: "Souther wind... in..." 
The feelings of faintness are faint: "The swaying is closed." 


The wind letter immediately said: "The south wind is also closed." 


Thanks for the "oh", said: "Is both closed? It's a shame." 


Between the talks, the play ended wonderfully. Although it was 
unanimously considered to be the meaning of ignorant believers, but 
because of the intention, the flower garden was really enjoyable, and it 
was a lot of applause. However, it is because the half moon is exiled. After 
everyone has had enough addiction, it is necessary to pay attention to it. 
There is no crossing in the division: "General General, what happened to 
your family?" 


He sipped himself and shook his head. "What else? If you don't put your 
heart on the heart, I can't manage him." 


Here, Shi Qingxuan can't listen, and said: "So, in the eyes of the general, 
what is the heart of the matter? The future of your little sister is the future, 
isn't it the girl?" 


He didn't have a good tone, and the teacher swept over and said: "Qing 
Xuan is not rude!" 


As soon as he reprimanded, Shi Qingxuan bowed his head. When I saw it, I 
laughed and said: "The brother of the water, your brother 1s so good, you 
can manage it. He is now provoked me. If you want to get rid of people in 
the future, it will not be like me. Look at your face." 


The teacher did not cross the fan and continued to teach his younger 
brother. He said: "Do you hear the words of the general? You have told me 
how many times you have not become like this. You are going outside and 
walking around. What do you like, you must use the truth when you go 
out!" 


Although Shi Qingxuan loves women very much, he is very dissatisfied, 
but still dare not face his brother. Thanks to the pity: "The wind teacher 
said that he is not afraid of his brother, but it may not be all." Who knows, 
the teacher has no way to the end: "If you encounter a general who is a 
strong man and a bad person, what should I do?" 


Lingwen haha laughed, and almost squirted another drink, said: "Sister of 
the water! You can do this again, we can't talk." 


After a round of eating, I finally ushered in the final bucketlight section in 
the intertwined. 


In Xianjingli, all the candlelights and the bright light were extinguished, 
except for the moonlight, which was bleak. At the lakeside banquet, the 
smoke of the lake is swayed, and through the clear flowing lake, you can 
see the darkness of the earth below. 


The bucket light is the number of blessings of the blessings that are 
enshrined in the palace of the largest and most famous priest in the Mid- 
Autumn Festival. As soon as you pray for a long lamp, it is hard to find a 
long time. The order of the bucket lights is arranged in descending order. 
When it is the turn of a certain officer, the lamp lamp that his followers 
will enshrine will float from the bottom to the heavens, illuminate the long 
dark night, and be very beautiful. 


Shenwu Temple is a 961-year-old lantern. The number is nearly one 
thousand. There is no precedent. The gods think that they will break the 
thousand next year. However, this is not the point. If the first is always the 
first, then the first loses its meaning, so everyone has automatically 
removed the Shenwu Temple in the bucket light. 


What makes people laugh 1s that the bucket lights are on the scene, and the 
first one is actually the rain guard. When thanking you for seeing a small 
bright light slowly and swaying up into the sky, and then hearing "Yu Shi 
Dian, a sigh!", I doubt that I was actually drunk and still awake, no matter 
how Not only a glimpse. In order to confirm that he was not drunk, he 
asked the teacher Qing Xuan: "Is there any error?" 


Shi Qingxuan: "No. It’s really a glimpse. It’s the same thing, or the cows in 
the home of Yushi’s family are trying to support themselves.” 


For yourself, this kind of behavior is really kind. Thanks for thinking, the 
rain guard is raining, so it is also the **** of the farmer, guessing: "Is it 


because the rainmen are adults and many farmers, so they are not 
enshrined?" 


Shi Qingxuan said: "Your Highness, what misunderstandings do you have 
for the peasants? Many peasants are very rich? Actually, because the rain 
sages have said that it is better to have money for the light, so the 
believers have always provided It is fresh fruits and vegetables." 


After listening to this, Xie Li is really envious, thinking: "There are such 
beautiful things." 


However, Shi Qingxuan said again: "Then the rain master said that he 
should not waste, so the general offerings for two days will be taken back 
to eat." 


The front is sparsely pulled, all of them are small priests. The length of the 
lanterns varies from a few to a few dozen. Everyone has no interest. 
However, the more the light shines every time the lamp is raised, the more 
focused everyone is. If it is not a special sacred official, you can see the 
number at a glance, and the array of lights will fly together and there will 
be a lot of flaws. Xie Li is not clear, so no evaluation is published. 
Concentrate on the beauty of the dark nights, and listen to other people's 
analysis of the current situation of the bucket lights. Although he feels that 
this kind of thing has nothing to analyze. After about two musks, the finale 
finally came. Mid-Autumn Festival banquet lights, began the last ten 
armor fight. 


The last one of the Tenth, Xie Li heard the news official sings: "Qiying 
Temple, four hundred and twenty-one!" 


Quan Yizhen has already left the game, and the sounds of other priests who 
hear this number will not be disguised. The Western martial art is still 
young, but the momentum is extremely fierce. With the same priests as his 
qualifications, there are two hundred chandeliers that have been counted a 
lot. He has turned over many times and has a long time to rise. The long 
light is slightly less than him, so it is worth it. But thankful, I feel that this 


boy is not very good in the heavens, because except for himself and Shi 
Qingxuan, there is almost nothing to be really amazed about this. 


Next, the division of the division, four hundred and forty-four. In addition 
to drinking two more soups, Mingyi did not have any other indications. 
Shi Qingxuan was more excited than him, and his voice was "lower and 
lower." Since everyone 1s not very familiar with the geographers, and they 
clap their hands in a charter, it is a congratulation. Then it was the turn of 
the teacher Qing Xuan himself, the Wind Master Hall, five hundred and 
twenty-three. 


It’s easy to see a person who is unpopular. After the number of the 
Changming Lanterns in the Windshield Hall was reported, Shi Qingxuan 
had not spoken yet, and the applause on the banquet suddenly rose. All the 
places were “Congratulations and Congratulations” and “Deserved 
Names”. Shi Qingxuan was very proud, got up and shook hands 
everywhere, and said nothing to the teacher: "Brother, I am eighth this 
year!" 


He was like a cousin who boasted to ask his aunt to ask for a reward. He 
looked at Ren Jun and refused. The teacher did not cross but replied: "It is 
only the eighth, what is so happy!" 


His words are actually very arrogant. Which of the whole heavens is a 
leisurely generation? Five hundred long lanterns, ranking eighth, were said 
to be "except" in his mouth. Isn’t the gods behind the eighth one even 
"only"? He is not ignorant of this, but he just wants to say this because he 
is not afraid. Shi Qing Xuan smashed his face, and the teacher did not 
shake his fan. He also said it was difficult: "However, the lights are more 
than last year, and the next year must be more." 


Hearing the words, Shi Qingxuan smiled with his long arm. In the whole 
banquet, only Mingyi had a face indifferently eating and not giving him a 
cheer, so Shi Qingxuan took him twice and asked him to congratulate him. 
Mingyi didn't want to care about him. He continued to concentrate on 
eating. Shi Qingxuan was furious and asked him to applaud himself. He 
thanked him for being laughed at the side, not to mention it. 


Next, the Temple of the Spirit, five hundred and thirty-six. 


In the spirit of the gods, the spirit is the winner, but there is not much 
literary support, but mainly the martial arts are very good face. Thanks for 
the fare, he congratulated him. He heard the teacher Wudu and screamed 
that he had a feast for the banquet. At that time, he heard a sacred official, 
and the spiritual believers were nothing more than the male and the 
spiritual. The current martial arts of the martial arts, the martial arts, the 
martial arts, the martial arts, the genius, the spirit is the most enthusiasm 
for the court, the spirit of the heavenly court, and the spirit is said to be 


sometimes invited to | Yunyun, shaking his head, only one thought in 
mind: the goddess official is not easy . 


Next, it is the Nanyang Temple and the Xuanzhen Temple, which are five 
hundred and seventy-two, and five hundred and seventy-three. The 
feelings of the eyebrows stretched, the winds and letters did not like the 
anger, and did not seem to care. Thank you for your pity, how can the 
number just be so close? This is too clever, right? The whispered teacher 
Qingxuan Fang knows that the two men were similar in origin, their 
territory was similar, their strengths were similar, and their relationship 
was not good. Both believers took a breath to win and swear by the number 
of lanterns in the other palace. They must have more for a trip. Do not 
seek first, only seek higher than the other. Do your best to get out and have 
a win-win situation every year. At the last minute of this year, Xuan Zhen 
Temple finally squeezed out more lights than the Nanyang Hall. It seems 
to have won a victory and is celebrating. After listening to Xie Pity, I 
couldn’t help but think: "There are a lot of lights on the outside for a fight, 
and this group of people are not going home for the holidays? Today is the 
Mid-Autumn Festival." 


Next, Mingguang Temple, five hundred and eighty. 


This number is quite impressive. However, there 1s no such thing as 

ambiguity, because compared to last year, Mingguang Temple’s long-term 
lanterns have actually been reduced. The deputy **** was a hit, and it was 
a blow. Nearly a hundred lights were lost this year. If it 1s not thick, it will 


be stable, but it will be less. The teacher Wudu and Lingwen did not 
congratulate him, just patted his shoulder. 


At this point, Xie Li found that the number of the gods of these priests was 
very dense, dozens of dozens, as if they could not open the gap. In other 
words, everyone is actually half-pounded, and no one is truly absolute. 
When he just thought about it, he listened to the official news of the 
newspaper: "The Navy Hall, 718!" 


At the banquet, there was a commotion and amazement. 


When the gods responded, they began to rush to congratulate. The teacher 
is only sitting, not getting up, and his expression is not very proud, just a 
matter of course. I am afraid that for the past few hundred years, the 
number of the second priest and the lord of the gods of the martial arts has 
been the most recent. Xie Li was too far away from the first time when he 
was soaring. At that time, a glimpse of the blessing of the lanterns was 
harder than the current one. Naturally, it cannot be generalized. However, 
the so-called "man-made fortune, birds for food and death", people's love 
for wealth will never be reduced, it is worthy of the **** of wealth! 


Shi Qingxuan is more excited than his own seven hundred lights, 
vigorously clap his hands, and thank you for his gratitude: "My brother! 
My brother!" 


Thanks and smiled: "I know, it 1s your brother!" 


At the banquet, there is still only one person in Mingyi who is struggling 
to eat. In fact, Xie Pity feels that everyone in his family treats the 
"banquet" as a feast and takes it seriously. It seems that for many years in 
the ghost market, it’s not enough to eat enough tonight, and think of the 
ghost street street stall. The snacks sold in the house, Xie Pity is also very 
understandable, can not help but think, will Huacheng usually walk in the 
streets of ghost cities? 


The most exciting mystery has been revealed. Tonight, all the priests have 
seen the play, and when they say enough, they are satisfied, and they are 


ready to get up and leave. Who knows, the teacher did not suddenly frown, 
the fan received, said: "Slow." 


Others say that they are slow, probably not so powerful. However, the 
teacher did not cross this person. It was really like his nickname "Shui 
Hengtian". It was as if he was used to giving orders. When he opened his 
mouth, people couldn’t help but listen. Everyone sat back and asked, "The 
Ten Commandments have come out, water. What else is there for the 
Master?" 

Thank you for your pity: "Is it difficult to break the merits?" 

The teacher did not cross the fan: "The Tenth is out?" 


Everyone didn't know what he meant by asking this sentence. Shi 
Qingxuan was shocked: "...not right. No, it's not right. The tenth is not out! 
- Counting the Shenwu Hall, just reported it, only nine!" ” 


The priests were shocked and suddenly said: "Only nine out?" 
"Really, I counted, really only nine!" 

"There is still a person in front of the Navy Master?" 

"What? Who else can I? I am not impressed?" 


At this time, in the darkness, suddenly there was a burst of light shining 
like white. 


That light is a light. 
If you fish over the rivers, countless lanterns will slowly rise. 


They shine in the night, shining, such as floating souls and magnificent 
dreams, magnificent, illuminating the dark world. Such a spectacle, 
indescribable, only the coagulation of breathing and the words of the fault. 


Xie pity looked at the bright light of the sky, as if suffocating, nothing 
could be heard, and God for a while. After this moment, he discovered that 


there is something wrong. 


Above the banquet, all the priests' eyes were projected. It turned out that 
the official officer of the newspaper slammed his hand and pointed at him. 


Thanks for your pity, said: "What happened?" 

No one answered, thanking me and pointing to myself, saying: "...[?" 
Shi Qingxuan on the side shot his shoulder and said: "... Yes. You." 
Thank you for your pity, saying: "What am I? What happened to me?" 


The newspaper officer had swallowed his throat in a difficult way and 
finally spoke again. 


As aresult, hundreds of priests at the scene heard an incredible trembling 
voice. 


"Thousands of lights, Prince's Temple, three ... three... 


"Three thousand!" 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 92: 
Qianduanguan Changming Long Night 2 


The author has something to say: After the first update last night, there 
was a change in the early morning after the 91 chapter, and the students 
who could not pick up could turn back to see. If you can't see it, you can 
clean up the cache. 


In the adjustment of the outline and the draft, so today is a little less (: 3 
Z) _ the third volume of visual inspection is the longest volume, everyone 
is anxious to let me first give the flower a new shape ... (?) 


Three thousand! 
Half a sigh of silence, abrupt, four ups and downs. 


Even the chief position of the Shenwu Temple, which is as stable as 
Taishan, has never been able to win three thousand lanterns at the Mid- 
Autumn Festival. Even no one ever thought about this number. Even if it 1s 
a thousand, it is still barely enough to say, three thousand, this is the real 
unprecedented, more than the previous few gods add up! 


It is conceivable that at this moment, how incredible the hearts of the 
priests are, even if there are sacred officials, they blurt out: "Make it 
wrong!" 


"The number is wrong..." 


However, not to mention the number of Mid-Autumn Festival ceremonial 
lights that have been counted for many years, will it happen to be wrong 
today? Just look at the flow of lights that make up a huge light curtain, 
even if it is a step back, it is really the number. Incorrect, the error can 
only be a small number, it is impossible to count more. Then, there is 
another sacred official said: "Will the light not really pray for the bright 
light? Maybe just ordinary lights?" 


This is actually equivalent to "fake it?", and several people are attached. 
Shi Qingxuan said: "How can it be ordinary lights? The ordinary lights and 
the blessings of the lanterns are completely different in specifications, and 
they are not floating in the sky. How can it be true?" 


If this sentence is thankful, everyone will probably continue to question, 
but since Shi Qingxuan said, and the division is not here, others can't say 
anything. When the road was blocked, he turned to the other direction: 
"Where are you, where is this thousand lights? When was it built? Who 
built it? Which fairy knows?" 


The official news of the newspaper: "I don't know... but on those lights, 


what is written is the "Thousand Lights View". 
"But I have never heard of any thousand lights?!" 
"Yeah, I have never heard of it!" 


Xie pity finally got out of a shocking blank. Hearing these words, he 
sincerely said: "You, you really don't care, you haven't heard of it, I 
haven't heard it." 


It’s always impossible to build this. 


All the priests were stunned by the thunder tonight, and they couldn’t 
believe it. Xie Li really wants to say: "But a game, why should everyone 
be too true?" However, first of all, many people did not regard "game" as a 
game, and secondly, he is the first place in this "game". Is this not a 
blame? Other priests are hard to say, because other priests are behind him, 
and it is ashamed to say that it 1s no big deal to excuse yourself. At this 
time, Xiao smiled and said: "I said that blood rain and flowers took away 
the Prince's Highness is not to find him trouble, before you still do not 
believe, is now credible?" 


After he reminded everyone, this suddenly became awake. 


If it is a flower city, then it is not impossible for him to raise his hand and 
raise three thousand baht to pray for a bright light. 


Whether there is any relationship between Xie Li and Huacheng, what is 
the relationship, it can be described as confusing. Previously, everyone felt 
that they were more convinced to say that they were more credible. 
Because there 1s no reason to be extremely unfriendly to the heavens, 
Huacheng suddenly looked at Xie. However, according to the lawless style 
of Huacheng, there is no reason to suddenly succumb to someone. After 
the Mid-Autumn Festival banquet today, this is not good to say, I am afraid 
it is a bit untenable. After all, three thousand baht pray for a bright light! 
Even the navy who is in charge of fortune does not mean that he can get it 
with his hand. In the midst of chaos, suddenly, from the banquet, there was 
a burst of unhurried sounds. 


The gods looked at the sounds and saw that Junwu was holding his hand, 
and smiled at Xie: "Xianle, congratulations." 


Thank you for knowing that I am willing to make a clearance, I am 
grateful, and bow down to him. Jun Wu sighed again: "You can always 
create miracles." 


Seeing this, the banquet gradually calmed down. After a moment of 
hesitation, I was led by Jun Wu, and I patted my hand in a mixed manner. 


At this point, even if they were shocked, the gods of the heavens had to 
admit it. This prince's body has always been a miracle. This is the case 
before, now, too! 


The Mid-Autumn Festival was scattered, and the Lei Shi, who had been 
booming, also received work. Of course, the most hard-working is Shi 
Qingxuan. No matter who is the name, he is the first to clapping. Except 


for . Xie Pity was still thinking about his horizontal insertion. The 
Navy changed from the second to the third and would not be displeased. 
However, there is no disappointment for the teacher, but there is no 
disappointment. He said congratulations, and the next three people 
discussed how to go to the hot springs on the hill to massage. Shi 
Qingxuan listened: "Brother, are you going out to play again?" 


The teacher did not accept the fan and said: "Yeah." 


Lingwen held his arm and smiled: "Would you like to come over and 
play?" 


Shi Qingxuan: "I don't go. I have a date." 


The teacher frowned and said: "You don't want to make some messy 
people." 


Ling Wendao: "After another mess, is there a mess in the general?" 
He warned: "Jie Qing, I have a mouth." 


Xie Li waited for a few words from their brothers, and they were ready to 
leave with Shi Qingxuan. When I met the feelings on the road, he didn't 
know if he was looking at the pity, and his brow was not so stretched. The 
wind letter is contrary to him. When he got up and left, he thanked him: 
"Congratulations." Xie Li also nodded to him and said, "Thank you." 


Lang Firefly was placed on the Fengshi Xianfu in Xianjing. The child 
looked clean at the moment, but he was still afraid of life. Xie pity led him 
down, and he didn’t say anything along the way. Xie Li first went to the 
town to buy some fresh fruit for him to eat. He did not go directly to the 
Bodhisattva village, but went to a small forest to look at it. 


Sure enough, the woods are now very lively. A shirtless young man is 
hanged upside down on a tree with a white scorpion, full of foul words, a 
child kneeling under him to drive mosquitoes. Thanks for letting Lang 
Ying stand outside, and slowly walked over, the young man met him and 
angered: "Thank you for this dog thing, but not fucking, let me put it 
down! Dead and dead, I'm dying!" 


Xie pity but warmly said: "You must have been smashed by mosquitoes 
for many years, and feel the taste of living is not good?" 


This person is exactly what it is. Thanks to the fact that he would not be 
safe, he must have asked Guzi to help him cut off the evil, so he slandered 
if he had escaped, and if he escaped, he would drag him into the woods. 
Grace is using the flesh of others, thank you for not being able to beat him 


frequently, but it is still possible for him to suffer a little bit of flesh. Xie 
pity cuts firewood in this area, picks up the wasteland, and suffers from 
the bite of mosquitoes. At the moment, the sadness is also covered by a 
pile of mosquitoes. It is better to die than to die. "Your heart of snow lotus 
Why don't you be a sticky person at this time!" 


Guzi hugged her legs, and wowed, "Chougan, let me kneel down! He has 
been hung for a long time!" 


Xie pity touched his head, and the grace immediately slammed and 
slammed into the ground. 


To return to the village of Bodhisattva, you must pass through the maple 
forest. Xie Pity held a young man with a shirtless face, followed by two 
children, one crying and crying, a boring head, thinking, this pedestrian 1s 
really strange. Going up the slope, he said two trails behind him: "Be 
careful under your feet. It is easy to wrestle here." 


It is the truth. Xie pity sometimes came back from the town and got back 
late. I walked this road in the dark, I don’t know if it was his institutional 
reason. I didn’t know how many times I fell. When I heard it, I 
immediately called out, "Oh my God! I beg you to let this person fall to 
death here!" 


Thank you for listening, I just laughed: "You are a ghost, what God?" 


At this time, he suddenly realized that there was a faint warmth in the sky, 
and the black-painted road on the ground seemed to be clearer by the light, 
and it was clearer. Looking up, I found out that it was not his illusion. 
There is really light in the sky. 


It is the light of the three thousand long light. 


The floating lights flowed in the night sky, and the glory of the stars and 
moons was covered by them. Thank you for your pity, half a sigh, 
whispered: "...thank you." 


I don’t know what it is, hehe said: "Do you thank you for your fart? People 
have their own play, and they are not specifically for you, and they are less 
passionate." 


Thank you for your refusal, and you can't refute it. Just say: "The beautiful 
things exist in the world. This is worthy of thanks." 


He has a good view of his heart, and he is not afraid of others watching the 
scenery. Take the light of the bright light of this sky and go all the way. 2k 
novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 93: Ghostly 
reincarnation 


In less than two days, Xie Pity ushered in a huge crisis. 
There is nothing to eat in the view. 


He alone, a few hoes a day with a dish of pickles, picking up cucumbers in 
the ground, can be perfectly solved, the supply of the villagers in the 
village of Bodhisattva is more than enough. Now, there are three more 
mouths in the view. Two living people and a living ghost quickly emptied 
his stock. 


The two children fell, and a dead ghost was attached. He was attached to a 
big man and refused to come out. He shouted and refused to treat him as a 
dog, and he was more than a dog. I have to eat a lot, so thank you for your 


pity. 


After completely squeezing out the pot, Xie Li decided to take two 
children to the market to see if they could receive something and bring 
them to eat. 


If you say that the usual politeness is not good, then today's thanksgiving 
is that luck is particularly bad. After walking around, nothing was broken. 
In the end, he stood at the entrance to the street where people came and 
went, and made a decision: to re-operate the old line. 


So, he settled the two children on the side and went to the street for a stop. 
He said: "The fathers and the villagers are in the neighbourhood of the 
neighborhood! Today, at the beginning of the next year, they are shy, ugly, 
and ugly, and hope that everyone will join in and send a ration. Make a 
trip..." 


Xie pity two sleeves fluttering, a sentimental wind bones, open Qingyue, 
full of gas, the street idlers have come around, said: "What will come, 
look?" 


Thank you for your kindness: "Look at the turntable?" 

Everyone waved their hands: "No difficulty, little tricks! What else?" 
Thanks again, "Is there a big stone in the chest?" 

Everyone also said: "It's too old to be too old! What more?" 


Thanks to the pity, the original street juggling is also going to keep pace 
with the times. At that time, his masterpiece has become a bright yellow 
flower, no one knows how to appreciate it. Seeing the crowds around him 
will be scattered, forced to kill the handcuffs, he took a scorpion from his 
sleeve and tied his own amulet, said: "Look at the art to send the body 
charm, hand-made, you pass by, don't miss "" 


I heard that the whites sent things, and the scattered crowds gathered back 
again: "What kind of body protection charm? Which Taoist revelation? Is 
it the great god?" 


"Is there a fortune? Give me the amulet of God of Wealth!" 
"I want Juyang Zhenjun, please leave me a ticket!" 


Thanks to pity: "No. No. It is the Prince of Xianle, and the Bodhisattva has 
opened the light and guaranteed the spirit." Of course the test. At least 
other people have prayed for at least a few thousand people every day. 
They are all awkward in their ears, and they are sent to the little gods 
under their command. And he can pray for up to a few people every day. 
Who do you think is more likely to be heard? 


Everyone shouted: "What is that thing, I have never heard of it!" Xie pity 
said: "I haven't heard it. It doesn't matter. The Bodhisattva view is in the 
Bodhi Village outside the Seven Miles. Welcome to visit, visit the 
incense... "Don't wait for him to finish, the crowd has already smashed." 
One by one, they walked away and took away the amulet that they had just 
grabbed. Xie pity followed up and smashed it up cleanly. The look was 
free to retract the sleeves, squatting, and a pair of shoes stayed in front of 
him. 


Thanks for raising his head, he saw a pair of black lacquered eyes exposed 
from the bandage and decided to look at him. 


Thank you for your kindness: "What's wrong? Go there and go sit with the 
millet. Just wait for me for a while." 


Lang is silent. At this time, the big house on the main street suddenly 
opened two doors, one person was thrown out, and then a violent drink 
came out: "Quack doctor!" 


Pedestrians on the street rushed around to watch the excitement. They 
smashed dozens of feet and smashed them. The amulets that had not been 
able to pick up were instantly trampled, dirty, and rotten. Thanks for their 
pity, they didn’t talk, let Lang Firefly look back. Millet, also followed to 
see what happened. I saw a man with a wealthy business in front of the 
house and a man who is like a doctor. The rich businessman angered: 
"What did you say when you came yesterday? Not that everything is good, 
don't worry? What is going on today?! My wife did not fall or eat bad, how 
suddenly did this happen?!" 


The doctor shouted: "I came to see your wife yesterday, she is really good! 
I should look for a Taoist priest, I should not look for a doctor!" 


The wealthy businessman was furious and yelled at him: "My son hasn't 
lost yet. What do you think of this mediocrity? Be careful, I will tell you 
that you are ruining!" 


The doctor picked up his medical box and said: "You didn't use me. I 
really can't understand this pulse! I have never seen it in my life!" 


Everyone is screaming: "Change a doctor!" "Look for a Taoist to see it!" 


Xie pity instinctively feels awkward, and raises his hand in the crowd: 
"Look here. The Taoist is here, I am a Taoist." 


Everyone brushed their heads and said strangely: "Are you not a juggler?" 


Thanks politely and thoughtfully: "That 1s only a sideline. Thank you." 
After he stepped forward, he said, "Can you show me the lady?" 


There was a burst of screams in the house. It was obvious that a group of 
women were panicking. The doctor who was called a new businessman 
couldn’t catch up for a while. He was in a hurry and went to the hospital. 
He actually took him and ran to the house. Thanks to the pity, the doctor 
was also caught. A few people went into the back room, the ground was 
full of blood, and a young woman lay on the big bed of the book. The 
painful death came to life and looked pale, almost holding the stomach 
and rolling, but fortunately it was held down by several old women and the 
servant. While thanking me for stepping into the door, there was a burst of 
hair on the back: 


The room was very sullen, and the yin was coming from a place. 
That woman's belly! 


Xie pity immediately stopped the person behind him and said: "Don't 
move! There is something wrong with her belly!" 


The rich businessman was scared: "Is my wife going to be born?!" 


The doctor and the old women couldn’t listen, and said: "This is only five 
months, how could it be born!" 


The rich businessman angered the doctor: "I don't want to be born, then 
you don't know what's wrong, quack! Don't even understand the pulse!" 


Seeing that the woman was about to pass out, thanked her: "All live!" 
Seeing that he suddenly took out a few feet long, black lacquered weapon, 
several people were shocked and said: "What do you want to do?!" Even 
after seeing the pity, the sword actually floats floating. It’s up! 


This time, everyone is shocked. 


The heart is hanging above, the tip of the sword 1s pointing downwards, 
pointing to the woman's belly. The sword was extremely murderous, and 


everyone saw that the woman’s stomach suddenly moved, and a mass of 
meat bulged, sometimes moved to the left abdomen, and then moved to 

the right abdomen. Moved and moved, and finally, the woman violently 

coughed, and suddenly a black smoke spewed out of her mouth! 


Waiting for a long time, a sword scatters the black smoke. The woman 
screamed: "My son!" fainted on the spot. 


Thank you for recalling the sword, re-inserting|back to the back, and said 
to the doctor: "Yes." 


The doctor was stunned and thanked him for several times. He hesitated 
and went forward. The rich businessman smiled: "Is my son saved?" 


Who knows, the doctor took a while, but trembled and said: "Nothing..." 


The rich businessman stunned, half awkward, and shouted: "Nothing? How 
is this going?!" 


Xie pity turned around and said: "Your lady is not a child, it is gone, no 
you understand?" 


That wealthy businessman said: "Is it not the same thing to follow the 
flow?" 


Thanks to pity: "Slightly different. Flowing 1s just a flow. ‘Nothing’ means 
this: Your wife’s belly, originally had a child, but now, the child is gone.” 


Sure enough, the woman’s abdomen was still uplifted, and now, there is no 
trauma, but it has been clearly smashed, and it is extremely unnatural. 
That wealthy businessman said: "...[s my son not in her stomach just 
now?!" 


Thanks for the pity: "It’s not your child just inside. It’s just a bunch of 
black smoke that propped up your lady’s stomach!” 


The doctor determined that the woman was only fainting, and after she 
was not in danger, they left the house. Fushang Road: "What is the name 


of the road leader? Which one do you want to play? Which one is the true 
one?" 


Thanks for the pity, "I don't want to thank you." I wanted to go on to say 
"Bodhisattva", and I changed my mind to somehow. "Ten thousand lights." 


After the three-character export, the face was inexplicably a little feverish. 
The rich businessman "Oh" said: "I haven't heard it. Is it far away?" 


Xie pity does not know far away, whispered: "Hmm..." 


After a few chills, the wealthy businessmen couldn’t wait to panic: "Dao 
Chang! What kind of monster is it just now? My wife has always been 
pregnant... is that thing? Is it a black gas?!" 


Shifted the topic, thanked the pity also looked good, said: "Undecided is 
always. You are not saying, when the doctor asked the doctor yesterday, is 
your wife still good? At that time, the pulse should be stable, today is 
chaotic, I am afraid The fetus is what happened last night. You may wish 
to think about it, did your wife do anything last night? Or what happened?" 


Fushang said: "Nothing happened last night, my wife did not go out! Since 
she got the child in the giant | Yang Dian burning incense, I set up a giant | 
Yang Zhenjun's **** at home, daily The door is not out of the two doors, 
and the scent is burned, and it is very devout!" 


"..." Xie pity that if you give the wind letter to know that someone is 
offering him this, then it 1s incredible. After thinking about it, he said, "So, 
is there any strange dream?" 


The rich businessman sighed and said: "Yes!" 


Thanks for the spirit, just listen to this wealthy business: "You are really a 
god-like thing! My wife really made a strange dream last night, dreaming 
of a child playing with her, calling her mother. Dreaming In the middle of 
the night, I felt something was waking up when I kicked her belly. I was 
still happy to tell me that the child in my stomach couldn’t wait to meet 
her, so I came to say hello. I was still yelling at her!" 


In an instant, thank you for making a decision, saying: "This is a problem 
for this child!" 


After a pause, I asked, "How old is this child? What did you look like? Did 
your wife say that?" 


The rich businessman was shocked by a cold sweat. He said: "She is afraid 
that she can't remember it. When she told me, she said that she was not 
allowed to be a few years old. She only felt that she should be very small. 
She still wanted to hold her and she was very light in her hand." 


Indulge in a moment, thank you for saying: "I will ask you some more 
words, you have to answer it truthfully, otherwise you will not be able to 
find out. First, you can have a slap in the house." Second, you Can I have a 
child before?" 


Asked if there is a EET Ce Le eee eee eee ee ere ree 
D> TTI IDTI>DZI>IIZI>T IIIT TIT T TI IT TT II TTI IIT IIT ITT IIIT IIIT IIDD 
If you have beaten your child for unjustified reasons, you may have 

resentment in the body of the mother, not letting the new child feel better. 


Under the repeated confirmation of thanking the pity, this rich 
businessman honestly confessed, even in the middle. In his house, there 
are not only a few rooms, but also a room outside, and he has raised an 
outside room, and he is always looking forward to it. Subsequently, the 
lady around the lady also confessed, her master was originally a beggar, 
once had a baby, I heard some remedies in Jianghu Langzhong that the 
baby is a daughter, but she wants to have a son to help, so the medicine 
will be the child It fell. Thank you for listening, your head is big. The rich 
businessman is uneasy: "Do you know that the long road, the revenge of 
the girl who was not born?" 


Thanks to pity: "This 1s possible, but not all. After all, your wife can't tell 
the age of the child in her dream, male or female." 


That wealthy business said: "That... that long, since this group of black gas 
came to my woman's stomach last night, then... Where did my son go?" 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 94: Ghosts and 
flats re-wave 2 


Thanks for the pity: "Maybe, it was eaten." 
The rich businessman sighed: "Being, being eaten?!" 


Thanks for your nod. That wealthy business said: "That, Daochang, what 
should I do now? I can still have a wife like a pregnant woman, how can 
the monster be in case of a good return?!" 


This person actually has a pregnant woman at home! 


Xie pity and hands up: "Slightly, don't worry, I will ask again, your wife 
still remembers, where is the place where she met this child in her 
dream?" 


That wealthy business said: "She said that it is a big room to remember, it 
is a big room, more certainly do not remember. A dream only, who will 
remember so clearly?" And gnashed his teeth, "I... 1 am more than forty. 
Come to a son, I am so bitter! Dao, can you catch this monster? Can you 
let it harm my family!" 


Thanks for your pity: "Don't panic, don't panic. I try my best." 


The rich businessman was overjoyed and said: "Well, what does the leader 
need? The reward is not a problem!" 


Xie pity said: "There is no need to pay, as long as you help to do a few 
things. First, trouble to find a set of idle women's clothes for me, must be 
loose enough, men can wear, and, I am afraid you still need your lady a 
glimpse of hair, used for practice." 


The rich businessman told the servant: "Write down the note!" 


Thanks again and again: "Second, please ask your pregnant lady, it is best 
to sleep in a room, but no matter where, at any time, I heard the voice of a 
strange child calling her mother. 'Do not agree. Don't promise, don't open 
your mouth is the best. Although people often do not know that they are 
dreaming, confused, but if you repeatedly lick in her ear, make her I will 
remember this matter deeply in my mind, and it may still be effective." 


The rich businessman should also respond, thank you: "Third, I brought 
two children out, I will help you take care of me and arrange a good meal." 


That wealthy business said: "This little thing, don't say two things, that is, 
one hundred pieces I can do for you!" 


Finally, the most important last one, thank you: "Fourth." 


He took a bodhisattva from the sleeve and handed it on with his hands. He 
solemnly said: "Please face this amulet and say aloud, please protect me!" 
I can remember it under my name." 


It was night, and she prayed for a woman's clothing again. 


Although he seems to be a well-dressed woman wearing a women's dress, 
but the pregnant woman is still the first one, the mirror dressing, no half- 
column incense, and finally put a pillow into his stomach, and then take a 
strand of hair from the pregnant woman Hiding in this pillow, thank you 
for lying on the bed. Calm, slow down, and soon, I fell asleep. 


I don't know how long it took, thanking me for opening her eyes, and it 
was not the house of the rich businessman, but a gorgeous pavilion. 


The first reaction of thanking the pity is to touch the heart on his side. 
After touching it, this is reassuring. After all, Fang Xin is a sword, tied 
with him. Then he slowly sat up and suddenly got a sticky bottom. He 
lifted it up and lay himself on a bed. The large pieces of blood on the bed 
were extremely horrible, not dried up, and his half body was also red. 
Shocking. 


Thanks for the pity, I got out of bed and took two steps. Suddenly I felt 
that something had fallen on my body. Looking down, it was the pillow. I 
quickly picked it up and stuffed it back. Two more steps, the stomach fell 
again, thank you for having to hold it with both hands, and observe it. 


Since childhood, he has grown up in the palace, and his ears are 
fascinating. For beauty and beauty, thank you for your own insights. This 
small building, in his opinion, is gorgeous, but full of fat, and he wants to 
guess, it feels like a restaurant, or a place to have fun. Moreover, 
compared to the prevailing winds of today's architecture, this style is a bit 
old, but it is like a house hundreds of years ago, I don't know where it is. 


In this way, it is unlikely that the feudal spirit of the wealthy businessman 
who was beaten is doing something. Because the illusion constructed by 
evil spirits is based on their own cognition. Obviously, this ancient house 
hundreds of years ago will only exist in the cognition of centuries of evil. 
After a walk, there was no one, and Xie pity returned to the room where he 
was the first to lie. 


This is a woman's bedroom with a dressing table, the cabinet can be 
opened, and there are some children's clothes, as well as toys such as dolls 
and rattles. Thanks for checking one by one, I found that they are all new, 
and I can see that the hostess loves these objects. In other words, for the 
"child", this woman is full of compassion. 


Turned over again, thanked pity suddenly surprised, the child's clothing, 
still holding a talisman. And this amulet is actually his amulet! 


Very strange, thank you for not having to confirm again and again. That's 
right, this is indeed his amulet. Moreover, it is not the simple amulet that 
he used to go up the mountain to pick up the herbs, to woven himself, to 
draw his own characters, to buy the red thread himself, but eight hundred 
years ago, when the fairy prince was the most beautiful, the country 
circulated almost one hand. The kind of amulet, the materials and patterns 
are extremely delicate, from where it comes from, whether it is open, it is 
also clear. 


Could it be that the hostess of this house was once a believer? 


At this time, in a dead silence, thank you for hearing a burst of laughter. 


That is the laughter of the child, very awkward, empty and scattered, I do 
not know where it came from. Thanks for the quietness, but my heart 1s 
pondering: This voice is familiar, as if I heard it. Where is it? 


Daddy, he heard a string of childish children in his mind: "New married 
mother. New married mother, new bride on the red flower sedan. 


"Tears, over the hills, under the cover, don't laugh..." 


With Junshan, on the sedan chair, the voice of the child spirit he heard at 
the time! 


When the pity suddenly woke up, the laughter of the child’s spirit also 
came to an abrupt end. He turned around and saw no trace. 


After the incident with Junshan, he also asked the child spirit in the 
psychic array, but at that time everyone said to him that he did not find any 
child spirit on the mountain, only he heard the voice of the child. Now, this 
child spirit has appeared in front of him for the second time. Is it 
coincidence or intentional? 


The child did not smile, said: "Mother." 


This "mother" is close at hand, but I don't know where it came from. I 
don’t want to say a word, I’m holding my breath, and I’m listening. 


Silence for a long time, the voice of the child said: "Mother. Hold me." 
This time, thank you finally found out - the voice, from his belly! 


Xie pity hands have been holding a fake belly, only to be shocked at this 
time, I do not know when, the pillow in his hand actually became heavy. 
He took a picture of his palm, and he slammed out a group of things in his 
clothes. He faintly saw a child who was pale and white. He spit out a few 
things from his mouth and rolled into the darkness, disappearing instantly. 
Xie pity grabbed it and saw that it spewed out a few strands of cotton wool 
and a black hair. I want to come, it is his blind eye effect, this little devil 


wants to eat the child of a pregnant woman like the "child", but eats the 
cotton substitute in front of the belly. Then, thanking and listening to the 
thing screamed sternly: "Mother!" 


No matter how it opens, how to scream, how grateful, always patience, not 
even open your mouth. He concluded that this child spirit is a fetus, this 
room is where he or her mother lived. Because it doesn't have a definite 
form, if it's a few years old, it will appear in its old age, but most of the 
time it is a black smoke or a fuzzy white shadow, indicating it I am not 
sure what I should be like. And the little clothes in those cupboards are 
obviously no one to pass through, plus a lot of **** blood on the bed, 
thank you for inferring that the hostess of this house should be aborted, 
and her unborn child has already formed, with a little self-consciousness. 
After turning into a fetal spirit, I wanted to go back to my mother's 
stomach and find the lady of the rich businessman. 


It shouted "Mother" in the woman's dream, and the woman was broken and 
agreed. It should be noted that the bond of "mother" and "child" is 
extraordinary. This promise is a "permission" for the request. She had 
another mouth, which gave the opportunity for the evil thing to come in. 
The little devil went in from her mouth, slipped into her stomach, and ate 
the fetus that was originally in the abdomen. Although Xie Pity is a man, 
he is also inaccurate. If he should open his mouth, will this child spirit 
also take the opportunity to drill into his stomach, but in order to prevent 
it, just shut up. 


So, he closed his mouth, holding a heart sword, looking for the trace of the 
child. For the danger, thankful and consistently strong intuition, this is 
from a myriad of actual combat, and do not have to look carefully, 
doubting where it is going to be a sword, ten of eight | nine are right. 
Although in the illusion set by the boy spirit, the damage of Xie Li will be 
weakened by several, but it has been prayed several times, probably 
enough. After a while, thankful and pity felt a tingling pain, actually 
stepped on something sharp and extremely, a slight meal. 


The boy spirit saw him in the middle of the move, as if a short smirk was 
heard. Although this voice is immature, it should not be a child. It is like a 
vicious adult. The contrast is huge and creepy. Who knows, but the pity 


does not change the color, one step at a time, the backhand 1s a sword. 
Sting again! 


The child’s “squeaky” sighed and ate a bit of trouble and escaped far away. 
Thanks for this, I looked down at the bottom of the boot. It turned out to 
be a small pointed needle that was erected upside down. It must be that the 
child spirit was deliberately placed. It seems that it really hopes to scream. 
However, it is miscalculated, thank you very much, but not to mention 
stepping on a needle, is to be caught by a few feet of traps, and if 
necessary, he can hold back. 


The needle was a small one, and it was very deep. Thanks to Pity, I wanted 
to pick it out first. However, the child spirit took it out after eating it. 
Thanks for fearing that it took the opportunity to escape and maimed 
others, and stepped on the needle to chase the house. In a short while, I 
can't feel the pain, and I am flying like a fly. I found a circle in the small 
building and I didn't see the child spirit. Thanks to my heart, I wondered: 
"Is it scared for me?" At this time, a window not far away opened without 
wind. 


Thanks for the rush, I went forward and looked at it, but it was stunned. I 
saw no street outside the window, no mountain view, no pedestrians, only a 
deep pool that could not be seen. 


On the opposite side of this deep pool, there is a house. There are two 
children sitting in the room. It is Lang Ying and Gu Zi, who are rising 
around a table. However, they were unaware that, above them, they were 
still hovering with a thick black mist, and they were making a squeaky 
laughter, shouting: "Mother! Mother!" 


Xie pity a heart slammed, hands on the window sill, subconsciously to 
sound a warning, but remembered not to open, forcing the sound. 


Although this is just the illusion of the child spirit, but he does not know 
whether Lang Ying and Gu Zi have also been pulled in. If so, the damage 
they receive here will be added to the reality of them. He wanted to find a 
vase and throw it over to the police, but he couldn't find anything to throw. 


The table and chair couldn't be thrown out. There was a big lake between 
the two houses. Would you like him to swim? 


At this time, the millet was languid, and he yawned. The black smoke 
suddenly gathered, and it seemed that he would slip into his mouth. 


The layer of defense of the child's body is very weak. Even if it is not 
licensed, maybe this thing can be invaded. There is no time for thanking 
and then thinking slowly and slowly swimming. When the decision is 
made, thank you for your kindness: "Closed Mouth! Run!" 


As soon as the words were exported, Lang Ying and Gu Zi suddenly woke 
up, scared both to shut up, and jumped up, the child spirit disappeared, and 
the next moment, a group of black smoke exploded in front of Xie Pity! 


Although Xie pity had finished drinking, he felt a cold air poured into his 
mouth, and the black smoke entered the abdomen. The internal organs 
seemed to be frozen in the blink of an eye. He gritted his teeth and quickly 
removed a few amulets, took out the vanilla and the paper and chewed it, 
swallowing it. After a while, the throat was itchy, and the black smoke was 
suddenly vomited by him! 


Xie pity sleeves to cover, coughing, not only tears, but also quickly think 
about the countermeasures. The black smoke was still entangled in his 
upper body after he spit out, so Xie’s hand pressed on the window and 
jumped into the lake. 

" ", thanked the pity deeply into the lake. He sighed, crossed his feet, 
picked up his hands and made a meditation posture, letting his body sink 
slowly in the cold lake. After the heartbeat was calmed down, he looked up 
and could see that the dark fog hovered over and locked the entire surface 
of the water. As long as he gets out of the water, he must take a breath, and 
as long as he takes this breath, he will surely **** the boy spirit into his 
stomach. If a man has a big belly, this is not good at all. 


However, jumping into the water is just to find a free time to think about 
it. After a while, thank you for thinking about the way to deal with it. I 
thought, "How about swallowing it in, I will swallow the heart again." 


When I was on the street, I also learned the skills of swallowing swords. 
Although I swallowed about the wounded body, it doesn't matter. Anyway, 
I can hold on to this child spirit. 


As soon as he made up his mind, he let go of his hand and swam to the 
side. But listening to a dull water scream above, suddenly, the eyes were 
occupied by a large blockbuster of red. 


The black hair lingering in his eyes filled the whole line of sight, the water 
splashes and the bubbles were dense, and nothing could be seen clearly. 
Thanks for the blessing of the eyes, struggling to open the lingering 
intricate and crystal-like bubbles, I felt a pair of powerful hands. One hand 
caught his waist and the other hand pinched his jaw. 


The next moment, a cold, soft thing blocked his lips. 2k novel reading 
network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 95: Square 
inch chaos 


Suddenly, thank you for your eyes. 


He has never treated anyone like this in his life. No one dares to come, no 
one can come. However, this person is like a ghost, appearing too fast, he 
did not have time to prepare for it, it fell into such a situation, and for a 
moment, he was rushing to push the other side, but he took a few slobbers, 


" 


" crystal beads A string of blisters emerged from his mouth. 
This is a big taboo under water. So, the other side tightened his waist 
tightly, and the two men were closer together. The hand that was praying 
was pushed firmly on his chest, and the lips were also firmly sealed. The 
kiss was deeper, and a gentle, cold air flow slowly passed over. 
Unspeakable, rebellious, and thanks to see the man's eyebrows. It is a 
flower city. 


When he discovered that it was the moment of Huacheng, he stopped 
struggling, and his mind was out of time to come up with many chaotic 
ideas. For example, it was originally a flower city, no wonder so cold. The 
ghost does not need to breathe, but he can also give him a gas. But can't 
the ghosts sink into the water? 


At this time, Huacheng suddenly opened his eyes. 


The moment of confrontation with the dark eyes that were close at hand, 
the pity and the stiffness, suddenly struggling, thumping, like a duck 
clumsy to the unfortunate drowning duck. This point of thumping was 
easily resolved by the flower city, and he took the praying waist and 
quickly floated up. Soon after, the two slammed into the water! 


The bottom of the water is cold, and the air is cold. However, at this 
moment, the pity is all hot. As soon as he came out of the water, he wanted 
to stop at the beginning, but the black smoke of the tiger was still 
shrouded in the water. When someone saw it, he immediately locked it. 
Xie pity just twisted a little bit, and was again pulled back by the flower 


city, and the four lips were still not separated for a moment, and this was 
closely attached. Xie Li was kissed and his lips were painful and numb. He 
almost lost consciousness. If he was someone else, he would have passed 
away, but this person is a flower city. He completely does not know what 
to do, and he is forced to tears. Out. At this time, across the face of 
Huacheng, he saw the two people around, and thousands of silver 
butterflies broke out! 


With a sharp whistling, the butterfly rain is like a dense steel bomb. It is 
shot from the surface of the water. The butterfly wing reflects the cold 
blade-like light. It instantly cuts the child’s scream and screams, and the 
black smoke collapses. . However, the butterfly array 1s overwhelming, 
locking it in the center, and it can not be broken. Huacheng’s eyes were not 
lifted, and she prayed again into the water. After a while, the lips of the 
two men finally separated. 


Once separated, thankful and spit out a bunch of bubbles, while Huacheng 
vacated a hand and threw a scorpion. The scorpion can actually turn fast in 
the water, spin out a fierce stream of water, and finally settle. The two 
men came to the surface again. 


This time, not far from the shore, Huacheng traveled with Xie Pity. This 
shore does not know where the shore is, there are lights and human voices, 
which seems to be far. Behind the water, the butterfly screamed at the 
black smoke and rushed to the sky, leaving only the child spirit screaming 
and screaming: "Mother-!!!..." 


The two went to the shore, sitting on the ground, so face to face, thank you 
for seeing the opposite of the flower city. 


In fact, they have not seen each other for a few days, but thank you for 
feeling that they have not seen each other for a long time. Every time I 
meet, Huacheng has a different look. This time, he seems to be a year or 
two older than the last time. His face was originally beautiful, and the 
water was more dazzling. The hair is extremely black, the skin color is 
very white, and the right side of the cheek is very thin and braided into a 
small mole. A red line is carefully braided. This is the first time that Xie 
Pity discovered that there is a small beauty tip above his forehead, which 


makes his face look more delicate and beautiful. And one eye that was 
covered by black brought a few murderousness, diluting the exquisiteness, 
and making his good looks reach a near perfect balance. 


Huacheng squinted, as if in a forbearance, a few breaths, an opening, the 
voice is obviously lower than before, said: "His Royal Highness, I..." 


From the tip to the body, thanking the whole person is dripping with water. 
His lips were red and swollen, his eyes were empty, and he stayed for a 
while, then he said: "I... I... 1..." 


"I" did not know how many, he suddenly came up with an inexplicable 
sentence: "I am a little hungry." 


Wen Yan, a flower city. 


Xie Pity has not recovered from the shock, and he is confused: "No. IL... I... 
I am a little sleepy..." 


He rolled over and turned his back to the flower city, landing with his 
hands and knees, slowly groping as if looking for something. Huacheng 
said behind him: "What are you looking for?" 


Xie pity is only subconsciously afraid to look at him, incoherently: "I am 
looking for something. I am looking for my fight. My fight?" 


If you change your personal opinion and see this situation, you must have 
a scream: "It’s over, stupid!" In fact, it’s just that she has never 
experienced such a thing, and the stimulus is too big and she 1s out of 
control. It’s gone. Thanks for using his hands and knees, he walked back to 
the flower city and walked a few steps on the ground, muttering: "...I, I 
can't find it. I have to go. I want to go home to eat... I have to get rid of it... 


99 


Huacheng Road: "I'm sorry." 


His voice came close to him, and thanked him for jumping up and 
shouting, "I am leaving!" 


He shouted and shouted for help. Huacheng Road: "No!" 


Xie pity and hurriedly ran, did not run a few steps, but it was a squat at the 
soles of the feet, and fell back to the ground again. Looking back, all the 
way to the ground was all blood, and the needle that was tied to his sole 
was completely penetrated. Huacheng caught his ankle and his tone 
changed. "What happened to you?" 


Xie pity quickly pulled his foot back and said: "Nothing is okay, I don't 
hurt at all, it doesn't matter!" 


Huacheng said with a slight anger: "How can you not hurt!" When he 
talked about his hands, he was actually going to climb in addition to his 
boots. He was so scared that he climbed forward and shouted: "Don't don't 
want, don't!" ” 


He climbed forward and the flower city pulled him to prevent him from 
climbing. It was a mess here, and finally alerted other people on the shore, 
knocking on the drums and screaming, and a large group of people who 
didn’t know what the gadgets had. They screamed: “Bold! Who! Don’t 
know where it is? Are you impatient or do you want to die again? I... my 
mother, isn't this a city owner?!" 


The group of ghosts immediately brushed the high voice: "The city owner 
is good for the elderly!" 


Thanks for the screams in his heart, hate not to cover his face with his 
hands. It turned out to be a ghost city! 


Many of the ghosts have swept a glimpse of the last time, and Xie has seen 
a familiar pig. The two of them were surrounded by countless people, and 
Huacheng still held him on one of his ankles. This extremely powerful 
scene finally made him wake up a little. Who knows, the group of ghosts 
saw that one of them was a flower city, more excited, and said: "Citylor! 


Do you want to be strong | rape! Do you want to help! We help you hold 
it!" 


Huacheng Road: "Roll!" 


The ghosts are busy. But even if they are far from the crowd, they don’t 
dare to look at it. Xie Pity also wants to faint, because Huacheng has stood 
up, bent over and copied it, and hugged him up, stepping toward the shore. 
Go. 


Xie Li is still wearing women's clothing, only to say that the pillow is no 
longer in the stomach, otherwise this picture can still be terrible. However, 
this terrible finally made him completely awake. He earned a few times in 
the arms of Huacheng. He didn't make a break and coughed. He said, 
"...Sanlang, I can't help it. I just got a little out of control and made you 
laugh." 


The moment that happened just now, it really hurts him too much. Let me 
say that itis a "strike", after all, it is the first time. However, it is not just 
because it is the first time. In the past few hundred years, there has not 
been no gorgeous female ghost red | body | naked | body tempted him, but 
thank you has never been so shameful. Why did it become what it is now? 
He can only think that it must be because the national teacher only taught 
him how to prevent women, but he did not teach him how to prevent men. 
He had no experience, and this was caught unprepared. 


Recalling a series of reactions, thanking the slightest shame, I feel a little 
too excited, I thought that Saburo is also kind, but he scared this virtue, for 
the help of people, it is really not very polite. I listened to Huacheng Road: 
"There is nothing that I am chaos. Offended my brother, Saburo is 
apologizing." 


Seeing that he didn't care, Xie pity sighed with relief and said: "At the 
time, the situation was urgent, and you just helped. It was not a big deal. It 
was right." He also remembered what he was doing, saying, "Saro, how 
come you suddenly appeared? What about the child spirit?" 


Huacheng has a tone of voice that cannot be questioned: "First cure." 


During the speech, the two have come to the front of a Chinese building, 
and Xie pity looked up. This 1s actually the word "Bei Le Fang" written 
upstairs. 


He was amazed. Did the burned bliss workshop be repaired so quickly? 
And it has been repaired and it is no different. But guilty, I am sorry to 
ask. Huacheng hugged him in and went to the jade couch. Xie pity sat on 
the couch, and he was half-squatting down, holding the injured foot and 
looking at the red hole that was stained with blood underneath. 


This position made the pity very uneasy, saying: "Do not make it!" He also 
came down, but Huacheng pressed him back, and his hand and his socks 
were steadily and quickly removed. 


This foot, just the one who thanked the curse and locked the curse, the 
dark black circle locked on the white ankle, the contrast is extremely 
strong. Huacheng's gaze only stayed for a moment on the soft shin bone, 
and the palm of his hand stuck to the place where Xie pity was injured. He 
said: "It may be a little painful, my brother will not bear it, but he will call 
it when he hurts." 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 96: Fang inch 
chaos Mo Daofang chaos 2 


Thanks: "TI..." 


When the voice did not fall, he only felt that the flower city was weak, and 
he climbed up with a burst of pain and couldn't help but shrink. 


Although Huacheng’s movements have been extremely restrained, this 
pain is nothing to him, but I don’t know why, in front of Huacheng, he 
seems to be a bit sorrowful. Perhaps it was because Huacheng first said to 
him that he wanted to be deliberately stunned, but he did not succeed. 
Appreciating the retreat of thanking the pity, Huacheng immediately 
clenched his cheekbones and whispered: "Nothing. It will be fine soon. 
Don't be afraid." 


Xie pity shook his head. There was a lighter movement in the flower city, 
and I started to take a quick shot. When I raised my hand, I took out a 
small needle and said, "Okay, it’s okay." 


Thanks for the slightest look, the needle tip flashed with vicious light, and 
the flower city's five fingers slightly merged, and it was crushed into a 
black gas, dissipated in the air. Upon seeing it, Xie pity put the restlessness 
on the side for a while, and said: "Good resentment. The general fetal 
spirit will not have such a strong mana." 


Huacheng stood up and said, "Yes. So, it must not be the normal passing 
spirit." 


At this time, a mask man leaned in and handed a clay pot in his hands and 
handed it to Huacheng. Xie pity subconsciously observed whether the man 
wore a curse on his wrist, this time his sleeves were tightly tied. Huacheng 
took it, took a look at the pottery jar with one hand, turned and handed it to 
the praying of sitting on the jade. Xie Pity hadn't gotten together yet, and 
he heard a sullen cry from the children. It seemed that something was 


madly smashing inside, and the pots shook slightly, and almost no one 
could stand, and the alert was even worse. 


And he took the clay pot and picked up a corner of the pottery seal. He 
only looked inside, and the back slammed a chill. 


I saw that the dough had the same thing as a blank tire. Although both 
hands and feet grew, but the weakness was weak, the head was hidden in 
the darkness. The whole look is simply a deformed internal organs. 


This is its true body! 
Xie Li immediately re-sealed the jar and said: "It turns out." 


He has heard that some people will look for pregnant women who are not 
full-term, cut off the child in the belly of the pregnant woman, make a 
little ghost to perform some spells, drive it to harm people, protect 
themselves, or protect the town house. It seems that this fetus is the 
product of the sorcerer, and his mother, who is probably a thank-you 
believer, will not put the amulet of the pity in the clothes of the unborn 
child. 


After a moment of indifference, thank you for saying: "This fetus 1s what 
you caught. Saburo can mind if I take it to investigate it. Because I had 
met it once with Junshan, this time it was the second time for me. In front 
of me, I don’t know if it’s a coincidence or a connection.” 


Huacheng Road: "I want to take it and take it away. Even if I don't show it, 
you can catch it by yourself." 


Thanks and laughs: "However, even if Saburo catches it, it is much easier 
than I can catch it." 


He was talking about it, but he listened to Huacheng: "Is it? If I didn't go 
at that time, what method would you plan to use to grab it? Eat it into your 
stomach and swallow the sword?" 


" " 


I really told him. 


There is no disappointment in the face of Huacheng. Xie Pity is 
inexplicably aware that he is a little angry. 


Intuition tells him that if this sentence is not answered correctly, Huacheng 
will be even more angry. I don’t know how to deal with it. I suddenly feel 
that my stomach is shrinking. I can’t help but say: “.... am a little hungry.” 


The thank-you who responded to the export was embarrassed to see what 
the expression on the face of Huacheng was. He could only honestly 
explain: "This time is really hungry..." 


For a long while, Huacheng finally screamed and laughed. 


This smile, in front of the pity, like a haze, suddenly relieved. Flower City 
is half-smile and sigh, nodded, said: "Do it." 


Originally, Huacheng wanted to leave him to a banquet in the bliss, but 
thanked him for listening to the word "the banquet", and he knew that he 
would have to be greatly extravagant, and he proposed to go out and take 
some food. The flower city should be. 


The bliss was very warm, and the clothes of both of them were dried 
shortly after they entered. However, she was very eye-catching, and he 
borrowed a set of clothes from Huacheng and changed her clean white 
clothes. After the two went out and walked out of the distance, they could 
still hear the crying of the fetal spirit, and shouted "Mother", which shows 
that they are tenacious. However, in the ghost city, ghosts and wolverines 
are everywhere, and it’s not unusual to cry. 


Ghost Street is still very lively, with stalls selling specialty snacks on both 
sides. Although the ghosts are still those ghosts, their attitudes are quite 
different from those of the last time they visited. Huacheng and his side by 
side, those who are very fantastic, all smiled and greeted each other, 


rushing to greet the two, almost nodded, and thanked the pity for a word: 
"Fox and Tiger." 


In addition to paying attention to Huacheng, there are thousands of pairs of 
eyes that cast a more burning look on Xie Pity. It seems to be examining 
and guessing, who can go alongside the ghost city, who is it, He also 
wondered if he made a wrong decision. In the turbulent flow of demons 
and ghosts, Wanzhong is currently accustomed to Huacheng, asking him: 
"What do you want to eat?" 


I finally saw that the thing I was selling was not a very strange stall. I 
would like to express my gratitude to the quick decision, saying: "Let's 
just this one." 


Huacheng said: "This family can't." 
Thank you for your pity: "Why?" 


Huacheng did not speak, indicating that he was watching the stall. Thanks 
for the pity, the stall owner saw them staying here, excited to pick up their 
hands, seems to be waiting for them to come, nervously slamming the 
tables and chairs bench. However, the thing it used to wipe the table and 
chair bench was his tongue. 


Although the pots and pans that were smashed by the wide, long tongue 
were covered with crystal water drops, reflecting the new luster, but thank 
you for giving up the store decisively and quickly left. After a few steps, 
he saw a chicken soup hall decorated very clean and fresh. The front door 
was written with the words "home-grown chicken, slow-fired old soup. 
Now sell it, keep it clean", stop: " Ah, 1f you have chicken soup, why not 
drink a bowl?" 


Huacheng said again: "This is not the case." 


Thanks for your pity, said: "Is there a problem with the plate or is there a 
problem with the chicken?" 


Huacheng took him into the store, opened a curtain and gestured for pity. 
Thanks for the curious look into the head, no words at the time. I saw a 
large pot at the back of the kitchen. There was a big fire under the pot. The 
pot was hot and steaming. There was a man with a red **** in his head 
who was taking a bath in boiling water. There are also many barrels next to 
the cauldron, which are filled with salt, pepper, vanilla and so on. In front 
of the hall, the guest shouted: "The boss is a bit salty! The taste is light!" 


The man took a bath and grabbed a lot of spices on his body. The towel 
rubbed his back and rubbed it. Finally, make a loud scream: "Oh-!" 


Thanks for letting go of the curtain and quit silently. 


After a big lap, the two finally found a store, and the signboard was 
“authentic food”. Although Xie Li feels that this "genuine" has to be 
questioned, for example, as far as he knows, the human chef does not use 
the meat of the large monsters that are difficult to hunted to make 
skewers, but relatively speaking, this is the most normal. It’s gone. 


When the two sat down, the group of ghosts who followed for a long time 
were all surrounded, and they contributed to the side dishes with great 
diligence. The pig butcher had a white human leg on his shoulder and 
squeaked, screaming: "The owner! Is the fresh thigh meat? Just arrived!" 


The group of ghosts said: "Go and go! Will the friends of the city owner 
eat the stuff? You are a green ghost? You may have to eat your thighs!" 


"The **** smell is so big, don't make people sick!" 


The pig really raised a pig's hoof and said: "If the city owner and the city 
owner friend can afford it, what is the leg?" I tell you, Laozi's legs are 
definitely strong!" 


Thanks to pity, Junjun can't help but bow down and drink porridge. 
Huacheng did not pay attention to them, and the ghosts sent their blood to 
the courtesy, and they said: 


“Local special snack brain juice! Selected on the good demon brain, all of 
them have been repaired for more than 50 years! You smell this mellow!” 


"This duck blood is very good, look at you, you just cut it from your own 
body, try it." 


"The fruit of our family is the authentic fresh fruit of the grave. We are not 
the ones who are long on the dead. We don't pick it at all. 


A bunch of piles, thank you for your gratitude, and thank you constantly. 
It’s not good for such a raging enthusiasm, but some special snacks are 
really difficult to look directly at. I’m in the middle of the chaos and see 
the opposite side of the flower city, looking at him with a smile, thanking 
the left and looking at the right, coughing, whisper: ... Saburo..." 


Huacheng said this: "Brothers don't have to pay attention to them. People 
are crazy." 


The ghost immediately said: "The city owner can't say that! We are not 
crazy when anyone comes. If the city owner is our grandfather, what is the 
brother of the city owner’? It is our uncle..." 


"Yeah, the big man is coming, of course, going crazy!" 


Xie pity and laughter, I thought that this is all nonsense, Huacheng also 
said: "Less nonsense. Shut up!" The group of people quickly said: "Yes! 
The city owner is right. Shut up. Not a big brother!" 


Who knows, at this time, there are a few female ghosts who have been 
groaning, and finally can't help it. "Come on, you are... isn't that the last 
Taoist brother who told Lancome that he didn't raise it?" 


Thanks for a porridge on the spot. 


The group of ghosts seemed to discover what a terrible secret, and fried: 
"Oh my mother! Really!" 


"It is he who is him! Lancome is talking about people around!" 


A lot of savvy ghosts are going to pick up the ghosts of the pick-ups. 
However, the flower city must have heard it. Xie Pity looked up and saw 
that Huacheng picked up one eyebrow and looked at him with gaze. He 
seemed to be thinking about what it means to connect with him. It was 
originally an excuse for the last time when she met the female ghost, and 
was ridiculed by the crowds, but he was able to take it easy. Now he is 
coming to the flower city, but he can’t help it. He can’t hate to stun 
himself, saying: “I...” 


Huacheng seems to be waiting patiently for him. But what can you say? Is 
it still a serious face to defend yourself not to mention? 


Thank you for your kindness: "...1 am full." 


He was indeed full, and when he finished, he got up and hurried out of the 
stall. Behind the group of ghosts holding a bunch of carefully prepared 
specialty snacks screaming more than: "Big, adults! You still eat!" 


Huacheng also chased it up, took time to go back and said again: "Roll!" 


The group of ghosts quickly rolled again. Xie pity walked in front of the 
chaos for a while, see no ghosts to follow up, slow down the pace and wait 
for the flower city. After a short while, Huacheng took the hand and came 
forward, a serious and authentic: "I don't know my brother has such hidden 
diseases." 


Thanks for the moment: "No!" 
Also helplessly said: "... Saburo." 


Huacheng nodded and said: "Good. Saburo understands. I won't say it 
again." 


He looked like a very obedient and obedient, but it was very obvious. He 
said: "You are really not sincere." 


Huacheng smiled and said: "I swear, you can't find a more sincere heart 
than me." 


Hearing this familiar answer, Xie Pity also laughed. 


Speaking, he said seriously: "Sanlang, do you know where the Qianduan 
view 18?" 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 97: White 
night title book with red sleeves 


This question, in his mind, actually has an implicit answer. However, the 
reaction of Huacheng was quite different from what he expected. 


For a moment, Huacheng suddenly said: "Sorry." 
Thank you for your understanding: "What?" 


He originally thought that if the "Thousand Lights View" is not an Oolong, 
then it is most likely to have a relationship with it. But no matter what his 
guess is wrong, Huacheng did not say the reason for the sorry. Huacheng 
did not answer, only to signal him to go forward with himself, thank you 
for following him. The two walked for a while, and at the corner, the sight 
of the audience suddenly became bright and clear, and a palace view of 
aura was quietly presented in front of Xie. 


For a moment, his breathing was stagnant. 


In all directions, the black and the red are intertwined with the ghostland 
scenery. In this encirclement, the palace is beautiful and beautiful, like a 
fairyland. 


Such a palace based on light and brilliance is located in a ghost city with a 
mixture of dragons and snakes, and it is so incomprehensible, but it is so 
shocking. The moment you enter your eyes, you will leave an indelible 
impression in your mind. For a long while, thank you for your kindness: 
“ecsEOIS. ASS 23 


Before they stood in front of this palace, they both looked up. Huacheng 
also slightly raised its head, saying: "The Mid-Autumn Festival in the past 
few days, thinking that my brother is going to participate in their boring 
game every year in the heavenly court, I got this place and gave some fun 
to my brother when I went to the banquet. Untiring." 


His way of "debating" is unavoidable. In order to give thanks, "get some 
fun", I got a look at it, and I also raised three thousand miles to pray for a 
bright light! 


Huacheng bowed his head slightly and finished the whole cuff. He said: "I 
didn't want to teach you what I knew, because it was my own arrangement. 
I built my brother's view in this messy place, and my brother would have 
to be surprised." 


Thanks for shaking his head immediately. Huacheng actually felt that he 
had troubled him, so he didn't want him to know that he didn't know what 
to say. At this step, thank you very much, but it 1s too weak. So, thank you 
for your heart, take a deep breath, and concentrate on enjoying this 
"Thousand Lights View", you must squat, and the first side: "This palace is 
beautiful. It’s magnificent, it’s a natural work, and it’s not a few days’ 
work. Sanlang will not be built in the near future?” 


Huacheng smiled and said: "Nature is not. My brother looks good. This 
place was built very early. It is hard to use it, so it has been hidden. I have 
never let anyone else come in. I would like to thank my brother for letting 
it. I finally found the purpose, and this is the day." 


Hearing words, thank you for being a little relieved. 


Since it was built long ago, it has never been used. I think it should be 
used for other purposes at the beginning. It is now used by hand. 
Otherwise, if Huacheng really built a palace view for him, he would be 
even more uneasy. Of course, depending on the nature of Huacheng, it is 
very likely that it is purely for the sake of building fun. Although she was 
very curious about the original construction of such a city with a ghost 
city, it was intended to be used, but it still clung to the impulse of inquiry. 
Asking too much is not a good habit. Who knows when to ask what should 
not be asked? 


Huacheng Road: "Go in and see?" 


Thank you for your kindness: "Of course." 


The two walked side by side, slowly entering the palace and strolling on 
the jade pavement. After four visits, the view was open and clear, but there 
was no statue, and there was no futon to be worshipped by believers. 
Huacheng Road: "In a hurry, there are a lot of sloppy, my brother Haihan." 


Thank you, Charlie: "No. I feel very good, very good. There is no statue 
and a futon. It is always best not to have it. But why are there no cards?" 


This question is not a question, but there are a few jade flower shops on 
the ground that have carefully carved the dark lines of the words 
"Thousands of Lights". The plaques that carry the facades are not hung up. 
Naturally, it is not because of hasty, so he Curious to ask. Huacheng smiled 
and said: "There is no way. I don't have any people who can write here. 
You can only see the group. It is good to be literate. What kind of 
calligraphy do you have in your brother? I will ask you to write this brand, 
or, I thought the best way, my brother wrote a piece of it and hung it on 
this thousand lights. That would be wonderful." 


Said, he pointed to the main hall for Taiwan. The jade case 1s extremely 
long and extremely wide. It is arranged in a well-organized manner with 
some offerings and a fragrant tripod. It also has a pen and ink basket, and 
the book is clear and elegant. The two went forward and thanked the pity: 
"That's not as good as it is, please ask Saburo to help me write." 


It’s said that Huacheng’s eyes are slightly wide, and it seems that he did 
not expect him to say this, “I?” 


Thanks: "Well." 
Huacheng pointed to himself and said: "I really want to write?" 
Thanks to the pity, he asked: "What can be Saburo?" 


Huacheng raised an eyebrow and said: "There is nothing wrong with it, 
just..." 


Seeing that Xie pity has been waiting for him to answer, he took up his 
hand and seemed to be helpless: "Okay. Just, I am not good at writing." 


This is amazing. Xie pity really can't imagine, Huacheng will do 
something bad, smiled and said: "Oh? Is it, write one to see?" 


Huacheng asked again: "I really want to write?" 


Thanks for taking a few sheets of white paper, neatly laid on the jade case, 
carefully healed, and picked a purple eye, and sent it to him, saying: 
"Come." 


Seeing that he is ready, Huacheng said: "Let's do. But don't laugh." 
Thanks for your nod. "That is natural." 


So, Huacheng took the pen and wrote it in a serious way. Thanks for the 
pity, the more you look, the more unpredictable your face. 


He really wants to hold back, but still can't do it. Huacheng whispered on 
the paper, with a warning and a little joke: "Brother." 


Thanks for the right color, said: "My fault." 


He doesn't want to, but what is he? The word of Huacheng is really funny! 
! 


Even the most embarrassing wild grass that she had seen before, she was 
not half wild. This wildness is also mixed with a sigh of evil. I am afraid 
that the calligraphy will be stunned. Thanks to the hard work and 
recognition for a long time, he barely recognized the ghosts of "Bohai", 
"Water", "Wushan" and "Cloud". He guessed that he should have written 
"When the sea was difficult, except Wushan is not a cloud." 


I thought of Huacheng as a ghost in a ghost world, so feared and feared, 
finally revealed this expression on a certain thing, and still write this kind 
of thing, he even laughed and endured the twitching twitching, both hands 
picked up the flower city The work that was completed in the air, forced to 
calm down, said: "Well. Very individual, self-contained. There is 'wind'." 


Huacheng put a pen on the pen, and the posture is quite impressive. He 
smiled and said: "What is crazy?" 


Xie pity pretended not to hear, a serious comment: "In fact, it is not 
difficult to write well, write your own 'wind’, it is difficult. If it 1s just 
good-looking, but it looks good, it is also down. Sanlang Road is very 
good. There is a wind of everyone, soaking up the mountains and rivers..." 
There are still eight words behind: the mountains and rivers are broken, 
and the soldiers are in ruins. There is no way, it is very hard to compose 
the praises. When Huacheng listened, he raised his eyebrows higher and 
doubted: "Really?" 


Thanks to pity: "Have I ever fooled Saburo?" 


Huacheng slowly added a few new fragrances to the little Jinding in the 
side. In the smoke and dark fragrance, he seemed to carelessly: "I really 
want to write well. No one teaches, I don't know what 1s wrong with this." 


He can ask the right person. Xie pity said: "There is nothing wrong with it, 
but it is..." After thinking about it, I finally felt that the light could not be 
said, and I went close, and I took a pen and wrote two lines of verses 
written on the paper. In one go, look at the moment, smiled and sighed: 
"Hey. I have no chance to write for many years, it is not as good as 
before." 


Huacheng gaze at the four lines with different styles and different styles, 
especially the last two sentences of thanking and praying - "taking the 
flowers and lazy back, half-edge cultivating half-margin", connecting the 
poems repeatedly Several times, my eyes linger. For a long while, he 
looked up: "Seeking advice?" 


Thanks to the pity: "I don't dare to teach." So, he talked about the 
essentials of the city, and he has no reservations. He will give his 
experience in calligraphy when he was young. 


The fragrant scent, the bright light, the praying is serious, the flower city 
listens to the focus. In the hall, the whispers are light, the picture and the 
voice are very soft. After a while, thank you: "Are you coming again?" 


Huacheng "oh", and took the pen, and seemed to write a few words 
seriously. Thanks for watching him, holding his hands and rubbing his 
head, said: "It's a bit interesting. But..." 


However, he always felt that there was something wrong with Huacheng. 
Looking at Emei for a moment, he suddenly found out exactly what was 
wrong - Huacheng did not hold the pen at all. 


Even holding the pen pose is a mess, of course not right! 


Thanks for the pity and laughter, standing closer, and not thinking about 
reaching out to correct, said: "The way you hold is wrong, to be like this..." 


When he reached out, he suddenly realized that it might be slightly wrong. 
The two are not long teachers and young people. It is too intimate to teach 
them in such a way. But it has already been shot, and there is no reason to 
rush back, so it is deliberate. Therefore, hesitated for a moment, he still 
did not withdraw. Think again, the last ghost gambling gambling, 
Huacheng is not the same hand to teach him to shake the scorpion? 
Although she felt that she hadn't learned anything at that time, she still had 
a feeling of being deceived afterwards, but this time, he really wanted to 
teach the city a little something. Therefore, thankful and warm palms and 
peace of mind stuck to the cold hand of Huacheng, gently holding, driving 
his gesture to swim away, whispered: "So..." 


Feeling that his hand was mad at the flower city, he took control and 
corrected it. Not a moment, he felt that his movements were more frenzied 
and uncontrollable, and he had to hold tighter. The words written by two 
people together were twisted and twisted, and they were unsightly. The 
more they felt, the more they felt wrong. They couldn’t help but say: 
"This..." 


Huacheng seems to make a bad success, giving a low laugh. The paper is 
indiscriminate, and thank you for your helplessness: "Sanlang... Don't do 
this. Learn well, write well." 


Huacheng Road: "Oh." 


At first glance, it is pretending to be serious. Xie pity shook his head and 
laughed. 


Although Huacheng’s hand was cold, he held it in his hand, but he was 
inexplicably like holding a soldering iron and dare not use it any more. At 
this time, Xie Li’s eyes suddenly swept to the edge of the platform and 
condensed. 


He looked at him and saw the corner of the jade case, leaving a small 
flower alone. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 98: Strange to 
open the door to steal the ghost 


Thanks for the slightest glimpse, the long-term memory ts like a dusty 
picture, slightly dusty, but still not clear. He let go of his hand and picked 
up the flower and said nothing. Huacheng also put a pen on the side, 
slowly researching ink on the side, saying: "What?" 


'..." Xie pity smiled. "Nothing. It's just this kind of flower, the aroma is 
refreshing, I always like it." 


It is not uncommon to offer flowers in the palace. However, it is generally 
for the big red flowers, or the hands that never fade. After a pause, thank 
you: "Is it a **** rain flower? Is this flower?" 


Huacheng smiled and said: "Brother is really a god." 


During the laughter, the two finally worked together to complete a word 
and wrote the four poems. Huacheng took it up for a moment and seemed 
to be very satisfied. "Well, it’s good. Pick it up." 


Hearing that he said "good", thankfulness has already stunned. Then I 
heard "kick up", thanked and pity again, said: "You should not want to 
hang on the wall?" If the teachers who passed away to him saw a word of 
thanksive participation In this way, I am afraid I will be angry with the 
corpse. Huacheng smiled and said: "No. I take it by myself, and no one 
will show it." 


At this time, the two suddenly heard a faint call outside: 
"Fire!" 
"Fire!" 


"The bliss workshop is in flames!" 


The view of the thousand lights is very quiet, but the two of them are super 
mortal, and they quickly look at each other. Thanks to the disappointment: 
"Is it a bliss?" 


When the words have been exported, I feel that this "again" is a bit funny. 
Huacheng was not in a hurry and collected the words. He said: "Don't 
worry, my brother is here, I will go back when I go." 


How can you thank you for sitting in peace, saying: "I am going with you!" 
Hurry up to keep up, wondering: How does he have a fire every time he 
comes? The name of the **** can be confirmed. Although this time is not 
his business, it is almost a habit to apologize. The two rushed back to the 
bliss workshop, and the whole street was full of smoke. The little ghosts 
and quirks screamed and slammed the bucket back and forth to extinguish 
the fire. When they saw the flower city and thanked the pity, they said: 
"The city owner! You don't have to worry about the elderly. The fire is not 
big, it is gone!" 


Huacheng said nothing, thank you for a sigh of relief, Wen said: "Great! 
It's really hard work." 


The little devils didn’t expect to be thanked, not to mention the “hard 
work” of the city’s friends. When they heard it, they said, “It’s not hard! 
What a big deal!” “Should be!” 


Thanks to this, he found that he was hard and seemed to be slightly wrong, 
because he was not the master here. However, since Huacheng did not say 
anything, he said that there should be no harm, and he would not care. The 
two entered the bliss workshop and looked at the fire. It was only a small 
place burned, and it was a small house in the corner. It was no wonder that 
it was quickly extinguished. 


However, after confirming this point, Xie Pian was wary, and said to 
Huacheng: "The arsonist is neither ignorant and daring to mischief, nor 
does it really want to burn anything. It is more like diverting attention and 
taking everyone's attention. They are all attracted." 


However, at this point of view, what kind of attention will you want to 
transfer? 


Suddenly, thank you for your reaction: "That's a baby!" 


Before they came out of the bliss, they walked for a long time, and the 
baby spirit was still crying, crying and sharp, and calling her mother from 
time to time. And now, this voice has disappeared! 


They went to a partial hall outside the Temple of Bliss to see. When the 
two came out, Huacheng placed the pottery jar with the fetal spirit on a 
case. The pottery jar was still there, but when she got up, she felt that the 
weight was wrong and it was too light. Open it again, and sure enough, 
there is nothing left in it! 


The seal, the thing that was locked in the jar, was impossible to open by 
itself. Thanks for the moment: "The fetal spirit was released." 


Huacheng did not have a trace of chaos, saying: "It was stolen. The thing 
passed in the butterfly array, and it was so badly hurt that he could not run 
far." 


Thanks for your pity: "That would be easy. Saburo, can you monitor the in 
and out guards? You can see if you can find suspicious people." 


Huacheng said: "No." 
"..."" Xie pity blinked, said, "No?" 
Huacheng Road: "Well. It has never been." 


It is no wonder that he secretly made small moves in the bliss studio last 
time, and he was not seen by a guard. Xie Li also thought about whether it 
was because the ambush was too deep. He didn't find it. He didn't expect it 
to be true. He said a little, "Do you feel so relieved about the bliss?" 


Huacheng Road: "Brother, have you noticed the door in the bliss?" 


After thinking about it, thank you: "I have never noticed. Is there anything 
special?" 


Huacheng Road: "Not bad." 


He pointed to the door of this partial hall, saying, "If it is not the master, if 
you don't allow it, take away the person who was originally inside, or 
something that is not your own, even if there is only one, you will not be 
able to open the door. , trapped in that room." 


Thanks to the last time I came to the bliss, he seemed to have been using 
the scorpion to clear the way. At the end of the day, the wind sergeant had 
a strong wind and opened the roof, which avoided the departure from the 
"door." These are some of the more violent pictures. The more you want to 
thank you, the more you can't think about it, the slightest shame. After a 
pause, I asked: "If you let Sanlang take away the same magic weapon from 
me, I received the bliss, and I am the original owner of the magic weapon, 
can I take it away?" 


Huacheng raised his eyebrows: "Of course I can't take it. It's mine when I 
get it. But my brother won't marry me, I won't grab your magic weapon." 


Xie pity and cough, said: "That is natural, of course I know, so I said it was 
a fake. And... I don't have any magic weapon to make people rob..." 


Huacheng joked around, smiled and continued: "So, it is impossible to 
steal things from me without being discovered. Of course, there is no need 
for guards." 


The first reaction of thanking the pity is that the person who stole the fetal 
spirit did not leave the door, but used other methods. But looking around, 
the roof of this partial hall 1s good, the ground 1s good, the walls are good, 
there is no trace of being broken, and | can't help but give birth to a more 
strange speculation: 


Didn’t the person who stole the baby’s spirit leave without being in this 
hall? 


Although there is no place to hide in this temple, but there are many ways 
to hide in the sky. Maybe that person is near them at the moment, quietly 
watching their every move. Thank you for watching the surroundings, and 
wondering if there is some abnormal distortion of the air. However, both 
his eyes and his instincts tell him that there is no third person or ghost. I 
am afraid that his thinking is wrong, I am afraid I have to change my 
direction. At this time, Huacheng smiled and said: "My brother does not 
have to worry. I have the means to find out who steals the baby." 


He was actually in the chest. Thanks to turn to him, thinking for a 
moment, and the ground is also suddenly clear. 


The two waited. After a while, the noisy sound gradually approached, a 
large group of demons and ghosts came over, and Wuhuan gathered 
outside the temple, saying: "The city owner, what is your command from 
the old man to find us!" 


This is a small number of people who say that there are nearly a thousand. 
If it is not a bliss, even if the house and the yard are big enough, I am 
afraid that it will not be able to stop. The one who brought them was the 
mask man, to Huacheng Road: "The city owner, who appeared on this 
street today, should be all here. The ghost city has also been locked, and no 
one can get out." 


Still the voice of the young man last time, thank you and couldn't help but 
look at him again. Ghosts said: "The city owner, who put the fire you 
caught?" 


"I heard that I also stole something! I am not impatient but I want to die 
again!" 


"I am so bold. I set fire and steal things. I dare to move on the old age. Can 
the city owner let go?!" 


Although the group of ghosts said that it was not him, but Xie pity as a 
person who burned a house in the bliss square last time, secretly robbed 


people, and was let go by the flower city, listening to the feeling of 
countless arrows, a light cough, my heart The more apologetic, the peek at 
the flower city, just hit the flower city and also unconsciously swept him, 
his eyes quickly fled. Next, just listen to Huacheng: "The person who 
steals the baby spirit stands up by himself. Don't waste my time." 


The ghosts were shocked and said: "In the middle of us?" 
"I thought it was foreign..." 
"Who is going to stand up!" 


For a long while, the Xuan Ran wave has subsided, but no one stood up. 
Huacheng Road: "Very good, really brave. Male left female right, 
divided." 


Although the ghosts are strange, they dare not violate the words of 
Huacheng. They immediately do what he said, and the brush is divided 
into two large piles. The male ghost is crowded on the left, screaming; the 
female ghosts are on the right, almost all charming. Huacheng and Xie 
Pity looked at each other and went straight to the right. They walked 
among the female ghosts and almost swept over ten. After a few steps, 
when he passed a female ghost, he made a slight meal. The female ghost 
was wearing a long skirt, and her face was covered with a thick layer of 
white powder. The white was scary and she could hardly see the original 
face. But the overly exaggerated makeup was slightly familiar, thanking 
her: "Lan Lan girl?" 


The female ghost glimpsed as if she had seen the ghost. Sure enough, it 
was the last time on the streets of the ghost city to entangle the pity, and 
the pig butcher confronted the street, and also laughed at the "not to 
mention" and preached the ghosts of the female ghost Lancome. 


After the surprise, she forked her waist and said, "What? You don't 
mention it, but you said it yourself! I didn't marry you! Is it difficult for 
the city owner to give me some color to look at revenge?" 


Although the female ghosts and banshees were a little nervous, but 
listening to her, she still ate and laughed. Huacheng also came over, 
although he couldn't see his expression, the female ghost Lancome was 
still a little afraid of him, and the posture did not dare to make it too 
much. Thank you for your kindness: "The jokes like that, the girl loves to 
say nothing. But the tires are so numerous that they are bloody, can't let 
go, or please come back first." 


Even if Lancome was coated with a very thick powder, she could see that 
her face was whiter. She went backwards again and again, but she was ina 
group of female ghosts at this time. She did not step backwards and was 
caught by the female ghosts next to her. They stopped the possibility of 
running away and had to say, "I don't know if you are What to say! What 
kind of fetal spirit?" 


Thanks for your pity: "Please come back." 


Lan Lan said: "What else do I have? I don't have it! You said that I stole 
something from the owner's house, but everyone knows that you can't take 
things from the owner's house, and you can't get anything!" 


All the ghosts are right, you know, the pig butcher is also awkward. 
Lancome said again: "The bliss in the blizzard is just a little while, I have 
never left in this street. If I steal something, I haven’t had time to hide it 
yet?" Empty hands, but also pulled up the skirt to indicate that they did not 
hide. Thanks for the pity: "Girl, the last time I saw you, the wind was 
sorrowful, you also dressed very little. Today is the wind and the sun, why 
do you wear a long skirt instead? You suddenly want to change clothes, Or 
what do you want to cover?" 


Listening to him, the group of ghosts discovered that Lancome was 
exposed to clothing on weekdays. She said that she “dressed very little”. It 


is already very polite. On the street she is almost —|chest|dew|milk . 
Today, she is wearing a long skirt, covering her waist and legs all the way, 
it is strange. Moreover, before the flower city took the pity to visit the 
ghost city, when the group of ghosts started to send the side dishes, they 
did not see the favorite of the past, and they actively promoted the "Lan's 


not that I can't do it." Lancome, a slight commotion. Thanks slowly and 
calmly: "You have not taken away something that is not your own. You 
just took away part of yourself. The fetal spirit is now in your belly!" 


Since the person who stole the fetal spirit did not leave in other ways, and 
did not stay in the partial temple, then there is only one possibility left: 
this person is left from the main entrance in a bright and honest manner. 


If this fetus has been born, then he is a child, an independent person. 
However, this fetus was forcibly cut out from the mother's body when it 
was not full, so if its mother put it back into her stomach, it would 
certainly be her own thing. No, it should be said that the fetus is simply a 
piece of meat on her body, a part of her. After all, the mother and the child 
are richer in water. In this case, they are one, and the female ghost can 
certainly go out safely and all the doors of the blissful bliss. 


Therefore, the stolen fetus must be a female ghost, the birth mother of this 
fetus. Quickly block the ghost market, and find the female ghosts who 
appeared on this street before and after the fire, and they will surely catch 
it. I want to come, these Huacheng thought about it in the moment after 
entering the temple. 


Suddenly, Lancome shouted and slammed his stomach with his hands. 2k 
novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 99: Strange to 
open the door to steal the ghost 2 


Thanks for the pity: "Girl?!" 


Lancome's face was white and could not be said in one sentence. Suddenly, 
something seemed to explode in her stomach. The flat belly was suddenly 
swollen into a huge sphere, almost the long skirt was cracked, and the 
black smoke spilled from the seams! 


The female ghosts loosened their hands and dispersed slightly. Lancome’s 
hands were barely holding their lower abdomen, and they were scared: 
“Don’t make trouble!” 


It was the tire spirit that was noisy in her stomach. Huacheng calmly said: 
"Brothers back." 


Thanks for your pity: "Nothing!" 


Lancome's knees slammed on the ground, and his face was painfully said: 
"Be obedient! Obey! You are a little bit, you are a little bit okay!!! Don't 
make another noise!!!" 


Thanks to the pity: "Lan Lan girl, you will let it out first." 


Lancome was busy madly shaking his head and said: "No! No, no! I will 
keep him in my stomach and raise it. He will not go out to hurt anyone! I 
want you to take my son away. I am looking for it." He has been for 
hundreds of years! Don't take my son! Don't hand him to the hands of the 
heavens! !" 


It seems that the ghosts of the ghost market all know that thanking the pity 
is a heavenly person. Lancome screamed and hugged her belly on the 
ground. Her belly seemed to be no longer part of her body. It was like a 
living creature, sometimes shrinking, sometimes swelling, and sometimes 
moving up and down, black smoke became more intense. I want to come 


to this evil spirit of the fetus to return to the mother's abdomen for a while, 
to restore a little vitality, but also to blame. The female ghosts spread out 
for a while and pressed her up, and couldn’t hold it anymore, so the devils 
and ghosts on the left yelled: "Look at us!" The scene is extremely chaotic, 
thankful and clenched the fist, said: "Lan Lan girl! The strength of the 
fetus in your belly is far stronger than you, and it can hurt you but you 
can't bear to hurt it, you have no way to take it! You sooner or later It will 
be sucked out by the body, let it go out!" 


If Lancome does not release the things she hides in her stomach, she will 
soon be sucked up by the ferocious fetus and then torn into pieces. She 
will have to cut her abdomen by hand. Although it is better than watching 
her torn into pieces by her own son, if he is not in the last step, where is he 
willing to do this kind of thing? He didn't want to do it, and naturally he 
didn't want to spend the city instead of him. But this female ghost Lantern 
is extremely stubborn, even if she is so screaming and screaming, she will 
not let the fetus out. This is not the way to go. He would rather come by 
himself, bite his teeth and say: "Sinful!" 


Who knows, he put his hand on the handle of the heart, the flower city 
immediately held him down, Shen Sheng: "No." At the same time, 
Lancome suddenly burst into a golden light, stabbing a pile of demons and 
ghosts nearby Called "Hey!", escaped and said: "What!" 


Thanks for a glance, after the golden light faded, the tire spirit that was 
rushing out of the rush seemed to be locked by something, and Lancome’s 
abdomen was flattened back. And the lock on it is a belt around her waist. 


The belt seems to be plain and unobtrusive, but you can look back and 
look carefully, "Why is this thing on you?" 


Even if it faded because it was washed too many times, thank you can see 
that this belt is a thing of heaven. 


Many things in the heavens are ingenious magic weapons. Therefore, when 
necessary, it shows the singularity of its escort. Moreover, even if this 
embroidered road is worn out, thank you can be sure, this must be the 
"golden belt" used by the priest. 


Look at the ranks, or the gods in heaven! 


In the heavens, giving a golden belt is a very popular style, which has 
special significance. A male priest gives his belt to others. This move has 
its own meaning. It is a special meaning. It is conceivable that the belt is 
naturally impossible to give away and is not so easy to lose. Thanks to the 
pity: "Girl, is it your child..." 


When I got here, he suddenly remembered that whether it was a magical 
cave or not, it was very bad to ask a woman about this intimacy in a large 
audience. Lancome immediately said: "No!" 


Thank you for your pity: "I haven't said anything yet. If you do anything, 
say no?" 


He asked: "You have been supporting this golden belt for seven or eight 
hundred years?" 


Hearing words, a lot of female ghosts are stunned: "...my mother, 
Lancome, are you so old?!" 


"Don't you say that you are only three hundred years old?" 
"No, she said she was two hundred years old!! False age!" 


This fetus is about seven or eight hundred years old, so its mother is 
naturally about this age. But this female ghost Lancome is not so deep and 
suffocating. As an ordinary female ghost, I can stay in this world for so 
long. I want to come, this golden belt with mana has helped her a lot. If the 
father of this fetus is a priest, it is more and more reasonable. 


A priest, and a woman in the mortal private, through the results, I do not 
know whether it was the beginning of chaos or a cold, this woman was 
horribly miserable, the fetus in the abdomen was cut into life. Now both 
mother and child are turned into ghosts, and the fetus is very likely to kill 
countless people. No matter how you look at it, the severity of this matter 
is no less than that of Xuan Ji, and it seems to be familiar. 


Then how to solve this matter, I think very well. Xie pity immediately 
turned around and said to Huacheng Road: "Sanlang, this girl..." 


Not to mention him, Huacheng said: "What do you do, do not ask me." 
Thanks and whispered: "Yeah." 


After receiving the answer, he turned to Lancome. At this time, the group 
of ghosts are asking: "Lan Lan Lan, who is your doll?" 


"It's mad! Just kill it, don't care, don't you care?" 
"Who is it? Should you come to the door to find him?" 
Lancome gritted her teeth and looked at her thanks: "...who else?" 


She didn't say the name, thanked her and prayed, and said, "You go back to 
heaven with me." 


Lancome immediately said: "No!" 


She said that it is useless, of course, it is useless to walk with her. Thanks 
for the color, said: "This fetus is extremely ferocious. It doesn't know how 
many people are stained in the hands. It is too much involved now. You 
can't help it. You must get to the heavens to confront and inform. If the 
priest is upright, or if there is a misunderstanding between you, let your 
mother and son go up to recognize him and deal with the child; if the 
priest is responsible for you, or does something bigger, It is even more 
important to ask him for justice. Anyway, this fetus is your son and his 
son. What is the matter of his father? 


In this case, the ghosts are quite reasonable. Moreover, let Lancome bring 
a lot of trouble to the heavens, and they are very irritating. They are afraid 
that the trouble is not big. The bigger the better, they are advised: "Yes, 
Lancome, what are you afraid of! Find him to settle accounts! ” 


"He dares not to accept the bill, let's burn his temple!" 


Thanks to Huacheng Road: "I will go back to Heaven and tell the story 
quickly." 


Although Lancome resisted, he also knew that there was no way to stop it. 
He stunned and suddenly went to the flower city and said: "The city owner, 
thank you for your great grace!" 


Thanks for the pity, she continued: "Lan Lan set fire in the bliss, it is a 
helpless policy, broken the rules of the ghost city, can't help you! I hope 
you will not be surprised." 


She has always been sloppy, and at this time she spoke, but it seems to 
have changed a person, teaching many devils and ghosts who are familiar 
with the sun. Huacheng is as usual. He is grateful to him: "My brother has 
been in a hurry. I will wait for you to come down and have a good 
hospitality." 


Xie pity nodded, this took Lancome and went straight to heaven. 


Walking on the streets of Xianjing Street, thank you for walking in the 
psychic circuit: "You are here! Look at the temple of Laowu, there is 
something to discuss." After finishing the sentence, he retired, not staying 
for a moment, first took Lancome to Shenwu Temple. . Because Lancome 
was the body of a female ghost, she couldn't enter the Golden Temple. She 
thanked her and waited for a while outside the hall. When Junyi came, she 
personally gave permission and Lancome was put in. 


In a short time, all the priests who were in Xianjing rushed to see them. At 
the sight of a princess, a female ghost with a heavy makeup and a genius 
of Jing Jingxian was attracted. A black-haired priest entered the temple 
and saw the scene in the center of the main hall. It took a moment to be a 
passion. Lancome also looked at him and immediately bowed his head and 
his lips trembled. The feelings of admiration are self-confident, only 
faintly said: "His Royal Highness, who is this woman?" 


Hearing the words "His Royal Highness Prince", Lancome's look changed 
slightly, look at the pity, as if thinking of something, but not sure. At this 
time, Feng Shui Second Division also arrived, a pair of brothers with 


similar appearances of six or seven points, one person with a paper fan 
gently shake, white clothes wide and fluttering, the picture is very 
beautiful. Shi Qing Xuanbian shook his side: "Yes, look at the Lord, how 
do you bring the female ghosts up today?" 


Xie pity inexplicable: "View the Lord?" What is the view? Bodhisattva 
view? Why is it suddenly called? Think again, most of them are 
"Thousands of Lights on the Lord!" 


He didn't know how to deal with it, so he had to pretend that he didn't hear 
it. Shi Qingxuan was proud of his enthusiasm, and he greeted him in a 
circle. He said: "Hey? This female ghost sister has nothing in her 
stomach? How do I feel..." 


Speaking up, I seem to want to touch. The teacher did not get a folding fan 
and said: "Qing Xuan!" 


Shi Qingxuan immediately shrank his hand and argued: "I just feel very 
bad evil. I want to see if there is something dangerous inside..." The 
teacher did not quit and said: "You are a man and a **** official." Here, it 
is still the Temple of the Gods, how can we do such a thing that has lost 
the system? It is not allowed to become a woman! The woman has done 
this kind of thing and has lost her body, and changed it back to me!" 


Lingwen shook his head and clamped the instrument under his arm. He 
stepped forward and placed his hand on the belly of Lancome. After a 
moment, I withdrew my hand and said: "A fierce fetus. How many 
centuries?" 


Thanks: "It’s about seven or eight hundred years." 


He said how to encounter the fetus twice, how the fetus killed the pregnant 
woman, and led to the female ghost. The Huacheng and Ghost City 
sections are not mentioned, and Lancome naturally does not take the 
initiative. At the end, thank you: "This is the case. I don't know if the 
priest is still alive or in office. Is there any misunderstanding? Does he 
know this? So I brought the girl up." 


Fengxin frowned: "If there is nothing wrong with it, I know that this is a 
matter for the mother and the child. I still don't care about letting it go for 
seven or eight hundred years, and it is too irresponsible." 


I hugged my arms and said leisurely: "I agree with the words of General 
Nanyang, so it is too irresponsible. I don't know which one is the result of 
Xianxie. If I am still in office, I will stand up." 


When the voice just fell, he felt that there were countless gaze coming 
over, and the temple of Shenwu was silent. 


For a long while, I said: "...Do you have any misunderstandings about 
me?" 


"..." Shi Qingxuan even fanned the fan and said, "I don't think there is any 
misunderstanding. It should be said that I know you too well." 


He immediately said: "There is no such thing!" 


Everyone laughed and laughed, and even the eyes of the teacher and the 
spirit were not trusting. The hoes are big, the amount of support, and 
earnestly said: "This... I have had a good relationship with some ghost 
girls, but this girl, I have never seen it before." 


It is also credible to listen carefully to this statement. Which woman is 
better with him, don’t he know himself? Although I have been criticized 
by my heart, I have never denied any love. If I do, I will not accept it. 
Anyway, I am not kidding. A woman who has made a good relationship 
with him, unless it is like Xuan Ji, who is not willing to follow him, at 
least it is to ensure that the second half of life 1s well-fed, and the rich 
honey is soaking. If this female ghost had had a marriage with her, she 
would not fall to the point where she was slashed and turned into a devil. 


Moreover, the look of a woman is very high. He has been hooked up with 
him, and there is nothing more than a woman with a beautiful color. He is 
especially good at beauty. As seen by other people in the temple, Lancome 
is so rich in makeup that she can't see the true colors. The appearance, the 
taste, the manners and the manners are far from the standards of the past 


lovers. Therefore, he said that there is no such thing. Everyone’s heart is 
faint or believe. However, it is only "in the heart" and "hidden". Have the 
opportunity to see the general being the general, why not? And the sleeves 
smiled and watched him argue, the letter is not believe, isn’t it high to be 
unhappy? 


Originally, Xie Pity also felt that there were ten ** , after all, he was 
tired of the previous section. However, if you look at your look, you don’t 
feel like a fake, you are also shaken. He remembered that Huacheng 
seemed to say that this person does not play with Yin, do not have to fear, 
and think for a moment, or said: "Before Lan Lan girl vaguely asked a 
question, 'Who can have it’, I also take it for granted. However, since 
General Sui said this, perhaps there is any misunderstanding, it may not be 
the same person. It is better to ask..." 


Who knows, Lancome suddenly said: "Not him." 


Thank you for your pity and turn around. Lancome repeated it again and 
said, "Not him." 


Lingwen indifferently said: "What. It is not." 


The teacher Wudu is also very polite: "Is it not?" 


The gods were disappointed in the round and they were even more excited. 
After all, it’s all year round in the peach color, it’s him, it’s not new. 
Instead of him, that is to say, it is very likely that another male priest who 
is present or not present, I am afraid to come out with a "up-and-coming 
star", how can I not be excited? 


Before in the ghost market, Lancome clearly indicated that it was 
awkward, but now it is vetoed. Thanks to the heart, but the face is not 
moving, said: "Well. Who is that?" 


Lan Lan decided to look at him and said: "You." 
Xie pity thought she didn't finish, said: "What happened to me?" 


Lan Lan said: "I said, that person, is you!" 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 100: Chaos is 
not appropriate for laughter 


Even Lancome said at this time that "the person who killed me is you" will 
not be more blue-eyed than the effect of this sentence. 


Thanks for being stunned by her on the spot, said: "I?!" 


Jun Wu’s hand on the top of the throne seems to have slipped. The gods 
and officials were silent for a moment, and immediately brushed their 
eyes and looked at him. Junwu’s hand was squared again, and continued to 
support the amount with this deep posture. The gods of the gods brushed 
again and looked at the pity. 


Are you finally coming, and the third time you are being watched! 


Xie pity only felt that the whole heartland was shaking, and the students 
swallowed the habit of "I don't lift" that was going to break through the 
teeth. 


This is just a casual excuse, not good at this time. Moreover, there is a 
private joke summary in the private court, about the attitude of the 
Valkyrie to the "woman": the wind letter sees the woman to stay away 
from it; Lang Qianqiu sees the woman blush; the sympathy refuses to see 
the ugly woman; There is no expression in the back of the woman who 
doesn't know what he is thinking; Quan Yi is really no woman in his mind; 
he is full of women. If he shouted out, it 1s estimated that he can be added 
later in this summary. Thank you very much, "Lan Lan girl, you calm 
down. There is no such thing." 


Lancome’s eyes were bigger than the bronze bells. “Yes. It’s you, Your 
Royal Highness Prince of the Kingdom!” 


Although the time when the woman died was later than the time when he 
was soaring, he was roughly able to match it, but did she have seen her 
before, could he still know? In the whispering around, Xie pity converges 
and looks solemnly: "Girl, although I am not a sage, but I know that I am 
single-minded. If I don't really love someone, I will not have any 
overstepping with this person. If there is Even if I sell the iron in the pot, I 
will not be willing to let this person suffer a little wrong. This is the 
Shenwu Temple, you have to open your mouth." 


Shi Qingxuan also said: "If you are doing this kind of thing, it is really the 
Prince Edward, how could he take the initiative to bring this female ghost 
sister up to confront the quality? How can this Lancome girl recognize 
him now? I think it is wrong. "" 


The obvious is not right. However, when there is a lot of fun, people don't 
care if you are not right, everyone has reservations. There is also a sacred 
official who guessed: "Will it be like this, will the Prince Edward have lost 
his memory, so I don't remember what I have done?" 


"To tell the truth, then I believe that he is so courageous that he has not 
known him for eight hundred years." 


Thanks for being speechless, reminding: "In order to prove that something 
incredible has made another incredible thing, 1s it a little dangerous for the 
thoughts of the princes?" 


The wind letter seemed to want to say something, but it was impossible to 
confirm the situation, and finally did not say it. Jun Wu coughed and said: 
"Xianle, how many gold belts did you have before?" 


Thanks for the forehead, said: "...that's too much. At least ten..." 


The feelings are faint: "More than forty. Each pattern is not the same 
color." 


When the words were exported, he felt uncomfortable and accepted the 
words, because someone immediately thought of the feelings of pity and 
pity, and he was very familiar with this detail. The gods and officials have 


more than forty belts, and the Prince’s Highness is not really exquisite. 
Not only others, but also pity, it is also very shameful. At that time, he 
changed his suit every day. The matching of the belts was also changed 
according to the clothes. It is like now, three sets of clothes are repeatedly 
changed and washed repeatedly throughout the year. These three sets of 
clothes are all the same, and I must think that he is poor enough to wear 
only one piece of clothing. Jun Wu said again: "Where do you still 
remember when you go there?" 


Both pity and morality are secretly glimpsed. 


Thank you for your pity, and said: "Cough, I don't remember much. After 
all, it was something more than 800 years ago. I didn't know where to go." 


Not only is there a loss of the three, but the main reason is that he and 
Feng Xin often take things when they are nervous. When I have too much, 
I really don't remember if I have a belt. Although Fengxin did not have the 
heart to discuss this topic, he still said: "If you can get this golden belt, it 
is not necessarily sent to people, and it may be embarrassing." 


Jun Wu does not seem to have any hope to thank and remember, said: 
"Xianle, I remember, your practice is to insist that you must keep the boy's 
body. Otherwise, the mana will fall." 


Thanks: "Yes." 


Shi Qingxuan said casually: "Hey, when I look at His Royal Highness, I 
think that he must have done this. It is true. If this is the case, let alone the 
children of life, he estimates that he has not pulled the hand." '"" 


Xie pity just wants to blurt out "Yes", and suddenly a pale and slender 
hand emerges in his mind. Under the shade of the red Xipa, it is as cold as 
jade, and the third finger is tied with a thin red line. This "yes", I was stuck 
in my throat and could not get out. Everyone in the hall can stare at him. 
At first glance, this card means "no"! 


However, "has not pulled the hand", this line is too low, even if it is pulled, 
nothing. Shi Qingxuan immediately changed his mind: "Even if you pull 


your hand, you will definitely not even kiss someone else." 


Xie pity also wants to say "yes", but this time, he suddenly rose up to a 
string of crystal beads like blisters, crystals scattered, and then, is a 
closed-eyed, handsome face, forehead A little beautiful tip above, it is 
very beautiful. 


This time, instead of squeezing out a word, the whole face was red. 


All the temple officials in the temple understood everything, and they 
coughed. Shi Qingxuan began to regret it. The fan tapped on his head and 
quietly prayed to him: "His Royal Highness, I am sorry. I just want to 
convince everyone that you are really pure-minded. I didn't expect you to 
be If you have had this kind of experience, you can't see it!" 


The phrase "I didn't expect you not" shattered the strength of thankfulness. 
He replied with difficulty: "Don't say it, that is, accident..." 


Jun Wu handed his fist into his mouth and coughed harder. He said, "That's 
good. You haven't banned these years." 


Xie Li finally breathed a sigh of relief and said: "Yes." 


Junwu said: "That would be easy. I have a sword here, called 'entitled', 
there is a strange method, the blood of the boy's blood flows over it, no 
traces, the more the wash is brighter. You take a drop of blood, drop I 
know it." 


Although Junwu’s hobby of collecting all kinds of strange and eccentric 
swords has been known for many years, the priests still secretly said in 
their hearts: “Why are you so many messy swords, and they are dry up...” 


Xie Li felt that this situation was really inexplicable. I just wanted to end 
it quickly. When Ling Wen took the sly "envy" sword, he immediately 
raised his hand and scratched it on the blade. Countless pairs of eyes are 
staring at this side, Shi Qingxuan clapped: "Okay. Solve the case!" 


The blood beads slipped past the blade, and there was no trace left. 
Ironclad is like a mountain, everyone has to be scattered, said: "Oh, it is." 
"Who is that?" It was a lack of interest, a little disappointed. 


Lingwen politely said: "This girl, trouble you honestly accounted for, 
which is the official officer? If the fetal spirit in your abdomen has been 
So uneasy, you have no mana, I am afraid that only the father who has 
blood connection with him can Moderately educated. I..." 


Who knows, the voice has not fallen, Lancome points to the spirit, and 
said: "You! That person is you!" 


Lingwen: "???2" 


Lingwen probably just came from the temple to participate in the 
assembly. At this time, it was a male phase. Suddenly, Lancome pointed 
out that the child’s father was inexplicably shocked. The gods were 
squirted. He said: "Jie Qing, if your official document is finished, go down 
and find a girl to give birth to your child, hahahahahahaha..." 


This is probably the so-called current newspaper. Ling Wen shook his head 
and refused the kindness of the teacher who had no need to send a red 
envelope to the "Yin Yin". He restored his look and said: "There is no 
approval, no time." 


It’s so troublesome, I’m suspicious of several people, and naturally no one 
will ever believe. The wind letter can't stand anymore, and he doesn't feel 
good. "I understand. This female ghost is crazy. Here, I am so mad and 
biting, and I am in trouble." 


Lancome smiled more and more like a crazy woman between individuals. 
If this continues, who knows if her next accusation will be her own, the 
gods have changed their tone and said: "Yes, who knows if the golden belt 
is stolen by her..." 


"It makes sense. I have more than one gold belt. I can't be sure if there are 
a few, and I can't think of it." 


Lancome did not hesitate, and he akimbo: "Why, now I want to clear it? 
It’s late! No way! It’s you, you, or you!" 


This posture, the courage to take root is to look at it without looking at it, 
and even standing in the corner, squatting in the gang, I don’t know what 
is being chewed, and my face is indifferent and focused, and Mingyi is 
forcibly recognized. At one time, the chickens flew and jumped, and they 
fled: "Pull down, pull down!" "Don't let her talk nonsense!" "This sister, I 
like the girl is not like you, don't rely on me!" "I really don't become a 
system." !" 


Junwu waved his hand and a small priest came in and put Lancome down. 
She was dragged out of the Temple of the Gods, and she was still laughing 
and screaming all the way. The gods in the temple stood back in their 
hearts and had a headache. Originally, everyone thought about things, not 
just about themselves. Just watching the fun is good, but now I don’t know 
if I will be cold or not. I will buckle up with a slap in the face. Maybe I 
will be inexplicably add a colorful makeup lover when I am in my new 
drama next time. And killing countless ghosts and babies, and feeling the 
crisis, they all fell: "This is not a matter of investigation!" 


"I think she is purely mentally ill. Don't check it, waste time, and directly 
shut down." 


"It is also very likely that the ghosts are deliberately sent to stir up the 
water." 


Xie pity did not agree, said: "On the way, the Lancome girl is clearly 
awake very well. How can it be like this when it comes to the Shenwu 
Hall? I am afraid that it is not a "mad" to explain. ” 


Therefore, once again divided into two factions, some controversy, the 
conclusion is still "watch again, look again." After the discussion was 
over, the same teacher Qingxuan said goodbye, verbally agreed to play for 
a few days, thank you for going out of the Shenwu Hall, and sighed in his 
heart: "All said that the spirit hall is inefficient, this is no way. Every time 
What is the matter of negotiating, and there are countless miscellaneous 
lesbians. The final result is mostly moderate, and how can the Lingwen 
Temple be resolute?" 


At this time, he felt that there was a person behind him who came up and 
looked back. It was a wind letter, a slight glimpse. The greetings have not 
been played yet, and the wind letter whispered quickly and said: "Be 
careful." 


Thankfulness also lowered the voice, saying: "Muscle?" 


Wind channel: "When he entered the temple, the female ghost looked 
different, as if he was a little afraid of him. I don't listen to other people's 
personal affairs, in short, you are prepared for it." Then he hurried away. 
Xie pity stood in the same place, waiting for him to go far, and this slowly 
took a step. 


Although it is not easy to detect on the surface, but the pity has always 
been secretly aware of the subtle look of each of the priests and Lancome's 
reaction, and naturally did not miss the feelings. 


However, he believes that the father of this fetus is unlikely to be a 
passion. Xie pity can't imagine that the love will do this kind of thing. In 
fact, the person who loves this heart is all focused on the martial arts to 
expand the believers to fight on the ground, and he is the same as he is 
repairing. . However, it is true that you are acquainted with Lancome. 
There were too few clues, shaking his head and thanking the heavens. 


Although the fetal spirit has been surrendered, Lang Ying and Gu Zi were 
placed in rich merchants, there is food and drink, nothing to worry about, 
but he has not been away for a long time. For a long time, the rich 
merchants did not see the shadows of others. Most of them were guilty. So, 
thank you for going to the town of Bodhisattva. When the rich 


businessman saw him, he held his hands tightly and excitedly said: "Dao 
Chang! Gao Ren, Gao Ren! You slept in my lady's room last night, our 
doors are locked, open in the morning, no Believe, disappear from the air! 
High, it is too high! How? Does the monster catch it?" 


Thanks for your pity: "Catch it, please rest assured, it's okay. How about 
the two children I brought?" 


Rich merchants such as Meng Dawei, Daxi said: "It’s very good, it’s very 
good! You don’t eat much! What is your view of the thousand lights? I 
want to donate, I hope! From today, I want to see you. Nobody's disciples, 
don't rob me!" 


Thank you for your regret. But how to say it is also the development of 
believers, and it is still a very rich believer, very gratified, to the rich and 
sacred gods, to teach him, to warn him that he will not be more attractive 
in the future, to be single-minded, to love his wife and family In the end, 
let him go to the Bodhisattva to visit, and then he left with Lang Fire and 
Millet. 


The three returned to the village of Bodhisattva. Before the view of 
Bodhisattva, Xie pity put the brand that asked for donation in a dangerous 
place to a more conspicuous place, secretly hope that when the rich 
businessman came, he could see it at a glance and push the door in. Who 
knows, when I push the door, I feel that there is something different in the 
house. 


Walking into the view, sure enough, it 1s very different. The grounds of the 
house were swept, and the tables and chairs were also wiped. The dust was 
also taken away, and the pickled waste in the corner was also cleaned up. 
It’s just like being stalked by the snail girl, it’s too clean. 


Because even the grace is gone! 


As soon as he disappeared, the whole room seemed to be spacious and 
bright, and it seemed that even the air was fresh. In the arms of the millet, 
he held the patties that he brought back from the town. He did not see 
anyone at the probe. He said, "Big brother, what am I?" 


Thanks for turning immediately. Before I left the door, I felt a dangerous 


cold light hit, and the backhand was a sword. The sound of‘ ’, the cold 
light was hit by a high, and fell outside the dozens of feet. 


He is like a sword, and his sword 1s like electricity. The heart is instantly 
returned to his position. He breathes a sigh of relief and immediately feels 
wonder: How can there be no trick after a cold light? 


Look at the cold light, after he hits the fly, cutting it | on the far side. 
Looking at the curved silver light from afar, thanking the more and more 
familiar, with two children walking over, a look, quickly squatted down 
and said: "This ... this is not an anger? How do you Already?" 


It’s a very strange picture to ask you what to do with a knife. The few 
farmers who passed by also looked at the elbows with a strange look. 
"Look, look at this person, he is talking to a knife..." "See, don't worry 
about going fast... "However, thank you have to ask this, because the 
whole body of the sorcerer, and the eyes of the silver line on the shank are 
trembled, as if they are terminally ill, the more they shake." Xie pity can 
not help but reach out and said: "I just hurt you now?" 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 101: Conflict 


The scimitar was shaking more and more. Thanks a little bit of trouble, 
gently stroking down the back of his knife, said: "I'm sorry, sorry, I just 
didn't see you, I won't." 


After a few moments, the embarrassment squinted and the tremor finally 
stopped. Thanks again, "What about your master?" 


Suddenly, there was a voice coming from behind: "Don't ignore it." 


Xie pity looked back and suddenly stood up and was shocked and happy, 
saying: "Sanlang? How come you?" 


The young man who came after him, is the flower city. He turned the black 
hair into a pony tail, the upper body was white, the red shirt was tied 
around the waist, the cuffs rolled up, showing the pale but strong arms, 


and the tattoos on the arms, walking, the silver chain on the boots _ It’s 
very clear, very casual, like the neighboring family of twenty-nine 
youngsters, but it is also very chic. He bit the root of the small weeds and 
smiled at Xie: "Brother." 


After thanking the original plan to settle down two children, I went to find 
Huacheng and thanked him seriously. Who knows that he actually came by 
himself. Huacheng came to him without hesitation. He pulled out the 
silver scimitar inserted in the ground with one hand and looked at it. He 
put the scimitar on his shoulder and said: "Brother is busy here, don't 
bother you. I went for a special trip, so I came by myself. You have 
forgotten this." 


He actually carried a bucket on his back and took it down to give thanks. 
This is the thank-you for forgetting the rich merchants. He sighed and 
said: "I forgot it, it is really work." 


After that, I suddenly thought that after something happened last night, he 
said to Huacheng, "I am looking for a fight, my fight 1s gone." It is a 


nonsense that is said in a confused way, but Huacheng actually helps him 
to fight. I found it, and suddenly I was embarrassed, so I was afraid that 
Huacheng would take this to make a joke. Fortunately, Huacheng did not 
mention it. He smiled and shifted the topic. He said, "Is my brother 
married two children?" He said that he smashed the head of the glutinous 
rice, and the hair of the people was messy. The millet seemed to be afraid 
of him. Go straight to Xie Pity and hide. Thanks to pity: "It's okay, this 
brother is a good person." 


Huacheng said: "Where is it. | am very bad." The mouth said so, but turned 
his hand, and turned a small silver butterfly in his sleeve, fluttering his 
wings and flying to the front of the millet. The dark eyes of the millet 
were widened, and he stared at the little silver butterfly for a moment, and 
finally could not help but reach out and grab it. 


As a result, his vigilance against Huacheng was greatly reduced. 
Subsequently, the flower city looked like a careless sweep of Lang Ying. 
Unlike the natural look when he swept through the millet, when he saw 
Lang Ying, his eyes were cold and not very kind. Lang Firefly lowered his 
head and also shivered uncomfortably. 


Xie pity took the fight in his hand and said: "When you come, what are 
you going to do to sweep the Bodhisattva?" 


Huacheng Road: "Just clean the house, don't you feel refreshed after 
cleaning up the waste?" 


'..."" Thanks for the sadness of the missing, I thought that the flower city 
would not have lost him as garbage. At this time, after listening to the 
view of the Bodhisattva, there was a scream: "The **** will go to the pot 
and kill the thousands of knives in the dog flower city! Killing people, 
Huacheng killing people!!!" 


Guzi shouted: "Hey!" ran with two small short legs. Xie pity also quickly 
followed. There is a small stream behind the view of Bodhisattva. On 
weekdays, thank you for the laundry and rice. They are here. At this time, 
the grace is also soaked in the water, and the body is still tightly bound 


with Ruo, trying to make the face out of the water and struggling. "I don't 
go out, I won't go out! I will be in this body until I die! I won't give in!" 


Huacheng spit out the wild grass and said: "When are you a heroic fighter? 
Waste." 


Thankfulness and helplessness: "...this is what I caught on a mountain a 
few days ago. He attached to someone else and he refused to come out. 
This person is still dead, forcibly stripping the soul, not destroying the 
flesh. Really... what can Sanlang do?" 


Huacheng Road: "Well? Are you asking me how to make him die, some 
are." 


This is a threat, and Grace said: "You two! It's a broken pot with a rotten 
cover! Snake heart! Hehe..." He sank into the stream without saying it. 
Although thanking him, he remembered the body of the mother who was 
turned into ashes. His heart was sorrowful, but the body was someone 
else's. He must be kept, and he was lifted from the stream and placed at 
the entrance of the Bodhisattva. I didn’t eat anything all day and night, I 
was so hungry that I was so hungry, and I was ruined by the flower city. I 
was so weak that the millet gave him the patties that I sneaked back from 
the rich merchants. He was so devastated that it was awful. Poor. Xie pity 
shook his head and found that his limbs were stiff. It was not because of 
the bundling of the evil spirits. It was probably what the magical technique 
of Huacheng had, and he fixed his body shape, so he said: "If evil, come 
back." 


If the evil has been tied for a few days, it has already been wronged, and it 
will come down with a sneak peek. Like a white snake, the whole person is 
entangled in a circle. Thanks for opening the door, while calming it, while 
dissolving it from himself, said: "Okay, okay. I will bathe you later, don't 
be sad. Let's go play next." 


If the evil is not eager to swim to the side. Huacheng also squandered his 
life, and he made his own personal posture and fell to stand. If the evil 
side of the wall suddenly found it, leaning against a silvery curved 
machete, carefully approached. The eye on the knives of the sorcerer also 


turned to the side and looked at it. The heart is still motionless and there is 
no indication. 


Thanks to the study of cooking during this period of time, I have a lot of 
experience. When confidence is multiplied, I want to show my talents and 
treat Huacheng well. So I will keep him down for dinner, and Huacheng 
will naturally answer. When I came back from the town, she bought a lot 
of vegetables, and the next brain was piled on the table. She took a kitchen 
knife and smashed it. This can be used as a desk or as a kitchen counter. It 
can be used as a tableware. It can be said that it is a table. Huacheng 
leaned on one side of the wall and looked at it for a while. Finally, he still 
couldn’t stand it. He said, “Would you like to help?” 


Thanks to the enthusiasm, he said: "No. If you help me, you can do it." He 
said, he lost a few bundles of fine wood. "Oh!", as the Cobra King raided 
in general, the white scorpion was pumped on the firewood, and the thick 
wooden section of the calf was smashed into a thin piece of firewood. 


If the evil dew reveals this hand, it will be in an unusually exaggerated 
shape in front of the errand and the heart, as if to show his power and 
beauty. Still not beautiful for a while, thank you and put a plate on the 
ground, and then lost a cabbage. If the evil is about to meet, the errands 
suddenly look at them, flew up and danced in the air with dazzling silver. 
On the day of the day, when it landed, the cabbage was cut into a piece of 
broken and broken. Xie pity picked up the plate and looked at it, boasting: 
"It's really amazing, you cut better than if you are evil." 


If the evil is attached to the wall, it seems that one person has stepped 
back a few steps and retreated to the wall. There is no way to retreat. The 
embarrassment turned his eyes in a frantic manner, as if he was in a state 
of mind, as if he had been swaying. In a knife and a knife, the heart is not 
moving. Xie Li did not pay attention to the small fighting between the 
magic weapons. While turning seven or eight different side dishes into the 
pot at the same time, he turned and asked: "Yes, how long will you go to 
Saburo?" 


Huacheng looked at his movements all the time. It seemed to remind him 
of what he wanted to do, but he still accepted the words and smiled. "Look 


at the situation. There is nothing to do there, just play for a few more days. 
If I am here, my brother will want to It’s a good thing to dislike." 


Thank you for your help: "How come? You don't want to abandon me. The 
place is small." The miscellaneous Lala pulls and pulls the female ghost to 
the Shenwu Temple, and he also said something, but naturally hidden. 
Going to the accusation and envy of blood. But I also thought that Junwu 
said that Huacheng had an eyeliner in the heavens. I wonder if he would 
already know it? Fortunately, no matter whether Huacheng knows or not, 
he has not shown that he knows it, but he is thoughtful. Thanks to the pity: 
"Sanlang, who do you think the father of this fetus will be?" 


Huacheng looked up and smiled a little. "It's hard to say. Maybe, the gold 
belt is really just what she is coming from." 


This vague answer, unlike the style of Huacheng, is a bit strange, but soon, 
the pot that has been tumbling has taken his attention. 


After the two musk, the pot was opened. 


It’s all the food that the villagers have given to the praying in the past. 
Although it’s just some pickles, cakes, eggs, sour and wild fruits, it’s good 
for people to eat. As soon as the pot was uncovered, the smell drifted out 
of the Bodhisattva. He shouted at the door and shouted: "Thank you for the 
murder! The snow lotus of the black heart! You might as well give me a 
knife! I will fish me off." It turned out that I was tortured by this! I can see 
you clearly!!!" 


Before the pot was opened, thankfulness was originally confident. After 
uncovering the lid, he again doubted himself. I tried my best to make such 
a pot of things. Huacheng still stood by and watched it. I don’t know what 
to do. Is it really necessary to spend this kind of thing in the city? ? ? It’s 
even more troublesome to hear the ghosts and ghosts. Wenshenghuacheng 
is going to go out with his arms, thanking him for raising his hand and 
stopping him, saying: "Forget it." 


He sighed and took a bowl of food from the pot. He said to Huacheng: 
"Don't eat this pot. Wait for me for a while." Go out and call Guzi and 


Langying to fetch water, transfer off the scene, and then carry it. The bowl 
of things smashed down and said with a cheerful color: "Cousin, it is time 
to eat." 


Grace is frightened and said: "What are you doing. What are you doing? 
What do you want?! Thank you for warning me, I am a human life now, 
you think about it! Who can eat this thing, whoever is overtaken by the 

three realms , jumped out of six reincarnations, nothing..." 


When the voice did not fall, he saw the flower city in the house standing 
on the side of the pot. He took a spoon and took a bowl. He sat for the 
table and took a bite. He did not change his color. He was as stable as 
Taishan. A never-ending thought flashed through my mind - 


It’s a must! 


Thanks for putting the bowl on his face and calmly saying: "I don't want to 
eat, you can come out." 


That is even more impossible. Grace gritted his teeth, however, with a pity, 
he opened his jaw and poured it in. 


The next moment, the screams rang through the village of Bodhisattva. 


The bowl in the hands of Xie’s pity was empty, and the sadness on the 
ground was already squinting, and even the voice was hoarse like an old 
man with a smoldering age. He said: “...I...hate...” 


Thanks for seeing a bowl and stuffing him in. He refused to come out. I 
don’t know if my mood is happy or sad. Although he is eager to force out 
the grace, but since it did not succeed, it seems to be confirmed side by 
side. What he made with his heart is not so difficult to swallow, as if it is a 
matter of happiness. When I looked back, I saw a bowl in the flower city, 
and slowly ate it. While watching this, the bowl was empty, and my eyes 
lit up. I stood up and said, "Sanlang, have you finished eating?" 


He didn't think he was doing it well. He was too embarrassed to eat it in 
the flower city. Who knows that Huacheng has eaten it himself. Huacheng 


smiled and said: "Yes." 
"..." Xie pity carefully, "How do you like the taste?" 


Huacheng also drank the soup, and smiled: "Not bad. It is thicker, and it 
can be lighter next time." 


Thanks a sigh of relief, nodded and said: "Well, I remember. Thank you for 
your opinion." 


Grace: "vomiting vomiting vomiting vomiting vomiting vomiting -!!!" 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 102: Sage 
Prince welcomes no speed 


Thanks to the original attempt to show his strength, this night, confidence 
has experienced a lot of twists and turns. 


Huacheng has been proposed, it is better to let him cook, but thank you for 
the good intentions to let him help himself repair the door, help them 
clean the house, and then help themselves cook? How can we ask the 
guests to do this, and what is it like this? 


Fortunately, the inventory he brought back from the town was quite a lot. 
Although he gave more than half of the pray to the pot last night, there 
were still some taro cakes, vegetables and fruits, and he would get it. But 
what should I do after I finish? 


On the second day, the problem was not broken. Early in the morning, the 
door of Bodhisattva was knocked open by a group of village girls, and sent 
a few pots of porridge and a grilled chicken. The women in the village are 
all shy and sly, who is coming to it, obviously. Thankful, I can't help but 
secretly sigh: Look good, really can eat. 


The roast chicken was eaten separately for the two children. Xie pity only 
drank a little porridge, and Huacheng did not move anything. He said: 
"Brother is really popular here." 


Xie pity smiled: "Sarlang don't make fun of me. Everyone knows that the 
meaning of drunkenness is not alcohol." 


After the bowl went down, Grace struggled for a whole night, and I 
couldn’t stop it. I would rather give it to Lang Qianqiu and give him a 
thousand knives. It’s better to be poisoned by you! What kind of cousin I 
am wrong, I beg you to give me antidote! And it seems to have seen many 
hallucinations, and the millet is scared. When I got up early in the 
morning, my face was languid, and my face was already blue. Now I 
snorted and snorted and sipped the porridge in the bowl that the millet 


held. I finally sighed and sighed and said: "Fat! What is popular? Who is 
rushing to him? It’s so cold and sour! Also, don’t be proud of the dog 
flower city, you can also attract the village aunts in this mountain, not all 
of you are so rich, they are Baba landed up! If you dress like a beggar, I 
don't believe they can still see you!" 


Thanks to pity, this is not the right thing, it is that Huacheng is dressed like 
a beggar, thank you for believing, he can ask for a golden mountain by 
begging. But I didn't talk, I just lived slowly and slowly. After a while, a 
scent floated out, and the grace was again: "What are you doing again! 
What is this!" 


Thank you for your kindness: "The pot is a good match for a hundred 
years. I am heating it." 


When Huacheng heard it, he immediately clap his hands and said: "Good 
name, good name." 


Graceful said: "This stuff, your mother gave me a name?!?! Stop!" 


I don’t really feed him, but when I get hot, I evoke the horrible memory of 
Grace and dare not speak again. After eating this meal, Lang Ying silently 
collected the dishes, it seems to be taken to wash, thank you: "No, you go 
to play next to me, I will come." 


Maybe he can't cook, he can still wash the dishes. Huacheng looked at 
Lang Ying and went out to play with the millet. He said, "I will come." 


Thanks for the resignation: "You don't have to, sit down." 


The voice did not fall. At this time, I heard the screams of screaming and 
snoring, and the oil and gas in the oil: "Hey, little girl, staring at what the 
uncle is doing? Is it moving spring| Heart?" 


The ghost said that he couldn't look down on the country villagers in this 
mountain. He turned back and smashed it. Xie pity shook his head, 
thinking that he would drag him in, lest he should be outside to scare 


people. Who knows, before I opened the door, there was a burst of 
exclamation from the villagers: "The peerless beauty!" 


"How can such a beautiful girl come to our village..." 


"I haven't seen such a girl in Peugeot in my life, and I have come two 
times!" 


Then, there was a loud knock on the door, which was actually knocking on 
the door of Bodhisattva. Thank you for your heartfelt feelings: "There are 
two peerless beauty? There are two? How can two beautiful women come 
knocking on my door? Ah, is it that the rich businessman with his new 
wife is still willing?" I thought of this possibility, and quickly took it. The 
sign of "the view of the dangerous house to donate" is ready to go out. At 
this time, I heard another girl coldly said: "What is this door, really hot 
eyes." 


Then, the voice of another girl wondered: "Is it to raise the door? No. 
Don't pick such a low-spirited beast?" 


Although these two are female voices, thank you for listening to them. 
Feng Shi Qing Xuan and geoscientists! 


He wanted to push the door out immediately. However, he turned back and 
saw the flower city behind him slowly tidying up the tableware. He 
stopped the movement and carefully looked out from the door. 


I saw two long-haired girls standing outside the door. One is a white- 
crowned female crown with a red lips and white teeth. The body is 
graceful, with a dusty, double-eyed look; one is a black girl with a fair 
complexion and a fair complexion, and her face is very poor, with a 
narrow hand and looking away. The white women's crown is full of smiles, 
and they are everywhere, saying: "Haha, thank you, thank you, don't 
exaggerate, don't be too high-profile. You are so troubled. You can do it, 
thank you. Haha." 


Thanks: "..." 


Around the black pressure, a large group of villagers who watched the 
beauty, and the perfect woman began to point at the grace. Grace is not 
happy, yelling: "Look what! I like how to lie on the ground! Get out! There 
is a fart look good!" The villagers stunned this person, his face was fierce 
and blue, scared and swallowed. It is. Shi Qingxuan said to him: "This is a 
green son. Is your Royal Highness now in the view?" 


Upon hearing this person, thanking him as "Prince Edward", he was so 
happy that he lost interest in the two beautiful women in front of him. He 
said: "I am! It is the dog officer in heaven! I am not the dog who gave him 
the door." Listen, OK, I am..." The voice didn't fall, I saw that Mingyi had 
come over, and then it was a scream, a ping pong. From the position of 
thanking the pity, I can't see what the Mingyi has done. I can only see the 
teacher Qingxuan's dust, saying: "Ming brother, this is not very good!" 


Mingyi said indifferently: "I am afraid of anything. He said that it is not a 
domestic animal." 


" " 


In order to avoid the death of the sadness, Xie pity had to open the door, 
raising his hand to stop the road: "Adult! Be merciful! Can not fight, this 
iS a personal!" 


Seeing that Xie pity opened the door, Mingyi smashed the black hem and 
removed the boots from the back of the grace. Shi Qingxuan came up and 
said: "His Royal Highness, I am coming a few days earlier. How 1s this 
person going? Can't hide in a ghostly possession, when are we blind? Hey, 
go in and say it. This time I have The important thing is to ask for your 
help..." Saying that you are going to go around the door to the grace. 
Huacheng can still be in the house, thank you for letting them put them in, 
and busy: "Wait!" 


However, it is already late. The Bodhisattva view was so slap in the face 
that there was no hiding place at all. The two of them immediately saw the 
imperial ghost king who was standing behind the blessing and washing the 
dishes. Eight eyes collided, and the smashing of the flowers, the flower 
city grinned, showing a little white teeth, smiling, but no smile in the eyes. 


In a flash, Mingyi’s pupils suddenly shrank and fell back three feet. Shi 
Qingxuan took out the windshield fan and opened the posture. He was very 
vigilant: “Blood rain and flower!” 


The gray-faced face of the door was furious and said: "I still have a blue 
light night tour! How can you not recognize me when you hit me for a long 
time? When you see him, you know him?!" 


Mingyi once mixed into the ghost market, and spent several years under 
the Huacheng. It was only recently that the horse’s foot was caught by the 
flower city. It was beaten in the labyrinth dungeon. At the moment, the 
enemy met, and the eyes were red and small. Both inside and outside are 
poisonous | Huacheng wiped a rag in his hand and blinked: "The landlord 
is quite alive and kicking." 


Mingyi also said coldly: "Ghost King is also as leisurely as ever." 


After pretending to say hello, the next sentence, Huacheng's tone and look 
are cold. 


He warned: "Leave. I don't care what you have to do, don't come close 
here." 


Although it is very taboo against Huacheng, but the momentum is not 
willing to retreat to show weakness, Mingyi sighed and replied: "Come 
here, not my intention!" 


Seeing the poison | the taste of the medicine has to become a fire | the 
smell of medicine, thank you for the side: "This is this, the wind master, 
how can this be good?" 


Shi Qingxuan fan knocked on his forehead and said: "I didn't expect the 
blood rain to be just right here. You didn't see it before. How come so 
fast?" Anyway, no need to It is best not to use force by force, and violence 
is not good. If you fight, let's stop it." 


Thanks to pity: "I generally agree." Grace can look forward to the two 
people playing, and has been listening to the ears, suddenly said: "Oh - you 


are the windshield that woman?? ?" 


Both Xie and Shi Qingxuan turned to look at him. Grace in his own cave is 
such a singer, and he dares to be so embarrassed in front of his face. I 
don’t know if it’s courage or lack of mind. Shi Qingxuan has always been 
pampered, and it is estimated that he was the first to hear someone use this 
word to slap him. He blinked and looked inexplicable. He said to him: 
"His Royal Highness, wait a moment." 


After that, I went out and watched the door. Just listening to the outside of 
the door again, a scream, a ping-pong, must-have, Shi Qingxuan, then 
opened the door, has changed the male phase, said: "Well. Just said where? 
I am also hungry, I don't think it's better to sit down and have something to 
eat. What's the matter? There is nothing that can't be solved at the dinner 
table." 


Although, thankful, I hope that they will fight in the Bodhisattva view, but 
Huacheng seems to be extremely angry with Mingyi undercover. I don't 
know what ts inside, let them sit down and eat with anger, it seems 
unlikely. However, Huacheng did not express objection. For a while, the 
face was gradually cooled and continued to wash the dishes. After 
washing, I walked to the side of the pot and held a bowl of good fortune. 


Seeing that he took the initiative to withdraw troops, a war was seized in 
time, and several people were relieved. The next step is to immediately 
turn the topic and activate the atmosphere. So, Shi Qingxuan said: "His 
Royal Highness, what is in the pot? It seems to be hot." 


Thanks to the pity: "Oh, that's what I did." 


The pot has been cooked for so long, it has already been tasted, and the 
smell has been dispersed a lot. Although the color is incredible, the shape 
is gone, it looks much better than last night. Shi Qingxuan listened and 
was very excited: "Is it? I have never eaten what the gods have done by 
hand! Come and let us taste." 


He said, he also took two bowls of chopsticks and held two bowls. To be 
honest, thank you for wanting to stop. However, because of the repeated 
affirmation of Huacheng, he buried the seeds of confidence, and when he 
reheated this morning, he made a match according to the opinions of 
Huacheng last night, which produced a kind of "maybe I saved it back." 
The thought, hesitated for a moment, still did not say anything, secretly 
looking forward to Shi Qingxuan to hand one of the bowls to Mingyi, said: 
"Come, Ming brother, your share." 


Mingyi glanced in the bowl and reluctantly removed his face. 


This is a bit rude. Shi Qingxuan was furious and handed it up. He didn't 
hesitate to say: "Come to eat! Didn't you say that you are hungry on the 
road?" 


Flower City picked up a spoonful of sorrows there, blew it, sent it to the 
mouth, swallowed it, and smiled at Xie: "Today's really faded, the taste is 
just right." 


Xie pity also laughed: "Is it? I added more water today." 
Huacheng took another sip and smiled and said: "Brother has a heart." 


Looking at the appearance of the flower city, it is convincing to say that he 
is tasting something delicious. For a long while, Mingyi still took the 
bowl. Shi Qingxuan smiled and said: "This is right!" The two took a spoon 
at the same time and sent them into their mouths. 2k novel reading 
network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 103: The 
vernacular fairy banquet is crying 


Thank you, "How?" 


Mingyi’s “squeaky” voice, face down, fell on the stage, seems to have lost 
consciousness. 


On the other side, Shi Qingxuan was silent, and shed two lines of tears. 


Xie pity hesitated: "Two adults, in the end, can you cheer up and comment 
on words?" 


Shi Qingxuan returned to God, wiped a tear, grabbed his hand, and gripped 
it with force, confused and authentic: "...His Royal Highness." 


Thanks for holding his hand back and said: "What?" 


Shi Qingxuan has a big tongue, can't speak, half awkward, tears down to 
push the instrument, said: "Ming brother... Ming brother! Ming brother, 
what are you doing, cheer up, you wake up!" 


Ming Yi was still motionless on the table. Shi Qingxuan has always been 
unable to bear the reaction of others not to give himself up, and the more 
he pushed, the more he finally stopped holding the other side. Thanks for 
the pity, I couldn’t help but reminded me: "If you are a wind master, you 
should put down the broom first, and have something to say." 


Shi Qing Xuan squatted on the broom and turned back to the loud voice: 
"Ah? What did you say to your Highness Prince? I can't hear it!" 


Reluctantly, he shouted at his ear: "The wind master! You are not a master 
in the hands of the land master, the land master is here, here!" 


At this time, Mingyi suddenly sat up. He actually recovered the male 
phase in an instant, his face was blue, and his face was a sentence: "I have 
a devil. Help me to get rid of it." 


A spoonful of cockroaches can actually eat the devil, thank you for being 
shocked, and said: "...no..." 


Shi Qingxuan pointed to Mingyi, and his eyes narrowed and said: "Slow, 
you! What kind of enchanting do you dare to play in front of the wind 
teacher? Ming brother, let me cover you, let us take him together first. 
"When I grabbed the broom with one hand, I took out the fan of the wind 
in one hand." The fan went down, and the entire roof must have flown 
right away. Xie pity quickly went up to hug him and said: "Do not make it 
impossible. You two adults, you are all awake!" 


"Ha ha ha ha ha..." 


Grace shouted and laughed outside the door, shouting: "Live it! Dog 
officer! Ascend to heaven! Happy! Detox!" 


The two gods in the house are squatting, and there are more than one. 
Huacheng hugged his arm against the wall, thanked him for seeing him, 
and then looked at the wind and the division, who was curled up on the 
ground, whispered: "Is it water or less? How can it react? Still big?" 


Huacheng raised his eyebrows: "I feel very good. It is a question of their 
taste. There are often things." 


Xie Pity has never thought about what it is to eat on weekdays, what the 
priests eat on weekdays. In contrast, the gaps and stimuli felt by the priests 
are greater, and the response is naturally more intense. Of course, he didn't 
even think about it. After the pot had passed the hand of Huacheng, there 
was nothing more. 


Under depression and guilt, he gave Shi Qingxuan and Ming Yi a full 

seven or eight bowls of water, and the two priests only woke up. Although 
it is still graceful, the face is blue and the eyes are straight, but the mind is 
clear and the teeth are clear. The only minor problem is that Shi Qingxuan 


still can't stop tears. When he talks, he bites his tongue from time to time, 
but it doesn't matter. 


After a time, the four people finally sat down neatly around the table. 


Mingyi still squats on the table with his face down, motionless, like a dead 
body. Thanks to the righteousness: "The wind master, you only said that 
there are important things to ask me for help, what is it?" 


The face-changing teacher Qing Xuan lost a sound-insulating spell on the 
door to ensure that the outside person could not hear it. He was dumb and 
said: "...this is the case. Keke, cough and cough. Your Royal Highness is 
hidden in the city. I have practiced for eight hundred years in the world. I 
have seen a lot more. Should I have met a lot of demons and ghosts?" 


Thanks for holding his hands, said: "I have encountered some." 


Shi Qingxuan: "I want to ask, do you... Have you ever met the ‘white 
vernacular immortal?’” 


Thanks for your pity, said: "The wedding banquet is crying, the vernacular 
immortal?" 


Shi Qingxuan lowered his voice and said: "Exactly!" 


Suddenly, thankful and pity felt a horrible sigh, and a sigh of cold air slid 
up the back. 


At the same time, it seems that someone ts in his ear, whispering softly, 
while holding a very strange little tune. 


The little Bodhisattva, which had leaked into the sun from the window and 
the hole, was warm and bright. I don’t know when it was dimmed, as if it 
was shrouded in a huge shadow. And the limbs of thankfulness are getting 
colder and colder, like cold. 


Thanks for the pity, I felt that 1t was necessary to say it straight away. "I 
want to ask... who is laughing? Who is singing? Who is blowing air in my 
back? Who made the house so dark?" ” 


Shi Qingxuan wiped his tears and said: "Oh, it's all me. It's a little spell 
that I applied, don't care, just to have a more atmosphere." 


For the other three people on the Taiwan side are speechless. Half a sigh, 
thank you for help, but helplessly: "...the wind master, or else, this cold 
wind or not blow it, this weather, everyone is not wearing much. And in 
fact, the atmosphere is good, you manually Adding cold air, with music... 
but it’s all gone." 


Shi Qingxuan: "Ah? Is that true?" So he waved his hand and removed the 
cold wind that slumbered behind the four people. "But the room 1s still so 
dark, I have a candle, I feel more." I really took out a candle and clicked 
on it. The faint fire illuminates two white faces and two white faces with 
green eyes. It is very atmospheric and very sensational. I am afraid that 
the look outside the house will scare the ghosts. 


The rest of the three did not want to say anything, and Huacheng continued 
to lean back, and Mingyi remained quite dead. Thank you for your pity, 
and said, "Go ahead...what have you said? The vernacular immortal. You 
said it was a bad idea, and when you talk about the vernacular immortals, I 
haven’t reacted yet." 


Shi Qingxuan was shocked: "You are so courageous under Prince Edward, 
it is not so good!" 


The vernacular immortal, although known as the "Imperial Man", but 
everyone called it "Imperial Man", but it means meaning, leaving a face, 
afraid of being ugly, and if it is known by it, it will come to you to look 
good. In fact, everyone can't wait to lick it, and the more difficult it is, the 
harder it is to listen. Because it is really abominable. 


Yes, the usual demon ghosts, at most terrible, but it is "detestable." 
Because, it is most like to suddenly pop up a cold water when a person is 
happy. Imagine that there is a couple who are married, there is such a thing 
appearing at the wedding banquet, drinking the wine of others, suddenly 
said: "If you don't take long, you will be separated!" Or, whoever is raised, 
it suddenly Come out, in the congratulations of everyone, "You can't go to 
prison in a few years!" 


If it is wrapped around a person, it will follow the pattern, tightly bound, 
and constantly send a completely opposite curse when the happy event 
comes. It can be imagined how bad it is. Especially those who are very 
afraid of bad signs, when they encounter this thing, they are dead. No one 
wants to be entangled in such things, but if they meet, they can only admit 
that they are unlucky, because no one has figured out how it is picking 
people. 


It seems that Qing Xuan is very jealous of this thing, but she does not care 
about it, saying: "Nothing. There is nothing to be afraid of this thing." 


To be precise, this thing is afraid of him. Shi Qingxuan came to the spirit 
and said: "It seems that you have met the Royal Highness Prince? Is it 
possible that this kind of thing can be completely obliterated?" 


Indulge in a moment, thanked the pity: "I did encounter two years ago 
many years ago, and then they have not appeared again, I do not know 
whether it is completely obliterated, but in my experience, it is not too 
difficult to deal with. ” 


Shi Qingxuan said with great joy: "Two? Both have been dealt with by 
you?! Then I am really looking for the right person! What is the 
situation?" 


Thanks to pity, the first is just like this: Many years ago, Xie pity passed a 
small town, and a wealthy businessman sent his daughter to the Imperial 
City to study. Because he felt that his daughter was arrogant, he made a big 
fanfare and made a big splash. Who knows, music is very sad, and on the 
banquet, suddenly there is a voice saying: "Your daughter will roll over on 
the road and fall to the cliff!" 


The rich businessman violently thundered on the spot, and he had to hold 
on to the person who spoke, but when the man finished speaking, he 
sneaked under the table, and he disappeared out of nowhere. 


Everyone is scared now. Just, thank you for the day when the house was 
smashed and smashed, and left some leftovers. I was about to take it back. 
I heard about it and knew what was being recruited. I said that I don’t have 
to worry about the rich businessman. He asked the rich businessman to 
hire more than 20 guards, plus himself, all the way to the lady safely sent 
to the imperial city, waiting for the lady to wait for a while. A month later, 
the lady got the first place in a performance match and the opportunity 
came. 


That night, everyone was banqueting for a lady at a restaurant in the 
Imperial City. Sure enough, another voice said in the crowd: "You will 
be..." 


Upon hearing this, Shimi immediately seized the thing hidden in the 
crowd, licking its throat and not letting it say the sentence. Immediately 
locked with its body shape, a beat, and then asked someone to get a 
carriage, carrying it on the cliff, rushing to a corner, cut the reins, let the 
car fall to the cliff, It should have its own curse to others. 


The other three said: "That's it?" 


Thanks to pity: "That's it. Deal with the bad... Well, the vernacular fairy. 
There are three ways to deal with the vernacular fairy: First, don't let it 
open, and it will fall off before it opens. This defense can't be prevented 
for a while. For the first time, it is impossible to prevent. 


"Second, if it is open, don't let the object cursed by it hear it. Anyone who 
hears cursing himself when he is happy will inevitably give birth to a hint 
of fear, and this thing is to feed on this fear. The more you are afraid, the 
more happy you are, and if you are really scared by it, as it is said, the 
mana in your hands will advance by leaps and bounds. But unless it is a 
blind man, I will hear it one day. In fact, even the blind man can't escape, 
because someone has pierced his own ears to escape this thing, but it is 
useless. 


"And, conversely, if you curse no matter how it is, how can you pour cold 
water, you will ignore it, it will take you helpless. So, the most effective is 
the third way: let yourself have a lot of fun, don't put it at all In it, it is 
said to be good, not to say it, all of them have been forgotten. Let yourself 
become stronger and stronger, and do not follow the tragic future that it 
gives you the default. So, in the end, it will not get from you. When it 
comes to pleasure, most of it will go away. Of course, it may be just a 
temporary lurking, waiting for the next chance to enter." 


Although this third method is the most effective, it is also the most 
difficult to do. After all, who in the world can really be as good as a stone, 
can not afford a trace? Shi Qingxuan listened, and the more frowning he 
was, he said: "What about the second time? Are you solving this the 
second time?" 


Thanks: "The second time, for others, it may not be useful. After all, the 
situation is special." 


"How is a special law?" 


Thanks to pity: "It is looking for me." 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 104: 
Vernacular fairy banquet crying 2 


It was also many years ago that Xie Pian met a vernacular immortal. 


At that time, he had just built a small hut with his own strength. Just as he 
stood below to admire the new house, suddenly, there was a small voice in 
the corner saying: "Your house will collapse after two months." 


Shi Qingxuan: "What do you do?" 


Thanks: "I didn't do anything. I said, ‘After two months? It can stand still 
within seven days. That’s weird.’” 


Huacheng smiled slightly, and then the smile faded. 


The vernacular immortal hides in the dark, waiting to absorb the fear, 
irritability, and uneasiness of pity. However, it sucked the air for a long 
time, waiting for the pity to wash and sleep in the new house, and did not 
“eee anything. 


Although thankful did not see its true body, but also can feel that it is 
probably very angry. 


Within a few days, the whole house was burned with a thunder and a night. 


The vernacular immortal was quite happy. I probably felt that it was about 
the same as the collapse. The curse of it was fulfilled. This is always a 
matter of fear. However, it does not. It is also not sucking anything that 
can be abdomen. Of course, it was not reconciled, so it followed the pity 
and waited for the next happy event. 


Who knows, this is half a year. During the past six months, there was no 
happy event in Xie Pity! 


If you are an ordinary person, you will give up. However, there is another 
characteristic of the vernacular immortal, that is, love and death, and a 
person who is eyeing a person is going to die, so he has been hungry for 
half a year. Finally, the opportunity has finally arrived. 


One day, Xie pity broke into a large amount of money, and made a small 
windfall. The vernacular fairy music 1s broken, and after so long, it 
immediately makes all the stops, bursting out a long series of thankful and 
rich money, eating, drinking, gambling, dyeing a wonderful life, ill and a 
debt, and cursing again and again. Thanks for the money, while listening to 
the gusto. After listening to it, I still slept, and the vernacular immortal 
still did not **** anything. 


On the night of the night, the pitiful pile of pity broke out. 


After the fire was extinguished, the black-gray thankful prayed to the 
vernacular immortal: "It’s a pity. It’s all burned out, and one child is gone. 
The drunken dreams that you said last night, the emptiness of the world, I 
still have one I have never experienced it. I think that you are very 
interesting, otherwise you will say it again." 


So three or four times down, later, thank you even will take the initiative 
to ask it, do you have anything to say? Do you want to say a few words? 
The vernacular immortal finally couldn’t stand it anymore, it ran away. 


For the vernacular immortals, it is extremely unfriendly to pray for such 
blasphemy. Either he has no happy events, waits for years, or he is 
accustomed to all bad luck, without any fear and uneasiness; and his luck 
is beyond the imagination of the vernacular immortals, so their curses are 
not painful for thankfulness. It’s a blessing or a daydream. 


In short, since then, thankfulness has been insulated from the vernacular 
immortals. He even had a little doubt, was it that the vernacular immortal 
escaped to his own ethnic group and publicized how bad he was. 


Hearing here, Shi Qingxuan did not hold it and stunned. Huacheng 
whispered: "Is it funny?" 


Shi Qingxuan also knew it was wrong, and immediately it was right, and 
he said: "I can't help it, Prince Edward." Xie politely said: "Nothing. 
Anyway, I also find it very interesting." 


He concludes: "The vernacular immortal is to draw mana from the heart of 
human fear, and then use this mana to make the prophecy come true, and 
then make new prophecies. This cycle, until a person is completely beaten 
and his heart is ashamed. Therefore, the more you are not strong, the more 
you lose; the more you have, the more you are afraid of losing." 


After a pause, he reminded: "Is the believer of the Wind Master receiving 
such a pledge, asking for help? You are Fengshen, this thing is not within 
your jurisdiction. If you receive it, you can hand it over to Valkyrie. "" 


Shi Qingxuan said: "It’s not the believers who met, it was my own 
encounter." 


This time, thank you is even more strange: "What do you encounter 
yourself? The vernacular immortals should generally not dare to provoke 
the priests. Even if they are provoked, they should not be afraid of them." 


Shi Qingxuan sighed: "If I meet after I fly, it is not enough to worry about 
it, but... this is a long story." 


It is said that hundreds of years ago, when Feng Shui Second Division was 
a man, he was born in the home of the wealthy merchants. 


Shi Qingxuan was the second son. When he was born, his family rejoiced. 
For this reason, he took the name of the milk, "Xuan", and spread the 
porridge, and he did good deeds. At that time, a fortune teller drank 
porridge, saw the baby in the scorpion, asked the birth of the character, 
said something like this: 


"Eat the porridge of your family, I said something. Your son, although the 
life is good, but it is hard to say. If you want to save, you must try to keep 
a low profile. Don't let him develop a savvy temper from childhood, and 
let him not show his limelight. If you live in a muffled voice, you can live 
a safe life. Never give him a happy event, it will attract bad things." 


This is too bad to hear, just like the vernacular immortal. The teacher's 
family is also a merchant's family. They are extraordinarily heavy. When 
they pull down their faces and take people away, his words are naturally 
unreliable. After a few days, they will also open a banquet for Shi 
Qingxuan, and the lights will be smashed. 


However, at the banquet, just as everyone was happy to drink, and they 
sang a message to the second son of the teacher in the village, they heard a 
voice from the underground and sang: "No good beginning, no good end!" 


The voice came from under the ground, overshadowed the voices of all the 
other people present, and scared everyone. 


The banquet was scattered, and the same day, the baby’s teacher Qing 
Xuan launched a fever, crying, how can I not retreat, but also vomiting 
bitter water, the whole family flies. The teacher remembered the fortune 
teller who said that the strange words were driven away. He was busy 
looking around and invited people back. The fortune teller said: "Let you 
not be arrogant, you must not listen. This time the child hit the real fairy, 
this life will have endless troubles. This fever is not a big deal, it will soon 
retreat. But this It’s just a meeting!” 


The thing that hits it is naturally a vernacular immortal. However, this is 
not a plain vernacular immortal who can easily run away, but a vernacular 
immortal with the oldest and highest ranks. Where is it high? Not a 
wedding feast, you can also cry. Therefore, it 1s called "the vernacular true 
fairy." 


This "true fairy" can be said to be three years without opening, and open 
for three years. The eyes are sinister, the people who are entangled, all of 
them are big and big, the legendary big man. Some people have defeated 
it, but they have also spent a lifetime with it, supplying it with many 
ingredients; some people have lost it, and it has become a part of its 
source of mana. Thousands of years have accumulated and the foundation 
is deep. Nowadays, it has been resting for more than 100 years. If you 
count the days, you should move out. This time, you must take a big meal. 
The teacher Qing Xuan, who was born at this time, was very appetizing for 
his appetite. Although the little baby at the moment can't understand even 


if he hears its prophecy, the little baby will always grow up, and one day 
he will understand, and one day he will know the fear. Moreover, this fear 
buried from a young age will be deeply rooted in the heart and lingering. 


Fortunately, this kind of strangeness often has a rib, and the way of 
thinking about things is very strange. It is different from ordinary people. 
So, the fortune teller thought of a way to lie to it: let the teacher send the 
teacher Qingxuan out first, and give it away. Then, the son changed his 
appearance, and the fake baby girl was sent back. He said that he was a 
foster daughter who was picked up from the outside, so that the whole 
family would manage the son to be a young lady, and he would be a girl 
from childhood. As long as the vernacular is really unable to find the baby 
boy that was originally set, for a long time, I may not remember who he 
was picking. 


In this way, Shi Qingxuan is safe and has nothing to grow up to ten years 
old. 


In the past ten years, the original wealthy family has gradually declined. 
The parents of the second division passed away, and the family was 
intrigued and vying for property. The teacher was too annoyed, so when he 
was sixteen years old, Shi Qingxuan, who was a few years younger than 
him, left home. 


The two brothers lived together, and the teacher did not go to the mountain 
to practice the practice, and the younger brother was fostered in the small 
town below. He practiced training very late, and only went down the 
mountain in the evening. There is no food on the mountain, and I can go 
home to eat at night. One night, Shi Wudu and others had a fascination and 
forgot the hour. Shi Qingxuan waited for a long time and didn't wait for his 
brother to come back. He worried that he had no food and was hungry, and 
he decided to send the meal up the mountain. 


At that time, Shi Qing Xuan was still a child, he would not walk the 
mountain road, and he was dark in the night. He took the rice box for a 
long time and waited for an emergency. Anxious, I took off my skirt on the 
side of the mountain. At this time, a black shadow came from the front of 
the mountain road and asked: "Is the mysterious child in front?" 


Shi Qingxuan listened to someone calling him a name, thinking that his 
brother called to pick up his own person, and quickly put the skirt down 
again, said: "I am!" 


The strange voice asked again: "Your birthday is a character, but some 
time of the month of a certain month?" 


Shi Qingxuan is even more curious. Why did Qi Qi suddenly ask for the 
birth of the character, the second Qi this person said that it is not bad, it 
should be: "Yes! How do you know? Who are you? Do you know my 
brother?" 


The voice did not answer, and finally said: "Come here, let me see your 
face." 


This is the tone of the order. At this point, Shi Qingxuan finally felt that 
something was wrong. 


He held the box for the meal and ran away. Running and running, I heard 
the wind blowing over the back of the body, laughing and laughing, it was 
that the thing was chasing behind, and said: "You are about to fall!" 


Shi Qing Xuan soul flies and scatters. When he says "pour", he falls down 
and broke the rice box. The rice is scattered. When the thing was about to 
be thrown up, the division did not arrive. 


When the people came, the vernacular true fairy disappeared. The teacher 
did not get up and picked up the younger brother who was covered in 
blood and rice. Both brothers were shocked. 


Still find it! 


After being hiding for so many years, the vernacular true immortal tasted 
the first sweetness, and since then it has been timed to appear, once and 
for all. This thing is too powerful, the family of the teacher has been 
paralyzed, and the Taoist Master who can be invited by the teacher has no 
way, and is unable to roar the million merits and directly convey his voice 
to the sky. Although it has not been to the life of the teacher, but the two 


brothers know that this thing is just waiting for fattening and then killing. 
Just gently hit you a few small slaps at the moment, reminding you to be 
afraid of it, one day you have to come big. This is like a hunter. Don't give 
a prey to the prey, but you have to rub a few arrows to teach the prey to the 
extreme, and it feeds on it. 


It’s like a late arrival. 


Fortunately, the turnaround is finally here. After several years of 
painstaking repairs, the division did not fly. 


As soon as he soared, he immediately referred Shi Qingxuan to Zhongtian 
Ting, and majestic Tiandi Dibao. After a few years, Shi Qingxuan also 
rose smoothly. The vernacular is really fairy, and it has disappeared since 
then. 


Shi Qingxuan took it for granted that it finally gave up and retired. 
However, this seems to be just that he wants to be beautiful. 


A few days ago, he found a large group of friends to drink alcohol. When 
he was drunk, he suddenly heard a voice in his ear: "You never want to see 
your brother again!" 


The voice is very familiar. In the days when he was ten years old, he could 
hear this sound almost once or twice a year. The fear of it has already been 
carved into the bone marrow. It is a fried thunder in his ear. Shi Qingxuan 
instantly woke up with the wine, and was scared to run to the hustle and 
bustle of the night. He saw the teacher’s martial arts and the spirits and 
they gathered, which set the mind. 


Afterwards, he wondered if the voice would be his own auditory 
hallucination. After all, the shadows that have been planted too deeply by 
this thing have never been before. But after thinking about it, I still felt a 
little worried. I pulled the instrument and asked for the pity. I didn’t 
expect it to hit the flower city in the Bodhisattva. It was really narrow. 


After listening to it, thank you: "So, the Fengshi adults you encountered, 
and what I encountered are not a level at all." Thinking for a moment, and 


asked Huacheng, "Sanlang, you can see the vernacular Really immortal?" 


Huacheng played with a chopstick in his hand and said, "Well? I have 
never seen it before. But I have seen people I know." 


Who is this "knowing person", although she is curious, but she did not ask 
much, she only said: "How high is it? Is it really powerful?" 


Huacheng lost the chopsticks and slowly said: "High." 


Wen Yan, the look of Shi Qingxuan and Ming Yi are more and more 
dignified. Huacheng said again: "It is different from the average Xiaoyan, 
and it is really difficult to deal with." 


Although he said "difficult to deal with", he still looks as usual, as if he is 
just a guest. However, it is extremely difficult to get the evaluation of 
Huacheng. Thanks to pity: "The wind master, it seems that the problem is 
not small. Why don't you tell the Navy master?" 


Shi Qingxuan waved: "No, no. You know, my brother is going to rob him. 
If he is going to fight the vernacular in this festival, what should I do? I 
have to keep it secret. Others know. I have not told the priests who have 
made good friends with me." 


A priest is not only able to spend a lifetime in a lifetime. The more days 
you spend, the higher the realm, the more stable your position, and the 
stronger your mana. Shi Wudu is a priest who has two days of robbing, and 
Xie Pity has also vaguely heard in the chatter of the Psychic Array. He is 
now waiting for the third. If distracted, it is really unfavorable. The failure 
of the robbery, how to say it is also to fall into the realm. 2k novel reading 
network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 105: Three 
gods, one ghost, no real fairy 


Shi Qing Xuan Zheng said: "I want to try, see if I can solve the problem 
myself. Anyway, you have more experience with your Royal Highness, are 
you free? If not, don't force it." 


Prior to this, Shi Qingxuan helped a lot of politeness. At the moment, he 
needs to be in a hurry. He is seeking for himself. Xie Pity can't push 
himself to say that he has something to do. But Huacheng is a guest in the 
distance. I haven’t played here for a few days. He left. Who will call 
Huacheng? Although he did not say much. 


Just thinking about it, Huacheng supported the lower jaw with one hand 
and smiled: "My brother is going to swear that the vernacular is really 
immortal? If you don't dismiss it, can you please me? After all, it is a rare 
thing, I have never seen it before." 


Thanks for your pity: "Hey, Saburo knows me." Good-hearted grateful to 
him for his thoughtfulness and nodded. Shi Qingxuan also has nothing to 
say, he naturally knows that Huacheng 1s not to help him, but the flower 
city will at least not be troubled, and it will not be bad for him. Thanks 
again and again: "But the vernacular is really a ghost, I don't know when 
and where will it reappear?" 


Shi Qingxuan: "I don't know, I can't do it. I plan to go to the best restaurant 
in the Imperial City to go to the banquet, drink him for a hundred and 
eighty days, and set off firecrackers to sing big drama every day. It will 
always come out." 


Thanks to pity: "This is also a solution, but even if it comes out, it will not 
be able to grasp it. Knowing yourself and knowing what to do, whether the 
wind master has checked it, what kind of people are there in the past? How 
about the style? There are no rules to follow." 


Shi Qingxuan: "My brother naturally checked it long ago." He said that he 
took out a scroll from his sleeve and spread it out. Thanks for giving me a 
look, I can't help but say: "Great, powerful." 


Good guy! This kind of thing is really not too big, the fish are too lazy to 
hook, the name on the scroll, almost all of them are famous people in the 
world, and they are all miserable. The ending of each one is a collapse. 


The defeat of the army is like a mountain, and the cross sword has been 
broken. The thousands of wealth have been exhausted, and the three feet 
have been cleaned up; These people are not lost to the vernacular true 
fairy, but lost to their inner fear of "lost." 


However, there is no emperor on the roster. The true emperor, the body of 
the self-contained spirit, is not easy to invade. In fact, in general, people 
who have the potential to fly up will also have a layer of aura shells, so 
that these ghosts will shun the house. Therefore, Xie pity faintly thinks 
that Shi Qingxuan is wrapped up in that thing, it is not so simple, and 
some people are secretly moving. Hands and feet deliberately target him. 
If this 1s the case, this person is inevitably not simple, but Shi Qingxuan is 
eyeing fashion and 1s a baby, why would it attract such a bad role? 


At this time, Huacheng Road: "Can my brother borrow me to see?" 
Thanks for giving the scroll to him, said: "Look." 

Huacheng only roughly scanned it and said: "Who wrote the scroll?" 
Teacher Qingxuan: "My brother. What happened?" 


Huacheng put the scroll on the table and said: "Not good. The wrong is 
outrageous. I suggest that you go back to the furnace to rebuild." 


Shi Qingxuan will have to make a decision: "Blood rain and flowers!" 


Xie pity took him and apologized: "Sit down, let's sit down. Let's sit down. 
Forget it, Saburo has always been like this. He didn't mean it." 


Shi Qingxuan sat down and suspected himself: "Is it always like this?" 


Xie pity turned to Huacheng and asked, "Sanlang, you are wrong, what is 
wrong?" 


Huacheng also leaned back to him, and the two sat close together. 
Huacheng pointed out a few names and said: "These are wrong." 


Thanks for your pity, those few are the overlords of the evil side, saying: 
"How do you know?" 


Huacheng Road: "Because these are my kills." 


" " 


Thanks to pity: "Isn't this all suicide?" 


Huacheng Road: "Before I started, I asked people to say hello to them 
first, and they broke their own. I don't know if this is my kill?" 


I don't know if this is a killer, but it can be considered very honest. Shi 
Qingxuan coughed a few times uncomfortably, his mouth was fretting, 
saying: "Ghosts don't frankly describe in front of the priest how they kill 
themselves. The ghosts don't want to discuss this kind of problem with the 
gods in front of other priests. "" 


Huacheng pointed out several names and said: "These are also wrong." 
Thanks to pity: "Who is this killing?" 
Huacheng Road: "Black water kills." 


Thanks for your pity, said: "Is that black water mysterious ghost, is it 
always a low-key?" 


Huacheng Road: "It does not mean that he will not kill." 


Immediately, he said to the teacher Qingxuan: "The reel that the brother 
gave you is missing a lot of mistakes. I have no intention of verifying it. 
Instead, I have a lot of suspicions of distracting my vision. A bunch of 
rags. So I suggest, tearing up the rewrite." 


Shi Qingxuan took back the scroll and said: "My brother won't be like 
this!" Although the words are pale and weak, the tone is very calm. If you 
are a younger brother, you shouldn’t have to worry about it. Then, there is 
still a possibility. Xie pity asks: "There is a specialization in the surgery 
industry. The Navy master should also use the power of others in the 
verification process. Who is the person on the reel?" 


After a moment of hesitation, Shi Qingxuan said: "Ling Wen." 


Thank you for your pity, not talking. Although the Lingwen Temple was 
always inefficient by other temple officials, it did not make so many 
mistakes. It was simply a perfunctory draft. The relationship between the 
tumors looks pretty good, at least on the surface. In the end, there are 
some twists and turns around, I am afraid that outsiders are unclear. 


Huacheng leaned back and continued: "How to tell the truth, I will tell you 
one more: once the fairy tells a prey, it will scribble and remove the roots. 
Not only will its prey collapse, but the relatives of the prey will also be 
affected. It’s spread. So, the above ones only die oneself, and the relatives 
and friends are still alive and well, and they are all wrong.” 


Hearing the words, Shi Qingxuan was pale for a moment. Immediately, he 
started his spirit again and smiled at Mingy1: "Is it not a Ming brother, you 
are also dangerous? You are my best friend!" 


Mingyi was far away from him, and his face was full of words, "Can I not 
want you to be your best friend?" Such a move, sitting close to Xie Pity, 
Huacheng swept his eyes, his eyes like a knife. Seeing Shi Qingxuan at 
this time did not forget to make a joke, thanking the pity and forbearing 
Jun can not help but but also faintly saw the uneasiness of the wind 
division. It is better to say that it is because of uneasiness that it is 
necessary to use more enthusiasm to restrain. Shi Qingxuan was the fan of 
the wind, and the fan was five or six times faster than usual. The black hair 
was messy in the wind. He said, "Let's go now! Go to the most gorgeous 
high-rise building, and I will take a look." We are so many people, we dare 
not come out. We have many people, hahahahahaha..." 


"..."" Thanks to the pity, "You are calming down." After waiting for a while, 
I still have some small things to deal with." 


I don’t know how many days to go, two children have two mouths, and a 
dead ghost attached to a living person can’t leave it alone. He wants to 
find a reliable person in the village to look after, and Huacheng knows 
everything about him. He said: "If my brother must go, just let go, I have 
someone. After you leave, you will Someone will look after you." 


Thanks for the sigh of relief, said: "There are Laosaburo. It is better to see 
someone here." 


Huacheng also laughed: "Yes. Someone stares at it." 


The "looking" and "staring" of the two of them are obviously not the same 
meaning. However, no one is being pursued. Mingyi moved open to 
Taiwan, and painted a series of thousands of miles on the ground. The 
faster the fan of the teacher, the faster the fan, the shadow of the fan has to 
be invisible, said: "Yes, the Prince of the Prince, just forgot to ask, Who is 
that at the door? I asked him to provoke him. Is it a human voice to 
speak?" 


Actually, I was asked casually at the end. If I heard the sadness, I would 
have an angina pectoris. It’s true that the pity is not a human voice. He has 
collected the evil spirits and hearts that are leaning in the corner. He said: 
"Has he already self-reported?" 


Shi Qingxuan: "Why, is that really a green ghost? On that virtue, it’s better 
to see it, and it’s better to see it!" 


Thank you for your pity, and briefly talked about a few situations, and told 
him to keep it secret, especially not to let Lang Qianqiu know. In a few 
words, Ming Yi also finished a few strokes in a few strokes. The last time 
the south wind was painted, it was rough for a long time. He was the 
opposite. He painted very fast, but he did not scribble. In the end, the 
freehand circle was more neat than the one drawn by the ruler. The word is 
also Neatly tidy like a seal, thank you for not being secretly surprised. 


The formation method was completed, Mingyi said: "Go away." Shi 
Qingxuan took a breath and blew out the candle. 


Huacheng walked in the forefront and the first one went to push the door. 
The small door was opened "Oh," and it was black-painted outside. It 
seemed to be connected to an old house that had been abandoned for many 
years. The air was full of musty and dust. 


Behind the flower city is thankful, and whispered the flower city that took 
the initiative to open the road ahead, then Shi Qingxuan, and finally 
Mingyi. After he came out, he closed the door with his backhand. 


Just as the door was about to close, in the darkness, suddenly a voice came 
from behind the door. Sen Ran said: "The place you are going to will 
become a nightmare that you never want to remember again!" 


Upon hearing this voice, she prayed out. 


The door was smashed by him on the spot. However, after the use of the 
formation, it was ineffective. The door was not a view of the Bodhisattva, 
but a pile of broken copper. The violent action provoked the fierce dust, 
and thanked for a cough. I was glad that I didn’t smash the door made by 
Huacheng. I covered my face with a sleeve: “Is that the vernacular true 
fairy?” 


Shi Qingxuan clenched the dust and the wind fan, saying: "It's its voice! Is 
it... always following me?" 


Xie pity opened the dust and vetoed: "No. There are three priests in the 
house, a ghost king. If something has been following you, can we not find 
it? It must have just arrived." 

Mingyi also said: "Calm." 


Teacher Qingxuan: "Calm. I am calm. I have calmed down!" 


Huacheng is in front of the road: "Calm is necessary, nothing is not 
necessarily. Does anyone know where this is." 


Xie pity looked around and said: "We are not going to the best restaurants 
in the Imperial City?" 


How to see it, this abandoned old house is not like the restaurant in 
Shiqing Xuankou. The four men turned around and touched the door, but 
they were locked by several big locks. Xie pity once again slammed, 
locked, and the door opened. After opening the door, it is not in front of 
the four people, it is not a slap in the face, it is not a secret scene, but a 
common town with no bright colors. 


Huacheng raised his eyebrows: "The Imperial City should not be like this.' 


Thanks for the deep feelings of the same, the imperial power of the 
emperor is not comparable to these small towns, and turned back: "Grand 
Master, are you drawing a wrong?" 


Mingyi said: "No mistakes, the original connection is not here." 


Thank you for your understanding. The implication is that the thing 
moved. This place is what it sent them. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 106: Three 
gods, one ghost, no real fairy 2 


Shi Qingxuan: "It flashed in after we left the Bodhisattva to tamper with 
the formation?" 


I even overthrew it myself: "No! It won't be like this." 


Thanks and pity: "Impossible. We just pushed the door out. Even after it 
flashed in and moved, we should have arrived at the original location, 
because the formation has already started, and the change is invalid." So, it 
can be hands-on time, only for a moment." 


That is, the short moment after the Mingyi painting method, the teacher 
Qingxuan blows out the candle, and the whole Bodhisattva view is in a 
darkness! 


However, this contradicts the statement that thank you. Shi Qingxuan: 
"But in the house, there are only four of us." 


In a small Bodhisattva view, three priests, a ghost king, if there is 
something more in the middle, they still don't know? And if it is one of 
them who is dark and moving, what is the most likely, who will be? 


Shi Qingxuan couldn't help but look at the flower city. Although I 
immediately accepted it, Huacheng did not miss this eye. He smiled and 
said, "Look at what I do? According to me, don't you think that the Master 
is more suspect?" 


Mingyi also glanced at him. Huacheng Road: "Don't just guess what made 
people move their hands and feet. If he started painting, the wrong way is 
wrong?" 


Mingyi did not refute, did not say. Shi Qingxuan couldn't listen, and said: 
"Flower City Lord, wait a moment. I know that you have had a festival 


before, but Ming brother is not such a person. He is temporarily helping 
me to help. There is no reason to do this." 


Huacheng Road: "To do one thing, you don't have to have a reason. In fact, 
the wind master is also very suspicious." 


"Ah?" Shi Qingxuan never imagined, this is OK, referring to himself, 
"Who? I?!" 


Huacheng Road: "Well. The thief shouted to catch a thief. You are very 
seeing very much. Why did you come here? If you and your brother are 
really so jealous, how can you sort out a bunch of rags? The bureau, it’s 
not impossible to get rid of us here." 


Seeing his expression, he knows that it 1s simply an unbridled swearing in 
the mouth of the letter, but it is also very different, and it seems that 
everyone is doubtful. Shi Qingxuan was shaken quickly and said: "I... 1am 
so bored?" 


Huacheng smiled: "The same reason. I am not so boring." 


When someone hits him at home, he will use it back as it is. Thank you for 
thinking about things, and waved: "Well, you all stop. If you haven't 
solved it, you will start to doubt yourself." 


Huacheng laughed and said nothing. His attitude is very obvious. If you 
don't help or mess up, you are purely playing. Don't look at him without 
looking at him, and don't be careful to guard him. Indulge in a moment, 
thanking the pity: "In fact, there is a possibility that when the magistrate 
in the house draws the formation, there is already someone outside the 
house, drawing a more powerful array on the door." 


At that time, Shi Qingxuan didn't let the outside of the house hear their 
conversations, lost a segregation, and the Bodhisattva was closed. 
Relatively speaking, it was not easy to be found outside the house. The 
same array of methods collided in pairs, and the winners won. This 
"strong" depends not only on the skill of the players, but also on the 
materials of the array. At that time, Mingyi used the cinnabar that was not 


used by the peers who came back when they were ruined. If someone used 
fresh blood to “press the array’, it would naturally be better. 


Shi Qingxuan immediately accepted this possibility and said: "Will 
outside the house? Will it be a green ghost? He is like that, can he still be 
a demon?" 


Thanks for your pity: "Can't you..." 


Huacheng whispered: "He doesn't want to move within seven days. 
However, people outside the house can be more than one." 


This seems to mean something. Thanks to the pity: "In short, everyone 
should not guess, so as not to hurt each other." 


After a few steps, I said: "The monster's words are really strange. Why do 
you say that this will become a windshield ‘a nightmare that you never 
want to remember again?’ What will this place encounter?” 


Looking around, Shi Qingxuan slightly frowned, said: "... Slow. It seems 
like..." 


The voice did not fall, and suddenly I saw Ming Yi’s gaze, and the palm of 
the hand was separated from the air. Thanks and pity: "The wind master is 
behind the heart!" 


However, I saw that the palm of the instrument was "squeaky" and cracked 
the same wide square. The thing descended from the sky, and went straight 
to the teacher Qingxuan’s head. He jumped a few feet away and took a sigh 
of relief: “Good and dangerous!” Then look down and the pupil suddenly 
shrinks. Thanks for the pity, I was slightly scared. That thing is actually a 
plaque, the blue gold word, the words "Feng Shui Temple" three 
characters. 


It is a big taboo to split the plaque of a shrine of the gods into two halves. 
Mingyi closed his palms, his face was cold, and Shi Qing Xuan took a 
moment. He immediately waved his sleeves and swept the plaque that had 
split into two halves. He whispered: "All are secret, confidential! Don't say 


go out. Let My brother knows that his plaque is embarrassing, and he must 
be mad!" 


Thanks for turning around, said: "This... turned out to be a Feng Shui 
Hall?" 


Yes, the broken house they came out is a Feng Shui Temple. 


The Navy is a God of Wealth. No one does not love money. There is a 
palace view in which he sits. He has always had a strong incense, and there 
will be such a dilapidated scene. It is like a stack of silver tickets being 
thrown on the street. It is generally unbelievable. Shi Qingxuan re-entered 
the temple, the temple is full of cobwebs, old dust, and no one cares about 
the desolate. After half a day, I finally dumped two disgusting gods in the 
pile of debris behind the house. 


The statue of the windshield lacks arms and legs, and the male statue of 
the Navy directly falls off, and it is not aging for a long time, it is 
naturally destroyed, but it is smashed by people, as if anyone has vented 
endless grievances. They are on them. The partiality of these two gods is 
also very realistic, lifelike, so uncomfortable, smiling and lying across the 
runen old temple, very uncomfortable. 


Shi Qingxuan’s right and left hands smashed a statue of God, and squatted 
in his arms, saying: “What hate and blame?” 


Although thanking the pity, this scene is full of malicious smug, but in 
order to stabilize the teacher's heart, Wen Wen said: "The wind master is 
stable. Some people worship people, the world is always reasonable, don't 
care. Must It is something that is deliberately arranged for you to see, in 
order to incite your fear, and to extract mana from it." 


Mingyi said in a simple and concise manner: "You can't do it. If you don't, 
you can go." 


Shi Qingxuan took the dust on the faces of the two gods, gritted his teeth, 
grabbed the windshield fan, and suddenly got up and said: "I am going! I 
have to look at what medicine it sells in the gourd." 


The four people went out of the temple and broke the circle in this small 
town. The town is very quiet, very stable, not prosperous and not 
backward, and nothing unusual. It is better to say that the most unusual 
thing is them. Lost in the mortal heap, this pedestrian's looks and dress are 
too eye-catching. Therefore, not long after, they still flashed into an alley 
and changed their heads. 


Thanks to the original one, it was very simple, but it didn't have to be 
changed. The other three people changed from head to toe. Over there, Shi 
Qingxuan expressed his opinion on the dressing of Mingy1; here, 
Huacheng changed into a refreshing black dress, and long hair was also 
neatly bundled up, with white jade, and three points less lazy. More three- 
point spirit, as if the famous one is a beautiful young man with a talented 
and talented younger brother. It’s really like to force the emperor to wear a 
donkey and not like a meal, it’s still very eye-catching. Looking at him, he 
couldn't help but think of an old saying: "Men must be pretty, and they are 
soapy." Going back to God, often the teacher of the place, remembering 
one, whispered: "Sanlang, there is something, I have forgotten to ask you." 


Huacheng completed the whole cuff and said: "What?" 


Xie pity hands into a fist, a soft cough in front of his mouth, try to ask as 
casually: "...What is your psychic password?" 


If you want to communicate with another person at any time, you must 
first get the password of the other party. For example, if you want to find a 
teacher, you must first meditate in the heart of the following four words: 
"The wind master is a talented person", "the wind teacher is very funny", 
"the wind teacher is a good person, and the wind is great." Year 28". Of 
course, the general sergeant, the password will not be so difficult to say, it 
is more normal. 


The psychic passwords of the superior priests are not easily told to others, 
unless the relationship is closely related. As a ghost king, Huacheng is 
naturally the same. Although the two people have not met each other for a 
long time, the relationship should be quite good. It is a bit strange that the 
password of the other party has not yet been obtained. But think about it, 


every time something is happening, they all meet directly, and they don’t 
exchange, it seems that there is nothing. 


Xie pity never asked the password of any priest, because something can go 
directly to the psychic scream, and it is OK to find someone who can talk 
privately. This is the first time to take the initiative to find someone to ask 
for a password. Nothing. Experience, a little worried about whether it will 
be abrupt. Seeing the flash of the flower city, but it does not move, he feels 
awkward, busy: "Is it inconvenient? Nothing is okay, you don't care about 
me, I just ask a word. Because I have something to say in private, so I only 
I took the liberty to ask, I thought of a way to quietly ask you if you can..." 


Huacheng interrupted him: "There is no inconvenience. I am very happy." 
Thank you for your pity: "Ah?" 


Huacheng sighed and said: "I am very happy, my brother finally asked me. 
Because you have not mentioned it, I still have some inconvenience, I 
don't want to exchange passwords with others, so I didn't take the initiative 
to talk about it. Now I can't wait until my brother. Asked, how can you say 
that it is just a question? 


Thanks to the pity, the mood immediately became clear, holding his hand 
and said: "We used to be general concerns! Only when I was wrong, that 
sentence is just a mouthful, apologize to Saburo. So, your What is the 
password?" 


Huacheng's eyes are slightly bright, slightly tilted to the upper body, said: 
"My password, my brother can listen, I only say once." Finished, 
whispered a sentence. 


Thank you for listening, he widened his eyes and said: "...this? Is this 
really? Saburo, you are not mistaken?" 


Huacheng is very calm and said: "Well. That's it. Don't believe, my brother 
is trying now?" 


Wherever you pray, you dare to try, "Well... isn’t that every time someone 
else looks for you, you have to meditate on you three times? This... Isn’t 
this going to be very embarrassing?” 


Huacheng said: "Because I don't want others to find me, I deliberately set 
this sentence. Let them retreat. But if my brother is looking for me, I will 
always be there." 


Xie pity always felt a little disbelieving, and said: "This is too bad..." 


He hesitated, trying to activate the psychic, but he couldn't read the 
password. Even if it is meditation, it will not work. Seeing Xie pity lived 
half a face, turned his head, and never made up his mind, Huacheng finally 
laughed enough, and said: "Okay, okay. If my brother doesn't dare to read, 
I will find you. Your What about the password?" 


Thanks to pity, he said: "Reciting a thousand times of morality is." 


Huacheng picked up one eyebrow. After a while, thank you for hearing his 
voice in the ear: "Through a thousand times of morality is gone, these 
eleven words, right?" 


The two stood clearly face to face, but they kept silent, and it was quite 
interesting to talk with their eyes and whisper in a voice that no one else 
could hear. Xie Li also responded with psychic: "Yes. You are not fooled." 


Huacheng blinked and continued to return: "Ha ha ha ha, almost fooled, it 
iS SO interesting." 


Xie pity also blinked and smiled. 


It should be noted that this password, but he seriously thought about it 
eight hundred years ago, thinks it is very interesting, so it is used again 
after flying. However, many other priests don't seem to be interesting, 
even after being fooled. My feelings directly said that your high point is 
too cold, I can’t smile, but the wind letter is laughing and screaming in the 


ground, but the gentleman’s smile is very low and inexplicable. He laughs, 
thank you and There is no sense of accomplishment. Now that Huacheng is 
laughing too, it probably shows that it is really interesting. 


The original plan was to go to the most expensive restaurant in the 
Imperial City to drink, but since I did not go to the Imperial City, where to 
drink is almost the same, so the pedestrian went to the town's largest 
restaurant to have a box, sitting bored for a while, the man sent Drinking, 
thank you: "Excuse me, what is it here?" 


Although this question is very strange, it is the most direct and effective 
way. The guy said: "Several VIPs are not coming here? This is Bogu 
Town." 


Thanks to the pity: "What is the name? What is the name?" 


The buddy said with a thumbs up: "The fire in our town! There is a famous 
top in this neighborhood. At this time of the year, many foreigners want to 
come to see a rare one." 


Shi Qingxuan is curious: "What is the social fire?" 


Thanks to the pity: "It 1s the entertainment that the folks use to celebrate 
during the festival. There will be some juggling, and what can be seen in 
the local drama." It is similar to the Shangyuan Festival of the Year of 
Xianle. However, the festival tour is a royal exercise, the official control, 
and the social fire is a folk amusement. Shi Qingxuan: "Can it be a holiday 
today? At most, tomorrow is cold dew." 


Thanks to pity: "It doesn't have to be a specific holiday. Sometimes it is to 
commemorate someone, choose a special day, make a noise, and have 
fun." 


At this time, there was a crowd of people in the street under the restaurant. 
Some people shouted: "Let's let go, children, women, don't stand in front! 
Go back, the team is coming!" 


The four looked downstairs. This hope is unfortunate, and Xie pity 
suddenly widened his eyes. I saw a long tour | the team went to the street. 
In the team, everyone has a bright red makeup face, wearing a variety of 
exotic clothes, and a sharp weapon on the forehead. 


Those sharp or rust-proof axes, kitchen knives, iron tongs, and scissors all 
plunged into their heads and poked into their heads. Some even squeezed 
their eyes, **** hanging on their cheeks. Some pierced from the forehead 
and then pierced from the back of the head, **** to the extreme. The 
people who walked in the line, all of them frowned, looked painful, and 
covered with blood. However, they were still blowing and playing, and 
slowly walked forward, like a ghost. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 107: Four 
ghosts smell the blood 


Thanks for a moment, stood up. Shi Qingxuan also stepped on the table 
with one foot, oh | the sleeves seemed to be rushing down. Xie pity quickly 
took him and said: "It's okay, the wind master is calm." 


Shi Qingxuan: "Is it all right if the eyeballs are squeezed out?" 


Thanks to pity: "Nothing. This place can actually see the blood of the fire, 
it is really rare." 


Shi Qingxuan quickly took his foot off the table and said: "Blood society 
fire? What is 1t?" 


The two men sat down again and thanked: "The fire in different places has 
different genres. The blood of the fire is a special genre. It is extremely 
rare. I have only heard of it. I have never seen it because of its **** 
performance. Hunting, and the makeup is top secret, not to pass on 
outsiders, now it is getting less and less." 


Shi Qingxuan stunned: "Makeup? These are fake? This is this... This 1s too 
realistic, I thought it was a magical method!" 


He said that he would never exaggerate, and thanked him for sighing: 
"How many folks can be different." 


Look at the performers of the tour | line, not only the sharp weapon on the 
head, "three points into the wood", some intestines wear belly, lack of 
arms and legs, crawl on the ground, crying and grab the ground; there are 
several people carrying a tall On the wooden shelf, a woman was hanging 
on the beam, and the neck was holding the rope, as if the cantilever was 
self-sufficient; two people were dragging the two legs of a girl, the girl’s 
clothes were torn and ragged, and the face was dragged all the way. There 
is a long blood mark on the ground, which is really like hell. It is clear that 
people are performing, but they are more horrible than ghost cities 


everywhere. Compared with here, the ghost city is simply a hot market. 
That makeup really doesn't know how it came out. Even if it is thanks to 
this tradition, it is almost the first time to see that the demon is coming. 


Many women and children couldn't help but curiosity to squeeze into the 
crowd, but they saw it and were scared to scream back. Shi Qingxuan: "His 
Royal Highness, do you not say that the social fire 1s to celebrate? If there 
is such a celebration, people must scare away, the little girls have to have 
nightmares. This kind of performance is really happy. ?" 


People will not be happy when they watch this performance, so it is really 
impossible. In fact, killing blood, it is indeed exciting. Whether there is 
fear or not, many people will have a sense of pleasure after the fear. This 
*K fire, there seems to be a name in the dialect called "Zha Happy", Xie 
Li's understanding is: a knife smashed down, tied people, and my heart is 


happy. 


In people's hearts, there is a desire for "killing." 


However, of course, thank you for not saying so much, only watching God 
for a while. In the mighty tour | in the team, there is a black-faced white- 
faced man, tall and tall, skinny, with a sharp weapon, slamming on the 
head of a gorgeously dressed performer, the knife is inserted into the 
other's head, he Then use a long gun to provoke the other party, hang it in 
the air, cruel and bloody, exactly the same as the real murder on the spot, 
scared the crowd with a wave of exclamation, there is also a wave of 
applause. Thanks to the pity: "I guess they are performing a story. This 
black man should be the protagonist. The people he killed should be the 
opposite and the evil. The whole story is to express ‘puncise evil and 


9 99 


promote goodness’. 


Speaking of this, Xie pity suddenly moved, said: "The wind master, look 
carefully." 


Teacher Qingxuan: "Look at it." 


Thanks to the pity: "I am letting you see the story. See who they are, what 
kind of story. The vernacular is really sending you here. There must be a 


reason. It just happened to be today, maybe it is In order to let you see this 
bleeding society fire." 


The black man’s eyebrows were tight and his eyes were painful. One 
person “killed” hundreds of “wicked people” in the team, and he was 
stabbed by a mess of weapons. Finally, he licked several “corpses” "Don't 
move, it's actually the end of the same." A team in the past, the next team 
continues to perform, and so on. Thanks to the pity: "Do you see what the 
story is?" 


Shi Qingxuan double eyebrows locked, said: "No. I don't feel how to 
understand, he is killing." 


Huacheng is beside him, and he said: "It’s not a household story. It’s not a 
local character." 


It happened that the restaurant guys came up to deliver the food and asked: 
"Several guests, can't you see? Stimulating?" 


Thanks to pity: "Good-looking, stimulating. This little brother, ask, what 
is the **** fire in your town?" 


Sure enough, the buddy said: "Well, outsiders generally don't know, they 
have to ask. Our Bogu town's social fire is a story of a local legend. It is 
said that hundreds of years ago, there was a scholar here. , surnamed He. 


"This Hesheng, although the family is very poor and poor, but he is very 
capable, from a young age, he is smart and scary, learning everything is 
fine and fast, or a well-known dutiful son, doing nothing to say. Partially 
born to him. It is unlucky, there are any good things, not long. 


"He studied exams, and he was the best at the exam. But because he didn't 
give the examiner a gift, he offended the above person. He was 
deliberately hiding his papers and changed his scrolls. For several years, 
he was on the list; he decided to kiss his fiancee. Like a flower like jade, 
gentle and virtuous, but his wife and sister have robbed the big family to 
be an acolyte, one is not, the life is to kill, one is unbearable, insulting, 
self-sufficient; he goes to theory, and gives others a cure| The traitor 


steals, shuts into the prison, does not give food to almost starve to death, 
the seventy-year-old old mother in order to give him a pleading, stunned 
the head of a night, useless, closed for two years before releasing, mother 
no one care, early I am sick, I have to work hard to raise a family at a 
young age, and | have only one breath. He does not study, and does 
business. Because he is doing too well, he is united by other big merchants 
to suppress and earn a little money. Clean, but still owe a debt." 


" " 


The buddy shouted: "Let's talk about how this person can be unlucky to do 
this?" 


Thanks a little and cough, sincerely said: "Yes." 
In addition to him, how can someone be unlucky enough to be like this! 


After the buddy was finished, the eyebrows danced and said: "Then people 
went crazy and made a temper. One night, just like the day before today, he 
brought a lot of weapons and cut all the people who had harmed him. It’s 
dead! It’s killing a flesh and blood, and it’s so dripping! Because the 
people he killed in the fish and meat village have been around for a long 
time, everyone clap their hands, so later, every day before the cold dew, 
the town will use blood to commemorate He hopes that Hesheng adults 
will bless us and kill the wicked." 


It is said that it is to punish evil and promote goodness. In the end, good 
and evil are not good. The buddy went on. Thanks to the teacher, Qing 
Xuan, if he thought about it, said: "What can you think of the wind 
master?" 


Shi Qingxuan returned to God and said: "I seem to have some idea, but it 
is still too inexplicable. I can’t tell why. What about your Excellency?" 


Thanks to the pity: "I am thinking, this Hesheng, will it be the predecessor 
of the vernacular true immortal?" 


During the talk, the next row of tour | the team began to re-enact the story, 
Shi Qingxuan looked down again, said: "Predecessor?" 


Thanks to pity: "Yes. This kind of humanoid, the source of the formation, 
is often related to someone's particularly strong resentment or 
obsessiveness. For example, I heard that Dongpu has a ghost called 'Qiao 
Ji', which is made by a woman. The resentment is condensed. The rumor is 
said to be because of the sorrow of the woman who ts waiting for her 
husband to return, and also because of the madness of the woman who is 
good at it. If the formation of the vernacular immortal, it is originally 
from someone who is unfortunately afflicted, for the unfortunate fate. It’s 
not impossible to hate, or to be jealous of good luck?” 


Mingyi said: "Check local chronicles. Be exact." 

Thanks for your pity: "Yes, I have to check." 

If you want to know that this possibility is not established, you should 
check that this "Hesheng" is a character that appeared hundreds of years 
ago. If the time is later than the earliest record of the vernacular immortal, 
it is not true. Shi Qingxuan nodded, thought about it, or said: "There is still 


a small thing..." 


At this moment, a voice suddenly came from below, and laughed happily: 
"Wait! Your closest relatives, your best friends, all will die because of you, 
no place to die!" 


Hearing the words, Shi Qingxuan suddenly changed his color, and his left 
hand pressed on the table and flew down the restaurant. 


That voice came from the crowd of the tour! 
Xie pity shouted upstairs: "The wind master! Come back!" 


Shi Qingxuan fell into the **** dead people, angered: "Get out! Get 
out!!!" 


However, those performers look very ignorant, completely ignore him, 
continue to sleepwalking and generally move forward. Shi Qingxuan was 
transferred by the crowd in the team. He couldn’t tell which person had a 
problem. Look at this suspicious. A fan will knock down and see that it is 
more suspicious. If it is wrong, it is a human life. . Huacheng put a piece 
of green vegetables in his dish into a smiley face, and did not lift his head. 
He said: "It’s useless. The old monsters of the Millennium Road want to 
hide the fox tail, which is very simple." 


In such a strange tour | line team, it 1s too easy to mix in something non- 
human. Moreover, the form of the vernacular immortals is very similar to 
human beings, not to mention the highest vernacular true immortals in 
them. 


In a short while, Mingyi also jumped downstairs and raised Shi Qingxuan. 
The group left the street and went to the Fengshui Temple. The hand of Shi 
Qingxuan’s fan was still shaking slightly. It was scared compared to the 
beginning, but now it 1s like being mad. He took a wine jug out of the 
restaurant, walked for a while, took a sip, and the blood in his eyes 
gradually dispersed, saying: "Ming brother, you still don't want to be my 
best friend. Waiting for me to kill this. Ghost things, you can do it again!" 


Mingyi was unceremonious: "Who is that. I was not originally." 


'..." Shi Qingxuan was furious. "Ming brother, you are very boring. You 
can't look at the situation and immediately turn your face and don't 
recognize people." 


They were arguing and screaming for a while, and Shake shook his head 
and found two things from his sleeve. He said, "I think, you can still use 
this for the wind master." 


Shi Qingxuan took over and said: "Ear plug?" 
Xie pity nodded and said: "Although this method is stupid, there is no rule 


of law, but it is effective to deal with it for a while. As long as you can't 
hear it, then that thing will take you nothing. I made a battle, the password 


is 'Tianguan blessing, no taboos', then let's talk to you, they will all be in 
the line." 


Shi Qingxuan stuffed his ears, and sure enough, he couldn’t hear anything. 
The four men went into battle. At this time, thankfully, I heard the voice of 
Huacheng gently in my ear: "Brother, brother." 


Xie pity looked up, only Huacheng blinked at him, did not speak, his voice 
still echoed in the ear: "Do you have something to tell me? You don't come 
to me, I have to find is you." 


Thank you, smile, replied: "Who asked you to set the password like that." 
Huacheng Road: "Okay, okay. My fault." 


Shi Qingxuan adjusted the position of the earplugs, and saw that they did 
not pronounce the two words clearly, but they smiled and smiled. In the 
psychic array, they said: "What are you doing under the Royal Highness 
and the **** rain?" Exchanging the password is secretly saying?" 


Thanks a little and coughed, and said seriously in the battle: "Nothing." 
Huacheng raised his eyebrows slightly and said: "Let." 

Xie pity soles slipped, while pretending to be a serious, squinting forward, 
and replied: "Sanlang don't bother me... there is something I want to ask 


you for help." 


The two walked side by side, their eyes were not handed over, Huacheng 
Road: "What?" 


Thanks for the pity: "Take me a temptation to find out if someone ts a 
vernacular true fairy." 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 108: Feng Shui 
Temple Night Words 


Hearing the words, Huacheng turned his head and his eyes fell on the back 
of Shi Qingxuan and Mingyi, who were screaming at him. He gestured to 
one person and said, "He?" 


Thanks for your nod. 
Huacheng Road: "How do you want to test?" 


Thanks to pity: "Many years ago, I dealt with two vernacular immortals, 
and I was entangled with one for half a year. At that time, I took them over 
and tried out one of their characteristics. This feature, they have I didn't 
realize it myself, but I can discern it with a little thought." After that, the 
secret passed. Huacheng listened and said: "It's easy. So this way." 


After the two people negotiated, they just returned to the Broken Fengshui 
Temple. It is slightly cold in the autumn, and the sky is dim. Shi Qingxuan 
looked around for the head of his brother's statue of the Navy, and glued it 
back, and rightened the two statues and placed them on the platform. Xie 
Pity gave birth to a fire in the temple, and some of the broken wood 
burned, and the four men sat around the fire. 


Shi Qingxuan blocked his ears, sullenly drank a few pots, and finally 
couldn’t help himself. “We can’t just sit and wait for that thing. Is there 
any program that can help?” 


He offered to express his gratitude. Mingyi dialed the fire and said: "This 
time, what more programs do you want to help?" 


Shi Qing Xuanzang said: "Yes. Doesn't that thing make me scared? I am 
not afraid of it. 1 am so happy how to play, how happy I am to play, I am 


more happy than usual, I will be a big man, mad at it." 


Thanks in the psychic circle: "It's better to play with the scorpion." 


Shi Qingxuan’s eyebrows sullenly said: “Is it a scorpion? Is it bigger than 
the size? Your Royal Highness, you are not addicted.” 


Thanks for your pity: "Where is there..." 


Shi Qingxuan: "Forget it, there is nothing else in hand, just play it. But we 
have four people, it’s a bit messy to play." 


Thanks to pity: "No chaos, this way." 


He spread his palms, and he was two small and sly scorpions. Thanks to 
the pity: "We are four people, divided into two groups. I am a group of 
Saburo, a group of two adults, which is better than luck. Two dice, one set, 
one throw, one throw, count points. Points Big, the group wins, and another 
group that can ask for a small number of points must answer their 
questions or do one thing." 


Shi Qingxuan: "I have a question." 
Thanks: "Excuse me." 


Shi Qing Xuan shook his legs and said: "Why, of course, is the two of you, 
the Prince of the Prince? Have you considered our feelings before you 
grouped?" 


Xie pity and cough, said: "This, if you want to change the group, it is ok. 
No difference." 


Shi Qingxuan put the dust into the back collar and said: "But. Actually, I 
don't have any opinion on this group. But the **** rain is so good, isn't our 
group very disadvantaged?" 


Thanks and smiles: "You can't say that. We are very lucky in this group, 
but my luck is very bad. Adding one another, one up, isn't it even?" 


Shi Qingxuan thought, it also makes sense, a shot of the thigh, said: "Oh! 
This is the case." Turned his elbows and smashed the Ming dynasty, said, 
"I don't know the rules, don't drag my hind legs." '"" 


Mingyi glanced at him, and his psychic voice rang his cold voice: "I will 
not accompany you." 


Shi Qingxuan was busy picking him up and said: "It’s OK to drag and drop 
your legs! If you forget it, come here! You still have to accompany it, or I 
will be alone in a group!" 


So the four simply sweared and obeyed the rules of the game, and that 
began to play. In the first round, Shi Qingxuan threw a "five", and Mingyi 
threw a "four"; Huacheng threw a "six" and thanked him for throwing a 
"one." 

Shi Qingxuan Daxi: "Ha ha ha ha ha ha! Your Excellency the Prince is 
really bad luck, too bad! Hahahahahahaha..." 


Thank you for your pity, and warmly said: "Although the wind master is 
telling the truth, can you not say it in such a happy tone?" 


Teacher Qingxuan: "Cough! OK, what, we won this group, this wind 
division asks you two to do one thing. What, Prince Edward, blood rain! I, 
command you - help each other immediately Undress!" 


Thankfulness: "???" 
Thanks to the pity: "The Wind Master?" 


The Ming instrument turned around in disgust, and the support did not 
seem to want to see such a bad scene. Shi Qing Xuan Zang shouted: "Come 
and come, I am willing to gamble and lose, the divine priests and the 
ghosts of the gods, will not lie. I have already sat down, please start your 
performance!" 


" " 


Thanks to the flower city, the flower city has a hand, the mouth is silent, 
"Brother, not my fault." 


Thankful and helpless, I only have to say: "How much?" 


Shi Qingxuan 1s just a joke, of course, he will not really want them to be 
embarrassed, shaking his legs and laughing: "It is enough to take off one 
piece, and keep a few pieces to continue, oh." 


He actually wants to continue... Xie pity, secretly said: "Sanlang..." 


There was no volatility on the flower garden, but the voice was comforted 
by a polite voice: "Nothing. It is not good to let them win a few times, 
when they lose." 


This is indeed what they said in advance, but thank you for not thinking 
that Shi Qingxuan would play like this, quite a kind of feeling of lifting a 
rock and rubbing his own feet. He grinded and smashed the belt of the city, 
and for a long time he helped the city to remove the black coat, revealing 
the white coat inside. Huacheng also helped him to take off his coat as 
usual, his movements were gentle and slow, and he did not touch his body. 
In fact, both of them only took off a coat, and it was not painful or 
ruthless. It was completely innocuous, but she still felt that this incident 
was extremely strange and was sitting in danger: "again... come again." 


In the second round, Shi Qingxuan had a "three", and Mingyi had a "six"; 
Huacheng still threw a "six", and Xie Pity still threw a "one." 


Shi Qing Xuan slammed and laughed, thanking him for looking at 
Huacheng. The two have not broken the psychic, he said: "...San Lang!" 


This is not the same as saying good! 


Huacheng apologized: "Sorry, sorry, I just forgot. My brother is not angry, 
this is my fault." 


Shi Qingxuan drank again, oh | sleeves: "Okay, this round, I command 
you..." 


Thank you for your help: "And live! We have been off in the last round. 
This round, it is time to ask questions." 


Shi Qing Xuan Haha said: "Ask a question? Yeah. Then, my first question, 
blood rain, in your heart, what is the most painful thing in the world?" 


The smile of Huacheng suddenly faded away. At the same time, the 
Fengshui Temple was slightly silent. 


Shi Qingxuan: "Don't misunderstand, I don't have any special meaning. It's 
really curious, it's the **** rain to explore the position of the ghost king 
like you. In the world, there 1s nothing in the end that can make you feel 
pain. Maybe, not presence?" 


Huacheng asked: "What do you think?" 


Shi Qingxuan thought about it and guessed: "Bronze furnace mountain 
city?" 


This is indeed the first answer that many people will come up with when 
thinking about this issue. Huacheng smiled slightly and said: "Not enough 
fear." 


Shi Qingxuan Qi said: "No? What would it be?" 


When Huacheng touched the corner of the mouth, the arc quickly 
disappeared. "I tell you what it is." 


He whispered: "I watched the loved one being trampled on the 
humiliation, but I couldn't do anything about it. You know that you are 
nothing and you can't do anything. This is the most painful thing in the 
world." 


Hearing words, thanking the whole person, they are holding their breath. 
In the broken Feng Shui Temple, no one should speak, and Shi Qingxuan 
couldn’t say a word for a long time. For a long time, he said: "...oh." 


The look of Mingyi was still cold, and he dialed the fire and said: 
"Continue." 


Shi Qingxuan grabbed his hair and waved his hand: "I asked. Ming 
brother, come." 


So, Mingyi raised her head slightly and stared at her pity, saying: "His 
Royal Highness." 


Thank you for your return, and said, "Well?" 
Mingyi said: "What is the last thing you regret in your life?" 


I didn't expect that Mingyi would not sound loudly on weekdays, but an 
opening was such a blunt question, and Xie pity stunned for a while. 


Shouldn't you listen to the advice and insist on privately lower bounds? 
Should not be self-sufficient, go to Yongan rainfall? Shouldn't you be 
delusional, want to protect Xianle? Still should not leave some people's 
lives? 

He knows that it is not. 

For a long while, thank you for your pity: "The second time soar." 

The other three people in the temple looked at him and did not speak. 
Thanks for a while, for a long time, suddenly returned to God, said: "What 
happened? You, I finished." 

Huacheng whispered: "Nothing. Keep going." 


In the third round, Shi Qingxuan "two", Mingyi "two"; Huacheng "six", 
thankful "one." 


Upon seeing it, Xie pity greatly relieved. 
Heavenly blessing, finally won! 


It was the turn of the teacher Qing Xuan to be punished. He was eager to 
try, as if he was not afraid of anything. "Come on, come on. Feel free!" 


Thanks and smiled: "So, I am free. Masters, please ask first." 


He turned to Mingyi and said: "Adult, next question I asked, you have to 
answer it, don't lie." 


Mingyi did not speak, Shi Qingxuan waved: "Do not worry, Ming brother, 
this person will not lie." 


Thank you, please, "Good. First question: Who am I?" 


Shi Qingxuan awkwardly said: "His Royal Highness, what is the problem, 
you are not you, you are not who you are?" 


Wen Yan, Ming Yi slowly raised his head, and looked at with respect, pity, 
replied: "Sin Leguo Prince, thank you." 


Xie pity nodded and said: "The second question, who is sitting next to me, 
who is it?" 


After a moment, Mingyi replied: "The Lord of the Ghost City, blood rain 
and flowers." 


Thanks to the pity: "So, the last question - who is sitting next to you, 
who?" 


Shi Qingxuan became inexplicable: "His Royal Highness, what are you 
playing? Who am I? I am a wind teacher?" 


Thanks to the pity: "Grandmaster, please answer." 
This time, Mingyi did not answer so quickly. 


After many times dealing with the vernacular immortals, the wonderful 
law that Xie pity found on them is: once the vernacular immortal 1s open, 
there must be at least one sentence lying in three sentences. 


This characteristic is like an ordinary person. If you are physically strong, 

you must drink water within three days. Otherwise, you will dehydrate and 
die. It will not change with the level of ability. Unless it is soaring, it is no 
longer human. 


The squadron is painted by Mingyi, and the door is also in the last 
Mingyiguan. If you want to move your hands and feet, he has the best 
chance. The first suspected nature is him. However, Shi Qingxuan was 


obviously uneasy at the time. If he immediately revealed doubts, it would 
undoubtedly make the teacher Qing Xuan heart shake, leading to the 
vernacular true immortal can absorb more negative emotions from him 
and turn into a source of mana. So, at that time, thankful quickly found 
another possibility. But in fact, he did not give up the most direct 
possibility. 


Although the relationship between the windshield and the landlord is 
excellent, if the geographer is pretending to be a vernacular, the wind 
master will never see it. But what if the vernacular is already silently 
attached to Mingyi? 


Therefore, he only wanted Huacheng to cooperate with him at the 
beginning, and he turned the corners of Mingyi. Huacheng suggested that 
the two of them and Mingyi did not communicate much, and it was 
unnatural for them to talk. It 1s better to use the name of the game first, try 
to create opportunities, let Mingyi say a few more words to see if you can 
find out the truth without being noticed by the wind division and the 
geographer. 


However, Mingyi always talks very little, and the atmosphere is warm and 
cherished. If you are in the game, thank you for listening to every 
sentence. He is open and mostly ambiguous. He can't judge whether he is 
lying. Finally, I had to use the killer, borrowed the flower city's ability, 
secretly manipulated the points of the scorpion, let Mingyi lose, and then 
suddenly throw three questions, so that he was difficult to ride the tiger 
and had to answer on the spot. 


Because it is in the game, Shi Qingxuan still reacts for a while, and still 
thinks that they are joking, so they will not be squandered by the 
vernacular. As long as the answer is wrong, Mingyi will immediately 
suppress him as soon as he reveals his feet. 


Knowing the things like the vernacular immortals, there must be at least 
one sentence in three sentences. Now, thank you for asking two questions. 
The two answers to Mingyi are all true. 


Then, if Mingyi is the vernacular true immortal, this last question, he will 
certainly answer the falsehood. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 109: Feng Shui 
Temple Night Words True and False 2 


If you really want to get away with it, it's okay to make the wording 
ambiguous or make a joke. However, the first two questions are clear and 
concise, no tricks, and the last one should be the same. Otherwise, it is not 
quite like the person of Mingyi, and it proves the abnormality from the 
side. 


Thanks and Mingyi calmly look at each other. For a long while, Mingyi 
finally spoke up. 


He replied in a tone that did not differ from the previous two sentences: 
"One of the five divisions, the younger brother of the Navy, the Qingshi 
Xuan." 


Shi Qingxuan shook his head and said, "Hey, what do you do not say 'My 
best friend'?" 


Mingyi looked at him: "Who is that?" 
Hearing words, thankful and secretly spit out a breath. 


As I said before, although the vernacular is called "Xian", it is not a real 
"Xian". As long as it belongs to the class of goblin ghosts, it is impossible 
to get rid of the characteristics of this group. Three sentences are enough, 
and three sentences are undoubtedly true. It seems that Mingyi 1s no 
problem. Unless the teacher Wudu and Shi Qingxuan are not biological 
brothers, this kind of shocking and reversible shock should not exist. 


Who knows, he hasn't slept in the end, and Mingyi suddenly shot and took 
his throat! 


Xie Li and Hua Cheng also intercepted his hand at the same time. The 
three hands were like three lightnings. The dazzling teacher Qing Xuan 
jumped up and said: "Ming brother! What are you doing?" 


Mingyi stared at Xie, and said: "You have asked three questions, and in the 
last round, I only asked one question." 


Xie pity smiled and said: "Grandmaster, you carefully recall the rules, I 
have not said that I can only ask one question in a round." 


Mingyi said: "That's good. I am asking now. Who are you?" 
Thanks to pity: "Is this question already you have already answered it?" 


Mingyi said: "Maybe I made a mistake. Otherwise, please ask the Prince 
of the Crown to explain why you suddenly want to design this game, why 
do you want to ask these three weird questions. The Lord of the Ghost 
King has a way to use it. On the top, it is inevitable." 


Huacheng smiled and said: "How do you say this? I am happy, how to use 
it." 


It should be noted that Xie Li and Hua Cheng saw that the instrument was 
suspicious, but Ming Yi was equally suspicious. After Mingyi’s sudden 
shot, they spoke and didn’t speak in the psychic circle. Shi Qingxuan 
didn’t know what they were arguing, but he didn’t dare to take the 
earplugs down. He said: “stop and stop. I ordered you to stop and tell me 
what happened, otherwise... or add me one!" He also started the wind fan. 
Mingyi pushed him away and said: "Let's open! Add less chaos!" 


At this time, a gust of wind blew through the smoldering wind, and the 
pile of bonfires surrounded by four people was brought up and down by 
this gust of wind. The fire and shadow are messy, reflecting the temple for 
the face of the two gods and one woman on the stage. It is also like 
laughing and laughing, crying and crying. It is very strange. Another 
instrument of Mingyi grabbed Shi Qingxuan and was alert to the truth: 
"There is something coming." 


Shi Qing Xuan Gang was pushed by him to the ground and fell down. Now 
he is caught by him, and he 1s staring at Venus: "Ming brother! You can't 
do anything good to me!!!" 


Mingyi said: "No time!" 


Xie pity always stared at the two gods and suddenly said: "Look at their 
eyes!" 


The four looked back and saw the two smiling feng shui gods on their 
faces, with four blood marks hanging. It was actually from the eyes of the 
goddess of clay sculpture that blood and tears flowed down. 


The method of opening the light, standing up to the incense and 
worshiping the gods, has a certain deterrent effect on the devil and the 
ghost. Even if you don't shun the house, you can't be destroyed or polluted 
by non-human things. The vernacular true fairy really did, and Shi 
Qingxuan is still here, it makes the wind teacher cry like a wind teacher. 
The blood and tears flowed more and more, and fell to the ground, slowly 
gathering into a twisted and complicated shape. Shi Qingxuan wondered: 
"What is that? Is it... drawing?" 


I can't understand what shape it is. He is not close, just changing direction 
and trying to figure it out. Swearing, thank you for awakening: This is not 
a picture, this is an inverted word! 


He immediately shouted: "Don't look! It is written for you!" 


When Mingyi slammed out, "Boom", the blood on the ground and the two 
statues were smashed into pieces of debris. Shi Qing Xuanmu stunned: 
"Ming brother! You... you, you, don't let my brother know, or he can't spare 
you!" 


Destroying the statues of other priests is a great disrespect to the priest. 
Today, Mingyi’s slap in the face is like a door-to-door game. It’s the same 
as signing a house, and sending people’s signatures to the two old- 
fashioned ear-scrapers, saying that they’re going to know that they’re not 
going to give up, will they pick up the wind and rain. Not known. At this 
time, thankful and unfortunately turned back, and suddenly saw the words 
on the plaques that were put on the side and they were put on the side 
during the day. The plaque is clearly the blue bottom of the gold, written in 


the "Feng Shui Temple", but now it has turned into a red, red and red 
twisted characters, vaguely a "dead" half. 


His eyes quickly caught the eyes of Shi Qingxuan and shouted in the 
psychic array: "Close your eyes!" 


Teacher Qingxuan: "What happened?!" 


Thanks to the pity: "Nothing, that is, the words on your temple plaque 
have changed. The thing knows that you can't hear it now, and you use it 
instead." 


Shi Qingxuan: "Dead! Then I can't listen to it now or watch it. Isn't it 
awkward and awkward?!" 


Thanks for letting go, said: "Nothing is calm, there is us." 


Mingyi grabbed the back collar of Shi Qingxuan and dragged him to the 
side. Shi Qingxuan still closed his eyes and folded his hands together: "It's 
really reassuring!" 


The voice just fell, and suddenly there was a lot of noise outside the 
temple. Thanks for the flowers, the next moment, there was a large group 
of people screaming, like the dark tides coming in. 


This group of people is really strange and strange. The one who was cut 
off, hanged, cut into the head by the big knife, and his stomach was cut 
open... a wide variety. Although Shi Qingxuan couldn't see or see, but he 
felt that the steps were messy, and the chaos was smashed by a few people. 
He said in the psychic circle: "What happened? What happened?? How 
suddenly so many people?" ??" 


Thanks to pity: "No big deal, it’s a **** night tour. OK, we will leave 
quickly." 


In some places, the blood of the fire, in addition to the day's tour | line, 
there is a Yuxing show at night. Not only the people who traveled, but also 
the scary addiction, many ordinary people are also very upset, so they also 


imitated the mascara in the blood of the fire, and they came out at night to 
scare people, I am afraid, right now, they are four People just happened to 
hit this wave of night trips. 


This group of ordinary people's yin makeup does not have the orthodox 
tour in the daytime | the walkers are exquisite and realistic, but the victory 
is more spectacular, the eyes are not clear, and the darkness is unclear, and 
it is very embarrassing. Therefore, there is such a town in the tradition of 
Yuxing. On the night of the performance of the **** fire, the locals will 
not close their homes. These night stalkers who are swaying outside are 
easy to see people in the temple. They found the prey, and they were 
extremely excited. They suddenly rushed in more than 50 people, and a 
broken temple was instantly crowded. The four people were drowned in 
the crowds of the dance, and Xie pour frequently turned back, only to see 
that Huacheng was still around, forever no more than two steps away from 
him, while the other two were rushed to seven or eight steps, saying: 
"Everyone is going out!" 


However, among the night visitors, some are purely fun and fun, while 
others are pranking rogues or small businessmen. They are looking for 
foreign tourists who come to see the **** fires in the distance and squeeze 
some small money to stop them from entangled. Road: "Two sons reward 
points!" "We dress up so hard, fun to enjoy!" "Yes, brother is not easy, one 
year is like this!" "Do not be rewarded Master is coming!" 


Huacheng stood by and watched, and there was no anxiety. After listening 
to it, he laughed and said, "I just want to see, is there any ghost to come to 
me?" 


At this time, Xie pity swept a glance, and suddenly saw the edge of the 
temple crowd, there is a pale-shouldered ghost, is laughing and holding a 
hemp rope circle to a person's neck. 


Although there are noisy people around, everyone is bloody, snotted, and 
constantly killing you, killing you, killing you, you are dead, I am dead, 
and sometimes people scream and fall down, there is no way to tell the 
truth. False, but thankful instinctively felt that the "person" was not right, 


and raised his hand, if the evil flies out, he is hitting the head of the 
hanging neck. 


Sure enough, the slinger screamed and turned into a black smoke, and 
sneaked into the seam. There is no one to pay attention to, others can see 
clearly, in the psychic circle: "Be careful! Something is in troubled 
waters!" 


Compared with the party, this Feng Shui Temple has more than a ghost, if 
it is not a vernacular, it should be a small cockroach that does not know 
where to mix it. Playing ghosts all day, one day will attract real ghosts, 
appearing at this juncture, it is really worse. There are so many people in 
this temple that they are too messy. When they touch their heads and their 
feet on their feet, they can't tell who the ghost was from. Xie pity took 
Huacheng out of the Fengshui Temple. When asked about how the wind 
masters had done it, they found that the mana was not good enough. It was 
almost exhausted and could not be psychic. In a hurry, he said to Huacheng 
Road: "Sanlang borrowed me a mana and returned to you!" 


Of course, this phrase "returning to you" is said casually, and the mana he 
borrowed before has never been able to return. Huacheng Road: "Okay." 
He reached out and grabbed his hand. Xie Pity felt a faint enthusiasm 
passed over, just in the Feng Shui Temple, a few **** people ran out and 
chased him. The last one ran all the way to the internal organs, full of 
corpse spots, a layer of ghosts scattered on the body, thanking the 
subconscious and raising his hand, punched him in the air. 


I only heard an explosion of loud noise, and at the same time, a dazzling 
white light illuminates. After a while, thank you for your reaction. 


The gangster who was mixed in the crowd had only a pile of black 
lacquered coke residue left in the original place. In front of the Feng Shui 
Temple, the entire roof has been bombarded. The noisy night visitors in 
the temple were all stunned by the loud noise and the white light. 


Xie pity looked up at the Feng Shui Temple that had lost the roof, then 
looked down at his hand and finally, slowly turned back and looked at the 
flower city behind him. Huacheng smiled at him: "Is this enough?" 


Thanks for your pity: "Enough. Actually... really, a little, just fine." 
Huacheng Road: "It's a little. Is it still? How much 1s there." 


Thank you for shaking your head. Previously, he also sought the mentor 
Qingxuan, Nanfeng and other people to borrow mana, they also borrowed 
very generous, however, Xie pity has never experienced this kind of blood 
as if the body is turned into electricity, is in the body The feeling of 
circulation. If he said that the mana he borrowed before would save money 
and eat a bite, he would not waste it. Now, his feeling is that eating a bowl 
of ten bowls is not a problem. 


The mana that Huacheng had crossed was too strong, enriching his entire 
body, so that he could hardly move around with a pity, for fear of waving a 
hand, and there was something to blow up next to him. Quietly quiet 
around, he quickly said in the psychic array: "Where is the wind master, 
where are you? I went out of the temple, did not see you." 


Shi Qingxuan said in the line: "Oh my mother... Why did your voice 
suddenly change so loudly? I also left the Feng Shui Temple." 


Thanks for the slightest gain of mana, said: "Sorry, a little uncontrollable. 
How did you leave? Is it alright?" Shi Qingxuan now blocked his ears and 
closed his eyes. Shi Qingxuan replied: "Hey, how can you leave, Ming 
brother took me out. Fortunately, I didn't give the group to death." 


Then, Mingyi’s voice rang in the psychic array. However, what he said 
made the smile that had just burst out on Xie's face condensed. He said: 
"Not me!" 


No? ! 


Oops! Thanks for turning back, said: "The wind master! Who 1s pulling 
you?" 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 110: Fighting 
fairy prince for the wind division 


Shi Qingxuan did not say anything again. 


Thank you for your poor feelings, said: "What about the wind master? 
What are you doing? Are you still there? What happened, why not talk?" 


If it is taken away by the night tourists who are ridiculously fun in the 
chaos, will not suddenly silence, is it already killed? However, it is useless 
to worry about it again. He doesn't even know where the wind division is 
at this moment! 


The crowd finally calmed down, and Mingyi finally got out of the Feng 
Shui Temple. There are rules in the heavens. It is impossible to abuse the 
mana and arbitrarily manifest the spirit of the mortal. If it kills and kills 
people, it must be remembered. This rule can be a bit of a sacred official. 
Otherwise, the group will fly with the roof. It was so easy for everyone to 
react, and wowed and shouted: "Exit, appear! Really!" "The monster is 
coming!" Thanks to pity: "Grandmaster! How did you not hold the wind 
master? Did you see him? When was it lost?" 


Mingyi said: "There are ghosts and stalkers in the crowd." 


I want to come when he sees someone in danger, distracted to save, but he 
lost a friend. Thanks for the pity: "Let's hurry and find it! It shouldn't go 
far." 


Suddenly, the voice of the teacher Qing Xuan re-sounded in the psychic 
array. He laughed loudly: "Ha ha ha ha ha ha ha..." 


Although the laughter is very abrupt, there is always an echo. Thanks for 
the blessing: "The wind master! What happened to you just now, suddenly 
did not speak, I thought you had an accident." 


Teacher Qingxuan: "Ha ha ha ha ha ha ha how could the wind master be so 
easy to accident? I just deliberately joking to scare you. Hahahahahaha 
Ming brother, you bastard, you actually do not hold me, I am going to die, 
I will definitely become Looking for you, hahahahahahaha..." 


Mingyi said: "Less haha. Say people!" 


Xie Pian already knows that the more nervous the person is, the more he is 
afraid, the more he wants to hahaha. This 1s not, he has forgotten even the 

pause, interrupted him: "You didn't speak, did you change your mind? Did 
you change your mind? ?" 


Shi Qingxuan: "T didn't speak. The look did not change. There was no 
resistance." 


Thanks for thinking: "It's broken. This is scary." 


He slowed down his tone and said: "It's very good. Listen to me, the wind 
master, it doesn't matter. You don't want to be afraid, just keep it as it is, 
pretend that nothing is noticed, if anything, quietly in the psychic Talk to 
us, Say it at any time. But don't be found by that thing. You already know 
what it is. Spread your aura light and form a layer of law, and protect it 
around you. This will ensure that you are at least not It will fall or fall into 
the pit. If there is any attack, you can also be aware." 


Shi Qingxuan’s voice is crying without tears: “Oh. Then?” 


Thanks for the pity: "Then take a deep breath. Just like this, how many 
times... Is there a lot better?" 


His voice is very soft and can comfort him. Teacher Qingxuan: "It seems 
to be a little better, thank you Prince." 


Thanks for the pity, he said: "That... you think, if you open your eyes now 
and quietly look at the thing that is pulling you, what will happen?" Can 
you hold it? 


Teacher Qingxuan: "I will die." 


It seems that if Shi Qingxuan is blind, his fear will reach its peak in the 
blink of an eye, becoming the perfect taste and nourishment of the 
vernacular. After that, it is estimated that it will lose its fighting power. 
Moreover, in case he opened his eyes, the thing just stared at him ina 
straight line, and he was not allowed to be a gentleman. On the spot, he 
would vomit and become a star. Thanks for your pity: "Then you still have 
your eyes closed." 


Mingyi said: "When it takes you out of the Feng Shui Temple, what 
direction is it going?" 


Now what they need most is the position of Shi Qingxuan. Shi Qingxuan 
can't see where he is going, but he can estimate the position based on the 
approximate orientation and step steps. Shi Qingxuan said: "I don't know." 


Mingyi: "I don't know this!" 


Shi Qingxuan was furious: "Who would normally remember this kind of 
thing! And I don't think it is you!" 


Aside from the flower city, it was already boring and changed back to the 
red dress, then changed back to black, and then changed into white. 
Almost every time he turned back, he instantly changed his appearance. 
The hair style, accessories and boots of each body were different, 
sometimes playful, sometimes elegant, sometimes chilling, and 
sometimes gorgeous. I am grateful to see how grateful I am, and I can’t 
help myself. After I found out, I blinked sharply and stopped the excuses 
of "good" and "good-looking". "And live and live. Now is not a time of 
quarrel. You have to make a big step. The farther it is, the harder it is to 
find it." 


Shi Qingxuan painfully said: "I said that you really can't find me, it's five 
or sixty steps. It's definitely no more than one hundred steps. It's still slow 
and slow!" 


Less than one hundred steps? Mingyi quickly rushed out and disappeared 
at the end of the street. However, he must be embarrassed, and he 
reappeared at the entrance of Feng Shui Temple, saying: "No!" 


broken. Thanks for your pity: "Shrinking thousands of miles!" 


After the vernacular was really brought out of the Feng Shui Temple, I was 
afraid that I would immediately display the law of shrinking the land and 
send them to other places. Otherwise, the distance of less than one hundred 
steps would have been found. This spell is open, and it knows where it will 
be sent. To find the whereabouts of the wind division is tantamount to 
finding a needle in a haystack! 


Things can't be done, thank you immediately: "I went to the heavenly 
psychic array to announce." 


Shi Qingxuan was busy: "Slow! Don't go down to Prince Edward! You 
promised me to keep it secret. My brother will soon go to the third day of 
the robbery. Three big hurdles, absolutely can't be broken at this step! ” 


Mingyi said: "Let's drag on, let you robbery now." 


Shi Qingxuan angered: "I can't do it. I can't do it. How many eyes are 
staring at my brother. This thing is deliberately staring at this opportunity. 
It's awkward, don't think! I just died." I have to dig it out after my brother 
has finished robbing!" 


For a long while, Mingyi said: "Good. Good!" 
Xie pity was keenly aware that his tone was actually pressing on an anger. 
This was an unprecedented fierce emotion, and he was uneasy and 


unwilling to let him develop more troubles. He screamed: "The wind 
master, that thing has been holding Are you leaving?" 


Teacher Qingxuan: "Yes. It is holding my arm." 


Thanks to pity: "Is there anything special about it? For example, special 
demon, or special smell, touch and the like." 


"No. Nothing." 


"What about the surrounding environment? For example, is the road under 
your feet rugged or flat? Have you stepped on something or kicked?" Xie 
Pity wants to see if you can confirm the approximate range as soon as 
possible according to the surrounding environment. Shi Qingxuan: "The 
road is very strange! It is very soft and floating, 1t seems to be on the 
cloud." 


"..." Thanks for your pity. "You are so scared that your legs are soft..." 


In the five senses of Shi Qingxuan, he has already sealed the second sense. 
It is difficult to give any clues. I am afraid that it will be broken. Although 
Huacheng has been watching the play on the sidelines, but in the end, he 
himself is watching the play, and the teacher Qingxuan 1s not a relative, or 
a ghost person, there is no reason to help the gods; second, thank you Pity 
does not want to always bother him to help, so he set his mind and said: 
"The wind master, I have a way to get you out of the thing right away, but I 
need your permission." 


Shi Qingxuan immediately said: "Okay, I promise!" 

Huacheng suddenly fixed his figure and said: "Moving the soul?" 
"what?" 

Thanks for your pity: "Yes. It 1s the soul of the move!" 


Move the soul **, as the name suggests, 1s a soul change spell. See what 
you see with my eyes. This type of spell is not commonly used. One of the 
burning abilities is extremely ferocious. Very few of them are willing to 
hand over the most important body control. Huacheng condensed his look 
and said: "Brother, be careful." 


Shi Qingxuan: "What do you do with it?" 
Thanks to pity: "I am not afraid of it, it does not matter." 


Mingyi said: "Change." 


Huacheng said: "Brother, think again." 

Suddenly, Shi Qingxuan said: "It stopped." 

Wen Yan, thanked the pity in the psychic array: "No hesitation, now!" 
Shi Qingxuan bit his teeth and said: "Please, you, Prince Edward!" 
Thanks for your pity: "Good!" 


The voice just fell, he closed his eyes, his body suddenly became 
extremely light, as light as if to float to the sky; suddenly became 
extremely heavy, sinking as if to fall into the ground. After a while turning 
to the sky, it gradually became real, and it was still closed. There 1s no 
sound in the ear. 


One hand is holding his arm and standing still. 


Xie pity blinked sharply, one hand took the earplugs, the other hand turned 
over, the anti-customer stunned the vernacular true fairy, smiled: "Hello?" 


Shi Qingxuan closed his eyes for a long time, and it was dark all around. 
Therefore, Xie pity had just blinked in his body for a moment, unable to 
adapt to the darkness, and could not see anything. But the thing that caught 
him has become what he is holding. If the evil is not there, Xie pity has 
specially made a lockman, such as a steel shackle that usually clamps the 
hand, so that the other party can not get away with a spell. Inside the 
Psychic Array, Shi Qingxuan’s voice said: "His Royal Highness! Are you 
okay? If you can't do it, don't you change it first, or I'm on top of it!" 


It seems that Shi Qingxuan has also safely changed to his body. Xie pity 
firmly locked the vernacular true fairy, kicked more than 30 heavy kicks in 
the blink of an eye, said: "It's good!" Just just moved the soul, will not 
adapt, wait for a moment to adapt The shots can be more ferocious. 
Teacher Qingxuan: "His Highness, I will tell you the law of my magic 
weapon, you can use it with your mana!" 


Thanks for the lack of a sword, the "fan" of the wind fan, and said: 
"Good!" 


Shi Qingxuan said again: "I also tell you the law of the woman, my 
woman's mana is stronger!" 


Xie pity categorically refused: "No. This is not necessary!" 


Huacheng Shen Sheng: "Brother, you look around and tell me what kind of 
place." 


Mingyi said: "No, let me first say what is fighting with you." 


A few words down, the eyes of thankfulness gradually adapted to the dark 
environment, he blinked and looked at the black shadow on the opposite 
side. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 111: Dou 
Zhenxian Prince for the Wind 2 


However, it is clear that the outlines of the branches and leaves around the 
leaves have been clearly seen. The shadow of the shadows 1s not really 
true anyway. It seems that there is a group of monsters and black fog 
hovering around the things. 


The windshield's windshield fan is a unique magic weapon. It can blow 
away the demon fog and clear the world. Thanks to the teacher's teaching 
of the Qingxuan, the mind meditation, and the fan flies. There was a gust 
of wind on the ground, and the hula lala had four wild leaves trembled, and 
even a few weak saplings were pulled up. The power was not strong. 
Unfortunately, this gust of wind blew a bit, and did not aim at the target. 


The magic weapon ts not so easy to call. He is not the owner of the wind 
fan. After all, it is naturally not as easy to use as the teacher Qingxuan. 
The angle and strength are not easy to grasp. It is not strong or weak, not 
partial or counter. It is. After discovering this, Xie pity decisively gave up, 


changed the strategy, and the fan’s “ ” received it directly as a weapon of 
attack and began to madly point to the other side’s body; then a “brush” 
exhibition, covered with a layer of aura On the edge of the fan, a paper fan 
is made into a steel knife, and the sound of the wind is smashing and the 
light is shining. Shi Qingxuan probably guessed what happened, and 
collapsed: "Do you have anything wrong with your Royal Highness! I am a 
ritual, you actually use it as a weapon! I am violent!" 


This is acommon problem of Wushen. In the busy schedule, thank you for 
taking the time to calm down: "Almost, almost!" 


The tone of the city is aggravated: "Brother!" 


Thank you for knowing what he is urging, and while he is on the side, he 
quickly scans the surrounding environment. There are beautiful mountains 
and rivers, pavilions and pavilions, there is nothing special about it. I 
really can't judge where I am. The vernacular really noticed his 


movements, probably guessing his purpose, and suddenly said: "You are 
not a teacher." 


Thanks to the body shape, the mind 1s not stagnation, "In general, I should 
not think of moving the soul so quickly. Why did it immediately find out 
that I am not a teacher?" No matter what, continue to fight!" 


He is not human, and the vernacular 1s really a bit of a parry. He said, "I 
will fall down immediately!" 


Sure enough, it began to predict the poisoning of the pity. Thanks for the 
pity, but I didn’t even hear it. That vernacular is really sweet again: "You 
will be defeated!" 


Thanks and laughs: "After more than 800 years ago, I lost, how about 
losing a few games? Where can I lose? Let's die! What you say to me is 
useless." 


Huacheng Road: "Brother, if you can't judge where you are, just use the 
windshield to wind up a hurricane, I will know where you are!" 


Coincidentally, Xie Li also thought of this method, saying: "Good!" Fang 
wants to start, suddenly, the vernacular is really sneer, said: "Someone is 
coming?" 


Xie Pity is inexplicably vigilant, and sure enough, that thing whispers: 
"Reassured, the person who is looking for you, you will definitely look at 
him and die in front of yourself!" 


Hearing words, thank you for not laughing. A heart hangs violently, and 
even the breath stagnate. 


The next moment, he actually said: "Shut up!" 


In the vernacular, the real fairy stunned him more than fifty times in a 
flash, kicked and kicked it on his head, and was stunned, but he sighed 
deeply. It was a sigh of satisfaction, and it seemed to have tasted the most 


delicious and sneer. If he didn't pay attention, thanking him for letting him 
“ee What he wanted from himself. 


However, Xie Pity did not have a heart to scream, but only because of the 
sentence, it really made him a sudden heart attack. Even if it is known that 
Huacheng is not so easy to say, "dead in front of him", as far as this thing 
is concerned, the flower city has already died, but he is still unable to 
control himself with a trepidation. In this case, he could not tolerate 
himself even listening. 


Although everyone in the psychic array could not detect his abnormality, 
the flower city seemed to be intimate and alert: "Brother? Is he talking to 
you?" 


Thanks: "It’s nonsense...no! It doesn’t say anything.” 


Huacheng immediately understood, and said: "He is looking for death! 
You will tell me immediately, I am now." 


Thank you for your help: "No, don't come over first. Never come over!" 
Huacheng Road: "Tell me!" 


Teacher Qingxuan: "I am sorry to interrupt you. I said that you really 
exchanged the psychic password. You have not found your Royal 
Highness. You are wrong, you are wrong!" 


Thanks to this, it was discovered that after the original use of the soul- 
moving **, every word that Huacheng said was psychic to him alone, but 
he was fiercely confused because of the fighting, and did not notice this. 
Directly responded to the psychic array, and now, their private psychic 
things can be considered exposed. But now I don't want to be embarrassed, 
thank you: "Nothing, give me half a column of incense, I can solve this 
thing!" After re-blocking his ears, the offensive was even more fierce, and 
he was absorbed to deal with the vernacular. He did not know, in the town 
of Bogu, Huacheng listened to his words, raising his hand is a palm, 
playing Mingyi trapped in the ground, and even in the Xie pity shell 
teacher Qing Xuandao: "Change back." 


Shi Qingxuan had already planned to change it back immediately. He said, 
"What do you do with blood and rain? I will change it now. Your Royal 
Highness is helping me. You can still tell me what to do, and what to do 
with Ming Ming!" When I think about it, this is the body of thankfulness. 
Of course, Huacheng will not fight. If you must fight something, it can 
only be Mingyi. Over there, thank you for being pitiful, and suddenly 
heard the teacher Qing Xuan crying in the psychic array: "His Royal 
Highness, trouble you to plug your ears and escape a little, I have to 
change back!" 


Thanks to the pity: "Can you do it?" 
Shi Qingxuan: "I can't fight it, I can still run away!" 


So, politely kicked the vernacular true fairy to fly a few feet away, turned 
and rushed for a while, and said: "Wait, you don't have to escape! Waiting 
for me to set up a guardian array here! Wind Master Do you have any 
artifacts on your body? If you don't have a device, precious treasures will 
do!" 


Shi Qingxuan listened and said: "The treasures? Some of them, you touch 
my neck, there is a long life lock, can't that work?" 


Thanks for the pity, Shi Qingxuan actually wore a heavy long-life golden 
lock. The golden light was rich and delicate, and he said: "Yes. This is a 
rare treasure, great!" 


Shi Qingxuan: "Is it? There are still: I have a jade belt on my waist, a hand 
on the agate, a few beads on the boots, and the sandalwood is bigger than 
you. Oh, it’s said that the dust is It is also very rare, I don’t know what 
kind of scorpion has fallen from it...” He said seven or eight pieces in one 
breath, “I’m all in my possession, you can see if you can use it.” 


Can be used. All are rare treasures! 


Xie pity is shocked in my heart, not worthy of being a **** of wealth, not 
a brother of the Navy, and said: "I can use it. I am here to find a room for 
you. After you change it, you still block your ears, don't look out. Stay in 
the house, don't go out, wait for us!" 


Shi Qingxuan is crying and crying: "You are too reliable for your Royal 
Highness! Thank you! From now on, you are my second best friend. What 
good things will happen in the future, this wind master will not forget you. 


! " 
Thank you for your pity and politeness. "Thank you!" 


During the conversation, the vernacular was really far away from him. 
Thanks to the pity of a pavilion, rushing in and waving, all doors and 
windows were automatically closed. He first bolted the door to lock the 
gold lock, bite the finger and draw the character, and then set the treasures 
one by one, with a blood array, a series of action compression in the 
shortest time, and finally sit in the center of the house, close your eyes , 
said: "One, two, three. Move the soul ** - homing!" 


As if it was violently thrown high and then fell to the ground, after a while 
turning into the sky, thankful again felt the feet touched the ground, the 
figure was slightly unstable, seems to be falling to the side. When you are 
not leaning, you will be held steady by one hand. When he blinked, he 
listened to the voice of the flower city and said: "Brother, I think you 
better explain it." 


Xie pity grabbed his arm and stood up. He was about to talk. Suddenly he 
found that he was missing a person. "Where is the Master?" 


Huacheng Road: "I don't know." 


Thanks for your pity: "Don't know?" A look at the side, there is a human 
pit on the ground, Mingyi is slowly crawling out of the pit. 


He has nothing to say, no words for a moment, the voice of the spirit of the 
teacher, Qing Xuan, sounds: "Hey?" 


Thank you for your pity, saying: "Is it coming?" 


There are so many treasures in the Qingxuan body. He made the defense of 
the house solid, and the vernacular should not be invaded. Even if it is 
higher, it will take a lot of time. Shi Qingxuan said: "Nothing is not there. 
Your Royal Highness is really true. It is as stable as Taishan. It makes 
people feel safe. I don’t think there is a three days and three nights. I don’t 
want something to break in, just... actually Here." 


Thank you for your pity: "Where? Do you know this place?" 


Teacher Qingxuan: "Of course I know. This is the dumping station! The 
place where I am flying." 


Thanks for your pity, the heart said: "The dumping station?" 


Shi Qingxuan seems to have turned around again in the house, and once 
again affirmed: "Yes, I will come back every 10 years in this place, there 
will be no mistakes." 


It is no wonder that the vernacular is really a fairy, and it is not that the 
real teacher is in the shell. If it is the deity, once you look at it, you will 
know that it is a dumping station, and you don’t have to look around to 
confirm it. 


After Mingyi climbed out of the pit, he squatted and drew on the ground. 
After a few strokes, I suddenly slammed the palm of my hand and ruined 
the ground. Huacheng’s eyes were cold, and Xie’s pity also said: 
“Grandmaster, what are you doing?” 


Mingyi stood up and said: "There is no way to shrink the ground. You have 
to go." 


Thanks for the pity: "What can't be used?" 


Mingyi said: "Only just now, some people put the vicinity of the dumping 
station, no, it was the entire area of the shrinking ground connection point, 
all ruined." 


Not long ago, Shi Qingxuan was clearly taken to the dumping platform by 
a thousand miles. It seems that after Shi Qingxuan hid in the house, the 
vernacular true sensation quickly reacted and moved his hands and feet in 
an attempt to hold their footsteps. This is equivalent to crossing a 
mountain, but the mountain road was destroyed by the collapse. Under 
this, no one wants to use the land to the vicinity of the dumping station. 
Thanks to the pity: "How long will it take to leave now?" 


Mingyi has turned and set off, saying: "Half hour!" 


Thanks in the psychic circle: "The wind master, we are going to your side 
now, arrived within half an hour, you are there waiting for us to come to 
you. If something knocks, you Never open the door." 


Teacher Qingxuan: "Okay is good. That is of course. I don't need you to 
say that I know that I am not a three-year-old child. I won't open the door. 
What about you... you guys, you must be faster." !" 


Fortunately, Bogu Town and the dumping station are not 1n the north, and 
the distance is still within the acceptable range. The three immediately set 
off. On the way, Xie pity ran freely, and found that the soul-moving ** 
really burned the mana, and only then spent a powerful wave on him, and 
now he has been used for most of it. 


Huacheng noticed his movements and said: "Is my brother still?" 


Xie pity quickly shook his head and said: "No, I really thanked Saburo for 
his generosity." 


Huacheng Road: "You're welcome, I said, how much is there." After a 
pause, he was half joking. "However, when my brother is still mana, can I 
collect interest?" 


Xie pity and cough, I still can't afford to still have a problem, of course, 
the mouth is still **** the scalp: "Well... good." 


It was originally scheduled for half an hour, but the three were 
extraordinary, and the situation was 100,000, and it was naturally faster. 


When I arrived at the dumping station, I thanked you for seeing it. All four 
are caused by his chaos, the wind fan, the fan does not listen to the trees 
and the grass, which 1s inevitable. Mingyi said: "His Royal Highness, in 
which room did you set up the Guardian? Can you remember?" 


Of course, remember, I am also looking for it. After a while, my eyes are 
bright and I am holding my finger: "It 1s that small building." 


The three went to the small building. The closer you are, the more assured 
you are, the more you seem to see the dawn of hope. However, when they 
turn around, Xie pity a pair of pupils tightened. 


The door of the small building was actually opened. Two thresholds, "Oh, 
oh yeah," are opening and closing in the cold night wind. 2k novel reading 
network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 112: Open the 
door and sneak out 


" " 


Thank you, "What about people?" 


The three people entered the small building, and there was no one in the 
house. The various magic weapons were arranged according to the original 
appearance. Only when the door was opened, they were all invalidated. Xie 
Li shouted in the psychic array: "The wind master? Where are you?" 


On the way, because of the tight road, plus Shi Qingxuan is too excited, 
thank you for suggesting that he should meditate first and calm down, do 
not think about it, and scare yourself, Shi Qingxuan feels very reasonable, 
and his speech is gradually less. It is not that there is no sudden echo, so 
thankfulness is not aware of the abnormality. At the moment, there is no 
one to call, and no one should, he has a foreboding premonition in his 
heart. Because there are only two possibilities for this situation: Shi 
Qingxuan deliberately ignores it, or he has lost consciousness. 


There are more than ten magic weapons on the windshield, and all of them 
are rare. All of them are used by the pity, and nothing can easily break 
through from the outside world. Even if it can break through, as Shi 
Qingxuan said, at least three days and three nights, and it is impossible to 
break the traces without violence. However, now the doors and windows of 
this small building are in good condition, and there is no authentic ladder. 
Xie pity returned to the door, picked up the golden lock on the ground, 
took it and looked at it carefully. He said: "It is his own initiative to open 
the door." 


It’s time to clear the reinforcements for a while. Is there any reason to find 
a way out at this last minute? Thanks for the unreasonable explanation, 
"He said that he would not open the door to anyone other than us. Why did 
he do this?" 


Mingyi Shen Sheng said: "Maybe the person he thought was coming is us." 


Hearing words, there was a dim picture suddenly appearing in his mind: 
three people came from the small building, which were themselves, 
Huacheng, and Mingyi. They stood outside the door and knocked on the 
door. The teacher Qing Xuan in the pavilion was ecstatic, and when he 
rushed out, he opened the door, and the three "people" outside the door 
surrounded him, slowly showing him a strange smile. The gold lock in the 
hands of Shi Qingxuan fell to his feet and never got up again. 


He shook his head quickly and said: "No. I have never heard of the ability 
of the vernacular to disguise." 


Mingyi said: "Maybe it has found other helpers." 


Thanks for thinking, and vetoed: "The series of events we encountered 
today are all sudden. We didn't expect to have such a squad to protect the 
wind masters. It should not be so fast. You can find the demon of the 
helper. Moreover, we did not talk to the wind master, will you inform him 
in the psychic array when you come? The outsiders are really fake, and 
when you ask, you can easily be fooled." 


Speaking of this, thankful pity suddenly stopped, muttered: "Unless, is his 
familiar person, told him to open the door." 


Mingyi said: "Familiar people? Why do you see it?" 


At this time, Huacheng said a sentence: "He blocked his ears and could not 
hear anything." 


Xie pity grabbed him at once and said: "Sanlang, well said! Because of 
this, it is said that it must be a familiar person. Because the wind master is 
blocking his ears, he can't hear the outside world! Unless he I took the 
earplugs down, but will he? He is afraid that he will not die at all. So, if 
you want to trick him into opening the door, there is only one way." 


Psychic! 


Thanks for a few quick steps, said: "I mean, during the time we came, 
there was a man who secretly privately and psychic, and said something to 
him, let him open the door. If you are not a familiar person, you will not 
know the psychic password of the Fengshi adults, because the passwords 
of the officers are strictly confidential, will not be easily known to 
outsiders, and will not be known to the ghosts of the vernacular. And this 
person should be very trustworthy, otherwise he would not open the door 
without thinking too much." 


Huacheng Road: "Or, he is not familiar with this person, but this person is 
very familiar with him, and said the reason for him to open the door." 


Xie pity seriously considered this possibility, said: "In theory, as long as 
you know the psychic password, you can convey information to the wind 
master, but a strange voice suddenly speaks to yourself, the wind master 
does not think Strange? When he heard it, he should tell us on the spot in 
the psychic array. Unless the mysterious person who was psychic to him, 
the first sentence of the opening shocked him. But what would it be? 
words?" 


Mingyi said: "Threats?" 


Thanks to the pity: "How can you threaten? "You don't come out? I will tell 
you, brother, I am coming back to entangle you?'" Immediate veto, "Not 
quite like." 


That vernacular true fairy may not be clear about Shi Qingxuan’s concerns. 
Moreover, it is not a sacred official. Is there any way to immediately let 
the Navy Master discover its existence? Half an hour of reinforcements 
will arrive, and Shi Qingxuan will not wait for half an hour. In the end, it’s 
still a problem that the fight won’t win the battle. Don’t forget, it’s never 
been entangled in the teacher’s no crossing, only staring at the teacher’s 
Qing Xuan, specializing in the soft persimmon pinch, maybe it’s also on 
the navy Very taboo, may not dare to take the initiative to provoke. 


Mingyi said: "Finally, find another half hour." 


Thanks for understanding his meaning, nodded and said: "Well, if you 
can't find him after half an hour, no matter how the wind masters object, 
you must also inform the Navy Master. Split it! Let's go here, There 1s a 
lot of trouble for you." 


Mingyi turned and left. Thanks for the pity and rushing to find people, 
while still not giving up, shouting in the psychic array, the teacher Qing 
Xuan, but there has been dead. Huacheng Road: "How?" 


Xie pity shook his head and said: "No response." 


The ominous shadows in his heart grew thicker and thicker. Every room 
was rummaging through every room in every building, and all the nearby 
houses were rummaged. However, they were not seen at all. 


After a short time, the two found the highest one in this area. This building 
is obviously the protagonist of this piece. The center building has been 
renovated many times, and it is gorgeous. Many walls still have verses on 
the wall. Thanks to the look of the plaque: "The wine table", involuntarily 
said: '" Wine '?" 


199 


Huacheng Road: "Yes, this place is the original address of ‘ 
Thanks to him, he said: "So 1s it really relevant?" 


Huacheng Road: "Well." A few simple words told him. It turned out that 
when the legendary teacher Qing Xuan was a man, he often drank here 
after the monastic practice, drunk and lying on the platform, so unhappy. 
One day, under the tall building, there was a bully in the often fishy 
township to bully the good people. Shi Qingxuan saw it upstairs, and 
immediately poured it on the glass. He poured a glass of fine wine and 
applied a small spell. The wine just fell on the bully head. On, actually 
stunned him. Later, Shi Qingxuan was no longer a teacher, and still loved 
the world. He still stayed the same and hang around here. On the day of the 
ascent, I am also drinking here. 


It’s ridiculous to fly when drinking, but it’s not a big deal. Sometimes the 
chance 1s coming at such a strange moment. Xie’s pity is still flying ina 


dream when he falls asleep. Maybe it will appear in the future. When you 
are flying up, you will definitely become a wonder. 


In short, the literati poetry has always liked this place with legends and 
stories. It is often possible to poetry and poetry, expressing their longing 
for the fairy tales. Thank you for your understanding, this is a scenic spot. 
There were no tourists in the big night. When it was tomorrow, many 
tourists were horrified to find that many houses and trees were being 
blown away, and the big windshield appeared. 


However, this "less-jundy" scene is not the same as Xie Pity originally 
imagined. At this time, he listened to Huacheng Shen Sheng: "Brother, I 
will deal with a little thing first. You must be careful here, I will go back." 


Thank you for your thoughts: "What is 1t?" 


I thought of the angry voice when I was in the city, and with the bad face at 
the moment, I guessed: "Are you going to find the vernacular true fairy?" 


Huacheng suddenly paused and said: "No." 


If it is not, then it is inconvenient to ask more. Xie pity nodded: "You used 
to come to play, there is something right now, you are gone. You are 
careful." 


Huacheng Road: "Well." paused, and said, "When I come back, I will tell 
you something." 


Thanks for your pity, he blurted out: "What?" However, the figure of 
Huacheng has disappeared. 


After half an hour, there is still nothing to gain in the psychic line: 
"Grandmaster! How are you there? I have not found it here, I am going 
back." 


Mingyi also said: "No!" 


Thanks: "No, I can't stand it. Let's meet at the center of the dumping 
station. I will tell the Navy now." 


After that, he immediately meditated the spiritual psychic password, 
saying: "Learning is there? You may find the Navy Master? Please tell him 
that he is in a hurry, please come to the dumping station to see you!" 


A clear male voice rang in the ear, it seems that the spirit at the moment is 
a male. He said: "His Royal Highness Prince? The Navy is here for me. He 
has never loved to go out and move around. Maybe it is not coming. Is 
there anything you are looking for? I can tell." 


At this time, thankfulness has already returned to the main building of the 
dumping station. I saw a thing hanging outside the pouring platform. It 
seems to be a white cloth, floating in the night wind. Thanks for your pity, 
the heart said: "Is there something originally there?" 


Going into it again, he finally saw it - isn't that the dress that Shi Qingxuan 
wore? 


At this time, Mingyi shouted in the Psychic Array: "His Royal Highness! 
Come to the tallest building on the dumping station, fast!!!" 


Thanks for a spirit, the spirit 1s on the other side: "His Royal Highness? 
Are you still there?" 


Thanks for your pity: "Let him hurry up! The wind master is up!" 


After finishing this sentence, he rushed to the floor, and there was no voice 
over there. It was probably that Lingwen was also scared by his sentence. 
He quickly went to the teacher and said nothing. And on the tall building, 
in the middle of the ground, there is a person lying down, it 1s Shi 
Qingxuan. 


Shi Qingxuan's eyes are closed, there is no trauma, no blood, and another 
person will lift him up, it is Mingyi. Shi Qingxuan sat up unconsciously, 
and the same thing fell from his arms. He looked at it with a fixed eye and 
tightened his heart. It was actually a fan of the wind division divided into 
two halves. These unique magic weapons can not be met, and it 1s not 
necessarily refined for hundreds of years, and it is still the first implement 
of the wind division, and it has been destroyed! 


Thanks to the pity: "We have been here before, clearly no one!" 


As soon as the voice fell, he discovered something new. Before he and 
Huacheng came to the wall, there were many poems on the wall, such as 
the singer and the singer, the savage and the savage, the savage, the 
condensed, but now they all disappeared, as if they were erased by force, 
only stay The next sentence is the original blood red that does not exist, a 
row of eight characters, bloody: "No good start can not be good!" 


It was the day when Shi Qingxuan was born, and the vernacular true 
immortal judged him! 


At this time, Mingyi was cold and asked: "His Royal Highness, who is 
with you?" 


Thanks for your pity, my heart said: "Oops! Saburo actually left at this 
time!" 


When he was not around him, Shi Qingxuan had an accident. This is really 
a bit of a mouthful. However, Xie's face was quiet and solemn: "I asked 
him to help me search for the whereabouts of the vernacular." 


Mingyi said: "When did he go?" 


Xie's face does not change the color: "It's just right. Leave no more than 
half a musk time." 


In fact, time is of course much greater than that. But thank you for not 
thinking about Huacheng, of course, you can't let others have the 
opportunity to doubt, and have more troubles. 


At this time, the sound of the thunder rushed from the sky, and there was 
actually an eight-carrying golden car on the night sky, piercing the clouds, 
and heading towards it. 


I couldn't use the shrinking ground to the dumping station. The teacher did 
not even drove directly to the golden car. It should be noted that this 
copper horse gold car ran, and it was very popular. If it was seen by a 


mortal who couldn’t think of the starry sky in the middle of the night, it 
would be rare to make a fuss in the world. This is really not afraid of 
things. Thanks for watching the golden car coming to the forefront, 
immediately said: "Grandmaster, if there is a priest in the future, please 
don't mention the flower city owner, okay? Many of the priests in the 
heavens like him to add oil and vinegar. It’s nothing to do with it, so don’t 
make complicated things simple.” 


Mingyi looked at him and said: "Okay." It was simply a promise, and he 
continued to check the situation of the teacher Qingxuan. Thanks for the 
sigh of relief, however, when I saw the motionless wind division, my heart 
sank again. 


The golden car was booming, but for a long time, dragging the road, Yan 
Xia Rui fell to the ground, waiting for a small priest outside the car, the 


three big priests down the car, actually the teacher Wu Du, , Ling 
Wen, Mid-Autumn Festival The top ten, came three at a time. Of course, 
thank you for forgetting that you are the head of the Tenth. The teacher had 
no eyebrows and tight eyebrows. He slid his face and fell into his car. He 
followed the sailor's fan and went upstairs. He and Lingwen followed him. 
The teacher did not see the younger brother who was lying on the ground, 
and his face suddenly changed. He grabbed it and said: "Qing Xuan? Qing 
Xuan! What is going on?" 


Thanks to pity and conciseness: "The Fengshi adults have met the 
vernacular." 


" " 


The teacher is unbelievable: "What do you say? What is the vernacular?" 


When I heard these four words, not only did the teacher not have a cross, 
but the face of Yan and Lingwen also changed. It seems that the teacher 
has no temperament, and they have heard it. Observing the look of these 
three people, thank you for not seeing who is falsifying, who is actually 
secretly stealing, is very natural. Especially if the teacher has no ferry, 
there can never be a holiday. Lingwen took a bunch of bottles and cans 
from the sleeve and said, "Let's feed it." 


Then he said to him: "His Royal Highness, it is you." 


Thanks to pity: "There is no way to go back and forth in heaven, not just a 
few people." 


He said: "It seems that every time I see you, I can involve another person. 
This time it won't be." 


Thanks for the pity: "No, no. Of course not." 


He squinted and said something, and Mingyi really kept his promise and 
did not say anything. I stopped talking, waved my hand, took my men, and 
went around. In this way, Huacheng’s departure is a good thing, at least not 
at the scene. The teacher did not wake up to the teacher Qingxuan, but 
inadvertently swept the eight blood-red characters on the white wall, his 
face was distorted. 


His face became paler than the wall, as if he was shaking with anger and 
shouted: "Who wrote this? Who wrote it?!" 


Although it is drinking, the voice is fainting. At this time, Lingwen said: 
"The wind master is awake!" 


Xie pity immediately squatted down and said: "The wind master?" 


Sure enough, Shi Qingxuan slowly opened his eyes. The teacher did not 
push the other people away, said: "Qing Xuan? How are you? Is there 
something wrong with you? Who is hurting you!" 


Shi Qing Xuan had been stunned for a while, and he gradually returned to 
God. Once I got back to God, the first thing I saw was the face of the 


teacher. The next moment, what everyone did not expect happened. 


He pushed open the division without a cross, and yelled at his head: "Ah, 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 113: Laughing, 
messing up, messing up 


The teacher was pushed by him without a ferry, and the water teacher was 
almost sitting down on the ground, and he was so embarrassed that he was 
so embarrassed that he was half-hearted and said: "Qing Xuan is a 
brother." 


Shi Qing Xuan said: "I know it is you!!!" 


Since I know that there is no teacher, no sorrow and confusion, why is this 
reaction? 


The teacher did not cross and reached out: "It's okay..." Shi Qingxuan 
opened and said: "Nothing is a fart! How could it be okay! Don't talk, ah! I 
can't stand it!" 


As soon as this statement came out, not only did the division have no 
cross, but the spirits on the side and the sly face that had come back from 
the subordinates changed. Ruan said: "Qing Xuan, don't make a fuss, you 
say this is not to slap your brother's face, my heart is down | frost?" 


Pingsu Shi Qingxuan heard the opening, not to blame him for two 
sentences, but now he is holding his head and not ignoring it. He always 
confesses himself: "I don't want to listen to anything. Don't say anything." 
You let me calm down. Go, let's go!" 


The teacher Wudu finally couldn’t stand it. 
He shouted: "What are you talking nonsense!" 


Lingwen also said: "The wind master, if you have something, you will say 
it, and you can solve it by saying it..." 


Shi Qingxuan angered: "Do you understand what I said?! You are rolling, 
you can't roll!!!! Ah! Ah!!!!" He snarled in madness, shouting and 


shouting Actually, spit out a blood, thank you: "Wind Master!" 


The teacher did not grasp the pulse of his life, and explored for a moment, 
when he looked horrible than the ghost, it seemed that he had to vomit a 
blood on the spot. Thanks to pity: "What happened to the Navy Master, the 
Wind Master?" He said that he would reach out and explore. The teacher 
did not cross but violently opened his hand and glared at it. It seemed that 
he could not let Xie pity explore the teacher. What is the situation in Xuan. 
Immediately, he said to his brother: "You are sick, you are scared, I will 
take you back to cure. You can be cured." 


Shi Qingxuan stared at his eyes and said in a word: "I am not sick. I am 
sick, you should be the clearest! You should not think that I am crazy, I am 
sober, I have never been so awake!" 


When the teacher did not cross him, he dragged him into the car and said, 
"You don't understand, don't say it." 


Shi Qingxuan screamed: "Ming brother, Ming brother saved me, Prince 
Edward saved me!" 


He stretched out his hands and grabbed one hand. Both Xie Li and Ming Yi 
held the hand he had stretched out. The teacher did not cross but dragged 
him out arbitrarily. He said, "Go, it's okay, my brother is here. ” 


Shi Qingxuan 1s still yelling, and he and the spirit help the teacher to hold 
him down. Mingyi said: "Your brother does not want to go back with you!" 


Thanks for the pity: "The vernacular is still not solved, the Navy Master is 
going to..." 


The teacher did not have a strong voice: "What is the vernacular, I don’t 
know what you are talking about. He is sick, his mind is confused, nothing 


more!" 


Thanks to the pity: "But the wind master 1s..." 


The teacher did not cross them and said: "This is my brother. Can't I be 
good for him? My family's business, don't bother the two outsiders to 
bother! Please ask the two adults not to talk outside, just manage yourself. 
"When you finished," waved in front of Shi Qingxuan, squatting down, 
stunned and forced to take the golden car. Although his words are ugly, he 
listened to his gratitude. This is the reason. After all, the teacher is a 
brother who is a younger brother of Shi Qingxuan. Does he still harm the 
teacher? Moreover, there are two other priests to accompany them, and it 
is safest to go back with them. Everyone in the family has come forward, 
how can foreigners continue to intervene? 


The fan of the wind split in half was left untouched on the ground, and the 
spirit picked it up. He thanked the two people: "His Royal Highness, the 
Master of the Master, don’t want to be surprised, the Navy is also 
concerned about chaos. This is a family matter, the family ugliness can not 
be promoted, but also hope that the two are tight-lipped. He is supposed to 
pay the two adults for a crime." A few chills, but also rushed into the car. 
The golden car was booming, taking off on the ground and rising. Looking 
at that haze gradually disappeared into the night sky, thank you for 
confirming that the Navy actually took the wind master away, and they, 
after tossing this for a long time, actually lost it in this way. This place is 
over. 


Mingyi turned to go, thanked the pity and returned to God, said: "Grand 
Master!" 


Mingyi stunned and looked back at him with a meaningful look. "You can 
rest assured that I will not say anything about the city." 


Thank you for your sigh of relief. "Thank you. Are you going to see the 
wind master?" 


Mingyi nodded and turned to continue. Although Xie Pity is also very 
worried about the wind division, but the power of the heavenly court is 
more useful than him, and the teacher is not willing to let the outsiders see 
the madness of the younger brother, how to think, is not a good time to 
visit. On the contrary, it was the sudden departure of Fangchenghuacheng, 
which made it difficult for people to feel relieved, and we decided to go to 


Huacheng first. With an idea, Xie pity left the sipping station and quickly 
rushed to the night road. Can not be used for thousands of miles, there is 
no copper horse gold car, can only rely on this pair of legs, running on the 
mountain road. While walking, I thought: "What happened to Sabura? I 
only looked at him and listened to him. It seems that things are not light. I 
hope I can help him a little this time." 


Not a scent of incense, suddenly, he was aware that the road was full of 
enchanting, unclear, and could not help but slow down, and said: "No, 
what happened?" 


Standing on the side of the road, watching the change, for a long time, in 
front of the demon, there was a strange sound. 


(74 29. 


At the end of the road ahead, the shadows show a very tall shadow. 


The black high, seems to have a virtual shadow floating, can not see what 
it is, thank you have never seen this shape of things, but it 1s indeed a 
giant. He couldn't help but take a step back. The left hand was ready to go, 
and the right hand was placed on the handle of the heart. 


Swearing, the behemoth slowly emerged from the fog. Thanks for the 
slightest look. It turned out that it was a gorgeous step. 


The steps are very magnificent, the golden caskets hang down the delicate 
tassels and the elegant gauze. If anyone sits on it, it will be blocked in a 
red curtain, reflecting only a fascinating shadow. The one who carried the 


step was actually the golden skeleton with four skeletons. The " : 


and " " shouted the number and was on the road. On each side of the 
skull, a few groups of wildfires floated around and turned around. It 
seemed to be used for lighting, because whenever it was too dark, the 
wildfire suddenly burned very well. 


This scene is too weird, the demon is demon, and the pity can't help but 
look at it. Is this the ghost girl who meets and the lover's rendezvous? 
Quickly retreated to the side of the road and let the road open. Who knows, 
the four gold scorpions carried the gorgeous steps, stopped in front of him, 
and brushed the skull. 


A golden > Saki ast Dae lee a> i> tea a> Mae: ale ual > > I> Ree ae a oe Jee a a-ak > le > ale ib Da Dee ee al a Pee De Dame ie Dat Si 


b Rie hae Dae a tae ae Dae 


The urban master should be a flower city. The thankful hand moved from 
the hilt and said, "It is me." 


Hey. We seem to be extremely happy, lowering the steps and saying: 
"Come up, start!" 


Do you want these four gold to carry him to see the flower city? Thanks to 
the scalp, "This is not convenient?" 


"No. Where is it inconvenient, don't you do this." 


"His Royal Highness, please come up! The Lord of the City 1s waiting for 
you." 


So, thankful and prudently took the step, picked up the gauze, sat up, said: 
"There is work." 


The goldens are happy, and I don’t know what to say, and raise the steps, 
which is upside down on the mountain road. 


There was a brocade soft seat on the step, which was very comfortable. 
Thanks to the pity, sitting in the center, I always felt that a person was 
sitting slightly wider. The gold squatted on the steps and looked like it was 
swaying and swaying. After actually sitting up, it was very stable, and it 
was very fast. It was faster than the sword, and in addition to those golden 
cockroaches, they liked to call some strange horns. Almost silent, more 
quiet than the banging copper horse car, more secretive. 


Once upon a time, when praying for the prince, I also took a ride. At that 
time, he was still young, sitting on the father's or mother's lap, and was 
carried by the carefully selected palace people. He was very arrogant and 
arrogant. When he grew up, he didn't like to sit down. This is still the first. 
When I was carried by these things, I couldn’t help feeling strange. After 
running for a while, I suddenly felt a group of green and green fires 
coming in through the gauze. There was a whisper in front of me. "Where 
are you coming from? Do you want to leave something from this 
graveyard? ” 


Actually, I met the wild ghosts who stopped the road, and they were black 
and black, ghosts and ghosts, and they also came to the head of Huacheng. 
We smiled slyly: "What do you want to leave?" 


Xie Pity is thinking about whether to go out and solve it, but listen to those 
thin voices screaming: "Ah, I can’t help it! I don’t know what our dog’s 
eyes are. Go, go back to the grave! Everyone is casual, there are a lot of 
adults, please feel free!" 


Gold said: "It’s late, the city owner explained it, and the one sitting on the 
squat is not at all. I’m delaying the highness of the temple, let’s talk about 
what to do!” 


Listening to the crowd, I was so sad that I couldn’t help myself. I said, 
"That, forget it. Since you are on the road, don't worry about it." 


Let's say: "Since your Highness says so, let them go. It's cheaper!" 


Thanks again and again: "However, remember not to stop the road to harm 
pedestrians." 


The wild ghosts said: "No, no, no, no guarantee! Never thank you!" 
Let's drink: "Go!" 


In the past, Xie pity faintly heard the curiosity of the female ghosts 
coming from the underground: "Hey, you said, which is the highness of the 


temple? I have never heard of the flower city owner. I have carried other 
people." 


"If it is a woman, I think about it. It is strange to be a man." 
Thanks for thinking: "What's weird?" 


The next moment, I heard the female ghosts say: "Yes. I used to say that 
this must be for the lady!" 


After running around for a few days, Xie Pity sat on the shackles, feeling a 
little sleepy, with a hand and a small amount of a moment, and after a 
while, I noticed that the steps stopped again, and thanked the pity: 
"What?" 


He thought that he had encountered the wild ghost who stopped the road. 
The voice just fell, and the step was slightly sinking, but it was one person 
coming up, picking up the gauze and whispering: "Brother?" 


Thanks for your pity, blinked your eyes, squinted and looked out, saying: 
"Sanlang?" 


It is natural to be a flower city. He saw the look of thankfulness, such as 
waking up and not waking up, and squinting. Thanks a little embarrassed 
to sit up and cough, saying: "I accidentally fell asleep." 


Immediately, Huacheng smiled and sat up and said: "Brother is too tired. 
Crowded. Brother is not strange." 


Cheering nodded, trying to sit on the right side, trying to give the flower 
city a little more position, but the flower city reached out and grabbed his 
right shoulder, and brought back the belt, saying: "No need. It is wide 
enough." 


In fact, not enough. This step is also done well. One person is sitting wide, 
and the two are sitting and they are a little crowded. Unless they are sitting 


on another person's lap like a child, it is just right. Thanks to the pity: 
"You just left, but the heavens came down three priests." 


Huacheng said: "What are the three cancers? I have expected it." 
Xie pity jokingly asked: "Is it because of this?" 


Huacheng also jokingly said: "No, I am going to call the car. How, my 
brother, my ghost car, is it much more interesting than the copper horses 
in the heavenly court?" 


Thanks for the pity: "Interesting, very interesting." After a few smiles, I 
remembered the wind sorcerer's strangeness, but I couldn't laugh out. Just 
colored, said: "Yes, Saburo, you have to tell me, yes. what's up?" 


Inadvertently, the two were on the line of sight. Huacheng also took the 
right shoulder of Xie, and never let go, as if he was holding him in his 
arms. If you look from the outside, you can only see the two overlapping 
figures in the step crepe, and you can rely on one place. Within the red 
curtain, Huacheng smiled. 


He said: "Brother, get married." 


Thanks for your pity: "...ah?" 


So gazing, such words, close at hand, nowhere to be avoided. When he was 
on the road, Xie was so colorful in his eyes, his mind was blank, and the 
whole person was stiff. Still stiffer than zombies. 


Seeing his shape, Huacheng took back his arm and said: "Just kidding. Is 
your brother scared?" 


Thanks to pity, it was easy to return to God and said: "...you are too 
naughty. How can you make such a joke?" 


I was scared. It was scared that he almost had a sudden cardiac arrest. It 
was actually a glimpse of a slight flaw that I didn’t even notice. 


Huacheng Haha said: "My fault." 


He straightened a pair of long legs, overlapped, and stood in front, 
swaying the boots, the silver chains colliding, and the jingle was clear, and 
it was really naughty. If in the past, thank you will feel that his young 
boy's heart is very interesting, very cute, but now I don't know why, I was 
disturbed by the sound, and I was inexplicably troubled. After a long time, 
I couldn't help but say it again in my heart: "How can I make a joke about 
this..." 


However, think about it. It is because I really don't care, so I can make a 
joke. 


Huacheng noticed that he looked different. He sat down at once and said, 
"Your Highness, don't care. I was wrong just now. I will never make such a 
joke again." 


Seeing him so solemnly apologizing, thanking the pity and guilty, thought: 
"I am not stupid, a joke, it is a big deal. Moreover, Saburo just said 
‘getting married,’ and did not say who is married, you think again Where 
have you been. Come back soon! Immediately! Immediately!!!" 


After screaming in my heart, I settled my mind and decided to feel my 
heart. Thanks and laughs: "No, no, what's wrong with you? Don't 
misunderstand, I am thinking about the wind master, so I look serious. 


Huacheng Road: "Oh? The water is down, and he should solve it." 
Both of them are extremely cooperative. Thank you for thinking carefully, 
shaking your head gently, said: "Sanlang, do you really think that this 


matter has been solved? I always feel that this is just the beginning." 


Shi Qingxuan always loves his brother and loves it. Only when he sees his 
face, but this reaction, can't help him to give birth to a terrible idea - the 


person who swindles the teacher Qingxuan to open the door, will it be the 
teacher? Cross? 


Although the division was not at the time, 1t was supposed to be with the 
spirits and the generals. However, it is not particularly difficult for the 
high-powered priests to use the points and body skills to do things. He is 
trying to continue to talk about some of his doubts and speculations about 
Huacheng. Huacheng said: "No. This is over." 


His tone was determined, and he couldn’t help but say, "Sanlang?" 
Huacheng stared at him and said: "Brother, do you believe me?" 
Xie pity also stared at him and said: "I believe." 


Huacheng slowly said: "So, believe me: wind division, navy, geoscientist, 
spiritual, sly. These priests, the farther you are from them, the better." 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 114: Laughing 
and messing up, I am also confused 2 


After this sentence, along the way, thanking the pity is very important. 
After a few more words, Huacheng’s words gave him the feeling of four 
words: “The words are all here.” So, thank you for not asking. 


When returning to the Bodhisattva view, the sky is still not dawning. 


As soon as the door was opened, the pots and pans were cleaned up. Lang 
Ying and Gu Zi and Grace were all sleeping in the house, covered with 
quilts, very stable. It seems that after he left, someone actually took care 
of it and left quietly. 


Thank you for coming back this time, and there is a lot of prayers. 


The prayers received by Bodhisattva have never been so much. He does 
not think that the rich businessman helped him to promote the merits of 
the famous name. Yes, the wealthy businessman who lived in the town 
finally fulfilled his promise and came. 


However, he came here, but did not notice the sign of cheating in a 
conspicuous place, or he deliberately turned a blind eye. There is not much 
how much incense is donated as he promised. The main purpose of this 
visit 1s to send a pennant to come, and in the face of the old folks in the 
village of Bodhisattva, enthusiasm and hand in the hands of Xie. Xie pity 
opened up and looked at it without any precautions, and immediately 
closed it. However, the four characters on the banner were deeply deep 
into his mind - "returning the baby." 


Thankfulness: "???" 


When he sent the rich businessman, he sighed and wondered when he 
would collapse when the house collapsed. I really don't know when it will 
be repaired. The flower city leaning against the door seemed to see what 


he was sighing. He said: "I have long wanted to say something. If my 
brother is not living in this house, it is better to change it." 


Xie pity shook his head and said: "Speaking lightly, Saburo, where to 
change." 


Huacheng smiled and said: "Or else move me to forget it." 


Xie Li knows that he should not only talk about this, but since the night of 
"joking", he has a little shadow in his heart, and Huacheng has not used 
this "joking" look. Just pick it up and smile down. 


As for the pledges received, although some of the old oxen in the family 
were injured, they couldn’t work in the field, and the housewives were 
pregnant and the fields were lacking. But they were all praying, and the 
pledges of the believers should be treated equally. After two days, thank 
you for praying, going to the village to help plow the plow. 


Huacheng lived here, and naturally he followed him to play. Because it 
was rough, the original pity did not want him to go to the ground, but 
could not pass, so both of them changed the coarse cloth clothes, rolled up 
the cuffs and trouser legs, and went down the paddy field. 


Looking from afar, there are many busy farmers in the vast expanse of 
green fields, two of which are particularly conspicuous. 


Even if the grateful cloth is in the body, it can't hide the half of the flower 
city. It is better to say that the broken clothes put his face and body shape 
out of the way. Both of them are white, their arms are beautiful, their 
calves are long and straight, and they form a beautiful and dazzling 
landscape among the peasants who are smacking their faces. They are 
greeted by the villagers who are used to the rough man, blushing, not 
stealing, plugging | With the insertion, the squatting of the hand becomes 
an arc and then becomes a joke. 


The white pheasant of Huacheng is a white scorpion with almost no blood. 
Xie pity is ruddy in the white sputum, and, due to his natural physique, the 
more sweating, the more white skin is jade. The hot sun took the lead, he 


did it for a while, the whole person was white and powdery, and it was so 
hot that he couldn’t help but wipe the sweat from the neck. But the ghosts 
were all sullen and not like the sun. The flower city is definitely not happy. 
Look around. Sure enough, Huacheng also swayed, squinting, shading with 
hands, eyes falling in the shadow cast by the right hand in the eyebrows, 
fixed to look at this side. 


Thanks for the pity, he took the bucket and put it on his head. He said, 
"Don't wear it." 


Huacheng was a glimpse first, then immediately narrowed his eyes and 
smiled: "Good." 


Although Huacheng said that it was for fun, he could do more work than 
thanking him. He was quick and good and very skilled. After half an hour, 
thank you for the dryness of this side, it is back pain, straight up and squat, 
and Huacheng came over to help him. Thanks for a moment, for a while, 
he actually finished a large piece of silence, and a green rice planted in a 
paddy field, neat and tidy, is very popular. He sincerely sighed: "Sara, you 
really learn what you are going to do. You don't help me, sit there and rest, 
drink some water." 


Huacheng went to Tianyuan to get water. The village head looked at the 
side for a long time, then raised his thumb and said: "Dao Chang, this is 
the young man, so diligent and so powerful! A dozen tops! Which big 
niece should be picked up by him. It’s a blessing!” 


Xie pity" "smiled out, but after a while, there were a few people 
secretly asking for pity: "Hey, long, this is the young man who lives in 
your view, is it called? Is there a kiss? No wife at home? ?" 


"Definitely not, so young!" 


Thanks to the pity and laughter, vaguely said: "This... yes, young, don't 
think about it first." 


A few people were busy: "How can I do that? It is young, so I have to fix 
it." 


"You still give advice to the Dao, men must grow up early to grow up. You 
must have a home before you do anything." 


"Yeah, young people! **! Can't stand loneliness!" 


These people have daughters in the family who want to inquire about the 
situation. Thanks to the warmth of the words, Huacheng came over with a 
bamboo tube and said: "Hey. There is a wife in the house." 


When the few people heard it, they were disappointed, but they still didn’t 
give up. They said, "Which girl is it? Can this little brother tell us 
something?" "It’s not ours." Also good?" 


Huacheng raised his eyebrows and said: "Well, that is. Beautiful and wise. 
It is a noble person who is a golden leaf and a jade leaf. I have liked it 
since I was a child. I liked it for many years and I have to work hard to 
catch up." 


What he said was serious, and it was not like a fake. Several people felt 
that there was no drama, and they had to regret it. Thanks to the slightest 
sensation, Huacheng handed him a piece of cloth towel and a tube of 
water, saying: "Drinking water?" 


Thanks to the cloth towel, wiped the hands covered with mud, then took 
the bamboo tube and took a few mouthfuls and handed it back. He 
unconsciously grabbed the cloth towel into a mess, wiped it off, and for a 
while, he couldn’t help but ask: "...take it?" 


Huacheng took back the bamboo tube and took a sip of his own. The throat 
was rolled up and down for a round. He bowed his head and said, "Well? 
What?" 


Xie pity raised his sleeves and rubbed a little sweat on his forehead. He 
always felt that the sun was too big. He had his cheeks on his forehead hot, 
and he tried to smile casually: "There is a wife in the house, beautiful. 
Also wise, is a noble person of Jinzhi Yuye, who likes it since childhood, 
and struggles to catch up with it." 


Huacheng Road: "Oh, fake." 


Xie pity did not realize that he was relieved. This time, it is really a laugh, 
learning the tone of the flower city before: "Let." 


Huacheng, please, said: "But it's not all fake. I haven't caught up yet." 


Hearing words, thanking me for a moment, Huacheng has turned around 
and continues to help. 


Thanks for staying in the place for a while, then I bent down and worked 
hard. I don't know why, I always feel a little depressed, I have to be 
embarrassed, I found that I accidentally inserted a small row, and quickly 
pulled back my thoughts. 


While working in the field, he tried to psychic with the wind master. 
Although Huacheng said, let him not be close to the group of the 
windshield, but thank you for not doing it. He has tried countless times 
these days, but there was no success. He whispered the password several 
times, and there was no reaction there, and he was dead. So he turned the 
doorway and found the spirit, and asked: "Learning, how 1s the wind 
master now?" 


The Lingwen was quickly passed, and the voice rang in the ear of Xie, and 
said, "Is it a good guy? Is it better?" 


Thanks for her instinct, she didn't tell the truth, but she didn't ask, just 
made up her mind and went to see it later. 


At this time, I listened to Lingwen again: "Yes, the Navy Master sent a gift 
to you, and it has already been delivered. You should remember to see 
your Royal Highness Prince." 


Thanks for your pity, said: "Gifts? No need to. Nothing is unreliable." 


Lingwen said: "Do not be modest and polite. The wind master is an 
impulse to find someone to accompany him, you accompany him to toss 


for so long, and the emotions are well deserved. The Navy Master said that 
it is only a little care. You will suffer." 


Thank you for your pity, but I don’t think it’s appropriate. After finishing 
the work, he received the work, and Huacheng helped the village chief to 
repair his family's plow, and Xie pity first returned to the Bodhisattva. 
After the "three idlings" in Huachengkou were moved to Bodhisattva, he 
found a circle in the house and said, "What about gifts? Where?" 


Thinking about whether it would fall into the gap under the merit box, he 
picked up his sleeves and prepared to move the merit box. Who knows, 
this move is not moving. The merit box was heavy, as if it had rooted on 
the ground. Thanks for the inexplicable, the key was opened and the lock 
was opened. When the lid was opened, it was flashed by the golden light. 


In the merit box, it was so dense that it was full of gold bars. When you 
look at it roughly, you can give him a million merits! 


Thanks for a moment, the lid was "smashed" and the hands were pressed 
against it. The heart said: "A little care?" 


Is it a sealable fee to send such a valuable thing for no reason? He was still 
thinking about it. If it was a little gift, such as a spiritual jade ring with 
mana, it would be better to accept it. After all, it would be better to send it 
back directly to the teacher’s face. High pride, not beautiful. But now, 
okay, it’s a **** of wealth, so a big box of gold bars has to be sent back. 


It happened that he was going to go to the heavens immediately and look 
at the wind teacher. He thought that the flower city was not expected to 
come back so soon, so he left a note and set off the box of the sinking dead 
man. 


Who knows, as soon as I arrived at Xianjing, it was actually a squad, and 
people turned their backs, and thanked the pity. The good Shenwu Street 
was actually thrown out of the pits everywhere. A group of small **** 
officials were busy before the group turned, and Ling Wen was kneeling in 
a deep pit and pressing the temple with a headache. Thanks for the pity: 
"True Jun, what is going on?" 


When Lingwen looked up, he was shocked by the huge merit box behind 
him. He said, "His Royal Highness, what are you doing with such a big 
merit box? What do you ask? Hey, don't mention, General Nanyang and 
General Xuan Zhen fights and gives the other party Xianfu." 


Fengxin and admiration? Thanks for the pity: "Why are they fighting 
again?" 


Lingwen said: "It's not because of the last fetal spirit. Several martial gods 
gathered to discuss how to deal with the ghost mother and son. General 
Nanyang proposed to send the baby spirit to refining, after all, that thing is 
really killing countless The harm is not shallow, Xuan Zhen will not let it, 
tone, a little teach people discomfort, Nanyang said that you have such a 
home in the past, you have a ghost in your heart. Your Royal Highness, 
you know, they look like that, In a few words, I went outside and went. 
Look, see, what? What I said, I said that the spirit of your Valkyrie is 
really bad. The repair expenses of Xianjing this year are terrible. I just 
finished half of it. And all forgot. Really..." 


Thanks for seeing her, she really had a headache. "That... you can count it 
slowly. I will go to see the wind master." 


Lingwen looked up and said: "Look at the wind master? Don't worry, Your 
Royal Highness, the wind master is not seen now." 


Thanks: "Don't you say that he is better?" 


Lingwen said: "This is what the Navy master said. But the wind master is 
not seen, but also the Navy master. At the moment, I can't even see the 
wind master. It is estimated that I still need to recuperate for a while. Go 
on. Say, is your merit box too..." 


Thanks for the "jingle", put the merit box down, said: "That trouble you 
help me to return this to the Navy Master. Nothing is not reliant. Even if 
he does not give anything, should not say, Xie pity will not say more." Lost 
the box and relaxed, he hurried away, the spirit screamed a few times 
behind, did not respond, give up, continue to bow his head, a deep 
headache to the feet. 


However, thanking the pity is gone, but of course it will not go so far, but 
quietly went to the Fengfu of the Fengshi and the Navy in Xianjing. 


Although the three floors of the Xianfu and the three outer layers are 
heavily guarded, this degree 1s still difficult to thank. The last time Shi 
Qingxuan brought him in. He roughly remembered the position of the 
windshield's sleeping hall, turned over a wall, and sometimes went high, 
sometimes sneaked, and soon arrived. The only worry is that the wind 
division was taken to another place by his brother, and it is not here at the 
moment. 


Fortunately, this worry has not been implemented. He climbed the roof and 
found a dead corner that could not be seen by outsiders. He made an 
upside down gold hook and hung it on the eaves and looked inside the 
dormitory. This hope, shocked. 


Shi Qingxuan was actually **** by Wuhua, tied to his own couch, still 
struggling. There was no crossing for the priest, and he was squatting on 
the edge of the couch, holding a bowl of black lacquer in his hand. He 
paused for a moment, and suddenly walked over to the teacher Qing 
Xuankou. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 115: People 
walk in the tunnel 


Shi Qingxuan was pinched by his jaw, poured a few mouthfuls, slammed 
hard, and spit out most of it, making a stain on his chest. He yelled and hit 
his head up and knocked over the bowl. The teacher did not face his face, 
and said: "Fall! You continue to fall! What are you afraid of? The 
medicine is very much. You drop a bowl. I will give you another 20 bowls! 
I will drink it until you drink it!" 


Shi Qing Xuan screamed: "Ah! Can you leave me alone, let me kill 
myself!" 


The teacher did not have a strong voice: "I am your brother, I can't control 
who can manage you?!" 


Shi Qingxuan did not speak, and his head turned to the inside. For a long 
while, the teacher did not sit down at the couch and eased his tone. He 
said, "I am going to fix the fan for you." 


Teacher Qingxuan: "I don't want that fan." 


The wind master is very fond of his fabulous magic weapon, and there is 
nothing to play with. There is a big snow in the winter, and the paper fan 
swayed and thundered. At the moment, he said that he didn’t want the fan 
to fan. The more you hear it. There is no crossing for the teacher: "If you 
don't want it, just give you a new magic weapon." 


Shi Qingxuan head turned again and said: "I don't want new ones! Let me 
go." 


The teacher did not turn back and said: "Go down? Where to go?" 


Shi Qingxuan: "Going down to the world. I don't want to stay in heaven 
again. I don't want to be a god!" 


The teacher’s forehead, the forehead of the white scorpion, is raised. 
“Jokes! Don’t be a god, go to the world? What is a good place for you to 
be a human being? Less shame is now! How many people have waited for 
years to fly, how many gods in the heavens are smashed I want to go to 
heaven in my head, I don’t know if you see it!" 


Shi Qingxuan angered: "Yes! I don't know! I want to be a Ranger, can't 
you?!" 


The teacher does not have a crossing: "No! Do your free rider and go to 
sleep! I..." 


At this time, his face changed, and it seemed to be psychic and reported 
what news. The teacher did not stand up and stood up. The **** arrived at 
the temple for a while, and his face became more and more dignified. He 
wanted to swear. "You give less chaos! I am busy recently, I have no time 
to care for you! Waiting for me to spend the first time." Three days of 
robbery, no longer you can do this with me!" After that, the hand slammed 
out of the hall. 


When he walked away, Xie politely turned over and pushed the window to 
enter, but he couldn’t push it. He wanted to set up a ban. He was afraid that 
if he had ever applied a warning spell, he would not dare to open it, so he 
lowered his voice: "The wind master, the wind master?" 


Shi Qingxuan moved on the couch and turned his head. He said: "His 
Royal Highness?!" 


Thanks to pity: "It's me. What's the matter with you? I can't open the door 
and window, can I come in another way?" 


When you can't open the doors and windows in the normal way, Wushen 
will change into a room, you can imagine. Shi Qingxuan said: "Don't stop! 
Don't smash, my doors and windows are covered with the technique. A 
hard battle, the entire Feng Shui House will know that someone is coming. 
Except for me and my brother, I have to Open inside." 


Thanks for your pity: "Can you be **** like that?" 


Shi Qingxuan struggled wildly and said: "You are waiting for your 
Highness! Look at the rope that I broke..." 


"..."" Thanks to see him whole people rolling around on the couch, 
sometimes bent into shrimp, and sometimes into a iron plate, very 
difficult, whispered: "Work hard!" 


The rope that tied the teacher Qing Xuan, a rough look, is not a magic 
weapon, with the mana of the wind division, the hook is cracked, why is 
this still not broken? Could it be that Shi Qingxuan really hurts very 
seriously, and even this level can not be earned? 


At this time, under the division of Shi Qing Xuan, a sudden strange 
movement came out, and one hand stretched out from below. Thanks to the 
pity, the scalp was fried, and said: "The wind master is careful! You are 
hiding under the bed!" 


Shi Qingxuan's face has also changed: "What?!" 


The voice did not fall, a black shadow quickly climbed out from the 
collapse, stood in front of his bed, overlooking him condescending. 


This man is dressed in black and wearing a ghost face. I really don't know 
when it was hidden under this bed. I don't know what he is going to do at 
the moment. Shi Qingxuan was tied to the bed by Wuhua, and he was 
madly rolling and trying to break free. Xie Li was forbidden to stop 
outside the door and couldn’t come in. It was really dangerous. Xie Pity is 
trying to break through the window, but sees the person pushing the ghost 
face up and pressing down the voice: "Shut up!" 


Shi Qing Xuanzang eyes widened and said: "Ming brother? Ming brother! 
Ming brother my mother, my good brother, fast! Help me loose!" 


Mingyi smashed the rope on his body with one hand. Shi Qingxuan lived 
his hands and feet, climbed up and rushed to open the window, grabbed the 
thankful hands and shook his hands: "His Royal Highness! Thank you for 
remembering me!" 


Xie pity patted his shoulder and gently turned into the sleeping hall. He 
said: "Is there a prohibition in this dormitory? How can the landlord come 
in?" 


Mingyi said: "This trip is gone." 


After that, he seemed to find something wrong. He picked up the rope on 
the ground and looked up. He looked up and asked the teacher, Qingxuan: 
"How can you not get this thing?" 


Thank you for your attention. Is the rope a illegal treasure? It 1s simply an 
ordinary rope. With the strength of the wind master's mana, how can it be 
banned by such a group of things for a long time and still can't open? 


Shi Qingxuan’s face was stiff, and Mingyi suddenly grasped his left wrist 
and looked cold. He said: “What happened?” 


Xie Pity also took the right hand wrist of Shi Qingxuan and explored for a 
moment. He said: "How can this be the wind master?" 


In the body of Shi Qingxuan, there 1s actually no mana! 
Immediately, thank you for your reaction: "Is that medicine?" 


I remembered that the teacher had no choice but to give him a strong 
potion, as well as Shi Qingxuan’s resistance. Xie Li immediately went to 
see the medicine. Shi Qingxuan said: "No." 


It is not the problem with the medicine. Thank you for your medical 
treatment. I smell this smell. I think it should be an analgesic and soothing 
soup. It may have a little sleep effect, but it is not surprising. I want to 
come, at the time of the sipping station, the teacher did not cross the hand 
of the younger brother, and immediately became the look, it must have 
been discovered at that time. He gave Shi Qingxuan this medicine, it 
should be for him, but I don’t know why Shi Qingxuan didn’t appreciate it. 


It is no wonder that Shi Qingxuan does not respond to his psychic, only 
because the original high-powered mana is now gone, and it seems to be 


no different from a mortal. Xie pity subconsciously dismissed: "The wind 
master, you were defamed?" 


Otherwise how could it suddenly become like this? But there is no curse 
on him, and if anyone is shackled, then wherever he can live, he will 
spread all over Heaven and Heaven. Shi Qingxuan’s face was white, and it 
seemed that he couldn’t stand it anymore. Thanks for his help and help, 
“Why did the Navy’s adults bind you?” 


Shi Qingxuan came back to God and said, "Yes, my brother. Oh, my 
brother is not there, hurry. Let's leave and say!" 


After I finished speaking, I went down to the bottom of the bed. Thank you 
for your pity: "The Wind Master!" 


There is actually a hole under the bed. I don’t know where to go. Shi 
Qingxuan went in and disappeared. Mingyi also bowed his head and 
prepared to go in. Thanks for thinking about it, he decided to keep up, but 
Mingyi retired and said: "His Royal Highness, don't let go." 


Xie Li was stopped by him and stunned. "The wind master has repeatedly 
helped each other. This time he has difficulties, I can't stay out of it." 


Mingyi said: "He has been more vocal in his daily life, and most of the 
things that go out of business." 


Thanks to pity: "How do others have nothing to do with me? Just figure 
out the ins and outs of this matter and make sure that I don't need my help. 
I naturally quit without asking." 


The voice of Qingxuan under the bed came: "You still don't keep up? The 
hole is off!" 


Sure enough, the hole under the bed is gradually shrinking. Upon seeing it, 
Mingyi quickly went in, and Xie Pity also kept up. The three men climbed 
in the passage opened by Mingyi. Thanks for looking back, the hole was 
actually closed. It was so magical that he whispered: "Grandmaster, how is 
this tunnel coming out?" I have never heard of it. Under the Xianfu of 


Xianjing, I can open a hole." The foundation of Xianjing is not the land of 
the mortal. 


When IJ asked, I realized that the local teacher, Mingyi, was originally a 
folk craftsman. In his life, he built bridges, built roads, opened mountains, 
and built houses, benefiting countless times. Now, there are great fortune 
in the world. Before you start, you must worship the landlord and pray for 
the work to be smooth. He flew up and refined the same magic weapon, a 
crescent shovel. It is rumored that there is no such thing as a mountain that 
cannot be moved by the gods, a hole that cannot be opened, or a room that 
cannot enter. He went to the undercover of the ghost market. This is 
extremely advantageous. When you encounter a secret room that you want 
to open, you will dig a shovel and then close it as it is. Last time, if I was 
beaten by the city, I was vomiting blood three liters, and my mana was 
badly damaged. Maybe I could use the treasure shovel to escape from the 
dungeon. 


Previously, the division had never tried this shovel in the sacred 
government of the priest. He did not show the magic weapon, and he was 
all collected. It’s not obvious, most of the magic weapons in the heavenly 
courts are still elegant and elegant. What books are written, swords, 
folding fans, and Guqin Piccolo, if there is a sergeant in the whole day 
carrying a shovel in and out, it can kill the scenery. The image 1s lost. 
After listening to it, Xie Pity couldn't help but think that the dangerous 
house of my view of Bodhisattva wanted to be repaired as soon as 
possible. Should it also worship the landlord? 


After climbing for a while, thank you for listening to the teacher Ming 
Xuan in front of him: "What is the vernacular?" 


Xie pity also wants to know, is this the case? If it is really a vernacular, it 
is true that the teacher has become a teacher, and the spread will definitely 
cause vibration in the heavens, causing great fear. A demon that allows the 
gods to lose their mana in a short period of time and become a mortal! It is 
conceivable that everyone will be in danger. Such a serious matter, Shi 
Qingxuan was silent for a moment, but said: "No matter who did it, this is 
the end of the matter." 


This kind of reaction is too bad. 


If it is designed to frame, in any case, it should not be this attitude, 
especially Shi Qingxuan, this person 1s not a big headache. 


For a moment, thankfulness suddenly had a bad guess. Although not good, 
it can explain everything. 


At this time, Mingyi suddenly said: "Beep." 


The three men in the tunnel held their breath in time. Mingyi held a palm 
of heart flame, faintly lit up the square inch, and the other two looked at 
him. 


Mingyi seems to want to be psychic, but Shi Qingxuan’s mana is lost, and 
he can’t convey his mind with his heart. He changed his method and wrote 
with his fingers in the air. The place where the fingertips crossed left an 
ink mark, as if the thick ink dripped into the clear water and collapsed. 
The other two saw it. He wrote: "Don't talk, don't move. Wait." 


After reading it, silently blowing it, the word dissipated in the air. Thanks 
for the remnant of the mana that has not been used up, the handle also 
wrote a line: "Wait? Wait until when?" 


Mingyi wrote: "When the people at the moment leave," 


Xie Li and Shi Qingxuan looked up and looked up. It turned out that 
Mingyi’s treasure shovel was opened in Xianjing, and it passed some 
Xianfu and the temple. About this time, there 1s just one priest, just above 
them. 


Listening and listening carefully, sure enough, there is a steady footstep, 
walking slowly, seems to pace indoors. Listen to this footstep, thank you 
for judging that this person should be a Valkyrie. Most of the Wushens are 
sensitive. If they make a suspicious sound, they will be caught. Shi Qing 
Xuan can not write can not write, can only be silently complained by 
mouth. Xie pity looked twice, only to understand what he said is: "Ming 


brother, what do you do not avoid the temple and the palace view? Can 
you dig under the Shenwu Street?" 


Mingyi wrote indifferently: "There was no one in the temple. Shenwu 
Street is all pits at the moment." 


Xie Li also wrote: "Yes. I saw it on the road when I came. The street was 
pitted and even a few feet deep. I dig a hole under it. If I look up, I will 
face it." 


Then, the three people did not say anything, turned into three stagnant 
stones, patiently waiting for the above-mentioned priest to leave. Waited 
for a while. Shi Qingxuan again said with a mouth: "Did you go?" 


Mingyi shook his head. Shi Qingxuan’s forehead’s blue-bellied violent 
violent, and his brother’s appearance was almost seven points, silently: 
“Who is so tempered, this is not the time of sleep, not to mention which 
priest is still sleeping, above is the cottage or What place?" 


In fact, strictly speaking, the priest does not need to go to the huts. When 
he made the word "Maofang" in his mouth, he thanked him for a burst of 
cold hair and shook his head in front of him. At the same time, he took the 
initiative and fell back. 


A sharp sword stabbed from the top of the tunnel, and it was savage, 
murderous, just inserted into the ground between his legs. 2k novel 
reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 116: One night, 
cold dew, stealing the column 


" " 


Although thankfulness has basically been living in a past as a person who 
does not mention it, there is still a fundamental difference between "being 
that you don't have that thing" and "really losing that thing forever." He 
stunned a thin layer of cold sweat and shouted: "Get away!" 


When the voice just fell, the sword slammed away, thanking the pity and 
taking the opportunity to move forward. Speaking, and slamming the 
teacher, Qing Xuan: "Beware!" 


Shi Qingxuan had another sword in front of him, almost stabbed under his 
head. If it wasn’t for the pity, he would be nailed here on the spot. He 
shouted: "Good insurance, how do you know where he is going?" 


Thanks for the pity: "I don't know, guess!" It is also an intuition. For 
murderous, he has almost reached the point where he can react without his 
brain. Then, the second, third, and fourth swords were also inserted, and a 
sharp sword light stopped the three people's way and retreat. Immediately 
after the "bang" of a loud noise, there was a violent vibration from the top, 
and the gravel was crushed. Thanks to the pity: "There is a blast!" 


The booming sound was louder than the next one, and the vibration was 
also louder than once, obviously closer than a point. Before and after being 
blocked by the sword, they are young and sharp top-selling swords. I don’t 
know if I can harden my hard time. Mingyi doesn’t know where to find a 
crescent shovel, and it’s difficult to go to another space in a small space. A 
hole was dug on one side. Shi Qingxuan is about to vomit soul smoke on 
the side: "Ming brother, you can't do it in the end, Ming brother, can you 
hurry up, blame you for not using this magic weapon for so long, no 
matter how much you use close relatives, you see What happened to it?!!!" 


In fact, unfamiliarity can also be forgiven, no way, after all, the whole 
heavenly court, in addition to thanking the pity, does not change color, 
carrying a shovel and walking in and out all day, really no other priests 
have done this kind of thing. Mingy1’s forehead bursts with blue veins and 
said: “Shut up!!!” 


Thanks for your help: "Don't be angry, don't be angry, pass it!" 


Sure enough, the force on the hand of Mingyi opened, and the hole opened. 
He copied a shovel and drove in front of him. Shi Qingxuan was crazy in 
the middle, and Xie Pity was the only person who was not crazy. The 
geologist's shovel shovel is magical. Just a few times, the tunnel has been 
re-excavated for more than a dozen feet. After a while, the hole is 
gradually closing, and the place where they were trapped is vented. 
Glimmer down. 


Thanks for the moment: "He is going to wear it!" 


Mingyi instantly dig more crazy, suddenly a stagnation, looking up. Xie 
pity also reacted with him, because they all felt that there was no silence 
above the place, there should be an empty hall. 


It has already been discovered by people, and it is no matter how to go out 
first. Mingyi turned to dig up. Shi Qingxuan: "Are you sure that there is no 
one after this place is dug out?" 


Mingyi said: "I didn't hear the sound. Unless I am sleeping!" 


Of course, the general officer does not need to sleep, and he does not sleep 
in his own temple during the day, so there should be no such possibility. 
Who knows, Mingyi shovel up, the three broke out of the ground, three 
heads came out, just took a breath of fresh air, did not spit it out, they saw 
a couch opposite, lying on the couch A teenager with wide limbs is 
sleeping. 


Thankfulness: "???" 


Is this really a **** official sleeping in his own temple during the day? ? ? 


When I heard the movement, the boy rolled over and sat up, his hair curled 
up in a mess, his brows were close, his hair was caught, and he looked at 
the three heads across the bed. He didn’t seem to understand why there 
was such a thing in his temple. . The three people pretended to have 
nothing to happen, and quickly climbed out of the hole. Who knows, when 
Shi Qingxuan climbed up, he suddenly yelled out, thanking him for 
looking back, and actually grabbed him with one hand. Ankle. 


The owner of the hand is awkward. Even in the tunnel, he is very graceful, 
saying: "I said where the little mouse came to drill under the hole in my 
palace. How did you run out of Qing Xuan? Where is this going? Your 
brother is angry with you. I know, he didn't find it and went back." 


If the evil flies out, he repels his hand. He jumped out and said: "His Royal 
Highness, Master of the Master, do you have nothing to do with the two, 
and there is no reason for the windshield to leave home, can't say it." 


Thanks to the pity: "Although the Wind Master is a younger brother of the 
Navy Master, but after all, he is a priest, and he is a few hundred years old. 
You should not say that he is like a three-year-old child. Even if it is 
reasonable, there is no reason. Imprisoned on the heavenly court of the 
fairy, how can you say that the Navy master can not say it." 


If his guess is correct, then the wind master can't really stay in heaven. 
Quan Yizhen looked at this side with a dull look on the couch. It seems 
that he still can't figure out the situation. ai ete ee ee 


After thinking for a while, Quan Yi really came to help. 


He jumped out of the couch and picked up the couch he was lying on. Sure 
enough, it helped the handles, but it helped the heads who prayed for them. 
I was so cold that I was shocked by a couch. The whole person was 
shocked. "Yiying!!! What are you doing?" 


Right one really puts a hand on Xie, probably indicating that they are 
going. Xie pity waited for a moment and quickly left. Shi Qingxuan didn't 
know if he was suffering from a lack of blood. He ran a few steps and 


looked blue, thanked him for helping him, and Mingyi grabbed him 
directly. Thanks to the hand on the door, took out two scorpions, and 
turned back to the boy: "Thank you!" 


Quan Yizhen is still arrogant, and his shots are fierce and unregulated. If 
he is not guilty of his ability, it will be **** for him to give him a slap in 
the air. He gave him a straight sigh and shouted: "Guards! Stop people!!!" 


Before he called, he thanked the pity, opened the door, rushed out the door, 
and closed the door again, which made him slip away from the heavens. 
However, what he never expected was that after closing the door, he turned 
around again and presented it in front of his eyes. He was stepping on a 
new merit box, and he was naked and sweating. 


A tattered little Bodhisattva view, where there are so many great gods, the 
feeling of pity will be suffocated. And there is a ghost outside the house 
that is screaming and making noises: "Muzi~ Come and give a lame~" 


For a long while, Huacheng just took the wrath of the wood, and raised his 
eyebrow slightly: "...?" 


His red|naked half body, skin color and lines are extremely beautiful, 
extremely eye-catching, and the eyes are swayed with sorrow and sorrow. 
It is clear that nothing has been seen, but the **** gas that can't stop is 
black. Thanks for the rolling and climbing to stop in front of him, open his 
arms to block the sight of Mingyi and Shi Qingxuan: "Close your eyes, 
close your eyes! Close your eyes!" 


The faces of the two men were solidified and looked at them with a 
strange look. Huacheng put his hand on the shoulders of Xie, and laughed 
and said: "... Brother, what are you nervous?" 


Thank you for your reaction, yes, what is he nervous about? Huacheng is 
not a big girl. What happened to the upper body? 


But he still didn't put his arms down, tried to cover the flower city as 
tightly as possible, and said: "In short... you put on your clothes first." 


Huacheng shrugged and said: "Well, listen to my brother." After that, he 
took a piece of clothes calmly and put it on slowly. 


Seeing that his party is calm and self-contained, Shi Qing Xuanzao said: 
"That, I am bothered, I didn't expect you... Hahaha, kinda, hahaha. In short, 
hahaha." 


"..." Thanks to pity, "Adult, you have to say anything, just say something, I 
have to explain it clearly. Do not use hahaha instead..." 


Time is tight, I am afraid that it will be checked later, and the Bodhisattva 
view will not last long. Mingyi put down the teacher Qingxuan and drew a 
thousand miles on the ground. Xie pity is waiting for where they are going, 
suddenly listening to Huacheng sighing behind him. 


Thanks for the remarks that he said to himself that he should not be close 
to the windshield, they couldn’t help but turn around and said: "Sanlang, 
SOrry."" 


Huacheng has already put on his clothes and said: "I knew you would not 
stand by." 


After a pause, he smiled again: "However, why should my brother 
apologize to me? You only remember the words I said a few days ago. 
Have you forgotten, have I said another sentence to you?" 


Thanks for the slightest sigh, my heart said: "Which sentence?" 
Suddenly, he remembered. 


It was the night of the Green Ghost's Nest, the flower city said: "You just 
do it." 


After remembering, thank you for your eyes. He didn't know what to say, 
just, suddenly, he wanted to do something for Huacheng. But for a while, I 
couldn't find what he could do. After a long while, I suddenly saw the 
neckline of Huacheng Red, saying: "Wait!" 


After saying it, I rushed to help Huacheng complete the whole collar. It 
turned out that the clothes that the city was ready to wear, did not turn the 
collar. Finished, thank you for a moment, smiled and said: "Okay." 


Huacheng also smiled and said: "Thank you." 
Thanks for the small voice: "I am." 


The two people over there seem to be unable to see this side, and even the 
circle under Mingyi is not so round. After he had drawn the picture, and 
then opened the door, Xie Pity thought that he would see what Yinyin 
Dongfu or the palace, who knows that the door is actually a large piece of 
farmland. In the distance is a secluded green hill and green bamboo. A 
group of farmers work in the fields, and a sturdy black cow is plowing the 
ground. 


This scene, he almost thought it was still in the village of Bodhisattva, 
could not help but stunned, and Mingyi has gone back with Shi Qingxuan. 
He has not yet taken a step, and Huacheng has also stepped out of the door. 


The four men and two of them walked on the top of the field. I wonder if it 
was an illusion. The black cow seemed to be staring at them all the time. 
After a while, I found a small hut, and four people went in and sat down. 
Shi Qingxuan finally spit out a breath. 


Thanks for your pity: "Don't you have to run again? Will the generals 
come here?" 


Huacheng looked out for a while, especially the black cow, closed the door 
and underestimated the authenticity: "Reassured. The owner of this place 
does not dare to provoke, and there is no good fruit to eat. The water will 
not act rashly." 


Thank you for thinking about it, or saying: "Sanlang, this is a mess, I am 
afraid that there is a lot of involvement in the heavens, you still don't 
come over." 


Huacheng smiled and said: "How about going to heaven is not about me. I 
just follow you and walk around and see." 


Suddenly, Shi Qingxuan said: "You don't come over." 


The other three people in the house looked at him, and the teacher said: 
"The Prince of the Prince is right, this 1s a mess, and there are many 
involved. I will not go out here. Friends don't have to help, stop here." 


Cheer, but slowly said: "The wind master, do not want to stop here, you 
said not to count, the Navy Master and the vernacular true fairy said it." 


Wen Yan, Shi Qingxuan's face is a stiff face. 


Thanks again and again: "The wind master, I ask a question, you have to 
be surprised." 


"what is the problem?" 


Thanks to the pity: "Do you have any handles with the Navy? Are you 
caught by the vernacular?" 


Shi Qingxuan's face is slightly white. 


Originally, the night of the pouring platform, Xie Pity has set up a very 
strong protective array, as long as Shi Qingxuan does not open the door, he 
will not suffer. However, why should he take the initiative to open the 
door? 


Unless someone is psychic to him, the first sentence directly throws out 
the handle, so that he has no room for resistance, and does not dare to 
speak, and has to do according to the instructions of the other party. 


Thanks for sitting at the table, "I am more inclined to be the handle of the 
Navy Master. Because, I believe, no matter what happened, you are not 


aware of it." 


Therefore, the rebound after the informed situation is so fierce, and even 
the resistance to the heavens, it is better to go to the world to do the sacred 
tour, and refuse to stay in the heavens to be a priest. 


Mingyi frowned: "What handle?" 


Shi Qingxuan is not a big head. If the victim is lost by the yin, the normal 
reaction should be anger, tracing the truth, and beating the fierce. 
However, none of these things he has, anger 1s there, but it 1s not true to 
the vernacular, but to his brother. What I said to others is "so far." 


This is of course completely abnormal, with one exception - 
The rise of Shi Qingxuan was originally not normal! 


Reversing the sky and changing the life of a person who could not be 
soared to the altar, this is daring and arrogant, and I have never heard of 
such a thing. If it is true, 1f you go out, you will definitely make a big 
splash. Imagine everyone wants to soar, everyone can use this means, the 
order between heaven and earth 1s nothing but a mess, a mess? 


Although this speculation is incredible, the more you think, the more 
reasonable it is. Since the beginning of his birth, Shi Qingxuan has been 
entangled in the vernacular for many years. The only way to get rid of it is 
to fly, and he just really has soared. In just a few years, a pair of brothers 
have soared in succession. This is really a great thing, and it is also a big 
deal. 


Xie pity does not want to question the fact that the teacher Qing Xuanfei is 
rising. However, if the wind division is naturally flying, how can it be so 
easily drained? If the demon wants to turn a priest into a mortal, it is so 
easy to know how many priests have been retaliated. 


Unless he was originally a mortal. Unless, when the windshield soared, the 
sailor moved something unclean. 


It is not unusual for Tian Tian Di Bao to stick to the road of cultivation. It 
is not out of the ordinary by the change of power between people and the 
squadron. After all, the world has always been like this, glory must be 
accompanied by blood, after flying, a write-off. However, some things will 
be out of place. If a mortal, or a certain priest, in order to let a person fly, 
and use the means of sin and deliberately killing people, it is very 
different. 


Xie pity whispered: "The wind master, the night you flew, is it a cold 
night?" 


For a long while, Shi Qingxuan took a deep breath and said: "Yes." 


After a pause, Shi Qingxuan said again: "I was remembered in Bogu Town 
that day. On the eve of the cold dew, isn't it the same day as I was flying? I 
wanted to ask you, is this a clue? What's the relationship? Is it a 
coincidence? But my heart is not practical, I still don't ask. Now you know, 
is it any relationship?" 


There are relationships. Of course, it has a big relationship. 


Why is the vernacular true fairy to be chosen on this day, first transfer Shi 
Qingxuan to Bogu Town, let him see a wonderful drama of a bleeding 
society, and then bring it to the pouring platform to start with him? It must 
not be so expensive for no reason. Try to connect this time with two 
places: many years ago, on the eve of a cold dew on the town of Bogu, a 
mortal named He Sheng collapsed, killing countless people and dying 
himself. On the eve of a cold dew on the pouring platform, Shi Qing 
Xuanfei rose. 


In this way, what the vernacular really wants to express 1s clear: 


The flight of your teacher Qing Xuan, and the death of this blood 
community fire protagonist can not be separated! 


Thanks to the very bad, but very reasonable guess, this is the case: 


After the division did not fly, in order to make Shi Qingxuan get rid of the 
vernacular true immortal, he secretly found a qualified person, made some 
evil laws, and let that person stop the disaster for the teacher. This person 
is undoubtedly a poor family, intelligent and unusual, but suddenly a bad 
luck, and finally died at home. 


He Sheng replaced the name of Shi Qingxuan and deceived the vernacular 
true fairy. Then, his own way of transportation was occupied by Shi 
Qingxuan. On the eve of the cold dew, a human body would have the taste 
of human purgatory; another person, in a strong escort, successfully 
robbed and soared. 


And these two people, their original fate, is the opposite! 2k novel reading 
network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 117: God is not 
as good as ghosts 


Xie pity continued: "I ventured to speculate that the Hesheng, single name 
is a mysterious character. And, his birth is eight characters, the same as the 
Fengshi adults." 


Stealing the sky for the day, crossing the sea, but not just looking for one 
can become, must meet certain certain conditions. 


Judging from the three questions that the vernacular Zhenxian first caught 
Shi Qingxuan, it firmly remembered two things: 


First, there is a "Xuan" in the name of the prey; second, the birth of the 
prey. But it does not recognize the face of the prey, but also Shi Qingxuan 
himself went up to show it. Because the teacher's remedy is early, I don't 
know about it. 


Therefore, if you want to find a person to give Shi Qingxuan a disaster, 
you must be a man who was born at the same time as Shi Qingxuan in the 
same month of the same month, and with the name "Xuan" in his name. 


Such a ghost is too hard to find. But how big is the world, looking for 
death, not necessarily not. Taking advantage of the momentum of his great 
navy, flying down the net, I really found such a person, and, actually, there 
is still a potential for flying, and will soon be robbed! 


How can such a good thing be let go? Compared with ascetic, how 
convenient. Not to be missed! 


Speaking of this, the side of the instrument seems to have reacted, and the 
look is gradually condensed. Shi Qingxuan first nodded, suddenly 
remembered something, looking towards the flower city leaning against 
the door. After all, this kind of thing can't be discussed in the face of a 
ghost. Huacheng, holding his arm, smiled and said: "You don't have to 
look at me if you are a windshield. You shouldn't worry about me. It can 


be nothing to do with me. You might as well worry about whether other 
people in heaven have caught the handle of the brother." 


Mingyi Shen said: "You really have eyeliner in heaven." 
Huacheng does not care about the tunnel: "Did you know it already?" 


The geologist was sent to the ghost city. It was originally to check this, but 
it seems that the eyeliner was buried very deep, undercover for more than 
ten years, still did not find out who it is. Huacheng said that this matter 
has nothing to do with him. Praying for nature is a letter, not much 
thinking. But he also said, "It is better to worry about other people in 
heaven." Xie Li suddenly remembered a moment and asked: "The wind 
master, that night at the dumping station, why did you open the door of the 
guardian circle? Isn't someone asking you to go out? Who is that person?" 


Teacher Qingxuan: "Yes. It is the vernacular true fairy. An opening 1s..." 


Thanks for the hands and sleeves, said: "But how does it know your 
psychic password?" 

"..."" Mingyi said with a black face. "It's not this person himself. I have to 
make friends with people all over the place. I have to talk a few words 
when I have time!" 


Shi Qing Xuan Zang said: "Ming brother can't say this, I am looking for 
the gods of heaven, I have not reported this thing with this thing!" 


Thanks to the pity: "Since the vernacular is so lingering for many years, 
the comeback is coming back, and the Navy's masters can be found... This 
secret is clearly known, and it is not difficult to get the psychic password 
of the Fengshi adults. There must be someone who has leaked your 
psychic password, whether it is intentional or not, you can follow this 
check." 


Mingyi said again: "So, do you see what it is? What did it do after it was 
called out?" 


"..." Shi Qingxuan seems to have a headache, "I don't know what it looks 
like, it casts a spell, I can't see it." 


He said vaguely, did not say what he saw, and Mingyi's face was cold. 
Thanks for speculation, it is probably a **** picture of some **** fire 
prototypes, and it is really difficult to describe. For a long while, Shi 
Qingxuan sighed and said: "I am useless. If I can fly by myself, then these 
things will not happen." 


The original number of the teacher Qing Xuan, in the mortal, 1s probably 
very good, otherwise the vernacular true fairy will not stare at him. But I 
am afraid that it is far from reaching the level of soaring. This kind of 
person is covered with a layer of aura. It is difficult for non-human things 
to start. Moreover, which demon ghost is willing to take the initiative to 
provoke future officials? 


Whether a person can fly or not is not to be smart, but to be smart and hard 
to work. It is not the more useful it is. Sometimes it is so irritating. Ten 
years of cold windows, less than people are born to think of agile exports 
into chapters; a hundred years of painstaking efforts, than a man's **** a 
wave of understanding. 


Nothing is not there. Even if the Navy spends a lot of blood on his younger 
brother, if he doesn't change his life, he will probably stop at 
Zhongtianting, and at most he will be the leader of the lower-level priest. 
Can go to this step, the infinite scenery, all because the brothers stole the 
things belonging to others, and settled on themselves. But with a little 
conscience and self-esteem, it is conceivable to know the truth after the 
truth. 


If there is no such thing, what would be the people who really have the 
number of flying air, what will it be today? 


Thinking of this, Xie pity suddenly flashed an aura. 


He said: "No. The wind master, telling you to go out, is not a vernacular." 


Shi Qingxuan lifted his face and said, "Ah? The voice must be it, I will not 
remember it." 


Thanks: "No, no, the voice 1s it, it doesn't mean the body or it. Everyone, 
remember? The prey that the vernacular is really staring at, and finally 
committed suicide. But there is one exception." 


After a pause, he said: "How did Hesheng die? How did the **** society 
fight? Is it suicide?" 


Shi Qingxuan’s eyes widened and said: “It’s not suicide. It’s...” 
Mingyi said: "Exhausted." 


Thanks: "Yes! Even if the bad luck is entangled, until the last moment, He 
Sheng has not thought of suicide." 


He stared at him: "Think carefully, this person's mind is extremely firm, 
and he has suffered various injustices. If he is an ordinary person, I am 
afraid that he has long since abandoned himself, or he has been in a fight, 
but he has been fighting. Nothing has yielded. I guess, maybe after the 
vernacular is really looking for him, I have never sucked what I want - 
fear. His death is not because of fear and despair, but he collapsed. The 
vernacular is really entangled in him, in fact, fundamentally Didn't eat the 
good fruit, bite down, bite a steel plate, collapsed his teeth, and finally lost 
completely." 


Shi Qingxuan listened, shook his head slowly, and sincerely sighed: "...I 
am not so human." 


Xie pity continued: "He died with a murderous and resentful temper. I 
don't think that the soul that has been tempered will rest in peace. It is 
inevitable that there will be no peace and longing for revenge. 


"So, the wind master, I think, the current 'white vernacular true fairy’, is 
very likely, not the one you found when you were born. But after tenacious 
confrontation to death, the vernacular true immortal He Sheng, or, He 
Xuan!" 


As soon as this statement came out, Shi Qingxuan and Ming Yi were all 
stunned. Huacheng faintly said: "Ghosts eat ghosts." 


If you eat people, if you have to go to the mouth, you can eat at most; if 
you eat ghosts and eat the right way, you can digest the other's ability and 
mana for your own use. 


Thanks to the pity: "This can also explain why the 'Vernacular True 
Immortal' understands many details of this matter. It is strange, blunt and 
strange, not so clever. But now it is a......" 


He wanted to use "combination" but he didn't feel very accurate. At this 
time, Huacheng Road: "Strengthen." 


Thanks to pity: "Yes. After swallowing up the vernacular, the 
consciousness of He Sheng is completely in control of the dominant 
position. Now he, not only has the ability to curse, but also is very clever, 
and has endless resentment against you." 


Therefore, although it is clear that Shi Qingxuan’s psychic password has 
long been known, he did not practise his curse with psychicism in the first 
place. It is necessary to step by step and tighten the trap, forcing him to 
block his ears and self. Close your eyes and lock your empty house. As if 
the cat caught a mouse, don't kill it right away, play it first, play it to 1t and 
scare it to death. 


For a long while, Mingyi said: "This is the end of the matter, what are you 
going to do?" 


Everyone looked to Shi Qingxuan. Shi Qingxuan has unknowingly caught 
his hair in a mess, and said: "... don't look at me? I don't know what to 
do!!! I just... temporarily, don't know How do you see my brother..." 


After all, it is my own brother, and it is for myself, to commit such a 
sinful crime, to harm people's lives, and to know what to do at the 
moment, it is justifiable. Shi Qingxuan said again: "But I am here to 
please everyone, first, don't say it! Temporary, just for the time being, let 
me think about it... What should I do? Although I thought for a few days, I 


didn't expect it. In short, let me calm down first..." At the end of the day, 
he was already incoherent and his eyes straightened. 


The teacher said that he had to ask the teacher Qingxuan to "treat the 
disease". What disease can heal? It is nothing more than falling into the 
altar and turning back to the mortal. Give him another life and fly again. 
This "illness" can be good. Although it is difficult to find a suitable 
candidate, who knows what kind of evil method will be used by the 
teacher? It is no wonder that Shi Qingxuan ts trying to be a mortal who 
does not be a god, and rushes to run. 


There is also a scroll about the vernacular true fairy, the mistakes and 
leaks, inevitably to mislead Shi Qingxuan to find the right direction, I do 
not know whether it is from the hands of the teacher or the hands of the 
spirit. However, when the teacher did not want to find such a qualified 
person, he would inevitably need the Lingwen Temple to help spread the 
net. Does the spiritual text really know nothing about this? Since there is a 
cleric of the teacher Qing Xuan who flew up like this, will it, and the 
second, third and even more priests fly up like this? 


If this is the case, it would be terrible. The world is in chaos and must be 
carefully considered. In addition to the flower city to stay in the house, the 
excellent travels, the other people in the small hut are full of thoughts, 
such as the enemy. At this time, there was a sudden scream of screams 
outside the huts. Some cows yelled at the squatting, and many farmers 
yelled: "Stop! Stop!" 


"What do you want to do!" 
Thanks to the side of the door, I saw, "It’s a general." 


It was only when the party was right that it was right to get up and 
slammed, but at the moment it stood outside intact. There is a monument 
in front of him. It is bound to be bound by the monument. It seems that 
there is some taboo, and he dares not to rush into the crime. Only the 
sword is standing in place. The farmers were holding the **** and the 
knives were not welcome. In the farmland, the black cow’s nose had a few 
rough air. Suddenly, the person stood up and turned into a strong man who 


was a tall man. His face was quite handsome. He was wearing a small iron 
nose and smiled. This is not a general, a rare guest. What kind of wind has 
blown you up? Let me say first, your family’s small things can be 
ignored.” 


Thank you for your pity. When he saw the farmland and the black cow, he 
had a faint impression. It is not the case. This place 1s the hometown of 
Yulongshan Yushi. At that time, it was this cow brother who borrowed the 
rainman to give thanks to the rain. For a long time, the style is as old as it 
is, and the plowing of the ground is still so diligent and vigorous. Shi 
Qingxuan also squeezed to the side of the door, thanking the pity: "The 
cow of the rain teacher's family. The cow is good." 


I used to eat a loss at the rainer's side. At the moment, I am naturally 
polite and not humble. I am quite polite. "I don't dare to be. This is not to 
find the head of the rain teacher. I would like to ask the wind master. 
Didn't come to your hometown?" 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 118: Cross the 
sky and rob the East China Sea 


The cow said: "Hey, I didn't praise you, what did you dare to do? I was 
busy planting the land and didn't see anyone coming." 


Ruan said: "If this is the case." Saying, taking a step forward, the farmers 
immediately brushed up their hoes and said: "Tread on the dead! He 
stepped on death!" 


Yan Wei frowned, said: "What step on death?" 


The cow said: "You have trampled on the crops they have worked so hard, 
and apologize." 


He looked down and looked at him with patience: "If you don't read it 
wrong, this is just a weed." 


The cow strangely said: "You are a general who fights and kills. What do 
you know? Grass is a crop. Isn't it clear that we are farming?" 


Although thankfulness has already seen that the people in Yushi Township 
are only deliberately martyrdom, but he can't help but wonder if it is grass 
or crops. How can the martial arts in the north of the temple be apologized 
to a group of farmers for such boring reasons? Directly ignore it, and 
move forward a few steps, cheering and saying: "Qing Xuan came out! 
Your brother is now robbing, the momentum is not good, something is 
going wrong!" 


Shi Qingxuan originally decided not to go out in the house. Anyway, he 
wouldn’t be hard, but once he heard this, he said, “What?!” This opened 
the door and rushed out. 


He glanced at the cow and said, "You really ran here again!" 


Shi Qingxuan looked awkward and responded with a sigh. He jumped back 
and said: "You, don't you yell at me, how can it be so fast? This is too 
sudden, I thought it would take at least a few months?" In Xianjing, the 
Navy was indeed leaving in a hurry, as if to deal with what was important, 
he immediately took **** to touch the temple. This is the handprint of the 
psychic. However, when he raised his hand, he remembered that he had 
lost his mana. He couldn’t even take care of it. He quickly grabbed the 
pray: "His Royal Highness, help me ask, this is true. Is it?" 


Both Xie and Mingyi entered the Psychic Array, and it was not a problem. 
It was already a mess of porridge, which was very bad. Many of the priests 
seem to be on the side of the East China Sea immediately, and they mutter: 
"My God... this posture... is nothing but water!" 


"This is this, can this be done..." 


The higher the mana, the more the number of robbers, the more violent the 
next day. The division has monopolized the waterway and dominated the 
financial road. This is his third day of robbery. How can this robbery be 
imagined? Thanks to pity: "It is true." 


The cow is still on the road, it is not hard to swear, far away: "You are not 
a child, whoever swindles you with this kind of thing! It’s not about eating, 
but it’s a good day to change. The clothes go again? It’s too late to be 
caught! He is now on the East China Sea, and the East China Sea has 
turned up a big wave. No one can get in and out. It’s a sudden wave of 
people who reported that you ran. How do you let him safely rob? !" 


Teacher Qingxuan: "Then tell me quickly, I am in Yushi Township?!" 
Thanks to the situation of the instant retelling in the psychic circle, said: 
"No. Now the whole sea of the Navy's robbers has released a frenzied 


mana field. He is afraid that it is chaotic, no one. Can talk to him!" 


Shi Qingxuan rushed out and said: "Take me to see!" 


Reaching out: "Go!" 


Mingyi suddenly flashed, and stopped in front of Shi Qingxuan, his look 
dignified. Teacher Qingxuan: "What happened to Ming brother?" 


Mingyi squinted, but thanked him for guessing what he thought, and why 
he wanted to stop Shi Qingxuan. 


Is it true that I am going to the water helper to get through this day? 


If the change of life is true, the Navy must accept the corresponding 
punishment. Well, I have not pursued his responsibilities now, but I have 
to help him to take it to the next level. Is there really nothing wrong with 
doing this? 


The reason why I can guess is because Xie Pity is also thinking about this 
problem. Shi Qingxuan hesitated for a moment, and finally a long sigh, 
said: "... Ming brother, I ... thank you. But anyway, after all, it is ... lam 
still not worried, first shut the eyes before saying it!" 


After he finished, he rushed to the side of the donkey and turned back: 
"Thank you, Your Excellency the Prince! Thank you, Rain Master! Thank 
you, cow! Thank you! Come back in the day!" The two hurried away. 
Mingyi stayed in the same place and followed it up. Thanks to their backs, 
they didn't leave, Huacheng slowly came out of the house and said, "Don't 
you go?" 


After thinking about it, Xie pity still shook his head and slowly said: "I 
can't manage this thing. Let's see how they solve it." 


Shi Qing is in it, and at this time he can't figure out what to do in the end. 
He is also very embarrassed. Although Xie Pity can understand why the 
teacher has to do this, he does not agree with this approach. The ideal 
ending is that the teacher does not plead guilty on his own, and he is 
responsible for the punishment. Mingyi probably also hopes so, so he 
stopped Shi Qingxuan. However, it is almost impossible to be proud of the 
spirit of the Navy and arrogant. Sitting in such a high position for so many 
years, no one will be willing to go down. 


If you change your personal, thank you for going to the scene and going to 
heaven. But I think that the wind teacher has always been friendly and 
friendly. At the critical moment of his brother, he can’t turn this face for a 
while, as if he is in danger, he’s down, and Do not read the past feelings. I 
can only see how they have solved it first. If it is finally solved, it is still 
inappropriate... 


Thinking of this, he laughed at Huacheng: "Sanlang, about your previous 
advice is right. Hey, this is the case." 


Huacheng smiled a little, waiting for the opening, but she changed her face 
and changed her face. I only listened to Lingwen in the spiritual circle: 
"What?! The boats of hundreds of fishermen have been mixed in. On this 
mouth?!" 


Xie pity immediately slammed, lost the voice: "Fishers? Where is the 
mix? East China Sea?" 


If it is said that the genius is in a mess, it is now that the porridge has been 
knocked over to the ground to feed the dog. Lingwen even responded 
innocently, but the sound was still calm: "Excuse me, which Wushen is 
worth it? Old man?" 


He squatted in the circle: "Don't worry, I took Qing Xuan to the other side, 
and the Master is also there. You know first that there are hundreds of 
people who have been encircled into the storm. We are all brought back. , 
try not to miss one." 


Lingwen said: "That's hard work for you. The Navy Master has now 
opened up the law field, and no one is allowed to enter the scope of his 
robbery. The priests of the Heavenly Court will definitely be beaten into 
leftovers and go to heaven. The priest can probably try to break through 
the barrier. I am afraid that more than two hundred people will be affected. 
The two of you are afraid that there are not enough people, and you have to 
have a martial art. Which of the princes is right now? General Nanyang? 
General Xuanzhen?" 


Someone should say: "Is the two generals not confined to the death of 
Xianjing? It is not called at the moment..." 


"What about Taihua? Isn’t your wife, Taihua, come back?" 
"Not coming back! Send it out." 
"What about Qi Ying?" 


"Who knows where he ran, this person shields all psychics all the year 
round, whoever doesn't listen, you don't know!" 


In addition to these few people, which other gods in the heavens are 
ranked? Even in anxious, thankful can not help but a little depressed, is his 
aura of the rotten **** really strong enough that everyone forgets that he 
is a **** of war? Busy: "I! Iam. I am going. Is it a fisherman in 
Donghai?" 


Lingwen said: "His Royal Highness, now the wind and waves on the East 
Sea can be very dangerous, your mana is not working well, in case..." 


Thanks to pity: "It's okay. I have been fishing in the four seas. I didn't go 
out to sea and didn't encounter big winds and waves. I often drifted at sea 
for ten days and a half, and I was used to it." 


" " 


The gods couldn’t help but think: "This is OK! Have you done some tricks 
in the end?" 


At the moment, the situation is in jeopardy, and I can’t think too much. 
Lingwen said: "Okay. That’s bothering you, you will cooperate with you!" 


Ramp: "OK!" 


Thanks for closing the psychic, and turning back: "Sanlang, the East China 
Sea..." 


Who knows, once I saw that Huacheng had changed a fresh fisherman's 
dress, lost a scorpion, grabbed it and grabbed it, and put the other hand on 
the door, simply said: "Go!" 


Thanks for a moment, then laughed, said: "Good!" Keep up. 


As soon as I opened the door, I saw that it was not a house, but a gray 
beach. 


The two came out from a small fishing room on the beach. This small 
house is one of the most commonly used sites in the East China Sea. 
Beyond the beach, there is a vast expanse of boundless sea. The reason 
why the beach is gray is not because the sand is gray, but because the sky 
is gray and the sea is gray. The black pressure is pressed, the black clouds 
are rolling, and the heavy ones are so depressed that they are breathless. 


From the far side of the sea, from time to time, a huge wave of sky and 
waves rises like a high wall on the ground, and then collapses and 
collapses. There is also a water dragon's general water column, rising from 
the sky, like a tornado, raging and mad, up and down. The sky climbed 
over the forest and thundered, twisted and smashed. 


There is a brand new big ship on the beach. The sea must not be in 
nowhere. If it is only flying in the air, it may be a thunder, so it is 
necessary to have a ship. This ship 1s not an ordinary ship. Shi Qingxuan, 
Yi and Mingyi were already on board. When they saw Hua Xie and two 
people coming out from the small fishing room, they said, "His Royal 
Highness!" 


Shi Qingxuan sighed: "His Royal Highness, you...hey! You have worked 
hard. I am sorry." 


Thanks to the boat, said: "The responsibility is here. How does the ship 
open?" 


He saw the flower city behind him with his arms folded and he was very 
relaxed. He warned: "The idlers wait for the retreat. This storm is not fun." 


At this time, Huacheng, a patchy plain clothing, still does not hide its 
handsome and smart, like a handsome little fisherman, smiled and said: "I 
am not a mess, waiting for my family." 


Xie pity also said: "He is a man in my temple." 


But he has already brightened his sword, he does not give in, and insists: 
"Retreat." 


Xie pity still did not respond, but Huacheng has said to him very firmly: 
"No. This embarrassment, I am not with you." 


There was a stalemate on both sides, but Shi Qingxuan was a must-see for 
the four seasons. He said: "Hey general, this person 1s fine, and hurry to 
sail!" 


During the speech, the sky suddenly stunned and thundered and hit the sea. 
A whole piece of sea water was lightning-fastened, and it turned into a 
fluorescing color, as if a huge heart suddenly jumped and breathed. The 
scene 1s very spectacular, and it is extremely horrible. I don’t want to wait 
any longer, and said: "Open!" 


The hull suddenly trembled, oh, a round of the sound of a circular axis, no 
one was operating, the big ship actually drove off the beach, and quickly 
drove to the depths of the sea, opening up a road in the thunder and 
thunder. 


Although the wind and waves are large, Xie Pity, Huacheng, Yi, and 
Mingyi all stand extremely stable. Only Shi Qingxuan was caught by 
Mingyi and did not stumble. Thanks for the loud voice: "Can this ship 
withstand this kind of storm?!" 


He said: "You should be barely able to do it now. If you can't do it, it's hard 
to say it!" 


The boat has already been drove very fast, and the sea water splashed high 
on both sides. Shi Qingxuan said: "Can you hurry up??" 


Ramp: "This ship is burning the mana, it is already the fastest!" 


Shi Qingxuan clenched his right hand. The hand was originally held by a 
windshield fan. A wind was flat and there was a good wind. The ship could 
at least be 40% faster, but now it was empty, but it was A long sigh. At this 
time, Huacheng took a look at the pity, whispered: "Brother." 


Thanks for turning his head, he widened his eyes. I saw a small fishing 
boat on the sea outside the seven or eight feet. The small fishing boat was 
spinning in the waves. There were several figures on the ship, which 
seemed to be calling for help. However, the cry for help was swallowed up 
by the big waves. 


The fishermen who are in trouble! 


This is the purpose of his trip. If the evil flies out, the waist of the 
fishermen who rolled up will be lifted up. Several fishermen stepped on 
the deck of the big ship, almost soft, but immediately opened the door of a 
cabin and threw them all in. When the fishermen open the door again, they 
will find themselves on the shore. 


After Huacheng and Xie Pity fished up to thirty or forty fishermen, the big 
ship was getting closer and closer to the center of the storm and the waves. 
At this moment, there must be many priests who are watching this terrible 
scene from afar, and there must be many mortals who are amazed and 
afraid of Tianwei. There are more and more lightning bolts to this ship. 
This lightning will be attracted by the source of mana, chasing the man of 
high mana, which is why it is best to hide when others are robbed, because 
it will catch fish. . 


At present, Qingxuan is a mortal. The mana of thankfulness is enough for 
him to ask a question in the psychic circle. The mana of the flower city 
does not need to be used at this time, so it is well received, so the lightning 
is dedicated to one person. call. On several occasions, he used the sword to 
kill the lightning, and he was very capable. This kind of skill, thank you is 
still quite admired. If you change the gods in the heavens, it is not only to 
be chased, but also to fight back, so they can't be put in. After crossing this 
barrier, Shi Qingxuan suddenly shouted: "Brother!!!" 


Thanks to pity, he looked up, and in the seven or eight water dragons, he 
saw the hunters in white, hanging in the air, and the division with the 
handprints. 


Although his figure is still above the big waves, it seems that some of his 
mind is restless and the pressure is not stable. From time to time, those 
manic water dragons are ready to take the opportunity to approach, waiting 
for the opportunity to swallow him into the abdomen, several times are 
dangerously avoided. The ship is still several hundred feet away from him. 
If the wind division fan is still there, Shi Qingxuan can press the wind and 
wave down one section, but now he is the body of a mortal, and even the 
sound can't be transmitted far, and he can only be anxious. As soon as I 
opened my mouth, it was extremely strong: "Shui master! Qing Xuan 
found it!" 


When the voice just fell, the teacher opened his eyes. 


At the same time, a huge wave hit the sky, and suddenly fell, the big ship 
was carried to the high midair, and did not keep up with the speed of the 
big waves falling, the whole suspended in the air, falling rapidly. Thanks 
for using the jack to settle the figure, firmly grasp the hand of the flower 
city, said: "Be careful!" 


It is strange to say that Huaming City 1s taller than him. It is effortless to 
pick him up with one hand, but Xie Pity always thinks that this person is 
fluttering, as if he is not paying attention, he will disappear, so he is very 
tight. Huacheng also held him back at the same time. Over there, shouted: 
"Sister of the water, accept God! You don't push the waves down, your 
brother is not drowning for you!" 


The teacher did not see the boat here, and he heard his words. His face 
flashed and his handprints changed suddenly. The whole body seemed to 
shake out a layer of law. The seven or eight water dragons that had been 
spinning around him were instantly defeated. It turned into a heavy rain, 
and it fell. 


When the rain falls like a falling stone, the deck creaks and the body is 
sore. But after that, the wind and waves also converge slightly. The 


division did not cross but slowly descended and landed on the ship. 
Everyone was beaten into a dying chicken, and Shi Qingxuan wiped his 
face and said: "... brother." 


The teacher's face is still blue, striding forward, said: "I told you to stay 
well, what are you doing! You are not mad at me, you are happy!!!" 


Shi Qingxuan also really does not know what to say. I was worried when I 
didn’t see it. When I saw it and thought of the thing, I couldn’t go to the 
hurdle, saying: “...oh, I am...I... ‘“ 


At the end, he grabbed his hair and sighed: "You will be robbed. I think, I 
still think..." 


The teacher did not cross but interrupted him: "Who said that I was 
robbed?" 


Shi Qingxuan sighed, said: "Is that right?" 


With both hands on the water, I wiped my hair up and said: "Don't be too 
happy. Your brother is the third day of robbery. It's so simple, at least 
seven days and seven nights. It's just an opening. "" 


In fact, even the first day of robbery is not that simple. I want to come, the 
"day robbery" that the teacher Qing Xuan greeted was greatly discounted 
compared with others. He must have thought of this festival, and his face 
is awkward. Thanks for the purpose of this trip, I asked in the psychic 
array: "Lingwen? We are now in the waters of the Navy's adults. Can you 
tell us where the fishermen who are involved in the storm are on?" ” 


Ling Wendao: "Wait a minute." After a while, she said: "Trouble. Today, 
there are 260 fishermen who have been involved in his robbery, and the 
spread is too open, and the stars are scattered. of...... " 


Without saying a few words, her voice began to be intermittent, and she 
couldn’t hear clearly. "What happened? Lingwen?" 


He thought that his mana was used up again. However, looking up at his 
look, it was obvious that he was there. A few people haven't discussed it 
yet, thanking and seeing a few ruined boats floating in the sea not far 
away, saying: "Probably the only time after the opening of the wave is too 
big, the psychic is not smooth, it may be better later. It is said that there 
are 261 fishermen who have been washed away by the waves. How much 
can be saved first?" 


Naturally no one will object. Ruan said: "Sister of the water, you advanced 
to take a break. You just took the opening, I don't know when it will come 
again. You are also unlucky this time, actually affected so many mortals." 


The teacher Wudu seems to be a little tired, slightly nodding, pushing the 
door of another cabin and going in and meditating. Shi Qingxuan seems to 
want to say something serious to him, but since he has not finished 
robbing, he can’t say anything at this juncture, he has to swallow it, and he 
is unhappy and ready to go to the side with Mingyi. Open your eyes and 
sigh: "Don't run, come over, just sit here." 


Shi Qingxuan had to kneel next to him. 


After a long time, after the night, the big ship drifted deeper into the East 
China Sea. 


Although the psychic 1s still intermittent, the time is not working, but it 
can also be used. During the period, Xie Li and others have saved more 
than two hundred fishermen. The fishermen originally went fishing in the 
sea normally. Who knows that they suddenly started such a big storm and 
rolled them into the sea too far. It is impossible for them to float back. If 
you have been floating for a few days and nights, maybe people are 
starving and dying in the sea to become dead bodies. Suddenly rescued, it 
is a perfect life, ecstasy. 


So drifting on the sea, I do not know how to float for a few days and nights 
to save all the fishermen, the teacher did not know the third day of 
robbery, I do not know when it will officially start, there will be danger at 
any time. Under such circumstances, he still did not change his style. In 
the evening, he saved several fishermen and sisters, and he was so scared 


that his eyes were spent. He put the people into his arms and softly 
comforted him. He was so sweet and affectionate, and the money was 
sentimental, and then he was sent to the cabin. Several girls were still in 
love, and they hoped to open the door to see him again. The teacher did not 
practice meditation for a long time, and the color was also a lot better. He 
blinked: "Are you not always asking for a high price?" 


Although the fishermen are just as youthful, but they are only in the 
middle of the people, they are not as good as the standards of hunting in 
the past. But after he passed the woman, he was radiant and touched his 
chin. He smiled and said: "Save it all at once." Seventy or eighty unshaven 
fishermen and grandfathers, when they see a woman, they feel the national 
color, hahahaha." 


Wen Yan, Shi Qingxuan and Ming Yi did not want to see him. Xie pity 
shook his head, but it was a little funny, sitting side by side with 
Huacheng, sitting for a while, suddenly felt a emptiness in the belly. 


The other people on the boat don't have to eat. Although Shi Qingxuan is 
now a mortal, but the skeptical skeptical teacher should have given him an 
elixir, a kind of one that can be used for a few days, so it is not hungry 
until now. state. This ship is not a ship made by the mortal world. It 
certainly will not have food. Thanks to pity, he is trying to catch a few fish 
in the sea, but he has handed a thing over him. Thanks for looking down, it 
was a soft white hoe. 


He sat back again, whispered: "Thank you Saburo." 


Huacheng also whispered: "My brother will use this for the time being, 
and it will be fine later." 


Still a gimmick split in half, and the two sat in a row slowly. On the other 
side of the ship, I heard them whisper and smeared their hair: "What are 
the two discoveries? Is it better to leave your little world and talk to us?" 


Xie Pity is about to perfuse him a few words, but suddenly frowns, said: 
"You don't feel that there is something wrong." 


Mingyi also frowned and looked up: "Yes." 


Xie pity stood up and said: "This boat seems to go a lot slower. Isn't the 
mana enough?" 


Ramp: "How is it possible. The mana that was pumped before the ship 
departed, you can run for another two days at sea." 


Thanks for walking to the side of the boat, hand on the side of the ship, 
said: "But I always feel that the ship suddenly became very heavy..." The 
sentence was not finished, the voice stopped. Several people outside the 
division were gathered to the side of the ship and said, "What happened?" 


Don't ask, just know what's going on. Although the sky is dark, it is still 
faintly visible. The draught of this big ship is suddenly abnormal and deep. 
And, it is constantly deepening! 


Xie pity immediately said: "Is there a leak under the boat?! Touching the 
rocks? Is there something that might have a hole in the water?" 


Ramp: "Impossible! How can we not perceive the reef? This ship 1s not an 
ordinary ship, and the general things are not worn unless..." 


He seemed to think of something, and he stopped, Mingyi said: "Unless 
what?" 


Ramp: "Bad." 


Teacher Qingxuan: "What is wrong?" 


ba: Mi Nace a> a ae Pig a aie a ate ai: ie a a> ce” aac ew eee: a> iy se» ala ee > a> Decne a> ai” > Mii > a> ae» Pac Sah de: ee Mae a> ay > 


> ame a le a> Si Lis Sane i> Pace Pa ee See ae 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 119: The ship’s 
ghost domain is sinking into the water. 


Thanks to pity: "One of the four, the black water sinking?" 


"Four evils are not four." 


'..."" Xie pity only remembered, he actually subconsciously excluded grace 
from these four people. Probably because he really can't put the "green 
light night tour" and the other three places on a level. 


The sorrow of the remnant of the reel, there is some shallow understanding 
of this "black water sinking boat". Legend has it that this is a big water 
ghost who lives in seclusion. Like the "blood rain and flowers", it is all 
killed in the copper furnace. Although it has always been low-key, it is 
only low-key in the world and the heavens. According to incomplete 
calculations, he is less It is said that it has swallowed up more than 500 
famous demons and ghosts. Among them, more than 400 are all high- 
powered water ghosts. The black water sneaky is the site on which it 
inhabits. 


Just as the ghost city is the site of Huacheng, "once this world, can't be 
without the sky", when they reach their boundaries, they have the final say. 
The ghost world has a very wide-ranging sentence: "The land is red and 
the king 1s in the water," and it is based on this. "Red", naturally refers to 
the blood and rain of a red dress, "black", it is this black water mysterious 
ghost. 


Ruan said: "The water master brother, you are really unlucky this time. 
The mysterious ghost is not like a green ghost, has not been so much love 
to cause trouble, but fortunately not far away, I was not found to quickly 
turn the bow." 


The rest of the people looked at him: "You tune? Isn't this ship you are in 
charge?" 


Hey 1s also strange: "Isn't it? This boat should be adjusted by itself, and it 
doesn't need to be used." 


However, the rudder is indeed moving. No, I just had to go up and 
manually put the rudder. When I put my hand on it, his eyebrows were 
wrinkled. Xie Pity also said: "Can't push?" 


It is impossible that because of the lack of strength, thankfulness is still 
very confident about his strength, but he can not push. Mingyi came up to 
check for a moment and said: "It may be stuck by something, I will go 
underneath." 


Teacher Qingxuan: "Ming brother, I will go with you." 
The teacher has no crossing: "Come back! No more running." 


Because he is still robbing, can not let him anger or distraction, affecting 
the mood, Shi Qingxuan does not dare to violate, and when he comes back, 
Mingyi will go down the deck and check it. Xie Liben also wants to help, 
but he knows that the teacher can repair it, and he can't help it. Together 
with the black sea that looks around, he thinks of something more 
important and condenses: " Will fishermen drift to this area?" 


Huacheng has excellent eyesight and has always cooperated with Xie Pity 
for search and rescue. Many fishermen have discovered it first. They 
looked at the circle and said: "There should be no. The black water ghosts 
are in the South China Sea. The fishermen cannot float so far. And this 
area has Barriers, there are no special circumstances, ordinary people can't 
get in. If they come in, they won't be saved. Basically, nothing can drift in 
and still sink." 


It’s already in the South China Sea, and I didn’t want to drift away so far. 
Thank you for your pity, and the psychic was completely blocked. 
Although it was intermittent, but it was good, but now it is dead. Although 
the sea at the moment is still calm, I don’t know if there are any sinister 
undercurrents lurking under the sea, and the sky is getting darker and 
darker. His intuition is not good. He said: "Since no fishermen have flown 
into this area, if they are later, they will be adults. If we can't repair the 


ship, we might as well abandon the ship and go ashore. The Navy Master 
will return to the East China Sea, and we will continue to search and 
rescue." 


Ramp: "Also." Then opened the door of the cabin. 


Who knows, after opening the door, the inside is empty inside the cabin, 
not the land scene, his face changed, and said: "There is a thousand miles 
of failure?!" 


Huacheng Haha said: "This is not taken for granted. Since the psychic has 
failed, why can it be used for thousands of miles?" 


Looking back, I looked at this side and said: "This little brother, I see you 
at a young age, it seems to be calm, not worried at all?" 


Thanks to pity: "Now the ship has drifted into the ghost domain, it is still 
sinking, and you can't walk, you can find a way to solve the problem." 


Shi Qing Xuan shouted under the deck: "Ming brother, how are you 
watching? Can you fix it?" 


Mingyi said at the bottom: "Nothing is bad! Nothing is stuck. It is 
something else that makes it malfunction." 


Shen Shen said: "It is the mana field of the mysterious ghost." 


During the speech, the entire deck was suddenly slammed again. Thanks to 
seeing again, there were already more than half of the hulls in the water. If 
it is an ordinary ship, it will not be able to hold it anymore. Because it was 
made by the Xian family, it is still stubborn and stubborn. He said: "There 
must be exceptions in everything. It is impossible that nothing can be 
floated in this water area! Certain things will not sink." 


Huacheng Road: "Yes." 
Everyone looked at him. Huacheng holds his arms and leisurely said: 


"There is a kind of wood that can float on the water of the black water and 
not sink." 


Thanks for speculating several common special woods, said: "Sanmu? 
Agarwood? Elm?" 


Huacheng said: "Coffin wood." 
"Coffin wood?!" 


Huacheng Road: "Well. People who have never been mistaken for black 
water ghosts can go back alive. There is only one exception, because on 
that ship, there is a person who transported his loved ones to go home to 
the sea. After the shipwreck, he rode a coffin. Go back to the shore." 


He raised his eyebrows: "The little brother knows quite a lot." 
Huacheng also raised an eyebrow and said: "Where. You know too little." 


Although Wu Dudu still held a handprint in meditating, his eyes moved 
over and blinked slightly. He said, "Hey, I wanted to ask before, who is this 
person? What is it? Why are you with you?" 


Ruan said: "Well, I am afraid you have to ask the Prince of the Prince. 
After all, it is his temple." 


Shi Qingxuan: "Well, let's not know more or less. Now, what spells are out 
of order, where can I find a coffin?" 


Ruan said: "Simple. Come, my brother will make a scene for you, let you 
know what you need to do yourself." 


Huacheng said: "It’s useless. It must be the coffin of the dead." 


Then there is no way, you can't immediately hit a coffin, and then kill one 
of them. During the speech, the big ship sank into the water, and the decks 
of the people were slightly tilted, and they were flush with the sea. The 
teacher Wudu originally meditation at the end, and almost stunned, cold 
and authentic: "But it! Or I am coming." 


He flipped out a paper fan, and the fan's head tapped his forehead. As soon 
as he unfolded, the fan had a "water" on the front and three water waves on 
the reverse side. The teacher did not have a fan, and said: "Water comes!" 


The voice just fell, thank you and felt that the hull slammed up a bit, and 
the foot was a few feet higher than the sea level, which was quite safe. He 
wondered: "Can the sailor's fan even the water of the black water sneaky 
be manipulated?" 


Huacheng Road: "It's not the water of the ghost field. He transferred the 
water from elsewhere." 


It turned out that they had not drifted into the black water ghosts for a long 
time. Just after a moment of crossing the border, the division did not cross 
the South China Sea waters not far away, and rushed to the bottom to lift 
the ship. He said: "The sailor brother is doing a good job! The rudder is 
useless. This ship can't be lost. You should quickly take it back with 
water." 


The division has not yet responded, and the hull is sinking again. It is 
actually that the ghost waters are not subject to loss, and the foreign ocean 
currents are on the bar. This time it sank even more, the entire deck was 
even more powerful, top-heavy, and everyone slipped to the bow and 
stabilized. Although the teacher Wu Duo gave birth to a handsome face, 
the temper is very strong, never admit defeat, and noticed that something 
is against him, his face flashed, and the sailor fan, when opened again, the 
three The fluctuation of the flow line is even greater, the power of the 
water in the sea is stronger, and the hull 1s suddenly lifted! 


One force is clamoring for the ship to sink, and the other force is dying to 
lift the ship, up and down, as if a tug-of-war between the two sides 1s 
deadlocked. The big ship stopped and stopped at sea, suddenly sinking and 
falling, the waves splashed, and the sea water poured from time to time, 
and it was very bad. If the ships were ordinary people, I was afraid that it 
would have been scared for a while. Xie pity firmly grasped the ship's 
side, and firmly grasped the flower city, saying: "What happened? The 
ship began to spin!" 


It is true that the big ship has begun to rotate slowly in one direction, and 
the faster and faster, the more it turns. Thanks and pity, the hull has been 
trapped in a huge vortex, being sucked in the depths of the center of the 
vortex! 


He shouted: "Everyone is careful! The water fights on both sides!" 


After all, it is not the home of the teacher's no-duty. The seawater that he 
transferred from other places is powerful, but the more he has crossed the 
border, he has discounted it, and he is fighting against the ghost field. 
After thanking the words, the big ship was sucked into the center of the 
vortex, and Xie pity threw the heart at the last moment. When one pulled 
the flower city, the two men stepped on the sword and flew up! 


He was extremely worried about whether the heart would not fly, and when 
he was off the deck, he finally breathed a sigh of relief. Although it is so 
fast, it can still fly. Viewed from above, the whole sea area is deep and 
horrible dark color. It can be clearly seen that two giant streams of 
different colors are fighting, and it is their chasing and biting that forms 
the huge vortex, the center of the vortex. After the big ship was swallowed, 
the two giant streams also spread out. But they have not given up fighting, 
like two snakes, they are still attacking each other. Every collision 
provoked a storm of turbulence, and looked back and looked around, 
saying: "The wind master? The land master? The general? Are you there?" 


Behind a dozen feet behind him, the voice of Shi Qingxuan came: "His 
Royal Highness! We are here!" 


Thanks to pity: "You are also a sword..." Looking back, nothing to say. I 
saw that Mingyi stood on the handle of a crescent shovel, and Shi 
Qingxuan sat on the head of the shovel and waved at him. 


This is not the sword, this is the shovel. This picture can't be seen directly! 


Over there, the voice of the cockroach also said: "What about the sailor 
brother?" 


He is a sword, and he does not see the Navy. Shi Qingxuan also shouted: 
"Brother? Brother?!" 


Thanks to the pity: "There is no hurry, the Navy is a water god, it should 
not sink." But when I think of the power of the whirlpool, I dare not take a 
nap, or go back and say: "Sanlang, you tighten my waist, Don't let go of 
it." 


Huacheng looks very embarrassing: "Well, good. But, brother, there 1s 
something, I have to say." 


Thank you, "What is it?" 


Huacheng Road: "The sky above the black water sneaky, can't fly. There 
will be something coming out." 


The voice just fell, only to hear a sharp shout, a white giant giant broke 
through the water, hitting the shackles. 


You are the master of the sword. When you see the monster, you will go to 
the sword. However, at this time his sword was stepping on the sole of his 
foot and pulled out. Fortunately, he reacted quickly, leaping down, holding 
a sword in the air, smashing the thing into two pieces, and then turning 
over the sword before the body quickly fell, steadily rising up, the hair is 
not chaotic, quite To calm down the tunnel: "What?" 


The thing was screamed after he was cut off, and fell to the surface of the 
sea, faintly visible. Thanks for your pity, look at it, "Fish?" 


It is indeed a fish, but it is not an ordinary fish, but a bone fish with a 
length of five feet and a width of two feet! 


The "fish" has no flesh and no scales. It has only a whole body and a bone, 
and it has a sharp mouth. It is not known whether it is poisonous. If it is 
bitten in it, it will be enough. He flew higher and said: "Be careful, there 
must be more than one thing!" 


Sure enough, when he said "one", the second one also leaped. This time, it 
is against Mingyi and Shi Qingxuan! 


Unfortunately, the geologist is not a **** of war, the attack power is not 
strong, the wind division is already the body of the mortal, plus the Ming 
Yi Yu... the shovel is not skilled, although the two are not bitten, they are 
suddenly hit. Going down and falling into the sea. In the air, Shi Qingxuan 
desperately said: "Ming brother! Remember to use your magic weapon in 
the future -" 


Mingyi said: "Roll--" 


He slammed and rushed to save people. Thanks to his hand, knowing that 
he is enough to cope with it, his heart said: "This can't be blamed on the 
master, the shovel, the magic weapon, the thin-faced priest really does not 
want to come out..." 


At this time, a cold slammed his vest. 


Xie pity immediately received the god, Wen sighed: "San Lang hurry. 
Beware, something has come." 


Huacheng Road: "Good." Really tightened his arms. 


After a short time, four sides suddenly burst into four water walls, four 
bone fish, and vacated! 


These four huge forest skeletons are not so much a "fish", but rather like 
"dragons." Bone skull, sharp corners, two groups of non-extinguished 
wildfire burning in the hollow eyelids, as if a pair of big lanterns, four 
claws complete, the upper body explored the sea, the water tank thickness, 
less said there are also six or seven feet; the lower body buried in the sea I 
still don't know how long it is. These four things, surrounded by Xie Li 
and Huacheng, locked in all directions. The two are hanging in the air, 
going up, the heart can no longer fly higher; down, it is a dead sea. 


Thanks a little sigh and said: "That... who starts first?" 


After thinking about it, he said, "Let's be together." 


The voice just fell, and the bone dragon in the east screamed and rushed. 
Thank you for raising your hand and pointing out! 


The bone dragon was settled on time. 


It can also be regarded as a giant, and it is so firmly fixed by a sword, a 
person, and a finger. The stalemate is in place. In any case, it cannot be 
stepped forward. The fishtail and hind paws are swaying wildly in the sea. 
Pick up huge waves. The other three also embraced, and Xie pity changed 
to the claws. He grabbed the horn on the bone faucet and used it as a 
weapon. In the "hue" bursting into the air, three bone dragons were hit by 


this one into a wolf-stricken" " word! 


Four bone dragons screamed and fell into the sea, and the bones were hit. 
After finishing the work, Xie pity overlooked the sea surface covered with 
broken bones, patted his hands and let out a sigh of relief. Then he turned 
back and said, "Is Sanlang okay?" 


Huacheng smiled and said: "I have brother protection, how can I have 
something?" 


He said this, thank you for being sorry. I want to come, it is easy for 
Huacheng to deal with this thing. I asked him if he had anything. It was a 
bit like deliberately asking for merit and dedication. At this time, the 
blade suddenly sank, and the pity did not react. The two fell quickly and 
plunged into the cold sea. 


It’s not being pulled down by anything, but the heart 1s too old to hold up. 
It took so long to rest! 


The icy waters of the sea were poured from all directions. Thanks to the 
two waters, they closed their mouths and tried to go upstream. However, 
this black water sneaky water is indeed very evil, thank you for swimming 
is also a good hand, in this water, the body is sinking like a lead, can not 
float anyway. He blinked and looked at it. The water was also pressed by 
the water. I can't see where the flower city is. Sweeping his arms around 


the sea, in addition to catching the fall of the heart, but did not catch 
people, thank you for being a little anxious. The more anxious, the more 
you can't swim, the faster your body sinks. Fortunately, after a while, it 
seems as if a hand suddenly opened the fog, thanking the eyes for a bright 
light, the next moment, someone took his hand, grabbed his waist, quickly 
floated up, and quickly broke The surface of the water. Thanks for taking a 
few breaths, wiped his face and saw that the person who brought him up 
was the flower city. 


It is strange to say that it is reasonable to say that Huacheng is a dead 
person. The so-called "death and death", the dead will be more heavy. He 
should sink more than thank you. However, he is so light in this water, and 
it floats easily. He looked down and thanked him: "Is it okay?" 


Thank you for your nod. However, this situation is very familiar, and it is 
inevitable that he suddenly remembered the same picture last time, and a 
heart was hot in an instant. Huacheng put him in his arms and took the 
water in the other hand. He said: "My brother will hold me tight and will 
sink when I let go." 


Xie pity did not know what to say, nodded indiscriminately. At this time, 
not far from the water, the sea surface showed several sharp bones, like the 
shark's fins, quickly approaching the two. It was the four bone dragons 
who were stunned by the gratitude and stunned, and wanted to take 
revenge. 


They looked at each other and swayed around the two for a while, and they 
had to squat, and finally they couldn’t help but rushed over. Xie pity 
clenched his heart and was waiting to fight back, but he heard Huacheng 
snoring impatiently above him. 


The bone dragon has already rushed to the front of the two people. As a 
result, he heard this sound, and the murderous gas suddenly disappeared 
without a trace. A fangs originally seemed to be biting off the throat, but 
after rushing over, it was on the heart of the sword. Hey, he kissed it twice. 


Thankfulness: "???" 


He still looked stunned, and the four bone dragons smashed in general, and 
hurriedly ran with his tail. Thanks for a moment of silence, Huacheng 
continued to take him to the water and swimed and said: "Is your brother 
seeing it? If you have a pet in the future, you can't raise it. Waste." 


pet? ?? 
Thanks for the pity: "No, no need for this..." 


Suddenly, a water dragon broke out from under the sea and rose to the sky. 
Xie pity looked up and saw that the teacher was sitting on the top of the 
water dragon, and his hands were marked with a strong attack. His face 
was suffocating and seemed to fight with anything. The sea that was 
originally unsettled became more and more violent, and Xie pity shouted: 
"The wind master! The master! The general! Where are you?" 


By the moonlight, he barely glanced around and found no other people, 
only to find himself in a huge shadow. He looked back and saw his eyes 
wide open. I saw a high wall built by a huge wave, overwhelming, and 
rushed over. Then he could see nothing. 


I don't know how long it has been floating in the sea, and Xie Li finally 
opened his eyes. 


He didn't sit up, but he could judge from the touch of his body that he had 
landed. Lying for a while, with a little effort, he looked up and saw that the 
palm print had been wrinkled. 


Slightly squatting under the waist, thanked and turned to look at it, and 
found that the thing that was holding him was the arm of Huacheng. And 
Huacheng is lying next to him. It seems that he has been squatting and he 
has never let go. 


He has already woken up, but Huacheng has not yet woken up, his eyes 
closed. Thanks for a moment, sat up and gently pushed him: "Sanlang? 
Saburo?" 


Huacheng should not, thank you for pushing him, and looked around for a 
while. Although it is already on the shore, there are no docks, people, 
houses, only dense forests, unlike the mainland, but like an island. 
Moreover, it is already daylight, isn't it a whole night? Where will this 
drift? 


Pushed for a while, Huacheng also fell asleep, no movement. Ghosts will 
not drown, so thank you for believing that Huacheng will certainly not 
drown, but there is no guarantee that there is nothing else in the sea, such 
as a bonefish with poisonous stings, secretly attacking him. So, thank you 
for touching the chest, arms and legs of Huacheng, and want to check if 
there is any wound on him. However, in addition to checking out the 
conclusion that Huacheng’s figure is really good, there is no other 
discovery. Thanks for giving me a bit of sleep, a little panic, murmured: 
"Sanlang, don't you kidding me." 


no response. 


In desperation, Xie Li actually put his head on his chest and listened to the 
heartbeat of Huacheng. Just post it and remember, how can a ghost have a 
heartbeat? Unexpectedly, this listened, actually heard it. Thanks for your 
pity, I immediately reacted and could not help but have a guess. 


The city of Huacheng will certainly not drown, but he is now a 17-year-old 
human juvenile. Will it still drown? 


Although, he still feels that Huacheng 1s unlikely to make such a mistake, 
but there is really no other way at the moment. He pressed the chest of 
Huacheng several times and he is always awake. Hesitating for a moment, 
thank you for slowly exploring his hands and gently holding the face of 
Huacheng. 


The eyebrows of this face are too good to look at. At this time, the eyes are 
closed, and there is less edge and more softness. So holding, watching, 


thinking about what to do next, thank you really hard to calm down. He 
struggled for a long time, look around, no one, look at the flower city, not 
awake. At the end, I ended up with a heart, biting my teeth, and 
whispering: "... offended." 


He said this, the voice was shaking. Finished, hands folded, silently prayed 
for a while, then bowed his head, closed his eyes, and put his lips up. 


At the same time, Huacheng also opened his eyes. 2k novel reading 
network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 120: He Ling 
Yu Zhou out of the ghost sea 


However, because of his excessive nervousness and excessive guilty 
conscience, he still closed his eyes and did not realize it. 


The last time the water was in the water was dominated by Huacheng. He 
is too strong in action, and he kisses too much. He doesn't dare to 
remember more after thanking him. He only remembers that his lips are 
swollen and numb. This time, he was led by him, but he was careful, just 
sticking it lightly, and he didn’t dare to use more force, as if he was afraid 
to wake up the flower city. But think again, he did not aim to wake up the 
flower city? And the kiss is too shallow, the lips are not closely attached to 
each other, the breath leaks, is it not futile? 


Therefore, Xie pity is still closed eyes, while the heart of the high-speed 
silent morals, while slightly separating the lips, take a breath, and paste 
again. 


This time, I kissed it deeper than the previous one. Thanks to the two cool 
lips that were in the flower city, and slowly entered the airflow. 


In the process, he always closed his eyes and did not dare to look at it. 
After five or six breaths, he thought that he would press the chest of 
Huacheng again. Who knows, blink of an eye, just greet the flower city. A 
big pair of eyes. 


Thanks to both hands and holding the cheeks of Huacheng, the four lips 
have just been separated, and there is still a soft and tingling touch on both 
lips. For a time, both of them turned into stone statues, as if a wind blew, 
they were all broken. Xie pity is already shocked, and the flower city that 
has always been in the forefront of the Taishan Mountain 1s not shocked? 


Thanks for the pity, I don’t know why I didn’t have a brain hemorrhage on 
the spot. For a long while, I said, “Samuro, you woke up.” 


Huacheng did not speak. 


Thank you for letting go of your hands and jumping back a few feet: "...no, 
no, no, no, no, no! No, no! Not what you think! I just want to give you..." 


What to give him? Give him a gas? 


Will the ghost need to get angry? He said that he did not believe in his 
own words! 


Thanks for the pity, Huacheng also sat up at once and extended a hand 
toward him. He seemed to be calming and said: "...His Royal Highness, 
you, calm down first." 


Thanks for holding both hands in his head, the whole person 1s very 
stunned. Finally, with both hands in the palm of his hand, he slams into the 
flower city and says, "I'm sorry, sorry, sorry!" 


After shouting, turning around, pulling out and running, fleeing. Huacheng 
finally returned to God, got up and chased him, and shouted behind him: 
"His Royal Highness!" 


Thanks for your ears, and screamed and replied: "I'm sorry!!!" 
dead! Hurry up! Don't die, dig a pit and pretend to be dead! 


He ran fast and rushed into the depths of the jungle. Running and running, 
suddenly flew in the face of a sharp arrow like something, although the 
pity of the eyes was greatly stimulated, the body reaction was not bad, the 
hand grabbed a spur, he jerked Looking in the direction of the incoming, 
but nothing to see, only see the shrubbery clusters. When there was a 
crisis, he calmed down and turned and ran back. Road: "Sanlang!" 


Huacheng originally followed him, and this turn almost crashed into the 
arms of Huacheng. Xie pity grabbed his hand and ran outside the jungle, 
saying: "Run, there is something in the forest!" 


The flower city that originally chased him ran back and was dragged back 
by him. He returned to the beach and thanked him for his sigh of relief. 
"Yeah, okay, didn't come over." 


Huacheng also said: "Well, there are some small things on the island, but 
nothing, it won't come." 


After listening to this, thank you for thinking about it, how can Huacheng 
be afraid of this kind of thing? Looking down, he still grabbed his hand, 
and he was stiff, and quickly let go. 


There were a few feet between the two, silently for a while, Huacheng 
sighed and pulled the collar of the clothes, saying: "I really thank my 
brother for saving me. The human body 1s really inconvenient, and the 
next sea is still drinking. A few mouthfuls of water, salty death." 


Xie pity is not so stupid, knowing that this is Huacheng looking for a step 
for himself, of course, but also had to follow down, bowed vaguely: "No, 
no." 


After a pause, Huacheng said again: "However, my brother is doing 
something wrong." 


Thanks for your pity, he said: "Is it wrong? I... I thought it would be fine." 


Huacheng Road: "Well. No. Don't do this to others in the future, or 
maybe..." 


Otherwise, it may not only save the lives of adults, but also harm people's 
lives. He said that he was serious, thanking him for being ashamed. 
Fortunately, he had never done this before, otherwise he was really guilty 
of sin, and he promised: "No, no." 


Huacheng nodded, smiling. Although Xie Pity really wants to ask 
Huacheng, how to get angry is right, but where can he dare to entangle 
more on this issue, first secretly remember, look around, said: "This island 
is really a wasteland Is there a little bit of smoke on the island?" 


Huacheng Road: "Of course. This is the center of the Blackwater Ghost, 
Blackwater Island." 


He is very determined. The blood rain and the black water sinking, these 
two should definitely be known, thank you: "Is Sanlang ever here?" 


Huacheng shook his head and said: "I haven't been here. But I know there 
is such an island." 


Xie pity raised his eyebrows and said: "I don't know where the wind 
masters drifted, not on the island." 


This place is the South China Sea black water ghost, 1s the site of others. 


At home in the north, the geoscientists are not martial arts, not to 
mention the situation of the wind division. If anything happens, it will be 
provoked by the black water, and only the navy can compete with it. 
However, the slain of the division has not yet known when it will arrive, 
and the situation is not optimistic. Xie pity asked: "Samuro, the black 
water mysterious ghost, is the temper? If there is a priest who mistakes his 
field and enters his home, what will he do?" 


Huacheng Road: "It's hard to say. However, my brother should have heard 
that. I am the king on the land, and he is the master in the water. In the 
black water ghost, I also want to be jealous of three points." 


Not only have non-home factors, but also the world's best, how to say that 
you have to leave a little thin face, and see each other in the future. Thanks 
to the pity: "Then we have to leave quickly." 


A rough walk around the island, during which the two did not go deep into 
the forest, thanked for a while, did not hear the response of the wind and 
other people, Huacheng said: "Probably they did not drift to Blackwater 
Island." 


The two went to the beach again. The sea was dead, and a piece of wood 
was thrown on the road, and it was thrown out. Such a piece of wood, it is 
reasonable to say that it can float on the water, however, after falling on 
the surface of the water a few feet away, it instantly sank. Xie pity looked 


back at the jungle and said: "It seems that logging is a ruin. It can't be used 
for a thousand miles. How do we leave the island?" 


Huacheng said: "Who can't say?" 


Thanks to pity: "But only the coffin wood that has converged over the dead 
can float in the black water ghost..." Unfinished, immediately 
remembered, coffin, there are trees everywhere, the dead, there is no in 
front of you? 


Sure enough, Huacheng smiled and said: "I can't just lie in?" 
Although he is smiling, thankful and pity is inexplicably sour. 


Huacheng flattened his palm, and the curvy smack appeared in his palm. 
Just do it and the two started to provoke the wood. Because | didn't go 
deep into the forest, I didn't encounter something lurking in the dark, and I 
cut down several trees in a while. In a blink of an eye, I was busy for a day, 
and the sky was getting darker. The two have a division of labor and 
cooperation. Everything is rushing to work, and the efficiency is very high. 
In the evening, the coffin is almost created. 


Xie pity only ate half a **** on the way, already hungry, but thought of 
doing the coffin as soon as possible to see as soon as possible, to find an 
excuse to catch fish. But how can there be fish in the water of the black 
water? Without success, he turned to the edge of the forest and picked 
some wild fruits in a not dangerous area. Who knows, when I came back, 
Huacheng had already had a bunch of bonfires, sitting by the fire, holding 
one hand, holding a branch in one hand, and a hare was grilling. 


The hare has been cleaned, and the epidermis is slightly coke DC oil, 
crispy and golden, and the meat is fragrant and tempting. Seeing that Xie 
pity came back, Huacheng smiled slightly, removed his hand and handed it 
to him. Thanks for the pity, handed the fruit to him, saying: "I can eat." 


Both of them were **, except that they were soaked in the sea water, and 
they were wet with clothes by sweat, but they all had a tacit understanding 
of not taking off their clothes and baking them. The hare meat ts really 


tender and tender, biting gently, the teeth are hot, but can not stop, the lips 
and teeth stay fragrant. Thanks to pity or half of one person, sighed: 
"Sanlang's craft is very good." 


Huacheng smiled and said: "Is it? Thank you, my brother praised." 


Thanks: "Yes. Whether it is doing woodworking or making food, I have 
never seen it better than you. The noble man of the golden branches and 
leaves is really a blessing to the world." 


When he said this, he seemed to be eating rabbits with great concentration, 
but he did not hear the sound of Huacheng. For a long while, I heard the 
flower city whisper: "I can meet him, it was my life." 


Xie pity did not know what to say, so it seemed as if he was more focused. 
After a while, I found out that Huacheng was calling him: "Brother, 
brother." 


Thanks for your pity: "What?" 


Huacheng handed over a party, and thanked him for discovering that he 
had to use too much force. Half of his face was full of oil. He was so funny 
that he was so stunned that he took it and wiped it off. Huacheng handed 
over the other half of the hare, saying: "My brother wants to be hungry, 
don't worry." 


Thanks for the pity, for a moment, still couldn't hold back, said: "Sanlang, 
the noble person, what kind of character is it? How can you not catch up?" 


He really feels that if the flower city wants to get someone, no one in the 
world can resist his offensive. That day, Huacheng said that he hadn’t 
caught up yet, and he couldn’t help but feel depressed. He felt a strange 
emotion in the heart of the ghost king. Probably think that the other party 
has very no vision, or is not blessed in the blessing. Huacheng Road: "I 
don't dare to laugh at my brother. I don't dare." 


I don’t know if it’s because of the unfair heart, or if I’m afraid that the 
flower city is arrogant, thank you seriously and said: “What are you afraid 
of? You are a ghost king, **** flowers.” 


Huacheng laughed and said: "What kind of **** ghost king, I want to be 
so powerful, I won’t be able to hang up for a few hundred years, and I 
can’t do anything, hahahaha...” 


Thanks to the pity: "Hey, you can't say that, everyone 1s not so trained." 
When I finished talking, I remembered that before he flew up, he didn't 
seem to have experienced the stage of being hung up and hitting. One 
sound. Huacheng Road: "He has seen me the most embarrassing look." 


Thanks to the pity: "I am very envious." 


Listen to him saying that Huacheng looked over. Thank you for your pity, 
Wen Wen said: "You think this way... I can understand it." 


After a pause, he said, "I have had a good time. I often thought that if 
someone saw me rolling in the mud, climbing and climbing, I could love 
me. But I don't know if there will be such a person, and I dare not show it 
to others. 


"However, since it is the person that Saburo yearns, I think, even if I have 
seen you the most embarrassing look, I will not say, ah, this person is not 
so good, this kind of words." 


He stared: "For me, it is you who have unlimited scenery. It is also you 
who fall from the dust. The point is ‘you’, not ‘how’. 


"I, very... Appreciate Saburo, so I want to know everything about you. So, I 
feel very envious, someone has seen you like that so early, this is the fate 
that can be met and not demanded. Whether or not, three points to look at 
God, seven points with courage." 


The campfire sizzled, and for a long while, neither of them spoke. Xie pity 
and cough, screamed at the eyebrows, said: "Is not too much, sorry." 


Huacheng Road: "No. You said it is very good, very right." 


Thanks for a sigh of relief, and quickly hugged the hare. Huacheng Road: 
"Not only that, there are many reasons." 


Xie pity consciously said too much, just want to end this topic quickly. 
Moreover, he couldn’t understand why he said so much, and encouraged 
Huacheng to bravely pursue his beloved. He is not a priest who is married, 
but only: "Well..." 


After a conversation, the atmosphere between the two was slightly subtle, 
and they rushed to eat and continued to work. After a short time, the coffin 
was officially completed. 


Huacheng pushed the new coffin into the water, and then turned it in 
lightly, sitting inside, such a long piece of wood, really floating on the 
water did not sink. The coffin was not wide, and Xie pity took the robes 
and hem and went in, only to feel nowhere to sit. At this time, the sky is 
thundering, the clouds are rolling, and the purple lightning is hidden. I 
don’t know when it will be a slap in the ear, the air is floating in the air, 
and it is getting denser and denser. The rainstorm is coming. 


Fortunately, the two did not be lazy when they were working, and they also 
played the cover together. Otherwise, the coffin pushed Shanghai, and soon 
it was filled with rain and smashed. 


The two looked at each other and thanked and whispered: "Sinful." 


Huacheng did not say much, and he lay down in the squat, and Xie pity 
also lie in and bring a cover. It seems as if the light is blown out and it is 
dark. 


The boat went out to sea and floated a long way. Outside, the rainstorm 
slammed the shackles, and inside, the two did not speak in one word, 
squeezed into a small space, and it was inevitable to stick to the limbs, 
drifting over and over. Cheering with one hand on the edge of the coffin, 
trying to make a little more position, the head hit a few times on the wood, 
but the flower city stretched out one hand, put it on his back, pressed it to 


his chest, and the other hand protected him. head. Xie pity even gasped 
and did not dare to be too hurried, said: "Sanlang ... or else, we change it?" 


Huacheng Road: "What?" 
Thanks: "...you are above, I am below." 
Huacheng Road: "The above is not the same." 


Xie Pity is pressing on him and said: "Let's say that we have to drift a day. 
You are only 17 or 18 years old. How can I say that I am also a Valkyrie? It 
is very heavy..." 


The voice did not fall, he said: "Sanlang, you... don't suddenly become 
bigger." 


Although he couldn't see it in the dark, he could feel the change of his 
flower city. Although the change was extremely subtle, he was very keenly 
aware of it. He guessed that Huacheng probably changed back to his true 
nature. Sure enough, the flower city opened, the low smile, is indeed the 
voice of his truth. Thanks to pity on his chest, helpless, but this also 
dilutes the inexplicable embarrassment. He gently lifted his leg, tried to 
move his position, changed his posture, but Huacheng suddenly did not 
smile, Shen Sheng said: "Don't move." 


Thanks for the pity, at this moment, a loud noise, the boat that the two took 
was suddenly sinking. Thanks for your pity: "What happened?!" 


Then, there was another loud noise. The two suddenly turned around in the 
cymbal. It was the whole boat that turned over the round. Fortunately, 
there was no water leak, but there were more than a few times, and it could 
not be guaranteed. . Huacheng followed him and said: "There is something 
staring at this boat." 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 121: He Ling 
Yu Zhou out of the ghost sea 2 


The voice just fell, the two men's feet were heavy and light, and they stood 
upright, and the boat was suddenly erected, and quickly fell, and the 
students turned a big heel! 


Huacheng held her hand on the waist of her pity, and she put a hand on his 
head and said, "Hold me!" 


If you are outside, you will be able to cope with it again and again, and 
you will be able to cope with it. If you are bad, you will be in a narrow 
space, your hands and feet will not open, and you will not know what is 
going on outside. You can only concentrate on the secret. , said: "If the 
boat breaks?!" 


Huacheng Road: "Nothing. It is not afraid of cracking. If you have me, you 
can't sink!" 


They were close to each other at this time. Huacheng’s sentence was 
almost kissed by his hair. Xie pity could even feel the microseisms from 
his throat, his mind was slightly scattered, and then he was violently 
tumbling. Got attention. The boat seems to be a child's toy, and it is 
swayed by the age of one or three years old and arrogant. As a last resort, 
thank you for holding a hand in the flower city and holding the coffin in 
one hand. 


In the chaos, the two men went up and down, turned over and over and did 
not know how to change a few rounds of body position, and hit the other 
side of the mess in a mess, rubbed it all over. Don't look at the flower city, 
it's a teenager. It's been a long time since he hit him. He knows that he is 
** his body. Thanks for being tossed with Venus, it’s easy to feel that it’s 
going to stop. It’s been found that he’s been pressed down by the flower 
city, and he’s so tired that he’s overwhelmed. Xie pity and raised a hand, 
grabbed the solid arm of the flower city on his side, snorted and dizzy: 
"Enough is not..." 


I don't know why, Huacheng didn't return to him. And thank you for a 
sentence, the breath will suddenly stagnate. Because, he suddenly realized 
that somewhere in his own, something unusual changed. 


In an instant, the feeling of pity is more incredible than seeing the 
blossoming of the iron tree. At least, when I saw the iron tree blossoming, 
he would not be blank in his mind. 


The shyness and embarrassment of 120,000 points gathered in a more 
violent storm than outside, and he was beaten. Thanks to pity and knees, 
who knows this position is not very good, he bent his knees, seems to 
encounter something that should not touch, provoked Huacheng to drink 
low: "Don't move!" 


He drank this, his tone was very heavy, and he prayed and hurriedly closed 
his legs. If he does not bend his knees, he is afraid that Huacheng will be 
aware of his body's reaction at this moment. It’s really not as good as a 
dead man in a coffin. It could have been explained by "involuntarily", but 
what is embarrassing is that there is a predecessor on the island. It can be 
said that it is unintentional once or twice, three times and four times. How 
can I say it? ! 


In a hurry, Xie pity said: "No! Saburo you... don't touch me!" 
Silence is a must, Huacheng Shen Sheng: "Good. Let's go out." 
Thank you for your kindness, saying: "Exit!" 


Suddenly, a strong sense of weightlessness struck, and the boat that the 
two were in was actually vacated! 


At the same time, Huacheng and Xie Pian each took a palm on the inner 
wall of the elm, and the boat was broken and the two men got out of the 
boat and both jumped out. Under the moonlight, Xie pity looked back and 
saw a giant water dragon holding the broken coffin. He was roaring in the 
heavy rain, as if a bite of teeth had broken the food and found it was an 


empty box, which was very angry. The talent is inevitable that this water 
dragon bites the boat and screams. 


The boat has already gone out to sea, drifting for a while, but was swept 
back by the water dragon, and the two landed and returned to Blackwater 
Island. There are two more figures on the edge of the coast. It is the Navy's 
no-transition and general. The teacher did not accept the law, and faced the 
wind and rain. He seemed to want to call the water dragon. He shot his 
shoulder and said: "The sailor brother! The water brother, you are a little 
bit! This round has passed, the next round does not know what Come and 
take some time." 


It turned out that the sudden heavy rain was the sound of the teacher’s 
vain. At the moment, it was getting smaller. The teacher did not cross the 
hand and turned to Huacheng and thanked him. He asked, "What are you 
doing?" 


" " 


He also said: "Yes, Your Royal Highness, you explain, what happened? 
What are you doing inside?" 


When the boat exploded, the posture of their tight embraces must be 
clearly seen. Xie pity blinked, and was about to open his mouth. Suddenly, 
he and Huacheng, after a while in the narrow boat, were all messy, and the 
clothes were scattered. They were unreasonable and unreasonable. And 
wiped the rain on his face, his cheeks are still hot. 


Huacheng took a step and stopped in front of him. For a long while, thank 
you for your cough and said: "...nothing 1s going on, that 1s... the coffin is 
too small." 


The teacher is inexplicable: "I didn't ask this again." 


refers to the pile of waste wood they left on the beach before, saying: 
"The coffin is what you are doing now. Wouldn't you make it bigger?" 


" " 


The type of the boat was set by Huacheng and Xie L1. At that time, it 
seemed that no one had ever thought about making a big point. Thanks to 
pity: "It’s also true, haha, haha. Are the two adults just drifting around the 
island?" 


Ruan said: "Yes. The sailor brother and the black water sneaky ocean have 
been fighting all the way, just arrived on the island, actually saw a 
eucalyptus floating in the black water sneaky sea, it is amazing." 


The heart of thankfulness slowly hangs up and smiles: "Yes, it is 
amazing." 


The teacher has no crossing: "You." 


He turned to the flower city and blinked: "I don't mean on the big ship, can 
you not sink the dead wood in the black water?" 


I pulled out the sword and said: "Yes. There is a coffin; where is the 
deceased?" 


Huacheng also smiled: "I wonder if anyone is dead, I suggest you commit 
suicide." 


He raised his sword to him and said: "It’s so arrogant. It’s a **** rain!" 


He really guessed it. Huacheng laughed and looked at the soldiers to see 
each other. Xie pity stopped in front of Huacheng and said: "Two adults, 
don't be too worried. You can rest assured that this trip is a good heart." 


Ruan said: "Sanlang? I have never heard of the **** rain flower, which is 
the number of children of the family. Good heart? Your Highness, Prince, 
are you sure that you are referring to him?" 


The teacher must stand in the most conspicuous position, so he pushed 
open and screamed: "Is this a ghost on your way? What purpose do you 
have to lure us into the black water ghost? ?" 


Huacheng Road: "There are other people's sites here, do you want me to 
come?" 


Xie Pity has become accustomed to this kind of scene, and skillfully 
transferred the topic, saying: "Isn't the Fengshi adults still found? Isn't the 
general going to fish them?" 


He said: "I was going to fish, and the sailor brother called a big wave and 
rushed away." 


There is no crossing in the division: "You don't make mistakes. You can't 
afford the waves. The things in the sea come out one by one, you can't get 
them!" 


Thanks for your help: "Don't be excited, don't be excited, that...the wind 
master and the master are together, there should be not much." 


The teacher did not cross the road: "The geoscientist? What is the use of 
the geographer! The high is not low, he is not the **** of martial arts, the 
mana is not as good as the green." Here, he seems to think of it, Shi 
Qingxuan has a hint of mana No, the face is slightly condensed, and I 
don’t speak. Thanks to pity, the industry has a specialization, although 
Mingyi is not a **** of war, the mana is not particularly strong, but no 
hydrologist said so bad. Moreover, at the end of the half-month, the skills 
displayed by the division's exhibition are not bad, even if it is not superior, 
it will not be too bad. Yan also said: "Don't worry too much. As long as 
there is no righteous ghost, the Master Master should be able to cope." 


Huacheng smiled and said: "The day of the robbery chased you to the 
black water sneaky territory, you messed up his waters, and expected the 
owner of this area not found?" 


Suddenly, the teacher had no change in his face, and he took a long life 
lock from his collar. Ruan said: "What is the situation?" 


The long-lived golden lock seemed to vibrate slightly in his palm, and the 
teacher did not have a crossing: "Qing Xuan is near here... and injured!" 


Thanks for seeing the golden lock, it was exactly the same as that of the 
teacher, Qing Xuan, who was taken down on the body, taken down and 


pressed, and said: "Is the long-life lock on the wind master? I remember 
He took it." 


The teacher did not have a crossing: "I put it on and put it on him." 


It turned out that these two long life locks were made by two brothers Jin 
Jing. When they are not far away, and the owner of one of them is 
bleeding, they will echo each other, and the closer they are, the stronger 
they will resonate. This is caused by illegal surgery, but it is natural and 
singular, so it is not affected by the ghost field. The teacher did not take 
the long life lock off the neck, holding the chain hanging in the hand, flat 
in front, slowly turned around. When he was facing a certain direction, the 
vibration of the Golden Lock suddenly increased. 


It is the direction of the forest, facing the unfathomable center of the 
island. The teacher did not cross the meditation: "Qing Xuan is on this 
island." 


When he finished, he strode to the forest. Nature travels with you. 
Thanks for thinking, since the wind division division is on the island, and 
the wind division suspected that the wound was bleeding, or find them 
first, said: "Two adults, there are small ghosts lurking in the forest, 
watching the dark arrows sneak attack." 


Huacheng also followed up. Xie pity originally wanted to pull his hand, 
but when he thought of himself, he was very disappointing in his boat. The 
hand that stretched out couldn’t help but shrink. Finally, he took the sleeve 


of Huacheng and dared not Look at each other's face look. 


Xie pity calmly said: "What did the general say? In this case, he followed 
up to avoid suspicion. Otherwise, if the two adults are in danger, and they 
suspect that he did what he did, how did he say it?" 


Ruan said: "Do this thing, what is the difference between him and her? Is 
it not easy to make a point? 


The voice just fell, a sharp wind breaking, slamming his hand, holding a 
dark arrow, said: "There is something, good insurance! Sister, be careful..." 
One sentence was not finished, and it was " ". Seven or eight dark 
arrows flew toward him. When the squatting squats, the sword lifted off 
the circle and wondered: "What is this?" 


The teacher did not cross the haha road: "Hey brother, you still be 
careful!" After all, speed up the pace. 


If you only lurk in the dark place to put a cold arrow, it is not enough to 
fear, just annoying, under the inferiority, stepping over the bushes, not 
long after, took out a few devils, said: "You are too courageous Very?" 


The little devils were so thin that they were thin and thin, just the lowest 
shackles, and they were held in their hands. They were scared into a few 
** by the generals, and they were not asking for mercy. After all, it’s the 
door of someone’s home, and it’s understandable to resist the invasion of 
outsiders. I’m scared a few words and let go. However, he later 
encountered a particularly vicious drug, and he simply grasped the ball 
and patted it in his hand. The four people split the forest in the dense 
forest, and for a long time, the resonance of the teacher's gold locks 
became more and more intense. Finally, they finally came to an empty 
area in the middle of the forest. 


The center of the forest is a lake. The four people walked there. Suddenly, 
they said: "Blood rain, you are joking, I can't help it." 


Huacheng and Xie Li looked at him and then looked at him. 


GO 66 CO CO 


Huacheng raised his eyebrows: "Brother, you have to believe, it has 
nothing to do with me." 


Thanks to the pity: "Hey general, he will not open this boring joke." 
I doubt: "Is it?" 


Thanks to the police, he said: "Beware that other things on this island are 
doing things." 


I don't talk. At this time, the teacher did not turn the pace and said: "Here.' 


The resonance of the long-lived gold lock in this place is the strongest, 
indicating that the teacher Qing Xuan is here, close at hand. However, it is 
clear here that there is nothing else except a lake. Ruan said: "Is there a 
underground palace underground?" 


The teacher did not look at the water, thanked the pity: "It is also possible, 
at the bottom of the water." 


However, the lake on the Blackwater Island can't be chaotic, and if you go 
down, you won't be able to get up. The lake is not calm, but like a huge 
mirror, reflecting the white moon hanging high in the night sky, without 
stars and clouds. The four walked along the edge of the lakeshore. Xie Li 
is thinking about how to find out the bottom of the lake, unable to prevent 
it, and screaming through the night sky. 


Walking in the forefront is the division without a cross, the last one is 
squatting, the three people in front are looking back and screaming, the 
screaming 1s the little ghost caught on the road. Its skinny body stood on 
the ground, the head disappeared, the black blood in the neck spurted up, 
and the head flew into the air, screaming. Thanks to the pity: "General, 
what do you do to kill it suddenly?" 


He said: "No!" The voice did not fall, and his body sank and fell on one 
knee. Huacheng smiled and said: "Do you not have to give this gift?" 


However, the look of sly is extremely extreme, and said: "Sister of the 
water, beware!!!" 


However, what should you watch out for? There are nothing but four of 
them at the lakeside! 


It seems that it is trapped by something invisible. The teacher has no need 
to rush to the past to help, but the air has flashed a cold light. He avoided 
the instant, however, there was still a blood mark on the cheek, and his 
face was abrupt. 


Thanks for the care of the flower city behind him, said: "Invisibility?!" 


He finally broke away from the invisible thing that suppressed him, and 
said: "Gather! Don't spread!" 


No matter how many teachers do not have to cross, one senses that long 
life locks resonate, holding it while running around the lake, while 
shouting loudly: "Qing Xuan! Qing Xuan!" 


The scene was extremely chaotic, however, it was in this chaos that 
thankfulness suddenly found a very strange thing. 


On the edge of the lakeshore, it is flat and flat, nothing. However, this is 
not the case on the shore reflected on the lake. 


In the reflection, on the other side of the lake, stood a black lacquered 
building. The house 1s sinister, not like a living, but like a cell. There is no 
door, only a high window, and it is ruthlessly sealed by a railroad. And a 
pale hand was found in the iron bar, and it was waving desperately, 
seeming to be asking for help. 


Xie pity suddenly looked up and looked at the other side. It was indeed 
nothing. The teacher Wudu was holding a long life lock there. Then bowed 
down, the reflection in the lake, and indeed did reflect a sturdy iron prison, 
the teacher did not look at the front of the iron prison, but could not see it. 


He blurted out: "Two adults! Found it! Look..." 


At this moment, his pair of pupils contracted at once. In the Blackwater 
Lake, something new is reflected. 


A dark figure appeared quietly behind him and Huacheng. 2k novel 
reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 122: BAZK7KAF 
me's 


On the shore, behind them, they are still empty! 


Thanks for the compassion on the way, I saw this scene, backhand stab. 
The shadow was clearly stabbed by him, but like a spurt of water, scattered 
a while, disappeared. Huacheng also slightly turned his head and looked at 
the direction in which the shadow disappeared. Immediately, there were 
more people in the water reflecting the shadows, a pale face and a pair of 
pale hands were the only eye-catching places in the night. Xie pity a sword 
swept out and shouted: "General general! Go to the water and see the 
reflection! The reflection in the water can reflect those things!" 


If it is not in the ghost domain, these little devils can't close the body of 
the gods, and the enemy can't see the enemy. At the moment, they are 
aware of the clues, staring at the water, brushing the two swords and 
solving all the ghosts around him. The teacher Wu Duo finally noticed the 
strange appearance of the reflection. He squatted at the water and bowed 
his head: "Qing Xuan? Are you there?!" 


The water is black lacquered, and the iron is also black lacquered, 
blending into one, it is difficult to detect, only the hand is white. Shun, a 
face suddenly found in the iron bar, it is Shi Qingxuan! 


He did not seem to see the teacher outside the iron prison without a cross, 
a horrible look, grabbed the iron bars with both hands, and desperately 
squeezed his head out, seemingly shouting for help, but a little voice could 
not be transmitted. After shouting for a while, suddenly there were five or 
six dry hands, filled his head, face, neck, shoulders, and dragged him 
down! 


When I saw it, the teacher would jump into the water without a slam, and 
he would hold him. He said, "The water master can't! I know this is not a 
trap? The water in the South China Sea is not here. You are a water **** 

officer. Going into someone else's waters, isn't it a knife for you to fish?" 


The teacher took no shots on his shoulder and said only one sentence: 
"That troubles you to help me look outside." After that, he pushed him 
away and jumped into the Blackwater Lake! 


As soon as he entered the water, he did not float up. He said: "Sister of the 
water!" but he couldn't follow it. It was only because he knew that there 
was a "boundary" under the lake. Like some organs set up in the ancient 
tomb, outsiders break in and can open the tomb door from the outside, but 
once inside, the tomb door is automatically closed, and it can't be opened 
from inside. The tomb thief is trapped in it, it is difficult to protect. This 
"boundary" has no similar settings. Thank you, "General General! You 
don't go down, you have a body at your feet, go back to the beach and go to 
the coffin to leave, I will go down!" 


Ruan said: "His Royal Highness? Are you OK?" 


Thanks for your pity: "Your mana has been discounted here. We are almost 
the same. I am more experienced than you!" 


He looked at the flower city next to him and remembered that he could 
float on the water. The two people used it here only to be bigger than him. 
They were no smaller than him. There was not a nonsense, and the little 
ghost on the ground ran out of the forest. Thanks for turning back: 
"Sanlang, still borrowing me a little mana... One point, one point is 
enough!" 


Huacheng did not speak a word, and took a light shot in his lower back. At 
the end of the heart, the sword was swept out of a giant column of white 
light, and the alleged devils hit the commandments. Thanks for a moment, 
and then received the sword, said: "I am gone!" 


The two jumped into the water together. However, at the bottom of the 
Blackwater Lake, except for the unusually cold water of the lake, there is 
no abnormality. And unlike the black water sneaky "water into the sink", 
this water can obviously float, and the ordinary lake 1s no different. 
Thanks to the strange feelings, the initiative to go downstream, and soon 
to swim to the bottom of the lake. I didn't see any strange organs under the 
water, and I didn't see the wind division and the navy. He frowned for a 


moment and returned to the upstream. After a while, thanking the pity for 
breaking out of the water, taking a few breaths and wiping the lake water, 
it was discovered that the shore scene is different! 


Beside the Blackwater Lake, there is already an iron prison, which is the 
one that is reflected in the water. 


But apart from that, the rest of the scene on the lake is still exactly the 
same, and it is too quiet, but it is very strange. The division has not been 
on the shore, is copying a large stone, roaring the big lock of the iron 
prison. He is a water **** official, and now he has entered the boundaries 
of other water law powers, unable to adjust the water in his own domain, 
just like the beast that has pulled his teeth and went to the claws. Thanks 
to the pity and the flower city on the case, the teacher did not see the pity 
and the eyes were bright, and the hand gesture: "Wu Shen! Come well! 
Fast, solve it with your Valkyrie!" 


" " 


Thank you for your pity, everyone knows that the **** of war is good, and 
it is a foot in silence. The big lock is broken. One more foot, the door is 
wide open. The teacher Wudu rushed in and said: "Green..." 


Who knows, he hasn’t rushed in yet, and he’s got a bunch of people out 
there, and the ghost is crying and crying: “Hey, ah, ah, ah, wow!” 


This group of people are unkempt, skinny, eyesless, clothes are not 
covered, dirty as if there is no bath for ten years, the chest ribs are 
protruding in rows, hands clasped, chest rubbing, very terrible, mouth still 
Ghosts and ghosts, like the same turbid turbidity, the teacher Wudu was 
simply stunned. 


However, these people just escaped and did not get entangled, so he stayed 
for a moment and did not care, and continued to rush: "green...!" 


Did not take a few steps, a fierce squat under the foot, the land was 
extremely slippery, almost fell. Moreover, there was an indescribable 
stench in the iron prison. Xie pity smelled outside when he had not entered 


it. He held his breath. When the teacher did not cross, he covered his nose 
with his sleeves and continued to rush in. He finally shouted out: Qing 
Xuan?!" 


The black paint inside, the private crying and strange whispers. For a long 
while, one voice said: "... brother..." 


Sure enough, Shi Qingxuan fell into the deepest part of the iron prison and 
leaned against a wall. The wall is the only high window in the iron prison, 
and the moonlight leaking out of the window reflects that his whole person 
is pale and pale. And beside him, surrounded by a group of dirty and weird 
people. Some are full of rotten sores, some are learning to call pigs, some 
are when they are chickens are glutinous rice, some are holding Shi 
Qingxuan, while crying and crying while his baby, they are all crazy. 


Shi Qingxuan Hao was also the priest of the gods, and he has not fallen 
into such a situation in this life. The teacher didn't go up and it was a bang, 
saying: "Get out! This is a group of ghosts!" 


Although he and the teacher Qing Xuan look like, the momentum is 
completely different. At the moment, the mana is big, but the strength is 
more prosperous. The madmen are scared to hold their heads and screams, 
and they can't help but feel pity. Shi Qingxuan also said: "Don't fight, these 
are not evil. These are all living people!" 


It’s true that these people are more like ghosts than ghosts, but when you 
look closely, they are all living people. Thanks for the slightest sorrow, my 
heart said: "Why is the black water mysterious ghost going to shut down 
such a bunch of people here?" 


The teacher did not care about this, but he did not care about it. He raised 
the long-life golden lock in one hand and grabbed the young man's arm in 
one hand. He said, "How did you come here? Where did you get hurt?" 


Shi Qingxuan was indeed dirty, and there was some blood on his legs, but 
it seemed to be nothing. "We don't know how to come. A wave hits and 
faints. When I woke up, I came here." I am a little hurt, not in the way! 
Ming brother is more serious." 


A few people discovered that Mingyi was lying on the side of the ground, 
his face was very poor, but it was not unhappy, and it was blue and purple, 
alternating and changing. Thanks to the pity: "What happened to the 
Master?" 


Shi Qingxuan: "It seems to bite into the sea. The bones and the bones of 
the bone fish are green. They are poisonous! I used the medicine I brought 
on him, but...hey." 


Thanks for your pity, I wanted to take a closer look, but I was almost 
fainted by the stench here. Looking around, there are some wooden 
barrels, the barrels are drowning, a smell of mildew, as well as the rancid 
smell of rotten pus and blood, and even the terrible taste of suspected 
months and nights. 


The teacher Wudu can no longer bear it, said: "So such a disgusting taste 
of fun, this black water sinking boat is not so good. Qing Xuan, let us go!" 


He grabbed the teacher Qing Xuan and dragged it out, but Shi Qingxuan 
said: "I am fine, don't need to help." Set up the Mingyi, this slowly broke 
out the iron prison. 


However, it is difficult to go when you come. The crossing channel of the 
Blackwater Lake has been closed. After a few drops of water, and then out 
of the lake, there was no change in the scenery, which proved that they 
were really left in the black water lake and could not go out. 


Teacher Qingxuan: "What about the general?" 


The teacher did not have a crossing: "I let my brother stay outside, he 
should also think of ways." 


Thanks to the pity: "I let the generals go to build the boat first, and wait 
for you to go out and start immediately." 


The teacher did not have a crossing: "If he made a boat, go back and report 
to us and come back to us." 


However, Mingyi has been wounded. Although I don't know how toxic it 
is, the sooner I leave, the better. I am afraid I can't wait that long. Thinking 
for a moment, thanking the pity: "The blackwater mysterious ghost is 
seclusion overseas, but he should not go out forever. Do he have to spend a 
whole lot of black water ghosts when he wants to go out? ?" 


There is no crossing in the division: "Well, you are right. There must be a 
place on the island that can be used for thousands of miles." 


He did not treat him differently, but at the moment he had a total of 
catastrophe. He thanked Shi Qingxuan several times, and naturally looked 
at it differently, and he agreed with it without hesitation. At this time, 
Mingyi slightly raised his hand, Shi Qingxuan said: "Ming brother? What 
do you want to say?" 


It seems to save energy, Mingyi did not open, only raised his hands higher. 
The crowd looked in the direction of his hand, and saw the depths of the 
forest, standing in a dark building. 


Mingyi put down his hand and dumbly said: "That place...what is it, you 
know?" 


Thanks for the pity: "I don't know. When we came over, we didn't see this 
thing." 


The teacher did not cross the eye and said: "That is the secluded water of 
the black water." 


In the rumor, the home of the Blackwater Xuan Ghost is called the 
“Ningshui River House”. After the conclusion is completed, the division 
has no crossing: "Go." 


He did not shy away from it and set off directly there. Although it seems 
to be rash, but what is the current situation, apart from walking? 


If they say that they have been spinning around in their yards, then they 
are going to smash the door. Thanks and whispered to Huacheng Road: 
"Sanlang, if you are not convenient, don't follow." 


Huacheng is also condensed, saying: "Come on, brother, leave early." 


Thank you for your nostalgia. But he faintly saw that Huacheng seems to 
have scruples. Moreover, it 1s not a matter of the owner of this place, but 
something else. 


He always felt that something was wrong, and thought of many small 
questions that had accumulated over a long period of time, and was 
slightly uneasy. Not long after, the pedestrians ignored the group of 
madmen who fled and ran away, ran through the forest and came to the 
front of the black building. 


When I came, I discovered that this "Ningshuo Water House" was actually 
a big hall, and the specifications were similar to those of the Windshield 
and the Naval Hall, which are second to none. The hall of the hall was 
closed, and several people stepped on the steps. Xie pity stood outside the 
door and knocked on the door. He said: "Excuse me. I am taking the liberty 
to commit crimes. It is an accident. I really want to go." 


No one answered. He fixed his mind and slowly pushed open the door of 
the hall. 


Originally, with many years of experience and past practice, even if there 
is something inside, it will not come out and say hello. Who knows is 
opening the door and hitting the face. At first glance, I saw an awkward 
thing. 


In the middle of the empty hall, there was a person sitting alone. And this 
person, in black, is white-- 


It was a bone! 
Cheering immediately shut the door with a bang. 


He said: "Is not the way to open the door is not right, generally not to show 
you this kind of thing when you come up?" 


I wanted to say hello again, and then I went over again. The teacher 
crossed the river without crossing him. When I came up, I pushed the two 
doors open. I said, "Is coming, are you afraid that he will not be 
entertained?" 


The crowd slowly entered the temple, a little closer to the black bones. 
Thanks for looking at it, he said, "Whose is the bone of this person? Why 
is it here?" 


Mingyi frowned, said: "..._ general, is it not a single order? It will not be 
him." 


It’s really not impossible. The teacher was slightly surprised and looked at 
a few eyes. Then he said, “It shouldn’t be. This skeletal figure is flatter 
than the general.” 


Suddenly, Shi Qingxuan said: "Wait." 


Everyone looked at him, Shi Qingxuan said: "This question is not very 
simple? Here is the Netherland Water House. It can be used in the 
Ningshui River House, of course only..." 


Thank you for understanding his meaning, said: "Black water mysterious 
ghost?" 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 123: BAZK7KAF 
mike 2 


Immediately, he vetoed: "No." 


Thanks to the flower city, said: "The ashes are the fate of the people in the 
ghost world, their fatal weakness. Imagine, how can such an important 
thing be put out like this?" 


This point, when he first met with Huacheng, Huacheng told him 
personally. Somehow, he said that he was serious, but he couldn’t help but 
think of Huacheng’s other sentences. Huacheng also stared at him, 
thanking him for a moment of loss, then turned his head and coughed. Shi 
Qingxuan: "That...what is this bone?" 


The people studied around the Sensen skeleton. Thanks: "First of all, this 
is aman." 


Everyone said: "See it." 


Thanks again and again: "Secondly, this person should be very smart with 
both hands and feet, especially the ten fingers. He should have practiced a 
little Wu, but the martial arts is not necessarily very strong. Most of the 
outstanding martial arts are boylike, and the skeleton 1s not like this." 


The teacher did not cross but swept his eyes and walked away. He said: 
"As long as this thing does not stand up and block our way, it doesn't 
matter who he is. Masters, you may see that there may be thousands of 
miles here... ” 


Who knows, the voice has not fallen, but the bones suddenly raised his 
head, unable to guard, and rushed to him! 


Thanks to the gratitude of the eye, the palm of his hand was smashed 
down, and the bone was cut down to the ground by his hand knife, 
scattered into a messy skeleton. Teacher Qingxuan: "Brother!" 


Among the five people present, Huacheng will not take care of others. 
Only one of them is a **** of martial arts. It is especially important at 
once. Although the teacher Wudu was attacked, but still calm, he only took 
a step back and said: "How is this bone? Is there a soul that is not 
scattered, is 1t attached?" 


Thanks for your pity, rummaging through the bones for a while, shook his 
head and said: "Weird." 


The teacher has no crossing: "Where is it strange?" 


Xie pity stood up and said: "There is no trace of the soul of this bone. 
Otherwise, we will not be able to detect the strange fluctuations when we 
approach." 


The teacher has no crossing: "This is the case, why can it suddenly injure 
and hurt people?" 


For a moment, I prayed: "I think it 1s a return to light." 


Teacher Qing Xuanqi said: "Returning to the light? Isn't that used for 
living people? The person who will die... is still a living person." 


Thanks to the pity: "The dead are the same. For example, the first seven is 
also a kind of returning light. After the death of the deceased, he will 
return to the soul to see his loved ones on the 7th. In fact, everything is the 
same. I think that the Navy Master must be stimulating. When it arrived, it 
suddenly made up all the residual power, and it came to the end." 


Because of the reasonableness of the words, the teacher did not pay more 
attention to his words, saying: "What kind of stimulation will it be seen by 
His Royal Highness?" 


Thanks to the pity: "Either what you said, or what is in you." 
There is no crossing in the division: "What did I say?" 


Mingyi gasped and said: "..." As long as this thing does not stand up and 
block our way, he is not important to anyone." 


Shi Qingxuan scratched his hair and inexplicably said: "Is there any 
problem with this sentence? Is it difficult for this man to be a temper?" 


There is no discussion about it, thank you for your pity: "The soul has been 
exhausted, let it go." The bones are well-received, put on the platform 
again, hands clasped together, worship a few times, Shi Qingxuan also 
came over to follow him. I have worshipped two. Five people in this 
secluded water house for a while, this place is empty, the legendary black 
water mysterious ghost is not at home. The water house is complex in 
structure, with many large and small partial temples. One of them is 
especially concealed, especially narrow. The door fan depicts a strange 
mantra, which is the trace that remains after using a thousand miles. 


It seems that there is indeed a place on the entire Blackwater Island that 
can be used for thousands of miles. And that place is this little temple. 
Using a room as a specific connection point consumes much less mana 
than a complete re-draw. And they have no mana to squander at the 
moment, it’s just right. Mingyi is an expert and took a look at the road: 
"This is a one-way array." 


Thanks for your pity, said: "I mean, I can only pass it out from here, can't 
pass it from elsewhere, is it?" 


Mingyi nodded and said: "The mana cost can be folded." 


Shi Qingxuan: "Isn't that what we need? We just need to go out. It's great! 
Let's go, don't find it for the black water master." He held the instrument in 
one hand and opened the door in the other. Mingyi has sighed: "Stop! 
There are traps!" 


When Shi Qingxuan heard it, he went back three feet and said: "What 
trap?" 


Mingyi was also alive and dragged by him three times. He was speechless 
for a moment, indicating that he would put himself on the shelf and looked 
at the mantra on the door for a long time. He said: "It is a trap. In this 
temple, I will draw a picture. You can only send one person at a time." 


Shi Qingxuan: "Is there such a thing? If it is said that two people will 
become what?" 


Mingyi coldly said: "When these two people arrive at their destination, 
you will find that they are crushed into one person." 


A few people present, only Mingy1 is a connoisseur, the rest of a water 
ee Official, a Fengshen official, a Valkyrie, this aspect is not very good. 
The first reaction of thanking pity is to go to see Huacheng. Seeing him 
staring at the scene, he did not raise objections. He wanted to come to 
Mingyi’s words and said: "If this is the case, the intruders in the unknown 
will want to activate." This escaped from the birth of the day, but it will be 
... horrible. It is no wonder that it is a trap." 


Just at this time, the sky is awkward. The crooked lightning climbed over 
the sky, and the faces of everyone in the Ningshuo Water House were 
reflected in the white and blue, like five ghosts. Everyone looks at each 
other, Shi Qingxuan: "Brother, and..." 


The teacher has no face and is not convinced, but everyone knows that this 
is his catastrophe and chasing it. Thanks to the vagueness of the ear, the 
unintentional words: "Sister of the water, this time you are really 
unlucky..." 


Shi Qingxuan: "Since we can use a thousand miles here, let's go quickly. If 
a thunder is here, collapse the water house, then..." The beam will be big. 
The demolition of a temple of a priest 1s to smash the signboards of others, 
and it is a deep hatred. Although I don’t know if there is such a jealousy in 
the ghost world, I would like to be unwilling to be demolished. Mingyi 
fingers rubbed the blood of his wounds, barely stood up, ready to draw a 
picture, said: "Where to go? Which one comes first?" 


Thanks for the pity: "That must be the first time you are a teacher. You are 
hurt." 


Mingyi shook his head and said: "This time you have to refill each time 
you use it, you will not paint, I have to stay to make up." 


Shi Qingxuan: "That brother, I will accompany you to the penultimate 
one." 


The teacher did not have a crossing: "What are you with, you are now... It’s 
useless to stay with you, hurry and go first, go to the East Sea!" 


Shi Qingxuan said: "Now everyone is almost useless, it doesn't matter. 
This time it doesn't matter to the brother, but he is so tired that he is so 
suffering, I..." He sighed. "I really didn't want to." ” 


There is no crossing in the division: "It is also passed to the same place 
anyway. It will be fine in a while, what are you afraid of?" 


If in the past, the teacher did not say a maximum of two sentences, Shi 
Qingxuan listened, but now it is different, Shi Qingxuan actually did not 
listen to him, asked something else, said: "If we go first, how 1s the 
general? Do you not stay here?" 


The teacher Wudu also noticed that his brother did not listen to his own 
words, and his look was somewhat complicated. Speaking, said: "It doesn't 
matter, my brother is tenacious, and he can insist here that we will go back 
to heaven to rescue the soldiers." 


"..." Xie pity and laugh, although the instinct of the Navy should be good, 
and not malicious, but suddenly sympathy began. After a pause, he said: 
"And slow." 


Everyone looked at him. Thanks to the pity: "Grandmaster, are you sure 
that this house can really start to shrink? Is there any problem? I don't 
think it's too good to rush, do you want to try it first?" 


Mingyi really stopped his hand and said: "How to try? There must be 
someone to try." 


Shi Qingxuan raised his hand: "T will try it." 


Huacheng did not speak for a long time, but then he picked up his arm and 
said: "Sorry, interrupt. Have you ever thought about a problem?" 


Mingyi said: "What is your opinion?" 


Huacheng Road: "How do I know if the person who went to the test has 
arrived at the destination?" 


Thank you for your pity, saying: "Yeah, the Master of the Master said, this 
is a One-way array." 


In other words, once a person is sent out, there is no way to pass it back, 
telling others that they will arrive at their destination safely. It is a dead 
end that it is isolated from the outside world and cannot communicate with 
psychics. And they have forgotten this. 


Huacheng made a conclusion and said: "So, it is totally meaningless to 
discuss this issue here. In a word, go or not, quickly settle. Don't dare? 
Then stay here." 


Although he was smiling, thanked Pity, Huacheng was slightly anxious and 
seemed to want to leave here as soon as possible. This anxiety should have 
existed since the return of the boat to the teacher, and it is probably more 
and more intense. 


The teacher did not want to wait any longer. The thunder was like a blast in 
the ear, and I wouldn’t go back sooner or later. Don’t think about it. So, he 
rushed into the temple and fell to the door, and Mingyi quickly rounded 
up. When I opened it again, there was a light smoke in the room, but it was 
empty. 


Mingyi said: "Okay. Next." 


Teacher Qingxuan: "Then the Prince's Highness..." The voice has not 
fallen, and Mingyi has pulled him over, stuffed it into the house, closed 
the door, and swiftly rounded up. The second time I opened the door, Ming 
Yi looked at the two remaining people. Thanks to the pity: "Sanlang, do 
you go first?" 


Huacheng pulled him up and said: "Brother, go together." 
Thanks for your pity, said: "But this is not a law only..." 
Huacheng Road: "I am not a living person, rest assured." 


Xie pity always feels that there is no peace of mind, but I can't say why. 
Huacheng took him into the door and said to the outside of the door: 
"Bodhisattva." 


Mingyi silently nodded. The threshold was slowly closed in front of the 
pity, through the door, looking at the face of Mingyi's green and sullen 
face, Xie pity could not help but think: "Is the Master of the Earth really 
still able to hold it?" 


Huacheng personally closed the door, fixed the need to open, and opened 
again, and presented in front of the two, is already a scene inside the 
Bodhisattva. At this time, it was nighttime, and the graceful sleep on the 
ground was like a violent death, and all the quilts were snatched, and the 
snoring sounded loud. Millet originally had a good sleep, I don’t know if 
it’s a bad thing for this cheaper one, and now it’s a dead fish on the belly. 
Lang Ying is a person who has a few rules in the corner. Xie pity picked up 
the quilt on the face, pressed the impulse that pressed directly on his face, 
and gave the quilt to two children, whispering: "We are... come back?" 


Huacheng closed the door behind him and said, "Well, it's over." 


Thanks to pity: "Not yet. I don't know if the wind masters are coming 
back." 


He shoved open the door lightly and went to the Bodhisattva to dare to 
speak loudly. He called in the psychic squad that was temporarily 
established: "Grand Master? Are you coming back?" 


No echo. I want to come to Mingyi's movements not so fast, and pity into 
the psychic array of heaven. I don’t know if I don’t know, I’m scared when 
I get into it. All the priests are shouting, and the spirit has actually 
tempered, saying: "Don't use anything that is useless to me. How much do 


I have to watch one day?! I won't start thinking about myself and ask me 
again! !" 


Thank you for your help: "Ling Wen! Are the sailors adults not coming 
back?!" 


Lingwen instantly changed his personality and grabbed him: "His Royal 
Highness! How suddenly did your voice speak so loudly... Have you 
returned from the East China Sea? Where did the Navy Master and the 
General General go?? What news is gone?" 


Thanks: "I came back from the South China Sea." 
"South China Sea?" 
"South China Sea, black water ghosts." 


The spirit is stunned: "This... how come there?" We can never get there. 
The old lady is there too?" 


Thanks to the pity: "When the story is long, the Navy is mistakenly into 
the black water ghosts on the way to the robbery. It is easy to escape from 
there. He and the wind master are coming back from me. You should go to 
the East Sea now, you are not. See you?" 


Lingwen said: "No! The East China Sea has long calmed down. More than 
two hundred fishermen have also searched and rescued them, but there is 
no trace of them on the coast." 


Thanks for your pity: "How is it possible! Unless..." 

Unless anything? 

Lingwen said: "Unless what? Your Royal Highness? What do you want to 
say to your Royal Highness? We are now sending the priest to the South 


China Sea?" 


Thankful and muttered: "It's too late." 


He closed the psychic array and turned suddenly, saying: "Sanlang." 


Huacheng seems to have expected what he would ask, and he held his 
hands and looked at him. Thanks to the pity: "Are you, what agreement 
was reached with that person a long time ago?" 


Huacheng did not answer immediately, and waited for him to open his lips, 
thanked and said: "No, no, don't tell me! You don't have to answer me. If 
you have reached an agreement with others, I certainly don't want you to 
do it because of me. The person who destroyed the promise. Suddenly 
asking you if I am wrong, don’t be embarrassed." 


Huacheng Road: "His Royal Highness, sorry." 


Xie pity shook his head and said: "You don't apologize. I should have 
thought that it must be because of some kind of agreement that you can't 
intervene or tell me the truth directly." 


Huacheng did not dissuade him, but he did not interfere with his will, but 
he followed all the way, and he had tried his best to take him away. 
However, thankfulness often went deeper into the center of the incident for 
various reasons. Thanks, "I want to thank you more." 


Huacheng Road: "Have you guessed it?" 


Xie pity nodded and said: "Probably guessed. In fact, it should have been 
guessed long ago, but he is really too powerful. I often think too much, 
doubt and repeated overthrow, often overlooking the most direct 
possibility." 


After a pause, he said: "And, that person really gives you a face. In order 
to open me up peacefully, I have spent a lot of hard work and a lot of 
bends." 


"His Royal Highness." Huacheng Road, "This is the end of the matter." 


Thanks a lot of sighs and said: "I hope so too. But he is afraid that he has 
done something too much." 


Silence for a moment, Huacheng softly said: "But you have come back, 
you can't go back to the ghost domain. This matter, let them solve it 
themselves." 


Thanks for the pity: "Not necessarily." 
It is said that Huacheng has a slight stagnation. 


Thanks to pity: "I just remembered it just now. There is a way to contact 
the adults of the wind." 


He got his hands and printed his hands and said: "So, Saburo, sorry, I have 
to go back first." 


When I saw the starting hand, Huacheng got it, but he obviously didn't 
expect to have such a trick. He blinked slightly and said, "... brother?" 


Thanks for a word: "Shift - Soul - Big - Law!" 


After closing his eyes, the familiar weightlessness hits, as if the soul was 
pulled out, suddenly thrown high and fell, and then opened his eyes, the 
face is no longer the face of the flower city, but the endless night and rapid 
The forest that has retreated to both sides. Xie pity can also hear the rapid 
breathing and the intense heartbeat from his mouth. 


Successful! 


The soul-moving ** is not commonly used, and it is extremely powerful 
than the psychic, and it is more rare than the psychic, so the general legal 
barrier does not think of blocking this spell. 


On the same day, after he and Shi Qingxuan exhibited a movement of the 
soul, Shi Qingxuan did not have time to close his mind and lost his mana 
and became a mortal. It is like the two of them exchanged the keys of the 
other's house and used the other's house. After returning, Shi Qingxuan 
should immediately change the lock to the house, so that he could not go 
in again, but he did not. Therefore, thank you can still use the previous key 
to open the house of the teacher Qing Xuan, but Shi Qingxuan can not 


open the room of the pity. Therefore, the two of them are sharing a body at 
the moment, and the body that thanked the pity should be soft in the same 
place, and fell down. I wonder if it has been caught by the flower city? 


Shi Qingxuan ran panting, his heart and gallbladder, and seemed to be 
escaping under the chase of something. Thanks to the ear, I heard the 
ghosts crying in the wind, and the group of madmen who were locked in 
the iron prison on Blackwater Island. They seem to love the teacher 
Qingxuan very much, and should even say that they are "eager". They are 
eagerly chasing their tongues and screaming at their tongues. The young 
ribs and lungs of the teacher are faintly painful, crying and crying, and 
crying silently. Xie pity feels that he runs up and the atmosphere is messy, 
so it will not last long, and take the initiative to control the body rhythm, 
said: "Wind Master!" 


He was speaking with the teacher's mouth, and the teacher Qingxuan 
almost bit his tongue and said: "Who?! Who is inside my body?!?!" 


Thanks to pity: "Calm, adults, I am coming back to you with the soul of 
the soul! Give me the body, I will help you run." 


Thanks to the feelings of the teacher, Qing Xuan’s eyes suddenly burst into 
two lines of tears: "His Royal Highness Prince!! It is really reassuring! 
You are so reliable!!! Thank you!" 


Thanks for your pity: "Don't thank you! You listen to me, the wind master, 
run!" 


Teacher Qingxuan: "Isn't that, I am running now?!" 


Thanks for the pity: "It's not this run, I mean let you run away..." In the 
middle of the talk, seven or eight crazy and filthy geeks were thrown in the 
woods, and they all rushed toward the teacher. Thanks to the two hands, 
the knots creaked, and the chain of thirty feet flew up, so many people 
could not afford to climb. Shi Qing Xuanmu stunned and said: "Is this 
kicked? It's so powerful. Wu Shen is so good! I also want to be a 
Valkyrie." 


Xie Pity has since poured out a nice cold water, saying: "No, ah, you are a 
physical qualification, not suitable for being a Valkyrie..." 


The two talked with the same body, as if they asked themselves to split the 
scene and taught others to think that it was really weird. Thanks to the 
pity: "What about Feng Master, Navy Master?" 


Shi Qingxuan looked around and said: "My brother and Ming brother don't 
know where to go. Just when I opened the door, I found that I was still in 
the Netherland. I just came out of another room. I don't know where it 1s. 
Something went wrong..." 


Suddenly, I thanked my feet and jumped up and flew up the tree. Shi 
Qingxuan is not clear, but the body suddenly feels that there is no teacher 
to go to the wall and let me go. I feel that it is quite wonderful, so he can 
control his body and climb to the top of the tree lightly and flexibly. "Your 
grandson, what are you doing suddenly... ” 


The voice did not fall, and thanked the pity and grabbed his mouth. 


In fact, it is to lick your own mouth. After a short time, Xie pity climbed 
the branch, sat on the branch, hidden in the dense foliage, and then, a 
staggering long shadow appeared at the end of the road, and fixed his eyes, 
it was Mingyl. 


He still looks pale, and the beauty 1s flat, but he is barely able to go. Shi 
Qingxuan was overjoyed and put down his hand. He was about to yell at 
him, but he prayed and raised his hand to cover his mouth. This time it 
was both hands, and it was almost breathless. Shi Qingxuan is not a savage 
person. Immediately, he understands that there is a deep meaning and no 
struggle. Watching Mingyi walk past the small road below, thanking the 
pity and letting go, slipping down from the tree and sneaking in the jungle. 


Flying for a while, Shi Qingxuan looked back and whispered: "His Royal 
Highness, why didn't you let me call Ming Ming?" 


Xie pity did not answer, and the figure suddenly stagnate. Shi Qingxuan 
once again turned back, and the pupils contracted sharply. 


It was only after Ming Yi, who had left the distance, stood in front of him, 
or in front of them. 


Mingyi seems to hold a tree to support the body, frowning: "...how are you 
here too?" 


Shi Qingxuan dismissed: "I..." 


Thanks for the unrequited voice, his hand stretched to the back and shook, 
indicating that he must not reveal the existence of the third "person." 
Teacher Qing Xuan will know, Mingyi's eyebrows are wrinkled more and 
more: "Your hand, what is behind the back? What is hidden?" 


Shi Qingxuan was busy spreading his hands to him and said, "No!" 


Thanks to pity, his scalp is blasting in a circle, and his back is numb, 
thinking about it. Although Mingyi is very reliable in Shiqing’s heart, he 
was scared by this. jump. 


Mingyi looked inexplicably and said: "I didn't really let you show it to 
me." 


Although this look is disgusting, but it is also very cordial, Shi Qingxuan 
is relieved, and the half-body goose bumps gradually fade away. Although 
she was very anxious, she did not dare to speak out at this time. Ming 
Yidao: "What about the Navy Master?" 


Shi Qingxuan: "You didn't see my brother? I am looking for him 
everywhere. Not that I can send us away from Blackwater Island. Why did 
the Prince Edwards go back, are we still here?" 


Thank you for listening, secretly anxious. Although he tried his best to put 
down the "hahahahahaha" that would inevitably appear when Shi Qingxuan 
was over-exposed, it would not be like Shi Qingxuan would say such 
normal Zhengjing. So, he madly scratched his hair and pointed out that the 
instrument said: "Ming brother! Isn't it for you to have more time to 
practice? Are you wrong with your hands!" 


Although a little exaggerated, but the effect is good. Mingyi really did not 
notice the clues, black face, said: "Roll! Have the ability to paint." 


With that said, he came over again. Shi Qingxuan stood still, and thanked 
him for quickly replacing him. He went up and held Mingyl, saying: 
"Ming brother, how is your injury? Is it poisonous?" 


Mingyi shook his head and said: "Nothing. Let's find the Navy Master 
first." 


Shi Qingxuan nodded and the two slowly walked forward. Xie Li could not 
find a chance to warn the teacher Qing Xuan, complaining that the pain is 
not over, must be embarrassed, and suddenly feel the lips slightly, but Shi 
Qingxuan is silently opening and closing, can not help but feel a spirit. 
Finely distinguishing the mouth shape, he said: "What happened?" 


Thanks to the closeness of Mingyi, he was surprised to find a strange, 
slightly bowed, and responded with a mouthful: "He is a fake." 


At the moment when the four characters were closed, thank you for feeling 
a thin goose bump on the arm. 


Shi Qing Xuan Zang eyes wide, with a mouth style: "Fake?! Who 1s he?!" 
Thanks for giving the answer silently. 
He said: "The vernacular is really fairy." 


Shi Qingxuan took a breath of air, and Mingyi’s voice came from the side: 
"What happened?" 


Shi Qingxuan sucked this cold air to the bottom, then sighed and trembled: 
"I am afraid." 


Silence for a moment, Mingyi said: "It 1s too early to be afraid." 
If it is in the past, this will inevitably be interpreted as awkward comfort. 


However, at this moment, it sounds like a sinister taste that cannot be said, 
as if it is a threat. 


Shi Qingxuan bowed his head and thanked him with a mouthful: "No. The 
vernacular is really immortal, it will not transform!" 


In fact, after thanking and saying that he was exporting, he also felt that it 
was not appropriate to call it "the vernacular true fairy". It should be said 
that it was too disrespectful and too sloppy. A few days ago, the "white 
vernacular true fairy" that Shi Qingxuan encountered, at best, was a small 
flaw, or a negligible point, body, or a residue that had not been eaten. So he 
gave the second answer: 


"Black water mysterious ghost." 


At the foot of Shi Qingxuan is another glimpse. Mingyi said: "What 
happened to you?" 


Shi Qingxuan’s teeth trembled and said: “I want to die...” 
Mingyi is cold and cold: "You think it's beautiful." 


Again. The same frosty tone, the same cold words, is clearly the same as 
in the past, but at the moment there is a completely different 
interpretation. However, this is far from over. Thanks and silently said the 
third name: 


"He Xuan." 

Shi Qingxuan seems to be unable to stand it anymore. 

His heart was like a drum, and thanking him was also aware of it. Just 
passing a small stream, he made a decisive decision and said: "Ming 
brother, I think you should take a break and find it!" 

Mingyi said: "Which time is there to rest?" 

Thank you for your pity: "You are poisoned, the more you move, the faster 


you can get sick. Besides, you don't rest, I have a mortal to rest. You sit 
down first, I will get some water to drink." 


Therefore, he tried his best to keep his hands and feet steady, not to 
divulge a little trembling, let Mingyi sit on the grass, and he went to the 
stream, covering the whispering voice by the sound of flowing streams. 
Shi Qing Xuanzang both hands poured water on his face, calmed down, 
whispered: "His Royal Highness, what are you talking about? Who is this 
person behind me? Is one of those three? Did it form a Ming brother? Or 
are they all attached to Ming brother?" 


Thanks to the pity: "The wind master, calm! Not them, it is him! There is 
only one person at your side. From beginning to end, it is this person. No 
one has been transformed, no one has been Leaning!" 


Shi Qingxuan muttered: "But, but Ming brother, he..." 


Thanks for your pity: "Don't call Ming brother. The real Ming brother is 
dead!" 


Shi Qingxuan: "How do you know? You saw it?" 


Thanks to the pity: "Not only did I see it, but you also saw it. The real 
master of the geographer is the bone that was just for the sake of the 
Nguyen Shuifu! Why should he use the crescent shovel of the bad master? 
Because that It’s not his thing at all! The person behind you, whose name 
was called He Xuan hundreds of years ago, was cultivated as a desperate 
name, black water, and a ghost. He swallowed the vernacular and 
manipulated it to find you, imprisoned and killed the real geologist. , from 
a long time ago, I took the name and replaced it to the heavenly court!" 


When the voice just fell, his whole person suddenly became stiff. 


One hand, I couldn't catch it on his shoulder. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 124: Dead 
water master 


The voice of Mingyi came from behind: "What are you talking about?" 
Shi Qingxuan is stiff and says: "I... I... [..." 


Xie pity wants to help him talk, but the tongue is not listening. There is no 
way, the most trusted friends on weekdays are actually the most fearful 
things, and have been lurking around them. There are no people in the 
wild, I don’t know what he wants to do, who 1s not afraid? 


Suddenly, the five fingers of Mingyi tightened, and Shi Qingxuan’s 
shoulders hurt, and this was pressed by him. 


At the same time, the stream suddenly burst out with a pair of pale hands, 
grabbing the teacher Qing Xuan throat. 


Water ghost! 


When Mingyi pressed, the hand grabbed an empty space, and he blew a 
palm again. The water screamed, thinking that the thing was broken. Shi 
Qingxuan fell to sit on the ground, and Mingyi pulled him up and said: 
"You don't have a problem with your brain. You can find a stream in the 
black water ghosts." 


Shi Qingxuan only used the stream water soaked in the body of the water 
ghost to wake himself up. It was slightly disgusting. However, he did not 
pay attention to it at all. The cheeks were dripping with water. The ** 
seemed to be a chicken, and it was lost. Staying is pulled up by "Ming Yi" 
and staying with him. 


In fact, thinking about it carefully, all the things about this "Ming Brother" 
reveal a strange thing. 


He is a geographer, and of course, all the way down the road, all the way, 
he painted. This should be his housekeeping skills, but there are frequent 
situations. 


Their group of four people was inexplicably transferred from Bodhisattva 

to Bogu Town, and the transmission of Fengshi Navy on Blackwater Island 
was out of order. Is the Hall of Transmission a disrepair for a long time? Is 
there something else to do? Is the curtain|post|/black|hand too supernatural? 


Why bother to think too much? The simplest answer is that all of them are 
Mingyi! 


For the first time, the wind teacher was taken away by the "Vernacular 
True Immortal". He was lost. The wind division who lost his mana was 
also discovered by him. He always accompanied him in the fear and action 
of him. It is him who knows the palm of his hand; knowing the password 
of the windshield can drive the "white vernacular true fairy" to threaten 
him to open the door of the platoon protection array. 


At that time, he personally smashed the signboard of Feng Shui Temple, 
but he did not change his color. Perhaps it was because of his maverick, 
and perhaps because he was deliberate. 


By the head in front of the enemy, the enemy has to smash the signboard 
of the enemy, and the enemy has to thank him, how bold he 1s. 


For these subtle eccentricities, thanking is not always doubtful, he also 
personally tried - the three questions. But he never thought that there 
would be such a daring and incredible thing: a ghost, disguised as a priest 
for many years, has been lurking among them! 


Black water sinking, consistently low-key? 
Perennial in another identity, of course low-key. 


At that time, the answer of "Ming Yi" did not flaw. That is because he 
swallowed the vernacular true fairy, possessed its ability, can drive it as a 
cockroach, the desperate ghost king, must be above it, of course, not 


limited by that characteristic. I want to tell the truth and tell the truth, I 
want to tell lies and tell lies. 


The savvy and dexterous, in line with the status of the division. Why do 
you want to supply it in the Netherland? necessary. Because it is the bone 
of a priest, after all, if you carelessly treat it, only the grass is buried, and 
you must not be able to suppress the coffin board. Therefore, you can only 
treat it in your own court. 


However, let Xie pity guess his identity, but not only this, but its flutter. 


The Navy asked why the bones returned to the light. Mingyi rushed and 
replied, "As long as things will stand up and block their way, everything is 
important." In fact, I am afraid that the real Mingyi is stimulated. This is 
not the sentence, but the following four words - " Master Master!" Just 
because he is the real master! 


The person who pretended to be him stood in front of him and deliberately 
directed them in the wrong direction. 


Sometimes, "Ming Yi" deliberately reversed the other way, and pulled the 
two in the right direction so as to pick up the suspect. For example, he said 
to Huacheng, "You really have an eyeliner in the heavens." But that 
eyeliner, isn't it his own? Therefore, Huacheng only sneered back to him. 
"Did you know it already?", the latent meaning is: "Why must you 
pretend?" 


However, the term "eyeliner" may not be accurate. Between these two 
people, it should be an agreement. For example, information exchange. 


The cooperation between the two desperate ghost kings is not a win-win 
situation? Black water is mixed into the heavens, mastering the size of the 
heavens, and the flower city is rooted in the human world. In addition, if 
there 1s more cooperation, it is not known. Junwu sent the "land master" to 
the ghost city to go undercover. It was just that the water rushed to the 
Dragon King Temple and sent it to the thief's nest. 


"Ming Yi" lurks to this day, probably only two accidents. For the first time, 
it was the law of the dragon. 


The imposter 1s naturally not going to have nothing to do with it. Cheering 
is more inclined. The law of the dragon and the whistling of the sky is the 
real release of Mingyi when it escapes. 


It is impossible to completely disguise another person into the heavens. It 
is impossible to know enough about that person. Therefore, the person who 
is replaced must leave a living mouth and lick the details from his mouth. 
Including experience, skills, how to use magic weapons. The false 
instrument should be taken away when he was just robbed, and he had not 
yet had time to ascend to heaven. Otherwise, if the real instrument has 
contact with other priests, impersonation is easier to dismantle. 


It was an accident, so Huacheng received the news and had to go back to 
help the partners. And it happened that thankfulness also received the task 
given by Jun Wu: ghost city rescue. 


I didn't think it was at the time. When I think about it, I will find out, is 
that action too smooth? Thanks to the rescue of the "Digit" from the bliss 
of the bliss, but how did he discover the dungeon in the bliss? 


It was because he first saw the ghost-faced man who was wearing a curse 
under Huacheng, and later saw this sneak sneak in the bliss. 


It is a shame to curse this kind of thing. The general priest is shackled. It 
should all be hidden. The ghost face person will wear it directly. Why did 
he hide again later? In addition to "inadvertent", another explanation 1s 
that he deliberately, in order to attract the attention of pity, let him 
logically discover the "Incarcerated" false geographer. In fact, the true 
instrument that issued the distress signal should be killed after this. 
Because it is impossible to destroy the corpse, but not to leave the body, it 
is equivalent to leaving a lot of clues, so he turned into a white bone. 


The second accident was that Shi Qingxuan found a thankfulness after 
being intimidated by the vernacular. 


Huacheng obviously did not want to be thankful for being involved in the 
incident. Therefore, at that time, Mingyi said, "It’s not my intention to 
come here." Later, at the pouring table, the time when Huacheng left, it 
should be to meet with Mingyi and ask him what happened. 


These, thank you have no chance to elaborate on the teacher Qing Xuan, 
but Shi Qingxuan must have thought of one by one, and his hands have 
been hidden under the sleeves and shivered. 


The two walked side by side, thanking the pity is thinking, where did the 
teacher go? 


The first one to leave through the gate array is the division without a cross. 
The last one is "Ming Yi". He should not be able to cross Shi Qingxuan to 
do anything to the teacher. There are three possibilities: First, the teacher 
is passed on. Going somewhere else; second, there are other things waiting 
for him at the destination of the division, he has been killed; third, the 
division has left itself. 


If it is one or two, there is no reason why Mingyi will continue to play in 
front of Shi Qingxuan and look for him together. When I think of it, 
suddenly, thank you for listening to "Ming Yi": "What about your long life 
lock?" 


Shi Qingxuan did not react, but thank you for your heart. Mingyi asked 
several times, and Shi Qingxuan said: "Ah?" 


"Ming Yi" did not say good-heartedly: "You are not saying that your two 
long-life gold locks are made by brother Jin Jing. Will the master resonate 
when he is injured?" 


Shi Qingxuan said to "Ming Yi" that he naturally knows the usefulness of 
this treasure. This means that I have to use this golden lock to find the 
whereabouts of the teacher! 


Teacher Qingxuan: "But...but my injury is already good!" 


"Ming Yi" is cold and cold: "Isn't that simple?" said, raising his hand 
slightly. Thanks for thinking: "Does he want to give the wind master an 
extra knife?" He is concentrating on the alert, who knows, "Ming Yi" is 
pressed on the wound of his own arm. 


The wound that had already healed was **** as it was. He said: "You give 
me the lock." 


Seeing this, thank you have to admire. 


Even if it is a play, it is amazing to do this. He can fully understand why 
Shi Qingxuan would value Mingyi as a friend. 


If this move is not an implied murder or a bad intention, such a person, it 
is a friend worthy of making friends! 


Shi Qingxuan hesitated and did not dare to move. As long as he has a long 

life lock, the two gold locks will resonate. If the division is not aware of it, 
it will inevitably come forward to look for it. "Ming Yi" frowned and said: 

"Are you scared?" 


Teacher Qingxuan: "...not! Actually, this, this lock, I didn't tell you? Only I 
wear it, it has this effect." 


"Ming Yi" suspected: "Is there such a thing?" 
Shi Qingxuan died and died in a long life lock, nodded hard: "Yes!" 


"Ming Yi" stared at him for a moment, seemed to give up this plan, looked 
down at the wound of his arm, and said nothing. Who knows, at this time, 
the long life lock on the neck of Shi Qingxuan trembled. 


Shi Qingxuan’s face changed dramatically, and “Ming Yi” reacted very 
quickly. He immediately walked in the direction of the long-life lock, 
saying: “The Navy master is there.” 


The golden lock resonated, indicating that the division was injured. But 
when he entered the battlefield, he was still unscathed. What would be 
hurting him now? 


Thanks to pity, Shi Qingxuan is eager to go, and does not want to go. They 
are trapped in the magical world of Blackwater Lake. There are no other 
people on the island. They are going to work hard to cut trees and make 
them go back. Shi Qingxuan is a mortal under the eyes. The teacher is no 
longer injured, so he should not be alone. Calling the ground is not 
working, sent to the door, how can this run? 


Hastily walked for a while, Shi Qingxuan said: "Ming... Brother, I think 
there is fraud in this, it is best not to go!" 


"Ming Yi" said: "What is fraud?" 


Shi Qingxuan hardened his scalp: "How can my brother get hurt? It is not 
necessarily him." 


"Ming Yi" is much more reasonable than him. He said: "At the moment, on 
the site of the Ghost King, the Navy Master may not be able to protect 
himself. No matter what, let's go and see." 


Shi Qingxuan could not think of a reason not to go. Xie pity can't think of 
it, but he waits and sees it. As the long-life lock vibration increased, the 
two became closer and closer, but they saw the teacher lying on the 
ground, the wolf curled up, licking the abdomen, very painful appearance. 
Shi Qingxuan was shocked and shouted: "Brother!" ran up, and Mingyi 
followed. 


Who knows, Shi Qingxuan approached the division without a cross, the 
teacher jumped up and slammed, grabbed him, and laughed wildly. Shi 
Qingxuan was held with a full of horror, and he was shocked. It was 
discovered that this person had a snot in his eyes, and there was no 
teacher, but he was a madman who wore the clothes of the teacher and the 
gold lock. 


He didn't speak yet, but he heard a loud noise. The "Ming Yi" suddenly fell 
to the ground, and a black hole with a hydrangea size was on his chest. 
And the tree jumped down to a white figure, grabbed him and ran, and 
said: "Go!" 


Thanks for your attention, this talent is a teacher without a cross! 
Teacher Qingxuan: "Brother?!" 


The teacher did not cross the low and said: "Don't talk to me! He is not a 
good person!" 


In the light stone fire, thank you for understanding. It turned out that the 
division was not a fuel-efficient lamp. When he came out of the door, he 
found that he was still not aware of the situation in the Netherland. He 
thinks that it is much simpler and more sharp than thanking him. The first 
one suspects that Mingyi is doing a ghost. He hides first and can't find 
him. He hides in the dark to see what he is doing. He probably sent it to a 
different place with Shi Qingxuan, otherwise he would hide with Shi 
Qingxuan. After discovering that Mingyi and Shi Qingxuan had acted 
together, he pulled a crazy man to come over, put on his coat, put ona 
gold lock, and then hit a palm, first attracting the attention of Mingyi, and 
then attacking from the side. He is also very ruthless. In fact, there is no 
strong evidence to prove that Mingyi has moved a lot of hands and feet, 
but he just started, but he is directly rushing to death! 


Shi Qingxuan couldn't help but look back. This time, I just saw the "Ming 
Yi" who was pierced through the heart and lie on the ground for a while, 
sat up and looked down at the **** hollow with a blank expression. Stand 
up slowly. 


On time, thank you for feeling a cool heart from the teacher Qingxuan to 
the bottom of his heart. Even if it is a priest, how can it be done like this? 
There must be only non-human things! 


The two brothers rushed out for a while, suddenly, thanked the pity on the 
back of the cold hair, and said: "Beware!" The water master pulled, the 


front of the air came a sharp wind breaking, the cold flashed. If it weren't 
for the pity, the Navy would have been wiped his neck. 


Invisible people who can only be reflected in the reflection in the water! 


The teacher snorted and took out the navy fan. The backhand was a fan. 
Seven or eight slender water arrows were shot from the water in the fan, 
and they surrounded the two sides to form a protective ring. Now, those 
invisible people can't help them. The two continued to flee, and Shi 
Qingxuan couldn't help but look back. This time, the creeps, and said: 
"He... keep up!" 


Sure enough, "Ming Yi" was about twenty feet behind them and was 
slowly moving forward. Although it seems to be "slow step", but every 
time he takes a step, the distance between the two people in the front is 
instantly close, and it seems that if you take another seven or eight steps, 
you can immediately grab them and put them on the back! 


The teacher did not turn back, but it was only one fan. On the fan plane, 
two or thirty dragon-shaped water arrows were shot. The water was 
condensed, and the sound of the steel blade was broken. Doubled; fanned a 
few times, more than a hundred water arrows flew toward "Ming Yi", and 
copied from all sides, as long as one missed, it must be a transparent hole. 
However, "Ming Yi" actually held the first arrived water arrow by hand, 
and the rope was generally glimpsed. The navy fan, actually got rid of it! 


When the fan left the hand, the water dragon arrow fluttering in the air 
turned into a drizzle and fell. The teacher did not cross the brakes and 
looked at his hand incredulously. For the first time in more than a hundred 
years, some people have fallen from the hand of the sailor. He knew that 
he couldn't run away, and looked back. The "Ming Yi" also took a steady 
hand toward them. 


He seems to be making some subtle changes in his whole body. Every step 
of the way, this change is one more point. The original white face was 
paler, and the flower city was bloodless, the eyebrows were sharper, the 
outline of the eyebrows was deeper, and of course, it was more gloomy. 
Originally plain black robes, quietly in the inconspicuous corner gave 


birth to a thin line of water waves and dark lines, sparkling secret silver. 
When he walked to the front of Feng Shui Second Division, although it 
was still the original face, it was already a completely different person. 


The geologist is not a martial art force, but the mana is not strong, but this 
one is obviously inconsistent with these two points. The teacher did not 
cross the road and said: "What the **** are you?" 


"Ming Yi" seems to be funny, blinking: "You are on my site, I have to ask 
me what is it?" 


"..." The teacher has no crossing: "Blackwater mysterious ghost?" 


"Ming Yi" looked at Shi Qingxuan, but Shi Qingxuan did not react. The 
teacher has no crossing: "Have you been a geographer? Or..." He did not 
finish, he also reacted, said, "It turns out." 


But what he reacted to is that the mysterious ghost has been lurking in the 
heavens. There is no crossing in the division: "You and I have always been 
in the river without water, and it is divided into domains. This time, your 
site is not what I want, why not take a step back." 


"Ming Yi" said: "The water is in the sky, and there are times when there is 
no dare to cross." 


The teacher was arrogant and arrogant. After listening to this, there was a 
slight unpleasant color on the surface. Although people are under the roof 
and their younger brothers are around, they have to bow their heads, but 
they are not willing to be short-sighted. "If the timing and location are not 
right, the teacher may not be afraid of you." 


"Ming Yi" has taken another step forward, and Sen Ran said: "The teacher 
has no cross, you see who I am?" 


The teacher had no wrinkles and looked at him. He has seen this face 
several times, and he did not know what he said. "Who do you want me to 
say?" It was thought that he was suggesting that he could not reveal his 
identity. "You don't care who you are." I swear in the name of my navy, as 


long as it doesn't affect my brothers, what do you have to do, it has 
nothing to do with me..." 


His voice has not fallen, "Ming Yi" is cool and authentic: "Shui Yoo Tian 
Guo really expensive people forget things. When you turned over the 
number of people and the roster of the mortal world, it took a lot of hard 
work to find me so unique, how? After a few hundred years, I forgot what I 
looked like?" 


Upon hearing this sentence, the teacher’s face was distorted little by little. 


This kind of "live and ghost" look that usually appears on the face of a 
mortal is the first time he appears on his face. The teacher did not have a 
pair of pupils to shrink to a very small size, and said: "Are you still 
alive?!" 


He Xuan is cold and cold: "I am dead!" 


He said this sentence, suddenly raised one hand, four fingers together, and 
lifted up. Xie pity felt a sharp pain hitting the head, but Shi Qingxuan was 
influenced by his law field and fainted. 


I don't know how long it took, thanking the pity to wake up with the 
consciousness of Shi Qingxuan. The eyes haven't opened yet, and I feel 
that something has been lingering on him. 


Slowly blinking, I found out that it was seven or eight hairy, stinky heads. 
A group of mad people are surrounded by him, sulking and smirking at the 
face, while reaching out and messing. Xie pity is still calm, just because 
he judges that there is no life at the moment, and this group of strange 
people is dirty and not a threat. Shi Qingxuan was shocked. He wanted to 
push it away, but he heard a burst of smashing chains, cold hands and feet, 
and no movement. Looking up, it turned out that he was shackled on a 
mottled wall by a large chain of several wooden sticks, and his arms were 
lifted high. 


Looking at the ground and the smallpox, he should have returned to the 
Netherland. The feeling of thankfulness is just like him. It’s all a 


headache. I just want to say: “The wind master, calm, I teach you how to 
break free from this kind of sly...” but suddenly found that he couldn’t 
make a sound. ! 


Under the stranger, thank you for your careful self-examination. His mana 
has indeed lost a large part of it. Although his soul can still stay in the 
body of the teacher, he is unable to use the body of the teacher, and even 
the voice prompts will not work. Could it be that the mana borrowed from 
Huacheng has run out? 


impossible. It takes a lot of mana to make a move. The mana that 
Huacheng lends to him will only be more, never less. Moreover, he feels 
that the mana is still fading, and he is anxious and anxious. At this time, a 
hoarse voice opposite: "Qing Xuan!" 


Shi Qingxuan’s eyes are flowers, and he looks up and looks at him. 


He was not locked by the chain, but his white clothes were dirty and 
squatting on the ground. He saw the teacher Qingxuan woke up and 
smiled. He seemed to want to come over, but he was immediately tripped 
by the person beside him. Your majesty. The man stood shoulder-to-hand, 
his face was cold and gloomy, and his complexion was a cold heart. It was 
the black water mysterious ghost, or He Xuan. 


Behind him, there is a **** platform, four black and smooth urns, 
standing calmly above the platform. Two torn fans were thrown on the 
ground, just the windshield fan and the navy fan. 


Father, mother, sister, fiancee. 
He Xuandao: "Taro." 
The teacher had no eyes on the teacher Qing Xuan, and said: "Okay." 


One sentence, but actually squatting in front of the platform, the squatting 
squatting against the four urns smashed dozens of heads. At the end of the 
squat, he got up slightly, but He Xuan stepped on his head and said coldly: 
"I let you get up." 


When the teacher did not cross the road, he was trampled by this foot and 
bitten his teeth. "No...". 


The older brother who was so proud that he was not willing to be low, was 
stepped on the ground with a foot. Although he knew that the reward he 
had to do should be ten times heavier than this, but the blood was thicker 
than water. Can't bear it, Shi Qingxuan: "Brother..." 


Hearing, He Xuansensen swept over. Even if I couldn’t lift my head, I 
didn’t know the bad thing. I immediately said, “You shut up!” 


Thinking for a moment, He Xuan moved his boots from his head. The 
teacher did not have the trepidation, but could not get up, whispered: 
"Qing Xuan!" 


He Xuan slowly came over. The madman was afraid that he was very good, 
and the ghost screamed to escape, but still sneaked at the teacher, as if he 
was holding something on him. Shi Qingxuan was locked on the wall, 
looking at this face that he should have been familiar with, and he was 
very strange. 


He Xuan squatted in front of him and paused. He asked: "Is the vernacular 
really scary?" 


He asked plainly and unwaveringly, and Shi Qingxuan had his eyes straight 
and his lips trembled and he could not speak. 


The vernacular of the past is really terrible. At present, the person who 
swallowed the "white vernacular true fairy" is ten times more than the 
nightmare of his youth. And this fear is what he should have suffered long 
ago. 

There is no crossing in the division: "He Xuan, it’s my idea to take care of 
one person when I work alone. This matter has nothing to do with my 
brother." 


He Xuan sneered: "Is nothing?" 


He stared at Shi Qingxuan and said in a word: "Your brother, a talented 
and ordinary man, can fly to heaven, the scenery 1s infinite, occupying my 
life, and enjoying my god. You tell me, this is called Not related to him?" 


This sentence, the word is like a knife, the knife and the knife are tied, that 
is to say to the teacher Qing Xuan, Rao is the teacher Qing Xuan clearly in 
the middle of the ins and outs, can not help but bowed his head, only that 
this life can not lift. The teacher did not make a strong calm, said: "You... 
since I have been around him, it should be clear that I have not lied to you, 
his temper can not hide, he really does not know from start to finish!" 


He Xuan Li said: "Because it is so hateful! Why do he know nothing?!" 
Shi Qingxuan’s head is lower. 


Why do you take the blood of others and step on the bones of others, but I 
can enjoy it with peace of mind and without any burden? 


He Xuan said again: "I didn't know it at first, but I didn't know it later?!" 
Shi Qingxuan raised his head and trembled: "Ming brother, I..." 
He Xuan shouted: "Stop!" 


His face was almost awkward, and Shi Qingxuan glanced at it and 
slammed it with a chill. He Xuan suddenly got up and walked up and down 
in the Netherland Palace, whispering: "I gave you a chance!" 


Shi Qingxuan closed his eyes and clenched his fists. Thanks to the old 
anger in the town of Bogu, "Good. Good!" and Shi Qingxuan want to go to 
the East Coast, "Ming Yi" blocked his scene. 


However, every time, Shi Qingxuan chose to help the teacher without a 
Cross. 


He whispered: "...sorry." 


He Xuan settled in his body and asked: "I am sorry, what is it?" 


The four urns in the row were placed opposite Shi Qingxuan, as if taunting 
his sorrowful apology, which made him more painful and burned his heart, 
as 1f he had said that everything would be returned to its original shape. 
Teacher Qingxuan: "...I know it's useless, but I..." 


He Xuan said indifferently: "But what are you? You know it's useless, but 
you still want to work hard to show sincerity, hope to touch me, I hope I 
can let go of hatred and resolve my grievances." 


Shi Qingxuan said: "No! No! I don't have this meaning! I am just... | am 
just, I, I really feel sorry for you. Really. Ming... Heh... He Gongzi. I know 
that I am with My brother is wrong. At this point, there is no way to 
remedy it, so..." 


He Xuan listened and said: "So?" 


At this moment, more words are pale and weak, and Shi Qingxuan has 
worked hard for a while, but he can’t say it. He Xuan is cold and cold: 
"Say, why don't you continue to talk. So you are willing to die for death?" 


Shi Qingxuan a glimpse. The teacher can't listen to it, and said: "He 
Xuan!!! The culprit is me, the vernacular is true, but Qingxuan himself is 
not sinful, you..." 


He Xuandao: "Who is my family of five who is guilty? Who is dead?" 


The teacher did not have a trip. He Xuan continued to ask: "Let's say. Are 
you willing?" 

"..." Shi Qingxuan whispered, "I am willing." 

Hearing, He Xuan sneered. Because Shi Qingxuan lowered his head, 


thanking him for not seeing his look, even if he saw it, I am afraid he 
could not figure out his mind. 


He said, He Xuan took the hand and walked away. The group of madsters 
saw him leave, and surrounded him. There was a thigh arm holding the 
teacher Qing Xuan who refused to let go, some pulled his hair, some 


hooked his neck, and all eyes were green, as if to live him. Going to eat in 
the stomach, Rao is thankful to live in the piles and feels creepy, heart: 
"Where are these people? Why do you want to make such a bunch of 
madmen here?" 


Shi Qingxuan silently endured these madmen pushing and pulling, pulling 
and pulling, not dare to make a sound. He Xuan looked at him with a cold 
eye and said: "Do you know who these are?" 


A few thin claws touched and touched on the face of Shi Qingxuan. He 
didn't even dare to come out. Of course, he didn't have time to think about 
who it was. He shook his head. He Xuandao: "Bad life, life-threatening, 
pigs and dogs are not as good as life, and living to drive people crazy." 


Thanks for a chill in his heart, he vaguely guessed what he wanted to do. 
The teacher Wudu also suddenly understood, and his eyes were round and 
said: "...you?!" 


He Xuan stood in the middle of Shi Wudu and Shi Qingxuan, and said 
coldly: "Now, I will give you two choices." 


He first referred to the teacher without a cross, saying: "The first choice. 
You, pick one from this group of people, exchange your brother's life with 
him. Then, roll yourself to the mortal world." 


The layers of bloodshot climbed the eye of the teacher, and his shoulders 
shook. He Xuandao: "Since you like to change your life so much, you want 
to come to this hand very skilled, I don't need to teach." 


This step, if you do not look at the cause, is really vicious. Although the 
original life of Shi Qingxuan is not qualified for soaring, it is also a very 
rich and leisurely person. Look at these people, all of them are sick or 
sore, or they are tortured to go crazy. Obviously, there is nothing wrong 
with the catastrophe. If it is exchanged with them, will Shi Qing Xuan Yu 
fall to the same tragic situation as them? This is the life that can drive 
people to life, and will suffer from endless suffering from now on. 


This robbery, the division of the division is obviously a failure of the 
robbery, and the incident of the vernacular is really awkward. After being 
degraded as a mortal, he could no longer give Master Qingxuan a good 
life. How can an ordinary person who is deprived of mana and a 
commander who is rotten to the heart of the earth go through this? 


The teacher did not breathe and gnawed his teeth: "The second one?" 
He Xuan continued: "The second one, you." 
This time, he is staring at Shi Qingxuan. 


He said word by word: "I will not move your life. You are here, cut off 
your brother's head!" 


"Dangling", he lost a rusty knife on the ground, Shi Qingxuan stared at the 
knife, widened his eyes. He Xuandao: "Then, never appear in front of me. 
In this way, I can not exist when you are in this world." 


The hatred that carved into the bone marrow settled for hundreds of years, 
and finally reached the peak of the explosion. Anyone can see his crazy 
color burned from his eyes. Anyone can understand that he is not talking 
about it. Silence for a moment, the teacher did not cross the mute: "...] am 
self-proclaimed. I can't do it myself." 


He Xuandao: "You are not qualified to bargain with me." 


The teacher did not want to look forward to the teacher Qing Xuan, 
muttering: "You are asking for our life..." 


Shi Qingxuan was not so desperate, he was busy: "Brother! Brother! We, 
we choose the first one. The first one." 


After a while, the teacher calmed down and said, "No. I choose the second 
one." 


"..." Shi Qing Xuan Zang, said: "Why choose the second one? Are we all 
alive? Brother, the first one, the second one, I can't." 


The teacher did not cross the anger: "Shut up! You don't know me? I have 
nothing to do, and then I see you become something that is muddy. Can I 
do it?! You are better than mad at me!" 


Shi Qingxuan: "Brother! Forget it... It’s better to live than to die. Besides, 
actually, you think about it, let’s... we have lived for hundreds of years, and 
it should be...and it should be..." It seems that I have thought of how these 
hundreds of years of good work came, and I dare not dare to say it again. 


He Xuan looked at them coldly. It was easy for the teacher to climb up, 
grabbed the rusty knife, stumbled to the wall, grabbed the shoulders of his 
brother, and said, "Come!" and whispered shortly: "...to find the general, 
Ask him to take care of you." 


The knife was so scary and full of rust, not to mention killing, it was 
difficult to kill a chicken. If you use such a knife to cut your head, the cut 
and the cut are bound to suffer. Shi Qingxuan was so scared that he 
couldn’t hold it, and went straight to the ground. He said, “Forget it, 
brother, forget it! Didn’t you tell me that everyone in the world is 
managing himself, others will take care of us, never Don't you all take care 
of yourself? Don't give me this, don't give it to me!" 


The teacher did not have a drink: "Qing Xuan! Don't be so good!" 


Immediately, smiled bitterly: "...you are outside the water, you don't know. 
The waves that have been turned over in the past few years have not been 
one thousand and eight hundred. Heaven and earth are enemies. I am dead. 
It’s better to say that if I die, it’s a matter of nothing. If I don’t die, but 
nothing is gone, then it’s life is better than death. If I’m not a water **** 
official, I can’t take care of you at all. I am afraid that our brothers have 
not been there for two days... you are holding!" 


Shi Qingxuan 1s simply scared and crying, out of control: "No! No, no, no, 
no brother, I really can't help! Don't force me, don't give it to me!!! Help, 
help, help!! !" 


At this time, he actually screamed and screamed for help, and the teacher 
did not have a ferry: "It's okay! Don't be afraid of Qing Xuan, it's better to 


change your life and smoke." 


He Xuan looked at the place with his patience and suddenly kicked it. I 
couldn’t wait for the defense guard to cross the ball and kicked a few 
mouthfuls of blood. He rolled a few rolls on the ground and couldn’t stand 
up. Shi Qingxuan hanged on the wall and shouted: "Brother!" 


He Xuansen said: "Shut up! Show your disgusting brothers in front of me. 
No one will be touched by you!" 


Who knows, the teacher did not have a big mouth to vomit blood, suddenly 
turned over, jumped up, grabbed the neck of Shi Qingxuan. Thanks for the 

pity, the sigh of suffocation, the blood straight to the face. Shi Qingxuan is 
hard to say: "... brother?" 


The teacher did not bite the blood between the teeth, said: "Qing Xuan! 
You are like this now, I can't worry! I am sure that you can't live in the 
world when you die. It is better to go with your brother!" 


Said, his hands suddenly force, Shi Qingxuan eyes black before the eyes, 


the dying dying in the throat | _—_. Thank you for your kindness: "Is the 
Navy really going to kill the wind division?!" 


In a short period of time, the pressure in the throat suddenly became loose, 
and a large amount of air poured in, and the teacher coughed and coughed, 
So it was easy to take a breath. However, He Xuan stood beside them, and 
his hands were pinched off from the arm, and the two hands of the teacher 
who had crossed his neck were cold. "I gave you the third way?" 


The teacher did not have arms crossed, the blood was like a fountain, but 
he laughed loudly. He Xuan lost his waste and generally lost his two arms 
and said: "What are you laughing at?" 


The teacher did not have a bloody, empty wide sleeve, saying: "I laughed 
at you, thinking that you have the upper hand! You feel that you have been 
forbearing for many years now, and finally reported revenge, very happy?" 


He Xuandao: "It’s really awesome to see you in this stretch of sorrow!" 


The teacher did not have a crossing: "Is it? Then I tell you, I am also very 
happy!" 


He used the **** broken arms to "catch" the collar of He Xuan and said: 
"Because I saw that you are so angry now, so painful, so hateful, hate your 
teeth, but you still Can't save your loved ones, you are still a ghost in the 
gutter, you don't have any use for jumping your feet, because they have all 
died! And I, my brother has lived so long, it has been a few hundred years. 
God official, even if he is not right, he can't live, and he also earned it, or I 
won! I am not more happy than you? Hahahahahaha..." 


Listening and listening, the white face of He Xuan gradually changed, as if 
the icy wasteland had a wildfire. Suddenly, the airflow in the room seemed 
to be much colder. Shi Qingxuan is extremely fearful and dumb and said: 
"... Brother, don't say it, don't say it. Brother, my God, what are you 
talking about, what are you talking about?" 


He Xuan fiercely shot, grabbed the neck of the teacher without crossing, 
and said: "You, no regrets!" 


The teacher Wudu laughed and said: "The heart of repentance? Hey, laugh 
at the dead! Lose you or the ghost king, black water sinking, you talk to 
me about remorse? I tell you, there is no such thing!" 


Shi Qingxuan screamed, and the teacher did not lead the slogan: 
"Everything I got today is my own struggle. Nothing, I fight for myself; 
without life, I will change myself! My life is not up to me. day!" 


For the first time, Xie Pity heard this explanation of "I am dying from the 
sky", even if the scalp was numb, I was shocked. It seems that the 
teacher’s arrogance and self-confidence did not admit the wrong 
momentum and opened up a new horizon. He Xuan also laughed. Seeing 
his face getting more and more horrible, Shi Qingxuan collapsed: "... 
Brother, I beg you, I beg you, don't say it, please stop. Help!" 


The teacher did not lose the color of Zhang Du, and said: "Qing Xuan, my 
brother took a step first, waiting for you below. Hahahahahaha..." 


The voice did not fall, and He Xuan put his hand on his head and grabbed 
his hair. Shi Qing Xuan soul flies, the chain slammed on the wall, said: 
"Ming brother! Ming brother! Sorry, sorry, sorry, sorry, sorry, sorry, sorry! 
Thousands and thousands of mistakes are our fault, it is my fault! My 
brother is because I am like this, my brother is crazy, he is crazy, you see 
no! I... 1... you... you..." 


I want to ask for mercy, but I can’t ask for it. I just dare to look at it with 
my eyes. He Xuan slowly looked at him, and he seemed to think of 
something. He calmed down and stopped the action. 


Seeing it, as if grabbing a glimmer of hope, Shi Qingxuan breathed a sigh 
of relief, and tears finally rolled down. However, the tears had not yet had 
time to fall to the ground, just listen to He Xuan’s cold voice: "You are the 
wrong person." 


After that, he raised his hand and shook his head from his neck! 
"Ah, ah, ah, ah ah ah ah ah ah ah 


The division did not have a head and body separation, blood spurted out 
from the jagged gap in the neck, and it was splashed on Shi Qingxuan's 
body and face. Shi Qingxuan couldn't stand it anymore, yelling like crazy. 


It’s very interesting to see a headless corpse standing up. Those crazy 
people are also happy to start a madness. They turn around him. The 
barefoot scorpion stepped on a large circle of **** footprints, circling and 
clapping. : "Hey! Dead and dead!" 


"Dead is dead! Hey!" 


Shi Qingxuan yelled for a long time, but he only seemed to fly, and I 
didn’t know when it stopped. When he was blessed with his consciousness, 
he had been sitting on the **** ground for a long time. 


He Xuan stood in front of him, and he was carrying a teacher with his head 
and his head, looking at him. 


For a long while, He Xuan said faintly: "Do you have anything to say." 


Shi Qing Xuan eyes stared blankly at the row of ashes on the front of the 
platform, and the two broken fans on the ground. For a long time, the 
gentleness said: "... want to die." 


He Xuan said coldly: "You think it is beautiful." 
Then, He Xuan extended a hand to him, and Shi Qingxuan closed his eyes. 


At the same time, the soul of thankfulness was suddenly smashed out and 
thrown high! 


When he fell, he opened his eyes and he was soft in the arms of a red man. 
Huacheng pinched his jaw with one hand and kissed him deeply. No 
wonder, I feel that the mana that supports the transfer of the soul suddenly 
fell sharply. It turned out that Huacheng actually used this quickest and 
most effective way to **** all the mana that he had just borrowed from 
thanking and praying. Recalled in the body. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 125: Dead 
water sergeant fighting mysterious ghost 2 


Seeing that Xie Yu woke up, Huacheng slightly separated his lips and 
seemed to leave. In a hurry, Xie pity can not care so much, his hands lifted, 
grabbed his neck, and the mana sucked away by the flower city sucked 
back. 


Huacheng obviously didn't expect him to do this. He didn't pay attention to 
it, and the mana returned. He was afraid that he would leave. He quickly 
took his face and rolled his body. He pressed the flower city to the ground 
and felt a cool spirit. The stream is poured into the body and falls into the 
abdomen along the throat, which is extremely warm. At this time, the 
small wooden door of Bodhisattva creaked, and a giant cyan caterpillar 
figure climbed out of the house and said: "Fucking, which dog is so 
courageous! The thief stealing things. Did you steal the old man’s head 
and dare to disturb Laozi’s sleep, Auntie! Look at Laozi’s...”” When the 
voice was not lost, I saw two overlapping figures that looked like a kiss, 
and that was red and white. Who and who? I was scared to scream: "Oh, 
ah, ah, ah!" 


Huacheng raised his hand slightly. Originally, he was going to grab the 
shoulders of thanking him. He listened to his noise and gestured. He 
turned back to the house with a sigh of relief, and the door was closed 
again. Huacheng turned over and put the pity under his body, raised his 
face, gasped slightly, and the black light flashed in his eyes, saying: "His 
Royal Highness!" 


Thanks for the pity, I couldn’t wait to say more. I reached out and hooked 
his neck and pulled it down. I sucked up the mana and slammed it. I said 
again: "Shift - Move the soul!" 


Who knows, this time, his soul has just been pulled out, but he has not 
been thrown into the sky, he was blocked by a wall, and he bounced back 
into his body and played him "ah". Open your eyes, the top is still the 


starry sky and the flowery city's slightly anxious face. Thanks for sitting 
up, holding his head, muttering: "... can't go." 


Is Shi Qingxuan dead? Or is the black water mysterious ghost 
strengthening the barrier? No matter what, anyway, he can't go to Shi 
Qingxuan's mind again. Even if I am going to the South China Sea, I am 
definitely too late. 


See him in vain, Huacheng Road: "His Royal Highness, sorry." 


Thanks to him, Huacheng said again: "But this thing, others can't 
intervene." 


Thanks for the pity, he said: "...you don't have to apologize. In fact, even if 
I am there, I can't do anything." 


With the Soul **, he can only enter the body of Shi Qingxuan. However, 
Shi Qingxuan is only the mortal body, even if thankfulness can help him 
break free, how can he compete with the owner in the black water ghost? 
Even if you escape, you can't do it. 


After slowing down the gods, Xie pity quickly returned to the psychic 
array of heaven, saying: "Ling, are you leaving?" 


Lingwen said: "His Royal Highness! Just why did you suddenly disappear 
for a while? We have sent a group of priests to the South China Sea. I will 
return to His Royal Highness. He will go out to sea later, but it will be 
black. The water ghost is not so good, and I don’t know when it will be 
found." 


Thank you for your mute: "A little while, I will leave with you. Maybe I 
can still remember the way. But I have to ask you to send someone to pick 
me up." 


Lingwen said: "Okay, he is here now." 


Thanks for a pity, looking back, Huacheng has disappeared, and two small 
priests came outside the village of Bodhisattva, followed by a tall, black- 


haired teenager, right. 


Xie Li said that he was owed to him. He said hello, but he did not 
understand the gift, but he did not care. Looking around, I did not see the 
flower city, knowing that he was giving himself time to deal with this 
matter. 


The two and a group of small priests came out of the South China Sea and 
listened to the suggestions of pity and pity. They collected dozens of heavy 
coffins with dead people in case of emergency. After the boat flew in the 
water for two or three hours, something strange was floating on the sea. 


The bodies of many giant bone fish floated on the surface of the sea and 
hit the ship. The gods and officials are full of vigilance: "Is this going to 
be?!" 


Thanks for your pity: "No, if you have already entered the black water 
sneaky, the boat must not float on the water, and it will open so fast." 


However, these are obviously the remains of the battles that the generals 
and the sergeants fought here the night before. Quan Yizhen has been 
squatting on the ship's side to maintain this difficult movement. At this 
time, he suddenly said: "There is a black island in front, is that the one?" 


Thanks for looking at it, there is a dark lacquered island in front. 
Moreover, from a distance, it is indeed like the Blackwater Island! 


Thanks for the slightest brow, said: "It looks really like. But how can it be 
found so easily, the boat is not sinking? Please be careful, please be 
careful." 


Just finished, he found that it was not a trap. Because there is a figure on 
the beach, it is against the sun, and the sword that kills the enemy is used 
to pull the wood back and forth to make the coffin. There are three 
completed coffins on the side, and he is making the fourth one on his hand. 
Xie pity immediately waved and shouted: "General General! It is the 
general, this island is right!" 


The ship immediately turned in the direction and drove quickly. At first 
glance, when the reinforcements arrived, they were not happy. They put 
the sword on the ground and touched the nose. They said: "You don't come 
early, don't come late, but when I am finished, what do you mean?" ” 


Quan Yizhen said: "Someone is not bad, I heard that you are coming to 
save you, everyone is not available." 


"..."" I didn't care about your child, turned to thank you, and asked: "This is 
the first time the Prince Edward is going back. How can you build this 
ship, how can it float on the waters of the ghost field?" 


Thanks to pity: "I don't think it's a ship's problem. It's the curse of the 
black water ghost that has already dispersed." 


After a trip, I tried it and tried to knock down a large piece of trees. The 
mana came back, silently, shook his head, saying: "I know why, why 
should I make a coffin so hard?" 


This is true, he was really in vain this night. I made the coffin of four 
people, and all three were useless. 


A line of gods went to the island and went straight to the forest center. The 
little devil in the jungle has not seen this battle, and was scared to escape, 
and came to the black water lake in the forest, and did not meet those 
shadow people. No one else interfered with the law, and everyone studied 
for a while, finally breaking the illusion, and the lakeside iron and the 
secluded waters were all shaped. 


As soon as he entered the Netherland, he prayed for the black bones to 
converge, and in his hands he ran around in the temple. After a while, he 
found the hall. On the mottled wall, two **** shovel are empty. A headless 
body lay in the center of the hall, the blood had drained, and a group of 
madmen were throwing things at the body. The gods came in, and the 
group of mad people became more excited. After I came in, I spent a long 
time and finally dared to confirm who it was. I was shocked: "...Sister of 
Water!" 


Xie Li has already been aware of this matter and said: "I am bothered here, 
and there is this whole island to look for, whether there is a wind master, 
or ... a body." 


However, no matter how you look for it, the island has not seen the trace 
of Shi Qingxuan. 


Is Blackwater Xuangui taking away the windshield? Or, the wind master 
has been killed directly, the corpse sinks into the sea, flesh and blood to 
feed the fish? 


Although the teacher did not cross the hair madness in the final, causing 
He Xuan to directly kill and kill, he died, but after all, it is not the wind 
master to kill, He Xuan will change the life of the wind division? 


The madman who smashed the annoying people, squatted to the ground, 
and sighed for a long time, sighed: "The brother of the water, you have 
been arrogant in your life, but you have to end up so badly, even if you are 
not eye-catching, you don’t know. High, the more you fall, the more you 
live, the more you can't escape, even if you are a god, you will never be 
spared." 


Quan Yizhen didn’t feel so much. He ran around in the Nether Water 
House and ran over and looked at it. He thought it was very strange. “What 
about his head?” 


Thanks to the pity: 'Take the black water mysterious ghost." 


Ruan said: "What is this sneaky master and what hatefulness? What is it? 
Qing Xuan, the geoscientist? Is it the water and the wind, the three official 
folds?" 


Thanks to pity: "It is indeed a great revenge, a big grievance. The 
geoscientist, you must see which one you ask, the one who is really in my 
hand, the one who 1s fake, that is, he put the Navy's adult The skull was 
taken away." 


"what?!" 


Xie pity stared at him, whispered: "The generals probably don't know. 
Blackwater mysterious ghost, surnamed Hemingxuan." 


Hearing his words, his face changed slightly. It seems that the things that 


the teacher did not do, the and the spirit are probably not ignorant. 
Just, knowing how much, it is not known. 


The report was reported, and the treatment was processed. When I returned 
to the village of Bodhisattva, it was almost a whole day. The pace of 
thankfulness is slightly exhausted. 


When he returned to the Bodhisattva view, just opened the door, he heard 
the sneaky ghosts of the gracefulness: "Dog City! Dogs | Thank you for the 
day! You two are really shameless. I am fucking, I am really in the middle 


of the night." Mom scared the devil! 


As soon as he heard his swearing words, Xie Li immediately remembered 
the terrible scene that he and Huacheng took turns to press the other side 
on the ground last night. At that time, he did not feel embarrassed, but he 
could not escape at the moment, and almost slammed the door and fled. 
Huacheng was in a chair, and a pair of boots were placed on the table. 
When he heard the pity, he pushed in and immediately put it down. He 
took a palm on the head of the head and stunned him. He stood up and 
said: brother." 


Xie pity nodded, backhand brought the door, crossed the ground and was 
tied into the grace of the green worm, sat down and said: "Is they going 
out to play?" 

Huacheng Road: "Well, I let go. I have worked hard." 

Thanks for your pity: "No. It’s hard for you." 


Huacheng smiled. He said, "I thought that my brother would blame me." 


Xie pity shook his head and said: "Why should Saburo think more? Really 
not. In fact, this thing, you are right. Someone else really... not good at." 


After thinking about it, he still asked: "Sanlang, according to your opinion, 
the black water mysterious ghost, how about the wind master?" 


Silence for a moment, Huacheng said: "I don't know. Blackwater is a 
strange person. He has been alone for too many years, no one can 
understand what he is thinking." 


"No one can understand what he is thinking about" - thankful pity 
suddenly remembered, this sentence is also a common evaluation of many 
gods in heaven. 


The black water sinking boat is from the smashing of the ghosts in the 
Copper Furnace Mountain, and the blood rain is also the same. He Xuan 
has been married for many years, and the time spent by Huacheng alone 
may not be less than him. 


It is hatred that the black water sinks into the black water of today. So, 
what about blood and rain? 


What will make Huacheng become the flower city of today? 


For a moment, Xie pity had a lot of flashes in his mind, shook his head, 
and smashed the "Golden Jade Leaf", and sorted out his thoughts. "But, 
Saburo, I don't understand, the Navy should steal the beam and change the 
column. It should be very concealed." How has he learned about 
Blackwater for so many years? If it is not convenient, you don't have to 
answer me." 


Huacheng Road: "He has changed from the ground, and the fake priests 
have not done it. Is there any inconvenience? It is simple. On the night of 
the death of Blackwater, the division did not specifically confirm it." 


Thanks to pity: "Because only the prey is dead, will the vernacular turn to 
find the next goal?" 


Huacheng Road: "Well. Blackwater doesn't know who the man is, but he 
remembers that face. Later he became a ghost. People and things in the 
sky and the earth knew something. Blackwater discovered that it was a 
water **** official." 


No wonder. This is very strange. How can you go to visit an ordinary 
person for no reason? Thanks to the pity: "But this should not be 
associated with changing lives?" 


Huacheng Road: "So, he replaced the true division, mixed into the 
heavens, and investigated this matter. The courage is also big enough." 


Thanks slowly and slowly: "If he later killed the real geographer and was 
involved in more than two hundred fishermen, he could also afford a ‘have 
a brave plan.’ 


Huacheng said: "My brother, I really don't know if he killed him. But if 
those fishermen are involved in the big waves of the East China Sea, I am 
afraid there are others." 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 126: Problem- 
solving ink marks 


Thanks for the slightest sigh, said: "Who would it be? According to 
common sense, at least 50 people should be affected by this kind of 
storm." 


Huacheng Road: "I guess, maybe with the half moon, the same person who 
sent the empty shell." 


In this way, it seems that there has always been a hand that is pushing him 
to the center of various chaotic events. Thanks to the inexplicable feeling, 
said: "What is the purpose of this person?" 


Huacheng shook his head and thought about it. At this time, suddenly 
listening to the sound of children playing outside the Bodhisattva, his 
sharp vision swept out. Following his gaze, Xie pity looked out through 
the window and saw two children playing outside the door. Guzi rode on 
the shoulder of Lang Ying, a carefree state. 


Of course, the Navy has crossed the sea to steal the pillars, the wind 
division is imposter, the "land division" is also imposter, the sailor's body 
is in the same place, four things, four sunny days, four thundering thunder, 
one ratio One ringing, a great uproar in the heavens and the heavens. 


For a time, everyone was so shocked that they didn’t know what to say, 
and no one in the Shenwu Hall expressed their opinions. Even Jun Wu’s 
hand seems to be unable to support his forehead. 


Although Mingyi does not deal with people very much on weekdays, only 
Shi Qingxuan, who likes to entangle himself, can mix well with him. 
Everyone has no deep friendship with him, but when he thinks his peers 
are actually legendary Desperate ghost king, the impact is too big. 


In order to dress up as a geologist, the ghost king has been diligent and 
diligent for many years. He has gathered a large number of believers in the 


world. The Mid-Autumn Festival feast can also enter the top ten, which is 
higher than the majority of the official positions in the heavens. It is really 
It’s terrible, it’s a desperate ghost king. Everyone can't help but be 
embarrassed, even if they tell them that Huacheng is among them, or if 
Huacheng is in the upper heaven, it will not be even more shocking. 


There is no mention of the resentment between Blackwater and the Navy 
and the Navy. However, it is true that the teacher died in the hands of the 
black water and the mysterious ghost. This is no doubt. Therefore, the 
Heavenly Court officially launched a command for the Blackwater Xuan 
Gui. But everyone knows that a desperate ghost king wants to hide, is it so 
easy to find it? 


The so-called wall is pushed by everyone. In the past, Feng Shui’s second 
division was full of wind and light. When the teacher did not cross, it was 
not the stars who held the moon. When they died, the stars did not dare to 
come out. Shi Qingxuan loves to make friends, and he is generous. At this 
time, countless "friends" on weekdays don't know where to go. The head of 
the Navy was confined to the head of the Navy. On the day of the burial, it 
was cold and clear. Except for the pity and the spirit, few other priests 
were present. Thanks for the past few days, I don’t know whether it was 
intentional or not. A group of people have begun to burn the Feng Shui 
Temple. Although he can’t bear it and blocked a few waves, as time goes 
by, people find that the gods that are offering are malfunctioning. It will 
only intensify, stop for a while, can't stop the world, and after more than 
ten years, even for a few years, people will forget these two Fengshui two 
gods who had stood on the peak of the heavenly court. Slightly sad. 


At the end, Xie Li said to the Lingwen: "The wind master 1s the descendant 
of Qing Xuan, and you have to bother with it." 


The spirit is also condensed, and there is no smile for many days. He said: 
"I don't have to say anything about my Royal Highness, I will definitely go 
all out." 


He said: "His Royal Highness, instead of letting the Temple of the Spirit 
go over the car and slowly looking for it, it is better to ask you directly 
about the **** rain, can you inquire with the black madman, Where did 


Xuan get it? He took the head of the Shui Si brother. What else does he 
want to do?" 


Xie pity shook his head and said helplessly: "The general is always taken 
for granted. What does a desperate ghost king want to do, but also need to 
tell another?" 


So, I don’t have much to say. 


Back to the Bodhisattva view, many villagers were surrounded and 
whispered. Thank you for knowing what is going on without asking, 
because there is a sneaky ghost in the Bodhisattva. The head of the village 
was frightened and frightened, and pulled him: "Dao, your crazy cousin, he 
and he, he again..." 


Xie pity's external rhetoric is that his grace is his crazy cousin, who is 
disgusted and no one is willing to raise, so he is obliged to take it. Ina 
sense, it is not a lie. He said: "It’s crazy again, it’s okay, it’s closed, he 
won’t come out, everyone’s gone.” 


The villagers said: "Oh." scattered. Before the scattered, the village chief 
sent a basket of eggs to thank the pity, said: "That, the road, your little 
flower..." 


Xie Li first is a glimpse: "??? Xiaohua???" finally reacted, said, "Oh, 
Saburo is it." I think that the current status of Huacheng 1s his younger 
brother, leaving home to come and play with him. The sensation of shame. 
The head of the village said: "Yes! Your little flower, he helped us repair 
things today. You should treat him at night." 


"Yes! Give him a supplement, eat strong, work better!" 
Thanks to pity, Junjun can't help but say: "Okay, good. Certainly, sure." 


As soon as the door was opened, Lang Ying had already shrunk in the 
corner to sleep. Grace was lying on the ground while screaming at the 
corpse. A roasting heart burned the liver. Guzi was giving him a shoulder 
and said: "Hey, hello. Didn't you?" 


"..." Xie pity took off the brawl and put the eggs in one hand. "What 
happened to you? Eat a bad stomach?" 


Grace said: "As long as you don't give me something to eat, I am on the 
ground | ash will not eat bad belly!" 


Listening to his exaggeration, thank you for your hands and sleeves, said: 
"Would you like to try those guys and see if you have a bad stomach?" 


Graceful words: "Hey! What did Laozi say, you exposed your dark heart! 
Change the son of the law to torture me! Hey, my son is not bad, change 
your side." Hey~ Auntie, what the **** is going on, I’m really dying to me 
recently, I’m going to call it with a cat. Spring is like it. Is it sick?! My 
cousin! I am sick! It’s definitely because of you. I am sick, I am sick! The 
snow lotus you killed this day is killing people!" 


Thank you for your pity, touched his forehead and said, "Is it a fever?" 
Suddenly, he opened his hand and frowned: "No. You should not pretend." 


Grace has to be smashed again, and Guzi said pitifully: "Dao, I have not 
lied to you. He has been uncomfortable recently. He has been screaming 
for a long time." 


Seeing the sadness creeping on the ground, Xie pity shook his head and 
stood up to look for a medicine box, but suddenly found that the merit box 
was actually heavy. This merit box is newly made by Huacheng. There 
should be nothing at all. Thanks to the strangeness, the key is opened and 
opened, and it is stunned. It 1s actually shook by a box of bright gold bars. 


" 


", thanked the pity and quickly closed the merit box. 


Didn't he send it back to the box of gold bars that the Navy sent? Who sent 
it back? ? ? 


It won't be a flower city, he won't be as simple and rude as a direct gold 
bar. Thanks for turning around and asking: "Who is it, who has been here?" 


Grace pointed at his nose and said: "Hey, have you made a mistake, you 
really are when I am raising your door? You are absolutely? You have 
never had such a big face, stinking black water and Dog Huacheng did not 
dare to take me as a door!" 

" "> the door of Bodhisattva was kicked open, but Huacheng kicked the 
door in. As soon as he saw him, his grace was dumb, and he sneaked away 
and sneaked away. He did not dare to mention what he saw that night. 
Thanks to the pity: "Samuro, you are back." 


Huacheng smiled and said: "Yes." 


Thanks for your pity: "It’s hard for you. The village chief sent something 
to help me, and I have a good meal tonight." 


Huacheng Road: "Okay. But, is your brother going tonight tonight?" 
Thanks to the pity: "Ghost city?" 


Huacheng Road: "Well. By the way, take this thing too." He pointed to the 
grace, "Look at any way to pull out his soul." 


Indulge in a moment, thanking the pity: "Alright." It is not a way to always 
drag on. Of course, the most important reason is that the grace is too much 
to eat, and his view of the Bodhisattva is really unaffordable. 


When Rong Rong heard that he was going to send him to the ghost market, 
he was shocked and resisted. However, the anti-discipline was invalid. 
After a smog, he was turned into a blue tumbler by the flower city, and he 
was holding it in his hand and took it to the ghost city. 


The ghost market is still so lively, walking on the street, the ghosts still 
remember the pity, see him come again, have screamed: "Da Bogong! ... ah 
no, the city's friends, you come again!" 


“Hey! Did you miss our specialty snacks here!” 


Thanks for bringing the basket of eggs, as the souvenirs brought from the 
world, many ghosts who got the eggs danced, and some decided to eat with 
their own blood tonight, and some announced Use this egg to hatch an 
eight-sword monster. Huacheng solved the technique of the graceful body. 
After a burst of blue smoke, the man with the graceful appearance 
appeared on the street, holding his head and preventing it. Some ghosts 
sniffed the smell of his body and said, "Hey, isn't this a green ghost?" 


The group of ghosts all gathered up, sniffed for a long time, and enjoyed 
it, said: "Ha ha ha ha ha ha ha, really a green ghost, this silly ** has come 
again hahahahahahaha!" 


"Tl haven’t been beaten before, hahahahahaha dare to come!" 


Huacheng Road: "Small optimistic, big way to think of a way, drag him 
out without damaging the flesh." 


"Yes! The city owner!" 


So, a few beautiful and beautiful female ghosts picked up the millet, and 
after a few minor tune, he fell asleep. The rest of the demon ghosts began 
to play with the grace and began to play ghosts. A screaming escape, a 
group of ghosts chasing after him. Huacheng and Xie pity looked for a 
while, then turned the direction and entered the thousand lights. 


The two slowly stepped into the temple and approached the stage. The 
stage was still covered with pen and ink. Recently, Xie Pity has been in a 
heavy mood. After reading these things, I intentionally relaxed the 
atmosphere and smiled a little. "I taught you last time, saying that you 
have to practice more words, but recently, have you not practiced?" 


Huacheng coughed and said: "Brother, you have given me everything else, 
what do I eat at night?" 


Thanks for learning his appearance, gently raising his eyebrows, said: 
"Don't care about him." 


Huacheng Road: "I can practice the knife, and I can't practice the word. 
My brother is not in the side guidance. I am practicing alone. I am afraid 
that the practice is wrong, and the more the training 1s worse." 


Thanks to the brow, the eyebrows are raised higher. "Is Sanlang so smart, 
is there something that is not good at it?" 


Huacheng raised the pen and dipped a little ink, which seemed to be very 
modest and authentic: "Really. Please ask your brother for advice." 


Thanks a little sigh, said: "You should write and read." 


So, Huacheng wrote two lines seriously. Thanks for watching for a while, I 
really couldn’t stand it anymore, said: "...stop, stop. You... still stop." 


Don't ruin the good pen and paper. Huacheng Road: "Oh." I really stopped 
and received the pen. Xie pity shook his head and said: "Sanlang, you... 
don't tell people, your words are what I teach." 


Huacheng Road: "Brother, I really tried my best." 


What he said in this way seems to be a little wronged. A good desolation 
ghost king, the name is reported, the three worlds are stunned, but at this 
time they are standing like a primary school student, listening to the 
criticism. He also talked about a few essentials. Thanks to the general, he 
held his hand and said, "Come on again. This time, be serious." 


Huacheng Road: "Good." 


Both of them are condensed in the book. After writing for a while, thank 
you for asking, "Why is it still "Thinking"?" 


Huacheng also replied casually: "I like this poem." 


Thanks to the pity: "I like it too. However, does Sanlang have other 
favorite poems? This one is well written, and you can write other things." 
Roughly, this poem is dozens of words, two people about After writing it 
for dozens of times, it is time to change it. Huacheng said: "Just write this 
one." 


When he dropped the pen, he blew his ink and smiled. "If I like what, I 
can't tolerate anything else in my heart. I will always remember it. A 
thousand times, 10,000 times, how many years will not change. This 
poem, This is the case." 


"..."" Xie pity smiled and said, "Yes." 


Huacheng Road: "Well." 


Thanks for letting go, he coughed and said: "That's good. Saburo is a 
person of affection and sex, very good... Oh, you can practice it yourself. 
Ah, yes. Grace seems to be the most recent. The body is a little 
uncomfortable." 


Huacheng put down the paper and put a pen and said: "Which discomfort?" 


Thanks for turning around, said: "He seems to say that he is flustered. But 
I have checked it. It seems that it is not the body of the person who has a 
problem. It is not because the weather is bad." 


Huacheng said behind him: "When did it start?" 
Thanks to the pity: "It should be these days, today is especially serious..." 


When the voice did not fall, his heart suddenly gave birth to an ominous 


premonition. At this moment, there was a sigh of" _" behind him, and it 
seemed that something had fallen from the air. 


Thanks and turned, and said: "Sanlang?!" 


The pen that was originally held in the hands of Huacheng fell, and a 
messy ink mark was drawn on the white paper. Huacheng’s face was so 
heavy that it seemed to be unstable, with one hand on the edge of the 
platform and the other hand holding his right eye. 2k novel reading 
network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 127: Copper 
furnace mountain reopened 


Looking at his look, it seems that the right eye is coming from a series of 
severe pains that are unbearable. Xie pity immediately grabbed back: 
"What happened to you?" 


Huacheng’s mouth was slightly moving, but he couldn’t answer it. The 
silver eyes on the knives of the **** were opened and the eyes turned 
wildly. The hand of the flower city placed on the platform of the gods was 
slightly raised, and it seemed to want to overturn the platform. Thanks for 
raising his hand to touch him, Huacheng whispered: "Don't come over!" 


Thanks to the stagnation of the action, Huacheng said with a resentment: 
"...His Royal Highness, you, leave me soon. I may..." 


Thanks for your pity: "How do you tell me to leave?!" 
Huacheng Wei Wei said: "You stay here again I...!" 


A thousand waves of light came from a wave of ghosts and wolverines. 
The ghosts on the streets of Ghost City fell to the ground, crying and 
grabbing the ground, screaming and screaming, seemingly bursting into 
tears and dying. Grace is running fast in front, just because he 1s attached 
to a living person. Although this body has weakened his mana, it also 
serves as a barrier to weaken the attack against the ghost body. He can 
barely jump and jump, seize the opportunity and rush. The few female 
ghosts holding the millet fell to the ground and yelled at the headache. 
They couldn’t sing the hypnotic little song. The millet fascinated and 
woke up, just saw the graceful scorpion rushing, and quickly climbed up to 
catch up, shouting : "Hey! Hey! Wait for me!" 


Grace ran back and licked his tongue and rolled his eyes. He said, "Hey, la 
la la, my son, my dad is gone! Hahahahahahahahaha!" 


Millet is still chasing after two small short legs, watching him go farther 
and farther, "Wow" crying out: "Hey! You don't want me. Hey, take me 
with me!" 


Grace shouted: "Go away! Go away! Don't chase me! Things that get in the 
way!" 


He spit in the air, hitting the forehead of the millet, dropping the grain 
back and falling down, sitting on the ground, crying, crying and tearing. 
Thank you for listening, and rushing out of the thousand lights and anger: 
"Sorry!" 


When he saw him in front of him, he was scared to run back. In the 
process, he picked up the millet on the ground and said, "Don't come over! 


Come over, I will bite the skull of this little oil bottle to you now. 


son, you have to give you the old ration, really filial piety! Hurry up 
to cook you, braised or steamed your choice, hahahahahaha!" 


Wherever he was afraid of him, he was about to catch up, but he heard a 
loud noise behind him. It turned out that Huacheng swept the pen holder 
on the floor and seemed to be furious. As a last resort, thank you for not 
having time to manage the sadness, turned and went back, said: 
"Sanlang..." 


Suddenly, Huacheng hurriedly hugged him and trembled: "I lie. Don't 
leave." 


'..." Xie pity stiffened into a piece of iron in his arms, said, "Sara? Do you 
recognize who I am?" 


He seems to have been unconscious. He couldn’t recognize who he was in 
front of him. He just kept his thanks and said, "I will lie, don't leave." 


Thank you for your pity. Thousands of lights came out to express the 
graceful smile and the scream of the millet, and said: "Hey! Dog Flower 
City! Let you look down on Laozi all day! Let you have a great ** like a 
whole day! The World News is not! Fall down!" 


The screaming ghosts on the street have no strength, but they are also 
stunned: "Green ghosts! You use this kind of useless and ruined stuff, 
where is the enthusiasm for our city owners?!" 


When I heard the noise of others, the flower city seemed to be particularly 
angry, and raising her hand would fly them. Xie pity quickly hugged him 
in the backhand, pressed his hand, softly said: "Good, good. I will not 
leave, I will not leave you." Another hand raises the door to automatically 
close the gate. Grace can't come in under such circumstances, and 
Yangsheng said: "To roll, you can't take care of you! Don't roll carefully... 
Ah!" 


Who knows, it is not enough for Huachengguang to hold him, and he has 
pushed him all over the jade case. This is good, the pen and ink are 
scattered and scattered. The hand of thankful prayed across the cinnabar 
on the table, struggling, leaving a few traces of red on the paper. In 
"Leaving Thoughts", "Wushan" except "Wushan is not a cloud" has a 


fascinating taste. Red marks, unprovoked _ | Mei. Thanks for the pity: 
"Three..." 


When the voice did not fall, Huacheng took his shoulder and kissed it. 


Grace is obviously hearing the wrong voice, wow haha said: "Prince 
cousin, you can be careful! Dog Flower City is now definitely like a mad 
dog, catch who bite! Lao Tzu goes out to help you publicize, with the dog 
flower city The monk of the hatred of the monks can be quite a lot, and 
now I have to come to him to settle accounts! Ha ha haha..." His voice is 
gradually gone, thank you for your tenderness. In case the grace 1s really 
called a large group of priests who have been offended by the city, the 
danger of ghosts, the current situation, how can the ghosts of the ghost 
market be unscathed? 


However, Huacheng does not give him the space to think about it. It is 
clear that it is not a living person, there is no body temperature, but the 
body at this moment is hot and abnormal, as if it has initiated a high fever. 
Thanks to his lips, he was forced to withstand the rush of heat from his 
side. The hand that had been pushed back grabbed his red dress. 


Perhaps the flower mana's mana is too strong, and his entire throat, chest 
and abdomen are warm and uplifting, and it is extremely uncomfortable. 
The feeling of thankfulness is so forced to bear this, and the whole person 
will be opened up by the things that the flower city has forcibly passed, 
and he will bite his teeth and forcefully go out. However, although he had 
a shot, he couldn’t really shoot on Huacheng, and he only hit his shoulders. 
This is not light or heavy. Huacheng slammed his wrist, pressed it down 
and continued to vent. 


If you continue, it will not work. This time, Xie pity used his hands and 
pushed him hard. He fled to the side of the platform and gasped. Huacheng 
was blindly bullied and pressed him to the platform. Thanks for your 
compliments: "Sanlang!" 


Perhaps his voice played a role, Huacheng stared at his face for a long 
time, and suddenly hugged him. 


Seeing him obedient, no more powerful manpower, thankful and relieved, 
but holding and holding, I feel that the mana in the city is violent. No 
wonder he kissed himself and kissed him. He was so frantic that he had to 
find a breakthrough to vent. If you want to calm down and restore your 
mind, I am afraid I have to give him blood. But the flower city is not a 
living person, where is the blood? 


Thinking about it and thinking, thank you still said: "... offended." 


So, he took the face of Huacheng with both hands and took the initiative to 
cover his lips, slowly guiding the hot stream of flowers in the flower city 
to his body, helping him relieve pain and heat. Huacheng also grabbed his 
waist, and thanked the gentleness and shivered a little. The next moment, 
the two fell on the platform. 


It is really unfair to say that Xie Pity does not dare to touch the slightly 
dangerous place in Huacheng. However, Huacheng is unscrupulous and 
unscrupulous in his body, forcing gratitude and misery. This Shentai was 


originally a place dedicated to the gods. At this time, it was a ghost and a 
* Who kissed and kissed here. It was really absurd, but it was gorgeous. 


A few times ago, both sides were still awake. Every time there seemed to 
be a very serious reason. To do this kind of thing was also restrained. It 
was limited to the lips. But this time, one side was confused and brought 
the other side. Also caught off guard, lips and teeth lingering across the 
border. Stupid, thankful finally confirmed one thing. Although every time 
it seems to be involuntarily, in fact, every time you can't help yourself. 


So much torment in the middle of the night, the flower body in the body 
finally slowly calm down, holding the arm of the pity also slightly 
loosened a little. Thanks for turning over and sitting up, staring at the 
closed face of Huacheng, sighing. 


The embarrassment was thrown aside, and the eyeballs were still rushing 
around. Xie pity took the scimitar and touched it for a long time. It was 
only when the embarrassment suddenly narrowed his eyes, as if he was 
finally satisfied. After a short time, Huacheng suddenly turned over and 
sat up, saying: "...His Royal Highness?!" 


Xie pity quickly adjusted his look and turned back to rejoice: "Are you 
awake? Nothing." 


The flower city looked around in a circle, and the temple was in the temple 
of the Lord. His face was a rare surprise, as if he didn't remember what 
happened last night. Thanks for taking the initiative to calmly say: "What 
happened last night? All of your subordinates have a sudden headache, 
fever, irritability, and you are also very angry." 


Huacheng Road: "What else?" 
Thanks to the pity: "Except this? Nothing." 


Huacheng stared at him and said, "Is it really gone? Then how can I calm 
down?" 


Xie pity and cough, a little embarrassed to say: "I don't care, Saburo, don't 
blame me, I am not like this..." He raised his hand that was touching his 
life, saying: "Yes, cough, I have a fight with you." 


Huacheng suspected: "...a fight?" 


Thanks to the face, he did not change his color, and looked at him 
sincerely. He said, "Yeah, look, this is the mess in the temple, that is, we 
fight and fight." 


" " 


For a long while, Huacheng spit out a breath and held his forehead in one 
hand. 


Seeing that he no longer asked, Xie Li finally put down a hanging heart, 
secretly relieved. 


At this time, Huacheng whispered: "Opened." 
Thanks: "What?" 
Huacheng looked up and said: "The copper furnace has been reopened." 


What is the meaning of this sentence, both of them are clear. Thanks to 
pity, he said, "The new ghost king... is going to be born?" 


When Xie pity went back to the report, the top of Xianjing was also 
thunderous and rumbling. Entering the Shenwu Hall, Xie pity and 
subconsciously want to find someone to ask, said: "What happened to Lei 
Shi adults?" But he only remembered when he finished, and the position of 
the Fengshi station was no longer there. The forefront of the Navy, the 
most corner of the division, also disappeared. He groaned, and his heart 
sighed, one side, but he saw Lang Qianqiu coming in from outside the 
temple. 


For many days, Lang Qianqiu lost a whole circle and looked dull. He 
looked at him and turned his head. 


Thanks for a circle, there is no one in the temple who can talk freely. 


One voice replied: "Nothing, the ghost king is going to be born, the ghost 
is crying, and the thunder can't stop." 


The answer is actually a wind letter. I don't know why, seeing him, thank 
you for being very intimate. However, Fengxin’s eyes are blue, and Xie 
pity can’t help but look back at the far side of the main hall. The feelings 
of the gang are swollen. It seems that the two have been complaining for 
many years. The last one was played enough. ruthless. 


Jun Wudao: "This time everyone is coming, why is it, I think everyone has 
heard it." 


The gods are not the same. Jun Wu slowly said: "The heavens and the 
earth are furnaces, and all living beings are copper; the water is hot and 
hot, and it is robbed." 


"Bronze Furnace Mountain is a natural sinister land of feng shui, a live 
volcano that does not know when it will erupt. 


"Every hundred years, the mountains in the mountains open, the ghosts 
vibrate, especially the shock of the ghosts of the first generation. All the 
demons and ghosts who are eager to rise to the desperate will rush to the 
Tongluoshan. After the gathering, the Tonglushan will be closed again, 
killing officially Start. 


"When the last one is killed, the ghost king is born. 


"Blood rain and black water sinking, it is the imperial ghost king from the 
copper furnace mountain. The two became a mountain, the black water 
spent 12 years, the flower city spent ten years." 


The feelings are cold and cold: "A black water, a flower city, has been very 
tricky, see what they have done. If there is one more, then it will be." 


Thank you for your kindness: "Xuan Zhenjun, I don't comment on what 
Blackwater has done. However, it is not too much for Huacheng to do 
anything." 


Mu Qing sighed and looked at him with a bruised gang. Ruan said: "It is 
very tricky. So this time the ghost will go to the meeting, it must be 
blocked, is it?" 


Jun Wudao: "Yes. It takes about a few months for the ghosts to gather 
together. They need to try to intercept them before they get together." 


Thanks to pity: "If you can't stop it, can you save it?" 


Jun Wudao: "Yes, but I hope that I don't want to go to that step. The 
current imperative is that this sneaky spurt has caused a mess, and many 
of the demons and ghosts that had been suppressed in all parts of the 
country have escaped. Many of these are extremely Dangerous inhuman 
things, such as the female ghost Xuan Ji, the fetal spirit, the Jinyi 
immortal, they must be rushing to the Tonglushan, they must be 
immediately retaken." 


Thanks to pity: "Is it all running? That mess 1s really big enough." 


Jun Wudao: "So I am afraid that the martial arts of the temples will have 
to bother to investigate their respective jurisdictions." 


Thanks to the pity: "That... me?" 


Although Xie Pity is now a rotten god, he has been flying as a martial art 
twice before, and now he 1s basically using him as a **** of war, but he 
does not have any jurisdiction. For a moment, Shen Wudao: "Xianle, you, 
and Qiying together." 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 128: Infatuated 
with blood 


After a pause, Jun Wu asked: "What about Qi Ying?" 


Thanks for looking down, I did not see the young Wu Shen in the Temple 
of God. Perhaps it was recently that there was a series of incidents in the 
heavens, and the Lingwen Hall was so busy that the spirits also had several 
layers of dark circles. "The Qiying has not come to the meeting for a long 
time, and it has never been contacted." 


The priest next to him snorted: "Where did this kid go?" 
"I haven't come yet? I can't come to the meeting every day, I really envy." 


Junwu said: "Qiying doesn't know where to go now. After I find him, I will 
inform you to meet as soon as possible." 


Thanks to the poor, said: "Yes." 


The world has already entered the autumn, the weather is very cool, and 
the Bodhisattva view is also true. Although she was dressed in a single 
coat, she did not feel cold. However, when she went back to the road, he 
bought two new clothes and brought it to Lang Ying with the broken 
money. 


Huacheng returned to the ghost city, and he grabbed the millet and 
escaped. At the moment, there is only one Langyan in the Bodhisattva. I 
felt very crowded some time ago, but it seemed to be suddenly deserted. 
Thanks for the fare, I saw Lang Ying silently sweeping the ground and 
sweeping the golden leaves into a pile. 


I don't know if it is an illusion. Xie Pui always felt that Lang Sui had a 
hunchback and timid, but his limbs stretched a lot. He looked at the 
appearance of a young boy, and he could not help but feel a little gratified. 
Going up and taking the broom, I was about to bring him into the view. 


The villagers who had been ambushing for a long time were all 
surrounded. The aunt, the uncle, the sisters and sisters, said: "The road is 
coming back!" 


"Going to the city to get rid of it? It has worked hard... that, why haven’t 
you seen the flowers recently?" 


"Yes, yes, I haven't seen it for a few days, I wonder about this guy." 
"..." Xie pity smiled and said: "Small... spend going home." 


The head of the village said: "Which? Which home? I thought this is the 
home of Xiaohua. Didn't he live with you?" 


Thanks for the pity: "Nothing. He just came out to play. Now that we have 
something, we will separate." 


That night, Huacheng later asked again and again, thanking the pity and 
killing the two people just to fight one. The copper furnace mountain 
reopened, and the flower city also had more things to deal with. If you 
really let a new ghost king appear, it will have an impact on the three 
worlds. Huacheng and Blackwater, although a high-profile, low-key, but 
very style, are considered self-sustaining identity, self-discipline, who 
knows what kind of things will be born this time? If you have a madman 
like a graceful one, and you have to divide it with them, it will be very 
tricky. Therefore, thank you for excusing the recent autumn of events, 
saying that it is best for them to be busy with each other during this time. 
For the time being, don't meet up, and when they are busy, they will say 
goodbye. 


Although it seems to be awkward and cold, it seems that turning his face 
does not recognize people, but thank you is really no way. 


He has no confidence to hide for a while. 


At this time, Lang Ying, behind him, suddenly said: "Fire." 


" 999" 


Thanks to this, I found out that I was absent-minded and didn’t pay 
attention to it. He actually picked up the iron pan and the spatula and 
ruined the meat and vegetables that had just been brought back to the 
Bodhisattva. The fire at the bottom of the pot was a few feet high, and it 
quickly burned the ceiling. But it was too hard to shoot the whole stove. 
Such a ping-pong for a while, thank you for your pity, holding the pot in 
one hand, I don’t know what to do. It was the moment of eating that the 
villagers were holding a big bowl and eating at the door, and they were 
scared and surrounded: "What happened?! What happened?! The road 
leader, is your room blown up again?!" 


Thank you for opening the window, saying: "Nothing, nothing! Cough and 
cough..." 


The village head took a look and said: "Oh my mother, this is so bad! Dao, 
I think you still call the little flower back!" 


For a moment, thank you: "Forget it. After all... he is not my family." 


When he returned to God, Lang Ying had already helped to clean up the 
mess, and there was a lot of colorful things on the table, which was when 
he was distracted. If the last bowl of the thing, with a name called a 
hundred years of good, then this time, it should be called a thousand 
purple red fried meat. I am afraid that except for the flower city, no second 
person can eat this kind of thing. Thanks to myself, I couldn’t stand it 
anymore. I turned to the pot and rubbed my eyebrows. "Oh, don't eat it, 
dump it." 


Who knows, he washed the pot and then turned around, but saw Lang Fire 
took the plate and had already eaten silently. Thanks for the pity, he 
quickly came up to stop and held him: "...day, are you okay? Is there any 
uncomfortable???" 


Lang Ying shook his head. Because the bandage covered his face tightly, 

he couldn't see what his expression was. Even Yan Rong and Hei Shui will 
be unconscious after eating what he has done. Lang Ying can still hold on. 
Is it hungry to a certain extent or is he unintentionally getting through the 


second line of Ren Duo? Thanks to myself, I teased myself and smiled. 
After I packed it up, I rested. 


Two mats in the Bodhisattva view, one person. Xie pity thought that this 
mat was under him and he was lying with Huacheng. He couldn’t sleep 
without blinking, but he didn’t dare to turn over and yell at Lange, struggle 
for a long time, just want to go out and breathe, but listen to the window. 
When someone snorted, someone gently pushed open the wooden window 
and turned it in. 


Thanks to the window, lying on the floor, surprised. 


Anyone who can't think of it, actually dare to come to Bodhisattva to steal 
things, is this not a **** return? 


The man’s movements are extremely light and his skills are excellent. If 
he is not sensitive to the five senses, he will certainly not be aware of it. 
After he came in, he went straight to the merit box. Xie pity immediately 
remembered that before the merit box was filled with a box of gold bars, 
was this person rushing to the gold bars? But those gold bars he got in the 
heavens and handed them to the spirit, let her help find the owner. Re- 
enjoy the gods, thank you for discovering that the person is not in the 
shackles, but in the merit box, stuffed one by one! 


After the stuffing, the man took over the work and seemed to want to go 
out the window. Thanks for thinking, waiting for him to go out and then 
catch up, see where he went, who 1s it, who knows, that person passed by 
for the table, looked at the large and small plates on the table, seems 
hungry, did not think much, I picked up the dried purple meat that I had 
not finished eating, and took a few mouthfuls. 


The next second, "plop", fainted to the ground. 


Thanks for a moment, I turned over and sat up, my heart said: "I saved a 
thing!" I got up and looked at it. The person lying on the floor was lying 
very bright and purple. I quickly saved my life and gave him a few 
mouthfuls of water. . The first sentence to wake up is: "What!" 


Xie pity pretending not to hear this sentence, the words are long and 
authentic: "Your Ching, your courage is too big, do not know anything, 
dare to smuggle into the mouth." 


This young boy has a high nose and a deep black hair. Isn’t that the right of 
the Western martial arts? 


He blinked: "How do I know that someone will poison the food in my 
view?" 


"..." Thanks for the pity of the eyebrows, opened the merit box, and found 
that it was stuffed with a box of gold bars. "The last box was also your 
next seat?" 


Right one really nodded. Thanks for your pity: "What do you give me this 
kind of thing?" 


Quan Yizhen said: "Because I have a lot." 


" " 


In fact, he can probably guess if he does not say thank you. Most of it is 
because of the last Mid-Autumn Festival feast. Xie pity a chopstick to fly 
out and cut off the curtain of the stage. Thanks to the pity: "You take it 
back, you are not ruthless." 


The right to really do not speak, obviously not listening at all, thank you 
for crying and laughing. At this time, Lang Ying was cold and cold: "Let 
you take it." 


He didn't know when he sat up. He thanked him and looked back at him. 
He felt strange. In the past, Lang Ying basically did not exist, and I wished 
I would indent myself into the ground. How can I take the initiative to say 
a few words today? Moreover, it is actually using this kind of not friendly 
tone. However, he didn't think much, but he couldn't make a big heart and 
let the spirits back to him. He said: "Your Highness, you are coming right. 
Today, the Shenwu Hall is not here. The Emperor gave us the task. Have 
you seen the scroll? Well, nothing, I know you haven't seen it, anyway, I 


have seen it. This time we are a group of two, the thing to be responsible 


an 


for is called 'Jin Yixian'. 


The vernacular immortal is called "Imperial Man" because people do not 
dare to call it a rogue, a flowless, awkward ghost, and they are reluctant to 
lift. Why is Jin Yixian called Xian? It is because, it is said that this thing 
can really become a god. 


Legend has it that a few hundred years ago, there was a young man in an 
ancient country. Although he was born to be foolish and inferior to a six- 
year-old child, it was not like this on the battlefield. When the two 
countries handed over their troops, the country could continue to linger, 
and he would be the one to be a horse. However, because his head 1s ill, 
there is no relatives and no deaths. The battles that have been desperately 
defeated are occupied by others. If they are poor, no one is willing to 
marry his daughter, and few girls are willing to be close. This young man 
is also stupid to a certain realm. He has never dealt with girls since he was 
young, and he dare not say more. 


However, this person has the potential to soar, and after playing for a few 
more years, it is time to go to heaven. It doesn't matter if there is a girl 
who likes it, but the bad is bad. He still likes a woman and likes it. On the 
day of his birth, the woman gave him a piece of brocade. 


Said to be a brocade, but weird, it 1s better to say that it 1s a scary pocket. 
This is the first time that the young man received a gift from a girl she 
liked. She was very excited and extremely happy. Plus, she was born to be 
stupid. She didn’t think it was weird. She couldn’t wait to put the “Jinyi” 
on her body. The hand had no cuffs that he could wear, and he asked his 
beloved girl: "Why can't my hand reach out?" 


The woman smiled and said: "I did it for the first time. I didn't have any 
experience. But, if I don't have a hand, I will stick out?" 


As aresult, the young man chopped one of his hands and he was finally fit. 
However, it was not enough. He asked again: "Why can't my feet reach 
out?" 


The woman replied: "If you don't have your feet, don't you stick out?" 


So the young man asked the man to cut off his legs. Finally, he asked: 
"Why can't my head reach out?" 


The final result can be imagined. 


Xie pity originally thought that "Jin Yi Xian" should refer to a demon 
ghost wearing a brocade, but who knows it really refers to a piece of 
clothes. When the copper furnace was reopened, the clothes were stolen. 
This brocade was stained with the blood of the young man, and turned into 
an extremely powerful sinister magic weapon. He swayed all the way to 
the demon and ghosts and used it to harm people. Therefore, don't just 
pick up the old clothes that you don't know. If you meet someone in the 
middle of the night with a piece of brocade to give you, don't pick it up. If 
you put on this brocade, you will be blinded by lard, obsessed with 
obscenity, arbitrarily slaughtered, and sucked up blood. 


Of course, this is a legendary story. It sounds absurd. It may also be that 
people are attached to the characteristics of Jinyixian. However, this 
Jinyixian must be stopped, and it must not be allowed to go to Tonglushan. 
2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 129: Infatuated 
child **** jinyixian 2 


"His Royal Highness? Your Highness? Are you listening?" 


Thanks for giving up and waving in front of Quan Yizhen. It’s only a 
matter of power, and it’s just like a god. It’s only going back to the soul. 
“Oh.”’ 


It seems that I am not listening. Xie Pity is also hard to say anything, said: 
"The immediate priority for us is to find this piece of clothing? Its 
prototype is..." 


Right one really answered: "A sleeveless, headless, sack-like **** dress." 


Xie pity smiled and said: "I don't know this? I thought you haven't seen the 
scrolls. But, because this dress is a demon thing, it is magical and ever- 
changing. There are thousands of clothes in the world, to find such a dress. 
It is tantamount to finding a needle in a haystack." 


Quan Yizhen said: "Oh. What to do." 


Thanks to the pity: "The monsters and ghosts who get this dress will 
generally become merchants. In the densely populated area, ask if anyone 
wants to buy or exchange for a new one. But that was a matter of hundreds 
of years ago. If there is anyone now, It’s a bit weird to do, but their habits 
and ways of thinking will not change so easily for a while. In short, go to 
the city first, and pay more attention to this news.” 


This kind of thing, ghosts are more concerned than people, the gossip of 
the ghost world is more familiar than the human world, that is to say, 
directly ask the flower city, certainly save a lot of trouble. But not long 
ago, thanked him for telling him not to meet for the time being, and asking 
for people to immediately return to the grass, it is not good to see. 
Moreover, Jin Yixian has just been stolen, and the thief will certainly not 
dare to take it out to harm people so quickly. Right suddenly nodded, got 


up and followed him two steps. Thanks to the pity, Lang Ying also 
followed up and said: "You will stay here." 


Lang Ying shook his head and thanked him for not talking. He heard a 
"Qianlong" after him, and he fell again. 


Thanks for turning back, said: "What happened to you?" 


On the face of Quan Yizhen’s face, the purple gas came up again. After a 
while, I finally couldn’t help myself. I turned over and squatted on the 
ground. “Wow,” I vomited. 


" " 


After the spit, Quan Yizhen turned over and turned his face to the sky. 
Thanks: "Qiying... can you still go?" 


Quan Yizhen has a flat limb and said: "I don't think so." 


Helpless, thank you have to drag the right to lose the fighting power to the 
side, cover the quilt, let him temporarily recuperate. 


On the second day, Quan Yizhen’s face was a little better. Thanks to him, 
he did not dare to let him eat anything. He asked the village chief to 
borrow some porridge and bring it back to the two. Quan Yizhen sat in the 
position where Huacheng was sitting often. I don’t know why, Lang Ying 
has been staring at him. It seems that he is not very friendly. He politely 
put the porridge in front of the two people, and he accidentally said: 
"Sanlang..." 


The voice just fell, and both of them looked at him. Thanks for the 
staleness of the action, this only responded to what was called, and 
coughed, saying: "Everyone continues." 


The two were drinking porridge at the table, and Xie pity took the axe out 
of the door, while chopping wood, while recalling the clues provided in the 
scroll: "Jinyi Xianyuan Town is in a Shenwu Hall, the seal of Shenwu 


Temple is extremely strong, and In the palace, the guards are strict, the 
masters are like clouds, and the simple ghosts and sorrows are afraid that 
they can't escape from them. It is certain that some people have taken the 
opportunity to steal the stolen goods..." 


In the past, I used to spend time in the city, and it was his turn. I don’t 
know why I always feel that I don’t have a flower city. Right one really 
drunk a few mouthfuls of porridge and fell down in the Bodhisattva to 
continue to sleep, Lang Firefly came out, seems to help, thank you: "No. 
Three ... Lang Fire, Let's boil water and take a shower later." 


He remembered that Lang Sui seems to have not bathed for a long time. 
The ghost does not have grease and sweat, but it shakes outside all day, 
and the ash that is stained is not less. But you can't just say it, or hurt 
yourself. Lang Firefly seems to be stunned, but did not answer, and 
thanked the pity has moved the firewood into the water, said: "I went to 
the town yesterday to sell the broken, bought two pieces of autumn clothes 
for you, after washing you look at the does not fit?" 


Lang Ying just put the new clothes on his body, listened to this sentence, 
said nothing, turned around and left. Xie pity took him, and he said with a 
strong heart: "Don't go! Bathing is a must. Rest assured, I don't remove the 
bandage on your face." 


Lang Ying still refused, and went out to pick up the firewood. He refused 
to come in. He refused to help him. He had to pick up a pile of firewood, 
burned water, and took off his clothes. If the evil faded from his chest, Luo 
Ying took a bunch of firewood and came in. He saw him in the upper body 
and widened his eyes. And thanked the hand to try the water temperature, I 
feel just right, already sat in the pants and saw him come in, said: "Oh, 
come right, trouble to hand me the scroll under the wall hanging on the 
wall.” 


Instead of coming over, Lang Firefly retreated to the door, and the 


backhand of the" "closed the door. Thanks for being inexplicable. After 
a while, Lang Ying seemed to think of something, and kicked the door 
open. Thank you for your help: "Don't kick this door! This door 1s..." 


Lang Ying did not look at him, but went straight to the inside and dragged 
the right of the corpse on the ground. Quan Yizhen seems to be very deep 
when he sleeps. Only the big movements of the earth shaking the mountain 
can wake him up, and he is dragged all the way and unaware. Thanks to 
pity and laugh, said: "What are you doing? Nothing, not a girl. Come in." 


When the flower city was not there, he did not bathe in the Bodhisattva. 
After all, the Bodhisattva view is really too small, and the living 
conditions are arduous. It is good to have a water tank to take a bath. There 
is no such a large bath with a screen that can make him row and wash 
slowly. However, intentionally or unintentionally, thankfulness has never 
been done in front of Huacheng. But because the people at the moment are 
not flower cities, others, he doesn't feel anything at all. 


Lang Sui turned over the power and pressed a bunch of messy clothes on 
his head. He lowered his head and handed the scroll of thankfulness to him 
and continued to sit in the corner. Thanks for the sake of opening the 
scroll, while frowning and looking at the hair. 


The heat was soaked that his face was slightly powdered, and the long hair 
and the eyelashes were black and lacquered. After a while, he suddenly 
groped for the thin silver chain on the chest, and a diamond ring was 
placed at the end of the chain. 


Thanks for holding the ring, slightly tightening the five fingers, and 
suddenly, the corner of the eye came to the corner of the table, with a 
small flower. 


He subconsciously picked up the flower and raised it to his eyes. He 
always felt vague in his mind, just like the heat in front of him. He needed 
a hand to wave and dispel the fog. At this time, the door outside the door 
was cold and there was a knock on the door. 


The voice pulled back his thoughts, and thanked him for putting the 
flowers back. He was about to ask who he was, but found that the knocking 


of the door was not on the door of the Bodhisattva, but on the door of the 
village head next door. . 


In the sound of knocking on the door, a delicate female voice: "Is there 
anyone at home? Trade-in, trade-in. I have a brand new robes here, I can't 
use it, I want to change the old clothes that fit my eyes. I don't know if the 
owner of the house has it. This willingness? Is anyone at home?" 


No need to find out, this thing actually came to the door! 


She knocked on the door from door to door, however, no one came out to 
open the door for her. That is of course, when Xie pity did not break in the 
week, he gave a lecture in the village of Bodhisattva, and told hundreds of 
tips and tricks of all the three aunts and six sorrows to distinguish the 
devils and ghosts. In the middle of the night, they encountered such an 
unsatisfactory uninvited guest. There will be no villagers at all. The people 
nowadays are not as deceived as they were in ancient times. The thing 
knocked in a circle, and no one ever understood it, and finally came to the 
front of the Bodhisattva. Thank you for holding your breath and waiting, 
who knows, that thing hasn’t knocked on the door yet, and it feels that this 


is not where she should come. “ ” the footsteps seem to be far away, 
thank you immediately: “Slow ! I want to change." Immediately, 
whispered to Lang Lu: "Open the door, don't be afraid, nothing!" 


Lang Firefly was not afraid at all, and he opened the door. Standing outside 
the door, there is a girl, her body is graceful, and she looks at the lower 
half of her face. But she took a headscarf and covered the upper half of her 
face, as if she had no eyes, and taught people not very well. 


She glanced into the room and smiled and said: "This road chief, what old 
clothes do you want to change for my new clothes?" 


Xie pity still did not come out in the water tank, just to reduce the 
vigilance, smiled and said: "That depends on what your new clothes are 
like." 


The girl reached out and shook it, shaking off a glittering brocade from the 
bag, which was gorgeous, but the style seemed to be a bit old, and the 


whole body exudes a fascinating atmosphere. Thanks and pity: "Good 
clothes, good clothes. Lang Fire, you give the girl the clothes I brought 
back from the town." 


Lang Fire handed the clothes with one hand. The girl sent a new dress, 
smiled, took the old clothes, was about to turn, but suddenly changed her 
face, as if something was tied, shouted, and threw the old clothes on the 
ground. In the arrogant linen, I don’t know when I sneaked in the sinister 
dish, and I drilled out from the neckline of the collar, like a poisonous 
snake with white flowers, rushing to the girl’s spit. And the "girl" is not a 
girl at all. Only when she was so screaming and jumping, her headscarf 
was suddenly attacked by the evil spirits. Although the lower half of the 
face is very charming, but the upper half of the face is full of wrinkles, 
extremely old, forming a very terrible contrast - this is what "girl", 1s 
clearly a 70-80-year-old woman! 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 130: Two-color 
color open dyeing workshop 


Half-face makeup girl! 


The half-face makeup woman is a low-level ghost that is condensed by the 
young woman's shackles. They can't face their old age calmly. They firmly 
believe that the flesh and blood of young women can rejuvenate 
themselves. They like to pinch the scorpion and pretend to be a girl voice. 
But the so-called "binocular is the window of the soul", the old is a thing 
that can't be concealed anyway. The more flesh and blood they smoke, the 
younger the lower half of the face, the older the face with the eyes, the 
older. The contrast between the top and bottom of a face is stronger. 
Despite this, they are still obsessed. 


Thanks to the water, a foot on the edge of the water tank, ready to fly to 
win, the right is like a return to the light, the bounce is a slap. The half- 
faced makeup woman is too weak. He was shot on the ground and 
screamed, saying: "Fear!" 


Xie pity is not flustered, grabbed the robe and draped it, and said: "Is you 
stealing Jin Yixian?" 


The half-face makeup woman is busy: "I am not me! Where can I swear to 
the martial arts temple!" 


Think about it too, the general low-level ghosts, really do not have the 
courage to swear to the martial arts hall, not to be beaten by the soul. 
Moreover, this half-faced woman probably has nothing to do with Jin 
Yixian. A rough look, the age of the ghost is only about 80, and the legend 
of Jin Yixian has been hundreds of years. 


Thanks to the pity: "Where did you get this brocade?" 


The half-faced woman licked her headscarf and re-covered her upper half 
of her face. The voice re-sharpened and said: "Go back... long words! 


Yes... I found it in the ghost city..." 


Can it still be like this? Amoy in the ghost city? ? ? 


For a moment, thank you for a moment, and said: "Who is the one who 
sold you this brocade?" 


The half-faced woman is afraid to go to the ground: "Dao Chang! I want to 
let go! I don't know, do business in the ghost city, and don't check the 
ancestors of the 18th generation!" 


makes sense. If you buy and sell in the ghost city to check the ancestors of 
the 18th generation, the ghost market will not be so lively. A thing leaves a 
hole and it will live. Thanks for asking for a while, I couldn't ask anything. 
I was sure that this half-faced woman was really a ignorant little girl. 
"Yiying, let the gods in your temple come to collect this female ghost." ” 


The right is true: "No. There are no priests in my temple." 
Thanks to pity: "Is there nothing? You haven't ordered anyone yet?" 


The power of truth is as strong as it is: "No one." 


It turned out that this Western Wushu was a loner, never had one person, 
and even a deputy who handled the sundries. Thanks to pity, because you 
can't afford it, the right one is really like this. It can only be said that the 
temperament is weird. He had to turn over a clay pot and take the half- 
faced makeup woman. Then he took the piece of clothing from Lang’s 
hand and shook it open. He couldn’t help but frown. 


Evil is very evil, but how? According to the pity, this kind of evil is too 
flowing on the surface, just like relying on the thick layer of rouge 
gouache, rather than from the inside out. Thanks to the intuition, this thing 
is not as dangerous as the legend, but it still maintains a 12-point 


vigilance. At this time, Quan Yizhen came over and looked at the clothes, 
saying: "Fake." 


Thanks for your pity, said: "How do you say?" 


Quan Yizhen said: "This dress is fake. Really, I have seen it, it is much 
more powerful than this." 


Thank you for your pity: "When have you seen it? In fact, there are many 
people who have seen Jin Yixian, but they still can't tell. Why are you so 
determined?" 


The power is true but not talking. Just at this time, the spirit is psychic, 
and the voice rang in his ear. "Our Prince, we have received news here. 
You seem to have a little ghost in the 20th place in the West. You are 
bothering you." Go and have a look." 


Thanks to pity: "Is there? Okay." I took a look at the right and did not 
speak out loudly. "Oh, yes, there is something, Lingwen, Qi Ying have seen 
Jin Yixian?" 


Lingwen said: "Qiying? Ah, he has seen it. He is much better than he has 
seen." 


Thanks to the pity: "Where does this start?" 


Lingwen said: "That is complicated. I wonder if I have heard anything 
under the Highness. This is the guardian of the West, which was not the 
Qiying Hall, but the Yin Temple?" 


Thanks for the pity, this paragraph was originally told by the windshield in 
the bliss party while undressing, and could not help but feel bitter, said: "I 
have heard. I heard that these two Highnesses were originally a pair of 
brothers?" 


It turned out that when the jade was not soaring, it was the chief disciple 
of his teacher. When he saw a pretty headed child, he was on the streets. 
When he was kind, he asked Master to take it. This child is the right one. 


In the same number of doors, the introduction of jade can be said to have 
always taken care of the right. He took the lead in flying, and he also 
ordered the right one. Lingwen said: "You have seen Qiying a few times, 
almost know, he is a bit..." 


Thanks to pity: "I don't know the world? This is a good thing." 


Lingwen smiled and said: "Well, you have to divide people and divide the 
situation. Some people will think that he is too self-motivated, and he does 
not know the number of gifts. He does not give face to people. When he 
first entered Xianjing, he would not help him. I’m leading, and I don’t 
know how many people are killed.” 


Thankfulness and thoughtfulness: "The two of His Royal Highness should 
be very good." 


Lingwen said: "The original is very good, the bad is bad, and later, Qi Ying 
himself has also soared." 


Both of them are flying westward. What should I do? So the two said that 
they should guard the West together. 


The teachers and brothers guarded one side of the water and soil, and it 
sounded like a beautiful story. However, after a mountain, one mountain 
could not accommodate two tigers. 


If you say that the qualifications of attracting jade are worthy of God’s 
catastrophe for him, there is only one person in 10,000 people. Then, if 
you have the right qualification, you can survive three days of robbing. 
One million people are not sure. Come out one. At the beginning, it’s not 
good, but it’s not obvious. Later, the gap between the two sides will be 
bigger. The right is really clear and unreasonable. It will not close the 
relationship between Xian and Dai, nor will it bother to please the 
believers. On the contrary, he will not remember. I have lived in any name 
other than the jade, and I dare to beat the believers to ask them to eat. Hey, 
you can say how come out. However, his territory is getting bigger and 
bigger, and more and more believers. In comparison, the temple of Yin Yu 
was eclipsed and finally could not sit still. 


The two brothers and sisters will give each other gifts when they are born. 
In a certain year, on the day of the birth of the right, the jade sent him a 
powerful armor. 


Thanks to the pity: "Jin Yixian?" 
Ling Wendao: "Not bad." 


In addition to being able to **** blood and kill people, there is also a 
strange thing: whoever wears it, who will listen to the people who let him 
wear this dress. Since the two brothers and sisters have always had a good 
relationship, Quan Yi did not think about it and put on the body. Soon, the 
jade-like joke seemed to be a joke. The power was really controlled by the 
brocade, and the ghosts would have to do it. If Junwu noticed something 
wrong and kept it in time, he almost cut his head off as a ball. made a bid. 
Ling Wendao said: "So, this incident was very troublesome in the past, it 
was a Sensation, and the jade was used to make such a murderous 
accomplice with the sacred priests. Of course, it was immediately 
smashed." 


It is reasonable to say that in this way, the two priests should have turned 
their faces. But thanks to the ridiculous performance of the believers 
performing at the Qiying Temple at the Mid-Autumn Festival, a harlequin 
jumped behind the power of a real thing, and it should be a jade. However, 
at the time, Quan Yi’s reaction was to be furious, and then he jumped down 
and beat his followers. “I think Qi Ying should still respect His Royal 
Highness, is there any misunderstanding?” 


Lingwen said: "This is not known. If there is any misunderstanding, people 
have been stunned for years, and who cares?" 


Xie pity nodded, just want to say goodbye, but the spirit said: "And slow. 
Your Royal Highness, and I have not finished. You have a 60-year-old 
view of the East, and there are also unidentified people holding Jin 
Yixian." 


"..." thanked the pity. "This is too far apart. How come?" 


Lingwen said: "There is no end, listen to it, and there are: forty-two miles 
in the northwest, fifteen miles in the southeast, twenty-two in the north..." 


After reporting the twenty-seven places in one breath, Lingwen said: 
"Well, this is probably the case for the time being." 


When she finished the report, she had forgotten all of it, and she was 
slightly depressed: "This time your hall is very efficient. But, at the 
moment? Is it temporary? Is there still going to be there... It’s hard to be a 
ghost city. In the wholesale brocade?" 


Lingwen said: "Almost. There are many mobile sellers in the ghost city 
who are unclear. They often sell fake goods in the skin. When they sell 
fake goods, they change their skins. Therefore, the general experts will not 
buy things in it. But there is no shortage of them. When there is a ghost, it 
is an antique, always thinking about ‘just if it’s cheaper.' This time, Jin 
Yixian was stolen, and many ghost hawkers got the gossip, took the 
opportunity to cheat, and found a piece of clothing and said it was 
Jinyixian. It is incredible that there are still a lot of ghosts to buy. After 
buying it, I will find someone to try. It really adds a lot of trouble to us 
collecting information here." 


This is simply to disturb the sight of them looking for a real brocade, and 
there are so many "Jin Yixian" in all directions. Who knows which one is 
true? 


However, since the task was delivered to them, you have to find a way to 
complete it. Thanks to the pity: "From the very beginning, look for one by 
one." 


Xie pity has no mana, and Quan Yi will not be able to draw a thousand 
miles. The two have no deputy officers. However, it is only a five-mile 
place in the nearest place where the spirit is reported. It is an abandoned 
dye house. I immediately made a decision and hurriedly set off. 


Xie Li was originally to let Lang Ying stay in the Bodhisattva view, who 
knows that he actually came out with himself, and still can't go back. I 
think that this trip should not be dangerous. I can also give Lang Sui a long 
experience. Anyway, I will take him to practice in the future. 


The three nights were a few nights, and suddenly there was a strange sound 
coming from the roadside: " ! 


Hearing this familiar number, Xie pity stopped. In the fog ahead, a tall 
outline was slowly displayed, as well as the secluded ghosts of the four 
regiments. Quan Yizhen seems to be ready to start, no matter what the 
three seven twenty-one hit, but thanked him but pressed him, said: 
"Nothing. Know." 


Sure enough, four gold squats carried a step and appeared in front of the 
three. Quan Yizhen seems to have never seen this magical thing, his eyes 
wide open and his eyes bright. Singing the first singer: "But the Prince of 
the Kingdom of Xianle?" 


Thanks to pity: "It's me. Is there anything?" 


Gold sang the song: "Nothing, nothing, that is, the brothers are idle and 
have nothing to do, I would like to ask, the Prince Edwards rushed to the 
night road, do you need us to help carry a journey?" 


The road is not far away, Xie Li just wants to refuse, the right is true: 
"Good!" Can not wait to climb up, as if I really want to sit on this 
gorgeous step. Thanks to pity and laughter, when he went up and pulled 
him, the step was suddenly stunned, and he suddenly slammed his power. 
Xie pity also stunned, but was helped by a person. He blurted out: 
"Three..." Looking back, I was ignorant of Lang Ying who did not know 
when he was on, holding his arm tightly, a pair of black The lacquered 
eyes were looking at him, silent. 


We hurriedly lifted the steps, and the eight legs turned like four pairs of 
hot wheels. While flying steadily, we shouted: "Let's let go! Don't block 
the road, don't block the way!" 


Quan Yi was ruthlessly kneeling on the ground, leaping and leaping, it 
seems that he has not given up, and he 1s ready to jump up, but we ran too 
fast, he always took a step, and he pursued it in the rear. It seems to be 
true. I really want to sit down and take a ride. Seeing that he is chasing 
seriously in the back, thanking him for being unbearable in the steps, he 
feels that this is not bullying the child. Although he knows that this step is 
a flower city thing, he may not welcome other **** officials to ride, but 
he still can't help but say: "So what... can't you carry three people?" 


Let's sing: "No, no! Only two people!" 


The hot wheels ran all the way, and the right one chased the road. As soon 
as they arrived at the place, the gold squad put down the two people, and 
lifted the sprint and ran away. Quan Yizhen has never been in the car, 
extremely disappointed, but also looking at the look of a reluctant look. 
Thanks to the glory of Lang Ying, but he heard the mourning in front of 
him, all from the abandoned dyehouse. It’s strange to thank you, isn’t it 
that there’s no one at this dyehouse at night? 


When I came closer, I realized that those voices mourned: 


"Small no longer dare to sell fakes on the site of the old man in the flower 
city!" 


"I really don't dare! But please tell the owner of the old man, these fake 
brocades are also wholesaled from other ghosts! I am also a victim!!!" 


The three came to the dyeing house. It happened that a black-faced ghost- 
faced man came out from the inside and seemed to have been waiting for a 
long time. He owed him slightly and said: "His Royal Highness." 


This voice was the ghost who took the glory in the bliss and brought it 
back to thank you. At that time, thanking him in his hand, saw a curse. 2k 
novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 131: Two-color 
color open dyeing workshop 2 


The wind master once told him that this person should be a jade. Because 
of the number of priests who have been desecrated in these years, there are 
only a few in number. So, thank you: "What do you call?" 


The ghost said: "Don't dare, no name is a small pawn." 


Entering the abandoned dyehouse, thank you for your gratitude. I saw all 
kinds of clothes hanging on wooden frames: wedding dresses, official 
gowns, daughter yarns, robes, children's clothes... and very simple and 
rude blood-stained linen, as if I was afraid that others would not feel this 
The clothes are weird. Layers are stacked, sullen and sinister, and the evil 
spirits are heavy, as if one of the dead people stood there. Even if it is not 
Jin Yixian, it is certainly not a good thing. 


The long fabrics are hung on wooden shelves, some are pale, some are 
dirty, and they have been left unattended for a long time. Right one is on 
the edge of the black lacquered dyeing tank, and burying his head to study 
the liquid with different colors and odors. Xie Pity always worried that he 
would use his fingers to squat and then squat, and drag him down. Seeing 
the courtyard, a group of demons and ghosts were chained up by an iron 
chain, holding their heads and saying, "Is this...?" 


The ghost said: "There are people who sell jewels in the ghost market 
recently, and the monsters and ghosts who use jinyi in all places. They are 
all here." 


There are actually ninety-eight, and they should all be caught within a 
short period of time. The ghost face again said: "If there is a new change, 
it will soon be the Prince Edward." 


Hearing this, Xie pity couldn't help but say: "No need. Please tell three... 
Flower City Lord, really don't have to be so troublesome. I can do it 
myself." The result is the same, just a little time and effort. . But he is the 


official of the heavenly court. Even if there are not many people offering 
it, it is just doing the job. 


The ghost said: "The city owner naturally understands that His Highness 
can be done easily. But for this reason, I hope that you don't have to spend 
your energy on such a small thing that anyone can do. His time and energy 
should be used to do more. Important matter." 


For a moment, thank you for saying: "Excuse me, your city owner is 
now...?" 


Lang Firefly seemed to carelessly wandering around with respect, and the 
ghost said: "The city owner is very busy now." 


Thanks for your help: "Oh. That's good. I hope that everything goes well 
over him and everything goes well." 


In this group of demons and monsters, I asked one by one, all of them 
were wholesaled with the masked mysterious person, not like lying, but in 
a place like a ghost city, there are hundreds of mysterious people wearing 
masks in one day. ? 


I couldn’t ask why, the ghost-faced man took the rope and took the devil’s 
ghost away. However, the ninety-eight ghost costumes have remained. Xie 
pity only felt that I had never seen so many clothes in the past when I was 
collecting old clothes. I turned over and turned over one piece. I suspect 
that no one is a real thing. Right to the truth: "Qiying, look again." Let's 


go." 
Quan Yizhen scratched his fluffy curls and shook his head. "Too much." 


Too many ghost clothes. The evil spirits of each piece of clothing interact 
with each other, causing people to lose their judgment. 


It's like a person with a sensitive taste. Although it can distinguish 
between pear-flavored and apple-flavored sugar fillings, if you mix the 


stuffing of ninety-eight different fruits and let him taste it, it will lose the 
taste. Xie Li is thinking about other ways. When I look back, I see that I 
have taken a piece of clothes and ready to go to the body. Xie Pity quickly 
stopped him and hung the clothes back to the road: "stop and stop. Qi 
Ying, let us first say Ok: First, don't mess around. Second, don't wear 
clothes. These are very dangerous behaviors." 


Quan Yizhen pointed behind him and said, "What about him?" 


Xie Pity suddenly smelled a slight burnt smell, and then looked back in the 
direction he pointed, only to see Lang Ying did not know from which 
corner to find a match ignited, is holding it, calmly and skillfully burn a 
ghost The hem of the clothes. 


Thank you: "...and... don't play with fire?" 


The ghost costume seems to be hurt by Lang Bing, the clothes are swaying 
up, madly twisted, and do not evade. Unlike a piece of clothing, it looks 
like a muddy live fish. This picture looks a bit cruel. However, although 
the burnt smell is emitted, the fabric is not burned. It seems that the ghosts 
of these ghost clothes are abundant enough to protect them from the fire. 


Listening to the pity, let him not play with fire, Lang Firefly lost the 
match, and one foot stepped on the ground, another look is very 
embarrassing. Thanks to the pity, I used to say, "How are you today..." 


Having said that, his face suddenly solidified. 


Because he saw it, not far from him, a long white cloth hung on the high 
wooden frame, and was slightly moved by the night wind. On the fabric, a 
black figure is reflected and is moving slowly. And this figure has no head. 


Thanks to the rush of Lang Ying to the back, the shot is a sword, said: "Be 
careful!" 


This sword smashed the fabric and the figure into two pieces. However, 
the cloth landed, and the back was empty, and the figure of the headless 
man disappeared. Xie pity has not had time to look forward to seeing it, 


there is a slight chill in the back, violently turning back, and the pupils 
suddenly close. I saw a woman with a gorgeous dress, I don’t know when I 
stood behind him silently. 


Do not! Not a woman, just a dress! 


Only then was he cut into two pieces, and it was also a piece of clothing, 
which fell on the floor and was covered by cloth. In all directions, the 
shadows of a crowd of people swayed toward the three people. It turned 
out that, unconsciously, the ninety-eight ghost costumes hanging in the 
courtyard, the corridor, and the dyeing house were all freed from the shelf! 


Thanks for your pity: "How come all the way suddenly?" 
A low voice came from the side, saying: "The ghost 1s moving." 


Thanks for looking back, Lang Sui is talking. Although he did not show 
any uneasiness, but the blue veins on the back of the pale hand have 
already started slightly, obviously also being affected. 


Another million ghosts! The closer the date of the Bake Mountain 1s, the 
more deafening it 1s to the ghosts. Thanks to the first time, "What 
happened to Saburo?" 


However, the situation did not give him more time to think, the thoughts 
turned sharply, more than 20 pieces of ghost clothes have been posted. 
Right one really does not think about it, and punches it out. If this punch is 
hit on the wall or on the ground, it must be the ground shaking, the earth 
and stone cracking, but it can be a few pounds, but it is hit on a few 
clothes. Imagine that even children play know "stones, scissors, cloth" and 
cloth hammers. The light, soft fabric is just a knuckle! He is heavy in the 
boxing style, and the cloth is so softly wrapped around you, unscathed, and 
can only be thankful for the sword. However, the ghosts of the ghost 
clothes are extremely light, and they can pull out four or five feet when 
they are swept. And because they have almost no weight, there is almost 
no sound. To capture their movements and watch out for their sneak 
attacks, it is more difficult than guarding people. It is. 


On weekdays, people pick clothes. At this time, they are clothes picking 
up, and 98 ghost costumes can't wait to find someone who fits their body 
and fits their eyes. In people, women are the most loved to pick clothes; 
inside the ghost clothes, women's clothes are the most loved. Dozens of 
women's dresses with different colors and styles are madly sticking to the 
pity, and the swords are forced to go. The battle is more intense than a 
group of women who see the beautiful clothes that fit together. For a time, 
thank you for being surrounded by flowers. , pulled by a circle of women 
in the middle of the pull. Quan Yizhen pulled a few pieces of children's 
clothes that were clinging to his head and threw them aside. He wondered: 
"Why do these women like you so much?" 


Thanks for the pity: "Maybe because I am more friendly?" 


However, there is no ghost costume to entangle Lang Ying, perhaps 
because he is a ghost body, knowing that he can not benefit from him, he is 
not close. Thanks to a sword, a few women's skirts were smashed, and the 
ghost clothes that were cut off were divided into two parts, and they were 
able to move freely, and the dodge was faster and more erratic. Thanks to 
the eyes, a few ghost costumes groped in the window and said: "Close the 
door, pull the array! Don't let them go out!" 


They can still cope with the two gods, but in case these ghost clothes slip 
out to find someone else, they are in trouble. However, it was still late. 
The courtyard of the dyeing house is open-air, and there is already a robes 
fluttering a few large sleeves, vacating, flying like a huge bat to the night 
sky. Thanks for the pain, said: "Qiying! The dyed square is handed over to 
you!" After that, the bottom of the foot, flying out of the wall, grabbed the 
hem of the ghost robe. 


With the weight of the individual, the robes slammed their sleeves and 
couldn’t fly, and they fell to the ground and were thanked for their clothes. 


However, it was very stunned. " "rips off one of his own clothes, and 
the strong man breaks his wrist and sneaks out from the hands of Xie. It 
happened that a passer-by had finished drinking a small wine and went 
home to see a headless geek fluttering and screaming: "Ah, ah, ah, ah, no 
head! No head!" 


Xie pity quickly rushed to grab the dress and showed it to the man. He 
said, "Don't be afraid, don't be afraid! Look! There is no head, no one." 


When the man saw it, the collar was empty, nothing! This is really more 
horrible than the headless ghost, and immediately turned his eyes and 
fainted. Xie pity quickly caught him and gently put it on the ground, said: 
"Sorry! I will deal with it immediately, and deal with it immediately." 


After this chaos, it was easy to thank the ghost clothes that flew out of the 
dyeing house and grab it back. After a round of rounds, it was confirmed 
that there was no less, and this was relieved. 


This is the end of the matter, thank you: "I have to use the most simple and 
rude method of Qi Ying, let's try it one by one." 


He is willing to wear it himself, but at the moment, the other two partners 
are more difficult to say. I am afraid that if he happens to be worn by him 
in the future, he will not be able to cope with it, or decide to be controlled 
by him and stare at the other two. . 


So, Lang Ying and Quan Yizhen both took off their coats and tried them 
one by one. Every time they wear one, Xie Pity issued a simple instruction 
like "Jumping two times" or "turning a circle" to see if they would Follow. 


However, after all eighteen trials have been tried, the two have worn forty 
or fifty of them, and there is nothing wrong with them. It seems that none 
of these ghost costumes is a brocade. White 1s busy in the middle of the 
night. 


Lang Ying and Quan Yi were dressed in single clothes and kneeling on the 
ground. Xie Pity sat in the messy clothes, holding the forehead: "Selling 
fakes, it is really unacceptable..." 


For a while, he went to find the spirit, the psychic said: "Lingwen, I have 
collected some ghost costumes here, although there is probably no 
authenticity of Jin Yixian, but they are quite evil, some tricky, you can 
Send someone to take it away?" 


Lingwen said: "Okay, I will arrange it immediately. How many pieces have 
you received?" 


Thanks to the pity: "98." 


"..." Lingwen said, "His Royal Highness is really capable, and I received 
more than I reported to you." 


Xie pity and cough, said: "It is not me..." 


The voice did not fall, but also a sense of familiar coldness of the back, 
thank you for a slight glimpse, looked up. 


I saw the front, the fluttering white cloth, reflecting a black human figure. 


This time, neither is headless nor erratic. Standing behind the long strip of 
cloth, it is indeed a person. It can be seen that it is a tall youth, and even 
the scattered hair is clearly visible on the edge of the figure. 2k novel 
reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 132: Ninety- 
nine demon costumes 


Xie pity immediately stood up and said: "Jin Yixian?!" 


Of course, the silhouette did not respond, nor did it move. It was only 
fixed. Thank you for holding both hands and one right and holding the 
other two, whispering: "Don't move." 


In a short while, a night wind blew, and the human figure seemed to sigh, 
smashed, and passed away with the wind. Xie Pity suddenly got up. At this 


time, the door of the dyeing house suddenly sounded a sudden " 
knocking on the door. The three of them looked back and thanked: "Who?" 


A male voice is out: "His Royal Highness, it is me." 


Thanks to the past, the door opened, and the man outside the dyeing house 
was a man with a sharp face and a clear shape. He came in with his hand. 
Thanks for the slightest sorrow, said: "Lingwen, how come you 
personally?" 


Lingwen finished the sleeves and said: "Listen to your imperial prince, 
you are too tricky. Ordinary priests may not be able to cope, and come and 
see for themselves. Your Royal Highness is good, how do you sit on the 
ground? What happened, all this look? ” 


It is the spirit of the male. Thanks for the pity to go to the curtain, and 
opened it, it was empty, half awkward, and turned back: "Jin Yixian has 
become visible." 


Lingwen Qidao: "What?" 


Thanks to pity: "It should be that it is right. It is a young man. He is very 
tall. He is two inches taller than me. Looking at the skeleton form, it must 
be a martial artist." 


Lingwen slightly hesitated, said: "His Royal Highness, are you sure? In the 
past many years, I have never heard of Jin Yixian in front of people. And, 
are you not saying that there are no authentic products in these ninety- 
eight ghost costumes? Will someone pretend to be a ghost and fake?" 


Thanks for the pity: "I am afraid not. After a while, in order to avoid the 
ghost clothes from flowing out to harass the mortal, we closed the doors 
and windows, and set up a line, things inside can not go out, things outside 
can not enter. There are three of us in this dyeing house. Who can make a 
ghost?" 


Indulge in a moment, Lingwen said: "So, is the real thing encountered a 
special situation? Or, the silhouette you see, is the soul attached to other 
ghost costumes?" 


Lang Ying and Quan Yizhen are on the ground, and they all seem to be ina 
daze. Xie Li and Ling Wen stood in the arms of an adult and stood on one 
side and discussed it for a while. Finally, the spirit proposed: "I see, it is 
better to bring these ghost clothes to the Temple of the Spirit, let me over 
there. The people are really not good. The next time you ask, there is 
always an expert in Heaven." 


After thinking about it, Xie pity nodded and said: "Alright, but this is the 
task that is delivered to us after all. I still want to finish it completely. 
Since Jin Yixian is in it, I will try to try it. If there is no result tomorrow, 
then transfer the ninety-eight ghost costumes to you." After all, this matter 
did not belong to the spirit of the temple. Lingwen said: "Why is your 
Highness polite? Right, if you send it tomorrow, send one hundred and 
one." 


Thanks for your pity: "Why do you have three more?" Then I reacted. "Do 
you suspect that there are problems with the three clothes we wear?" 


Lingwen said: "It is not impossible." 


Xie pity lifted the cuffs of the robes that had been worn off the line, 
saying: "I have been wearing this robes for four or five years, and it is 
definitely no problem. The one on the laurel is my new purchase, but he 


did not It’s okay to listen to it, so it should be no problem.” He let Lang 
Liu do not work, Lang Ying smashed the firewood; let him stay at home, 
Lang Ying still followed the door. Lingwen shook his head and said: "I 
don't mean this. You don't know your highness. This is a very good thing. 
There is one here. The evil will spread to other ordinary clothes. In short, 
insurance, today you Don't wear any clothes you wear, deal with them." 


Hearing words, thank you for taking off the coats of Lang Ying and Quan 
Yizhen, and said: "Don't wear it, don't wear it, take it off, take it off. Then, 
I will take the clothes and send it tomorrow. Go to the Temple of Spirits." 


Lingwen said: "I send people to pick it up?" 


Thanks to pity: "No, no. It’s already embarrassing to bother you again, and 
you have to run it yourself. You are too busy there, or I am coming." 


The next day, Xie pity really packed up a lot of clothes, one person 
carrying a few huge burdens, went to Xianjing. 


The spirit has been waiting in the temple for a long time. Today, the 
temple is not as busy and crowded as it is. Xie pity untied several big bags 
of ghost clothes, and the colorful clothes burst open and paved. He wiped 
the sweat of the forehead with his hand, and Lingwen walked around and 
said: "Can you harvest?" 


Thanks, pity, sighed: "Hey, nothing. First, I am sorry, there are no ones 
around me, and it is inevitable that I will lose everything. Yesterday, a lot 
of clothes are messy, I don’t know if there is a leak, I always feel like I 
missed one or two pieces, but Not very sure." 


Lingwen said: "No problem." He bowed his head and said, "It is indeed 
missing. Your Royal Highness, as if the piece worn by the little devil 
around you yesterday was confiscated?" 


Thanks to the right hand into a fist, gently hammered in the palm of his 
left hand, said: "Ah, you are right! I remembered, the clothes Lang Yu was 
habitually draped, I forgot to collect it. 1am Just go back and take it." 


Lingwen smiled and said: "No hurry, your Highness will go slowly." 


However, the pity did not go, but instead set itself in place, and the look 
gradually dignified. Lingwen is preparing to order the priest to come up to 
accept the ghost costume, and turn to see him still, there are only two 
people in the temple, strangely said: "His Royal Highness, what else do 
you have?" 


Thanks to the complex look at her, said: "Nothing. Just, I am thinking, if I 
send the real Jin Yixian, will I turn around, you take the real thing and hide 
it?" 


Lingwen smiled slightly, but still very polite, said: "His Royal Highness?" 


Xie pity looked at her calmly and said: "From the beginning, I have a 
vague idea." 


Lingwen calmly said: "What thoughts?" 


Thanks to the pity: "Ordinary people and ordinary devils and ghosts, can 
not arrogate the martial arts hall. If anyone is familiar with the Shenwu 
Temple to steal the guarded things there without being caught on the spot, 
I am afraid, except for the prince, it is the spirit. Wen Zhenjun is you." 


After all, the Temple of Spirits has traveled to and from the temples all the 
year round. It is familiar to other people's sites and can no longer be 
familiar with them. 


Lingwen smiled, said: "The Prince of the Prince, this is a matter of course. 
"Who is the easiest to do, who is the most doubtful." According to your 


thinking, is it more likely that the Emperor will be self-stealed?" 


Xie polite nodded and said: "I admit, this is taken for granted. However, 
what started to make me feel wrong 1s the half-face makeup woman." 


Ling Wendao: "What happened to the half-faced makeup girl?" 


Thanks for the pity: "It took a fake Jinyixian, just asked me when I came 
to the door. How could it be so clever? And, it just wants to write 
suspicious words on his face, as if I was afraid that I would not suspect 
that she had Ghostly, the purpose is too strong." 


"Oh? What purpose?" 


Thanks to pity: "Have she already said it? ‘Old-for-new’. What she wants 
is the old clothes in my view!” 


In retrospect, Jin Yixian was stolen, Shenwu Temple found it very quickly, 
and the reaction was very fast. It began to be traced when it was stolen. 
Therefore, the thief may not dare to leave it in his own hands and will hide 
it first. So, where is the hiding place that is the least easy to find? 


Tibetan leaves in the forest. 


If you want to hide the jewels, you will turn it into a very unremarkable 
ordinary linen, thrown into the market, and stare at yourself. Such a rough 
dress, according to common sense, no one wants to buy. But the life of 
thankfulness can't be used for common sense. He himself wears a edging 
robe for four or five years, and the money in his hand is only enough to 
buy this kind of clothes. Moreover, his current request for clothes is to 
keep warm, clean, and not pick, and he is the one who has the ability to 
pick the most dangerous one in countless pieces of high-priced clothes, so 
I loved to buy the legendary Jin Yixian back at a very low price. 


Lingwen said: "Your Highness, you said this is very excessive. You are a 
‘ee Of martial arts, and you want to know that the half-faced makeup 
woman who goes to the door will be subdued immediately. No matter the 
new clothes and old clothes, all bring Don't go." 


Thanks to the pity: "She really does not take it, but who said she must take 
it away? If there is no accident, what will happen in the end?" 


If it is pity that the half-faced woman holds the real brocade, it will be 
reported to the spirit, and then the spirit will probably come down 


personally. Like yesterday, telling the pity, for the sake of insurance, to be 
present. The clothes are taken back to the Lingwen Temple. 


Unfortunately, at the time, Quan Yizhen was also present. Moreover, I did 
not expect that he had experience through one pass, and actually decided 
that the brocade was fake. In this way, it is not so logical for the spirit to 
come and take away all the clothes in the Bodhisattva. 


Thanks to all the news is given by the spirit, she can also ask questions in 
a bright and honest way, always understand the movement of thankfulness. 
After the half-faced woman was seen, Lingwen immediately sent a new 
psychic to Xie, telling him that the ghost market had a lot of fakes to be 
dealt with, and that he had to give him a new task, so that he could not 
think about it. Thanks to the pity: "I don't know if the fakes are flowing 
out of you, but the news is indeed what you told me. This step is probably 
to remove me from the Bodhisattva and then to Lang. ” 


Who knows, Lang Ying also followed. 


"I don't know that Jin Yixian suddenly appears, not in your expectation, 
but for you, it is not difficult to adapt." 


So many pieces of ghost clothes, true and false do not know, in the chaos, 
there is always a chance to touch the authentic Jinyixian; and the Jinyixian 
display, the spirit can also appear in person, the light and the big to take 
away some people's clothing; finally how to verify, judge there There is no 
real thing, how to explain that silhouette, it is also a matter of the spiritual 
temple. 


Hearing here, Lingwen compared to a pause gesture, saying: "His Royal 
Highness, do you want to stop first? So, do you think Lang Ying, is that 
so? Do you think that the one he wears is Jin Yixian? Forgot, after he put it 
on, he didn’t listen to you. Isn’t it? This is what you said. You know, the 
power of Jinyixian is very strong, even if it meets the ghost king, there is 
no exception.” 


Thanks to the pity: "You also said, ‘I have encountered a special situation.' 
As for what special situation is, I think, you know better than me, I hope 


you can answer for me.” 


Lingwen slightly frowned, took up his hand and whispered: "His Royal 
Highness, have you already identified me as a thief? I am blunt, this 
makes me a little bit...not happy." 


Thanks for the slightest apology, said: "I apologize." 


Lingwen said: "I accept. However, Your Highness, if you must insist, it is 
not impossible, come up with evidence, it is OK. After all, when it comes 
to the present, it is still speculation." 


Thanks slowly and slowly: "The evidence is not there before today, even 
before I stepped into the Temple of the Spirit, there is no. But from now 
on, there will be." 


Lingwen made an invitation gesture and said: "Please." 


Thanks to the pity: "The evidence is that you just did not order the number 
of these ghost costumes." 


The look of the spirit 1s almost unchanged, however, the eyebrows are 
slightly congested. Thanks to the pity: "The ghost costumes I sent are 
indeed less, but not one less. In fact, I only sent you eighty-eight pieces, 
and lost ten whole! 


"All the clothes that I think are suspicious, I have all been deducted and 
not sent to you, but you did not notice the number of problems, but at a 
glance, I found that Lang Ying did not send it - then, how do you alone? 
Did you find that one missing?" 


The spirit of the hand raised: "Please wait." 


She did not panic, re-pointed the ghost clothes on the ground, and found 
that it was eighty-eight, not calm, still calm, said: "I think, this can be 


\ are 


explained by ‘ 


Thanks for your pity: "Okay. Since you have been careful, you should have 
seen it one by one. Then, I will tell you one thing: Didn’t you find it? The 
clothes that Lang Ying wore yesterday, clearly Just in these eighty-eight 
ghost costumes!" 


Lingwen said: "His Royal Highness, what is this?" 


Thanks for the pity, he pulled out one of the clothes from the ground and 
shook it. It was a plain white linen. He said: "This is what Lang Fan wore 
yesterday. Isn't it here? Why have you not found it after you have clicked 
it?" 


Lingwen said: "Son of the Prince will also know that this linen is not eye- 
opening, and has not seen it in a hurry. I can't blame me for having no 
eyes." 


Thanks to pity: "It's really inconspicuous. Then, with your spirit and truth, 
you can be more careful and cautious. Why would you say that such an 
inconspicuous dress is not here when you don’t clear the number? ?" 


The spirit smiles unchanged, saying: "There are too many clothes, and the 
eyes are spent; the files are made into mountains, and they are stupid." 


Thanks for your pity: "You have no eyes, on the contrary, you are very 
good-looking. I will tell you the second thing: the clothes that Lang Sui 
wore yesterday, I did not bring it. In my hand, It’s just that I copied the 
other one as it was - but my imitation 1s still very serious. How do you see 
at a glance that the real thing of Lang Liu is not here?" 


Lingwen is inexplicable: "In fact, I didn't see it whether it was true or not. 
Your Royal Highness is not a business office. I can't help but think too 
much on weekdays. Why 1s it that I have to spend time to make an 
imitation? ” 


Seeing that she avoided the edge, thanked her: "It’s not finished yet. I will 
tell you the last thing." 


He lifted the white linen and whispered: "...this linen is just one piece that 
I just picked it up inside. What's imitation of a "seriously fine' as it 1s, all 

my nonsense As you said, I have nothing to do with an imitation? You are 
fooled. It has a different color from the dress that Yesterday's Swallows 


wore. I took it and asked you, didn't you think that something was wrong? 
yaw 


" " 


Xie pity staring at the spirit, said: "Lingwen, now, I only need you to 
answer a very simple question: What color did the clothes worn by Lang 
Sui yesterday?" 


The spirit did not open immediately, and slowly raised his eyes. 


The white linen fell to the ground, thanking the pity: "The first **** of the 
church, the tens of thousands of volumes of the heavens in the heavens are 
gone from your hands every day, so that the memory is so bad. Why do 
you even have yesterday? What color does the dress that I wear don’t 
remember?” 


"You can't answer, because you are guarding me and swindling you, don't 
dare to answer it easily; because you don't know what color it is; because 
yesterday, you saw that he was wearing a headless sleeveless Cloth bag!" 


He said in one word: "The ever-changing glory of the brocade is nothing 
but a very powerful obstacle. However, this sinister method is so powerful 
that it will never be effective for one person - that is, the person who made 
it by himself. 


"No matter how infinitely it changes, what you see in the eyes of the 
people who make it 1s always its original face. Only then, you glanced at 
the eighty-eight ghost costumes, and did not see the headless inside. The 
scary bag of the sleeve, of course, can be immediately judged, Jin Yixian 
is not inside!" 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 133: Knowing 
the ghost king prefers the ghost king 


Originally, he only intended to leave suspicious ghost clothes, and then 
explored and verified it himself, but he did not want the spirit to casually 
say a word, and gave him a terrible flaw, thanking him for having a taste, 
he would count it, and follow the road. Go on. In the end, the fried Lingu 
film was not left. 


The spirit is dead. Thanks to the pity: "Of course, you can not admit it, but 
you must know whether it is true or not, and it is very simple. As long as I 
take the dress to the temple of the gods, I will change it in the face of the 
emperor, and ask you again. If you can't see what it looks like, it will come 
to the fore." 


That Jin Yixian had sucked more than 500 people's blood when he was in 
the world. It was a sinister evil. If the spirit is only arrogant about the theft 
of the martial arts hall, and has not had time to take it out to harm people, 
it is not sinful and unforgivable. However, the spirit is first to be picked up 
and then to ascend. The earliest time that the legend of Jinyixian was 
circulated was far later than the years when the spirit was ordered. 


That is to say, the spirit is the Jinyixian made by the body of the gods after 
entering the heavens! 


The priest who should have defended the mortal peace, but instead seduce 
the mortal, should have been investigated and handled. The mortal who is 
tempted to kill is still the future priest. I am afraid that this matter cannot 
be easily done. Lingwen sighed and said: "His Royal Highness, you are 
really..." 


Suddenly, she said: "Probably, I am not lucky, this thing has spread to you. 
Although there are only two of us in this spiritual temple today, you and I 
have hundreds of years of friendship, but, I I think, if I ask you to look at 
the eyes of many years of friendship, you will probably not agree. The 
next step is to persuade me to go to the Shenwu Temple and ask for sin." 


Thank you for your pity. Although he and Lingwen have known each other 
for hundreds of years, they have been dealing with business. Although they 
have never been deeply involved, the relationship between the two is not 
bad. Even when they have just risen for the third time and everyone is 
ridiculing that he is a broken fairy, the spirit is right. He has not been so 
arrogant, on the contrary, he has taken care of a lot. The task of partial 
birth of this brocade was distributed to him, and finally he checked the 
water and stone, and reported it was not, it is even more impossible to 
report it. 


Thanks for your sincerity: "I am also bad luck." 


Lingwen picked up his arm and shook his head. "Your Highness, you are 
this person... Sometimes it is very smart, sometimes it is not very clever; 
sometimes it is very soft, sometimes it is hard-hearted." 


After a pause, she said: "Where is that dress, where is it now?" 


Thanks to pity: "In my hand. After that I will personally send it to the 
Temple of God." 


Lingwen nodded and seemed to have nothing to say. Thanks again and 
again: "So, can you tell me why the jewels don't work on Lang Sui?" 


Ling Wendao: "I can probably guess. But if your Highness wants to know 
the answer, can you promise me a request first?" 


Thanks for your pity: "You said." 
Ling Wendao: "Can you show me? Jin Yixian." 


Thank you for your pity. Lingwen said: "Give me a day. Just after all, if I 
go to the Shenwu Temple and ask for my own sin, I am afraid I will not 
have a chance to read it. Don't misunderstand, I am not going to move 
anything, just, you said that he was visible yesterday, I Really surprised." 


She shook her head and her eyes narrowed and said: "... For so many years, 
I have never seen Bai Jin appear." 


Thanks to the pity: "The young soldier, whose original name is Bai Jin?" 


The spirit seems to have returned to God, saying: "Oh. Yes, but generally 
others call him white." 


Thanks to pity: "Little white? Sounds like..." It's a bit like calling a dog, 
and it's a bit like calling an idiot. Lingwen smiled and said: "It is the 
meaning you think now. The name Bai Jin is what I gave him. Others never 
call it, so few people know the name. However, if you call him that way, 
he I will be very happy." 


In the legend of Jin Yixian, the way that the young admired woman treats 
the young man ts only cruel and terrible. If it is not bitter, or it is born cold 
and blood. However, when Lingwen mentioned the youth, his tone was 
very easy-going, and there was no tenderness or hate. He said: "Well? If 
you are afraid that I will run away, it is better to use the evil to lock me. I 
am not a god, escape. Can't fall." 


I don't know why, thank you, he should believe in the spirit, indulge in a 
moment, slowly nodded and said: "Okay." 


The two made nothing to look like, and they went out of the Temple of the 
Spirit. When walking on Xianjing Street, I still greeted the other passing 
officers as usual. The spirit looks as usual, and the roots in her sleeves 
have not been locked up. I didn’t go far, and I ran into the hustle and 
bustle of the patrolling street. The two men greeted each other and stood 
on the side of the road. They whispered a few words and stared at the pity, 
thanking me with a slight vigilance. Why are you looking at me like this?" 


I touched my chin and said with sincerity: "I don't want to be your prince. 
I am scared when I see you. I always feel that someone standing next to 
you seems to have something to do. So I saw you walking with the spirit. 
The heartbeat has accelerated. Lingwen, you have to be careful." 


Lingwen haha said: "How come? You don't want to laugh at the general." 
Xie Pity could not laugh. In a sense, the feeling of embarrassment is really 
accurate. 


Back to the view of Bodhisattva, it was far from seeing that Lang Ying was 
leaning against an old tree in front of him. The left hand was carelessly 
turning the broom to play, and a pile of sweeping golden leaves piled up at 
his feet. Xie pity looked at it for a while, then deliberately let go of the 
footsteps, Lang Ying did not look back, but he must have noticed their 
existence, changed the posture very naturally, continued to sweep the 
floor, turned and saw, it seems to see Thank you for your pity and 
spirituality. Xie pity and cough, said: "I am sweeping the floor again." 


Lang Fired nodded. Seeing him like this, thanking pity did not hold back, 
so the elders touched his head and praised: "Good boy." 


Lang Hsiao is safely affected. Lingwen looked at them and declined to 
comment. Xie pity led her to open the door of Bodhisattva and said: "It is 
here..." 


Who knows, once they open the door, they see a figure in front of the 
merit box, and sneak a sneak peek, and thank you for being too busy to 
drag him away, saying: "Qiying, don't plug it anymore, really enough. The 
last time you stuffed me, I haven't got it yet, it's stuck." 


Lingwen nodded: "His Royal Highness is good." 
Quan Yizhen also said to her: "Hello." 


In the center of the Bodhisattva view is a wooden shelf with a plain linen 

hanging on it. Of course, this is only seen in the eyes of the pity. Lingwen 
went forward and stared at it for a while. The clothes did not respond. She 
said first: "Two of His Royal Highness, I want to see it alone, can I?" 


Thanks for your pity: "Yes." 


If the evil hands are tied to the hands of the spirit, she is not a **** of 
martial arts. Basically, there will be no troubles. She is still reassured, and 
puts her hand on the shoulder of the right, saying, "Go out." 


How much is solved one thing, thank you for a little relaxation. Just left 
the neighbor and sent a circle of melons and vegetables, he took the 


kitchen and prepared to cook. It can be described as perseverance. In a few 
days, Quan Yizhen seems to have turned his Bodhisattva view into a place 
like a farmhouse. He jumped up and down, sometimes climbed trees, 
sometimes stealing melons, sometimes fish, and sometimes catching 
frogs. If he didn't pay attention, he would touch him into the kitchen and 
steal a sweet potato. He touched the air, and when he turned back, he saw 
that the right one was smashing out of the sweet potato, and he was ina 
hurry to sneak out the fish. He said, "I haven't done it yet, don't eat it!" 


However, it is because you have not done so you have to eat quickly, and 
when he is done, he can't eat it. Xie pity shook his head and saw Lang 
Firefly coming over. He blinked and said: "Lang Ying, are you free? Come 
help, cut a dish." 


Lang Ying was originally going to grab the sweet potato that he had stolen, 
and listened to the pity, and then he came over and helped. He took the 
kitchen knife on the cutting board and took the cabbage. Xie pity looked at 
him, turned his head, and while scouring the rice, he said casually: "Lang 
Ying, ah, have you seen a lot of gods and ghosts who have come to see us 
in Bodhisattva?" 


Each one is weird. Lang Firefly said behind him: "Well." 


Thanks: "That, I ask you a question: If you let you choose, do you think 
that among these gods, which one is the most handsome?" 


Lang’s bloated head cuts vegetables and seems to be thinking. Xie pity 
gently raised his eyebrows and said: "Tell it. It is true according to the 
truth in your heart." 

So, Lang Ying replied: "You." 

Thanks and laughs: "Besides me." 


Lang Weidao: "Red clothes." 


Thanks for pity and forbearance, you have to be hurt. 


He said seriously: "Well, I think so too." 

After a pause, thank you and asked: "Which one do you think is the best?" 
Lang Ying still answered: "Red clothes." 

Thanks again, he quickly asked: "Which one ts the richest?" 

"Red clothes." 

"Which one do you most appreciate?" 

"Red clothes." 

"Which one is the most stupid?" 

"Green clothes." 


These problems are so close, he actually changed his mouth very timely, 
showing the agility of thinking and the spirit of reaction. Thanks to pity: 
"Well, it seems that you still like the brother in red, his name, called 
Huacheng, remember. So, do you think he is very good?" 


Unknowingly, Lang’s knife seemed to be several times faster, saying: 
“Very good.” 


Thanks to the pity: "So, if you have time, do you think it is time to invite 
him to come to us as a guest?" 


Lang Weidao: "Well. Of course. Must." 


Thanks to pity: "I think so too. However, his subordinates said that he is 
very busy recently and must be busy doing very serious things. I don't 
think I should bother." 

After this sentence, the sound of the chopping of Lang Ying’s “ 
suddenly rose a few points, and Xie Pity supported the stove, and laughed 
and endured the twitching. Quan Yizhen suddenly came in from the 


window and took a bite of the sweet potato. He looked at his eyes and said 
to Lang Lu: "You cut it so badly, it is not good." 


Lang Weidao: "Well? What are you talking about?" 


Thanks for looking back, it was broken, it was broken into slag, and a light 
cough, said: "Oh, really, your knife is too bad." 


Pour a lot of messy ingredients into the pot, thank you for taking a clap, 
decided to let them cook for an hour, out of the kitchen, looked at the 
spirit, and still stayed in the view, he Continue to work, pull out a slightly 
larger wooden sign from the woodpile, borrow the pen and ink from the 
village chief's house, sit at the door, take the wooden card in one hand, and 
write the pen in one hand. Lang Ying also walked over, thanked him for 
raising his head, and said: "Lang Ying, are you literate? Can you write?" 


Lang Weidao: "Yes." 

Thank you, "What about your words?" 

Lang Weidao: "General." 

Thanks to pity: "It doesn't matter, you can see it, and help me a little." 


He handed the wooden sign and the pen to Lang Ying, and smiled: "We 
haven't had a plaque in our view. Is it better to write one with me?" 


Under the urging of thanking, Lang Ying picked up the pen. The little pen 
was in his hand, as if he were heavy, and he could not waver in any way. 


For a long while, he seemed to admit defeat. He put down the pen and the 
wooden board. After the bandage, there was a helpless voice: "... Brother, I 
am wrong." 


This voice is not a Lan Ying, it is clearly a flower city, just more crisp than 
ever, is a young boy. Xie pity holding his arm against one side of the wall, 
watching him struggle for a long time, finally surrender, can't help it, 
laughed to the ground: "Sanlang is really busy!" 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 134: Knowing 
the ghost king prefers the ghost king 2 


Before, Xie pity always felt that I haven't seen it for a long time, and I 
miss it very much. Although, this "long time" is only a few days. Who 
knows, Huacheng has always been hiding with him. Suddenly, before he 
was in a good mood, he had forgotten everything before, and he almost 
forgot to laugh. Huacheng Road: "Brother teased me." 


Thanks for pity and the wooden board, said: "I dare to say that it is 
obvious that Saburo first teased me. I think... You are there when I beat the 
stove?" 


Huacheng praised: "Oh, indeed, how did my brother know? It is really 
God." 


Xie pity waved: "What god, San Lang, you have to pretend to be a serious 
person, do not be so perfunctory, if I can not see it is the real god. Loss I 
thought that there 1s really a second person can eat... Cough, but, "Which 
one is the most handsome? Which one is the best? Which one is the 
richest? Which one do you most appreciate? 'Ha ha ha ha... 


'..." Huacheng softly said, "Brother, forget this paragraph." 
Xie pity categorically refused: "No. I will always remember." 


Huacheng said helplessly: "Brother, I am very happy to make you happy, 
but is it really so funny?" 


Thank you for your support: "Of course. I only rediscovered after I met 
you. It was such a simple thing to be happy, hahahahaha..." 


Hearing this sentence, Huacheng blinked, and the laughter of thankfulness 
was slightly weak. Suddenly he noticed that the sentence was somewhat 
exposed. Bone, after reacting, he had some numbness, a light cough, and 
blinked his eyes, barely positive color. Road: "Well, don't be naughty, the 


real Lang Ying? What do you want to be as a man? Just change the child 
back." 


Huacheng slowly said: "I will invite him to the ghost city for a while." 


It was taken away by Huacheng, and she was very reassured. She nodded 
and waited for another opening, but listened to the wooden door. The 
Lingwen took the hand from the Bodhisattva and said: "His Royal 
Highness." 


Huacheng didn't mean to reveal his identity. Xie Pity also said nothing. In 
front of others, he was only Lang Ying, and he saw the spirit of the spirit 
dignified. He couldn't help but be serious. The smile was completely 
collected. "What happened? Jinyi... Is there any problem with Bai Jin?" 


Lingwen said: "No. He has no problems. Just, I seem to smell strange 
smells from the kitchen. What is your cook burning?" 


Thanks for your help: "Oh, yes, cook it." 


After thinking about it, the spirit still uses a euphemistic tone to say 
something that is not euphemistic. "Take it, Your Highness. No matter 
what you cook, it should be ruined." 


After an hour, night falls. 
Inside the Bodhisattva view, for the table, Huacheng, Lingwen, and Quan 
Yizhen sat around the wooden table. Thanks to a pot from the kitchen, put 


it on the table, uncover the cover, dozens of jade snow cute, round and 
smooth small balls, the armpits in the plate. 


Quan Yizhen said: "Are you not boiled? Why did you become a meatball?" 
Xie Li introduced: "This is called "Yu Jie Bing Qing Pills." 


Quan Yizhen said: "Are you not boiled? Why did you become a meatball?" 


Xie Li continued to introduce: "Because in the process of licking the ball, 
it takes a lot of time to use the soft and soft hand." 


Quan Yizhen said: "Are you not boiled? Why did you become a meatball?" 


Since Quan Yizhen is too persistent, Xie Pity will warmly say: "It was 
indeed boiled well, but because the fire and time controlled a little 
problem, one pot was dried, and I simply added some ingredients. Made a 
ball." 


After listening to the spirit, I sincerely admire: "The whimsy of His Royal 
Highness is really a great thing, and I will admire it." 


Thanks to the pity: "Like, praise." 


Lingwen said: "No. At least I believe that there will never be a second 


an 


person in the world who will create such a "Yu Jie Bingqing Pills’. 
Thanks to the chopsticks, said: "Well, let's talk. Come, everyone, please." 


Lingwen and Quan Yizheng both took the chopsticks with their right 
hands, and then the left hand agreed to reach out to a cold steamed bun at 
the edge of the table. Only Huacheng caught an ice-clear jade pill, and sent 
it to the entrance. He said, "It's good." 


Upon seeing this, Quan Yizheng’s eyes widened. Huacheng said again: 
"The taste is slightly lighter." 


Thanks for your pity: "Okay, write down." 


The eyes of the young man with a bandage on his face ate five or six **** 
of shimmering muddy stones. The evaluation was so sincere. Quan Yizhen 
seemed to be convinced. After thinking about it, he still caught one. 


Thanks for keeping a smile. Smiling and watching him eat, smiling and 
looking at his face turned white, smiling and watching him fall to the 
ground, and finally, smiled and said: "What happened?" 


Huacheng Road: "It may be too urgent to eat." 


Ling Wenwan. At this time, thank you for listening to a familiar voice in 
his ear: "Brother." 


This is neither the sound of Lange-Nan, nor the sound of a young boy who 
is now a flowery city. It is the voice of the flower city. He used to speak 
politely with psychicism. Thanks for raising his eyes and responding, 
"What is it?" 


Huacheng Road: "Ling Wen is a man who ts cold and ruthless. You bring 
her back, I am afraid it is not so simple." 


For the first time, Xie Pity listened to people who commented on the 
spirit, thought for a moment, and replied: "I saw her have a goodwill to the 
sacred fairy, and should not be fake." 


Huacheng Road: "There is a little goodwill, and it 1s not in conflict with 
the heart and heart. She is the first **** of heaven, and she looks at the six 
roads and listens to all directions. Her hands are also long, and my brother 
should beware of her looking for help." 


Thanks to the pity: "General General?" 


Huacheng Road: "It shouldn't. If the water is still there, she will definitely 
look down on the water, because the teacher has no way to help the pro." 
But if it is, you only need to explain the ins and outs. He may not choose 
to help him. Brother, be careful." 


Thanks to pity: "Well, I am careful. Fortunately, the day will soon pass." 


The voice of Huacheng in the ear is deep and deep: "No. Brother, you 
misunderstood, and what I said was another thing. Someone is coming." 


At this time, a ring of bells and bells were heard in the ear. Huacheng 
slightly frowned, thanking through the window slits, looking out, I saw a 
middle-aged Taoist shaking the bell, staggering from the mouth of the 
village of Bodhisattva. 


The robes are very gorgeous, carrying a treasure chest, and the box is 
covered with a yellow plaque. The bell slams all the way, thanking the 
goods, knowing that this is a good thing. If it is an ordinary monster, you 
will have a headache when you hear this ringtone. Retreat on your own. 
Not yet close, there are a few tall white-browed yellow robe monks 
holding a staff, walking slowly. 


In a short time, it was actually continued. There were fifty or sixty people, 
as if they had made an appointment. They were not surprised to see each 
other and surrounded the Bodhisattva. 


This group of people is not a flower shelf, the body is full of various 
instruments, the hands and feet are very calm, obviously a bit of a skill. 
The priests draw mana from the worship of the believers, and some of the 
cultivators can also seek the power from the sacred officials they believe 
in. These sinister humans may have higher mana than the priests, and they 
have come so much. There is no good thing. Thanks for the slightest brow, 
I feel that the person is not good. 


Huacheng put down the tableware and stood up. Xie Pity heard him 
snoring in the psychic, saying: "The old monk stupid priest actually came 
here, with a tired brother, I will take them away." 


Thank you for grabbing him and saying, "Don't move." 
Lingwen ts inexplicable: "What is it?" 


Thank you for using psychic to Huacheng Road: "Don't go. Tell me 
honestly, is it important to reopen the Tonglushan?" 


Huacheng Road: "No." 


Xie pity stared at the eyes behind his bandage and said: "Less lie. You are 
a ghost king, and you don't need to be afraid of mortals like them. Why 
don't you just drive them away, but you should lead them away? You 
change In this way, in fact, I don’t want to make a joke at all, 1s 1t?" 


The copper furnace mountain is reopened, and the higher the realm, the 
greater the impact on the monsters. The first time the ghosts moved, how 
uncomfortable Huacheng was at the time, and thanked him for seeing it. 
And the closer the day of leaving the mountain, the greater the vibration. 
Under such circumstances, if you are thankful, you will choose to 
temporarily seal the deity form, turn it into a relatively young form, store 
mana, avoid runaway, wait until the official start of the mountain. Unblock 
again. 


In this way, although it can avoid the trouble of chaos, but because it seals 
the strength, it will also provide opportunities for people. Thanks for the 
pity, said: "Sure this..." 


That night, when the graceful priests and the monks and monks who had 
hatred of Huacheng were called, they did not expect it to be awkward. 
Huacheng shook his head slightly and said: "Brother, they are coming to 
me. I will leave. Although this form can't kill them in one stroke, it is not 
a problem to let them roll away." 


Thanks for the pity: "If you are gone now, never come to see me later." 
Huacheng Road: "His Royal Highness!" 


Huacheng has always been calm and unimpeded. In the past, he helped 
prayed so many times. This time, thank you for not having the opportunity 
to help him. How can he let him leave alone? 


Thanks for the silence: "You are sitting. I will come to them." 


Quan Yizheng barely opened his eyes and looked sighingly: "External... Is 
it coming? Do you want me to run?" 


" " 


His voice is hoarse. Xie Li helped him close his eyes and said: "Qiying, 
you are still lying down. Also, you can't beat mortals, you have to deduct 


merits." 


Xie pity sticks to the wooden door and scrutinizes the outside. Some 
villagers who had just finished work outside and had not had time to go 
home to have dinner had come to see so many monks and monks. It was 
amazement and said: "What do the masters do here to find Xie Dao?" 


A murderous monk put his hands together: "Amitabha. Donor, do you 
know that this place has been invaded by evil spirits?" 


“What!” The villagers were shocked: “What kind of evil things are there?” 
Another monk is unpredictable: "A supernatural king of the ages!" 
The villagers: "This, how can this be good!" 


The earliest Huayi Road said: "Give us the best! Today I am the same as 
the Chinese people gathered here, just for this once-in-a-lifetime 
opportunity to win this ghost!" After that, I will come forward, but I was 
The village head went back with one hand. The man blinked: "Who are 
you? What do you want to do?" 


The head of the village said: "That, Master, I am the village head of the 
village. Thank you very much, but, hey, I am telling the truth. You look 
very expensive..." 


" " 


That Huayi Road said: "We are here for the devil to demon, you should be 
paid for it!" Then he rushed to the scene, and the villagers stopped them. 
Some people are unhappy, but they can't be swearing, and they are 
resistant to the temper: "What happened?" 


The head of the village said: "If you don't want money, that would be 
great. Thank you for your unselfish devil's demon. But... this, the village's 
life has long been contracted by Xie Daochang. The masters came here to 
grab the work. As a village head, I don’t want to explain it to Xie 
Daochang." 


The group roads face each other: "Xie Daochang?" 


So, together, I have discussed a few words: "Which famous Daoist in the 
industry is the surname Xie?" 


"Maybe not." 
"I haven't heard it anyway. It's eighteen." 
"Nothing is not famous, don't worry about it." 


After the discussion was over, the Hua Yidao people turned back and said: 
"You said that Xie Daochang, but this one who lives inside?" 


The villagers said: "Yes." They shouted, "Xie Daochang! Xie Daochang! 
You have come together! Many people! You are not at home?" 


A yellow-haired old man folded his hands together: "Amitabha, that Xie 
Daochang did not have much to do with him. But the evil thing is now 
hidden in this room!" 


The villagers were shocked: " ???!" 


Just at this time, thankful and calmly pushed the door out, saying: "I am. 
What are you doing here?" 


The villagers were busy: "Daochang, these monks and old Taoist priests 
said that you have hidden in your house...a...ghost..." 


Xie pity smiled and said: "Hey? Is this all seen by you?" 
Everyone outside the scene was shocked: "Really?" 
"You admit that it is refreshing!" 

Xie pity throws a jar: "Yes, there are ghosts!" 


The Hua Yidao took the can, first of all, happy, opened it, smiled and said: 
"Half-faced makeup girl?" 


Immediately, he threw the jar back and was unhappy: "The Taoist friend is 
not going to wear garlic. This kind of low-level demon, even the 'bad' is 
not! You know what we are saying." 


Thanks for accepting the jar, I feel that the strength of this person is not 
weak, it really is a bitter repair for many years, not a parallel. A few 
monks said to the Hua Yidao: "Dear brother, I see this person is 
enchanting, will he, he 1s..." 


That Hua Yidao said: "Yes and no, I will know when I open my eyes!" 


He said, he shouted, biting his finger, and smeared a vertical mark on his 
forehead, and his face seemed to have a third eye. Seeing his technique, 
Xie Pity also praised it well, leaning against the door and admiring his 
spellcasting. The Hua Yidao people blinked and stared at him for a 
moment, saying: "Sure enough... there is a ghost! Good ghosts! Ghost 
King! You really changed a skin!" 


Thanks for the pity. 


He is a **** official who works in heaven, how can he have a ghost? I was 
still thinking about this person's ability. How can I talk nonsense? 


It is said that a circle of fifty or sixty mage is like an enemy, posing a 
posture. Huacheng said to the pity: "This group of people is really 
annoying." 


Thanks: "It doesn't matter. Fortunately, it's okay. You can just sit." 

After a short while, the Hua Yidao people wondered: "... is not right?" 
Aside from the humanity: "What is wrong?" 

The Hua Yi Dao smashed the blood of the forehead, as if blinking his eyes, 
saying: "It’s amazing and weird. I look at this person, sometimes it’s 
sneaky, sometimes it’s full of light, sometimes it’s faint... It’s amazing. 


Also weird." 


"Hey? How can this be. Do you can't do it? Don't let us come." 


"Yeah, how could it be so weird?" 


The Hua Yidao people angered: "What? I can't? I can't do it?! I have been 
mixing for so many years, I haven't seen it for a few times!" 


Thank you for your pity, and shook your head and said: "Would you like to 
see where the ghost is the most yin and heaviest?" 


The eyes opened and I slammed my forehead, and for a moment, I was 
sure to say: "Lip!" 


Sted ue hercheaeteste " 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 135: My view 
of the Buddha is absolutely over 


"Yes, it's the lips!" 


The eyes of the sky openly swear by this, and all the sorrows feel very 
strange: "Why is it the lips?" 


"Why is there a single lip that is a ghost? Is it a liporrhea?" 
Thanks for the subconsciousness, he slammed his mouth. 


I never thought that the thousand lights would kiss and kiss for a night, 
and the flower city touched the breath of him, and it has not faded yet! 


He looked at him in the sky: "Hey, look, he is guilty!" 


Xie pity immediately put his hand down, forcibly restrained and turned to 
see the flower city to hear the impulse of this sentence, although the 
flower city now with a bandage, can not see what look. He gently said: 
"Hey, this friend, you misunderstood, in fact, because my life is more 
difficult, more useful, such as this jar." 


He raised his pottery in his hand and said sincerely: "Although I use it to 
pretend ghosts, in general, I use it to pickle pickles. The pickles that are 
marinated in this jar have a unique flavor and will naturally eat... ...J don't 
believe you can try it yourself." 


... In theory, this is not impossible. The public martyrdom will be 
suspicious, and the villagers will pout: "Ah? Xie Daochang, 1s it that the 
pickles that you gave us before are also marinated like this?" 


"Then we ate it, is it also a ghost?" 


On weekdays, the villagers offered some fruits and vegetables. Thanks for 
giving back a little pickled pickles, and quickly raised their hands: "Don't 


worry, the jars for everyone are separate!" 


The sky is angry and said: "You are sick! You are not afraid of reducing 
the life of this kind of thing? Do not talk nonsense, you still hide people in 
your view, more than one! Let go!" 


This time, he was afraid that he would be stopped by the village chief, and 
the voice would not go down and then rushed forward. Thanks for the bad 
mood, he quickly retired into the house, grabbed the right to faint on the 
ground, and glared at his collar, rushing to his ear: "Qiying! Listen well! I 
want to feed again. You eat Yu Jie Bing Qing Wan!" 


Hearing the words, Quan Yizhen’s eyes are stunned. At the same time, the 
sky that had just rushed in screamed and screamed out of his forehead and 
said, "Don't go in! There is an ambush!" 


The public martyrdom did not dare to act rashly, and surrounded him to 
protect him: "God eyes, what do you see?" 


The eye opened: "I didn't see anything, I saw a big white light!" 
"Oh, my brother is gone, your eyes are smoking!" 


The sky was open, and sure enough, the red mark on his forehead turned 
into a black mark, and a white smoke appeared as if the candle had been 
blown out. He was shocked: "This... this!" 


Lingwen put down a slow slash and took half a gimmick, saying: "What’s 
wrong with the outside?" 


A humane: "You see, there are two children and a woman in the view, plus 
this Taoist. Which of these four people is ‘he’?” 


The eyes open and make a forehead, but they can't open their eyes. The 
white light he saw was a true aura of power. When a priest felt that he was 
about to encounter great danger and the challenge of life, the aura that was 
covered in the body would instinctively explode several times. Thanks for 
the glare of the blast, which flashed the eyes of the man. It is not that he 


has been ruined for decades, but he should not be able to open his eyes 
again within a few days. Then she politely picked up the plate with the 
meatballs, and Quan Yi was completely awake. She grabbed the hand of 
Xie Pity and muttered: "I don't eat." 


Xie pity took his hand and said: "Don't be afraid, not for you!" 


A group of mage, surrounded by Bodhisattva, exchanged a circle of eyes, 
and they were mixed for a while, and they rushed up. However, thanks to 
the lack of welcome, they were bounced off by an invisible barrier. There 
was a deep voice coming from all over the sky: "You old-fashioned monk- 
like singer-like priests, but also entangled in addiction? Dare to catch up 
here, live impatient!" 


"Flowers, flowers, flowers..." 


"Flower" a few, and finally the eyes open or succumb to its prestige, did 
not dare to call his name, sturdy, "... flower city master! You, you scare 
people. We all know, Tongluoshan want Open, you have to seal your own 
mana in order not to be affected. At the moment, you can’t be as arrogant 
as you used to be! Bundle, bunch, and hand it..." 


Although he said that he had no more enthusiasm, but thanked him for 
feeling, Huacheng was very angry now. He immediately rushed into the 
house and hugged him. He whispered: "Don't say it! Don't waste your 
mana, save strength. Just give it to me!" 


Huacheng’s body was slightly stiff at first, and after he was picked up, it 
seemed to fade away. Shen Sheng said: “Good.” 


Thanks for holding him, I feel that the age of Huacheng seems to have 
become even younger. Now it is probably only as big as a child of twelve 
or three years old, and I can’t help but feel a little worried. He held the 
flower city in one hand and took the heart with one hand. He walked out 
and said, "You have never thought that the green ghost is cheating you?" 


Who knows, the words, the public voice is a strange face. Heavenly eyes 
openly wonder: "The green ghost is sad? What did he lie to us? Why did 


he lie to us?" 
Thanks for the slightest brow, said: "Don't you tell him here?" 


The eyes opened up and said: "Who are we who we are? We also need a 
‘fierce’ to ventilate the letter? Will we be in the same situation?" 


Not sad? How did the news flow out? 


He had no time to think about it. The group of martyrdoms had already 
been attacked. Thanks to a sword and seven or eight swords and five or six 
staffs, he said: "Amitabha, why should the Taoist friends protect this 
enchanting?" 


Thanks for your indifference, said: "Master, no matter what, the danger of 
taking people is not good." 


Heavenly eyes open: "He is a ghost, not a man! You are a young, stubborn, 
do you want to be so sinful and false?" 


The staff, the sword, and the sword came together. If you use your heart, it 
will inevitably hurt the mortal. Morally speaking, mortals can fight the 
priests, but the priests can't beat mortals, because they want to be tolerant, 
generous, compassionate, caring for all beings, and can't care for mortals. 
If you dare to fight mortals, you must remember the merits, and thank you 
for not having the right. Unrestrained and arrogant, there was not much 
merit in the original, and then the deduction was negative, and the kendo 
was received: "If evil comes over! Qiying, optimistic about the spirit!" 


If the man was **** with a man, he was often aggrieved. When he tied the 
woman, he was another face. Xie pity shouted two times before he 
reluctantly took off from the spirit. The next moment, a white lightning 
smashed through dozens of wrists, and the hand was a little unstable, and 
could not hold the weapon. He said: "What is this instrument?" 


"Is this a device? I looked like how it was like a white crane for hanging 
up. It was very evil..." 


"Can't see, this kid has two brushes!" 


Unexpectedly, on the occasion of the pity and the group of masters, the 
spirit shook his head, swayed the clothes, and stood up, saying: "Thank 
you for your hospitality, my lord." 


Thanks for the slightest sigh, said: "Ling, the day is coming! Where are 
you going? Do you want to destroy the promise?" 


Lingwen said: "Yes. I am going to destroy the promise." 


She said that she is justified, as if to say, "I am going to do the heavens." 
Speaking, said: "It’s not sad to let the message flow out. It’s you." 


Lingwen smiled and said: "I am not a martial artist, but I am bound by 
Ruo, but I can do a lot of things with only psychic." 


really! However, how did the spirit learn that this bandage boy is a flower 
city? She and Lang Ying did not even say a few words, met several times, 
thank you for not being so aware of her! 


Seeing her hand-in-hand preparation to leave the hall, she couldn’t take it 
out, saying: "Qiying, can't let her go!" 


Although I had just eaten a jade Jiebing Pill, but Quan Yizhen has now 
climbed up and recovered her vitality. What's more, the Lingwen is a **** 
of the gods, and there is no power to bind the chicken. It is more than 
enough for a finger to stop her. Listening to the right is a far cry: "Good!" 
Thanks to the peace of mind to go to the battle group. After a while, 
suddenly a loud noise, the roof of the Bodhisattva was broken, and a 
silhouette flew high. 


Thanks for turning back, I was shocked, and said to the house: "Qiying, 
can't play like this!" 


Wu Shen was so thrown and thrown nothing, Wu Shen was originally 
playing big. But then how to say that the spirit is also a goddess official, is 
still a god, the power of a really rude play, have to give up alive! 


Who knows, a figure slowly walked out of the house and said: "Bai Jin, 
can't play like this." 


The voice was clear and cold, and it was clearly spiritual. But when she 
came out, she thanked her for her illusion. The man who came out of the 
house was not a spiritual, but a very tall young man. However, looking at 
it again, it is still a thin figure. 


The spirit is a literary god, and it is true. In the past, if she was 
deliberately concealing her strength, she would definitely not be thankful. 
Why did she suddenly get the power to go to heaven? ? ? 


Huacheng Shen Sheng: "My brother is careful, she put the dress on." 


really! On the surface, the spirit is still black, but a layer of black gas is 
covering her, making the whole child seem to have become a person, 
murderous, mad, her face is extremely calm. Formed a strange contrast. 
Xie pity tempted a sword to stab, the spirit of the sleeves opened, just right 
to really fall from the sky, slammed into the ground to see this sly, when 
the two eyes shine, said: "Good!" 


Xie pity also shines, said: "Good!" 


The trick of Fang Cai Ling Wen is really beautiful. No, it should be said 
that it is the trick that Jin Yixian helps the spirit to block! 


That Jin Yixian is in other people, either lost his mind, or **** blood, 
wears it on the spirit, but it is invulnerable, but also actively attack, and 
instantly called a literary **** to fly the Western Valkyrie. I have never 
heard of the magical effect of Jin Yixian in the past. Who can expect that 
this robes are cut off by her head and limbs, but can still be used for her? 


This time, let alone the villagers of the Bodhisattva village, that is, all the 
martyrdom is also shocked. The eyes opened: "What is good? Was it 
beaten? Is there still a normal person in this view? I don't think they are all 
humans!" 


The right is really eager to try, jumped from the ground and attacked 
again. Lingwen whispered: "I said, don't stay too much!" 


Her words were told to Jin Yixian, but the body did not listen to her words, 
and she took the right fist with a fist and smashed it. Demolition and 
demolition, while splitting and playing, the wind is arrogant, and the old 
wall is swaying, and the glory of the glory 1s the potential of soaring, and 
the right is actually hidden in the wind. Thank you for your pity: "That... 
Excuse me, can you stand a little farther and stand a little farther!" 


The voice did not fall, and a lot of martyrdom was copied. The forty and 
fifty handles, swords, swords, hammers, and sticks came over, thanking 
the pity for change, and said: "Wait, don't ah!!!" 


In this sorrow, I suffered from countless ravages and remained strong. The 
long-lasting view of the Bodhisattva finally collapsed completely and 
completely. 


Xie pity was sluggish for a moment, full of desolateness: "Sure enough, 
each of my houses is quite no more than half a year. This really requires a 
donation for repairing the house..." 


Huacheng Road: "My brother doesn't have to be upset, the house is there, 
and some are." 


Thanks for the courage, but seeing the sky, opening his forehead, 
stumbling and blocking, and pointing to him: "You are a young boy who 
makes the little tricks, dare to kill me! Who is your master? How many 
years have you been in? What is the **** of the road?!" 


Thanks and pity, he suddenly turned back, and suddenly there was a sigh of 
brilliance in the eyebrows. He said: "Who are you asking me? Listening 


well!--I am the noble Prince, your violent people| | All of them are 
for me!" 


The sound was like a clear sky, and some people on the spot almost 
slammed him. They were pulled back by the companion: "What are you 
doing? Really?" 


"Odd, weird, unconsciously..." 
Thank you for your pity: 


"I, more than eight hundred years old, more than everyone in your place, 
the bridge is more than you go!" 


"I, the temple and the temple, all over the place, believers and pilgrims, all 
over the world, do not know my name, you are ignorant! 


"I don't worship God. 
"I am God!" 


Everyone listened to this magnificent, shameless section, all stunned, and 
unconsciously opened his mouth: "...ah???" 


Thanks for the pity, the wait is this moment, the plate in the hand flies, 
dozens of white raw meat **** smashed in the wind and the bells of the 
iron ball, scattered in all directions, accurately into a row of people In the 
mouth of Da Zhang, I lost my sweat and said: "Please forget what I said, in 
fact, I am just a broken one!" 


The face that has been eaten into the meatball has changed greatly: "Ah! 
Medium and middle strokes!" 


There were a few special-handed swords that intercepted the meatballs and 
lifted the sword to the front. The meatballs were still spinning at high 
speed, and the sword was rubbed with fierce sparks. Everyone couldn’t 
help but stunned: "This... what 1s this hidden weapon?!?! Hard and 
incomparable, the gloss 1s different, is it the legend..." 


Thanks for your pity: "Yes! This is the legendary Yujie Bingqing Pills. It is 
extremely poisonous. If you can't drink enough in a day, drink 989 cups of 
hydrolyzed poison and explode in the belly!" 


Although I have never heard of this name, everyone is even more 
embarrassed: "Hey! Is it really so poisonous?" 


"In short, drink water first! Anyway, detoxification is just drinking water! 
Go! Go find water!" 


Immediately rushed away like a dozen strokes. On the other hand, the 
spirit of the more and more fierce, actually put his hands on the neck with 
his hands and right. Although he has the upper hand, the look of the spirit 
is not very good-looking, and he sighs low: "Bai Jin! Do you want to kill 
him? Don't fight, hurry!" 


It happened that Xie had a ball left, and when Lingwen said the word "go", 
he quickly threw the ball into her mouth. 


At a glance, the luster in the pair of pupils of the spirit disappeared, as if 
the thing she swallowed had been sucked away, and the blackness of the 
body suddenly faded. 


Her face looked strong and vomiting, and looked forward to thanking her, 
her lips silently moving for a moment, forbearing for a while, throwing the 
right to the ground, and helping out. 


The right to jump up and go by her. Xie Fu originally wanted to keep up, 
but the group of martyrdom stopped in front of him and said: "Everyone 
insists, and there are reinforcements coming soon!" 


Again? Pu'er Village can't stay, let's leave and say. Quan Yizhen chased the 
spirit, and after a while he ran away. Thanks to pity a flower city into his 
arms, said: "Hold me!" A little foot, crossed the crowd, strode away. 


Huacheng really insisted on him. I don't know why, this scene makes the 
cheating faintly familiar, but there is no time to give him a vague memory, 
this matter must be notified immediately. Xie pity did not think about it 
and sent a psychic: "There is something wrong with the spirit! I..." 


Lingwen: "...[ know." 
Thanks for your pity: "...have disturbed." 


Speaking, the spirit side took the lead in cutting off the psychic. 


Cherish is also speechless. In the past, he was directly connected to the 
spirit, and now he had an accident in the spirit. He did not react to it for a 
while, but he still told her to tell him, and he could not laugh. Thanks to 
pity into the psychic array, while holding the Huacheng all the way 
rushing, while drinking: "You! Trouble all the court to inform, the spirits 
dressed in Jinyi Xian ran!!!" 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 136: My view 
of the Bodhisattva is absolutely 2 


Who knows, no one in the psychic array is listening to him. It seems that 
something went wrong, and all the priests are noisy. Thank you for hearing 
the wind and saying: "His Royal Highness? What did you say? This is 
messy now..." 


Xie pity raised his voice and said: "Fengxin! I said that the spirit is the 
person who made the Jinyixian by hand. She ran in the Jinyixian, be 
careful of her!" 


Fengxin: "What?! Is there such a thing?!" 


Xie pity still needs to be elaborated, but the ears are noisy but suddenly 
stop and stop, nothing can be heard. He groaned and said: "You? Are you 
still there?" 


Shouted a few times, but no one answered. Huacheng Road: "It's useless. 
The psychic squad in Heaven is built by the spirits. Only then will she 
break up the whole line and rebuild it." 


Thanks for the band: "How can this be good?" He usually contacted 
Heaven, not through the spiritual circle, or through the spirit, followed by 
the wind division. He did not know the passwords of the rest of the priests. 
At the moment, the spirit and the wind master must have no hope, and the 
battle is also ruined. How is it good? 


Huacheng seems to see his worries and said: "Don't worry, my brother has 
not already made the most crucial thing clear? The gods in the heavens are 
not all rice barrels. Junwu is also in Xianjing recently. It is." 


Thanks for thinking too, nodded. He ran wildly and turned over several 
hills. He had already opened the group of wizards far away, but Jin Yixian 
and Quan Yizheng could not catch up. Huacheng said again: "If my brother 
still wants to trace the things of Jinyixian, it is necessary to catch up now." 


Xie pity shook his head and said: "Before that, Qi Ying has gone to chase 
the spirit, and of course we have more important things at the moment. 
Saburo." He stared at the flower city in his arms, said, "Your look... ... it 
seems to have changed again." 


Before the flower city was dressed as Lang Ying, it was still a fifteen or 
six-year-old boy. She was not good at holding it, even if she was holding 
it, it would not look good. But now, the size of Huacheng has shrunk again. 
It seems to be at most eleven or two years old. Thanks to the one hand, he 
can hold one hand and let him sit on his arm. However, the young child 
was young, and the gas field of Huacheng was not changed. He said: "No 
problem. Brother does not have to worry, the day of the mountain is 
approaching, and the transformation 1s just a matter of expediency. After 
this, I will return. It is." 


As he spoke, he solved the bandage on his face. On the white face, a pair 
of black and deep eyes looked at the pity, and the shadows of the 
handsome young boy could be seen in the eyebrows. It is a childish face, 
but the look is as usual. 


Xie pity stared at him, did not speak. 


Huacheng slightly brows his eyebrows and said: "His Royal Highness, 
you..." 


Xie pity suddenly extended the other hand and pinched his cheek. 


Unable to prevent it, Huacheng’s face was pinched by him, and his eyes 
widened. “... Brother!” 


Thanks and laughed: "Ha ha ha ha ha ha ... sorry, Saburo, you are so cute, I 
really can't help it, hahahaha..." 


Thankful and tenderly pinching him, he gently said: "That, Saburo, will 


you continue to change? Will it become five or six years old? Even 
become a baby?" 


Listening to his seemingly anticipating tone, Huacheng said helplessly: "I 
am afraid that my brother will be disappointed." 


Thank you for your pity, and he said, "No, Sanro will never let me down. I 
have a chance to protect you. I am really happy." 


Huacheng whispered: "I am not happy." 
Thanks: "Why?" 
Huacheng’s voice was very cold, saying: “I... hate this look!” 


Xie Li actually really heard a hint of hatred from his tone, could not help 
but stunned. Huacheng hanged his head and said: "I don't want you to see 
my useless look, and I don't even want you to protect me!" 


I don't know if it 1s because the flower city is getting younger, and the 
mood seems to have a bit of a wave. Thanks for the slightest movement, 
he quickly plunged him into his arms and patted him on the back. He 
smiled and said: "That's what you said, I have seen you many times in a 
mess. I don't want to live. And you are not really useless now, just 
temporarily save your strength." 


'..."" Huacheng buried his face on his shoulder, sulking, "Not the same. 
Your Highness, I must be the strongest. I want to make myself stronger 
than everyone else. Only then, I can..." 


His voice at this moment is immature, but with a hint of tiredness. Thanks 
to pity: "You are the strongest. But you don't need to be like this all the 
time. Just... occasionally give me a face, let me protect you once? Please, 
okay?" 


For a long time, Huacheng raised his head from his arms, put his hands on 
the shoulders of Xie, looked at him, and said: "His Royal Highness, wait 
for me." 


Thank you, "Okay, I am waiting for you." 


Huacheng seriously guarantees: "Give me some time, I will be back soon." 


Xie pity smiled and said: "Don't worry, take your time." 
The next day, the two came to a small town. 


Xie pity took the flower city, one big and one small walking slowly on the 
street, like a casual conversation. Thanks to the pity: "Bronze Furnace 
reopened, the first generation ghost king was affected by the vibration, 
will that black water also be like this?" 


Huacheng was held by him in one hand and left behind his back. He said: 
"Yes. But we have different situations, different ways of cultivation, and 
different methods of stress." 


Thanks for the pity: "For example? How 1s he stressed?" 
Huacheng Road: "Maybe, hibernate." 


There are eight big characters suddenly appearing in the mind: "If you are 
hungry, you will eat. If you eat, you will sleep." 


Huacheng Road: "When Blackwater is a man, he has been imprisoned, and 
he has been in prison for three days. Even if he is given a drowning, he 
will eat it. He will starve the stomach, sometimes gluttony, and sometimes 
anorexia." 


Thanks to the thoughtfulness, said: "No wonder he swallowed things so 
powerful." 


In fact, according to the situation of He Xuan, you can focus on 
swallowing the hungry ghost, because he has this attribute, the starving 
ghost should be more appetizing. However, among the more than 500 
famous ghosts swallowed by the black water mysterious ghosts, the water 
ghosts accounted for the vast majority. I wanted to come to him to 
remember the face of the teacher who had no cross, and to break the water 
law, intentionally. And swallow too much, you need to sleep and digest 
after a while. Huacheng Road: "Yes. By the way, it is meant to imitate 
him." 


Forgive me for a moment, my heart said: "How can you eat and eat 
ghosts?" After thinking about it, he said, "Is that hanging up the corpse, is 
it intended to imitate you?" 


Huacheng Road: "Positive solution. Because he also wants the scene of 
blood and rain, but I don't know how I did it, so I simply hang a row of 
dead people in the sky." 


To this day, Xie Li has fully understood why it is hard to say anything 
about it. The form is done, but the taste is still low. He sighed and thought: 
"Muzi was taken away by grace. I don't know if he will be eaten by him or 
he will be lost. The wind division... I don't know if it was taken by 
Blackwater. I hope they are safe. It’s good.” Again: “Don’t you be in the 
ghost city? Will someone go looking for trouble?” 


Huacheng Road: "Before I left, I had blocked the ghost market and 
released some false news of my whereabouts. Even if someone finds 
trouble and doesn't find me, it won't be too difficult for them. But there are 
bound to be many eyes staring at it." 


Huacheng can't go back to the ghost city. Xie pity can't bring him to 
heaven. If he is seen by a **** official, it will be bad, so the two talents 
wander aimlessly in the human world. 


Thanks for the slightest frown: "You put a fake message, but the spirit has 
flowed out the truth. I always can't understand why she can see you as a 
fan." 


Huacheng Road: "I don't understand another thing." 
Thanks: "What?" 


Huacheng Road: "The stupid priest ‘the eyes open,’ I played a few times 
with him, and it’s still a bit of a skill.” 


Xie pity agreed: "Well, it is true, there are still real students." 


Huacheng Road: "Well, then, why did he say that his brother has a ghost on 
his lips?" 


The hand of thankfulness tightened up at once, remembering that this hand 
still held the flower city and relaxed. Huacheng Shen Sheng: "My brother 
should not fool me with the words of the fools, tell me what I did to you 
that night." 


Thanks to the heart: "Probably, it is not what you did to me, but what I did 
to you..." 


Suddenly, his eyes lit up and said: "Wait, Saburo, look over there." 
Huacheng Road: "Brother?" 


Xie Li has already led him into a very luxurious and lavish shop on the 
roadside. The boss at the shopkeeper looked at the strange combination of 
this big one, a common one, and said: "What do you want to say?" 


Xie pity lifted the flower city and smiled: "Not me, it is him." 
Huacheng licked his head in his hands. 
After a fragrant incense, Huacheng came out from the back room. 


The original clothes of the fifteen-year-old boy of Lang Ying were not 
suitable for the current flower city, and he gave him a new one. As soon as 
she came out, her eyes would suddenly stand bright. 


A good little boy with a white skin! 


A red dress like a maple fire, a pair of deer leather boots with a silver 
chain, is handsome and sultry. He had dark hair. He had just licked a very 
thin scorpion on the right side of his cheek. He couldn't help but give him 
a left side. This is symmetrical and more playful. The most over-the-top is 


his look, shining, calm, and like a child! This contrast, simply teach 
people to open their eyes. The girls in the shop were shocked, surrounded 
by a large circle, could not help but hold their hearts and shouted. 


Huacheng slowly walked to the front of Xie pity, thanked the gentle 
applause, said: "Sure enough, Saburo is still the most suitable for red." 


Huacheng reluctantly pulled the little scorpion on the left and said: "My 
brother is happy." 


Thanks for the hand and took him, smiled and went to the store, ready to 
check out. Huacheng is not cheap, and there is no pocket money on 
weekdays, and he will not enter such a store at all, but he has saved a small 
amount of money to prepare for the house. Now, I don’t need to fix it, and 
I don’t want to take care of anything else. I first bought clothes for 
Huacheng. Just as he slowly counted a piece of copper plate and a piece of 
broken silver, the flower city squeezed in front of him, and he slammed a 
piece of gold foil in front of the shopkeeper. 


Thanks: "..." 


Girls: "..." 
Huacheng Road: "Don't look for it. Brother, let's go." 


He pulled the clothes corner of Lache, and took the lead to leave the store. 
He smiled and smiled. He took a few steps. Suddenly, Huacheng retreated 
back and slammed into his arms. Xie pity supported his shoulder and said: 
"What?" He looked up and saw a figure in the crowd on the street. Just at 
this time, the boss said: "Do you want to buy something?" 


Xie pity and hands up: "Yes. Trouble to get that dress down for me!" 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 137: Barren 
Mountain Ridge, Black Heart Shop 


The boss stunned: "Ah? That? You didn't make a mistake?" 
Xie pity definitely said: "Yes, that is that!" 


When I finished speaking, I rushed to grab the dress and took the flower 
city and rushed to the back of the clothing house and got into the curtain. 
This clothing store 1s very bold, and the idea is novel. There is a small 
compartment in the store for dressing. People who buy clothes can try it 
on the spot. Everyone was ashamed, and he was stunned. At the entrance 
of Yizhuang, he passed by a Huayidao. He walked and muttered his 
forehead. He followed a large group of fierce, strange-shaped monks and 
priests. Seeing many people in this clothing village, they were dissatisfied: 
"See what?!" 


"Hey, don't worry, let's go, I want to go to the cottage again!" 


"Slow, Tiantian brother, there are many people here, it is better to ask if 
they have seen it." 


"Dear women, have you seen a priest in white clothes, with a child with a 
bandage on his face, passing by?" 


Everyone did not speak, but some people could not help but look at the 
back room of Yizhuang. The public voice is now vigilant, compared to a 
"past look" gesture. The eye-opening stepped forward and held his breath, 
slowly approaching the curtain. After a while, slammed open and 
screamed. 


I saw a woman sitting behind the curtain. The black long hair pulled a 
loose bun, the neck was long and white, surrounded by a black collar with 
a finger width, and a very thin silver chain. The clothes faded a little. The 
white shoulders and the small half of the vests are all smashed | exposed, 
wanting to fall, teach people to blush. 


After the curtain was pulled open, the woman's body trembled, covering 
her face with her sleeves, and screaming, seemed to be scared by such a 
terrible act. The eyes opened and slammed down the curtain, saying: "The 
right pair is right!" 


With the eyes open, a monk of the monk also yelled, saying: "Sin has been 
sin!" have caught their eyes. With this opportunity, the "woman" turned 
around, not who pity and who? Huacheng was sitting in his arms, but he 
was blocked by his figure. Although the pity 1s a man, the shoulder is 
wider than the ordinary woman, but he only pulled down half of the 
clothes, the exposed place 1s just right, the effect 1s quite good. Xie pity a 
handful of flowers in the city, a portable skirt, through the screaming 
group of gangsters, hurriedly ran away. The owner of the Yizhuang and the 
girls all looked at it. Seeing him escape, the boss wanted to reach out and 
stop, opened his mouth, looked down at the piece of gold foil, and bought 
two more than enough, shrugged, no matter what. 


Thanks for holding the flower city all the way, rushing away. In the blur of 
the pedestrians, only a "woman" was seen flying with a small child. For 
example, the cheetah is generally strong and vigorous, causing the dust to 
fly in the sky, and it is incredible to cough. The roadside stall selling 
snacks with a pot of ash, screamed: "You have made a mistake!" 


Thank you for taking the time to go back and apologize: "I got it wrong! 


Sorry! Sorry!" At this time, I heard the screaming behind me: "Stand up 
-!!t" 


Looking back, it was the group of people who rushed out of Yizhuang. 
Thank you for your pity: "I really don't know what people who are yelling 
at the back of this time are thinking about it. I want to know that the 
person who is being yelled won't stand. It's better to concentrate and 
concentrate on running!" It’s faster to bury your head. Such a vast group of 
people rushed through, the sky was dusty, and the snacks that sold the 
snacks could not be found, and they were so angry that they fell into a pot: 
"Mom still makes people do business!" 


After chasing two hours, sure enough, the monks who chased and shouted 
shouted and sighed, and the slower they ran. Thanks to the rich experience 


of escape, the perseverance was unsatisfactory. After insisting on the end, 
the chasing troops were all smashed, and then they put down the flower 
city and stood on the side of the road and gasped. Huacheng supported his 
shoulders and said: "Don't inhale too much, beware of injuries." 


Xie pity looked up and saw Huacheng slightly squinting, but still a 
childish face, could not help but laugh out loud: "haha, hahahaha... oh!" 


Suddenly, the ribs burst into pain, and I caught my chest. I saw the face of 
the flower city changing slightly, and I waved my hand: "I don't get in the 
way... Hey, is there a hotel inn?" 


Really, not far ahead, in the blue secluded night, there is a hotel that is 
revealing warm yellow light, seems to be guiding the passers-by. Thanks 
for the straightness, he said, "Let's go in and rest." 


Huacheng Road: "Good." 


At the moment, Xie pity took him, and he walked away with a deep foot. 
Before arriving at the store, Xie Pui discovered that this inn was on the 
second floor and was much more spacious than the distance. The door was 
closed. Thanks for raising his hand and tapping it gently. "Well, is anyone 
there?" 


After a while, someone shouted inside: "Come on!" 


Speaking, the door opened, and a few guys smiled and greeted them. "This 
guest..." 


I want to call the guest officer, but 1t seems that the person is wearing a 
women's dress, tampering with the mouth: "This aunt..." 


Not yet exported, the flower city that Xie Pity took was slowly coming out 
from the darkness. With the child, it seems that the girl who is not married 
does change her mouth: "This husband..." 


The "man" of "Mrs." is still in his mouth, and the face of thankfulness is 
also illuminated by the yellow light in the store. Although this person is 


dressed in women's clothing, his eyebrows are gentle, but according to his 
conscience, this face looks more like a man. A few buddies were dumb, 
half-hearted, or honestly called back to the beginning of the title: "This 
guest officer, please inside." 


Thank you for your smile. Now, he is very skilled in wearing any clothes. 
He has no mental or physical discomfort. He took the flower city and 
entered the very low threshold. He took a position at the corner of the 
lobby and sat down. In addition to a few buddies in the inn, there was no 
one. When they arrived, all the buddies immediately closed the door and 
surrounded them. They were full of smiles. Instead, they were smiles and 
made them feel uncomfortable. 


He took the menu and said: "It's not easy to find an inn in the wilderness." 
y 


The buddy also said: "Isn't it? In the wilderness, it is not easy to have a 
guest, it is not easy!" 


I don't know why, although they are laughing, but the smile seems to be 
painted, it is very false. Thanks for the quietness, turned over the 
vegetable brand, ordered a few dishes, and the guys laughed and went to 
the kitchen to make people. 


Huacheng played with chopsticks and said: "Brother, I entered the black 
shop where the devil and the ghosts opened." 


Thanks: "Well." 


If it is not eccentric, this kind of wilderness ridge, there is a small inn on 
the first floor, one or two buddies are very bad, how can there be so many 
buddies, such a wide store? 


Of course, this is not a strong proof. The main reason is that because of the 
pity, when he entered the store, he smelled a thick, fresh **** smell. 


This **** smell, the average person may not be aware of it, but for the 
five sensitive and experienced thankfulness, it has become so thick that it 


cannot be ignored. Thanks to the pity: "There are people on the second 
floor who heard the footsteps and didn't know if they were also travelers." 


If it is, it must be saved. The two sat opposite each other and whispered for 
a long time. The guys finally got on the food and said, "Come on!" 


Xie pity was about to talk, but caught a trace of movement from outside, 
immediately got up and said: "The store, we have to enter the house to 
rest, trouble you to bring the dishes upstairs." 


"Okay good!" 


Xie pity took the flower city with one hand, and put the skirt upstairs with 
one hand, and turned back: "Oh yes, if anyone asks if I have seen us, I am 
tired of saying that I have not seen it." 


"Okay good!" 


Xie pity quickly went upstairs. Shortly after going up, I heard someone 
knocking at the door and shouting: "Open the door and open the door!" 


The guys opened the door with a smile. As soon as you enter, it’s the eyes 
of the monks who are chasing the monks! 


Xie Li and Huacheng had already entered the second floor room and 
closed the door with their backhands. When someone heard the next 
person enter the inn, they shouted: "The huts of the cottages!" ran over, 
and some people said: "Boss! Is there water!" 


Seeing so many people at once, the guys are happy to say: "Some, you 
wait, come!" 


Tianyan opened the way: "Hey, I am dying! I have this reason, then what 
“Yujie Bingqing Pills’ is really poisonous in the human world. I only drank 
20 cups, when can I drink 981 cups?” 


Xie Li did not expect that these monks and priests were so sincere and let 
them drink 981 cups. They really planned to drink nine hundred and 
eighty-one. A monk replied: "Amitabha, who has already drunk twenty- 
five cups, has to say that antidote is still very useful. Barrenness now feels 
much better." 


Hearing words, thanking the pity and laughing, looking around to find out 
where there are seams and holes to peek. I saw that Huacheng was on the 
side of the ground and said: "Brother, look here." 


Xie pity also fell down and looked at the place he pointed out. There was 
no trace of it. "What happened here?" 


Huacheng suddenly poked a finger, and the hard ground smashed a small 
hole, revealing a trace of yellow light. He said: "Here, you can see." 


Thanks to pity down, through the hole, spy on the bottom. The people sat 
down around the long table in the middle of the lobby, and they opened the 
table with their eyes open: "Hey! This is our intention. The next time I see 
the evil spirits, I will never give him another chance. It is necessary to 
take the flowers, flowers, and flowers to take the place for the heavens!" 


Thanks for your quiet voice: "Sanlang, how did you offend them?" 


Huacheng has not answered yet. Someone has already thanked and asked: 
"Yes, I haven't asked, how come you can catch the ghost king? But what is 
the festival with him?" 


So everyone started the critical exchange meeting: 


"It’s really hateful! Twenty years ago, there was a village with a pig. It was 
mad, and the house of the owner’s house was arched. The house collapsed 
and the whole family died. The pig fled to the ghost city, I When I first 
entered the business, I went to get it, but I was beaten by a group of ghosts. 
It was a shame and shame. He also sent his men to tell me what there is no 
reason why you can eat the whole family of pigs. Pigs can’t take revenge 


to kill your family. It’s your luck. It’s your job to report it. You talk about 
it, how can there be such a reason in the world!” 


"So smart, the situation is similar, but it is because of a chicken|fine." 


"It's very simple, because the sect of the faction is the name he wants to 
fight, so how much we build to see how much he burns is really mad! It's 
too unreasonable." 


"There is still. My brothers, you know, the talents of the heavens, the 
future is boundless! There is a small problem, the woman is like a life. 


More than a decade ago, a__| children ghost cited | lured my brother, put 
him Lively sucked into people, flowers, flowers, and the ghost king 
actually sheltered her." 


The next batch was hot, but the flower city above was a boring look, and 
even a mocking smile was not interested. At this time, the eyes opened: 
"You brothers I seem to have heard, is it in the name of the practice of the 
early years, the fans | raped a few married women, closed the three months 
was released?" 


"Cough and cough!" 


At this moment, the guys sent the dishes over, and everyone was busy: 
"The dishes are on the dishes, come and come, don't say anything, come to 
eat." 


Xie pity straightened up and glanced at the dishes sent by the guys on the 
table. Huacheng said: "You don't have to look. The entrance is down." 


Thanks and whispered: "This is troublesome." 


Although these monks and priests are entangled and annoying, they can't 
be told to plant them in this strange black shop, but they are not good 
enough to remind them. At this time, the eyes opened: "And slow!" 


He stared at the dishes and stopped the others, his eyes sharp. Thank you 
for your kindness: "Sure enough, there are some ways!" 


Everyone said: "What happened to the **** of heaven?" 


The eye opened a finger, wiped the edge of the plate, lifted the finger high, 
and said: "I wiped it with one finger, so much oil! The dishes are not 
washed, how do you do business?" !" 


Xie Li thought that he was aware of what was there, but he did not expect 
it to be another clue. Although the whisper is speechless, the result is the 
same. As soon as he said, everyone said: "Oh, really, this stuff is slimy, 
saliva... and so on! There is hair in this dish!" 


Someone stretched out the chopsticks and stirred up a few stirs. Suddenly, 
he stirred up a few black hairs and said: "My mother, what's going on in 
your kitchen, who is inside?" 


The buddy smiled and said: "This... recently slaughtered a few pigs, maybe 
pigs!" 


However, the chopsticks sandwiched the black hairs, and the longer they 
were pulled, the longer they pulled, the more they said: "Is there such a 
long pig hair? Are your bosses washing their hair in the kitchen?" 


"Do not withdraw and redo!" 


The buddy is busy: "Yes, yes, we will redo it immediately, redo it right 
away, and the uncles drink water and drink water." 


Thanks to pity: "Don't drink water, it must have been put in the water!" 


But the buddy hasn’t gone down yet. When everyone is on the water, the 
eyes open and say: “Come back!” 


The guy came back again and lost his smile: "What else does the Taoist 
command?" 


The eyes opened: "I asked you, have you seen a woman with a child who 
looks strange?" 


He really asked. Thank you for your pity: "Fortunately, don't tell him in 
advance." Who knows, just thinking about it, just listen to the guy and 
think without thinking: "Oh, yes!" 


Thankfulness: "???" 


Everyone was shocked, put down the water, and lowered the door, saying: 
"Where?" 


The buddy also lowered the voice and said: "It's upstairs!" 


Everyone was on the alert, and his eyes brushed up. Xie pity eyes quickly 
blocked the black hole that Huacheng pointed out. Speaking, I only heard 
about Soso for a while. It seems that a group of people came upstairs. 
Thanks to the door and listened to the footsteps, the buddy took the group 
of people and sneaked over. He held the flower city in his left hand and the 
sword in his right hand. If he was guarded by his side, he was fully armed 
and was preparing for the 120,000-point, but he heard the footsteps 
passing by his door and went to the depths of the corridor. Strange, I got to 
the door, through the door, and looked out, the group actually crossed the 
room and was blocked at the door of another room. 


There seemed to be someone in the room, with a slight light on the paper 
window, reflecting the black silhouette of a woman sitting at the table. 2k 
novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 138: Barren 
Mountain Ridge, Black Heart Shop 2 


Unexpectedly, it turned out that the buddy actually kept the promise, and 
really did not give them, and said others. 


It seems that in addition to them, there is a "strange woman" who, with a 
child, has stayed at this inn. 


The eyes opened and others looked at each other, and the gesture was 
uneven. It was waiting for the door, and suddenly the lights in the house 
disappeared and the silhouette disappeared. Then there was a rush of fast 
and fast footsteps. A girl yanked open the door and shouted: "A group of 
stinky men in the middle of the night gather in front of the old lady to do 
something? Your grandma, I want to take a shower. Now, what are you 
doing here? Ah?!" 


This woman is awkward and looks good. Although the momentum is like a 
cockfighting, it is indeed a woman. She took a sip, and she said, "I am still 
a monk. Are you not a monk? Net?!" 


Several monks yelled: "Misunderstanding, misunderstanding a..." 


The girl Liu Mei was upside down and raised her hand to fight: "I am a 
misunderstanding or a meeting, and I will not go, be careful that my 
grandmother will reward you with a bath of water!" 


"Hey, how is this female donor, how is this? Don't pay attention to the 
character?" 


"Go fast and go..." 


Although the girl's face was strange, she felt that she was very familiar 
with her voice and posture. She shouted and whispered: "Lan Lan?" 


Huacheng Road: "Yes. It is her." 


Seeing everyone gone, Lancome seemed to be relieved, left to look, right 
to see, and quickly entered the house to close the door. She doesn't have a 
heavy make-up, and she looks like a person. Although her eyebrows are 
slightly more fine and pretty, she is quite old, but she is not very aware of 
her. If she was so fascinating at the Shenwu Temple on that day, the 
clarification of her sorrow would not be so powerful. Before the Bronze 
Furnace reopened the first time, the demons and ghosts of various 
localities ran a lot, including Lancome and Fetal. If the "weird woman" 
mentioned by the buddy refers to Lancome, then the child she is carrying 
is not... 


Xie pity whispered to Huacheng: "The fetus must also be with her. That 
thing is too dangerous to let them run like this." 


However, this inn itself is a black shop, and a group of human masters 
from the flower-by-city city are annoying here. How easy 1s it to catch 
them in this situation? 


The group of martyrdoms went to the stairs, and the buddy said, "How? 
Isn't the person you are looking for?" 


The eyes opened: "No! Hey! I will ask you again, have you seen a Taoist 
with a child?" 


When the guy thought, he said, "The Taoist with children is not, but the 
Taoist who is alone is there!" 


After listening to this, everyone came back and asked, "Where?" 
The buddy also whispered: "Here." 


This time, he is referring to another room. The people once again looked at 
each other and slammed with him again. 


Who knows, this time, they just walked to the door and there were three 
feet away from the door, and suddenly heard a sharp wind breaking sound, 
a yellow feather flew out from the crack of the door, rubbing the cheeks of 
the open eyes, nailed The wall behind him. Everyone was shocked and 


went to see the sign. It was really like a steel piece. It was half inserted in 
the wall and it was not shocking. 


A few people are about to rush into the room, but they are stopped by the 
eyes, saying: "Not him! But it is also a powerful role, everyone should not 
act rashly, and have more troubles." He also handed over, "disturbing the 
superior. Misunderstanding." 


The person in the house did not answer, it is indeed quite high-profile. 
When everyone retired, some people asked: "Dear brother, why do you say 
that it is not him in the house? Is the ruinous person throwing a hidden 
weapon, isn't the general strength strong?" 


Tattered Taoist... Thanks for thinking for a while before I reacted. "The 
hidden weapon" refers to Yu Jie Bing Qing Wan, thinking: "Okay..." 


The sky is open and whispered: "Of course not. It 1s also a hidden weapon. 
The man's technique and strength in the house 1s slightly weaker than the 
broken person..." 


The voice did not fall, " " from behind them shot | come seven or 
eight yellow characters, feather arrows are generally nailed to the door, 
wall. Everyone was awkward, dare not say it again, and rushed down the 
stairs. Thanks for seeing everything, quietly open the door, pull a yellow 
charm from the wall, and take back the house. Huacheng **** licked the 
yellow charm, glanced at it, lost it in a fluttering manner, and fluttered in 
the air: "The eyes are really good." 


Outside the yellow character, the whole body was plated with a layer of 
aura, So when it was shot, it was as sharp as a blade, and it was as deep as a 
steel. 


But before, Xie pity will be able to play the general power of stainless 
steel marbles, but it is based on its own control and explosion of power, 
without any magical bonus. After all, he has lived for hundreds of years 
without a mana, and he has long been accustomed to relying on himself 
and not relying on mana. The eyes of the sky are the heights determined by 
this. 


Xie pity secretly thought: "Where is this inn gathered in a few squares? 
Why is there such a Taoist in the store? Could it be for the demon to 
descend from the demon? These are not normal and the normal is not 
found. This person is so standard. It’s impossible to find that this inn is 
weird. Anyway, let’s not let the monks and Taoists find that Saburo is here. 
If they pick it up, they will hear the Taoist people in this room, I’m afraid 
more people will chase after them. I am afraid this one is not as good as 
the dozens of them." 


The people went downstairs and returned to the lobby, sitting around the 
long table. Xie Li saw the buddy from the hole that Huacheng poked out: 
"I will go down and call the kitchen to redo, and the troubles of the lords 
will wait, hehe." 


"Wait! The water is also withdrawn. Wash your cups and bring them up." 
"Good. Oh." 


The guy smiled and went down. He should have gone to the kitchen. 
Thanks for the pity, just outside, I saw the kitchen in the inn, immediately 
holding the flower city, turned out from the window, came outside the inn, 
circled around, and smashed a few small stones on the ground in the palm 
of my hand. 


Touching the kitchen wall, Huacheng is a finger, the wall is like tofu, and 
there is a hole in the air. Xie Pity goes forward to see what kind of club the 
black shop has. 


The light in the kitchen was dim, and only a few oil lamps were lit, empty. 
But if you listen carefully, you will hear a groaning sound from a certain 
place. 


Thanks for changing a few angles, I finally found out that the sound came 
from under the stove. His line of sight was blocked by the stove, but the 
side of the stove that was built up by the bricks revealed a pair of legs. 
Obviously people are already dead, but they still have a slight sigh of 
resentment. 


At this time, a few buddies walked into the kitchen and said: "The king..." 


After the stove, a unkempt man suddenly raised his head and chewed 
something in his mouth, vaguely saying: "What?!" 


The man was full of blood, his eyes were green, and his hand was licking 
his mouth like a chicken. Although the look and shape are so terrible, I can 
still see at a glance that it is the man who Is graceful! 


He slammed the gang, and quickly sucked the hand that had not been 
finished into his mouth. After a while, he spit out a few bones and hit the 
door of the "buddy". He said: "You are in this group." The waste that came 
out! The same name as the mourning, Lao Tzu thought that the meal was 
sent over. People? Meat? Isn't the medicine for you?! How the group has 
not fallen yet?!" 


It seems that the one lying on the ground and being smashed by him 1s not 
the original owner of this place, but the other traveler who passed by. 


The guys are wronged: "The king, not our waste, it is the group of monks 
and priests who are forced to do things. For a while, they think that there is 
a plate of oil. After a while, there are hair in the dish, and they refuse to 
eat what we sent." ” 


Grace "Oh, oh, oh," licking the blood of the fingers, said: "What? Fuck! 
Laozi personally cooks the broken rice for them, so they don't let them lie 
on the ground, they should cry." Who gave them a dog face? They should 
be asked to eat the dog that my prince cousin made is not as good as a dog. 
This group of things only knows to kneel down and grateful to Laozi!" 


Thanks: "..." 
"..."" Huacheng Road, "Brother, don't care about a waste." 


"_" thank you, "Well." 


"It's all your waste, you can't wash your dishes!" 


The guys jumped up and hit him again, and they got a sigh of relief, and 
they were so angry that they smashed their sleeves, smacked a **** 
mouth, and picked up the spatula, knocking the iron pan and screaming, 
saying: Come again!!! Let's make a big dog's eyes and see what I'm doing! 
Look back at what you have to say!" 


In the heat, not long after, he really made another table and ordered the 
guys to send it. 


This table can be fragrant, and it 1s a cockroach, a vegetarian, full of oil 
and water. Thanks to the second floor guest room, looking down, the 
crowds sighed: "Good craft!" 


"Yeah! It's a good craft, especially this salt and pepper chicken feet, fat 
and tender... Is it too fat, I have never seen such a slender chicken claw?" 


Guys said: "Oh! This is the signature dish of this shop, not the general 
chicken feet, but the selection of the rare and rare white phoenix chicken 
claws, and the nails are removed. Is it like the softness of the girl, it is 
embarrassing What is your heart?" 


"It makes sense. But I like this fried pork skin most, the pig skin is tender 
and tender, the fire is just right... so how can the pig have tattoos?" 


The guys said: "Oh! It's not a tattoo, but the master of our masterpiece is 
specially engraved with a little skill in order to show his magical work." 


"This sweet and sour pork ribs does not seem to be enough time, it is 
expected to give too much, it will not be not fresh, want to cover up any 
other taste with sweet and sour taste?" 


The guys said: "Oh! Nothing, our ingredients are sold on the same day, but 
our master's taste is heavy." 


" " 


Seeing that they were full of praise, they had to eat it. Thanks for the pity, 
they couldn’t stand it anymore. They threw a small stone that was thrown 


away and knocked it out of the small hole. 


This time, hit the sky and open the cup is preparing to "drink hydrolyzed 
poison" of the hand, his arm trembled, the water in the cup poured out, 
poured aside the laughing face of the guy. 


The tea was not hot, and the buddy seemed to be poured with water. The 
face screamed loudly: "Ah!!!!" 


Now, the people at the table are all staying, and they are raising their 
swords: "What happened?!" 


The eye opened and grabbed the hand of the buddy, and opened it, and 
everyone screamed. I saw that the facial features on the face of the man 
actually melted more than half, as if a glass of water was poured on the 
white paper, the ink was smeared, and the ink traces spread along the 
cheeks and slid down. 


His facial features and smiles are all drawn with strokes! 


" " 


The public shouted nothing, and took a look at the table, which was played 
with the guys in the store. 


The group of guys were beaten and shouted: "You guys! Don't fight! That, 
what, you are looking for a strange woman with a child!!! Strange Taoist! 


He is upstairs They are upstairs! Go find them! Let me go! I am just a 
temporary worker!!!" 


"Ah! Temporary workers, who are you?" 

"Want to lie to us? Is it so easy! It is already late!" 

The man is bitter: "No lie to you! I mean it!" 

Under the pipa ping pong, I was grateful to see these wizards in a crushing 


victory, shaking their heads, no matter what, and intending to chaos to 
capture Lancome and the fetal spirit. Who knows, the door has not been 


opened, I heard a scream from the corridor, Lancome’s voice horrified: 
"No... please, I don't want to go! Please let us go! I will give you a kneel 
down. Shantou!" 


A young boy's voice angered: "Who is rare? You squat down? You are 
gone, I... How do the generals do? Mom, this time it hurts your mother and 
child! Don't talk nonsense, go back with me!" 


Hearing this voice, thanked me and shoved open the door and said, "Is it 
you?" 


On the promenade, a black boy was blocking in front of Lancome and his 
face was black. When he came out, he looked up slightly and said, "Is it 
you?!" 


Xie pity came out and said: "Wave it? How are you here?" 
Lancome saw him, widened his eyes and said: "... Prince?" 


'..."" lL waved him up and down for a moment, his mouth twitching slightly, 
so his eyes didn't turn up, and asked, "How are you here?" 


Xie pity looked down at himself and quickly took off his women’s clothes 
and said, “It’s long.” 


At this time, the swaying saw the flower city with his hand on his side, and 
the pupil narrowed slightly. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 139: Barren 
Mountain Ridge, Black Heart Shop 3 


Shake the lost channel: "...you?!" 


Huacheng snorted and ignored. When Lancome saw it, he ran away. 
Raising the awareness, suddenly turned back, said: "Stop!" 


His steps have not yet taken off, and a white scorpion has sneaked out and 
covered Lancome's ankle. Lancome fell on the spot and rolled over on the 
ground to hug the lower abdomen. It seems that the fetus was hidden in her 
stomach. Thank you for accepting the evil side: "You think she should 
stand like this... It’s useless to scream. Right, you only said your general, 
what happened to your general?" 


I didn’t answer, and I snorted. I grabbed Lancome’s arm when I stepped 
forward. It seems that I was really angry. I caught a woman, but the action 
was not welcome. I just sang a “mother’s”, but this is a bit It 1s not like the 
past. Who knows, he hasn't pulled Lancome up yet, Lancome's stomach 
suddenly swells in a balloon, slamming a white shadow, screaming and 
screaming at the facing door. 


Fetal! 


Every time it returns to the mother's abdomen, it will accumulate a new 
round of energy. Therefore, this blow is very dangerous, and the support 
must be coped with God's hand. The fetal spirit is like a ball, and he is hit 
by a "squeaky" on the wall. Heed the road: "Catch! Don't let it run!" 


Xie pity has not moved, Huacheng has stopped him. The ball of the 

general tire spirit came to him in front of him, and once again attacked. 
Here a group of ghost **** smashed in the hallway, and the bottom was 
also messed up. I only listened to the "buddy" downstairs and asked for 
help: "You guys are raising your hands! The little ones are also trying to 
eat!" "Yes, I don't dare any more! We usually steal a few chickens in the 


vicinity." It’s all green...green uncle, we must force us to be his men, we 
can do it, he is in the kitchen now!” 


Seeing that the scene 1s already in chaos, thank you for thinking about it 
and jumping from the second floor. Grace is cocking the legs in the 
kitchen, while picking up the teeth, while the "meals" are sent to the door, 
but suddenly heard a loud bang, a figure kicked a wall, jumped into the 
**** and asked: "What is Grace, Millet?" 


This typical martial art approached the door and jumped up and suddenly 
jumped up: "You?! How come? You won't knock on the door, do you want 
to come in like this?!" 


Xie pity did not say anything. When he went up, he slammed him twice. 
The ducks usually put him on the cutting board: "No more nonsense. 
Where did you get the child?" 


Graceful and grinning: "Hey, look, this is not the same?" 
What is the land? They are all human bones! 


Thanks to the anger, from the heart, the hand on the force, the graceful 
ghost crying wolf screamed: "Hands! The hand folded! Folded off! Prince 
Cousin, etc.! I am honest, I lie to you, did not eat No food! Ready to eat, 
haven't eaten yet!" 


Thanks to the pity: "Where is he?" 


Graceful said: "Don't press it! Don't press it! I tell you, the small oi! bottle 
is closed in the firewood room next to it. You open the door and see it!" 


Thanks to the mercy, if the evil is tied to the grace, open a small door on 
the side of the kitchen, the millet really curled up inside. Thanks for the 
breath, he saw that he still had a steady breath, and his face was red and 
fluttering. It seemed to sleep well. However, when he was hugged, he felt 
that the child’s body was hot and seemed to have a high fever. 


At this time, those monks and priests also came in. As soon as I entered 
the kitchen, I stepped on the bones and almost slipped. The scene was 
shocking and said: "Ah? Black shop!" 


"Don't the dishes outside... all... human flesh?!" 
"I said that there are no slender chicken fingers like fingers!" 


At this time, there was another loud noise, and there was a big hole in the 
ceiling. A white ball came in. Everyone said: "What?!" 


Shou, shook and jumped from the hole, and took out a dozen yellow 
characters in one hand and said: "Go away! Don't hinder my office!" 


Everyone said: "Ah! Supreme!" 
Immediately, Lancome rolled his body and said: "Don't hit him again!" 
Everyone said again: "Hey! Woman!" 


Those Huang Fufei are like steel nails, flying knives in general, thanking 
the pity to avoid them, but they can't get out of the way, and the back gives 
a large piece of densely screamed, screaming: "killing ghosts! !!" 


The crowd swarmed up and researched around his back, exclaiming: "This 
trick of throwing... is really subtle..." 


A good kitchen, it’s crowded and noisy. The swaying chasing the tires is 
high and low, and Lancome 1s chasing and swaying like crazy. The half- 
face of the graceful face was changed on the cutting board by the 
thankfulness. The half-back was used as a sieve for the yellow-studded 
nails that were thrown and thrown. It was surrounded by a group of people. 
From time to time, Lancome stepped on a few feet. He said: "Why? Why? 
There will be so many people? Who are you? Who are you? Mom's still let 
people eat? How come anywhere? Are you all hateful with me?!" 


Having said that, his eyes turned and suddenly passed through the wall 
where the kitchen collapsed and saw the outside of the inn. Huacheng 
seems to have never seen the scene of the melee here, and he is calmly 


sitting under a tree, and there is still a leisurely scene to play with gold 
foil. I don't know how long he has been playing so bored. In front of him, 
he has set up a gorgeous little house with a dozen pieces of gold foil. 


Grace immediately shouted and shouted: "Everyone looks at the outside! 
Blood rain and flowers become a devil! Come with him and hate it! The 
machine can not be lost, no longer come to this village, no more. This 
store...!!!" 


The voice did not fall, and a cold, **** kitchen knife slid across his teeth. 
The handle is held in the hands of Xie. 


He smiled and said, "Well? What are you shouting?" 


Grace did not see how thank you for putting the knife into his mouth. I 
only felt that my mouth was cold, and the tip of my tongue felt suddenly a 
sharp thing in front. Although it was unharmed, I moved a little more. It’s 
going to be full of blood, and the voice 1s abruptly stopped. 


However, everyone has already seen the flower city outside the inn that is 
playing in the Golden Foil Hall, saying: "Is he?!" 


"The eight achievements are!" 


Before they robbed them, they prayed for a hand to hold the millet and 
rushed out in one hand. Grace was tied to the ground and screamed on the 
ground, and was screamed by the tow: "Dog|Yes, thank you for your 
deliberate, I have never seen you so sinister fake white lotus." Ah ah -" 


The crowd discussed it and said: "Chong... not rushing?" 

"Be careful with fraud. Or else, let's look at it first?" 

Just at this time, Huacheng also finished the Xiaojin Temple, stood up, 
raised a brow, looked down on the small house that he had built, and gently 


kicked it. 


Oh, the golden temple collapsed. 


The inn also slammed down. 


The illusion has also been broken. Thanks for looking back, behind him, 
where is the inn, but it is a collapsed small hut. In this barren mountain 
ridge, it is normal to have such a house, and the inn is just a blind eye. 


The group had not had time to discuss the rushing road, and the collapsed 

house was pressed underneath, and a pile of rotten wood broke through the 
straw and fainted. Xie pity ran to the side of Huacheng, said: "Sanlang, do 
you use this force, will not be affected?" 


Flower City waved a hand, and the gold foil disappeared out of thin air. He 
said: "My brother is relieved, this is not a problem." 


At this time, a broken roof moved twice, and a straw was opened, and it 
was drilled out. He said: "You are not in the way, I am in the way!" 


He finally grasped the fetal spirit, but it was black in front of him. When 
he looked up, the broken roof was covered and covered, and it was said 
that it was extremely embarrassing. Shake off a straw from the head, and 
the momentum went to the face of Xie Li and Hua Cheng, and yelled at the 
flower city that was shorter than him: "You this... are you deliberate?!" 


Huacheng blinked, no refutation, no ridicule, just raised a pair of dark eyes 
and looked forward to thanking. Xie Li immediately took his shoulder and 
covered his shoulders and said: "No, no, no. The children are not light and 
heavy... Sorry to help." 


Shaking up with a mess, unbelievably said: "...Children? Your Royal 
Highness, you won't really be when I can't see it. Who is this?" 


Thanks for your pity: "What are you talking about? This is a very ordinary 
child." 


" " 


I was staring at the flower city and squinting, but listening to the "Takaka" 
micro-sounding behind me, Lancome also opened a roof, climbed out, 


shook and turned back to find her. Thankfully, he gave a sigh of relief and 
put the millet on the ground. At this moment, a voice whispered in his ear: 
"...His Royal Highness?" 


Xie pity immediately got up and said: "...fair letter?" 


It was really a wind letter, and it sounded relieved. "That's great! Your 
password hasn't changed." 


Thanks for the silence. Eight hundred years ago, the first time he used the 
psychic password, it was "reciting morality for a thousand times." After 
eight hundred years, it still has not changed, and the wind letter actually 
remembers. Thanks to the feeling that when Fengxin first heard the 
password, he laughed and shouted, and missed it in an untimely manner. 
He said, "Yes, it hasn't changed. Is it still okay to go to heaven? Is the 
emperor knowing nothing?" ” 


Huacheng heard that he was talking to the **** officer in the heavenly 
court. He consciously walked away and put his hand on the forehead of the 
millet to test whether he was sick. Over there, the voice of the wind letter 
was Serious again. "It's very bad. I know. Now it's a mess in heaven." 


Thanks and pity: "The co-ordination and distribution of all affairs in 
heaven has always been controlled by the spirits. It is no wonder. No other 
gods can top it?" 


Wind channel: "On the top, not top. On weekdays, one of the Lingwen 
Temples is more diligent than anyone else. It seems that you can do ten 
times better in that position. Now, one thing 1s going to be topped, no one. 
The top three can be stunned by the summary of the news, and several 
literary gods are shirking." 


Xie pity shook his head and listened to the wind channel: "And it is not 
only spiritual, but also has an accident. It was originally in custody. He 
injured the guardian of the guard and escaped." 


"what?!" 


Hearing words, thanking a psychic spirit, immediately looked up and 
shook, the black boy was talking to Lancome, there was an unpleasant 
eyebrow, and a little anxious. Thanks for walking farther, lowering the 
voice, saying: "What happened to the situation? How could this be?" 


Wind channel: "Not only was he shut down, but the entire official of the 
Xuanzhen Temple was suspended for investigation. It was because of the 
fetal spirit." 


Thanks to the lower voice: "What happened to the fetus, is it really related 
to him?" 


Wind channel: "Well. This time the cracks of the demons scattered around, 
the love is responsible for the female ghost Lancome and the fetal spirit, 
did not catch, let them run. But in the process of arrest, the fetal spirit 
identified the feelings, He said that it is a feeling of love for those who cut 
it out from the mother's womb and live to be a little devil." 


"impossible!" 


Xie pity said: "Impossible! If you love this person, oh, he has no reason to 
do this kind of thing." 


Wind channel: "I don't know. But it is said that there is a kind of sorcerer 
that uses dead infants to cultivate. It can achieve the purpose of rapid 
ascent. Now many people doubt whether his ascent is also a problem, so it 
was originally intended to be detained first. Slowly and thoroughly check 
all the traces of his past, who knows that he can't hold his breath, he ran, 
and this time he decided that he was a guilty conscience and fled. 


Thanks to pity: "Wait and so on. This 1s really too wrong. If the affair is 
the murderer, why did the fetal spirit and Lancome not recognize it in the 
Shenwu Hall early in the morning, but when they were arrested and 
arrested?" Is it a fallacy if you don’t make it clear?" 


Wind channel: "I knew this when I was already there. I don't know what 
happened to them. I heard that Lancome and Fetal did not know who the 
man was, but when the little devil became evil, there was Once 


accidentally awake, uncontrollable, he took a bite on the arm of the 
surgeon and left a scar on the man. When the fetus was fighting and 
admiring the law, he just saw a bite on his arm. It was old. Injury, for 
hundreds of years." 


Thanks for your pity: "...this bite mark, does it match the trace of the teeth 
of the fetus?" 


Wind channel: "Exactly." 
Thank you for your pity: "How do you explain this wound?" 


Wind channel: "He admitted that he had indeed seen this fetal spirit, but 
he did not admit that he was the murderer, saying that he only helped him 
with good intentions and saved the fetal spirit, which was accidentally 
bitten by it. This explanation is not as good as Explanation." 


Yes, because, "good help", "love the young child", "do not leave a name for 
good things", in everyone's impression, and love is not at all. This kind of 
person is very "independent". I have never shown any extra love. I have 
never had a heartfelt friend in Heaven. I have no such thing to believe. I 
have no one to believe. Naturally, there is no one who spoke to him. 
people. Probably because of this, he will choose to escape and find out the 
truth. Wind channel: "In short, it is now chaotic, Your Highness, where are 
you now? The emperor said that the ghosts are gathered together, I am 
afraid that they can’t stop it. Come back and discuss it!" 


Thanks: "I am..." 


The voice did not fall, and the cold and cold voice suddenly sounded 
behind him: "Who are you talking to?" 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 140: Sharp 
fangs 


Thanks, I sighed and turned around and said, "Hey, I thought, but now the 
psychic squad in heaven has been demolished. I don't remember the 
psychic passwords of other priests. I don't want to say anything. Do you 
remember the password of the priest? Let me pass the news back and tell 
them that I am here and ask someone to help." 


His look is extremely natural, very persuasive, and the clouds on the 
surface are scattered, and he perfunctors: "I don't know. At the moment, 
the heavens are in a mess, everyone is very busy, handle their own." 


At this time, Huacheng Road on the side: "Brother, this child is hungry for 
two days and is having a fever." 


Thanks for the past, it’s true. Millet’s forehead was hot and fried, and 
immediately grabbed the sadness and asked, “How do you raise children?” 


Graceful and **** shouted: "I don't really want him to be a man! If you 
haven't eaten, he is already a big compassion! Give me a good dedication!" 


Thanks to pity: "I see you because he has a bad taste and doesn't eat it." 


Lancome over there was hesitating for a moment, saying: "Is the child 
sick? Would you like me to check it out?" 


She was also swollen by the beam of the small broken house, but the poor 
child climbed over and picked up the millet, and the palm of his hand 
covered his forehead. He seemed to want to use the chilly body and the 
heat of the millet. He shook his hand and grasped the fetal spirit that was 
wrapped into a ball by Huang Fu, and came over and said: "It is time to 


go." 


Lancome obviously did not want to leave, but his son was in his hands, 
very helpless. Thanks for your pity: "Wait, don't leave. Don't you, can you 


talk to your general now?" 
Take a look at him and say, "What do you want to do?" 
Thank you for your pity: "Actually..." 


When it comes to the word "real", he suddenly shot, lightning, and 
instantly locked his arms and firmly grasped it in one palm. This 
continued: "Actually, I already know that he has an accident!" 


Forcing him for a moment and not locking him, he was shocked and angry: 
"You! Despicable!" 


Thanks: "No, no. I am strength. You can try to attack me in the same way 
and see if I can lock me." 


Huacheng politely stroked: "Agree." 


I’m so angry that I have to turn my eyes and say: “Then you let me go, let 
me try?!” 


Thanks for the righteousness: "The next time I have a chance to try again, 
now I have a business. I can help you, please help me to persuade your 
general, first go back to heaven." 


psa go back?" 


The swaying anger is forced to suppress under the soft voice, saying: "You 
are light! If you are in the same situation now, would you choose to go 
back? What do you say when you persuaded you to go back? Go back and 
wait for someone to say Convicted? Go back and die?!" 


Thank you for your pity: "You don't want to be excited. I am serious, not 
talking about the wind. Your general is different from me. He is not 
serious enough to be irreparable. It is the next step to escape. Now there 
are many priests. Just convicted him. If you can contact him and tell him, I 
can help him check this." 


Supported: "Do you help him check?" 


Thanks to pity: "Well. I have a lot of checks, but I still have experience. 
Anyway, I have more experience than him." 


He swayed: "His Royal Highness, can you remember if you remember to 
go to heaven and check how many priests? Do you have any priests who 
have been checked by you and will not fall?" 


Xie pity and cough, said: "It's not the same. It's not my problem. If he 
really didn't do that kind of thing, I can naturally give him an innocence." 


He smiled and screamed and interrupted him: "Oh! You have a personal 
grievance with him. I don't know if you want to help others. Do you still 
have room for him to turn over? Is there a chance to turn over and see him 
laughing? That's it, don't pretend." 


Wen Yan, Huacheng face is heavy. After a short while, he smiled and said: 
"But, my brother. This person does not know how to be good, why should 
you talk nonsense with him? Someone is born with a white-eyed wolf, who 
is best at the heart of a gentleman's heart. No permission to check At the 
end of the day, he did not do anything. He doesn't believe you, you are too 
lazy to take care of him, and he will toss himself." 


Looking at him, he sneered: "*Children?’ 
Huacheng replied more sarcasmly to him: "‘Little God Officer?” 


Shake his face slightly. Xie pity locked him, Wen sighed: "This, one yard, 
one yard, the public and private to separate. I have no personal complaints 
with him is one thing, whether he has done bad things is another thing. 
Love this person, Although careful, narrow-minded, sensitive and 
suspicious, poor personality, a lot of thoughts, bad talk, like broken 
thoughts, often offended people, many people hate, a friend does not, a 
little thing can remember for a long time..." 


In a single tone, I said a lot of things, thank you for the final conclusion: 
"...but I know him from a young age, he still has a bottom line." 


Xie pity continued: "He may spit in a cup of tea that he doesn't like, but he 
will never poison him in the water." 


Huacheng is faintly authentic: "Is it? It is also very disgusting." 
The forehead blues are all raised: "No! Spit is not!" 
Thanks to pity: "Then go down the laxative." 


The swaying seems to be holding back something, saying: "You must use 
this metaphor to describe him? Are you talking to him or hurting him?" 


Thanks to the pity: "Sorry, I can't think of another more suitable metaphor. 


I’ve earned a few times, I can’t earn it, and I’m wary: “Are you venting a 
letter with someone who is in heaven?” 


Thanks to the patience and longevity: "Not yet. Just chatting for a day. You 
can rest assured that I will not harm your general. If he really does not 
want to go back, it is better to come and act with me. So what did he do in 
the middle? Testify, otherwise he can't tell, it gets worse..." 


At this time, the two of them suddenly came a burst of laughter, but they 
stared at Lancome's face, suddenly mad, said: "Ha ha ha ha ha ha ha I am 
who! This is not, this is not a sword blue Missy?" 


Lancome originally held the millet, was cooling him, heard the shoulders 
tremble, and looked round and round: "Who are you? How can you also..." 


Grace said: "How can I know? Nonsense! You almost have to call my 
cousin! Why, everyone has become a ghost? Mixed and mixed so many 


acquaintances, this world is really lively, ie 


Thanks and pity: "What kind of madness are you making? Who ts the 
gladioli?" 


Graceful said: "My cousin, my brother, I said that you are jealous or 
stupid? You carefully look at who this is, this is our first big show in 
Xianle Country - Miss Jianlan! The family is also the official It’s a 
business. I didn’t know how much scenery I had in the past, so it’s the 
same. Every time I’m on the list of women’s talents, she’s arrogant and her 
eyes are on her head, and she’s not on the list. Hey!" 


"what?" 


Thanks for the pity, I couldn’t help but immediately look at Lancome’s 
face. At that time, the Lord and the Queen did indeed intend to choose for 
him, and called a large number of carefully selected girls to enter the 
palace to feast, so that he did not close his eyes. But when I was grateful to 
the youngsters, I practiced my heart and practiced. I walked around at the 
banquet and took a stand. I didn’t remember those women’s faces and 
names. Where can I find out? 


Lan Lan looked forward to help, but he shook his head and said: "This is 
not what my general said. This person is also a relic of Xianle. I must have 
seen you that year." 


Thanks to the flower city, he is not surprised. I don’t think it just 
happened. Thanks to turn to Lancome, muttering: "You used to be..." 


Lancome quickly grabbed his ear and said: "Don't say! Don't say it! Don't 
call me with that name!!! I... | changed my name." 


Thanks for the first time, a sigh of sigh. 


The daughter of a nobleman in the past is a ghost in the world today. 
Changed the name, probably afraid of being shameful in the family, and 
not acknowledging that he was himself. 


This woman used to be his follower, and how can his people teach people 
not to sigh. 


At this time, he suddenly felt warm on his hands. Looking down, it was 
Huacheng. He didn't look at him, but he held his hand. 


Although he is now in a child's form and his body temperature is cold, this 
hand is small and cold. When he holds him, it is warm. 


There is no sympathy in grace, and he said: "I didn't expect that the 
unsuccessful Miss Marshal of the year is now old and ugly! I used to think 
that you are not very good, now one Look, my eyes are really sharp, and 
it's not very good! By the way, who is this wild breed?" 


This is really unsatisfactory, and the face of Gladiolus is slightly white. 
Grace said again: "Isn't that my cousin's cousin? No, I don't know, my 
cousin, 80% is not a lift, so I will pretend to be innocent and unintentional 
throughout the day. How can I have a son? Oh, I have forgotten it. After 
the death of Xianle, isn’t your Missy being sold to that place? It must be 
the kind of Yong’an people!” 


Thanks for pity, I was ready to go up and let him shut up. Gladiolus broke 
out faster than he broke out. He slammed the past: "What do you say in 
your mouth?!" 


She was slap in the face of her nose and blood, and she rounded her eyes 
and said: "Are you a bad person, this kind of incompetent thing, actually 
dare to beat me this close?!" 


Jiang Lan licked his face and licked his neck and slammed his slap in the 
face. "What **** is close! You can really put gold on your face! What 
stuff, you also match the other three." A perfect comparison?! What do 
you get? Face? You are playing!" 


Her words poked the scars of grace, and her sadness was also irritated. 
"Smelly girl let go of your chicken paws! I am dirty! I vomit and vomit!!!" 


The two twisted into a ball, however, only the swordsman unilaterally 
beaten the sadness, the grace was trapped by the evil spirits, and cried: 
"Thank you! Why don't you persuade this time?! Your Father Heart?!" 


Thanks to pity, he was shaking his hand, and bowed his head and spoke to 
Huacheng, as if he had never heard his screams. When the gladioli kicked 
her face, her eyes were red and sullen: "The old lady is giving the people a 


dross, and I don't want to be smashed by you. The insect touches a finger! 
You don't want anything, waste! You also have Calling someone else! Who 
are you talking about?" 


Graceful and angry: "I don't want anyone? I waste? You are so bad in your 
bones." Is it qualified to marry me like this? Isn't it how the people can see 
you?!... Wait a minute!!! Put down That stone!!!" 


Was twisting, and there was a loud bang in the sky. Several people looked 
up and looked up and yelled: "You are not saying that there is no 
ventilation, just chatting for a while?" 


Huacheng frowned slightly and said: "Do not ask." 


A smashing night sky, everyone was blown up by this thunder. When I 
blinked again, not far away, a long-looking black-eyed priest with a long 
bow and striding, said: "His Royal Highness!" 


Thanks for putting down the sleeves and pushing the flower city behind 
him without a trace, said: "Faith! How come you?" 


Fengxin quickly came up and said: "You just stopped talking, I asked 
people to find you near here through mana fluctuations." After frowning, 
he said, "What's wrong? It's messy. It's a problem." What is it?" 


Thanks to the pity, the wind letter saw the swaying of his hand and the 
flower city standing behind him. 


This picture is beyond his imagination. It seems that I don’t know which 
one to show more surprises. The wind channel: "You..." 


In the end, he still pointed to Huacheng and asked Xie Li: "...What is the 
child?" 


Thank you for your smile: "Is it cute?" 


Feng Xin blinked, looking at the flower city that did not match the 
expression of pity, doubt: "... cute? No, how do I look at him especially 
like..." 


Thankful and calm: "Is my son?" 
Fengxin: "When did you have a son?" 


Xie pity smiled and said: "Not yet. I mean, if I have a son, 1t must be so 
cute, right?" 


Huacheng took his hand and smiled: "Yes." 

Fengxin: "..." 

Shake: "..." 

Thanks for your pity: "Ha ha ha ha... Hey? Lancome girl, don't run!" 


The wind creed suddenly turned around, and I really saw a woman’s back 
escape from the graceful side, rushing away, immediately thinking about 
it, taking a bow and aiming at her leg. 


Who knows, I don't know if it is a mother's danger. I shake the fetal spirit 
ball wrapped in the yellow plaque paper that I have been holding in my 
hand. It suddenly bursts into the yellow whistle, and screams and screams 
at the wind. The swordsman seemed to panic, and he was flustered. 
Hearing this voice, he remembered that his son was still in the hands of 
others, and turned and lost his voice: "Wrong!" 


This is the first time that Chery knows the name of the fetal spirit. It 
turned out to be wrong. The arrow of the wind letter changed direction and 
flew to the white tire. But listening to the "click", the fetal spirit turned a 
few turns in the air, jumped to the side of the tree, actually bite the feather 
arrow, and let everyone see what it looks like at the moment. 


It is not so much a fetus as it is a deformed little monster. The skin is so 
pale that it seems to have been brushed with a layer of powder, the eyes 
are huge, the twinkling light is shining, the top of the head is sparse and 
yellow, and the two rows of sharp and fangs licking the arrow of the letter, 
see him look over, "giggle" After a moment of high-speed chewing, bite it 
into pieces, and then "squeaky" spit out a cold arrow, nailed to the wind 


letter boots, spit out the serpent's generally long and thin red tongue, as if 
in provocative. 


The wind letter did not say anything, but took an arrow and aimed at it. 
The fetus seems to be a lizard who climbs up and down the tree and is 
extremely flexible. It is no wonder that the support has been unable to 
grasp it. Jianlan anxiously said: "Don't call him, run!" 


It is only the biological parents who are so concerned about this kind of 
monster who is afraid of disgusting. The wind letter was aimed at the end, 
and the hand was released and the arrow flew out. The little short leg of 
the fetus was pinned by a arrow and screamed and could not climb. The 
swordsman ran back and reached for the arrow, but because of his low 
level, he was bounced off when he touched the arrow and exploded. She 
stepped back two steps and continued to pull up and blow up the sparks. 


Fengxin took the bow and went forward. He said, "Okay, go back. Don't 
give us more official duties... Jianlan?!" 


The gladioli, who had just been bounced again, heard his voice, a sly, no 
movement, and quickly turned around. The wind letter turned her back and 
said: "Jian Lan?" 


"..." Xie pity premonition is not good, doubts, "What is going on?" 


The gladioli bowed his head and said vaguely: "You have mistaken 
people." 


Wind channel: "What are you talking about? How can I admit you? You 
are very different, but how can I not recognize..." 


When he said it, he was stuck. Because, before the gladioli was Lancome, 
heavy makeup, and covered with dust, he did not recognize it. 


Can't blame him. The wind letter is exactly the same as it was in the past, 
but the change has not changed, but the change of the gladioli is too big. 


Look, makeup, manners, talk, temperament... Even if her biological 
parents are standing in front of her, she may not recognize that this is their 
baby daughter. 


The wind is fluent: "...1s you. It's really you. Yes, it's you!... I thought you 
married someone, and you are doing well. How are you...how have you 
become what it is now... ” 


When I heard this, Jianlan suddenly turned and slammed him, and said: 
"T|Fuck|Your mother!" 


The wind letter was pushed back by her and she couldn’t speak. At the 
same time, Jianlan continued to push his chest and shouted at him: "I said 
that I am not a ghost. Do you understand people? You are sick, are you?? 
Also, it is you, It’s really you, yes, you’re coming in three bursts! Pretend 
not knowing me, can’t you? Pretend not to recognize me, can’t you?! Good 
dear, leave me some face, okay? !" 


Her appearance, it is simply a city shrew, probably too much difference 
with the memory of the wind letter, he looked at the gladioli with a sly 
look, can not speak. The same is true for pity. Grace is the most happy, 
laughing on the ground and rolling: "Ha ha ha ha ha ha ha my mother! 
Prince cousin! You see what this is! You are wearing a green hat with your 
most loyal dog!!! ” 


Gladiolus kicked a few feet and said: "Dog! Dog! I see you like a dog!" 


Strictly speaking, the gladioli has only been given a high hope by the 
family, but it has not officially entered the palace, and it has never been 
awkward, so it is not true that this schadenfreude is not true. However, 
thank you for not knowing what to say. 


I never thought that there would be no need to say a word of truth to a 
woman, but actually... 


At this time, the two-legged teeth of the fetus were crunching again and 
pinning his feather arrow, and fluttered to the wind. The wind was 
convinced, giving him a deep bite on his right arm, bloody, and raging. 


The right hand is the hand that is used by the wind. For a martial god, 
there is no good feeling of common hand injuries. Fengxin will raise his 
left hand and kneel down. Jianlan says: "Don't hit him!" 


The wind was in a state of silence, and a terrible thought came into being. 


It’s not just him, he thinks about the same thing in someone’s mind. The 
wind trusts that the piranha in the fetus generally bites on his arm and 
looks at the gladioli, saying: "...this...1s it...?" 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 141: Road and 
I are the winners 


Xie pity suddenly remembered one thing. On that day, at the Shenwu 
Temple, Lancome confessed to a large circle of people, but it did not mean 
standing in a very prominent position. 


Gladiolus immediately denied: "No!" 


It’s also unbelievable. It seems that he did not know what the relationship 
between the wind and the woman was, and he was also defamed. It was so 
easy to come back and said: "He hasn't asked what it is, how do you 
answer so fast? ?" 


Gladiolus said: "Crap! I want to know what he wants to ask. I tell you, no!" 


The wind letter looked at the fetal spirit and said: "What do you call him? 
Wrong?" 


This name seems to have any special meaning. Jianlan opened his mouth 
and did not argue. He said: "Where is a big man who has so much 
nonsense? No, it is not! How can you confess your son like this!" 


Feng Xin said: "What are you talking about? If so, of course I..." 


Gladiolus said: "How are you doing? You recognize him? Are you raising 
him?" 


Wind channel: "J..." 


After saying "I", I was stuck. He looked down at the deformed little 
monster hanging on his hand. The fetal spirit seemed to hate him very 
much. He caught him biting, wow, the wind letter is not, no, no, no. The 
right hand was **** and clenched. 


Seeing that he was stuck, it seemed that he was a little unacceptable at a 
time. Jianlan immediately shouted: "I have said that you are not asking! It 
doesn't matter to you, it's safe!" 


Grace said: "Sophistry! Certainly! I didn't make a mistake, isn't it the 
people's livelihood? Everyone comes to the goods, the son of Fengxin's 
own son is cut out from his mother's belly and made into a little sneaky 
Hey, actually there are people who dare to worship what kind of **** 'send 
a child to Nanyang’? Byeby, be careful, you have a son..." 


Thanks for raising his hand, if the evil seals the mouth of the grace, the 
swordlan slammed a few feet on his head and stepped on him. At this time, 
Guzi woke up in confusion, saw the grace and stepped on it, and quickly 
rushed up and said: "No... don't step on me..." 


Seeing that Guzi hugged the head of Grace, Jianlan did not go to the foot, 
changed to grasp the two white short legs of the fetal spirit, and ran away, 
angered: "Let you not bite! So disobedient! ” 


Fengxin 1s out of the air, unable to grasp them immediately, thanking and 
subconsciously: "If evil, chase!" 


If the evil is going to chase it. However, the white man went out to thank 
him for remembering, and it was tied with grace. Looking back, the 
graceful head of the valley suddenly jumped up and proudly declared: "I 
am regaining freedom!" 


Seeing the wind letter finally reacted, thank you for changing your voice: 
"If you are evil, you will come back." 


Then, if the evil came back, the sound of" "smacked a slap in the face. 
Grace just turned over and the old ghost sang, and was dragged to the 
original place and turned three times. His face fell, and he squatted on the 
ground for a moment. He suddenly became mad. He grabbed Ruo and said: 
"You can even fight this rag." I!!!" 


This time, if the evil was caught by him, twisted and twisted, and he 
couldn’t open it, and the grace seemed to suddenly increase. Xie Li just 


wanted to go and pick up him personally. Grace found that he still had a 
child on his head. He quickly pulled the grain off the shield and blocked it 
in front of him. "Don't come over! Come and kill me!" Hey, look behind 
you, the dog flower city is going to die!" 


Thanks for the pity, turned sharply, Huacheng was really close to the 
eyebrows, and the hand that was hanging down was shaking, as if he was 
forcing anything, but when he saw him, he immediately said, "I am fine!" 


Everything is moving! 


This time, it was more trouble than ever. Xie pity decisively chose to hug 
him. Taking this opportunity, Grace quickly grabbed the millet and 
escaped. Gladiolus also seems to have a terrible headache, holding her 
ears, and the fetal spirit is stimulated by spurs, and the bite is fiercer. The 
wind letter was bitten by a dozen or so, and the blood was fluent. He still 
couldn’t beat him, and he firmly grasped the arm of the sword. The fetus 
was unrelenting, and the face waving at the wind was a paw. This claw was 
extremely dangerous, and the wind was low and he slammed the wound. I 
wonder if it was scratched. Xie Pity looked timid and frightened. He 
wanted to sneak out the evil and went there to save the field. Jianlan but he 
squatted: "You are like this again, I am going to be angry!!!" 


Listening to the mother drinking, the baby spirit jumped back into her 
arms and broke into a group. Gladiolus looked at the wind and glanced at 
it and said: "It doesn't matter to you, I warn you, don't worry about us!" 
One hand gimmicks, holding it in one hand, the mother and son flew away. 
See you, support the road: "Let me go!" 


Fengxin was half-squatting on the ground, holding half of his face, 
thanking him for holding the flower city next to him, saying: "Are you 
okay? I see the wound? Have you scratched your eyes?" 


Blood fell from his fingertips, and Fengxin closed his eyes and said: 
"...No. You don't ask me." 


Thanks to the pity: "Wind letter, Lancome... What does the swordlan girl 
say...2" 


Who knows, the voice did not fall, the wind letter suddenly punched out, a 
loud noise, discounted the tree next to it, roared: "said let you not ask me!" 


This sentence is actually mixed with some resentment. Moreover, thank 
you for listening, this grievance seems to be rushing to him, can not help 
but see. 


Huacheng was cold on the side: "Whoever made your wife and son a ghost, 
there was a fire to sprinkle on the Caesar." 


Hearing the words, the wind letter raised his head slightly, and his eyes 
looked red. When I waved it, I immediately angered: "What do you think 
of me? You don't really be me... The general is doing it? It's really bloody! 
He just looks at the woman who is also a relic of the Xianle, some with the 
royal family. Yuanyuan only helped each other. I wanted to get rid of the 
fetal spirit. Who knows that it is obsessed with obscurity, and refuses to go 
back to become a murderer. If you don’t fall, you will get rid of it. You 
know it, you don’t care! The little devil whoever produces his own I don't 
know, can you expect it to remember who killed himself?!" 


Perhaps it was a horrible thing in the past few days, and he even made a lot 
of rude words. Huacheng Road: "So your general will be able to smash the 
blood mold? Isn't the person who is more unlucky than him not to live?" 


Fengxin shook his head and murmured: "...how is this? How could this 
be?" 


Thanks to pity: "You... or else deal with the wound first. Have you taken 
the medicine?" 


Fengxin glanced at him and said: "I am fine. Leave me alone!" 


He licked his wound on his head and did not deal with it. He stood up and 
stumbled and left. Thanks for the pity and the swaying, he called several 
times and asked if he was going back to heaven or chasing people. He 
didn't care, and his back disappeared quickly. Shake and earn a few times, 
angered: "His Royal Highness! If your old man does not chase, can I go 
after it?" 


Thanks for the resentment of the gods, thinking about the balance for a 
moment, said: "Okay." Sure enough to let him go. 


I didn’t expect him to really agree, and he lived his wrist and bones and 
shouted: "How can I let go now?" 


Thank you for your pity, and said: "I am afraid that I am still more than I 
imagined... Hey, I feel that instead of asking your general to go back, it is 
better to let him act freely." 


After a pause, he said: "What are you going to do now? I think that the 
fetal spirit is not only for the purpose of getting out of the way, but the 
letter is falling, and I am afraid that someone will instruct." 


He patted the ash on the sleeve and said: "What is going on with it? It is 
going to Tonglushan, and I will catch it!" 


After that, I hurried away. The inn that had gathered a few squares of 
people had suddenly become cold and clear. Thanks for turning around, 
checking out the collapsed small broken house, looking up the wooden 
beams and thatched grass, the crowds are really just coma, it is estimated 
that they will wake up soon, let go, and leave. 


After a while, out of the barren hills and finally found a real inn, the two 
stopped here. 


Thanks for the confusion in these days, I was sitting in the window and 
staring. If the evil is in his hand, he will be rubbed in an arch, as if he is 
groaning, and the fingers of the pity have licked it. 


Suddenly, Huacheng went to the window and shared the moonlight with 
him. He said: "It has nothing to do with you." 


Thanks for the slightest glimpse, he immediately understood his meaning, 
shook his head and said: "I don't know if it really has nothing to do with 
me... Fengxin knows the girl of Jianlan, it must be after the break of 
Xianleguo, he Before I was flying, I calculated the time, which was the 
first time I was desecrated." 


Huacheng Road: "That doesn't mean they are becoming like this now, you 
are wrong." 


After thinking about it, thank you: "Sanlang, I didn't tell you, what 
happened to me when I was jealous?" 


Huacheng Road: "No." 


Thanks to pity: "I have not said to others, pull you to break a few words, I 
hope you don't dislike." 


Huacheng gently pressed the window and sat up, saying: "No, you said." 


Xie pity recalled, and said: "At the time, my followers only had a wind 
letter, and the days were very bad. I used to be a **** of war, and some of 
my family members when I was a prince, all of them were destroyed." 


Huacheng smiled and said: "Include red mirror, is it?" 


Thank you for your smile: "Ha ha ha... yes. This can't let Junwu know, 
remember to keep me secret. And my dozens of gold belts are all gone." 


Huacheng Road: "Well, so, is Fengxin taking your golden belt to 
Lancome?" 


Xie pity shook his head and said: "That should not be. Fengxin will not 
take my things. I asked him to sell the money and keep it for use." 


In fact, this is a white letter to the wind. At that time, Fengxin had 
resigned for a long time and refused to ask for it. In the end, he said, "I 
will help you for the time being." 


Thanks to pity: "When it comes, I let him take the money to use it for 
himself, not only because of jealousy, but also because of fear." 


The believers dissipated, and only the wind letter still used him as the 
Corolla and the Prince. Thanks to this, I was shocked. The two grew up 
together. Although the wind letter was his confidant, he was a bodyguard, 
but he never took a reward for him. Suddenly, he knew that he was afraid. 


I am afraid that even the wind letter also feels that this day can't be done, 
no longer follow him. Therefore, the meaning of the golden belt 1s not a 
reward, nor a gift or a solace, but also a little bit of pleasing, or rewarding. 


In the illusion created by the baby spirit, thank you for seeing a talisman, 
and it should be a letter to the gladioli. After the death of Xianle, the 
temples of Xie’s palace were all burned. No one believed in the Prince of 
Music. His amulet was also regarded as a waste. However, Fengxin also 
receives a lot of his amulets, and often persistently distributes and gives 
away. He said to you that you are still believers. But thank you for 
knowing that most of the amulets are lost. 


Thanks for the gentleness: "Over the years, I have never known who 
Fengxin likes. I haven't asked, I haven't noticed it." 


After all, he was a prince of heaven from a young age, and the sky was full 
of glory. The wind letter simply took everything around him. How could 
he have his own life and careful thoughts? 


"Take someone else's things and send them to the girl. It may not sound 
good, but at that time, the gold belt was really the best gift that the letter 
can send." After all, we often can't even eat rice. Feng Xin is not a person 
who loves to spend money. So, I can imagine how much he likes the 
Gladiolus girl at that time. Since I like it... why is it separated?" 


Regardless of whether the fetus is the son of the wind, if it is because of 
the desolate, the wind letter missed the woman who likes it. In any case, 
thanking the pity will feel bad. 


Huacheng said: "If you like it, but it is separated, it can only be explained, 
it just likes it." 


Xie pity smiled and said: "Sanlang, the words can not be said so absolute. 
Sometimes, the road is good, not you can decide." 


Huacheng whispered: "The road is good or not, maybe I can't decide, but I 
can't walk, but only I can decide." 


Hearing words, thank you for your pity, only to feel that something has 
been opened, staring at Huacheng does not speak. Huacheng smashed the 
***%* and said: "Brother, isn't that what I said?" 


Looking at his black eyes, Shimi suddenly grabbed him and put it on his 
lap. He said, "Ha ha ha, Saburo, you are right!" 


Huacheng seems to have been shaken by his actions, letting him raise 
himself high. Thanks and laughs: "Speaking shamelessly, Saburo said that 
the self-sufficiency of that sentence is really a bit like when I was young." 


Huacheng seems to have gotten used to being hugged by him, picking his 
eyebrows and saying: "That is my dream." 


One big one was playing in the house for a while, thanking the pity to 
throw the flower city on the bed, and he was lying up, looking up to the 
sky, just wanting to open, but seeing the flower city suddenly sit up, the 
pupils slightly closed, sharp eyes cast opposite . 


Xie pity immediately noticed that he was wrong and suddenly turned up 
and sat up. When I saw a cold sweat, I saw that there was a shadow in the 
room. I was sitting at the table, the tea was soaked in a pot, and the tea was 
full of fragrance. However, he has never found out! 


Thanks for the shame, the heart is in front of the sword, said: "Who?!" 
The man said warmly: "Don't be afraid. Drink tea, Xianle." 


The figure and the voice are all young people, and they are very familiar 
with each other. Thanks to pity, this is a sigh of relief. When the hair is 
scattered in the ears, the heart is still jumping wildly. "Is the emperor..." 


However, this tone was not loose yet. He jerked over the quilt and buried 
the flower city and his body. He said, "...How come you?" 


His hand clenched the flower city under the quilt, indicating peace of 
mind. Jun Wu slowly smashed three cups of tea, and he got up and said: 
"You don't come back, of course I have to personally come down and have 
a look." 


As he spoke, he leaned his hand and walked over to this side, slowly 
pulling out a small part of the shadow. Thanks to his white robe, he saw 
that he actually brought a sword, and he was shocked. He jumped out of 
bed and said: "Imperial, I want to explain first..." 


Who knows, Huacheng opened the quilt behind him, sitting on his feet, 
elbows on his lap, and smiled: "I don't think so." 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 142: Road and 
I are the winners 2 


Thanks for the blessing between the two, said: "I still think that we can sit 
down and talk about it. You see this child, is it very similar..." 


Jun Wu smiled and said: "Like your son, yes." 


Thanks for a while, said: "How do you know what I am going to say?" 


Jun Wu finally took his eyes back from Huacheng, gently patted the 
shoulders of Xie Pity, did not speak, turned and went back to the table to 
sit down. Thanks for knowing that this 1s the meaning of no positive 
conflict for the time being, and I can't help but breathe a sigh of relief. 


If Jun Wu is killing the heart, how terrible it is after pulling the sword, he 
has seen it with his own eyes. In any case, Xie Pity does not want 
Huacheng to have a chance to face him. 


However, Huacheng’s gaze has not been recovered, and it is still not good. 
Jun Wu pushed the three cups of tea one by one and said: "Although it is 
not the first time I saw you, but it is the first time so close, the atmosphere 
is so peaceful, it is better to use tea for wine, and this situation Let's go." 


Xie pity and cough, try to wear clothes as naturally as possible, while 
wearing boots: "Imperial, how is the heavenly court now?" 


Jun Wu put down the teacup and looked out the window for the moon, 
sighing: "Don't mention it." 


Thank you, "...good. No mention." 


It seems that it is really bad. Jun Wu has turned around and said: "Just 
kidding. Don't want to mention it. Xianle, you should let go of this little 
friend, let me go out for a while." 


I want to come, there is something that is inconvenient to be told in front 
of others. Xie pity just had to answer, but listened to the flower city behind 
him and said: "You are in the heavens and the chaos is now a mess, it is no 
secret, even the city and the wild ghosts know that this time the ghosts can 
not stop, excitement and scream, Why go out and say?" 


He also got out of bed, Shi Shiran came to the table, took the cup and 
played it for a while, but seemed to be not interested in drinking tea in the 
cup. After a while, the three were sitting at the table. Although Huacheng 
has few forms at this time, his expression and temperament always make 
people forget this. Jun Wu Wen said: "I really can't hold you anything." 


After all, it is the tea of Junwu, the face can not help, thank you or drink, 
and drink and say: "Is it still time to officially open and close the 
Tonglushan? Is it already determined?" 


Although the wind letter has also been mentioned, but thank you always 
feel that there should be exaggerated elements, not to be determined. Jun 
Wu said: "It is really impossible to stop." 


Huacheng Road: "When you want to come, your original plan is to send all 
the gods to completely block the passage to Tonglushan as before, and stop 
them on the road. But the feelings are broken and the whereabouts are 
unknown. The south has opened a big moment. gap." 


Thanks to the pity: "Is the Fengxin going back to Xianjing? How 1s he? Is 
there anything?" 


Jun Wudao: "Going back, not very good. Nanyang was injured and came 
back and reported the truth in a hurry. I asked all the priests to make a 
murder against the female ghost Lancome mother and son. He wanted to 
go down again, but the injury was not allowed. Optimistic, the right hand 
can hardly move, I deducted him to recuperate in Xianjing. As a result, the 
southern guardian defense, riddled with holes." 


If you change something else, such as who is missing at the moment who 
is going to kill the demon slaying and robbing the immortal, and thank 
you, you must take the initiative to ask for help, but the leader will keep 
the road, not a single-handedly good thing. A person can break through 
thousands of horses, but can't prevent thousands of horses. Xie Li has 
already profoundly learned that the things that bring people to lead the 
soldiers are not his own. It is better to let the people who are really good at 
this on the scalp, so they don’t recommend themselves. They only ask: 
"No other gods can top. Yet?" 


Junwu said: "Other Wushens have already had their own sites and tasks to 
be responsible for themselves. They have been in the Mingguang Hall. 
They can be borrowed for use, but he has already been exiled. As for 
Qiying, like you, it is also a favorite. The madman who is alone in the 
world is doing his own thing. Moreover, he is still unknown. The child 
never listens to the psychic. In addition, the spiritual temple loses the 
main hall and the eunuch, and the other gods dance and ink, and the wind 
and snow are not in the air. Listening to the letter, making decisions, but 
not, these days..." 


Listen to him saying that in the past few days, I am afraid that I am going 
to be paralyzed. Xie pity only felt terrible, and sympathy, said: "I 
remember that you said that even if you can't stop it, there 1s a remedy? 
How can it be remedy?" 


Huacheng said: "Remedy? It is suicide." 


Junwu glanced at him and sighed: "I also said that I don't want to go 
there." 


Thanks to the heart, said: "Is it...?" 


Jun Wu slowly said: "Yes. The only remedy now is to send a Valkyrie to 
the ghosts of the Tonglu Mountain." 


Since you can't stop the start of the fight, then be sure to kill to the end, 
one does not stay! 


Thanks for the hands and sleeves, slightly frowning, said: "I am not very 
familiar with Tonglushan, I don't understand the rules very much, so what 
should I do? Do you want to put thousands of monsters and monsters 
inside? Killing?" 


But this is almost impossible. If you sneak into the Copper Mountain, you 
must hide your identity. You can't bring too many helpers. Otherwise, once 
the ghosts find that one or more of the priests are coming in, they will 
inevitably attack and attack. The Tonglushan is an extreme place of evil 
spirits, and the magical power of the priest will be limited to the greatest 
extent there, and it is definitely more than a slap in the black water. 


Jun Wu said: "No, not so big." 
Huacheng Road: "Bronze Furnace, I am familiar. Brother, look outside." 


Guided by him, thank you for looking out the window. Below the window, 
there is a large piece of land, some kind of onion grass and flowers, and a 
small flower pot in the corner. Huacheng turned over the window and 
pointed to the flower pot. He said: "There is a huge 'copper stove' in the 
center of the copper furnace." 


When the voice just fell, the small flowerpot suddenly fell, and the bones 
rolled to the center of the land and stood up automatically. Immediately, 
with it as the center, the original flat soil around the arch arched and 
arched, and gradually carved a small piece of high and low low earth bag. 


Huacheng Road: "The "Bronze Furnace" is surrounded by mountains. This 
whole belt is all within the scope of the Tonglu Mountain. At least there 
are seven cities." 


Thanks to the novelty, he jumped to the window. So standing in the small 
earthen bag group, there is really a illusion that the giant overlooks the 
vast earth below. 


Huacheng Road: "The ghosts are killing, starting from the outermost edge 


an 


of the mountains, and constantly approaching the center's 'copper stove’. 


He waved his hand and there were many smaller things on the ground that 
twitched. After a long wait, I found out that many weeds and leaflets were 
twisting, as if a little man was traveling between the mountains, saying: 
"That is, the closer to the center, the 'copper stove', The stronger the ghost 
is?" 


Huacheng Road: "Yes. Because of the weak weeds, all were killed on the 
periphery." 


He waved his hand again, and a gust of wind swept over. The weeds were 
all cleaned up by the gust of wind. The bare little earthen bags became 
solitary and looked very pitiful. The small flowerpot in the center 
suddenly burst into red light, which looked like a small copper stove that 
was burnt red. Xie pity stared at it and found a small red flower, and a few 
inconspicuous weeds, jumped into a small flower pot, circled around the 
edge of the flower pot, as if several small people were dancing. That little 
red flower danced the most mad. Huacheng also bowed down to him and 
said: "In the end, only a few ghosts can enter the interior of the "Bronze 
Furnace’. Then, the 'Bronze Furnace’ will close." 


The few "little people" jumped and jumped in and quickly disappeared 
into the darkened mud. Huacheng continued: "In the next seven or forty- 
nine days, there must be a ghost to break through this 'copper furnace." 


The small flowerpot trembled fiercely, and suddenly a burst of glaring red 
light burst into a wave of flying earth. 


With the birth of this "shocking earth", the red flower leaped out of the 
soil, holding its own two leaves, as if screaming in the wind, showing the 
world its strength. When I saw it, I couldn’t help but laugh at it. 


However, I don’t know if it’s too happy. The little red flower slipped on 
the edge of the flower pot, and it’s about to fall. Seek and stretch out your 
hands and gently pick it up and hold it in the palm of your hand. The little 
red flower seemed to be a little dizzy, licking the "head" and raising the 
"face" to look up to the person who caught it. Thanks for the rubbing of the 
soil splashed on the hair, said: "This one is the new generation of ghost 
kings born in Tongluoshan?" 


Huacheng nodded: "Exactly. The killing of the front is a process of 
continuously strengthening the strength. It is indispensable. If the ghost 
strength of entering the 'Bronze Furnace' is not enough, it will be boring 
inside and burned. Become ashes and become a nutrient for others." 


He stood up and said to Junwu in the house: "Your method is nothing more 
than extermination of the elite, placing weeds. There are only so many 
potentials of ghost kings, and they are eliminated by themselves, and the 
rest are weak, even if they are allowed to enter’ The copper furnace can't 
be rushed out, and it won't be recognized as a ghost king." 


Xie polite nodded and said: "It sounds like it works, but I don't know how 
to do it? Have you tried it before?" 


Jun Wu also walked to the window and said: "I don't know. I have never 
tried it. It used to be stopped before the gathering." 


Huacheng picked up his arm and said: "I am afraid it is not feasible. To 
fight under such conditions is tantamount to suicide. It is recommended 
that you come up with this wise magical approach." 


Jun Wu calmly said: "I have this intention." 
Thank you for your pity, saying: "Imperial?" 


Jun Wudao: "Xianle, I am here to go down, it is for this. I am going to 
Tonglushan. You go back to heaven and help me with all the affairs." 


Thanks for letting go, Huo Ran got up and said: "How can this be done? 
Let me be a temporary? You don't make a joke, no one will take me." 


Jun Wu, said: "So, this is a good opportunity for them to serve you." 


Thank you for your pity, saying: "Emperor, this time, I really can't agree 
with you. This is too ridiculous. Take an inappropriate analogy between 
the world. The emperor can drive the pro, but you have heard the emperor 
go. Undercover assassination? The reason why Xianjing can float in the 
sky is all you are supporting. All other priests can’t control it, you are in 


charge. You are there, the sky is not falling, you are not there, the sky is 
true. The collapsed." 


Jun Wu has a hand: "Xianle, in fact, there is no one in the world. If he is 
gone, he will collapse. If you get used to it, you will find that no one can 
still be there, there will always be new replacements. The old. The ghost 
king was born. If there is another **** rain or a black water sinking, it will 
be nothing, but if there is another white blame, then the world will be 
chaotic." 


He looked straight into the eyes of thankfulness and said: "You have seen 
it with your own eyes. How difficult it is to kill a ‘dead’ like him. There is 
no other way than to go.” 


Xie pity also knows that this 1s not a self-sufficient. In the weakest state, it 
is enclosed in the tens of thousands of ghosts, and it is necessary to pick 
out the most powerful ones one by one to kill or conquer them. Even if he 
is himself, he will not say that he can do it. Only Jun Wu, grasp the 
biggest. However, when he leaves, maybe it will take about ten years. 
What should I do outside? What about going to heaven? 


At this time, Huacheng Road: "Who said no other way?" 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 143: Copper 
furnace 


The next day, Xie Li and Huacheng set off on the road. 


Huacheng took the hand of thankfulness and said: "Brother, next time you 
see Jun Wu, don't tell him a word, run around and turn." 


Thanks for the pity: "Why?" 


Huacheng Road: "I know that every time he looks for you, there is no good 
job." 


Thanks and smiled: "How do you say this? What he originally sent to me 
is not this errand." 


Huacheng said: "The same. Whether you go to Tonglushan, or help him to 
control the heavens, which is a good errand? The heavens are now ruined, 
and they are scattered early. Lose such a mess to you, what is going on? 
It’s nothing more than choosing to commit suicide with a knife and suicide 
with a sword.” 


Thanks to pity, Junjun couldn’t help but laughed, and seriously said: 
"However, I did not expect that you would actually propose to accompany 
me to Tonglushan. I thought for a long time, I still have to say, Saburo, you 
must not reluctantly." 


He always felt that Huacheng was proposing to go with him because he 
knew what he was thinking. After all, thankfulness really feels that it is 
better to be locked up in the stove than to go to heaven and do things that 
he is not good at. Huacheng said: "Brother, I have repeatedly promised 
that I am not reluctant, do you not believe me?" 


Thanks to the pity: "Of course it is not..." 


Huacheng nodded, said: "That brother can rest assured, I have their own 
consideration. Do not feel that I owe my feelings. Even if I am completely 
in my position, I do not mind to plug him back before the new ghost king 
is born. ” 


In this case, the existing Ghost King and Shang Tianting have common 
interests. There are so many rice, everyone wants to eat, now it 1s not 
enough, and occasionally fight, and then a lot of new ones, no one 1s 
happy. And if this newcomer is to die, to be alive, and go crazy, everyone 
should not want to eat. 


After listening to the proposal of Huacheng, Jun Wu seriously considered 
it for a long time. If you are pity to go alone, it is certainly not as good as 
he is to grasp the big, but if it is a pity and a ghost king who has personally 
experienced it from Tongluoshan, this combination is worse than his own. 
Big. 


Of course, Huacheng will not go away. Junwu agreed to the conditions he 
opened: before the next mountain start, the entire heavenly world will go 
around the ghost city. Moreover, the whole court must inform the heroic 
deeds of blood and rain, and sing praises for a whole year... Xie pity 
imagined, probably like "you stupid priests! Know who saved you!" - this 
effect. It is simply to abuse the gods who are quite jealous and 
complicated in the flower city, and step on their faces on the ground. 


Huacheng smiled and said: "With me, you will be a lot easier in this trip." 


Pulling back my thoughts, thanking the pity: "I still feel that when you 
have passed the stagnation period and restore the original form, we will go 
again." 

Huacheng Road: "You don't have to worry about this. It's fast." 

Thank you for your pity, saying: "Ah..." 

Huacheng Road: "What? What is this look of my brother?" 


Thanks to pity: "...that is to say, Saburo is going to grow up?" 


Huacheng bears the hand: "Well. I have been holding back for a long time, 
I can't wait." 


Who knows, he just finished, thanked him and asked him to lift him up, 
his hands raised high, smiled: "That's a pity! When you grow up, you can't 
hold it, now you hurry and hug. Ha ha ha ha ha ha ha...... ‘ 


Going to Tonglushan, you can't use the shrinking ground, you can only rely 
on it. After a few dozen days, the two finally moved away from the town 
and the people, and entered the mountains, an endless, lush forest. 


The deeper the forest, the more monsters and ghosts the roadside 
encounters, the more grotesque, the sneaky, hurried. Xie pity took the 
flower city and whispered as he walked: "There is a lot coming." 


Huacheng Road: "There are more people gathered together than ever 
before. Because this time, the heavens did not stop, and many people who 
did not intend to come came." 


Moreover, there are not only single-shaped, but even hordes. After 
walking for a while, Xie pity met a large group of tattered demon ghosts, 
face-to-face, formed into an array, while walking and shouting: 


"The heavens and the earth are furnaces, and all beings are copper!" 
"The water is hot and hot, and it’s robbed!" 
"The heavens and the earth are furnaces, and all beings are copper!" 
"The water is hot and hot, and it’s robbed!" 


Listening to the tone of their drink, instead of being afraid, they are very 
yearning. When they heard the slogan of their slogans, Huacheng looked 
very cold and said: "I don't understand what this sentence means at all. It 
is more than anyone who is screaming." 


I want to come here, this is a lot of demons and ghosts that I have never 
seen before. I don’t know that it’s cruel, but it’s too easy to think about it. 
It’s full of ambition and makes the experienced people feel uncomfortable. 
Thanks to the pity: "Do you come in groups like this?" 


Huacheng Road: "This kind of thing 1s usually met early, and I plan to go 
to Mount Lushan. I have agreed to stay in the other party beforehand. But 
the agreement is not counted. Because it kills the last one, kill more than 
one. Power, killing one less 1s less vital. The easiest to start, of course, 1s 
the closest and trusting object." 


After he finished, he frowned slightly and grabbed his right eye. It seemed 
to start a headache again. Thanks to him, he flashed him to the side of the 
woods, kneeling down, slightly worried, said: "Saro, it is about to enter the 
mountain, you really don't matter?" 


Slightly calm down the eyebrows, Huacheng Road: "Brother is assured, 
normal. Soon it will be fine." 


Can you say that you can rest assured that you can rest assured? Huacheng 
said again: "Brother, come over, I have something to say to you." 


Thanks to the unclear, I really put my face closer. Huacheng held his face 
in both hands and gently put his forehead against him. Thanks for your 
pity, blinking, and stunned. When the flower city let him go, said: 
"Sanlang, you..." 


Huacheng smiled and said: "Okay. It's all ghosts here, my brother is a **** 
official, the smell will be obvious inside, so you can hide it a little." 


It turned out that this was the way it was, and it was the smell of his pity. 
Xie pity couldn't help but think of the situation of the two people who had 
"crossed the law and crossed the gas". I was afraid that Huacheng would 
also think of it. When I mentioned it, I was busy: "Okay. Let's all 
disguise." 


To be mixed into the ghosts, naturally do some camouflage. However, in 
fact, it is a cloak. There are many devils and ghosts who like to wear 


masks or cloaks. It is not unusual. The two simply dressed up, thanked the 
flower city, and slowly walked forward. After a long walk, there was a 
faint noise coming from the front. I don’t know what happened. Thanks to 
the pity: "Is there any landmark or something that tells you that you have 
entered the Copper Mountain?" 


Huacheng Road: "Yes. But don't believe in those things." 


Xie Pity is trying to continue to ask, but he is getting louder and louder. 
The two went out of the forest. It turned out that in front of a steep 
mountain wall, a large group of demons and monsters under black pressure 
were blocked in one place, and there were also three or four hundred 
people. However, this is just the tip of the iceberg where the ghosts gather. 


"How ts the road blocked? Is it because we have gone wrong?" 
"No... not that which road can lead to the Copper Furnace?" 


Perhaps it is because the boundary of the Tonglushan has not yet entered, 
and the killing has not officially begun. At present, the ghosts between the 
groups are still harmonious. Thanks for looking for a ghost next to him, he 
asked casually: "Excuse me, what's wrong with this?" 


The ghost said: "You don't have long eyes, you can't see it yourself? You 
are blocked by a mountain, you can't go." 


Xie pity looked at the ghost next to him, half of his head was cut off, this 
is the real price without long eyes. But he can't say anything, just saying: 
"Can't you go around?" 


At this time, a few ghosts came over from the side, spit a long tongue: 
"Mom, this mountain evil door! I ran for half of the time and I couldn't see 
the side! I ran for more than half an hour before I came back!" 


The ghosts thanked him: "No." 


Thanks again, "Can't you climb up or fly over?" 


The voice just fell, the sky "call" fell to the next seven-foot bird, " 
heavy on the ground, seems to be on the spot. There is a ghost shouting: 
"Hey! It’s a bird that can’t fly until it’s exhausted!” 


The ghosts thanked again: "No!" 
Thanks again, "That can't..." 


Before he finished, the ghosts rushed to him, and he wanted to seal his 
mouth: "Don't ask! You crow's mouth!" 


Thank you, "Okay." 


Hundreds of monsters and ghosts were blocked in the mountains and cliffs 
that could not be circumvented, overturned, and flying. The sounds were 
noisy and noisy, and they were very noisy. Some said: "I understand! This 
is not an ordinary mountain, but a barrier." 


Some said: "You, turn over this mountain, the back is definitely the 
Tonglushan. This mountain is probably the first test before entering the 
mountain. If even the simplest test of this road can't pass, the more behind 
it." Passed, it’s better to disperse it!" 

"and many more!" 

"What are you waiting for?" 

One voice wondered: "How do I... smell a strange smell?" 


"What smell? Is it that you bring the dead meat on the road to stink?" 


The voice said: "No, no. It's not dead, it's a living person! No, no, no! It's a 
bit like...the taste of a **** official!!!" 


As soon as this statement came out, a stone stirred up a thousand waves, 
and the group of ghosts shouted: "What?! Less nonsense, how can there be 


a **** officer?" 


"Ah! Wait... that... I smell it too!" 


"Tl didn't have it?" 


"If you say this, it seems that I am a bit too... | won’t have a sergeant 
mixed in?!” 


"Impossible... Which priest 1s so bold, come to this place?" 


After a dozen sentences, the pot was fried in all directions, and the heart 
was slightly lifted, but the face was quiet. 


Fang Cai, Huacheng has clearly helped him to cover up the smell of 
humanity, how can there be smell? It should not have been discovered that 
he was coming in. 


Huacheng held his hand and whispered: "Brother is careful, something is 
stirring up the water, and the machine is chaotic." 


Thanks to pity: "It is also possible that, besides me, there are really other 
sergeants who are coming in." 


At this time, the ghost who first mentioned the smell of people jumped on 
a big stone and said: "Everyone! Maybe the goddess of death in the 
heavens can't stop us on the road this time, and send people to the Boiler 
Mountain to the gangsters. The event, I suggest that everyone wearing a 
mask, wearing a cloak, and wearing a lot will take off first. In this case, 
whoever takes the aura, will be discovered at once, everyone will report it 
one by one, do not give They are coming in!" 


The group of ghosts applauded, and the ghost continued: "I will come 
first! I am the ‘death-killing knife,’ is the knives of the executioner. The 
murderer cuts the head and always uses only one knife!” 


" " 


According to Xie Li’s experience, in general, the more famous the name is, 
the more it is easy to bring words such as “peerless”, “thousand hands”, 
“invincible” and “death”. Being killed, usually a trick is enough, 


sometimes a trick can kill three. At the moment, at least a few hundred 


names were reported in a mess, and he shook his head as he listened. 
Suddenly, there was a ghost who hit him with his elbow and said, "Hey, 
why don't you take off your cloak? What are you?" 


This sentence is not intentional contempt, but if it 1s not a person, then it is 
called "something" and it seems that there is nothing wrong with it. In 
fact, there are many other ghosts who have not taken off their cloaks or 
masks. There is one near Chee, and they are holding their arms to look at 
them, but the name of the pray is still the first one. Seeing all around, he 
has to admit that he is unlucky. Slowly remove the cloak and sigh: "I am a 
teacher." 


The ghosts gathered around and said, "It turns out! It's no wonder that you 
are like a human being. I am the first to see the teacher!" 


Thank you for your smile. The sorcerer is a kind of demon ghost with very 
weak evil spirits. Because they want to do a perfect job, they will look for 
a variety of material tests, and the smell of something 1s not surprising. 
Because of their preference for human skin materials, their popularity is 
very heavy. The dream of the priests is to pluck the hair on the head of the 
priest, to make a wig for their own cockroaches, and some of them are 
really daring to try, so even the smell of the sage is not strange. 


The ghost asked: "What about your doll?" 

Thanks to the left and right, he bent over and took the flower city up. 
The ghosts are amazed: "Hey, so exquisite!" 

"What material? Hey, it’s pretty realistic." 

“T feel like a very good competitor...” 


"Which is very realistic, I think it looks a bit fake, the skin is too white. 
And how can the child's eyelashes be so long?" 


Although Huacheng holds his hands and looks expressionless, many 
female ghosts are still hit by the appearance of a heart that has long since 


stopped beating. "Will you die, a good doll!" "Do you accept the list?" Can 
I order the same one for you? The price 1s good to discuss." Some even 
can't help but want to reach out and touch. Xie pity quickly took the flower 
city back, and broke into his arms, and the crowd said: "It's so stingy! So 
baby, he doesn't touch it." 


Thanks to the left hand, the flower city was held tighter, and his right hand 
touched his hair. "Of course, this is my doll. And he has a strong temper. 
People other than me can't touch him, or he will be angry." "" 


Huacheng picked a brow in his arms, and the group of ghosts laughed and 
said: "Hey, he will raise his eyebrows and blame!" 


At this time, suddenly there was a voice saying: "I can't see it." 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 144: Copper 
furnace, mountain, ghost, come to 2 


Thanks to the slewing head, I saw that the speaker is the "death-killing 
knife." He said: "The popularity of you is too heavy." 


The group of ghosts said: "Well, you can understand. He also has ghosts on 
his body." 


Desperately fast knife magic: "No, everyone will take a closer look. The 


ghost of this is not from the inside out, but it is like... from the 
outside." 


Ghostly from the outside, it can be confusing, but once it becomes the 
focus of the crowd, the details will be magnified. This life-changing knife 
is not very good when it first comes out. It looks like the same day. Xie 
pity thinks that he is a small and insignificant little character. There 1s a 
ghost: "This seems to be very understandable. So is there any answer? In 
the end, how to judge? Do you have a way?" 


Desperate fast knife magic: "Yes. There is a prop, you can judge what he 
is!" 


He took out one thing from his sleeve. When the ghosts saw it, they retired 
a big circle and said, "Mama! You still carry the yellow character with 
you?! I see you are the priest who 1s coming in!" 


Desperately, the knife is savage and savage: "Wrong! Only when I came to 
kill a few Taoist priests, I just collected their things. This is just the most 
common Huang Fu, and can only deal with some little mobs. Small chop, 
everyone can come here, presumably this can not help you, look good!" 


When he finished, he slammed the yellow note on his forehead. Zizizi, the 
yellow character burned a black smoke in front of his face, and his 
forehead also left a black lacquered burnt. The knife quickly wiped out the 


burnt seal and said: "Although this can not help me, but still can leave a 
little print on my face. Can this prove my identity?" 


This kind of paper, although used to deal with demons and ghosts, can be 
used to distinguish people from people. The fast-cutting knife means 
thanking the pity: "If you are really a teacher, put this yellow note on your 
forehead. If you don't leave a seal, it's natural to know." 


Thanks for the quietness, the heart is flying, but I listen to the flower city 
Shen Sheng: "Nothing, brother." 


Thanks to pity, he was sure, so he put down the flower city, took it easy, 
took the sign, and posted it on his forehead. Just listening to a "Zizizi", the 
yellow character is also burned into a black smoke, but the black smoke is 
exhausted, but the forehead of the pity is still clean, leaving no trace! 


This proves that the ghost on him is contaminated from the outside! 


In addition to the man with the arm of the cloak, hundreds of ghosts 
instantly surrounded them in the middle, screamed and watched as many 
strange weapons would be greeted, but all of them were suddenly bounced 
off by an invisible barrier. The crowd was horrified: "Hey? The road is 
quite high!" 


Thanks for the hand: "I didn't do anything." 
At this time, the flower city standing behind him spoke. 


He took his hand and walked up and said, "You guys haven't seen the 
country's little devils, what a big fuss." 


"Hey, you have seen this big devil doll, have you seen a big world?" 
"There is no ghost in him, but the truth. Who are you, speedy!" 


Huacheng Road: "Non words, of course he does not. Because, I am the 
teacher!" 


As soon as the voice fell, the ghosts felt a chilly airflow sweeping through, 
as if the whole piece was frozen. They were originally chilly physiques, 
and they actually started to swear, saying: 
"..how...what...return...things...?" 


Huacheng Road: "Let you see the world a little." 


He took the momentum, and the ghosts were so easy to ignore. That kills 
the knife and the devil has a sigh: "You... you are a teacher, he is also a 
teacher. Who is it? No, he is definitely not, who is he?" 


Huacheng has not answered yet, but she politely smiled and said: "Of 
course, it is his person." 


The group was sneaky for a while and finally wanted to understand: 
"Original - turned upside down? He is the master, you are the doll?!" 


Desperately, the knife and the devil doubted: "What did you say before 
that was you a teacher? What is your liking?" 


Huacheng smiled and said: "Because, I find it interesting." 


Xie pity also smiled and said: "Yes. The owner feels interesting and is the 
most important reason." 


After the female ghosts were shocked, they put away the claws and 
tongues of the inquiring, and began to talk around with respect and pity. 
But I don't know what the reason is. When the female ghosts commented 
on him, it was a completely different style of painting when he discussed 
the flower city. It seemed to be a lot of arrogance. such as: 


"Is this little brother the only doll? Oh, I like this age, I want one more! 
Really not ordered?" 


Thank you for your kindness: "This...thank you. But, actually, I am very 
old..." 


"Is this material a human skin? It's quite clean. I don't live a man who 
smokes a dead man's Yang Sao | taste. Master, how do you care for him? Is 
there perfume?" 


Thanks to pity: "It's human skin. There is no perfume. Just take a shower 
and drink plenty of water." 


"Wow, this doll can be used to do a lot of things! All kinds of. The face and 
body are not bad? Looks like the skin feels good. But he is a little thin, I 
don't know if there is meat in the clothes. Hee hee hee...... ; 


Xie pity has always maintained a modest smile, and seeing that there are 
really female ghosts in the eyes to touch his chest, the eyebrows twitch 
slightly. Huacheng took **** and lifted it slightly. A circle of slender 
hands and hands were swept away by him. Thanks to pity and hurry to hide 
behind the flower city. The girls said: "What? You have to say, this is your 
doll, bad temper, don't like other people to touch? I think his temper is 
very good!" 


Huacheng stretched out his hand and provoked the sorrow of the pity, 
saying: "His temper 1s really good. But my temper is not good. I like 
things, no one but me, don't want to touch." 


Thanks for his gesture, he raised his face obediently, and smiled and 
endured the convulsions of the lower abdomen, but still very cooperative, 
looking at the eyes of Huacheng, sincerely said: "No. Three... The master 
is very good-tempered." 


Huacheng also laughed, seemingly very satisfied. The two sang one and 
one, and they were playing well. There was a ghost in the side. "I still 
think that the human taste on him is too heavy." 


The girls said: "What do you want?" 


That ghost said: "I heard that the stuffing inside the skinny doll is not flesh 
and blood. If you are smashed, you won't bleed. You let me ask him to try 
it..." The voice is not falling, it is scared by an eye knife. Out of voice. 


Huacheng cold channel: "Who dares to touch him and give it a try. 1am 
cherishing things in my heart, is it for you to move casually?" 


The group of ghosts was shocked by his gas field. At the moment, he 
directly threatened his voice. He did not dare to have any rash action. 
Unconsciously, he had already given a large area to the center. The singer 
of the singer was quick and the sword was not good. Instead, he started the 
round: "This sergeant should not be angry first. Now we have not entered 
the boundary of Tongluoshan. How can we say it after we go in? Woke up." 


Huacheng gaze at the side and said: "You are entangled with my doll. It is 
better to ask why the person over there is still unwilling to take off his 
cloak." 


Thanks to pity, there has been a cloak of cloaks, and for so long, he has 
never taken off his cloak, and he always stays with his arms and watches. 
After Huacheng picked him out, the play could not stand, and the 
protagonist became himself. Take a step forward and say: "Please ask this 
friend to take off the cloak, let us squat?" 


The cloaker paused for a long time, and when he prayed that he was 
waiting for an opportunity to escape, he suddenly reached out and 
slammed the cloak. 


Under the cloak is a handsome but unremarkable face. 


Such a person, thrown into the crowd, although not ugly, but will soon be 
forgotten, can not remember the face, causing the group of ghosts to see 
him after the face of the mountains are somewhat disappointed. However, 
the vigilance of thankfulness is coming up. 


Huacheng Road: "A look is a fake face." 


This voice can only be heard by thank you, thank you for nodding. 
Sometimes, some priests or famous ghosts have something to go to the 
mortal world. If it is not convenient to use the real body, a fake face will 
be formed. At this time, the essentials of the transformation are "plain and 
plain". Whether it 1s good-looking or not good-looking, the more plain the 


better, the more people must stare at this face for half an hour, and they 
can immediately forget it when they turn back. It 1s a successful 
transformation. The face of this cloak 1s perfectly in line with this 
essential, so this face 1s not the true face of him. I don't know what the 
identity of this person is. 


The fast knife magic handed out a yellow character. The cloak was picked 
up, and he did not hesitate to put a sticker on his forehead, nourishing, 
smoking, and leaving marks. 


It seems that he is also a ghost. 


After a round of laps, the ghosts were a little embarrassed, saying: "Is 
there any sergeant in the end?" 


"Who is the first one to ask? Can you make a mistake?" 


Desperately, the knife and the devil: "The first thing I found was me, it 
was true! I absolutely smelled the priest... ah!" 


Who knows, he said here, suddenly screamed and fell. Thanks for the pity, 
grabbed it and went to see it. There was actually a blood hole in his body, 
and the hole was worn in the lower abdomen. Moreover, the wound was 
really faintly immersed in the aura of the **** officer! 


The group of ghosts said: "Look at his wounds! There are really gods 
mixed in us!" 


The knife stunned the blood hole and panicked: "Everyone 1s careful! He 
wants to kill!" 


The ghosts were all shocked by this, as if they had blown up the pot, armed 
with weapons, and surrounded by hostility, they all shouted: "Who is it?! 
Who wants to destroy the mouth?! Where is it hidden?!" 


After the killing of the knife, the first thought that flashed in the heart 
was: "Sure enough, the person who called this kind of exaggerated name is 
often easy to be the first one to be killed!" "Everyone just saw it. My host 


and I have been staring at you all the time. We didn't do anything." He 
said, glanced at the cloak. The other party also raised his hand slightly and 
lowered his voice: "The same." 


Xie pity leaned over to see the wound of the fast knife magic, said: "It is a 
sword injury. There is a sword in the presence..." Turned his head and 
looked at it without words. The sword is not only the most popular weapon 
in the world and the heavens. It is also in the ghost world. In the four 
hundred monsters and monsters, at least three hundred are swords, and the 
number is countless. Xie pity and cough, said: "If there are a few more like 
Huang Fu to try all, I don't know who it is." 


Of course, he just talked casually and pretended to be very enthusiastic. If 
there is really a sergeant in the same place, he does not want to help out. 
This fast knife magic is also impossible to come up with so many yellow 
characters to spare. Who knows, he just finished, the fast-cutting knife 
really suddenly took out a few thick yellow letters, said: "Oh, yes!" 


" " 


Xie pity couldn't help but want to look at his back: "Where did you come 
from?" 


Desperate fast knife magic: "This is not important!" 


Thanks to pity: "No, this is very important. Generally, you don't have to 
carry so many heavy things with you. You can kill the bricks when you 
come... How many priests have you killed on the road?" 


Desperately, the knife is stunned and said: "Twenty." 


... that's no wonder. Even if each Taoist has only a few dozen yellow 
characters, there are hundreds of them added! 


Not much to say, the group is eager to find out who is the sacred officer 
lurking between them, quickly set the way, two or two groups, holding the 
yellow sign on the forehead, and then observe whether the opponent’s 
forehead is left There is a burnt seal. Some of the little devils saw that 


Huang Fu was still a little scared. He said, "Is it really going to be posted? 
Will it break my soul?" 


"No, it’s exactly the same as the one you just posted. It’s very weak, 
leaving only a lot of marks.” 


Huacheng blinked slightly and seemed to be aware of something. In a 
short while, there were more than four hundred ghosts, and the big yellow 
forehead was attached to the big forehead. It looked strange and funny. 
However, after posting, nothing happened. 


The group of ghosts looked at each other and said: "What happened?" 


"Hey, fast knife, what kind of priests are you killing? Is it water, the 
symbols don't work?" 


Thanks to the beginning, I felt awkward. At this time, I was slightly 
frowning, waiting to speak. A female ghost screamed at the side: "I don't 
post it, tear it... Hey? What happened? Why can't you tear it?? ” 


Several female ghosts all screamed at once: "Me too! Why can't I tear it 
off?!" 


Oops! 
At the same time, Huacheng Shen Sheng: "Brother, Your Majesty!" 


Thanks to the quickness, Huacheng quickly caught his ears. Not far from 
the cloak, he quickly pulled the cloak and squatted to the ground. Then, 
"Hey!" A burst of firecrackers and loud bangs rang through the sky! 2k 
novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 145: Copper 
furnace, mountain, ghosts, 3 


Xie Pity only felt that the violent fluctuations in the layers came from all 
directions, and an unspeakable strange smell filled the air. 


Those yellow characters, all of them exploded! 


And the monsters and monsters that put them on their heads, the solid 
heads were blown up by flowers, flesh and blood, and the hollow ones 
were directly blown out and the black smoke was scattered. Before the 
mountain wall, a ghost cried. Huacheng let go of the hand that shook his 
ears, and it seemed to have no effect. Xie pity stood up and was slightly 
shocked. Those who have seen Huang Fu have only seen them one by one. 
It is indeed the most common exorcism. How can there be such a horrible 
effect? 


At this time, the sky was dark and the sky was falling down with a piece of 
shredded paper. Thanks to the eyes and eyes, I quickly looked at it. When I 
got it, I saw it at the moment and said: "Well." 


This is a piece of debris of the yellow character. If it is not broken, it is 
impossible to see it. It actually has two layers! 


A layer of paper is covered on the top, the most common spell is drawn, 
and a layer of paper is extremely thin and thin. Although it has been burnt 
to see what is drawn, it does not mean that it must be the most vicious and 
powerful. Spell. 


The dust and smoke are flying, and the ghosts are still unclear. Many 
ghosts are still screaming constantly. It seems that anyone is taking the 
opportunity to attack. Xie pity immediately fell low, and the ghost 
shouted: "Wait! The killing has not yet begun, how do you start your 
hand!" 


"Yeah! It's not that everyone is a ghost. Before going in, go together and 
find a way to pass this mountain?!" 


A voice sneered: "You are such a fool, you should be removed in the first 
round! No one has ever said that when the specific killing starts, anyway, it 
is an opponent, of course, the sooner the better, the better! Also say hello 
to you in advance?" 


"Wait, wait! I quit! I haven't entered the Copper Mountain yet! Can I still 
quit now?!" 


"Do you think this is the place, if you want to come, you want to go and 
leave? Didn't enter the Copper Mountain? You have a good look, where are 
you now!" 


The smoke was slightly scattered, and after the group of ghosts could see 
it, they were shocked: "Ah?! How could this be?!" 


Not only them, but also pity was slightly shocked by the sight. 


When they came, the front was blocked by a mountain that could not be 
turned around and could not be turned over. However, at this moment, I 
don’t know when the mountain has disappeared. 


No, it didn't disappear, but moved behind them. 


It turned out that, unconsciously, they have already entered the boundary 
of Tongluoshan! 


Xie pity suddenly understood why he asked if there were any landmarks in 
Tongluoshan, Huacheng said, but don't believe them. Because these 


"landmarks", like children who like pranks, will move by themselves! 


Cold, Xie Pity heard a voice sneer behind his back: "I would like to see, 
are you a doll, or something else?" 


Desperate fast knife magic! 


Xie pity suddenly turned back, however, if the evil has not yet flown out, 
but see the cold flash, then the knife screams did not have time to send 
out, it was cut off! 


Thanks to the foresight, it was a bit of a sham, and it was really smashed 
into a neat two halves. This is really dead and can no longer die. He looked 
up and saw that the cloak was actually a cloak. He was slowly inserting a 
long sword into the scabbard under the cloak and steadily coming. 


Xie pity only felt that this figure and gait were familiar. He got up and 
asked, "What is your lord?" 


The man smiled low and seemed to be answering, but suddenly leaned 
over. Seeing this strange, thank you for the bells and bells, concentrating 
on guarding him to attack, but seeing that the man just leaned over, his 
hands left and right, holding the waist of two female ghosts, said: "The 
two girls can have something to do. ?" 


Thanks: "..." 


The appearances of the two female ghosts were quite good, because they 
did not make the sword, did not stick to the yellow, escaped, but they were 
still stunned by the explosion that was close at hand. At the moment, 
people are screaming into the arms and calling them in a deep affection. 
They woke up and thanked: "I am fine, thank you..." 


Unexpectedly, a "thank you" has not finished, the two female ghosts have 
changed their faces, and a slap in the palm of the cloak, said: "Go away!" 
Then hurriedly climbed to the side. The man was not annoyed when he was 
called by the two slaps. It just seemed strange. He touched his chin and 
frowned. "Should not? This face is not ugly?" 


Although he still did not fade the disguise, thank you already understand 
who he is, said: "Hey general, how come you?" 


The person turned to him, smiled slightly, and put a hand on his face to 
reveal the truth, it was! 


He said: "Nature is the emperor who asked me to give a little wish to the 
Prince." 


Thanks to pity: "Really? That's really embarrassing, you see it, it's quite 
dangerous here." 


Huacheng Road: "My brother doesn't need to be embarrassed. He must 
have no less benefits to Jun." 


He walked to the front of Huacheng, kneeling down and comparing his 
height with his current height, and smiled: "I didn't read it wrong. Is this 
the **** rain flower? Is it true that you don't look at it for three days, what 
do you eat? Going back long? Ha..." 


He only "had" a sigh of relief, thanked him for taking a look, and pumped 
him to almost fly out. fatal Dh Ser ry tay 


Thanks to the righteousness: "Are you really a general?" 


He patted the waist with a sword and showed it to him. He said, "If you 
change it." 


Thanks for your pity: "If you don't change, you can return it directly." 
Huacheng Road: "Brother, kill it, fake." 
Hey: "Hey!" 


Thanks to pity: "If you are really a general, how can Huang Fu leave a 
mark on your forehead?" 


He said: "It's very simple, it's all based on this." He said, he threw a little 
thing to thank. Out of alert, thank you for not picking up the hand, picking 
the sword and sending it to the front, saying: "Sugar?" 


On the tip of the sword, it is indeed a small black candy. He lost another 
one into his mouth and said: "The ghost candy **** bought in the ghost 
market are very useful when you chew a ghost. From the inside out, posing 
as a non-human thing." 


Thanks for picking up the ghost candy ball, the wonder: "Can the ghost 
market still buy this magical thing?" 


Hey, eat the sugar road: "Ask the flower city owner around you, he knows 
best. Everything can be bought in the ghost city, it depends on whether you 
have a doorway. It tastes good, also come to the Royal Highness Prince?" 


Xie Pity is also very curious about what it is like to eat. For Huacheng 
Road: "So, we should buy some of these ghost sugar **** before we 
come." 


Huacheng took the sugar ball in his hand and said: "My brother wants 
something in the ghost city. Just talk to me. But don't eat this thing." 


"Why?" 


Huacheng did not use any force at all, and the sugar ball screamed and 
turned into a black smoke. He said: "The things in the ghost city are very 
dangerous. For example, this sugar ball is from a black workshop. Most of 
the raw materials are inferior devils who are unclear. After eating, they are 
detrimental to the body." 


I don't mean it: "Fortunately, don't eat often, emergency." 


Huacheng continued: "And the taste is pungent. The gods and the people 
can't smell it, but the more inferior the devil, the more stinky the taste." 


Huacheng smiled and said: "So, you know, why are the two female ghosts 
calling you to go away?" 


" " 


Because they feel that the ghosts on the body are very inferior, very 
stinky! 


Xie pity and cough, euphemistically said: "General general, this ... or don't 
eat it." 


Can you see that I am 
not right, what should I do then?" 


The female ghosts are eager for the flower city, and they want to come 
because they like his smell very much. The ghost that Huacheng has given 
him is inevitably the top grade. There is no need to buy a ghost candy ball. 
However, if you want to be unaware of the ghosts that are contaminated 
from the outside, you probably still need to have the same teeth and fluids 
as before. When I think of it, thank you for letting me hurry, and I am 
really authentic: "I don't know. I am just a doll." 


It is the meaning of continuing to play. Ruan said: "Let's do. The Prince of 
the Prince may have to keep up with your master." 


Xie pity pretended not to hear, looked around, slightly indulged, said: "I 
did not expect that the opening casualties will be so heavy." 


Originally, there were more than 400 demon ghosts gathered here, and 
almost died in the chaos of the genius. Xie pity couldn't help but think of 
the scene that the night flower city showed for him. It was really no 
exaggeration. It was like a strong wind blowing, and the weeds were all 
scraped. The rest have escaped from the robbery, but still not dead, the 


sparse pull is less than a dozen, the limbs are falling, a piece of | 


Huacheng stood in front of them and said: "Do you know where the Boiler 
Mountain is?" 


The surviving group of ghosts did not dare to speak. Thank you for your 
kindness: "At the moment, you are still in the outer layer, you can still 


withdraw. If you don't want to go deeper and encounter more terrible 
things, just wait in this area and look for opportunities to leave." 


The group of ghosts are doing this, seeing that they have no intention to 
destroy their mouths, and they are quick to help, how far to avoid. Looking 
at the backs of those who had evacuated, thankful and thoughtful: "There 
is a great role in the name of the knife, but the name is a superb character, 
and it is a real role." 


He agreed: "This thing is extremely hard work, and it is stirring up the 
water at the beginning, and it is very quick and responsive. Your sword by 
the Prince has just given him the opportunity to display his bitterness." 


Thanks for a pity, said: "Wait, I ‘that sword’? Which sword do I have? I 
didn’t stab him?” 


Ruan said: "No? It is the sword on his lower abdomen. If it wasn't before 
he tried to create panic, then the wound was stained with your aura, and 
other demons and ghosts would not believe his words and stick to his 
head." 


Thanks for the pity: "I don't care, I thought that the sword was a general 
who stabbed you?" 


Ruan said: "Do you have any misunderstandings about my Royal 
Highness? You may not do a sneak attack." 


Thanks to pity: "It’s not that you are not me. Is it because there is a third 
priest in the place? Or is it that there 1s a problem with the aura of the 
knife?" He turned back and wanted to go again. Look at the confirmation, 
and the place where the fast-cutting knife is separated from the body is 
actually empty. 


He stunned: "What about the body of the knife?" 


He also stunned and said: "I have clearly divided him with a sword." 


Huacheng Shen Sheng: "Brothers are careful. In the Tongluoshan, the more 
opponents are killed, the stronger the slaughter will become." 


And just in the moment of the talent, the killing knife quickly killed nearly 
400 demon ghosts! 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 146: General 
Ming can regret the hate sword 


The corpse was full of land and the black smoke was floating. 


After the mountain gods moved unconsciously behind them, the road 
ahead finally showed up. The thick layers of the black forest are very 
horrible, and several old crows are heard from time to time. Thanks for the 
pity, the whole body sensed and watched, and did not intend to hold the 
hand of Huacheng. Who knows, this grip has found a bad news. 


Huacheng is a ghost. At this moment, his body temperature 1s hot, as if he 
had a high fever. Xie pity immediately whispered, immediately whispered: 
"Sanlang, you... are you going to change back?" 


Although Huacheng burned hot from his forehead to his fingertips, his 
look remained the same, saying: "Come on." 


The flower city is going to change back, and it is definitely good news in 
the current situation. But the moment he officially returns to the prime 
minister, it must be the most important and most critical moment. Xie pity 
took the initiative and said: "Set the array! I will protect you." 


He said that he started to do it. He ordered Ruozhi to circle a four-foot 
circle around Huacheng, and then insert the heart into the circle. In front 
of the circle, it was the "door lock" of the town circle. Huacheng hit a seat 
on the ground and said: "Brother, you are holding your self-defense." 


Thanks to pity: "No, this line can't be sloppy. There must be a piece of 
blood that has been smeared with human blood..." 


Before I finished, I felt that something was smashing behind me. Looking 
back, I was speechless. I saw a small silver scimitar standing behind him, 
screaming at the big silver eyes, smashing him with a shank, and seemed 

to recommend himself in the donkey. 


"..."" Xie pity down, said: "Eh, how did you become like this?" 


The famous scimitar is arrogant, the blade is slender, and the evil spirit is 
frivolous. At the moment, at least half of it is shrunk. The silvery eyes 
were originally long and narrow, and now they seem to have become 
children's eyes. They are big and round, fluttering and flashing. Listening 
to thanking them, it seems a bit wronged, but still trying to put the handle 
on his hand. Send it. He also bowed down and said: "This is the famous, 
curved knife?" 


As I said, I wanted to reach out and touch it. I suddenly turned my face and 
the blade threatened to align him. Fortunately, I was so fast, otherwise I 
was sure to see blood on the spot. Thanks for the grief, he said, "Let's let 
the heart go." 


The heart is still moving, but the initiative to devote himself to being 
screamed and screamed back to Huacheng. Huacheng does not look at it, 
the backhand is a palm, said: "Cry and cry. Not all you are useless. Waste!" 


The embarrassment fell to the ground like a rotten man who didn't want it, 
and seemed to be stunned by his palm. Thanks for the pity and tears, I 
quickly put my life in my arms and took two. I said, "No, no. Don't listen 
to him, you are not a waste, you are very useful!" 


I really can't see the atmosphere in the circle. I went out to the circle and 
slowly pulled out the sword again. "I didn't think it was so nervous. I didn't 
expect to encounter such a tricky character. Prince." His Royal Highness is 
really good." 


Their group of people came to Tongluoshan, in order to take the lead in 
eliminating the possibility of becoming a non-human thing, to find a 
powerful role, thank you for not knowing whether it is luck or bad luck. 
Huacheng said: "Why did the generals think that it was the luck of His 
Royal Highness? You never thought about it. Is 1t possible that the fast- 
cutting knife is coming to you?" 


Hey, laughing and laughing: "If that is a female ghost, I believe that I am 
coming to me." 


Who knows, he hasn't laughed for a long time, his face has changed and he 
has jumped to one side. When he looked up again, the blood ran down the 
cheeks. 


On the sly face, there was actually a blood mark! 


He touched his face incredulously, and the entire palm was stained with 
blood. This is not a small bruise. The two were only concentrating on the 
alert. However, thankful and innocent, did not feel the murderousness 
against their own, honestly said: "Looks like... it seems that you are 
coming to the general." 


I am waiting for the opening, and the sound of the sharp-cut wind hits 
again. This time he was prepared to guard against the sword. This sword, 
really smashed something, there is a figure in the air, it should be split 
into two sections, the landing of the cockroach, half of the upper body, half 
of the lower body, the upper body lying on the ground, staring at the eyes. 
It’s the killing knife! 


He walked over and stepped on his chest. The tip of the sword touched his 
throat and said, "What the **** are you?" 


This thing used to say that he was the singularity of a scorpion knives. If it 
was, after being smashed into two paragraphs, it should be beaten back to 
the original form. Which knife can be folded into two pieces and can be 
used as a blessing? 


Who knows, the fast knife magic suddenly double eyes, sneer, and 
smashed the sword with bare hands! 


"the eyes are wide open. 


Not only him, but also pity is almost a general reaction. 


is the officially rising martial art, even in the Bronze Mountain, 
mana is suppressed to a minimum, his magic weapon should not be so 
easily cut off! 


Desperate fast knife magic haha said: "The sword of such a waste, you can 
get it by hand!" 


The sword has been broken, and immediately the sword is used to 
represent the sword. The fast knife magic has a left hand on the ground, 
and it vacates, and the right hand is close to the five fingers. Wherever he 
was in the palm of his hand, there was a clear flash of metal, and it was a 
wind with a sharp blade. It can be seen that his true body is really a sharp 
weapon! 


Xie pity stood in the circle, wanting to go out to help out, Huacheng 
stopped him, Shen Sheng: "Brother, look carefully." 


He also said: "You don't have to step in!" He is a martial **** in the north. 
If you can't even beat a knife demon in the outermost layer of Tonglushan, 
how can you pass this heart? 


However, although the fast knife has only one upper body, it is extremely 
flexible, but no matter where he beats, he seems to be able to predict it 
first, which is very unfavorable to him. After hundreds of strokes, there 
have been dozens of wounds on the body. Xie Pity can't stand it anymore, 
said: "General General, come to your advanced circle!" 


His face is getting more and more ugly. He refused to withdraw, and he 
couldn’t help but rush to go up and help him fight two. For some martial 
arts, it is an insult to ask for help when you are one-on-one. Xie pity only 
said: "Hey general, come back first! Are you strange that you haven't 
found it? This person is completely familiar with your sword and body 
method!" 


I naturally found this, but I can't believe it for a while. But even the 
gratitude of the onlookers can be seen. If you don’t believe, you have to 
believe. Xie pity pulled out his heart and briefly opened a gap. He took the 
opportunity to jump back into the circle and his face was extremely bad. 
Xie pity re-inserts the heart and said: "Hey general, your magic weapon Is 
broken, don't you come back?" 


I wiped out the blood on my forehead and said: "That's not my magic 
weapon. It's just a handy one." 


Hearing words, thank you for your relief. Although a sword that you pick 
with you should be very valuable, at least it cannot be compared with the 
magic weapon. He added: "Why did the generals come here without a 
magic weapon?" 


He said: "I didn't make it." 


Xie pity is even more strange: "Why?" Generally, the martial arts will 
choose to sculpt their most sturdy weapons into magic weapons, so that 
they will naturally become more powerful at the time of the attack. I 
haven’t answered yet, and the fast-cutting knife has been screaming coldly. 
“That’s natural because the sword he used best has long gone!” 


Emei Yu condensed and said: "Who, who is it?" 
Thanks: "You don't ask him what is it?" 


Desperately, Knife Devil said: "Who am I? Ha! Hey, you broke my hand 
when you were in the first place, but I expected to have today?" 


Thanks for the slightest blink of an eye, said: "Hey General, do you know 
him?" 


After thinking for a long time, the look became more and more condensed, 
and he tried to say: "You are... Mingguang?" 


Hearing the name, the knife quickly caught a smile. At this time, he looks 
very different from the devil who was at the beginning. Thanks to the pity: 
"He is called 'Mingguang'? General, isn't you the general of Mingguang?" 


For a moment, there were countless incredible stories in his mind, such as 
impersonation, stalking, and so on, but it was not ridiculous because of the 
many previous records in heaven. He couldn't help but think: "Isn't it 
another teacher?" 


He seemed to see what he was thinking, and screamed at the wound: "His 
Royal Highness, what are you thinking about, I said that I am a sergeant 
general. I am myself!" 


Thanks to the pity: "What do you call him Mingguang?" 


Ruan said: "Because he was originally called Mingguang. This is my 
name. He is my sword!" 


Thanks for the "ah", said: "Is it wrong - “General’s sword?’” 


Ruan said: "Yes. ‘Mingguang’ is the sword that I used to be a man. I was 
broken by my hand hundreds of years ago!” 


No wonder! 


It is no wonder that this "death-killing knife" is very familiar with the 
swordsmanship of the scorpion, as if he can see what he is going to do 
next. It is no wonder that it was clearly divided into upper and lower 
halves, and it was still free to move. The wounds in the abdomen did not 
affect him. It is only because this sword has been followed by countless 
victory in the Northern War in the South. It is naturally clear that the 
habits and routines are clear; because he had already been folded into two 
sections! 


Thanks to pity: "So, the sword wound before, is he stabbing himself? What 
is the aura on the wound?" 


He said: "My. When I folded him, I immediately flew up. I thought it 
would be there at that time, and I couldn’t fade it." 


Desperate fast knife magic - no, Mingguang, began to use the hand as a 
knife, look at the heart to the heart. His face was sullen, as if he was 
cutting himself. Xie pity could not help but say: "That... General, what is 
your sword doing so much grievances to you? What have you done to him? 
What is the general's sword?" 


While rubbing the medicine bottle on his body, he said: "What happened 
hundreds of years ago, what is he doing now? First try to get him back!" 


Although there is a circle of evil, but once the heart is cut off, this array 
will break more than half, just like the lock, only the door. After praying 
for hope, Huacheng has been meditating and closed, and it seems that the 
outside world is not aware of it, and he 1s relieved. The sly voice pulled 
him back and said, "His Royal Highness, can your sword stand up?" 


Thanks for turning back, said: "I don't know, after all, the heart is very 
old." 


Ruan said: "It doesn't matter, the age of Mingguang is also very big." 


Thanks for a sigh of relief, said: "In this case, as long as there is no other 
help, it should be able to support for a while..." 


Who knows, the voice has not fallen, there is a very heavy footsteps in the 
forest. In a short time, a big man with a brutal armor, a look of sorrow and 
a dark skin appeared in front of several people. 


The big man was very tall, and when he saw him, both pity and sorrow 
shed a drop of cold sweat. 


The big man saw that there was a personal hand on the side of the sword 
that was inserted on the ground. It seemed a little surprised and came over. 
Thanks and pity, he smothered his face and turned to the side. When 
Mingguang saw a giant corpse coming over, it seemed to have a lot of 
strength. He shouted to him: "Hey, big man, help me! Help me to knock 
out this sword and break this battle. The inside head is half yours!" ” 


However, the big man seems to be born in the Central Plains. He is not a 
ghost of the Central Plains. He can't speak. He can't understand what he 1s 
saying, but he also shouts at him. The two sides were facing each other for 
a long time and did not understand what the other party was saying, but the 


blue veins were more and more skyrocketing. Try to make your face 
look more natural and more awkward, whisper: "His Royal Highness, what 
is this barbarian called?" 


Xie pity also whispered: "He thought that your sword was provoking him, 
angry, and said that he would ask for mercy, or else he would be killed." 


Ruan said: "Great. I hope they will fight quickly." 


Who knows, the big man seems to have heard their whispers, turned his 
head and stared at them and frowned. Thanks to pity and swearing to make 
his face more rigid, pretending that nature can't take care of it. However, 
the great man still recognized them, and the whole ground was shaking 
with a slap in the face. He shouted: "It's you! Stop the rotten priest! The 
boss of the shack!" 


Seeing that he was recognized, the two had to put down their hands. After 
a moment of deliberation, thank you for using the half-moon language 
tone: "Engrave the general, you calm down." 


This strange big man, naturally, 1s the engraving of the copper furnace and 
the ghosts. He was caught up by Xie Pity. Later, he also saw the shackles 
standing on the side of the squatting in the interrogation. The enemies met 
and were extraordinarily jealous. If they didn’t say anything, they kicked 
their hearts to the heart, and the sword smashed an inch! 


When I saw it, I clap my hands and said, "Don't be brave!" Seeing that 
Fang Xin was shaking more and more under the attack of these two people, 
Xie pity explored the forehead of Huacheng, and immediately retracted his 
hand, saying: "How can this be good!" 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 147: General 
Ming can regret the hate sword 2 


Thank you for giving the city a way to protect the law. And in the face of a 
weapon that is most familiar with him, it is not a threat! 


At this time, I suddenly heard the light snoring: "This ghost is a man! Can 
you not swear when I am jealous? I am afraid of the old man!" Seeing that 
the two people had slight friction, thanked and pity, and said: "General 
General! I don’t believe that you are not malicious to him. You must find a 
way to talk about it! You are close to your hands and fingers, and your 
wrists are crossed overhead. Press down from the top of the head and then 
separate. This is their common gesture of summing up. In short, tell him 
your kindness and let him stabilize!" 


Hey, inexplicably, said: "Ah?" You must know that the enmity between 
them and the engraving is not a small misunderstanding of small troubles. 
Is there a gesture that can be summed up? How can he keep him steady? 


Xie pity could not help but say, grab him and said: "Come, let me do this 
with me first, let him stop!" 


However, his hand was hurt, he was caught by him, his mouth was slightly 
pumped, and he was trying to do it. Mingguang had already listened to all 
of their words, grabbed the face in front of him, crossed his hands over his 
head, and made a stroke. With your hands apart, the two people in the 
circle proudly said: "It's not that easy!" 


Who knows, seeing him in this movement, his eyes are round and round, 
the iron-black skin is covered with blue veins, and his five fingers are 
open. A slap is like an iron fan, and he directly shoots out the light. 


The moment the slap was thrown out, and Mingguang did not 
understand what happened. I have to turn around and I will turn around. I 
am grateful to you: "His Royal Highness, I thought that Mingguang was 


very embarrassed. I didn't expect you to be more embarrassed than him. I 
admire it." 


Thanks for a cold sweat, said: "Where, where." 


It’s just like saying something to the audience, but actually speaking to 
Mingguang. After Mingguang heard it, in order not to let them wish, they 
will surely preemptively show them. However, this action of thanking the 
pity is not a summation, but a provocation. Moreover, it 1s the most 
aggressive type of provocation in the half-moon language. It is roughly 
equivalent to the power of "cracking your dog's head, swearing|your wife, 
killing your whole family, and planning your graves." After the engraving, 
no Fury is strange. If you change the situation, Mingguang may still doubt 
its authenticity if he hears the pity, but now the situation is urgent, and the 
sly hand has already lifted up quickly, and he is not allowed to ponder. 


Mingguang was quickly reacted after being shot and flew, and wanted to 
remedy, but the language was unreasonable. He instinctively yelled and 
looked more like a curse. He also tried a few other gestures, such as 
squatting and thumbs up, but this is equivalent to a person who has just 
used the most sinful words to swear by you, and suddenly asks for mercy, 


itis too insincere, or A few fists. In addition to engraving and knowing 
some shallow swear words in the Central Plains, while playing and 
smashing, Mingguang is also annoyed. The two of them are playing more 
and more, and they simply want to cheer for them. The eyes of the bright 
eyes swept here, very annoyed, suddenly reaching out, shaking and 
shaking, pointing to themselves, then pointing to the pity and sorrow in the 
ring, facing them both, re-doing the fork hand Separate action. 


The engraving stopped, and frowned and asked: "Are you doing it to me or 
doing it?" 


Thanks for your poor feelings, but I don’t dare to speak out, because I 
can’t hold back if I’m not sure. Mingguang saw a turnaround and 
continued to work hard. When he turned to the squat, he repeated the 
action and turned to calm. With the look of the eyes, so repeated, the 
engraving really understood his meaning: 


The same enemy! 


After reaching an agreement, Mingguang and engraving once again forced 
the circle. Thanks for your eagerness, and took a deep breath, and shouted 
in half a month: "Small General! Half a month!" 


As soon as I heard these two names, I smothered my footsteps and sighed: 
"Is both of them nearby?!" 


Xie pity did not answer him, only called: "Little General! Half a month! 
Engraved here, you must not come over, run away! Never come back!" 


He shouted, and naturally thought that the two were really nearby, and Xie 
Li was giving them a ventilating letter, informing them to run away, and 
immediately angered: "Not so easy!" After shouting, he rushed out, 
Mingguang said: "Hey! Big guy! What are you running?! He must have 
lied to you, come back!" 


However, the engraving has run far, and the anger is clear and stunned: 
"Idiot!" 


Thanks for the second cold sweat, my heart is heartfelt: "Learning a 
language, you will benefit all the time!" And seeing Mingguang want to 
continue to beat the heart, he raised his hand: "And live! Come again, we 
will You are welcome." 

Ming Guangdao: "How can you treat me now?" 

Thanks: "You, have you forgotten to bring something?" 


Mingguang said: "What?" 


Hey, he wants to stop, pulls out the same thing from behind, and says, 
"Can you forget such a big thing?" 


He was dragging, and it was a pair of two human legs with a small waist. 
When I saw it, I looked at it and said, "Ah? My lower body!" 


Fang Cai, he has always been in the palm of his hand, holding his hands 
and jumping, unconsciously used to this kind of action, actually 
completely forget that he has not yet received the lower body. And he and 
the engraved and beaten a lot, went out and dragged the second half of the 
ground, unable to move into the circle, threatened: "You better not act 
rashly." 


However, this threat is very embarrassing. Because, if the hostage is a 
complete person, when you say this sentence, you can put your hand on the 
neck of the other person, or grab the other person's heavenly cover, so the 
picture 1s very powerful, not to talk about it. However, now they only have 
one lower body in their hands. So, where should his hand be placed in 
order to not be embarrassed and shocked at the other side? 


I couldn't think of it, so I had to step on his foot. Mingguang said: "Are 
you kidding me?" 


Xie pity also feels that this is too serious and euphemistic: "The general is 
not convincing, can you... let him think you caught his key?" 


Ruan said: "His Royal Highness, you should not say so light, if you are not 
willing to do the inferiority of the product, do you think I want to step on 
the foot? It is better for you to catch his key." 


In short, both are unwilling to grasp this key point. Thanks for your pity: 
"But it. We are not like this!" 


After a moment of discussion, the two men seized one leg of Mingguang. 
There is more deterrence under this, and it is not awkward. Thanks for 
your pity: "Please retreat. Otherwise, your real body will probably be 
folded again." 


Mingguang sneered: "Ha! Do you really think that my lower body is 
useless?" 


As soon as the voice fell, Xie Pity felt a murderous move up the palm and 
quickly climbed up. Immediately, he said: "The general is careful!" 


The lower part of the original dead body was actually too late to prevent, 
"brushing" flying out of the two feet. He also smashed his hand in time, 
and this was not kicked by the two feet with the wind of the blade. The two 
legs turned over in the air, and the ground first landed on one knee, then 
slowly stood up and set himself up in the same place. These were actually 
very neat, quite posture, thank you for your help: "Good. "When you finish 
it, you change your mind immediately. "Not good!" 


What is good. He was struggling to set up a protective ring, just to prevent 
the light from coming in. This is wonderful. Although the upper part of 
Mingguang is still outside, the lower body has already entered! 


He also woke up and said: "The meter is counted." 


This kind of real body is divided into two demon monsters, some are only 
half of the head can move, and some are two halves can move. It is 
impossible to confirm which kind of Mingguang belongs to him, but his 
lower body has always been dead and heavy. He was stepped on and did 
not move. He thought it was the former. He wanted to come but he 
deliberately pretended not to move. Mingguang clapped his hands outside 
the circle and smiled: "Yes! This is called taking the wolf into the room 
and catching it!" 


Now the three people in the circle, Huacheng closed their eyes and 
meditated, and they were in a critical juncture. The sword of the scorpion 
was cut off by the light. The heart of the pity was filled with the lock of 
the protective array. Both of them were unarmed, and thanked the pity: " 
Eternal life!" 


The scimitar, which fell to the ground like a tatter, immediately stood up 
in the same place and flew to the hands of Xie. Thanks for holding the 
handle, the sickle smashed, the lower part of Mingguang kicked out, took a 
knife, stepped back two steps, almost out of the circle, the upper body was 
outside the circle, the look changed slightly, it seems some taboo, pat the 


palm The lower body returned to the prototype, and a nearly three-foot- 
long Qingfeng murdered in the air. 


Xie pity does not use a knife, but the embarrassment is in the hand, it is 
quite handy, just waiting to be greeted, but he said: "His Royal Highness, 
Zhai is not deliberately messing up at this time, but your flower city owner 
seems to have made a point. problem?" 


Thanks for the pity, looking back, sure enough, Huacheng Metyu was even 
worse, and his hands on the knees were also trembling. He was distracted, 
and the broken blade was ready to stab. At this time, the ego was separated 
from the control of Xie Pity, and greeted the "squeaky" in the air and the 
broken sword! 


Thanks for your pity: "I am in trouble, trouble you to support it first!" He 
said to the flower city, "How can this be? What is the problem?" 


He said: "You don't want to ask me if you are a Prince. You are not 
familiar with the ghost king!" 


Thanks to Huacheng Road: "Sanlang? Can you hear it? Don't bear it, come 
out!" 


At this time, I only listened to the light outside the circle and said: "A 
knife, I dare to stop me!" 


Between the talks, there is a dozens of clashes between the light and the 
broken edge and the moment of anger. If it is a flat knife, it will naturally 
prevail, but now, before the long, bright sword, the shrinking water looks 
really like a child playing with an adult, although fierce, but because of the 
hands and feet. Not long enough, it is inevitably limited. There were times 
when the situation was very critical. I was relieved to take a look back and 
said, "Be careful!" 


After he shouted, his life turned into a silver whirlwind and cut the blade. 
The light outside the circle "Ah!", it seems that this is not cut down. 
Thanks and pity: "Good life!" 


Suddenly said: "Wait, Your Royal Highness, I feel like you boast it, it 
seems to be getting bigger?" 


Thanks for your close look, said: "Really?" 
He said: "It seems to be. Or else you try again?" 


Anyway, it’s just exaggeration. Thanks for your pity: "Okay. Elder life, 
listen well: you, handsome, cute, kind, intelligent, gentle and strong, the 
world is the first..." 


When the voice did not fall, he stopped. The bangs swelled, and the light 
outside the circle was unbelievable, and the anger was ruined: "And this 
kind of evil | surgery? I never heard it!" 


Half a bit is not fake! Thanks for each exaggeration, the shape of the 
errand is a long one. If you say that you are like a ten-year-old child, at the 
moment, it is probably a 14-year-old boy! 


The broken blade is a little bit bigger, and it seems that it can't cope with 
it. The left and right sides are squatting, and the errands are more erratic 
and strange. Seeing the outcome is about to be known, the light outside the 
circle is better than the law. At first glance, immediately said: "No, he 
passed all the mana of the first half to the bottom half!" 


Sure enough, the broken blade in the circle suddenly became black and 
strong, and the embarrassment hit a knife, and it was bounced off by the 
black air that could not be opened, and slanted into the ground, thanking 
the pity and pulling it out | Road: "Are you okay?" 


Shouted: "Nothing, look at me." He said that he had taken his life from his 
hand. Xie pity was strange, and suddenly there was an ice on his face. He 
slammed his face on his face, and the handle was just photographed on his 
mouth. 


"..."" Xie pity took down the embarrassment and licked the edge of the lips 
that were photographed slightly numb, and wondered, "Hey general, what 
do you mean by doing this?" 


Ruan said: "Of course it makes sense, Your Royal Highness, please look 
down." 


Thanks for pity, bow down, no words on the spot. The embarrassment 
actually became slender again! 


Mingguang couldn't help but yelled outside the circle: "Mom, what 1s this 
evil|Surgery? You can make it out at once!" 


Thanks to pity: "I don't care, I want to know, this is what it is." 


The spirit of the eagerness jumped up and cut off again to the light. A 
sword and a sword, fighting in the air. Thanks for revisiting the flower city, 
I looked at the bright light that was not far away. At the moment, all the 
powers of Mingguang are passed on to the lower half of the fight, and this 
upper body is really threatening. Several people were aware of this 
incident. When they got up and were preparing to go out and take him, a 
deep footstep flew and came. It was carved and returned. They hated: "You 
are the Central Plains Taoist, and Lying, you have been ruined for a 
lifetime! They are not here near!" 


Xie Liben did not expect to be able to deceive for a long time, but he came 
back earlier than he thought. This festival can be difficult. Mingguang is 
overjoyed and refers to Fang Xindao: "Big man, fast! The sword is 
knocked down and broken, and the people inside are gone!" 


There is no need for him to remind him, he has a slap in the palm of his 
hand, and his heart has been smashed by two inches; another palm has 
been smashed two inches; another palm, the heart has fallen! 


The protective array was finally broken! 


The broken blade is no longer fighting with the embarrassment, flying out 
of the circle, returning to the light and turning into two legs, connecting 
into a complete human form. Mingguang jumped up, patted and grinded, 
pointed to the cockroach, pointed to himself, and then pointed to 
thankfulness and fingering. It is clear that this is the meaning of the prey. 


Nod, a pair of iron-bag-like fists creaked, and walked toward the blessing 
in front of Huacheng. 


Mingguang sneered at the side while moving his legs. "Hey, aren't you 
going to fold me again? Come and try it?" 


I don’t speak. Mingguang sneered: "The generals are folding swords, the 
generals are folding swords, hehe! It's really a beautiful talk. This kind of 
thing can actually become a beautiful talk! It can be seen how blind the 
sky is." 


Ruan said: "I never thought of it as a beautiful talk." 


Ming Guangdao: "Crap! Killed many brothers and subordinates who have 
followed you for so many years, and you know best in your own heart." 


At the same time, the engraving also forced me to pray. Xie pity took the 
life, but he was not afraid of him. He just worried that he would not pay 
attention to it. Seeing that his eyes are not condensed, he seems to be 
thoughtful. "You don't have to think about intrigues. I won't be deceived 
again if you say anything!" 


Thanks to pity: "I didn't lie to you. It was really in this area before half a 
month and General Xiaox1, but after I informed them, they all left. Hey, 
half a month? How come you are here?!" 


Engraved and angered: "Do you treat me as a fool? This stupid trick..." 
The voice did not fall, a voice rang above him: "Engrave!" 


This sentence is a half-monthly language and is a very familiar voice. 
Grinding immediately raises his head and falls into a group of purple-red 
things. When he arrived, his face changed a lot and he shook his head: 
"Get out!" 


The one that fell down is the special snake of the half moon country, the 
irish! The person who throws it out is naturally the national teacher of the 
half-moon country. 


Half a month leaping from the tree, falling to the side of Xie Li, said: 
"Flower General..." 


Xie pity grinds: "I have told you long ago, it is really half a month..." 


I don’t even listen to what he is saying, but he swears for half a month: 
"You throw me!! You throw me with the pigtails! You know that I hate the 
snakes the most, you still use it to throw me!! !" 


Half a month down the road: "I'm sorry...but I will only throw the snake..." 


Mingguang also saw that things have changed, and he is alert to the truth: 
"Who is coming!" 


A black figure fell from the tree and stopped in front of him. He said: "The 
former Mingguang Temple is a deputy Wu Shenguan, and stays!" 


Heaven fell to the squad, and suddenly said: "Small ? How come you 
ran here?" 


Xie pity said: "Half a month, are you not following the rainmaster?" 


I heard the words of the Rain Master, and I frowned slightly. Half Moon 
Road: "Well, so this time is also with the rain master." 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 148: General 
Ming can regret the hate sword 3 


Mingguang looked at it and said: "Are you a small sister?" 


: "It's me." 


Mingguang blinked and looked at the half moon, mocking: "I heard that 
you lost the position of the priest for a little girl? Haha, hey, you are not 
always the most respected brothers such as brothers and sisters, women 
like clothes? How are you? This later person, is not like you at all? You 
pick a woman's eyes, he did not learn 10%, this half-month national 
teacher with a little like, what is it? It will not be you hundreds of years 
ago Wearing a green hat, it’s not your own kind of life, hahahahaha..." 


: "Fully nonsense." The carving also leaped from the ground and 
said: "I am not in opposition to you!" 


Mingguang shouted: "Hey! Big man, let's go all the way!" 


After a moment of grinding, I saw that the light leaped and turned into a 
long-blade Qingfeng, flying into his hands. Grinding the big iron-like 
palm, holding the hilt firmly, the huge body, a burst of black air! 


The murderer holds the magic sword, just like the beast is poisonous! 


Just before the slap in the face, I was inspired to give thanks. Although I 
don't know the exact principle, he feels that maybe the same way can help 
Huacheng. I don't think anyone else has noticed the sneak peek and 
Huacheng's anger. See if there is any relief, see the situation is critical, 
have to say: "Beware. !" 


It is not good to join the battle group, only the squatting, half-moon force 
together. Although the two people's body is a fierce and abrupt, a 
whirlwind, but also the body can not be done, the shackle can not force, 


half a month without brute force, on both the mana, but also brute force 
and light, slightly hard. 


After half a month had been honed, I was embarrassed to throw a snake to 
him again, but I couldn’t afford a little bit of it. I lost my snake and rained, 
and I was so angry that I couldn’t even scream, thanks to the 
swordsmanship of Mingguang. Make those snakes not close. However, 
despite this, she was relieved to watch the battle for a while, but she was 
relieved. Because he saw it, the cooperation between engraving and bright 
light was not good. 


Engraving in the half-moon country is to make the mace. He used to use 
heavy and large weapons, but he was not so good with a sword. Even if he 
is very powerful, the weapon in his hand 1s also very sharp. Together, he 
may not be able to exert the strongest effect. He will not be able to touch it 
for a while. So, thank you for taking the opportunity and facing the flower 
city. In the tenth, said: "offended!" 


However, looking at the small face of the eyes closed, Xue Bai Ming Jun, 
Xie pity always felt difficult to start, so it is easy to make up their minds, 
close eyes to meet, a nervous, but involuntarily kissed the flower center's 
forehead. Gently, it was very soft, but his heart was broken. One voice 
said: "You are wrong with your Royal Highness, what is the use of the 
forehead!" 


Xie pity did not give this sound to the ground, and looked back, kneeling 
beside him. He rarely said awkwardly: "Hey general, can you watch it!" 


He raised his hand: "Well, don't look." Turn around and look at the fight. 
After watching the battle for a while, he grinds: "This sword is not for you. 
If you don't use it, don't use it!" 


I can't understand it, but the light in his hand says: "I can't compare you, 
fold the sword with your own hands, and now you are standing next to it 
like a waste!" 


He just shouted, but he suddenly flew into the battle group and landed in 
front of him. I slashed my sword and went to listen to it. I only heard the 


sound of "squeaky". This sword didn't have anything in it. He looked down 
and couldn't help himself. 


The Mingguang sword in his hand was broken again! 


Taking advantage of this opportunity, 1t was a big wave of rattlesnakes 
thrown over. It was like splashing a large tank of dyes, and it was all 
purple and red, and roaring and desperately pulling those slippery snakes 
down. . He bowed his head to the kendo: "The number of roads you have 
made to me is clear, and I naturally know where you are most likely to be 
broken." 


Half a month, holding two cans from the sky, I couldn't help but deduct it, 
and put the stunned light and the roaring in the jar. At this point, Xie Li 
finally breathed a sigh of relief and said: "Many people are good things!" 


Half a month sealed the clay pot, holding two jars and shaking it, and 
listening to it. Thank you for your help: "Don't play for half a month, just 
put them away, be careful not to let them go." 


Nodded for half a month, I looked at the face of Cheer, looked at the 
flower city, said: "Flower General, is this your son?" 


Thanks and smiled: "Unfortunately, no." 


Soon, he couldn't laugh. Half a month, "Oh," he said, "I saw you kissed 
him, I thought it was." 


" " 


I don’t want to say anything more than thank you, and I hold my forehead. 
Half a month seems to think that Huacheng is very cute. He pulled a small 
scorpion and pulled him very concerned. "He seems to be sick. Do you 
want to go into the jar to recover? I used to live in the jar of the general, I 
feel good." Soon." 


I finally came over and said: "No. You don't care, your Royal Highness 
will look after him." 


Half Moon Road: "Oh." 


At this time, he looked at her and said, "Are you a half-month national 
teacher?" 


He looked down at half a month, half a month was shrouded in the shadow 
he dropped, kneeling on the ground, nodded. 


intentionally or unintentionally stood in front of her, but he pushed 
him away and walked half a month before, seems to want to take a closer 
look. Who knows, he walked two steps away from the half moon, but his 
face changed a lot in half a month. After a smog, he hid behind him, as if 
he was avoiding it, but it was not like watching her look. Everyone was 
surprised, thank you for thinking and understanding, and twirlingly said: 
"General general, that ... ghost sugar ball..." 


Hey, his face is black. I want to come, it is the sweetness of the ghost sugar 
ball has not been scattered, half a month is a female ghost, can not stand 
the kind of inferior ghost, to escape the smoke... 


Thanks to pity, Junjun couldn't help but immediately, and said: "Why did 
the Rain Master come to Tongluoshan? Where is he now? Why didn't you 
join him?" 


: "The ghosts are moving, a large number of non-human objects 
gather to Tonglushan. When passing through Yushi Township, several 
farmers were arrested and taken away as spare food. At that time, the 
rainmaster and the law-protection mount were not there. After we knew it, 
we were chasing this. We were originally one, but when you heard the 
imperial edict of the Prince, you shouted us in half a month, and they 
checked it out." 


At that time, thanking the pity was just shouting for the emergency, I did 
not expect that they were actually in the vicinity, but also beaten. That 
Yushi Township looked like a quiet little village, and there was a ghost 
passing by. It’s not surprising that I don’t know how to catch people. He 
frowned and said: "I couldn't find you in the world before. How did you 


get to the Rain Master? Don't tell me that you are chasing this half-moon 
national teacher." 


I stayed down slightly and said, "No. It was the Rain Master who saved 
me." 


It turned out that after being exiled to the lower bounds, I was always 
wandering around the world. I was idle, and I took a few small pockets of 
grace, and annoyed the sadness. I found a lot of things I didn’t know about 
to contain the goods. Chase him. If there is a mana in the body, these 
people of the Uighurs certainly can't help him, but he is now a mortal 
body, facing the besieged by a hundred ghosts, and eventually he is injured 
and in trouble. At the time of the confrontation, it was just that the rain 
teacher was riding a cow and passing the help. After asking about his 
identity and the original committee, he was taken in Yushi Township and 
temporarily injured. 


He seems quite surprised, saying: "Isn't the rainman an embarrassed 
person?" 


According to the teacher Qing Xuan, Yushi Township and Mingguang 
Temple had had a gap before, and the rainer kicked off the former deputy 
“ek a few hundred years ago. It seems that he does not think that the rain 
teacher is an open-minded priest. However, he said: "No. Rain Master has 
never had a hard time, but he has helped a lot." 


At this time, a sly voice suddenly rang, saying: "The rain teacher? Is the 
rain teacher a person of the rain teacher country?" 


Thanks for saying: "Yeah." After the answer was completed, it was 
discovered that the sound was actually bright. He was put in a jar, and he 
was still listening to the outside with his ears up. After thanking him, he 
shouted: "Hey! Have you slept so many women, have you given birth to 
such wastes? Actually, you still need the shelter of the rainmen to be alive, 
and help them to say good things. It is a generation. Not as good as a 
generation! Ha!" 


It’s a bit uncomfortable to hear the words. Thank you for not knowing how 
to laugh, and whispering for half a month: "Do you understand?" 


Half Moon Road: "I don't understand. However, I seem to have heard that 
my brother said that before his family's generals, he was a general of Li." 


Is it a general of Li Guoguo, is there any problem? 
Very problematic! 


Because, according to Xie Lizhi, Yu Shiguo, is the iron ride of the Li 
country! 


Half a month and again: "The Rain Master is the last generation of the 
Rain Master." 


It is no wonder that when you talk about the rain guard, there is always 
something different. It is no wonder that the rain teacher had learned the 
deputy officer of Mingguang Temple before he was welcome. It turns out 
that both sides have old grievances that have a long history. 


It should be noted that although it is true to the **** officials that the 
human worlds are extinguished each other and you sing and sing, it 1s true 
that when you turn to yourself, you will never be relieved. If the generals 
who have destroyed their own country are in the same court, this person is 
still swaying all day in the heavens, very high-profile, have to say, a bit 
troublesome. 


added a note, posted on the outside of the jar, the sound of the bright 
light stopped. He said: "Why is the general coming?" 


He said: "Not all of them are going to get you back soon." 


Thanks for the words of Huacheng. It seems that this is the "benefit" for 
the exchange of Junwu when he was sent to Tonglushan. I took a picture of 
the shoulders of the slap and said: "Since you have come, do a good job. If 
you do well this time, you may be able to go back to heaven in advance." 


The hangover had not yet answered, but the spell on the jar in his hand 
burned, and the light that was locked inside burned the spell with anger. He 
said: "Hey!!! You remember what you said?!" 


Waiting for another post to seal, but he stopped him, saying: "There are 
too many words in the life of a certain person, what do you mean?" 


Mingguang hates the voice: "When you kill the men who have followed 
you for many years, what reason do you remember?" Some people can kill, 
some people can't; some things can be done, some things can't.' - One 
party seems to be in a heart-wrenching tone! Now? Do you think that 
others don't know what your family has done? The early spread! You are 
not trying to wipe his **** and help him cover the past? The brothers who 
have been levied in the North War will die, and it is your turn to be a 
descendant. He shouldn’t be dying? You, this person, is throwing through 
the clothes, and the opponent’s foot is used. It’s your home. It’s treasure, 
are we grass?!” 


He had a lot of brains, and after listening to it, he suddenly said, "You, not 
the light." 


The jar was silent for a moment. Shun, Mingguang said: "What do you say, 
I don't see you in the light? It's all shaped!" 


Hey, definitely, said: "No. You are not a bright light." 
The sound in the jar was violent: "Who can I still be?" 


He took the jar from his hand and sighed with a sigh of relief: "You are 
Rong Guang." 


When the words came out, the jar was completely silent. 


When I heard the name, my eyes were slightly enlarged. Thanks to the 
pity: "General Xiao Xiao, who is Rong Guang?" 


After a long time of hesitation, he replied: "It is the most powerful 
subordinate who followed the longest time when the general did not fly." 


Xie Li finally knows, "General will fold the sword", what is the allusion. 


When the time was a man, the love of the scene was proud, and the 
battlefield was proud of it. It was a regular victory general, and there were 
dozens of unsuccessful defeats. Among them, although he himself is brave 
and good at war, but also a support from a deputy. This deputy, the name is 
called Rong Guang. 


Rong Guang is famous for his treacherousness and enthusiasm. Although 
the character styles of the two are very different, but they know early, and 
the cooperation is also very good. One master, one master is dark, but it is 
the upper and lower level of many years. The sly sword "Mingguang" is 
made by selecting the twonames" "and" ". 

I will fight. In the age of turmoil and war, it will be more important to 
fight money than to make money. It is more important than anything that 
will be done. Naturally, it will rise. However, no matter how much, the 
highest is only a general. It’s awesome to add countless honorable and 
lengthy titles in front of the general’s word. There can always be someone 
on the top of the head. When you see the kingdom, you have to bow down 
and bow down. 


In this regard, he himself has no opinion, but as he breaks through one city 
after another, the glory on the armor is more and more dazzling, and the 
masses headed by Rong Guang are eager to move. 


I have never forgotten this book, but his subordinates have infinitely 
expanded his own. 


The most serious is Rong Guang. Because he and the soldiers in the 
military are more closely connected, they are very inspiring, and many of 
the old men have sprouted. "The generals of today are far less than they 


deserve." "The generals and we were oppressed." The country needs the 
idea of smashing the general and saving us." They worked hard and wanted 
to break into the Imperial Palace of Li, and the fans were kings. They took 
a group of old people to fly, and stood at the peak of the most powerful 
country at that time. They even thought about the future of the iron horses 
and the unification of the world. 


Unfortunately, I personally have no interest in the king. 


The joy of his life is to win and sleep, and these two do not need to be the 
master. Moreover, although the owner of the Lili country did not make any 
achievements, there was nothing wrong with it. If he changed himself, he 
might not be able to do better. If you start a business, there is no harm, no 
benefit, why not provoke | chaos? Therefore, Rong Guang hinted with him 
a few times with great enthusiasm, and was all turned away. 


Many times, Rong Guang was not persuaded, but more and more konjac. 

Finally, one day, they decided in a circle of martial arts, regardless of the 
three seven twenty-one, first start things. Things have become, and if you 
don’t believe it, you can still shirk it. 


Hearing this, thank you for being speechless, and said: "This kind of thing, 
you can catch the ducks on the shelves..." 


When he saw him thoughtfully, he said: "Rong Guang may not really want 
to hold the general as the king, but he must start from the name of the 
general. Because he prestige there is no general, if you pull your own big 
Flags may not be able to convince the public." 


Thank you for thinking, "I don't think so." 


They are playing the banner of the shackles. Of course, they can't pretend 
that they don't know about it. They immediately took the sword and a 
small number of confidant soldiers and rushed into the palace and played a 
game. 


This awkwardness is the last embarrassment of his life. 2k novel reading 
network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 149: Left and 
right panic 


Thanks to the pity: "Is the general won, or is it defeated?" 


: "Winning. Also defeated." 


The murderers all died under the sturdy sword, many of which were old 
departments with whom he had more than a decade of friendship. 


The sword of "Mingguang" has always been used in conjunction with these 
people. Today, it has become a weapon for these people. 


At the end of the killing, the victory and the loss of the dawn, the Li Guo, 
also logically to capture the name of the anti-thief, the life of the body will 
be surrounded by blood, almost exhausted can not move around the group. 


Although he will fight, if the battlefield is not a real field, he may not be 
able to win. It is clear that it is to retreat to the enemy to rescue the driver. 
In the end, it has been exchanged for a "killing!" 


Holding the pots, I didn’t hear what they were saying, but they didn’t have 
time to go. He said: "I should have thought of it, it is your style." 


I want to come, it is Rong Guang’s resentment attached to the broken 
sword that has dyed thousands of people’s blood, and it will last forever. 
But the sound in the jar is still cold and cold: "Your hands and feet are all 
dead. I am just a sword." 


Xie Li knew that he would not admit it now, and asked for no benefit, 
saying: "But, general." 


Nodded and returned the jar to the lodge. 


In this way, they have already accepted two quite tricky ghosts on their 
hands, ignoring the others, it is a good start. Thanks to the pity: "I will 


continue to go to Tonglushan with the generals. What about half a month? 
Go to the Rain Master?" 


: "The Rain Master has already chased the demon of the peasant, and 
walked in the first step. We went to find the same road, and would like to 
assist the general and His Royal Highness, and go forward together." 


He returned to the gods and frowned slightly: "Then we will quickly leave. 
The rainmaster is not a **** of war, but it is faster than us, and the road 
ahead is dangerous." 


So, thanked the pity to pick up the flower city, half a month to collect two 
cans, the pedestrian hurriedly rushed to the jungle. 


Because they are still in the outer layer of the Copper Furnace Mountain, 
they have not encountered any powerful characters on the road. Most of 
them are weeds. Everyone has no interest in hands-on. They skip it 
directly, and they don’t know how to take the initiative to challenge them. 
They are also put on half-moon and overnight. The snake scared away. So, 
after a day, I finally left the forest and went deep into the second floor of 
Tongluoshan. 


At this point, the forest is gradually sparse, the road is gradually wide, and 
there are many traces of human smoke. Thanks to the road, I saw some 
small houses that were ruined and blackened. It was too weird in this 
isolated place. I couldn’t help but ask. : "How can someone live in a 
house?" 


Half moon and are shaking their heads. Yan also said: "I am afraid to 
ask you the Lord Ghost King in your arms." 


Thanks to the pity, he was thinking, if the flower city is awake, he will be 
able to answer his questions and look down. Although the unusually hot 
body temperature of Huacheng gradually subsided, the eyes were still 
closed and could not help but worry. 


He reminded: "His Royal Highness, you will go down to the next level, 
and the things you encounter in front will be even worse. Otherwise, stop 


and stop, wait for the flower owner to wake up." 


At this point, everyone was on a wide fork. One road leads to the east and 
one road leads to the west. Thank you for your pity, saying: "The night is 
deep, stay here for one night." 


After a day of rushing, it is time to take a break and carefully assist the 
Huacheng Law. Half Moon Road: "Well, my brother should rest." 


Everyone thinks about it. The moment is a mortal body. It is a need to rest 
and eat. He has never heard anything. Thanks to the curse, it is no 
exception, but he completely forgot about it because he was worried about 
the flower city. 


The group of people will camp on the fork at the moment. Half a month of 
fire, hunting and hunting. Thank you for seeing everyone busy, and staring 
at the face of Huacheng. After a while, the intuition made him **** back, 
and sure enough, he was watching them. 


The two looked at each other for a while, and they laughed and said, 
"Okay. I am going away." 


Thanks for your pity: "No. Still not." 


He didn't want to do anything that he couldn't see, why he said it was like a 
thief! 


At this time, half a month with a jar of food came over and said: "Flower 
General..." 


Thanks and pity both turn around. Thank you, "What's wrong?" 


There was a frightened pheasant in the black jar and was tied up. I showed 
them the cans for half a month, saying: "Let me fight, let me do it, but I 
won't." 


After playing the hunt, go to the front to find the way to let the wind out. 
Hey, it seems that he is not very satisfied with how he looks at the half 


moon. He is confident and confident: "The girl's family, killing and killing 
all day, will not dress up, how can I even cook?" 


Both pity and half moon are speechless. Half a month is not a girl who is 
usually raised by ordinary people. She can't understand her aesthetics at 
all, and she is very puzzled and inexplicable to his words. And 
thankfulness has almost figured out, and this person 1s very difficult to 
talk about when it comes to women. "Let's put it down in half a month, I 
will teach you." 


Half a month was originally very convinced to him, naturally happy to 
agree. After a scent. Thanks for the colorful feathers of the pheasant, and 
raised his own blood-stained palm, he said: "The generals killed the 
chickens, the princes twitched, and it was also a famous scene." 


Thanks for seeing him kill the chicken by hand, killing the blood, said: 
"You can't use a knife and sword for you? General? Clean and neat." 


Ruan said: "Is there?" 


As soon as the voice fell, the two men couldn't help but look at the two 
jars that were placed on the ground. Rong Guang in the jar seems to have 
noticed these two strange eyes. The cans trembled with chills and shouted: 
"Fast roll! The farther you roll, the better! Beware of the poison on the 
blade, poisoning you!" 


The two quickly went away. Going to the place where the jar must not be 
heard, he shook his head and thanked him. "I still haven't said it. He has 
always been tempered, not blame." 


Xie Li also heard how Rong Guang blamed him. He had a subtle sympathy 
and said: "Understand you. I have a cousin. It is a bit like a general. He is 
more capable than him, but he is not. Will do things." 


Rong Guang can help to fight, if you let the grace to help thank you for 
your sorrow, thank you for not being killed by the enemy first, you must 
first give life to death. I seem to have imagined what it would be like to 


say that a wide-ranging person would not fight. It is sincere: "That is 
terrible." 


Thank you for throwing the cleaned pheasant into the jar again, filling it 
with water, throwing it on the fire and starting to cook. From time to time, 
throw some wild fruits and herbs and adjust the taste. Half a month also 
learned how he looked, trying to stuff everything that he could find to be 
able to eat into the jar. I didn’t seem to understand what they were doing, 
but because he had never been to the kitchen, and did not see any 
problems, helped to add some firewood, said: "His Royal Highness, I have 
always had a question to ask you, But because it is not familiar, it is not 
good to open it." 


Unfamiliar is true. Before, the impression of thanking the pity was almost 
a radish with a good skill and a bad heart. Now that I have dealt with a few 
times, I have been a little bit accustomed to it. I am a bit familiar, saying: 
"General General." 


He said: "You have been beaten twice, two curses are in your body. After 
the third ascent, you can ask the emperor to help you remove them. But 
why don't you let it go?" 


After seeing half a month of meditation and thoughts, he suddenly pulled 
out a few long purple-red snaketails and put them directly into the soup 
pot that was boiling. The look was as usual: "That, general, I There is also 
a question I want to ask you." 


He said: "Excuse me." 


Thanks to the pity: "Why don't you refine a new sword after you break the 
light?" 


Raising the eyebrows, said: "It is an unpleasant problem." 


The expression of thankfulness is exactly the same as him, saying: "To 
each other." 


The two talents laughed twice and suddenly said, "I never thought it was a 
beautiful talk." 


Thank you, "I understand." 


He still waited for an opening, but he heard a strange movement behind 
him, and his heart moved and turned back: "Sanlang?" 


Sure enough, it is the flower city to sit up! 


Thanks for the pleasant surprise, busy helping him to hold his shoulder, 
said: "Sanlang! You woke up! You... seems to be getting bigger?" 


Indeed, before the flower city appeared to be only in its early thirties, it 
now looks like it is thirteen or four years old, and the voice of a boy who 
turned into a sand from the opening of the voice: "Yes. Thank you brother 
for helping me." 


Ruan said: "It's really gratifying." 


Thanks for the pity: "Nothing to thank, I..." After I finished, I noticed that 
there was a "deprecated" word. The smile was congested and my heart 
said: "Isn't that what I think?" 


The next moment, Huacheng grabbed his shoulder and said: "His Royal 
Highness, listen to me, now there is something in the east to go here. You 
have to avoid it temporarily!" 


Thanks for the pity, the two looked at the east together, as if they had 
penetrated the boundless night and saw a figure sneaking in the darkness. 
Although thankful did not feel anything, but still said: "Okay! Let's avoid 
it first." 


Ramp: "Where to avoid?" 
This fork is only leading to two roads, thank you: "West!" 


Half a month grabbed the clay pot that was cooking on the fire. It seems 
that I am ready to take it with me. "I haven’t come back!" 


When the voice just fell, I saw a dark shadow on the road in the west, but 
it was the back of the road. He said: "General! Don't go this way! There 
are a lot of demons and ghosts coming here!" 


Huacheng Road: "How big is it?" 


He stayed up and asked him, and stunned, saying: "According to the 
ground vibration, at least five hundred!" 


As a **** of martial arts, it is not a last resort, and it will not consider 
"returning" this road. Ruan said: "Was it going to the west or the east?" 


Huacheng decisively said: "West!" 
Thanks for the pity: "West." 


I don't know why, although there are many ghosts in the west, there is no 
ghost in the east, but thanking me is instinctively, the west must be safer 
than the east. Not much to say, the group left in a hurry. Originally, Xie 
Pian had already prepared for a wave on the road and then opened the 
killing. Who knows, ran out of the six or seven, and did not hear anything 
at all. It was not strange, asked: "General Xiao Jun, you are Where and 
when did you hear more than five monsters and monsters approaching?" 


: "It is near here. At that time they were five or six miles away 
from me, and the speed was extremely fast." 


Thanks: "That's weird!" 


Their group of people ran west, and the five hundred devils and ghosts ran 
eastward, and the speed was very fast. So, they should be hit on the face 
soon. Why didn’t you see a ghost now, not even a little movement? 


Ruan said: "Small —_ will not be wrong, are they returning the same way?" 


: "I think, it is unlikely. Because they are really fast, it sounds 
like..." 


Huacheng Road: "Escape." 


Suddenly, thank you for your footsteps. Not only him, but the group of 
people all stopped. Because, a corpse in front of the field, stopped their 
way. 


These corpses, some people have livestock, are strange, varied, and the 
souls that have been broken up, only a sneak of black smoke and wildfires 
scattered in the air, the scene is extremely strong. Thanks for watching the 
moment, said: "I really escape, just... I have not escaped." 


After visiting them, they stayed in the first time and then notified Xie and 
others. And shortly after his evacuation, there was something going on and 
killing them all. 


Huacheng Road: "It is a human hand." 


Thanks for your nod. If both sides are crowded, it is impossible to do so 
cleanly and the battle will not end. 


In such a short period of time, killing five hundred devils and ghosts is 
undoubtedly stronger than the fast-killing sword. It seems that this is also 
the key object they need to pay attention to. 


Holding the soup pot for half a month, said: "The Rain Master will not 
choose this road..." 


: "Do not worry, adults have a law-abiding mount." 


At this time, thank you for hearing the strange " " sound that was 
not far from the front. In the past, there was a **** that was trembled, and 


the sound of " " was so transmitted. of. It saw someone who found 
himself and said in horror: "Forgive, I will never come again, I want to go 
back, I want to go home!" 


Thanks to both hands and holding it up, Wen said: "Don't be afraid, we just 
passed by. Can tell us what happened?" 


The **** was fighting and he said: "You, are you passing by? Don't go any 
further, there is a terrible thing in front... Count us, he has killed more than 
a thousand ghosts, but he Still not satisfied, still non-stop, non-stop..." 


More than a thousand! 


More than they thought. Thanks to the pity: "Who are you talking about? 
Do you know his name? Or nickname? Or what does it look like?" 


Shantou said: "No, I don't know. I can't see it clearly. He killed us. It didn't 
work a few times. I only saw it vaguely. It was a man in black clothes, very 
young, and his face was very pale..." 


Ruan said: "It sounds a bit tricky. Your Royal Highness, Flower City Lord, 
are you sure that we should go west now, not to the east?" 


The girl listened, but screamed, saying: "It’s not going to the east! 
Never! !!!" 


Thanks to the pity: "What happened to the east?" 


The girl said: "We... I didn't dare to go to the east side, so I chose the west. 
Because there is a white boy in the east, in just one day, more than 2,000 
ghosts have been killed, than the west. This, more terrible..." 2k novel 
reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 150: Left and 
right panic, no choice of things 2 


More than two thousand! 


It is said that everyone is looking at the micro-condensation. Xie pity saw 
Huacheng and said: "It seems that the west is right." 


The skull tooth trembled: "Hey! Which side is wrong, there is no way to 
go! " 


Indeed, for them, the ordinary little devil, which side is chosen to be a 
disaster. No matter the west side of the east, they can be crushed easily; no 
matter which way you go, it is the end of the smog that is used as a 
nutrient. After a few dry words, the wildfire in the skull's eyes was 
gradually extinguished. 


Thank you for putting it on the side of the road, saying: "Sanlang, do you 
know what is in the east?" 


Huacheng Road: "It is not certain for the time being, but it is coming here. 
At the moment, it is not recommended for a confrontation. West, this is a 
little better." 


Thanks and nodded, "Okay. Then we will continue west." 


A group of people passed through the body of the land and hurried 
forward. After walking for a night, I didn’t meet the black man who was 
said by the girl. I didn’t see the rainman’s trace. I couldn’t help but worry. 


Along the way, there are more and more houses on both sides of the road. 
They are already clustered and even recognizable. This is a dwelling house 
for the poor. This is a leisurely play theater. This is a shop for buying and 
selling groceries. This is a wealthy family. The courtyard...The road that 
they walked under their feet was also an artificially repaired road. They 


could still see the patterns of paving tiles. It was a rich town, but it was 
empty and empty. 


When I saw an old well on the side of the road, I took a look at the water. 
The water was still clear, and everyone rested here for a while. Xie pity 
and squatting drank a little water, washed his face and looked up, and saw 
him come half a month. 


Half a month has been holding the black pottery jar, waiting for a long 
time, said: "Flower general, sleep brother, eat something." 


: "Good. Hard work for you." 
Thanks for the pity: "Everyone has worked hard, come and try." 


So everyone was surrounded. However, the moment many people opened 
the jar in half a month, many people's looks solidified. 


Although the "smell" thing is colorless and invisible, when the lid of the 
can is uncovered for half a month, it seems that there is any mysterious 
substance that distorts the air at the mouth of the can. 


Everyone stared at the scene in the jar for a long time. Everyone's pupils 
reflected a boundless darkness, as if they could pull people into the abyss. 
No words could express the emotions contained in the eyes. For a long 
while, thank you for taking a half-month shoulder and erecting a thumb: 
"Yes. For the first time, you can." 


I looked at them incredulously and said: "She is the first time. Your first 
time is Prince Edward. If you remember correctly, you let her all follow 
what you taught. You start with more than her. I just said how I always feel 
that what you are doing is not right. It was not my illusion." 


Huacheng said: "Is it? Since it was done by my brother, I really want to try 
it." 


Hearing the words, he and Yu Jingqi brushed his eyes and looked at him, 
his eyes mixed with exclamation, stunned, admired and so on. Huacheng 


Road: "Brother, what is this?" 
Xie pity and cough, said: "... ‘Bumping down the phoenix’.” 
Huacheng sincerely said: "Good name." 


When he finished, he reached into the black bottomless jar. He looked at 
the eyes and looked as if he was about to be swallowed by the jar. The 
flower city took a small piece of charred pieces of corpse and took it into 
the mouth. 


He said: "How." 
Huacheng Road: "Taste as its name." 
Hey, look at the complex look of the road: "Do it for you. You look at it." 


2 " 


He took the can from his hand in half a month and stretched his hand in a 
blank expression. 


Thanks and pity, I wiped my face with cold water, rationalized my hair, 
turned around, stopped looking at them, and looked around, and asked: 
"Why is there so many traces of people in this isolated place?" Can you 
still live in Tonglushan?" 


He asked this question yesterday, but no one can answer him at the time. 
Now there is. Huacheng Road: "Yes, but it was a long time ago. There are 
seven cities in Tongluoshan, which cover a vast area. It used to be an 
ancient country. These houses are all the remains of the ancient country. 
The closer to the center, the 'copper stove' The ruins will be more and 
more and more and more prosperous." 


Xie has no doubts, said: "It turns out." 


At this moment, there was a screaming voice behind him: "What are you 
doing? Little man has gold under his knees, stand up for me!" 


Xie pity did not look back, said: "What is the name of this ancient country, 
Saburo know?" 


Huacheng did not look back, and took the hand: "Wu Yongguo." 


2 66 66 66 CO GO 66 CO (74 


? Can you 
still move? Become fine?!" 


Half a month seems to be apologizing constantly, saying: "I'm sorry... I'm 
sorry... Sorry, it's really fine, I don't know how long it will be cooked... 
Sorry..." 


Thanks for the first time, thinking about it for a while, said: "I am 
ignorant, it seems that I have never heard of the name of this country. How 
old?" 


However, he just finished, but he is not sure. Wu Yong, Wu Yong. At first 
glance, it is indeed strange. But think carefully, but it seems to have been 
heard in a certain population for a long time. 


Huacheng Road: "The specifics are not clear, but they must be more 
ancient than Xianle. There are also two thousand years to say." 


Thanks for looking around, "But looking at these buildings is not like a 
thousand years." 


Huacheng Road: "That is natural, because most of the time, Tongluoshan is 
not open to the outside world, just like being enclosed in a huge 
mausoleum, isolated from the outside world, naturally preserved." 


Cheering down, I fell into meditation. Over there, I finally left behind and 
said: "Ghost King is really omniscient. However, your intelligence is too 
singular. Can you ask where the source is? You have never heard of it. 
After a while, it’s passed down." 


Huacheng did not look at him and said: "Don't ask the general, what kind 
of person can collect such information in the Tonglushan?" 


Ruan said: "In theory, as long as it is a ghost, but in view of the rules of 
Tongluoshan will kill thousands of ghosts, to collect so much weighty 
information, it will take a long time, then, it must be very Strong." 


Huacheng Road: "After collecting this information, what kind of person 
can come out from the Copper Mountain?" 


He said: "There must be only a ghost king like you." 


Huacheng Road: "So, this information is collected by myself. As long as I 
don't say it, naturally there will be no circulation." 


He finally turned his head and said with a slight sigh: "Conservative 
secrets may be more difficult for the gods in heaven than for the heavens; 
for me, it is not." 


This is true. If there is a similar level of information that is known to the 
heavenly priest, or an hour, you will hear everyone excitedly discussing it 
in every psychic array. With such a heavy amount of information, 
Huacheng can actually be so long, not sold to others, and did not say to 
show off, it is very calm. Ruan said: "I understand. It seems that to the 
Royal Highness Prince, the flower city master is not omniscient, but also 
knows everything and says nothing." 


Xie pity suddenly said: "No." 
Everyone turned their heads and said, "What is wrong?" 


Xie Pian Fang has been thinking hard. At this time, he finally made a fist 
in his right hand and gently glimpsed in the palm of his left hand. He said: 
"I only said that I have never heard the name of 'Wu Yongguo'. This is not 
true. I have heard this name!" 


Huacheng looked slightly condensed and said: "Where did your brother 
hear?" 


Xie pity turned back and said: "When I was a teenager, I was a monk in the 
Royal Taoist Temple of the Kingdom of Xianle. I taught the teacher to be a 
teacher of Xianle. When he first accepted me as a disciple, he told me a 
story." 


In fact, it is not a story. It is better to say that it 1s a reflection of a glorious 
and legendary image of Xie Pity. Once upon a time there was an ancient 
country, a prince, a gifted man, a young and intelligent, a civil and 
military, and a worldly match. Amazing characters. He loves his people, 
and his people love him. Until he died for a long time, people did not 
forget him. 


The teacher’s teacher’s heart is long and he kindly said to him: “Children, 
I hope you can be such a person.” 


At that time, the younger brother was still sitting in danger, thinking 
without saying: "I don't want to be such a person. I want to be a god." 


Thanks to the pity: "If the prince of the Prince you said is truly 
unparalleled, why is he not a god?" 


Xie pity continued: "If people really have not forgotten him, why have I 
never heard anyone mention this Prince Edward?" 


Thanks and pity, he did not bring a little provocation and rebellious heart 
when he mentioned these questions. He was really curious and 
incomprehensible. However, after the national teacher heard the 
expression, it was still very exciting. 


Why can you pray for morality? Because, on the night of the day, the 
national teacher asked him to copy a hundred times of moral saga, and he 
was famous for his "self-cultivation." Xie pity is very skeptical. If it is not 


for the sake of his honorable Prince, the National Teacher will let him 
copy it on the nail board. 


In short, since then, every word of the Tao Te Ching has been deeply 
imprinted in the mind of thankfulness. By the way, I also left a little 
impression on this "Prince of the Prince of Wuyong". 


Xie Pity is very fond of reading, and he has not seen the relevant records 
of "Wu Yongguo" in ancient books. Therefore, I feel that most of the 
teachers of the country have just made a fuss to educate him, or that the 
Guoshi card has played too much. However, he felt that there was no need 
to dismantle it, and he did not want to copy another hundred ethics, which 
was not true and did not go to heart. 


Ruan said: "His Royal Highness, it sounds like you, the national teacher of 
Xianle, is not too small, knows a lot? Can you ask him what happened 
later?" 


After a moment of hesitation, thank you for your pity: "I don't know. After 
the breaking of the country, many people will behave later. I have never 
seen it again." 


At this moment, he suddenly felt his ankles tight and looked awkward and 
said: "What!" 


I was about to step on a broken bone and broke my bones. I looked down 
and let out a sigh of relief. "You are going to play in this way? You are in 
such a way that you are in danger. You almost scrapped your hand." 


That hand is exactly what it is. The whole man was kneeling on the 
ground, his face buried in the soil, one hand grabbing one, and one 
grasping pity. The two men squatted and said, "What do you want to say?" 


Half a month holding the jar said: "I don't know, I just stayed on the 
ground and climbed up and climbed, as if I found something very 
important." 


He said: "Oh? This can also be discovered? It is a small flaw. So what did 
you find?" 


He stayed away from the hand holding him and pointed to one side. 
Thanks to his guidance, he said: "This is..." 


Everyone has surrounded the past and studied for a while, saying: "Big 
hoof print?" 


The face of Yu Su was finally lifted from the soil, and he muttered: "This 
is... Yu Shida, the person's guardian sitting, riding the seal left, remember." 


Half Moon Road: "My brother, your sentence seems to be wrong." 


: "I don't have anything. Rain Master, person, person..." 


He can't turn around when he is stuck in "people." Xie pity suspected: "Is 
this... 1s it a snake venom?" 


Half Moon Road: "The toxicity of the iris is not like this..." 


Huacheng Road: "The Rain Master has already encountered this black man 
in the west and has played a game." 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 151: Left and 
right panic, no choice of things 3 


Thanks to pity: "Yes? Why do you see it?" 


Huacheng was about to speak. At this time, the words of the words stuck in 
the trembling fingers and began to write on the ground. Out of 
inexplicable respect, everyone looked around and saw him. He only saw 
the words "combat form" written by his men. After writing, it seemed to 
exhaust the last effort, clenched his fists, and did not move. 


Huacheng looked up and said: "This is the case. The guardian mount of the 
Rain Master is a black cow formed by the Golden Beast of the Royal Dojo 
of the Rain Masters. The stable walking road leaves no traces, and once it 
enters the battle, it will change its shape. Therefore, this hoof print is 
different in shape from the usual hoof print, and is more spacious." 


Ruan said: "The information of the Lord Ghost King is amazing." 


Huacheng pointed to the mark on the ground and continued to thank her: 
"Brother, look." 


Thanks for giving up and looking over, said: "Well, sure enough... this 
hoof print suddenly appeared, and it was sudden that they came to meet 
the enemy." 


Huacheng Road: "Well. And this hoof is very deep. It shows that the 
enemy is not simple. The cow is here to fight against the enemy. It is 
squeezed into the soil by two inches." 


The two simulated the battle scene at the time, and they were not willing 
to show weakness. "But in the end, the two sides still tied." 


Thanks: "Not bad." 


There were no bloodstains around, and there was no ghost of drifting. It 
looked like they were hitting here. They quickly and slyly slammed a few 
tricks. They found that the other side was a hard bone, and both gave up. 


Huacheng informed that the east side of the things turned direction, and 
the pedestrians continued to go west, but the speed of the road was slower. 
In a short time, a very tall and singular building appeared on the side of 
the road. From a distance, it was more stylish than other houses. Even if 
several walls and some eaves collapsed, it still can only be seen. Xie pity 
could not stop to stop, said: "Where is this?" 


Huacheng only glanced at him and said: "The temple of the Wuyong 
people." 


The truss was squatting with an arm and dragging him away. "How do the 
flower city owners know that this is the temple?" 


Huacheng Road: "Because it was written above." 


It was said that everyone looked up and saw that on the stone beam in 
front of the building's main entrance, it was really engraved with a row of 
incomparable words. Although it has been through years of tempering, 
there are some strange scratches, but it is still quite clear. 


However, for a moment of silence, thank you: "The above is indeed 
written, but..." 


But this text does not understand at all! 


I never imagined that even this is hard to beat the city. He said to the pray: 
"This line of text, the general idea is that 'Princes of the Prince will bring 
the light to the world and eternal illuminate the land of Wuyong'. The 
singer's nonsense is gone. Brother, you see, countdown characters, are 
there two like? Wu' and "Yu'." 


When I heard "His Royal Highness Prince", thanking me for being slightly 
moved, and then looking at it carefully, sure enough, this line of text is 
like a child's drawing, but also a circle and a bend, mixed with many 


strange symbols, but the shape of the word "Wu Yong" And strokes, but it 
is quite similar to the text he knows, as if it were a variant. Ruan said: 
"The flower city master can even interpret this ancient Chinese text that 
has been lost for thousands of years. He is really admired." 


Huacheng raised a brow and smirked: "I have been in Tonglushan for ten 
years. I can do a lot of things in a month. If I can't read a single text for ten 
years, what else can I do in the world? ." 


The gods who are in the top ten in the heavens may not dare to say such 
words. As a martial art, what can you do? I can only laugh and say: 
"Maybe." 


Xie pity sighed softly and said: "Fortunately, Saburo is there." 


Huacheng Road: "I can only interpret some superficial Wuyongwen. If you 
encounter something difficult, you can only ask your brother to come and 
think together." 


Thank you, Khan, Yan Yan: "This... am definitely not as good as Saburo. 
But is the **** that Wu Yongguo believes in, is also their Royal 
Highness?" 


Huacheng holds his arm and says: "I think, yes." 


Xie pity and thought, said: "Since my master knows the Prince of Wuyong, 
I should know that he has soared. But why did he tell me that the Prince's 
‘dead’?” 


Huacheng Road: "Three possibilities: first, he really does not know; 
second, he lied; third, he did not lie, Wu Yongguo prince 1s dead, but not a 
common ‘dead’.” 


Ruan said: "If the emperor is here, maybe he can ask if he knows the 
country and knows this person." 


Huacheng said: "That can't be seen. Wuyong country disappeared more 
than 2,000 years ago. Compared with it, Junwu is just a young and young. 


It's all generations." 


Junwu was promoted to about 1,500 years ago. It was a world-famous 
singer. After that, he became a king. He fought for several years and 
successfully rose to the celestial. As the first martial artist who sat in the 
millennium, what he was born in has long been touched. The 
"intergenerational" that Huacheng said refers to the "generation" of the 
heavens. 


Today, the heavenly court composed of a prince and a hundred priests 
belongs to one generation, and earlier than this generation, it 1s another 
generation. 


Just as the dynasty's dynasty changes, the heavens will also "change the 
dynasty." Although the time required is long and long, the essence is no 
different. New believers will replace the old believers, and new gods will 
replace the old ones. 


Sometimes, the decline of a **** is not because he is wrong, or that a 
more powerful priest appears than he is, just because people's lives and 
minds have gradually changed, no longer need him. 


For example, a priest of a palm horse must be well mixed today, because 
people can't live without horses and carriages. Who wouldn't want their 
horses to be strong and strong? Therefore, his incense can't be shortened. 


But if one day, people discover something new and run faster than the 
horse. After this new thing becomes the first choice for people to travel, 
the incense of the palm of the horse will surely become more and more 
deserted. This is the vast majority of the gods who flashed like a meteor. 


This way of fading is the most cruel because the process is almost 
impossible to reverse. Unless the priest jumps from the sky, he will return 
himself to the mortal body, change the road and re-cultivate once, as a 
brand-new god, rise again, otherwise, he is destined to watch as he slowly 
declines and disappears. . However, not everyone has such courage and 
luck. 


The gods of the previous generation are so fading, and they say that they 
have caused a big mess and a melee, so they are all depraved, and they are 
not testable. It 1s not important. 


Because, a few hundred years later, Jun Wu turned out to open up a new 
celestial god, and after him, a lot of new generations of priests rose up and 
filled the vacancies of believers. A stable heaven now. 


That is to say, unless there is a priest who is older than Junwu's 1,500- 
year-old qualification, it 1s unlikely to know how the ancient Wuyong and 
the gods they worshiped have been erased all traces. 


The group walked over the wall that had collapsed more than half and 
entered the black hall. Did not take a few steps, thank you for finding out 
that something is wrong. 


He originally thought that the black hall in this hall was because there was 
no light all the year round, and there was no window opening. Who knows, 
looking at the circle, the more you look, the more you feel surprised. He 
walked to the wall, his fingers slid across the wall, and he couldn’t help 
but say, "This is..." 


Huacheng Road: "Black." 
Not dim light, this huge temple, the walls are all black! 


Huacheng Road: "As far as I can see, almost all the temples in 
Tongluoshan are like this." 


This scene is very horrible. Is there any wall of the temple that will be 
painted like this hellish black color? Just looking at it at a glance, how can 
you worship the gods here? 


Ruan said: "All this is the case? Is it too long to decay?" 


Thanks to the pity: "We have not seen the other houses before passing 
through other houses. It is reasonable to say that the years and months of 
these houses should be the same." 


As he spoke, he continued to gently touch and explore the walls of the 
temple. This wall is not only black and sultry, but also rugged, as if a 
woman's disfigured face, full of horrible scars, and hard. Thanks for the 
move, said: "This temple was burned by fire." 


He said: "How come?" 


Thanks for turning around, said: "The wall of this temple should have been 
painted with murals, using special pigments, a thick layer. After the fire is 
burned, it will turn black and melt a part of the deformation. After 
solidification, This 1s the uneven feel of this unevenness." 


He said: "His Royal Highness knows a lot, and I also admire you." 


Thanks for the pity of the eyebrows, a light cough, said: "This ... is not 
something to admire, just because I have a lot of Princes Hall burned 
before, this effect." 


It was heard that everyone was silent. Thanks and reminiscent of the 
matter, said: "There is also the stone beam outside! There are many 
scratches on the sacred words on the stone beam. It is not like ordinary 
wear and tear. It should be someone with a knife on it." 


He frowned: "Why do you want to do this?" 
Huacheng cold channel: "Because I don't recognize this sentence." 
Thanks to the pity: "Yes. And the plaque is a meaning." 


Half a month smashed, said: "So, this temple is a national of Wuyong, do 
you set it on fire?" 


Silence for a while, thankful pity wants to speak, and suddenly listened to 
the swearing: "What does this mean?" 


Thanks for the pity, I saw that he raised his left hand and bit a pigtail in his 
mouth. He still used his sharp tail to poke him. I have to kneel down for 


half a month, saying: "Sorry, I have snakes on my body..." 


Thanks to pity and laughter, she took her and said: "For half a month, don't 
make up the habit of giving apologize to you. How can you give her snake 
a bite?" 


He raised his hand and said with a black face: "How do I know? It’s like 
this when I reach out to shoulder." 


Thanks patiently and patiently: "What do you want to do with the 
generals?" 


'..."" I] seem to have noticed and started thinking about this issue now. I 
have to say, "Let's get used to it. In this dark and gloomy place, it is not 
common sense to take the woman's shoulder and comfort them. Don't be 
afraid?" 


Half Moon Road: "I'm sorry, I am not afraid." 


'..."" Thank you for your understanding, this is the tragedy caused by the 
unconscious itch. It was easy to tear down the snake, and the left hand had 
swollen a large piece. He said: "Get me an antidote." 


Half Moon Road: "Sorry, my moon grass has run out." 
Thanks to pity: "Nothing, you are a sergeant, you are a priest, and you will 
be swollen after a while." After that, he turned back and continued to study 


the wall. Suddenly, my eyes swept over a black wall and instantly 
condensed. 


He said: "Look, come see, there is still a face in this wall!" 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 152: Four 
kings in the dark wall 


If so. I don't know if it's not burnt out, or the pigment on the top melts and 
covers the image below, so that it can be saved from suffering. Thanks to 
the fingertips, it is faintly visible to see half of the face. He began to 
carefully remove the black hard objects that were formed, holding the 
swollen left-handed left hand: "His Royal Highness 1s so interested in 
murals?" 


Thanks: "I am not interested, but I have a bold idea." 
Ruan said: "Talk about it?" 


Thanks to the pity: "It 1s rare for us to come to Tonglushan in this trip. In 
addition to stopping the potential ghost king, can we trace the source? For 
example, who created it and what strength it supports. Maybe, Once 
broken, once and for all, don't worry about the birth of the ghost king." 


He said: "Your idea is really bold. However, the flower city owners have 
not found out, we are afraid of more time to waste. At the moment, it is 
not recommended to do so." 


Huacheng said: "I didn't find out because my qualifications were dull, 
limited, and I was busy killing at that time. If I was hosted by my brother, 
it would not be." 


Thanks to the pity: "No, no. I am limited in ability, and Saburo is more 
than me." 


It seems that I can't listen to it. I lost my shack to half a month and turned 
and went out. "I still go out and breathe." 


Over there, Xie Pity actually wiped off a few pieces of black hard objects 
without difficulty. He groaned and said: "These can actually..." 


This layer of seemingly burnt black hard objects can actually peel off in 
large pieces! 


Between a few words, he has peeled off a large piece, revealing a baby's 
big fist face, although the line is extremely simple, but the face looks 
vivid, seems to be chasing something, even the eyes of the fanaticism are 
drawn . The black hard object seems to have formed a protective film, so 
that the color of the wrapped mural is still very bright, as if it had just 
been completed. Thanks for turning back: "Sanlang, let's be together..." 


I saw that the flower city did not move, but in the darkness, there was a 
silver flash. In a short time, hundreds of silver butterflies appeared silently 
and stopped on the black lacquered walls. As they fluttered their wings, 
Xie Pear heard a slight cracking of the sound, as if the mask was peeled 
off, and the black walls cracked countless tiny cracks. 


Then, crash. 


The black hard objects that were originally attached to the wall fell, 
revealing the true meaning behind them - 


A huge color mural! 
Thanks for looking up at the wall, I only felt the scalp numb. 


The entire picture is divided into four distinct layers. The top layer of gold 
is shining, the clouds are lingering, no one. 


On the second floor, only one character was painted, and it was a 
handsome white boy. He painted the golden light all over the body, and 
used the same kind of pigment as the uppermost light. 


On the third floor, four characters were drawn. Everyone's face, dress, 
look, and movement are not the same, and they are half the size of the 
white boy in the second layer. 


The fourth layer, the bottom layer, draws countless individuals, which are 
half smaller than the fourth person on the third floor. Everyone's face is 
exactly the same, and the look is also full of fanaticism, worship, and 
confusion. The first face that Xie pity stripped was the face at the bottom. 


The whole picture was beautiful and round, and thanked for being shocked 
by it for a while, said: "Sanlang, you...have you seen this before?" 


Huacheng slowly said: "I have traveled through most of the Boiler 
Mountain and walked through almost every Wuyong Temple. I can be sure 
that I have never seen this thing." 


Thanks to the resentment, he said: "This mural is probably not something 
two thousand years ago." 


Huacheng Road: "Absolutely not. Look at the color and preservation 
integrity, up to a hundred years. Maybe, update." 


In other words, this mural was later painted! 


Xie pity pointed to the top layer and said: "The one layer should be the 
‘day’ of painting. Because ‘ ’ 1s above all beings.” 


Also refers to the second floor, said: "This layer should be Prince Wu 
Yong. Since this temple worships Prince Wu Yong, the protagonist of the 
mural is naturally him, so he is the biggest figure in the picture, the light 
on his body. It is the same color as Skylight, and it is second only to 


an 


"Tiandao’. 


Referring to the fourth floor, the road said: "The lowest level of the 
characters is the smallest, the face is the same, it should be Wuyong 
nationality." 


Finally, referring to the third floor, said: "But who are these four people? 
They are above the national level, regardless of location or position. They 
are under the prince. Explain that status should be the same. Is the 
minister? Guard? Or...” 


Huacheng took a few steps and said: "Brother, you see, they also have a 
layer of aura." 


Sure enough, there is indeed, just because, because the light of Prince Wu 
Yong is too strong, in contrast, the aura of their body is almost hidden. 
Thanks for the enlightenment, said: "It is the priest who will point to the 
prince after flying." 


It is the same as the role of the wind and the feelings. Thanks for turning 

around in this shrine, it was determined that only this side was hidden on 

the wall of the main hall door, and the other three walls were burnt out of 
focus. 


Who left this mural? Who is left to see? What kind of message do you 
want to convey”? 


Just like this one, thank you can't see too much. For a moment, he said to 
Huacheng: "We will pay attention to other Wuyong temples on the way. I 
have a hunch that such a mural...may be more than one." 


Huacheng’s first slogan: “This is what it is.” 


The two men took the temple for half a month and thanked him for 
thinking about one person. "Where is the general?" 


The party said that it was necessary to breathe out first. They did not see 
him back in the temple. They thanked and prayed a few times, and they did 
not see the echo. "Do you not disappear at this time?" 


The four people found a circle in this desolate town, and there was no way 
to use psychic in Tonglushan. Just when she felt that this mountain 
couldn’t be smashed, Huacheng said: "Brother, don't worry. I have a way." 


He held out a hand, and a tiny silver butterfly in his palm fluttered gently, 
and flew around for a few laps. Although she feels that it is cute, she does 
not know what it is, saying: "This is..." 


At this moment, he suddenly heard a gasp, and then a man's voice was 
uploaded from the silver butterfly body. 


He said: "I have never imagined that I will see you here." 
Hey! 


Thanks to the flower city. Huacheng smiled and said: "Yesterday, I put a 
silver butterfly on everyone." 


Detecting flowers." 
Huacheng Road: "Don't break the sentence, don't talk." 


Xie pity put the little silver butterfly on the palm of his hand and said to 
him: "Hey General? Where are you? Who are you opposite?" 


Huacheng Road: "Sorry, my brother can only listen, can't say." 


Thanks for thinking about it, said: "Yes." If the voice of the listener can 
pass, is it not easy to be perceived by the other party? 


Then, another cold and cold young man was tired and said: "Daddy, a piece 
of advice - you should never talk about boring nonsense now. Be careful, I 
will shoot you." 

Hearing this voice, thankful and slightly blinked. 

It is the male phase of the spirit! 


He said: "It turns out that! The black man who killed the Quartet along the 
way... is the spirit of the male." 


: "Yes, the spiritual predecessors, took away the generals?" 


Thanks for your pity: "I don't know, I still listen." 
Over there, he said: "Jie Qing 1s so angry." 


Lingwen said: "Shut up. Let me not say it. It is not that I am angry, but 
others are very angry. First of all, I can't control my body now. If you are 
disabled, don't look for me." '"" 


Ruan said: "We are all this virtue now, we can't move, who is scared." 


Xie pity looked up: "It is not the general who took the spirits away. At the 
moment they are all trapped somewhere, subject to someone." Then they 
meditation, "Even Jin Yixian can suppress, what should the other party 
come to?" 


He said again: Are you wearing it now? ” 
What did he say, but everyone understood what he meant. 
Jin Yixian! 


Lingwen said: "Well. He doesn't like you very much. You should be careful 
when you talk." 


He said: "How do you know what he wants? I really served you, how can I 
not think about it? I dare to go to the Shenwu Temple to steal things, 
smash your golden rice bowl, and now I am running the Copper Mountain. 
Let you come?" 


Lingwen said: "Not that he let me come, I am coming. I don't ask the old 
man! He is going to be angry. I feel it." 


He shut up. After a while, the spirit sighed softly. It seems that Jin Yixian 
finally calmed down. So, Lingwen said: "What happened to you, old man? 
What are you doing when you run Tonglushan? Your left hand is being 
How about a million wasps stumbled, and hurt like this." 


The voice of the cockroach is also extremely depressed and sullen. "There 
is no disadvantage to the teacher. It is not difficult to say a word. It is not a 


small sorrow." Will it be dragged to this ghost place? Even no one can see 
it." 


Thank you for your pity: "You are going to talk directly about which ghost 
place, the cave or the house, and I said, I know where to look." 


However, it is not all wireless cable. In the copper furnace mountain, it is 
impossible to use a thousand miles, so you must not leave far. It can be 
heard that the voice of their conversation is somewhat ethereal and there is 
a faint echo, which must be in a space that is sufficiently empty. 
Moreover, thankful and faint can hear the sound of water. 


Just before I came over, there were rivers and lakes on the ground, and 
there was no more empty building on the road than the Wuyong Temple. 
So, at the moment they are in the land, there is only one possibility - 


underground! 
However, this town is not small. Which one is underground? 


He said: "What about you? I heard that you have killed more than a 
thousand monsters on the road and scared them all. It’s really gratifying. 
The first god, you can’t do it, turn to be a **** of war. What is the purpose 
of tying you here?" 


Lingwen smiled bitterly: "I don't know. I accidentally played a game with 
the rainmaster. After I finished the groggy, I was probably left behind by 
the people who were hiding behind. If I don't ask, he will always come 
out." Remember to not reveal your identity." 


At this time, the two people's dialogue suddenly inserted a third voice: 

"Minnan Gongjie, you have a pair of dogs and men, and you have a bad 
idea. What are you under the skin? I don't know yet!" 2k novel reading 

network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 153: Why 
don’t you want to be disrespectful? 


This is a man's voice, very strange. Although Xie Li knew that there could 
not be heard there, he still couldn't help but lower his voice. "Someone is 
coming. I don't know if it will be bad for the generals. I have to find out 
where they are now." 


The two of them seemed to have been shocked by the coming people. For a 
long while, they said: "Which person would you ask me? Since you have 
reached this step, why not show your face to the truth?" 


The voice said: "That would ask you." 


Lingwen said: "It must be a hate with you, most of them are female ghosts. 
It is also miserable for you." 


Ruan said: "You squinting and talking about you. This... What kind of 
thing is there like a female ghost? And he has not only caught me, maybe 
he has hatred against you?" 


Lingwen said: "Forget it, don't push each other at this time, let's tide over 
the difficulties together. It may also be a crime with both you and me. Do 
you remember that there are such people?" 


Ruan said: "Can't remember. Too much." 


The man seemed to be getting closer and the voice was louder, but the 
strange thing was that he did not hear the footsteps, but instead heard the 


strange noise of " ". He said: "Can you point your face and play less in 
front of me?" 


It seems that the wording and tone of this sentence reveals something, 
silent for a moment, and the spirit says: "You are... respectful and true?" 


That voice didn't answer. He also seems to be embarrassed, saying: 
"Wangwen Zhenjun? No, Jingwen Zhenjun will be so unspeakable?" 


Ling Wen shouted: "He has always been like this. It is a sigh of relief to 
speak in front of others, and another tone in front of me. Of course you 
don't feel like it." 


This head, thankful and slightly frowning, said: "King Wenzhenjun?" 


This title, he seems a bit impressive, but he is not sure. It sounds like a 
literary god. However, in the gods of the gods, there are too many words in 
the gods with the words "text", "respect" and "quietness". At this time, the 
whispered whispered: "King Wenzheng Jun, yes, the spirit, Wenzhenjun 
will point, come up, the first generation, the first god!" 


He said this, thank you finally remembered. When he first rose, the spirit 
was only a small civil servant in heaven. At that time, the first **** of 
heaven was not her, but another god. And the **** of the gods seems to be 
the honorary and true! 


However, now the **** of worship has long since declined, and there is no 
Jingwen Temple in eight hundred miles. Thank you for your pity: "It turns 
out that everyone is an acquaintance. Why can't you talk well? You must 
come up with a knife and a gun." 


Huacheng said: "Because it is an acquaintance, it is necessary to use a 
knife and a gun." 


The voice just fell, and the tribute was open again. It seems that because 
he was dismantled and had to stand on the shelf, he cut a face and spoke 
more than before, but he only had a needle in his mouth. He said: 
"Nangong, you are not very proud of your first **** in heaven. How did 
you get rid of your golden rice bowl and ran here?" 


Ruan said: "Seeing no, it is against you. This time is for you." 


Jingwen said: "Hey general, you don't think that I am looking for Nangong 
to settle accounts, you have escaped the relationship. This monk insulted 


me to honor the temple's incense, secretly sent people to smash my palace 
to add firewood, you thought I did not Know who the martial arts officials 
lend to her?" 


Jingwen continued: "You don't laugh at Nangong. I used to be a cherished 
heart. You are rewarding me. You are rewarding me like this. You are 
really ungrateful and guilty, the most poisonous woman. | waited for this 
day, Waited for too long, too long!" 


Thank you for your forehead, my heart: Three cancers are not a tumor, 
doing things, one is not kind! 


Who knows, the spirit is faint: "King Wenzheng Jun, no one else is here at 
the moment, just now you are all stunned, why should you swear now? You 
point me, really because of cherish? You in the end Why is it that I am, 
how do you treat me after I clicked on it, others are not clear, are you 
unclear?" 


The more you listen, the more you hear the more strange, and said: "What 
is going on in Jingwen Zhenjun and Lingwen? General Xiao Xiao, do you 
know the inside? Curtain?" 


He also listened earnestly and said to him: "Hold, apologize. Then, when I 
am still, not flying, knowing, not much." 


Xie pity that he thought this sentence would be awkward, Huacheng said: 
"Brother, don't ask others, just ask me." 


Thank you for your pity: "When you go to the heavens, you know what you 
are doing?" 


It turned out that it was not his illusion. For the black history and white 
history of the great priests in the heavens, the flower city is really a trick. 
He nodded, and really told thank you. 


It turns out that Jingwen and Lingwen are both the gods of the country. 
Jingwen is a lot older than Lingwen, and he has a deep root in the country. 
The original is that there is no intersection between the two. 


But in one year, Li Guoguo worshipped the gods. There is a small event 
during the festival. The young students have the subject of Li Liguo, the 
subject matter is not limited, write an article, do not sign, and posted it to 
the largest Wenshen Temple in China - at that time, it was Jingwen 
Temple. It is assessed by everyone, and the best one is selected as the 
leader, and the person is rewarded. 


At that time, it coincided with Jingwen Zhenjun’s play, a moment of whim, 
and the shape of a scholar. He participated in this event, and wrote a slap 
in the air, writing a slogan, and singing must be in the country. Self- 
confidence will surely be in many articles. stand out. Imagine, if the 
results are announced after the game, the chapter won the championship, 
and then reveal the truth, the top one is Jing Wenzheng's own points | body, 
isn't it the beauty of a later generation? 


If things are this development, then it was very harmonious. Who knows, 
there is a very embarrassing accident. 


After the ceremonies ended, the top of the list was announced. The winner 
was not the "Li Ri Fu" of Jing Wen, but a policy, called "No Li." 


Although this turning point is embarrassing, it is quite interesting for 
others. Xie pity asked: "Isn't you seeing "I don't want Li"?" 


Huacheng Road: "Looking for it. If your brother wants to see it, I will give 
you a rough idea." 


Thanks for your help: "That's not necessary. However, it is good to be able 
to defeat the Jingwen Zhenjun who has already soared at the time." 


Huacheng commented: "It's a good writing, but it doesn't have much to do. 
It was only at that time that the domestic situation in Liguo was not good, 
and the country was very resentful. I saw such a thing, just in line with the 


taste. Plus "Xi Li Fu" The kind of article flooded into disasters, and it was 
tired of seeing it early. In contrast, "No Li" naturally won." 


Thanks for the slightest nod, saying: "There is no first in the text. This is 
actually no big deal, not to mention the fact that it is not the same thing." 


Huacheng Road: "Yes. At the beginning, Jingwen also thought so." 


The people of Lili were looking around for the "No Li", who was 
unclaimed. Who dares to recognize this kind of thing? Some people are 
greedy and easy to reveal. Soon, because the officers and soldiers noticed, 
the festival was removed from the top of the list. 


For this event, although Jing Wenzhen was not very happy, he sneered, but 
after a few months, he forgot. The bad is bad. After a few months, an 
amazing news spread between the gods of heaven. 


The man who won the title in the "Liu Guo Wen Shen Festival" with "No 
Li" was still found out, and now he has been caught in jail. And this person 
is actually a young woman selling shoes on the street! 


This is all right! 
Thanks to the pity: "...sell and sell shoes." 
Huacheng Road: "Yes. Nangong Jie used to do this in the world." 


It is no wonder that in the past, someone has heard that the Lingwen 
Temple is a "broken temple", more than once and twice, but Xie Li does 
not think that this kind of thing should be grounded, so I never know why. 


Originally, no one would associate "No Li" with a girl selling shoes, but 
the young woman occasionally helped people to write letters and write 
love poems. The patron found that the handwriting was very similar to the 
first one of the list, and it was reported that it was caught. 


After learning of the incident, Jing Wenzheng took a pen and immediately 
called the young woman named Nan Gongjie. 


You must know that the goddess of the time was originally small, not 
without, but most of them are palms, flowers, embroidery, handicrafts, 
songs and dances. Even if it is a point, everyone is not willing to point 
women to be subordinate priests. The female **** is even rare. The 
women in the Temple of Wenshen are all beautiful girls, and they are not 
in the palm of their writings. They are mostly soft jade scented with ink 
and ink, which is not a **** official, and can only be regarded as a play. 


Jingwen Zhenjun’s move, in the hearts of the gods, won a cherished 
reputation. Everyone said that this little woman’s luck is really good. 
When she met the honorable person like Jingwen Zhenjun, she not only 
escaped from prison. The disaster, but also climbed the branches and 
turned into a phoenix, a piece of the story. 


However, at this moment, the protagonists of the "False" are confronting 
aggressively. 


Over there, Jingwen said: "I am heavy on your hand, and when you come 
to your mouth, it turns out to be unwilling." 


Lingwen has always been polite, not humble, but then ridiculed: "Forget it. 
You don't have to say that there are many things to me all over the day. 
The real thing is heavy, and I will not let me be in your temple for 
decades." Everyone gave tea to wipe the copy, walked hundreds of miles to 
get a poem, and gave gifts to other priests on holidays." 


Thanks for thinking, it seems that this is the case. When he first rose, 
every time he saw the spirit, she was always in the mix. It is because she 
has a lot of miscellaneous, thank you for remembering to have such a 
personal. Jingwen said: "In the end, you are basically complaining that I 
will not promote you. But why don't you think about it, why don't I 
promote you?" 


Lingwen said: "Why? I also want to know why. I used to be a mortal 
person who still has free time to read and write. Even if he is locked in 
prison, he can at least face it. After being clicked, he will not be there for a 
while. It’s good for you to be a cow and a donkey. If you want to kill me so 
much, it’s a good idea.” 


Jingwen shouted: "Nangong! You still refuse to admit your mistakes!" 
Lingwen asked: "What is wrong with me?" 


Jingwen said: "Is that still my fault? What I let you do is what is best for 
you. If you can't do even this little thing, why do you do something more 
important? I am trying to temper you. The heart gives you so many 
opportunities to practice. Is your own ability insufficient, can you blame 
me for not promoting you? Your heart is too high, but you are a woman 
after all, you can't get that high, you have to admit this fact!" 


Lingwen "haha" laughed, seemed to be irritated by him, and lowered his 
voice: "Good! You said that I can't get so high, then, ask your Jingwen 
Temple to get my spirit in the most prosperous period of incense. Is the 
temple now knees?!" 


Xie Pity smelled the growing grievances and anger of the two sides, and 
thought that they could not let them go any further. They had a very rude 
way. 


He slammed into the ground with a punch, accompanied by a terrible 
noise, and when the time came, the ground took his heart and cracked a 
huge round pit with four feet square! 


Huacheng immediately understood what he wanted to do, saying: 
"Brother!" 


Thanks to the driver, he waved the dust in the air and coughed a few times. 
He said: "This is the most direct! I am responsible for trying this! Saburo 
and General Tsang... Lying on one side!" 


He originally wanted to arrange the flower city and the other direction, but 
the two people are not in the same state. It is naturally impossible for 
Huacheng to listen to his lie and lie in the opposite direction of thanking 
him. He summoned his life and stabbed him into the ground. 


This knife and the punch of the pity have the same effect. The two 
alternately create a huge noise that is one after another, and the distance 


between the two sides is getting farther and farther. After playing a few 
punches, thanking the pity and listening to God, he did not respond to the 
spirit and the spirit. He did not seem to hear the loud noise he made, and 
the Jingwen seemed to be poked in the spirit, and he laughed. I took off the 
mask of the original Sven, and turned into a sour tone when the dogs and 
men were men, saying: "Nan Gongjie, you are in front of me, the villain is 
eager to slap the tail! If I didn't order you, you are afraid of being there. 
There are many children in the prison of the world who don’t know how 
many people!" 


This sentence can be somewhat unpretentious, and Xie pity has almost 
slipped. You can't listen to it, and said: "Hello, you are a god, can you stop 
your mouth?" 


Jingwen said: "You look at Nangong, your good deaf|Head protects you! 
What is your reputation as a general, how can you say that I am sloppy?" 


Lingwen said: "In your mind, who is not me? Head? Are you going to 
settle accounts? Then we will come to calculate!" 


Thanks to pity has jumped a good distance, once again boxing to the 
ground. This time, the greetings on the side of the silver butterfly are alert 
to the truth: "What sound?!" 

Thank you for your happiness: find the right direction! 

He and the spirit also heard it. I hesitated: "Who is playing on it?" 


After another effort, Xie pity ran out a few feet, and it was a thunder 
punch. Ramp: "Closer! Strong blasting power! It came from above!" 


right here! 
Xie pity no longer punches, pulls out his heart, and slams his sword 


The sword was so strong that the ground collapsed, and then he fell into a 
cool hole in the forest. Thanks for praying in my heart, I didn’t know what 


to do with the spirit and the spirit, and I waved the dust in the air, stood 
up, and turned the sword and said: "Respect..." 


In the moment when the real body of "King Wen Zhen Jun" came into his 
eyes, Xie pity could not help but widen his eyes. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 154: Why 
don’t you want to be disrespectful? 


Seeing that there are uninvited guests breaking in, Jingwen vigilantly said: 
"Who are you?!" 


However, this questioning to him is actually not a "person", but a rough 
stone statue of a man, naked, but wrapped around the whole body, 
inexplicably strange, and inexplicably funny. 


It is no wonder that he walked without making footsteps, but issued a 
"squeaky" noise; no wonder when he and the spirit saw him, they were 
shocked; it is no wonder that the spirit said with a squint. Because, from 
the head to the foot, there is really no point like a female ghost. 


Both the shackles and the spirits were wrapped in a scroll-like thing, and 
they were firmly held in the hands of the sacred texts. Thank you very 


much, it’s easy to go back to God, saying: “??? =???” 
Jingwen said: "You are Prince Xianle?" 


Thanks for your pity, said: "Ah? You actually recognize me? This is 
really..." 


However, it is not surprising that when the first flight of the courtesy, the 
battle was great. He may not recognize every priest in heaven, but every 
priest in heaven will definitely recognize him. Just like now, he can't 
remember what Jingwen looks like. Jingwen still remembers him and said: 
"Of course. Prince Edward's Highness 1s ups and downs, I don't think it's 
hard to know you!" 


Xie Pity is a little touched, subconsciously: "I am honored, honored... but 
how can you become this now..." 


Jingwen said: "How can I become like this?" 


Xie pity and cough, nodded, feeling that this problem is a bit rude. 
Jingwen took the opportunity to attack, saying: "It is not the gift of the 
monk of the South Palace. The temple is weak, my mana is getting weaker 
and weaker. She is still going down the stone to stop and intercept me. I 
have to attach this statue to me. On, can survive to this day!" 


Lingwen said: "Isn't it too much compared to you? Isn't it? You personally 
ordered me to stay in Jingwen Hall to stay in Sanjiao, but I went out and 
said that I am not ashamed to stay in the middle of the night and entangled 
in you. Speech kills invisible, I use Mingdao Responding, more polite." 


After that, he suddenly kicked out, and he was in the middle of the text. 
This trick seems to have no power in thanking the pity. After all, the stone 
statue is not a **, and at most it can only smash the few pieces of cloth on 
the Jingwen. Who knows, Jingwen issued a sharp scream, as if he really 
kicked his life, and caught his lower body. 


However, it is already late. The layer of white cloth around him was 
kicked off by the spirit, and the pity seemed to fly fast, under the white 
cloth, nothing. 


Nothing means nothing. This is a stone statue of nakedness. However, he 
has no things he should have. 


This stone statue is actually a sly figure! 
Thank you for your pity: "It turned out to be a slave!" 


This kind of stone statue is common among the tombs of the nobles and 
nobles. It is a kind of burial funerary. It is indeed a good choice for 
possession. However, Jingwen is such a male **** officer who loses 
money to the woman. The final destination is a monk slave. It is ironic! 


Lingwen laughed: "I said why are you so irritated? It turns out! I can't get 
so high? Now how high you can look like this, I will wait and see! 
Hahahahahaha..." 


The obituary fig leaf was torn down and trampled, and he was very angry. 
He grabbed the hair of the spirit and said: "Stop! I don’t know how many 
priests have fallen asleep to climb to the point where you are today. Are 
you proud of it?! I apologize!" 


Lingwen almost got rid of a lot of hair, but he did not ask for mercy, and 
did not apologize. Ruan said: "Are you really a **** of the gods? There is 
no wind and wind, and the shrews on the streets are better than you!" 


Xie pity complained, for fear that he was so excited that both of them were 
dying, and could not help but "feed", and said: "Calm! Jingwen Zhenjun! 
Actually! There is no difference in that thing!" Really!" 


Jingwen grabbed the spirit in one hand, and squatted in one hand. Body, 
roaring: "You lie! Is there any difference?! You have not tried it?!" 


Thank you very much and sincerely: "Really! Believe me! I, although 
there is that thing! But! There is no difference with not having that thing! 
Because | am!" 


He also offered himself and appeared. After hearing this, Jingwen seems 
to calm down a bit and said: "Which of you?!" 


Thanks to pity: "That's the way! You know! Even if I have, I never use it! 
Cough, in fact, whether it is a male priest, a goddess official, or... other 
priests, these are things outside the body, don't have to be so persistent... ” 


Jingwen interrupted him: "Since you feel that there is no difference, then 
you cut it and show it to me." 


Thankfulness: "???" 


Jingwen immediately said: "Don't you say that there is no difference? 
False! You can't bear to have this thing clearly, use less of that nonsense to 
persuade me, I will not cry if you eat two sugars, you will cry and repent. 
Young! It doesn't matter if you don't cut it, I cut him!" 


He is referring to jealousy. Suddenly: "You fucking?!" 


This is a terrible thing. Although there are many people who want to cut 
off the generals of the generals, thank you for not wanting him to be 
defeated here, busy: "King is really good! Although you are bullying, you 
are not right, but you also bullied. If she is too flat, why bother to do so!" 
While talking and diverting attention, while quietly letting go of evil, let it 
slip into the back of Jingwen like a snake. Jingwen said: "Is it even? It's 
not that simple. You reminded me that I have something to ask this monk! 
- Nangong, you must destroy the country, do you have any hands and 
feet?" 


Jingwen is the literary **** who wants Li to be on the altar. Li is the 
foundation of his country. If the roots are ruined, it will naturally suffer 
and even decline. Therefore, it is very reasonable to respect the spirit of 
the text. After he asked, the spirit was shut up and did not answer. Jingwen 
shouted: "Quickly say! Is it a ghost you made?! I know, it must be you! It 
is definitely you, or it can't be destroyed so fast! It is all sinister to you! 
That idiot general It must be harmful to you!" 


Thank you for your pity: "When the spirit has not answered you, why do 
you ask yourself to answer... Wait, what? What general?" 


Over there, the spirit suddenly laughed low. If it’s not Jingjing’s possession 
on the stone statue of the slave, it’s expressionless, I’m afraid I’ve been 
gnashing my teeth, saying, “What are you laughing at?” 


The spirit raised his head slightly and whispered: "You know, in front of 
him, calling him an idiot, what will happen?" 


The tribute is still unknown. The next moment, the scroll that binds the 
spirit is split, and a hand with black sleeves punctures out from the broken 
debris, covering its celestial cover. 


Jingwen’s words were too late to say more, and they were already stiff. On 
the rough face, there was a crack, and then the second and third... 


Within three voices, the whole body, broken bones! 


And the spirits broke free from the bondage, standing in the same place, 
the layers of black gas scattered around the feet, the pile of gravel residue. 


It turns out that the "old country" in the legend of Jin Yixian is Li Guo, and 
Bai Jin is also a Li national. Xie Li just finished his thoughts and listened 
to the shackles that were firmly tied by the scrolls: "Lingwen? You stand 
first." 


I saw that the spirit turned and was walking towards him step by step. 
When I think of the genius, I say "He doesn't like you very much", thank 
you for your pity: "Oops, is this going to kill people?" 


While walking, Lingwen pacified and pacified: "Bai Jin, he 1s already 
dead, all nonsense, nothing." 


However, the effect does not seem to be good, the spirit said again: "I can't 


help the old man, he listened to the honorary saying that youaremy | 
head, ironhearted want to kill you. Your Royal Highness, help!" 


Without her reminder, Xie Li has already opened a scroll that binds the 
shackles, and jumps up. The two flew away from the hole and returned to 
the ground. Looking down, I saw the spirit. The fist box is in the place 


where the ae 


Thanks for accepting the evil, and rolling it on the wrist, he also lived 
alive and wrist, and was tied for so long, and his left hand was swollen for 
a little, but it was only from the one million wasps to the fifth. The extent 
to which 100,000 wasps have collapsed. He said: "I am fucking..." 


The voice has not fallen, the figure of the spirit has been forced to his 
eyes! 


The two were on the palm of their hand and each returned a few feet. 
Cheer and pity look at each other, the heart is tricky, and the legs run wild. 
Thanks to pity, he ran back and shouted: "Lingwen! Can you persuade the 
White General again!" 


The spirits chased after them and said: "I have persuaded! But he does not 
believe me!" 


He said: "It must be because you lied to him and he was injured!" 


Thanks for your pity: "Lingwen! Can you change back to the female body? 
The body of the female body will have a little bit of lethality!" 


Lingwen said: "No!" 
Thank you, "Why not?" 
Lingwen: "He won't let me change back!" 


Hey: "I understand! This kid doesn't dare to stick to the woman's body! 
Oh!" 


Rumble! A roof slammed from behind, almost praying and smashing 
Mount Taishan, Lingwen said: "Not that I threw! Who told you to slap 
him, he is even more angry, both of you are dangerous!" 


Thank you for your help: "Ah? What about me? I can't say anything, you 
don't want me to count me in the spirit?" 


He said: "Come on, people are more likely to share. Prince's Highness, 
Xiao Yan? Half-moon National Teacher? Your **** rain?" 


Thanks to pity: "Go to the other direction to find you, don't count on it. We 
have already ran for dozens of miles. Let's run and talk about it! He has 
sucked more than a thousand demons. It's not hard at the moment!" 


Who knows, he just finished, suddenly the soles of the feet floated, the 
whole body was lifted up. Not only him, but also his eyes, the two of them 
were each caught in a large net and hung in the air. 


This is really a disaster, and the net seems to be made of special materials, 
which can't be torn. At the same time, there are many demon ghosts in the 
woods in all directions, and there are also one or two hundred, and one 
clap is ecstasy: "Catch!" 


"Ha ha ha ha, this is the first few to be arrested? This trap is really good!" 
"Look at what you caught, there are a few people!" 


It was a momentary intention, panic-stricken, and fell into the trap of such 
a third-rate kid. Thanks for the subconsciousness to touch the heart and the 
net, and found out the space before I found out that the network was 
suddenly opened, and the heart fell off the ground, did not bring it up, and 
the spirit has already caught up with the net, his feet are the heart. The 
little devil still doesn't know what's coming, and he likes it: "One more!" 


The spirit raised his hands, and both hands held a group of black lacquered 
wildfires. He looked up and politely and said: "Two, I... really, I can’t help 
myself." 


Thanks, pity, and said: "Lingwen, I can ask, what will happen to this group 
of things?" 


Ling Wendao: "The last time I used such a large group of wildfires, I hit 
the high school of Qi Ying, he was injured. But fortunately, still can run 
and jump." 


It seems that the lethality is not big, and there is nothing to be hit. Thanks 
and pity are relieved, saying: "Fortunately, okay..." 


Just finished "good", the two groups of ghosts in the hands of the spirit 
suddenly rose ten times, becoming two raging fires! 


Thanks: "..." 


'..."" Lingwen said, "But such a big group, what will happen after being hit, 
I will not know." 


Roaring: "Wait, but my mother is not your hoe?!!!" 


Lingwen said: "I don't know why, but it's useless to know that I know it!" 


A circle of demons and ghosts were stunned by the two groups of ghosts, 
and quickly copied the guys, and the fierce spirits surrounded them up and 
shouted: "Good boy! The courage is very big, and I want to rob us of the 
head, dead|dead." he!!!" 


However, such miscellaneous soldiers, they do not pose any threat to 
Jinyixian, at best, only become his new wave of nutrients. The spirit is 
slightly side-to-side, and the phosphorescence of the wildfire is reflected 
in the pupil. It seems that it 1s ready to receive the head of the person who 
sent it to the door. At this time, there was a gust of wind blowing. 


In the screams of the screams, the little ghosts were caught in the sky! 


It is not so much that it has been blown up by the "wind". It is better to say 
that it was caught in the sky by an invisible giant hand! 


Jin Yixian seems to be aware of it, vigilant, and the hand of the spirits 
holding the fires is also lowered, and slowly sweeping around. Thanks for 
the effort to look up, but the top is covered by dense foliage, and the 
screams of the ghosts have long since stopped. Therefore, I don’t know 


what happened above. alertly said: "Who is here?" 

Looking at it for a while, thanked the pity suddenly: "You didn't smell it?" 
Shouted: "What?" 

Thanks to the pity: "Flower." 

Doubt: "Is there something?" 


Thank you for closing your eyes. Swearing, surely said: "Yes. It is indeed a 
floral fragrance." 


A faint, weird, cold floral fragrance. I don't know what the name is, I don't 
know where. It is very light and shallow, and it seems to have nothing yet. 


He frowned: "The flowers didn't smell, but they smelled..." 


When the words are not over, he feels something is dripping on his face, 
and he has a slight crease. 


is blood. 


The wildfire in the hands of the spirit was also dropped two drops, and the 
flame was weakened. His look became more vigilant and he looked up 
sharply. In a flash - 


The wind and the rain, falling from the sky! 


The cockroach hangs more than the praying, and when it is on the way, it is 
hit by the sudden rain of the blood, and it is a red pheasant. Only a pair of 
eyes are black and white, and the eyes are round and round. The wildfire of 
the hands of the spirits was blown out completely, and they fled to the tree, 
avoiding the consequences of unprepared and unprepared. And thanking 
pity suddenly felt that the net was broken, the body sank and fell down. He 
turned over in the air and landed steadily, just as the **** hurricane was 
about to come. 


It’s too late to dodge again, thank you for holding up your sleeves and 
being prepared to block how much. However, after the darkness, he heard 
a low chuckle. 


In the air, suddenly overflowing with the fascinating floral fragrance. 


Thanks for raising his face slightly, he didn't feel the rain hitting the 
human face, but instead felt something soft and extreme. 


As soon as I reached out, I caught it and looked down. The quiet palm of 
my hand turned out to be a small red flower petal. 


He raised his head again and held his breath, only to be unbelievable. 
The **** rain is actually a flower rain that has been raging in the sky! 


There is no need to guess who the person is. Thanks for the five fingers, 
holding the petal and blurting out: "Sanlang!" 


As soon as he turned around, he saw that the spirit had fallen silently. And 
the independent place, the high-haired teenager in the red hair and the 
light smile, is not the flower city and who? 


Flowers are bloody, blood is like flowers. The face was as beautiful as the 
first sight, and the eyes were shining. He slowly put the slender silver 
scimitar into the sheath, Shen Sheng said: "His Royal Highness, I am 
back." 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 155: The 
mountain road is far from the narrow road. 


Xie pity stepped on the floor of Zhu Hongchong Qiong, slowly came, saw 
the flower city shoulder with a little bit of bonus, I wanted to help him 
smashed, but suddenly realized that the action was too close, forced to 
press, hand back behind, laugh Road: "I don't know, except that you can 
bring blood and rain, you can come to fly. Interesting and interesting." 


Huacheng also approached him and smashed the petals of his shoulders. 
He also smiled and said: "This is a new trick that was improvised and 
created today. It was originally a routine to have a **** rain, but suddenly 
thought of my brother. If it's drenched, don't you blame me? So the cliffs 
are horses and turned into flowers. It's fun." 


However, the pity is not drenched, but it is dripping. He said in the air: 
"Excuse me, two, let me down first, OK?" 


A few silver butterflies fluttered their wings, and the phosphorescent 
wings shattered the grid, so that they could escape and land stably. 
Cheering down, seeing a silver butterfly in the center of the butterfly bone 
on the back of the spirit, said: "Samuro, Lingwen and Jinyixian are all 
unaffected?" 


Huacheng Road: "No problem. I let them sleep for a while." 
Thanks to pity: "This is so violent, you are subduing quickly." 


Huacheng raised his eyebrows: "It's okay. I don't know why, it doesn't 
seem to want to fight with me." 


Indulge in a moment, thanking the pity: "It is also said. Before you wear it, 
it can't take you, and it is obvious." 


At this time, he walked over and said: "Two, turn back and talk. Don't you 
take this clothes off first?" 


Thanks to pity: "This... is not convenient?" 


He didn't mean it: "He is a man now, 1s there any inconvenience?" He said 
it started. However, he just reached into the collar of the spirit, as if he had 
been smashed by something, his face changed greatly, he plucked back, his 
hands were full of blood, and said: "This dress! It will bite!" 


Huacheng is so long and elegant: "Jin Yixian refused to let go of the spirit, 
can't take it off." 


Look at the two **** hands and say: "Do you have such a thing, can you 
tell me the ghost king?" 


Thank you for your kindness: "Hey general, it’s not that he didn’t say it 
earlier, it’s too fast for you.” 


Huacheng is authentic: "That's it." 


" " 


Despite his disability, he is still determined to be a strong man. The three 
men have to return to the original path. They have to have a man who is 
masculine with the spirit of the man. He still took the initiative to shoulder 
this responsibility. 


and half a month still stay in the original town, a group of people 
gathered in the vicinity of the temple of Wuyong, when they came back, 
they sneaked up and said: "General, too, the son of the temple, the god, the 
temple , murals, disappeared!" 


He rubbed his hand in the spirit, and put the **** hair back in one hand, 
saying: "What mural?" 


Seeing that all of them are purple and red, they have eyes widened for half 
a month. Xie pity simply said a few words with the ,, then he followed the 


back to the temple to see. Sure enough, the original wall has become 
exactly the same as the other blackened walls that have been burnt on 
three sides, as if there had never been any murals. 


Huacheng took the handle off the wall and said: "The mural was made by 
magic." 


Xie pity nodded and said: "Maybe, the people who left it have concerns 
and dare not let it exist for too long." 


Over there, hesitated for a long time in half a month, or screamed at the 
whole body: "You...all right?" 


Look at her and scare: "You ask your snake, bite me like this, is there 
something?" 


opened his mouth, not sure if he should say a few fair words. Half a 
month’s eyes were bigger and he argued: “But... ’'m bitten by a rattlesnake 
and won’t spread to the whole body and become like this...” 


He raised his left hand with a tooth print and shook it in front of her, 
proving that he was indeed bitten. "Iron certificate" is like a mountain. For 
half a month, I have to say: "I'm sorry..." 


I couldn’t stand it anymore, patted her shoulder and said, “No, I want, 
care. It’s not yours, the snake bites.” 


Xie pity can't stand anymore, but helplessly said: "Hey general, can you 
not tease the little girl like this, it's time." 


However, the source of his life is here. He washed his blood with mana, 
and his face was radiant. He laughed and said: "Isn't the little girl just 
teasing? And the half-month of the national division is a few hundred. 
Years old, what a girl, are you afraid that she is awkward?" 


"..." Everyone didn't want to care about him. 
Although the sentence was not good, but the action was able to move 
freely, took over the task of Ling Lingwen, the pedestrian walked through 


the town and continued to the next level of Tongluoshan. 


One day later, everyone came to a small canyon. 


On both sides of the gorge are winding mountains, rocky cliffs, and a 
mountain road in the middle. When I got here, the spirit finally woke up in 


a groggy way. 


Although he woke up, he still couldn't move because the silver butterfly 
was still firmly on his back. Lingwen found that he was shackled on the 
shoulders of a person and did not change his color. He only confused: "... 
Why are so many people? How come you all come here? Isn't it here?" 


He said: "This is more? Tell you, there are more people in the future, and 
you have not seen it, you can make a few tables to play cards." 


Thanks for the deep feelings, I can't help but laugh. Suddenly, said: "Yes, 
Lingwen, before in the view of Bodhisattva, Qiying 1s chasing you, where 
is he now?" 


Lingwen said: "I don't know. After entering the Boiler Mountain, there are 
too many inhuman objects, and His Royal Highness has chased it. I don't 
know where he is." 


He sighed at the Lingu: "You didn't even tell me that it was you who took 
the last straw to save the country. It's too kind." 


Thanks to the pity, this is what I think of. However, he seems to have no 
feelings for Li, but after all, he is only a general, not a national lord, and 
he was also swayed by the king before he was promoted. Therefore, there 
is no grief and anger in the discourse. However, I was grateful to worry 
about talking too much about the need for the Lieutenant Congress to 
anger the singer, or to quickly turn the subject. I asked back, "Sara, I have 
always had a question." 


After entering the canyon, Huacheng has been watching the mountains on 
both sides, saying: "Ask." 


Thanks to the pity: "What is the "copper stove" of Tongluoshan? Is it 
really a big stove?" 


Huacheng smiled and regained his gaze. "Of course not. However, my 
brother asked for cleverness." He raised his finger. "Just, you can see it 
now." 


The crowd looked in the direction of his guidance, and for a moment, they 
could not help but stop. 


Thanks to pity: "...that is... “copper stove’?” 
Huacheng holds his arm and says: "Not bad." 
His dark eyes reflected a great mountain far away. 


Far in the sky, high in the world, above the peaks, showing a deep blue 
color, the peak of the mountain is surrounded by the wind and the sky, 
faintly can also see a layer of snow, as if the ice age 1s not a year. 


Huacheng slowly said: "The 'Bronze Furnace' ts an active volcano and the 
center of the entire Bronze Mountain. When the Ghost King was born, it 
was when it was awakened." 


Thanks: "The volcano erupted?" 


Huacheng Road: "Yes. Therefore, the Desperate Ghost King was born with 
the flames, magma, and the catastrophe that destroyed the land." 


Imagine the hot picture that is both red and red. Ruan said: "It's too far. It's 
going to take a long time to go down at this speed, not counting the time 
between the middle and the ghosts." 


Xie pity nodded and said: "So it is like a difficult birth in the past." 


Huacheng smiled and said: "The metaphor of my brother is very 
wonderful." After that, he suddenly stopped and said, "Come." 


"999" thankful, "so fast?" 


Huacheng Road: "It is here. However, it is not to the copper furnace, it is 
to the Wuyong gods." 


Sure enough, in the center of the front canyon, there was a tall and sturdy 
view of the palace. 


This is the second view of Wuyong that they encountered. Xie pity 
couldn't help but want to blink his eyes, wondering: "Is this view of God 
true?" 


You can't blame him. In fact, almost everyone is wondering if this temple 
is true. Because, it appears to be too awkward. 


It should not appear here at all. Has anyone seen a temple in the not-so- 
canyon mountain road? What is this dog| ? 


Even if you can't think about it, you have to build it in such a place. At 
least it should be built on one side. However, this Wuyong Temple is built 
in the middle of the canyon passage. It is like a brainless little bully, 
directly blocking it. The road through the canyon! 


Shen Shen said: "There must be a demon, we must be careful." 


Lingwen is on the shoulders of his shoulders, and he tries to raise his head: 
"You, if you don't want to enter it, you can actually fly over the cliff." 


Thanks for the pity: "No. We have to go in and see if there are murals." 


Huacheng Road: "My brother is relieved. If you want to see it, you can see 
it. It's no big deal." 


He said this, everyone was inexplicably safe, and the group walked slowly. 
There was no abnormality until I walked to the temple. Stepping over the 
gate and entering the hall, sure enough, the walls of the temple here are 
also the dark colors after the fire was burned. Just a glimpse of it, like a 
temple, also dropped a small piece of hard and hard debris. 


Xie Li first began to be very vigilant. At this point, there seems to be no 
hidden secrets, a little peace of mind, so, said: "Do it." 


After a short time, the blackened "protective layer" on the wall was 
removed a little bit, revealing the mural behind. Xie Li and Huacheng 
studied together. 


The murals in this temple are completely different from the ones on the 
previous one. They are seen from the top. At the top of the screen, a white 
boy is sitting on a jade couch, and his eyebrows are clear, it is the Prince 
of Wuyong. He closed his eyes and looked at his posture, as if he was 
meditating. However, it is not stable. 


The Prince's brow was close to his brow, and his forehead seemed to shed a 
few drops of cold sweat. There are four characters on the side, and the look 
on the face 1s worried. It is the four guardian gods under the prince in the 
last mural. Their hairdressing costumes are exactly the same as the 
previous murals. Continue to look down, the protective layer is still slowly 
falling off, not yet removed, thank you for seeing a messy red, slightly 
frowning, said: "Weird." 


He reached out and touched the wall gently, wondering: "Is this mural 
saved?" 


Although I can't see what the specific painting is, I can see that the lines 
and colors of this piece are vague and embarrassing, as if a layer of light 
smoke is shrouded. However, this mural is made by the technique, and 
how can it be preserved as a real mural? 


Huacheng is also looking at it, squinting and saying: "Let's wait." 


The two looked at each other. When the blackened hard objects were 
exhausted and the picture was complete, they took a few steps and looked 
back. When the whole picture came into view, the pity breathed a little, 
and suddenly the scalp was numb. 


He stunned: "Is this... hell?" 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 156: The 
mountain road is far from the narrow road 2 


Huacheng Shen Sheng: "No. It is human." 


It is indeed human. Because the pictures in the picture are dense houses, 
trees, and people, however, they are all drowned in an endless sea of fire 
and flowing magma. The vague red color that I saw when I saw it was the 
color of the fire. 


Houses and trees are burning, people are blazing and screaming. The 
distorted faces were too realistic, and they could hear their tragedies. 


At the center of the picture, a red mountain is painted, as if it is a huge red 
stove. It is terrible. And the flames and magma are all spit out from the 
mountain pass of the mountain. 


Thanks to the pity: "This mural means...the volcanic eruption, Wu Yong 
destroys the country?" 


Huacheng Road: "Yes. Not right." 


Thanks for your pity, said: "This statement is not accurate. Because this 
is...dream." 


The next human tragedy below should be the dream of the Uyghur Prince. 


The Uighurs and the Four Protectors of Heaven and God are all painted 
with golden light, indicating that he has already risen at this time. And he 
is being tortured by nightmares, so the content, lines and colors of dreams 
are "virtual", as opposed to "real". 


Some of the priests have strong mana and talents. After seeing some small 
signs, they can peep into the future in their dreams. That is, it will make a 
prophetic dream. I wonder if the dream of His Royal Highness is true? Is 
the Wuyong State so ruined? 


After a moment of indifference, thank you: "There must be someone who 
wants to tell us something. The story of this mural should be followed by 
the previous one. I think that when we walked to the end of the "Bronze 
Furnace’, we will be able to untie it. A lot of questions." 


At this time, Lingwen looked out the window and said: "You, there is 
something, I have to ask, do you think it is strange?" 


Shouted: "Where is it strange?" 


Lingwen said: "I don't know if I remember correctly, but the mountain 
walls on both sides are so close?" 


Everyone looked out the window. Sure enough, when they came in, the 
outer mountain wall was about a mile away from the window, but at the 
moment it was pushed very close, as if it would be posted. I was grateful 


to see it in the past, but I heard a strange sound of "Kala Kala" and" 


"as if the civil and masonry were squeezed. 
Now, everyone feels, saying: "What happened?" 


The floor tiles were trembling, and the ceiling was trembled. Two pieces, 
the gravel fell to the bottom. Ruan said: "Is the ground moving?" 


The voice just fell, the wall has been squeezed out of a few sultry "folds." 
Thanks for the pity: "Not earth moving! Yes..." 


It is the mountain wall on both sides, and it is squeezing to the middle of 
the Wuyong Temple! 


No time to explain, he shouted: "Run!" 


Needless to say, he has already collapsed a wall and opened an exit. 
Everyone broke through the wall and ran to the front. However, they still 
ran in the temple of Wuyong, because this temple is very deep, except for 
a large hall, there are many partial halls, small halls, fragrant rooms, and 
Taoist houses. Wait, so everyone has to run all the way through the wall. 
At this time, the style of action of the Valkyrie really helped a lot. 


However, only after passing through the two small halls, a half-man-high 
stone smashed the roof and slammed into the feet of Xie. 


This is the boulder that falls above the mountain walls on both sides! 


The bang of the bangs continued, and more boulder fell from the sky. 
Large as a water tank, directly collapsed a whole roof, small as a human 
head, falling from the sky, the power is amazing, but there is a layer of 
roof blocking, and everyone is good, dodge in time. Only Huacheng is the 
most laid-back, and Xie pity ran and flashed. He suddenly listened to him. 
"Brother, come over?" 


Looking back, Huacheng followed him one step away, steadily flying, I did 
not know where to take out his red umbrella, looking at him with a smile 
under the umbrella. And those who fell to the paradise on the surface of 
the stone, Huacheng single-handed umbrella, even shaking without 
shaking! 


Xie pity immediately went to the bottom of his umbrella and said: "Good 
insurance, good luck, Sanro." 


Huacheng smiled and tilted the umbrella to him thoughtfully. He said, 
"Come here." 


Although it was out of date, Xie Pity couldn't help but feel the slightest 
movement, saying: "You are so tired and tired? Do you want me to help 
you with an umbrella..." 


The rest of the people fled and flashed, running crazy, seeing them so 
comfortable, could not stand it, could not help but said: "Hey, this is not 
fair!" 

“The flower city owner can ask if you have extra umbrellas?!” 


"Can you borrow somewhere to hide?!" 


Huacheng smirked: "No. No." 


In the anti-speaking voice of everyone, Xie Pity is also a little 
embarrassed, said: "This mountain is really strange!" When he said, he 
wanted to sneak out, but Huacheng took him without any trace and calmly 
explained to him. "My brother can be right. This mountain is indeed a 
strange, strange strange. There are three big mountains in the Tonglu 
Mountain, called 'old’, 'ill', 'dead', although not the same as ordinary 
mountains, but in The operation in the Tonglushan area is automatic, so 
some people regard them as landmarks of Tonglushan." 


The top of the rock is arrogant, but under the umbrella is harmonious. 
Thanks to pity: "It turned out to be the case! Before Rong Rong disguised 
as the mountain that stopped us from going to the road, is it one of the 
three mountain monsters?" 


Lingwen was up and down on his back, and he was still communicating 
with each other. "It is no wonder that this Wuyong Temple was so 
strangely built in the middle of the 'Canyon'. I am afraid that the place 
where it was chosen is not so wonderful. It is the two. The mountain 
monster took the initiative to attack it!" 


Thanks to the pity: "However, ‘he is sick and dead’, since there is ‘old sick 
and dead’, then ‘live’?” 


Huacheng Road: "Unfortunately, there is no ‘life’. At least I have not seen 
it. 


Thanks for the pity: "Do you mean to live alive? It is cruel!" 
Then, half moon road: "The mountain wall is still close!" 


When they first entered the canyon, the mountain road was about ten feet 
wide, and the narrower and narrower. When they walked to the front of the 
Wuyong Temple, the road was less than ten feet. Now, the distance 
between the mountain walls on both sides is no more than three feet. The 
houses and walls were crumpled, because the Wuyong Temple used hard 
building materials such as stone beams to "catch" the mountain walls that 
are close to each other. But I am afraid I can't hold on for a long time, and 


said: "There is no way to go before and after. Break the roof and go up! 
There is nothing to meet the stone rain. It is broken!" 


Xie pity but said: "No! There are still temples stuck, go up, in case two 
mountain monsters hit a palm in the air, they are directly killed by them!" 


During the speech, the two sides approached faster, and the car was pulled. 
The place where everyone was accommodated was less than two feet wide. 
Under such circumstances, the spirit is still unable to move, can not help 
but said: "You, can you take any measures quickly? If you can not, can let 
me let me take measures myself? I do not want to be so clipped |Death 
thank you???" 


The fire is burning, and where is the measure so easy to think of? As the 
space continued to shrink and shrink to only one person, he suddenly 
sighed and leaped. His hands pressed against the left side of the mountain 
wall, his feet against the right side of the mountain wall, and the whole 
person became a "thorn", which was stuck in two big mountains, saying: 
"It is clipped|dead, I am him." Mom doesn't want to be caught by this kind 
of thing|death. I will hold it first, and you will quickly find a solution!" 


" " 


Everyone was shocked by his move, and the spirit reluctantly gave him a 
thumbs up and said: "Daddy, real man!" 


Bite the teeth: "Polite!" 


The strength of the Valkyrie does not need to be said more, the two 
mountain walls are still moving closer to the middle, and it seems that 
they are stuck in a deadlock and are in a deadlock. But this is the effect of 
exploding all the mana, and certainly can't last for a long time. When Xie 
pity quickly thinks about the strategy of getting out of the way, the two 
mountain monsters have a slight advantage and are pressed against their 


knees. Seeing the situation is not good, : "Yes, I am, to help you!" 
A handful of shoulders and spirits for half a month, also joined the ranks 
of human flesh. But he is a mortal at the moment, how come the power? 

Jin Yixian is in the body of the spirit can be, but he is too dangerous, 


released it is only afraid of the oil on the fire, is equal to has fallen into the 
wolf's nest and stepped on a snake. So, half a month left the spirit, said: "I 
am coming..." 


However, she is a little girl's body shape after all, not as long as the two 
big men have long legs and short legs, the card is not on the wall, so I have 
to take a palm to the back, give him the mana, and stay here. Slowly 
straighten your knees with your ankle. The two men broke out, their faces 
were blood red, and the blue veins skyrocketed. The flower city with the 
strongest mana in this group turned to the red umbrella at the moment, and 
it was not active at all. Suddenly, thank you for a fist in your hand, saying: 
"With! Have it!" 


There is a way! Thanks to the pity: "Since going to the back and going up, 
it will not work, then go down! Let's dig a hole to avoid it!" 


Lingwen immediately said: "Good idea! Please start now!" 
Bite your teeth: "That... trouble you... hurry up...!!!" 


Thanks for the pity: "Okay is good!" I have already frantically smashed 
the pit on the ground with my heart, and I am going to fly the sand and go 
to the mud. Huacheng gave him an umbrella on the side, but instead of 
working, he advised: "Brother, don't dig, sit down and rest." 


Everyone couldn’t help but said: "Flower City Lord!!!" 
Huacheng Road: "Well? Call me what?" 


Lingwen squatted on the ground and said: "Flower City Lord, you and your 
Royal Highness are also here. If there is a move, can you support one? 
After all, everyone does not want to change the slate stuff." There is 
another saying that everyone is not very embarrassed to say: If you don't 
have a move, can you bother to go up as a personal meat stuck? Although 
Xie Pity is anxious, he instinctively trusts him, while he is squatting at the 
bottom of his hand, he said: "Sanlang, do you have a solution?" 


Huacheng smiled and said: "Brother and wait, you don't have to do it, just 
a little while." 


At the moment, all of them are burning their ass. Although everyone 
thinks he should have a solution, he still can't help but feel that his **** 1s 
hot. Lingwen is going to say it again, but pity suddenly said: "What 
sound?" 


In the bang of the boulder in the sky, another strange sound appeared and it 


was approaching quickly. Rub and rub! !! !! Extremely fast, 
getting closer and closer, and thankful that this voice is a bit familiar, 
seems to have heard it, stopped the crazy pit, said: "This... is this?!" 


As soon as the voice fell, his feet suddenly collapsed, revealing a black 
hole that was enough to accommodate two people. In the hole, the head of 
a shovel is raised and reflects the white light of the snow! 


The treasurer of the geographer! 


The shovel lit up and quickly retracted into the hole. Huacheng Road: "It’s 
late, but it’s catching up. Let’s go.” 


Thanks to the two words, the first thing to grab the spirit and lose it, and 
then half a month and stay together. Lost the "thorn" in the middle, the two 
mountain monsters suddenly accelerated the movement, in the sound of 
rolling, Huacheng stopped and thanked the pity, said: "Come on!" Then he 
hugged him and jumped into the tunnel. . Xie pity only immersed in a 
darkness, and then there was a loud noise from the top. 


The two mountains finally fit together! 


If they are still above, they must have been crushed into patties. The 
horror was a little bit, and a small flame was ignited in the darkness. Xie 
pity looked at the tunnel where they were at the moment. They were not 
wide and narrow, and they were neat and tidy. Several people who fell first 
on the ground squatted on the ground and gasped. Huacheng loosened his 
waist, and Xie pity took the unconsciously climbing his shoulder and 
looked at the black man holding the shovel. 


The black man was also gasping, licking the shovel and wiping a few cold 
sweats. Thank you for taking a few steps and taking a closer look. This 
person seems to be a clean and tidy young man, Junxiu is also handsome, 
and he can have a seven-point appearance, but there is no personality. 
Presumably, there must be someone who has a very thin feeling on 
weekdays. 


Xie pity came to him, the black man looked up and said: "Prince of the 
Princex.* 


Waiting for him to finish, thankfulness has already grasped his pulse, 
saying: "Where is the wind master?" 


The black man sighed and said, "Ah? This... I don't know." 


Thanks for the pity, he said: "Why should you play again in Blackwater? 
Your revenge is your business, but the Fengshi adults have a good 
relationship with you, and they have not done anything to hurt the world, 
but also hope..." 


At this time, the spirit interrupted him: "Blackwater? Your Royal 
Highness, why do you think he is black water? The face is different." 


Thanks to pity, he turned back and wondered: "Because he 1s holding the 
shovel of the landlord. And, do you not know the metamorphosis? This 
face is so flat, it is a fake face that can’t be picked up immediately. ” 


The head first said the method of transformation, and now this face of the 
black youth is perfectly in line with the first essentials of a good fake skin: 
unremarkable. 


Even if I stare at his face and watch an hour, I can sleep, and the next day I 
can forget what he has to do. Isn’t it a fake face? 


" " 


However, for a long while, the black youth said: "I'm sorry, Your Royal 
Highness, but, I... I really grew like this." 


Huacheng also came over and coughed and said: "Brother, this is really not 
black water." 


a a 
Huacheng Road: "This is indeed his true content." 
It turned out that this is a real natural road face! 


Thank you for holding your forehead, and you must change your hands to 
ten, and slightly apologize: "...sorry." 


He actually took it for granted. Actually, in front of others, he directly said 
that he was unremarkable and could not be picked up. There is no way, 
because his face is really a positive example of a metamorphosis! 


The young man in black is also extremely savvy, and he said: "Nothing is 
ok, I have been used to it..." 


Lingwen said: "Introducing His Royal Highness, this time, thanks to you." 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 157: The 
mountain road is far from the narrow road 3 


Hearing this title, thanking him for a moment, only to notice that the 
young man’s voice is a bit familiar. He should have listened to it a few 
times and went to see the wrist in the next eye. Although the wrist was 
covered by the sleeves, he was sure that the bottom of the sleeve must 
have a black curse. 


He also stood up and further confirmed the identity of the young man in 
black: "His Royal Highness? It’s true. I didn’t expect to meet you here. 
You are..." 


The jade fingertips licked the nose and sighed, and also said hello, saying: 
"Lin Wenzhenjun, General Suijun, General Xiaojun." 


Suddenly, a voice shouted: "Introduction of jade? You are the one that gave 
your own younger brother a defeat?" 


Several of the priests’ expressions were stiff and stiff, and the voice 
continued: “I said, you are too unprofessional? If you are not mentioned, 
you will go directly to the ghosts, and what is right with you, you It’s 
really bad to mix, and you are still his brother...” 


This sound is exactly the volume that shrinks into the jar. I immediately 
posted a note to let him shut up. 


Although, under the hands of Jun Wu, it is also a mixed race. Under the 
master of Huacheng, there is no difference. However, in the past, the 
priests, nowadays, are ghosts, and now they are in the same room with so 
many former friends. The thief was caught as a thief, and the old 
companion was caught. The air was full of ambiguous atmosphere. 
Everyone didn't know what to say, so the jade had to turn silently and copy 
the shovel to continue to dig holes. 


While everyone is on the road, they are still thinking about the 
whereabouts of their younger brothers. "Since the flower city owner can 
get the shovel, it means that you are still connected. I remember that I 
asked His Royal Highness, His Royal Highness." I also excused you, 
saying that you and the blackwater mysterious ghost are not familiar with 
it, and you must not know where his whereabouts come. Can you tell me 
what the mysterious ghost is, if he didn’t kill Qingxuan, please put him 
back?" 


Huacheng said: "You are wrong. I really don't know the black water drop." 
"How did the shovel come?" 


Huacheng Road: "I am jealous." 


He is just arrogant and not acknowledging, what should I do? People can't 
take him anyway, let alone the situation at this moment, everyone still asks 
for him, so I have to say: "Do it. The flower city's main luck is also very 
good, you can pick up the magic weapon." 


The spirit that was shackled on the shoulder habitually said: "This treasure 
shovel is the sacred thing of the heavenly court, and the flower lord is not 
returning to the original..." He said that he did not work in the heavenly 
court. No need to help with debt collection, shut up. 


Thank you for your pity, and still wondering if you should sneak a 
question, and listen to Huacheng’s voice that only he can hear: "Black 
water throws. After he does not play as a division, he will throw the shovel 
into the ghost city. I ran off the road. Before I entered the Tonglushan, I 
thought it might be useful. I sent someone back and took it." 


Thanks to the pity: "It turned out that I thought I could know that the 
windshield fell.... This treasure shovel is used to deal with the mountain 
monsters. Sanlang is really considerate and has no choice." 


Huacheng Road: "It was only that the mountain monster was chasing 
enough in the past and it was long." 


Thankful, I couldn’t help but imagine the appearance of the flower city 
that entered the Tonglushan Mountain as a novice. At this time, a few 
small silver lights were lit up in the darkness, and the dead butterfly sent a 
faint phosphorescence. Lighting things. Thanks to a small silver butterfly, 
looking up, said: "What is this mountain monster? Why attack us?" 


Huacheng Road: "It's hard to say what. When I came, they have been 
around for a long time. However, they are not attacking us. For all those 
who want to enter the Copper Mountain, they will block. If they can't stop, 
they will attack." 


Thanks: "Is there no difference attack? If you think so, it is consistent with 
our purpose. The eyes of the Rain Master and His Royal Highness are also 
in the Tonglu Mountain, I hope they will not be in danger." 


The jade has been excavating and excavating in a diligent way. When he 
heard that he was right, the action seemed to be slightly stagnation. 
Thanks for the pity, he glanced at him and remembered that he had seen 
one side before he was wearing a mask. But at that time, the expression of 
jade seemed to be completely ignorant of the right, if the right knows the 
standing What is going on in front of him? 


Lingwen reluctantly looked up and said: "Your Highness of the Emperor, 
have you seen His Royal Highness? He came to my spiritual temple and 
asked me to help you find you many times." 


The jade card was introduced, and said: "Yes, is it?" 


Lingwen said: "Yes. When you just went down, he came almost one day. 
After all, there was no news. He came to see it in three days. He came to 
see it in a month. He always felt that there was a misunderstanding 
between the things of Jin Yixian, and I wanted to hear your explanation 
and help you explain it to others, but you always have no news." 


Yin Yu did not speak, just sighed and digted more fiercely. Thank you very 
much: "He doesn't want to talk anymore." 


The spirit is also a wise man. If you hear it, you will not talk about it, 
leaving Jade to concentrate on clearing the way. I don’t know how long it 
took, but the jade said: "The city owner, His Royal Highness, we have been 
marching underground for 30 miles, continue to dig?" 


When the shovel shovel shovel in the soil, it was like a wind, it was like 
cutting tofu, and there was no accumulation of broken soil. In addition, the 
pedestrians escaped and walked faster than on the ground, and actually ran 
out for three. Ten miles. Thank you for listening to him and asked him, 
slightly strange, Wen said: "You don't have to ask me." 


Huacheng Road: "Ask everyone is the same. What does your brother 
think?" 


Thanks for thinking, said: "When we were attacked by the mountain 
monsters, we have already come out of the canyon. It should be far enough 
in the 30th. The air circulation in the ground is not enough. I am afraid 
that I will be dizzy when I wait for it. I will dig up." 


Yin Yu should say: "Yes!" Immediately change direction, dig obliquely 
upwards, and even repaired a beautiful dirt step. Thanks for your pity: 
"This person is really a good deputy, and his hands and feet are not a 
nonsense." 


After the people followed the lead, they walked out of the dozens of steps. 
Suddenly, thanking and feeling the foot stepped on a hard protrusion, 
unlike the stone, it was not like mud, bowed down, digs with hands, for a 
moment, slightly squinting . Huacheng met, said: "Brother, don't move!" 
However, it is already late. When Xie pity stood up, the left hand had 
already held up a beggar, and the right hand also held a donkey. "You have 
a problem." Have we dug into a messy burial post?" 


He also pulled out a thigh bone from the soil wall and sighed: "Yes. Look 
at this bone, it must be a beautiful woman with long legs. It is really 
regrettable to bury it here." 


Huacheng Road: "Unfortunately. The length of the leg is not fake, but this 
is a man's bone." 


When I heard that it wasn’t a woman, I lost my thigh bone with little 
interest. Huacheng said again: "Accurately, it is the bone of a man who has 
deformed the ghost, so there must be a corpse poison on it." 


He spread his palms, and sure enough, the place where the hands were 
holding the bones showed a blue corpse. Lingwen said: "Can you control 
your own hands. Can you?" 


: "The corpse, poison no, okay. Will, the army is a priest, after one, 
the array is fine,"! 


To tell the truth, the thigh bone is not only slender, but also quite strong. 
When it is waving, it is still awkward. It is still picked up and wrapped 
around a few strips at the end. It seems that it is intended to be used as a 
weapon. And, said: "How is your prince's possession of the two heads?" 


Thank you for gently putting down two cockroaches and unfolding your 
hands to everyone. It turned out that his palm is also blue, but the cyan is 
rapidly disappearing. 


Thanks for your pity: "It doesn't matter. The number of corpse poisons in 
my family is not as high as one thousand and eight hundred, so the 
resistance 1s already very strong. This level of corpse poison is fine." 


After listening to this, everyone was inexplicably funny and a little wanted 
to laugh. Huacheng did not seem very happy. When he walked over, he 
stepped on the two smashes. 


Thanks to the original peace of mind, but after hearing the violent and 
even fierce "Takaka" two sounds, sensitively caught the unhappy emotions 
of the flower city. I want to ask what is going on, but inexplicably think 
that his unhappiness seems to be caused by himself, so I dare not ask. 


After a short while, I only listened to the flower city: "How did you dig for 
so long?" 


This tunnel should be at most two feet away from the surface. Even if it is 
slightly longer than the oblique excavation, it should not be dug for such a 
long time. The jade is so boring: "I am also strange... Wait, come, and dig 

through!" 


Just after the flower city was finished, the front end of the geostrophic 
shovel dug an empty space, dug through it, and introduced a few shovel to 
make a big hole. He jumped out and said: "Let's come out...?" 


Everyone climbed out, but after the foot was on the "ground", it was 
strange. He said: "Is this back to the ground? No. Where is this?" 


The place where they came out is definitely not the surface. Because the 
light is very bleak. Lingwen said: "When we walked the canyon, it was 
still during the day. There is no reason to be so dark as soon as possible." 


A few deadly butterflies flew out with a faint phosphorescence and circled 
around. The people finally saw what they were in the moment. 


This is a huge cave. Empty and empty, the dome is extremely wide, like 
the dark night sky. In all directions, there are countless small caves, each 
leading to a different direction. Xie pity said: "Is this place artificially cut, 
or is it naturally formed?" 


Huacheng glanced at his arm and said: "The natural formation." 


Although he still has a question and answer for thanking him, Xie Li 
always remembers that he was only a little bit wrong. Huacheng said 
again: "This is the point of picking up, just above the top of the mountain. 
I dig into the mountain." 


Xie pity nodded: "It turns out that. Then we hurry to find the exit." 


: "But, where are you, side, go?" 


This is really a problem. Except for the small holes that small people can't 
drill in, there are seven or eight holes that the rest can pass. Thanks for 


raising his arms and thinking about it, he said: "Min, group, line, move? 
The fastest." 


Thanks for putting down his arm and saying: "No. The split action is a big 
taboo. If something is lurking in the dark, it is too easy to be broken one 
by one. It is better to slow down to find the right way and don't distract the 
power." 


The new weapon made of the thigh bone in his hand seemed to be 
addictive, and he waved and said: "Let's act together, let's go first." 


So the people chose a path and acted together. Huacheng and Xie Shixing 
took the lead. Silently walked for a while, thanked and tried to whisper: 
"Sanlang?" 


The color of the flower city has already eased, and said: "What does your 
brother want to ask?" 


Xie Pity is not good to ask him if he is a little angry, and casually said: 
"Nothing. Just... this cave is like a bowel, and it is a little dizzy." 


Huacheng listened and immediately said, "Would you like to take a 
break?" 


He didn't mean to make a joke. Thanks for your help: "You don't have to." 
He yelled: "I didn't get it wrong, Your Royal Highness, you will be dizzy 
when you walk?" 


'..."" Xie pity also feels that this sentence is a bit shameful. It seems that 
there is nothing to look for. I pretend that I haven’t heard the sentence 
from the party. I am awe-inspiring: "You must keep up with the point 
behind, this corner of the cave." How easy it 1s to be alive..." 


As he spoke, he looked back, but he stopped, grabbed the flower city and 
said: "Sanlang!" 


Huacheng Road: "What?" With the look back, it is also a brow. 


Behind them, they are empty! 


Just before a sentence, he was still taunting not far behind him, but now, in 
the dark cave, there are only two of them left empty. Huacheng 
immediately took hold of Xie's shoulder and said: "Brother, stay with me, 
don't go away." 


Xie Pity also held his breath and stood alert. "Is there something hidden in 
the mountains?" 


Huacheng Road: "No. But no one is terrible." 


Because this shows that there is one thing that can be close to them 
without knowing it, and take away everyone! 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 158: It’s not 
safe to enter the same hole. 


Thanks and whispered: "...If you say it again, it’s impossible to move a 
little bit behind us and do something so big." 


Even if she does not believe in her insight, he believes in Huacheng. 
Moreover, to be honest, in the intuition of danger, he is very convinced of 
himself. Huacheng Road: "Go back. Look." 


The two men walked side by side, returning to the original road, and after 
walking for a while in the tunnel, they stopped. 


It’s not that they want to stop, but they have no way to go and are forced to 
stop. The tunnel they came from, although twisted and twisted, but only 
one road, but now has not returned to the head, but out of thin air out of a 
cold stone wall! 


Both of them are not changed. Thanks: "Is this illusion or really?" 


A silver butterfly flew forward and touched it on the uneven stone wall. It 
was nothing unusual and was bounced back. Huacheng Road: "It is true." 


Thanks for your nod and said, "That would be tricky." 


Ghosts hit the wall, common people, there are two kinds of doorways: the 
first one is to make you see the illusion. That is, you think that there is a 
stone wall here, but there is actually no illusion. This is also very good to 
break, go straight to touch, or you will slap yourself, splash yourself a cold 
water, wake up and then touch it; 


The second type makes you feel distracted by the memory and direction of 
the road. This is a little bit more powerful. For example, at a fork in the 
road, you think you have chosen the left side, but in fact, your heart is 
stunned and you are on the right. There is also a so-called "ghost circle", 
but it is a small trick: people have left foot and right foot, the step has a 


subtle deviation, the inhuman things will confuse your mind and expand 
this deviation. So unconsciously, when you go down, you think it is a 
straight line. In fact, it is a big circle. When you come back, it will be 
strange: Hey, how come back here? ! 


But for both of them, these two kinds of doorways are small insects. This 
cold stone wall is actually the third one: it is real. 


Xie Li is thinking about whether to sneak through the stone wall and see 
what is going on behind him. He will listen to Huacheng Road: "Brother, 
give me your hand." 


Thank you: "?" 


Despite the doubts, he still handed the hand to the flower city. Huacheng 
gently held his hand, placed it in his palm, and covered it with another 
hand, as if he had put something on him. 


Thanks for the breath, I held my hand for a while, and I raised my hand 
and said, "What is this?" 


On the third finger of his left hand, there was a thin red line, which 
Huacheng personally gave him. Moreover, this red line stretched out and 
was connected with the red line between the city's fingers. 


Huacheng raised his hand and showed him the same small butterfly- 
shaped red knot on the two hands. He smiled and said, "Tie it together." 


After listening to this sentence, thank you for feeling a bit hot on the face, 
I wonder if he is too sensitive, and quickly smashed two faces, as if afraid 
of being noticed by the flower city that he is a lot faster than usual, 
laughing: "This What is the spell?" 


"Yeah." Huacheng was slightly positive in color, let go of his hand and 
said, "Although we will not take the initiative to separate, just in case. 
This line will not break, it will not be short. If the line is not broken, you 
will know the other person. Nothing. Unless people are gone, they will be 
able to find the other person on the red line along this line." 


Thanks for your pity: "Is it all?" 
Huacheng Road: "Dead, or the smoke has disappeared." 


Xie pity is about to talk, and suddenly heard the sound of vibration in the 
distance. He listened for a moment and said: "Who is punching?" 


This strength and frequency, as if someone is punching the mountain with 
one punch and one punch. Thanks to pity: "This power is definitely not an 
ordinary person. It must be a martial god. Is it a general?" 


Huacheng Road: "From the front." 


This "front" refers to the front that they had intended to go, but they had to 
retreat because they were missing. But he and others are disappearing 
behind them. How can they suddenly run to the front? And if not, who will 
it be? 


The two looked at each other and walked side by side to see exactly what 
happened. Halfway through the practice, the sound of the punching 
mountain suddenly disappeared, and I did not know whether it was 
intentional or exhausted. 


But come here, how can it be abandoned halfway? So, Cherish and 
Huacheng continued to go where the voice came. A few silver butterflies 
danced in front of the blue, dark, lacquered caves, illuminating the road 
ahead. Suddenly, I glanced at the strange side of the stone wall and said, 
"What is that? Red line?" 


Looking far away, I really don't know what it is, but it is very strange, like 
the red line, but much thicker than the red line, still twisting, more like a 
red long worm. Thanks slowly, I walked to the edge of the stone wall and 
looked carefully. "Is this not a half-monthly snake?" 


Sure enough, it was the lower part of a fuchsia pigtail, exposed outside the 
wall, constantly twitching. Its upper body seems to have been buried in the 
stone wall, thanking the pity: "It is a hole in the hole, can't climb out?" 


Huacheng Road: "I am afraid not." 


The whole body of this snake is suspended in the air, and the snake will 
not climb the wall. How can I swim in such a high place to drill a hole? 
Moreover, there are so many holes in the stone wall. If you have to drill, 
why do you have to drill so small? This "hole" is also strange, almost 
exactly fits the shape of the snake, which 1s alive and stuck. 


Thanks for the sake of grabbing the snake and pulling it out, the snake is 
very vigilant, and the tail of the scorpion is staggering, and it is almost 
inevitable. So, Huacheng played it, although it seemed to be easy to 
follow, the snake seemed to be scared by this, and did not dare to move. 
Thanks to the pity, I was about to talk, and suddenly shut up, saying: "Have 
you heard it?" 


Huacheng also said: "I heard it." 
The two looked forward together. 


In the darkness, there was a low-pitched breathing that came slowly, very 
steady and very gentle. 


The two dead butterflyes play with each other and fly toward the place 
where the breathing sounds. The higher the flying, the higher the silver 
light. Gradually, the two hands were reflected. 


This is a double hand. Man's hand. The back of the hand is bloody, scarred, 
and generally hangs down. Going up, it reflects a messy head, and the head 
is also dead and low. 


However, there is no lower body. 
Yes, this person who "hangs" on the stone wall 1s not in the lower body. He 
only showed an upper body, which seemed to grow out of the stone wall 


out of thin air! 


In the past, thank you for seeing some princes and nobles. When hunting 
for rare prey, they cut down the head of the prey and treated it with syrup, 


so that it was not rotted and hung on the wall of his house for people to 
look at. At this moment, he could not help but think of the tigers, deer, 
wolves and other animal heads that are lined up on the wall. But this 
person is still breathing, he is still alive! 


Thanks for taking a step closer, said: "What is this? The body of the 
mountain monster?" 


However, there is no response from the side. Xie pity scalp suddenly 
climbed a chill, violently turned back, and sure enough - the flower city is 
gone! 


Thanks to the pity: "Sanlang?!" 


Naturally no one answered, the man hanging on the wall whispered a few 
words, and seemed to wake up and sleep in a sleep. At the moment, she 
couldn’t control him. She turned two laps and suddenly remembered the 
red line that Huacheng had tied to him before, and she was lifted. Sure 
enough, the red line is still there, not broken. So, thank you for a little 
relief, holding this red line, pulling all the way, walking and walking, the 
line is over. 


The other end of the red line was actually connected to a stone wall! 


Xie pity was unbelievable, and he smashed twice. He also had a longer red 
line pulling out of the stone wall. He simply made him wonder, is the 
flower city in this stone wall now? 


As soon as I thought of this possibility, thank you for saying nothing, and 
lifting the heart would break the wall. Who knows, his sword tip has not 
touched the stone wall, suddenly it was black, and the stone wall in front 
of him suddenly opened a huge pot. Take a sip and swallow his whole 
person alive! 


This black is not going to pass quickly, but is turned into a constant 
darkness with the pity. There are gravel and mud in all directions, pressed 
against him, and suffocating. And these sand and gravel soils are still 
moving constantly, and it feels like being swallowed into the belly of a 


giant monster. In addition to this, he also eats a lot of messy things, in 
order to digest it in the belly. It seems to be caught in quicksand, and there 
is no way to make it happen. The harder it gets, the deeper it 1s. Xie Li just 
wanted to break through the wall, but he thought that Huacheng might be 
inside, and he wouldn’t retreat. He waved his arm and broke the sand, and 
squatted on the red line. At this moment, a hand suddenly came out in 
front and accurately grasped his wrist. Thank you, "Who?!" 


He took a bite of mud in one mouth and spit out in misery. The hand 
grabbed him and pulled him into a bottle, and the familiar voice rang at 
the top: "Brother, it is me!" 


Upon hearing this voice, thanking the whole person for relaxing, and 
holding on to each other, he blurted out: "...very good, the red line is not 
broken, I really found you!" 


Huacheng also slammed him hard, and surely said: "I am not broken! I 
also found you." 


It turned out that the strange things that the two were encountered were 
exactly the same. Thanks for observing the half-length man hanging on the 
wall, the flower city is watching and watching, and beware of something 
lurking in the darkness. Who knows, in this blink of an eye, the pity that 
stands beside him is gone. Inexplicably, there is a stone wall. Huacheng 
took the red line and walked all the way to find it. He found that the end of 
the red line was connected to the wall, and he went in and went to find the 


pity. 


In fact, at first they should have only one wall in between, but both of 
them thought that the other party was in the wall and they went in without 
each other. Thank you for repeating the flower city countless times in my 
heart. I thought about it in advance. "Fortunately, you have even connected 
a red line! Otherwise, it 1s hard to say if you can't find it. No wonder the 
generals disappeared suddenly. It was not at all. Someone sneaked, but... 
they were swallowed by the mountain monster." 


Huacheng Road: "Yes, the location was unfortunate. A shovel just dug into 
the belly of the mountain monster." 


Xie pity could not help but cough. 


Yes. At this moment, they must be in the belly of one of the three old, sick, 
and dead mountain monsters. At that time, the jade asked if he would like 
to dig up. The location of the election was just the habitat of the mountain 
monster, and Xie Pity readily agreed, and the world’s wonderful luck 
would not be deceived. The sand and gravel in all directions is so tight that 
the space for the two people is getting narrower and narrower, and more 
and more boring. Thanks to the deep feeling that this place is not suitable 
for a long time, said: "How do we go out now?" 


Huacheng Road: "It was dug through the bottom, not very happy, is 
digesting us, a little trouble. But my brother can rest assured that he can 
always go out." He joked again, "The taste of death is like this." 


Thanks for listening, a slight glimpse, the corner of the mouth turned up 
slightly, and found that he quickly pressed down, said: "The half-body 
outside is probably swallowed by the mountain monster. The sound of the 
punching mountain we heard before should be He wanted to escape and 
smashed on the stone wall. Like the one-tailed snake, he didn't swallow it, 
only half swallowed it." So the effect was extremely horrible. Huacheng 
Road: "But he is not the one who came with us this time." 


Xie pity suddenly remembered the messy hair, said: "Wait, I know who it 
is. That is probably Qi Ying!" 


Huacheng seemed to think about it before he remembered it. "Oh, roll the 
hair. It's him." 


Thanks to pity: "I don't know if he has something, is he fainted? Only then 
has he seen that he has not responded." 


Huacheng Road: "Nothing, fell asleep." 


Thank you, "How do you know?" 


Huacheng Road: "I left a few silver butterflies outside, only to send it to 
fly. My right eye can now see the situation outside." 


When the voice just fell, he gently "hmm?" and seemed to see something 
strange. Thanks: "What happened outside?" 


Huacheng did not speak, slightly bowed, gently lifted his jaw, and the two 
foreheads. Thank you for blinking, closing your eyes, blinking again, and 
saying, "This is really... magical." 


His right eye actually saw a different picture from the front. Although it is 
dark, it can also see a rough outline. 


This monitor of the outside of the silver butterfly seems to be hidden in a 
pile of weeds, and below the picture, there is a black shadow is slowly 
approaching. Xie pity whispered: "There is someone coming, I don't know 
who it is. Where is your silver butterfly hidden? Will it be discovered?" 


Huacheng Road: "In his hair. The light 1s hidden and will not be 
discovered." 


The shadow finally came close enough, raised his face and pale. 


Thanks for the pity: "Learn jade?" 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 159: This jade 
quality can be used as a brick 


It is indeed a jade. 


He also took the shovel. With this artifact in hand, even if he is swallowed 
up by the mountain monster, he can quickly dig up a homosexual birth day. 
Therefore, it is not strange that he appears here. After all, the power of the 
wall can be counted as true. It is earth-shattering. 


Because the pictures seen by the left and right eyes are different, it is 
extremely uncomfortable. Xie pity squints and blinks, and finds that even 
if you close your eyes and the right eye, you can see the outside picture, so 
simply close your eyes. At this time, the line of sight suddenly shook a 
little, and then suddenly swayed around for a while, it seems that the right 
to finally wake up, and smashed the girl. 


Seeing him look up, the jade movement is extremely fast, and when he 
raises his hand, he buckles the face of the ghost. However, Quan Yizhen 
did not pay attention to him at all, because he just woke up and the whole 
body huddled back. 


The mountain monster took a lot of power into the body! 


With both hands still outside, Quan Yizhen continued to smash the wall 
and tried to pull himself out. However, this mountain monster may be 
thousands of years old, and the demon power is deep. Zhang’s mouth is a 
suction, and the right is deeper and deeper until the sound of the wall 
disappears. It seems that both hands are dragged into the stone wall. At 
this moment, the mountain monster stopped moving. However, Quan 
Yizhen only left a head exposed. 


It seems that he has noticed that there is a person standing below, and he 
asks: "Who are you?" 


Leading jade does not answer, through the mask, shoot | out of sight. 


That look is creepy. Thank you for your pity: "...Is this not like trying to 
tell the old eyes?" 


Quan Yizhen continued without thinking: "Is it a shovel in your hand? 
Help me to dig the wall, I want to come out." 


His speech has always been like this. Innocent, of course, fearless, like a 
child. Even if the other party is not asked, let him help, regardless of the 
scene, the strange shadows appearing in this atmosphere will not come to 
take his dog's head. Hearing these two sentences, the hand that led the jade 
to hold the shovel was gradually tightened. 


Shou, he grabbed the bright shovel and slowly approached the right. Step 
by step, it seems to be a murderer who is ready to make a big case. I can’t 
help but feel a little bit trembled and said: “... Wait, how do I think he 
wants a shovel to shovel Qi Ying’s head?” 


Huacheng said: "Is not sure." 
Thankfulness: '"???" 


Huacheng said again: "However, for the time being, he can't let him kill 
the right. Now the mountain monster can only swallow, it is not easy to 
digest, but if the right is dead, only the body is left, it will be good to 
digest a lot. With a **** official, the mana has increased greatly. If we 
want to go out, I am afraid it will be even more troublesome." 


Thank you for your help: "Wait and so on. Saburo, if you don't digest it, 
put it aside. Leading jade is your subordinate. With your understanding of 
him, do you think he will kill Qiying? Do they have any deep hatred?" ?" 


Qi Ying is so active in finding jade, it is not the same as the brother of the 
same door. He will not be able to see this person for many years. He thinks 
that it is natural because Quan Yi feels that it is worthy of doing so. And 
with the power of a true temper, why not do anything to make people want 
to kill him. Huacheng Road: "No. However, sometimes, if you want to kill 
a person, it is not necessarily determined by one or two deep hatreds, but it 


may also come from some small things. Even small things that you have 
not noticed at all." 


Thanks for the pity: "What little thing?" 


The voice just fell, and his right eye saw the scene is different. What I saw 
was neither the red dress of Huacheng’s heart, nor the sight of one person 
facing the stone wall, but a street. Xie Li just wanted to ask what it was, 
and he heard a sigh of relief from the front. 


I saw a group of Taoists gathered on the road, seemingly yelling at 
everyone around. A closer look reveals that there is a child among the 
group of people, with curly hair and blood on his face. 


The ordinary child, who was so scared by such a shackle, was crying, but 
the child was only about ten years old, but he was not afraid, but he was 
very excited. He looked left and right and held his fist. A look of 
eagerness. At this time, a young Taoist person opened the crowd and said: 
"Forget it, don't worry, he should know it wrong." 


Thanks for the slightest sigh. 
This young Taoist is bright, radiant, and straight, and it is actually a jade. 


However, I don't know if it is because the jade is a real boy at this time, or 
because he is arrogant, and there is no such faint eclipse after being 
polished by the years, but it is more vivid than the faint impression left in 
his mind when he first saw him. Many, anyone who wants to praise a good 
boy, is a very different two people. Thanks for your pity: "This time is not 
so ordinary!" 


Huacheng laughed and said: "Who isn't a teenager?" 


Thanks to this, I found out that I accidentally said it, saying: "Sararo’s 
right eye is even seen in this kind of thing?" 


Huacheng Road: "I didn't see it with my right eye. I saw something else. I 
borrowed it to see it." 


Thanks to pity: "Fantastic method. Qifa." 


Huacheng Road: "Simple. If you want to pick a subordinate, don't take the 
other side of the old one." I still know how to do it. If there is a need, I 
want to know who is the bottom, even if I am looking for me." 


At this time, in the picture they saw in the right eye, another Qing Jun 
Dao, who is similar to the jade age, said: "He knows that he is wrong! You 
see him like this is wrong? This little devil is basically I don’t understand 
anything! Let’s do a good morning exercise, give him a stone mud and get 
a good wolf, and have to teach him well!” 


Leading the jade to stop: "Forget it. Jianyu. He has been beaten like this. I 
will definitely not commit another crime next time. You should be mad, 
and there are any good lessons. If you learn the lesson, you will be killed. 
You Look at this child dressed like this, there must be no one in the family, 
no one teaches him. Leave him alone, go back and let go." 


Jian Yu turned to his side and said: "I told you that this stinky boy is sick, 
he is not normal! You see him being beaten and laughing! I want to play 
another meal!" 


Leading the jade side and pushing them away: "Hey! You said that he is 
sick in the brain, why bother with him?" 


It can be seen that at this time, the words of attracting jade are very 
weighty in the same door. Although everyone is not jealous, they still go 
back. Yin Yu looked at the child sitting on the ground and squatted down. 
Still not talking, the child grabbed a mud and threw it on his face, his face 
still excited. 


The jade was thrown away, silent for a moment, and wiped the face, 
saying: "You kid, how so naughty, why do you call our Taoist?" 


The child jumped up and put up a fight posture and said, "Come on!" 


" " 


Yinyu stood up and said: "This hand is sent by us. Who taught you?" 


The child just shouted: "Come on!" Jumping in the same place, like a 
stupid little monkey, while constantly grabbing the earth's dirt and stones 
to the "opponent", the technique is still very accurate. Leading jade is a 
few years older than him. He is not good at playing with a child, but he is 
beaten by this child. He said: "This method is also sent by us. Do you steal 
school on the wall every day... Don’t fight I said, don't hit me! I didn't hit 
you! Do you really like fighting?!" 


Who knows, after this sentence, Quan Yizhen suddenly stopped, nodded, 
licking the muddy hands, said: "Like." 


He actually said it very seriously. Both Xie Li and Yin Yu were stunned. 


Who is this child, it goes without saying. Xie pity can not help but sigh: 
"Qi Ying is really a martial arts. Natural Wu Shen." 


Although at this time, everyone else feels that the right is really a child 
with a sick mind, but she feels very kind. 


Because, for the same thing, the first thing to be "idiot" is to become a 
" " 
god. 


At this point, people who understand this crazy person are still a little 
potential, a little meaning; but people who can't understand can only laugh 
at the "ill" and "fool" people, from this moment on. Judging that there is 
no hope on this road. 


The jade was jealous and laughed. But I still haven't laughed for a long 

time. The next moment I was once again muddy to my face. I was busy: 
"Hey! I said, don't hit me... Listen to me! - Do you want to come to my 

door and come to school? How to fight?" 


Hearing the words, Quan Yizhen’s action stopped, and a group of mud was 
caught in his hand. I don’t know if it’s flying out. And Xie Pity did not see 
whether he had thrown it out, because, immediately, at this moment, the 


jade outside the stone wall was "squeaky" and the shovel was nailed to the 
wall. 


He didn't really shovel his right to really have a head, but the sharp metal 
was pressed against the right face and it was extremely dangerous. 


The silver butterfly hidden in the right hair was very stable. Although it 
was not shocked by this sudden blow, the picture that Xie pity saw in the 
right eye was amazed. He could not help but blurted out: "Don't! ” 


Huacheng seems to have expected this for a long time, saying: "Look. It 
does have this tendency. But the current killing is not heavy." 


Right one really only reveals a head outside, said: "You want to kill me?" 
Yin Yu did not speak. 

Right one seems to be very confused, saying: "What am I doing wrong?" 
Thanks and pity: "What did he do?" 

Huacheng Road: "Difficult to say. Brother to see it." 


After the speech, Xie pity showed a white wall and tiled road in front of 
his right eye. The jade looks a little older than before, and is screaming on 
the case of the Taoist Book, surrounded by a large circle of complaints, 
and the indignation is filled: 


"Leading brother, the right one is too ugly to eat. Every time I eat, I get it 
everywhere. The amount of food is three times bigger than others. It 1s like 
a starving ghost. Anyone who is occupying a rice bucket can't eat well!" 


"Leading brother, I can't live with him. I have to change the room. He gets 
up so much. I worry every day that he kicks my ribs and can't afford it!" 


"Leading brother, I don't want to be with him. This kid never cooperates 
with others and doesn't care about others. He just wants to make a fuss. I 
would rather not want to join him with the worst younger brother!" 


Yin Yu heard a dizzy rise, said: "Well, then, it is worse than this, I will 
investigate first, after the investigation, I will consider how to deal with it, 
you should go back first." 


Of course, the most fierce shot of the table is Jian Yu. He is obviously not 
satisfied with the result. He said: "Introducing jade, you really shouldn’t 
let Master take the kid down the door. It’s really trouble getting into the 
house. Look at him. It’s been so long, what day is it’s not smoldering? 


Everyone was aggressive, and the jade said a few words to mediate, 
saying: "In fact, these are not too big..." 


"Isn't that much more?! Our cleanliness has been ruined, cleaned up, and 
unclear how to repair?" 


"Yeah, why didn't you have so much before?" 


The jade has to say: "There is nothing malicious about him. It is that he 
really doesn't understand the world, and he doesn't know how to get along 
with others." 


Jian Yudao: "I don't understand the world. I don't know if I don't know how 
to learn gold. If I live in this world full of people, I have to learn how to 
get along with others. He is a teenager. Still not like a child? People are in 
their teens!" 


"We don't say that Master is eccentric. Did this kid come for a few years? 
What good things have been given to him, the best practice room for him, 
and the best medicinal medicine in each period is also given to him. You 
can also not do morning and evening classes, even the scriptures don't 
have to memorize. When you are caught by the master, you mean to say 
that he has two sentences. It is not awkward! Why? By the jade brother, 
you are a big disciple, if you are like this Everyone will forget, there is 
nothing to say. But who is his onion? He is not educated and has no virtue. 
The qualification is so great?! Which one of us is the big guy?" 


This faintly has the meaning of arrogance, and everyone has nicknamed it. 
The jade has been heard, and his face has become very good. He has 


clenched the pen, and thankfulness is not good. 


People with average gas volume are very easy to get on this kind of hook, 
and if it is a person with a small amount of air, he will jump up without 
hooking himself. If he hooks, he can't blow it up? 


However, unexpectedly, thinking for a moment, attracting jade and putting 
down the pen, the eyebrows are awe-inspiring: "You brothers, I think it is 
wrong to say this." 


Everyone glimpsed and said: "I don't know what to say, no matter what the 
repair is, the qualification is good, it is really amazing. Not to mention his 
qualifications are good, but also willing to practice. If you really feel that 
the Master is eccentric, let us work harder. To catch up with him, surpass 
him, practice room, and medicinal herbs will naturally open to everyone. 
The big guy has the air to be angry with him, it is better to work harder 
and harder, is it right?" 


He said this, everyone is a little boring, but still said: "The brother is 
generous, do not care about him." 


"It’s just that this temperament has smashed him for a hundred thousand 
miles." 


Jian Yu said: "Introduction to jade, you help him to talk today, beware of 
being disgusted by him in the future!" 


In short, the two sides are not very happy. After a group of people left the 
house, Yin Yu closed the door and was about to close the window. 


Suddenly, I found someone lying on the window and was shocked. "Who is 
it?!" 


Quan Yizhen took his head and squatted on the window. He told him to be 
clear. He said, "When did you come?" He pulled him twice and did not pull 
it. He said: "One true, you have to change places. Hey, I have to close the 
window." 


Quan Yizhen suddenly asked: "Brother, I am not very annoying." 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 160: This jade 
quality can be used as a brick 2 


Yin Yu smiled a bit and said: "Have you heard?" 


Right one really nodded, and it was difficult to lead a jade. The knuckles 
smashed the nose and said: "...and...and...well...well..." 


It’s a normal person who can hear that this is very reluctant, but Quan 
Yizhen seems to only listen to the literal meaning, saying: “Oh.” 


Yin Yu saw that he believed it was true, smiled, and finally said: "In fact, 
don't care. You didn't do anything wrong, really. It's also good." 


Anyone with a discerning eye can see that the reason why all the brothers 
and sisters are looking at the right 1s not pleasing to the eye, not because 
he has a large amount of food, not because he gets up very much, or 
because he always ignores others when he is in the group, and only pays 
attention to himself. 


In the final analysis, they can't really stand it, only the latter paragraph: he 
came late and got the most. 


Quan Yi really nodded: "I also think." 


The jade shot him on the shoulder and said: "Go to practice! This is the 
most important thing. Don't think about anything else." 


Right one really jumped out of the window. Looking at the direction, it is 
really going to practice. And the jade closed the window, and also took up 
the scriptures from the book case to work hard. 


After watching the two games, Xie pity praised: "Sanlang, your 
subordinate, is really a very rare character. The heart is quite good." But 
after thinking about it, the outside of the jade has just been copied from 


the geologist to shovel a shovel. I cut my head and rightly, and said, "Is 
nothing outside?" 


Huacheng showed him outside. The jade was calmed down and the shovel 
was pulled out. It seems that I was thinking about what to do with this 
right. Thanks a little bit of snacks, said: "I guess their problem should be 
after the ascent?" 


Huacheng Road: "Positive solution." 
After that, Xie’s eyes showed a magnificent hall. 


Yin Yuzheng was sitting in the center of the main hall, and Jian Yu and 
Quan Yizhen left and left to stand behind him. The gods in the temple are 
full of enthusiasm, and they are all gods in heaven. Xie Pity also saw many 
familiar faces, such as the spirit of the male, the cold and the cold, the 
laughter without awkward Lang Qianqiu... ...all are dressed in formal 
costumes, and behind the small priests holding a red gift box. 


Obviously, here 1s Xianjing, which leads the jade palace. This day, it is the 
ceremonial ceremony of the jade palace, that is, the day when he was 
completed in Xianfu, Xianjing. 


Thank you for your pity. It is not difficult for Huacheng to see the world. 
The world is his territory. As long as the people are netting the net, the 
eyes of passers-by, wandering souls, birds, and beasts can be used for him. 
But Xianjing is the boundary of the heavens. How can this be seen? 


Huacheng seems to have guessed what he was thinking, saying: "Brother, 
look at the corner near the temple door." 


Thank you for your kindness. The scope of the "corner" is not small, 
because the temple is not so small, and there are at least dozens of figures 
in and out of the corner of the temple door. Huacheng said again: "Guess 
which black water?" 


Thanks to this, I remember that He Xuan has been lurking in the heavens. 
The message about Xianjing must be sold to Huacheng. He couldn't help 


but know what to do, and he found a more consistent one. He said, "Where 
is that wearing black clothes?" 


Huacheng Road: "This guess is too conservative, not right, guess again." 
Thanks again and again: "Is that unsmiling?" 
Huacheng Road: "Not right." 


I guessed that several of them were wrong. At this time, some people 
reported that "the wind master 1s coming -" 


Thanks to the door of the hall immediately. I saw Shi Qing Xuan Zhao 
swaying the wind fan, shaking his face in the spring breeze, and throwing 
the gift box to the side, he said, "Congratulations to lead the jade palace, it 
is late, late, penalty Wine, hahahaha!" 


The jade on the seat smiled and said: "Where, never come late, the wind 
master, please!" 


Huacheng finally revealed the answer and said: "This is this." 
Thanks for the pity: "What is the windshield is black water?" 


This is too mysterious. Huacheng smiled and said: "My brother 
misunderstood, not this, the one behind him." 


Xie pity took a closer look, I saw the side of the temple door behind Shi 
Qingxuan, standing next to a lower-level priest who was responsible for 
the guests to receive the gift box, his appearance was not good, but the 
enthusiasm filled with smile, Shi Qingxuan proudly entered the temple, 
easy Throwing him a small pearl in the future as a reward, the gods' eyes 
glowed, and both hands caught, and even the channel thanked the adults 
for thanking the adults, a pair of dog legs to the extreme. Thanks for your 
pity: "...1s this black water? The black water with such a bright smile?" 


Huacheng Road: "It's him. I laughed. This person has at least 50 points in 
Xianjing. Each body is different. You can monitor more than 80 Shangtian 


court officials and more than 300 Zhongtian court gods at the same time. 
Otherwise, only the geographer’s identity is far from enough." 


"..." Xie pity couldn't help but sigh in the heart of Blackwater's acting 
skills, the ability to bury chess and exuberant to not know what good 
energy to say, said, "So that more than fifty points now? Body?" 


Huacheng Road: "Jun Wu is pulling nails one by one." 


The voice just fell, and suddenly there was a harsh voice coming in from 
outside: "You should give me an account of your imperial lieutenant today, 
what is going on with your teacher!" 


The smiles of the priests of the gods converge on time, and they look 
outwards. It seems that some people want to break in, but they are stopped, 
and they are still shouting outside the temple: "Your brother-in-law is 
really in the heavens to compare his high-ranking gods, do you still care?" 


The jade smile disappeared, and the voice was lowered. Two people were 
asked: "What happened? Are you really doing it with others?" 


Quan Yizhen said: "Move." 


Jian Yu’s anger is round and snarling, and he’s gnawing his teeth: “It’s 
your stinky boy!” 


When this happened, Shi Qingxuan was always the first to open. He put 
the dust into the back collar and said: "What happened? Today is the 
ceremony of the people, what can’t be done later? Let me talk about it?" 


People's good days, run here to make trouble, not to see no eyesight, just 
to find fault. The humanity outside the temple: "Ah, it turns out that today 
is the day of your big day. We really don't know this. But he didn't pick us 
up when we hit us. Do we still have to pick up the days when we look for 
him? Right one is the jade palace." The person who is attracted by His 
Royal Highness, who is not looking for him?" 


Can be sure: look for it. The spirit frowned slightly and said: "Why?" 


The jade had to stand up and said, "I know. But it is not a good time, how 
can we talk about it later?" 


The people outside the temple shouted: "I only hope that you will attract 
the jade palace to cover it!" 


I don’t know how things are going on. A big hat of “covering” is buckled 
up and it’s just aggressive. Shi Qingxuan seems to have to talk again, but 
Quan Yizhen suddenly jumped from behind the jade, saying: "You can't 
go?" 


The troublemaker apparently decided that he would not dare to fight back 
on this occasion. There is no fear: "If you don't leave, you still want to 
play again? So many of them can be smashed..." 


Who knows, the right to really one person can not be measured by 
common sense, without saying anything, raised his fist and flew out. There 
was a scream outside the temple, and all the gods in the temple were 
shocked! 


For a while, Lingwen said: "Come, pull him, kill him!" 


The jade also stayed for a while, and quickly went out, saying: "Give me a 
hand!" and those troublemakers screamed: "You are so amazing to 
introduce the Jade Palace! Good, good! The brothers and sisters are 
bullying!" 


In the evening, the temple was introduced to the jade palace, and the jade 
was used to walk around. Jian Yu violently thundered, saying: "Today's 
good temple ceremony, all ruined this stinky boy!!!" 


Xie pity can fully understand why Jian Yu is so angry. 


Li Dianli this thing, although thankful is not care, but many other priests 
care. It is a recognition ceremony for a **** official to formally become a 
member of the Heavenly Court. Today, this is an inappropriate analogy. It 


is like an emperor in the mortal world. The throne ceremony is a mixture 
of people. Who can not be angry? 


Yin Yu sighed and said: "Forget it. Certainly others will provoke him first. 
And he is not today's trouble, but people deliberately pick today, what is 
the way?" 


Jian Yudao: "There are so many people in Heaven, how can others provoke 
him if they don't provoke others?" 


Yin Yudao said: "You know, he has never been a temper who beats and 
doesn't fight back. It's not that others don't provoke other people. Others 
can bear it. He can't stand it." 


Jian Yudao: "This is Xianjing, and it is not human. Can you breathe a low- 
key point? If he doesn't pick things up honestly, others will not have a 
chance to attack today! This is good, lose face and lose big. So many of 
the priests are watching! Who is going to pass the hand who is the first to 
move? It can only be said that the jade palace is quite unreasonable and 
the big audience is big. Who can tell you who 1s wrong and who 1s wrong?! 
You think he has Nothing? No! As long as something goes wrong, as long 
as you move your hand, you just don't make sense! He doesn't understand 
it! It will only give us trouble!" 


After an attack, Jian Yu was able to rush out of the temple. And the jade is 
sitting in the same place, worried. 


Half a mile, one look back, a black shadow on the window. The jade was 
shocked again by this familiar scene, saying: "Why are you here again? 
When did you come? What kind of habit?" 


Quan Yi did not answer, said: "They swear at me first." 


Leading jade and ending, said: "One true, what Jianyu said, don't go to the 
heart." 


Quan Yizhen is self-satisfied and arrogant: "They blame me first. I don't 
know them at all. They said that I am a lower-level priest, inexplicably 


yelling at me, laughing at me, calling me to roll, don't block the way. I let 
them apologize, they If you refuse, I will fight. Only when they are beaten, 
they shut up, otherwise I will not beat them." 


Although it is still harmonious now, in the early days, some of the higher- 
ranking and superior priests of the heavenly courts and the lower courts 
did indeed crowd out and underestimate the junior priests with the lowest 
qualifications. At that time, such things were not uncommon. Yin Yu 
sighed. 


Quan Yizhen said: "Is the lower-level priests inferior?" 
Leading Yu Road: "No." 
No? 


Obviously, even he himself did not believe this sentence. The power was 
also aware of it. For a long time, he said frankly: "I don't like it here." 


Leading jade does not speak. Quan Yizhen said: "They think that I am 
annoyed, I think they are more annoying. There were eight hours in the 
past day to practice. Now I have to divide more than half, to talk nonsense 
and listen to nonsense, to smash the door and to be smashed. Someone is 
inexplicably coming. I, beat me, don't apologize, don't allow me to beat 
them. This is not a fairyland at all. I don't like it here." 


Yin Yu sighed and said: "I don't like it either." 
Quan Yizhen said: "Let's go back." 


Yin Yu shook his head and said: "Although I don't like it, I still want to 
stay here." 


Right is really puzzled, said: "If you don't like it, why should you stay 
here?" 


Yin Yu was so ridiculous that he couldn’t explain to him. How many 
people in Xianjing dreamed of seeking the ultimate goal, and could not let 
him understand that it was not easy for him to fly up like this age. He said: 


"This... because, It’s really hard to fly. Since it’s not easy, come here, I still 
want to do better.” 


Quan Yizhen did not agree with it. "There is no big deal in flying! It 
doesn't fly." 


The jade is a bit arrogant and a bit funny, saying: "What is no big deal! Or 
else you try?" 


Seeing this, thank you: "People, really don't just kidding." 


Huacheng Road: "Yes. Less than half a year later, when the power ts really 
rising, he will not feel funny." 


Thanks to pity: "Can you watch it at that time?" 
Huacheng Road: "Can. Wait a moment." 


The picture turned, this time, it is still Jingjing, but the scene 1s a feast. 
Thanks for a moment, said: "Mid-Autumn Festival?" 


Huacheng Road: "Not bad." 
Thanks to the pity: "Where is the black water hidden?" 
Huacheng Road: "Look at who is eating." 


At the banquet, all the priests were busy toasting, chilling, and playing 
games. Only one person, his face was buried in the sea bowl in front of 
him. This time, He Xuan did not hide, but sat in the corner as a geographer. 
However, no one really noticed him. 


Yin Yu and Jian Yu were sitting next to the "Digit", both of which belonged 
to the marginal zone. They did not eat anything and did not talk to people. 
A side of Jian Yu Xiaoqu: "Thank God, the stinky boy with a sick brain did 
not come!" 


Yin Yu heard it, whispered: "He has been soaring for so long, you say that 
he has heard people bad, or pay attention to it." 


Jian Yudao: "This is the case. I said wrong? What about the ascent? He is 
just a few hundred years old and his brain is still not good." 


As I said, there are a group of new arrivals in the vicinity who seem to be 
new faces. They greeted each other and asked a priest to ask jade: "Is 
this?" 


Another priest also replied casually: "This is the martial **** who guards 
the West." 


Upon hearing this, the priest who asked the question suddenly became 
very enthusiastic, stood up and toasted, saying: "Oh! Oh oh! Long time, 
long-awaited, long-awaited your name!" 


Leading jade quickly got up and smiled: "Where is it?" 


The sacred official said: "Hey, you should not be humble! It’s a long- 
awaited name! I’ve heard that the Western Royal Highness is young and 
promising. It’s only a few years since I’ve been so confident that I’ve been 
a believer in this Mid-Autumn Festival. At the moment, it 1s the majestic 
West, the status can not be shaken, the future is boundless, the future is 
boundless! Now I see it, it is a little older than I imagined? But still very 
young, can afford a young and promising! ” 


Hearing the words, the smiles of the jade are all on the face, this cup of 
wine is not connected, not to pick up or not, suddenly become very 
incomparable. The other party is still enthusiasm to close the relationship, 
saying that the brothers and brothers got up: "I tell the truth, my life is 
rarely seen in people's eyes, but you are really right to see the right 
brother! My site is also in the west, if the future is a younger brother If 
you want to help, as long as you don't give up, just say it! Everyone looks 
at each other. Hahaha..." 


He smiled openly, and he also smiled when he knew the jade. Thanks to 
the time and space, I can feel the suffocating sigh of the sky. 


Jian Yu’s face is green, and the jade is still calm. Although the hand is 
shaking, it is still stable. “I’m sorry...” 


And when he wants to solve the misunderstanding, someone shouted: 
"Qiying is coming!" 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 161: This jade 
quality can be used as a brick 3 


There was noisy over there, and the priest here was shocked: "Hey? You - 
aren't you the Royal Highness?" 


Others just took the belly: "You admit the wrong man! You forgot? There 
are two martial arts guarding the West, one attracting jade, one Qiying. It 
is the same brother, you are in front of you, is the imperial lieutenant, 
hahaha... ” 


The priest was busy: "Oh oh, I admit it wrong, I am sorry, hahaha, 
ignorant, I heard more than Qi Ying..." The voice has not fallen, and the 
jade has closed his eyes. It seems that he is tired of words and gives up. 
Exchange. Some people noticed that it was wrong. He took the elbow and 
licked the priest. He seemed to find himself saying that he was stabbing. 
He took a haha and immediately said: "Cough, less accompanying, I will 
go down first, lead... lead the moon, ah no No, no, lead your lieutenant! In 
the future, you will have time to retell, Mid-Autumn Festival and music, 
hahaha..." 


He said that he wants to go down, but he is holding a glass of wine and 
flocking to the direction where the right is coming. There have been a 
large group of priests over there, all of whom are vying to say hello to the 
right. They are surrounded by groups and cannot see the people inside. 


It seems that at this time, the right has not just been flying for a long time. 
It has already gone out of its own way. It is just when it is hot, it has not 
been so disliked. Although the two are both Western Martial Arts, but this 
scorpion has greatly overshadowed the introduction of jade, people are 
flocking to the other side, resulting in almost no other He Xuan still sitting 
in the soup, cold and clear, he stood It’s not sitting or not, it’s awkward, 
suddenly saying: “Go back.” 


The two left the room and no one noticed. Jian Yu is extremely angry, said: 
"This group of things with red top white! Also the sacred officer? At the 


beginning of this kid just arrived in heaven, one of the two suspected that 
he is dying, I told you not to know how much strength Now, wow, this kid 
is flying up, the lights are more, holding him like what he is, this is 
blowing! Changing face is faster than flipping the book, what position is 
unshakable, young and promising? I see all his followers Like him, there 
is something wrong with his brain! People with a sick brain will believe 
this kind of person with a brain!" 


At this time, Shi Qingxuan came over with a glass of wine and sneaked 
into the jade: "Don't say it, go!" 


Seeing someone coming, Jian Yu closed his mouth. Shi Qingxuan Qidao 
said: "Introduction of jade, you are going to go back? Qi Ying is not 
coming. I heard him say that you haven’t seen each other for a long time. I 
also asked me what you are doing recently. You don’t tell him about it. ?" 


Yin Yu said with a strong smile: "No, my body is a little uncomfortable. I 
will go back first." 


Shi Qingxuan didn't think much. He saw the "Digitist" behind him. Haha 
said: "Then rest well, let's gather next time. Ming brother! I told you not to 
sit here! Walk and go to my side. ...... si 


When Shi Qingxuan walked over and couldn't watch this side, Jian Yu only 
lowered his voice and continued: "Say a fart! This kid can't be stunned for 
a long time. Sooner or later, people will turn over and I will wait for that 
day!" 


He has been shattered, and the jade is also very upset, saying: "Forget it, 
you should not be so angry." 


Jian Yudao: "If you forget it, you always say it, how can you forget it? 
When he just came up, if you helped him to pay him a gift, he was already 
rushed, I really can’t see it. Going down, it's not worth it for you!" 


The two have quickly returned to the Yin Yu Palace. Compared with the 
excitement at the beginning of the temple, it seems to be a door-to-door, 
and there are not a few lower-level priests standing. Closing the door, the 


sound of the jade was a little bigger, said: "Don't say it again! I don't want 
to hear it. It is normal for the soaring officer to rise to the temple. He has 

nothing to do. Since you mentioned him, he is annoyed. Then why do you 
always take the initiative to mention him?" 


Jian Yudao: "You don't blame me for talking. You must have someone to 
remind you of this. Leading jade, the whole west, the site is so big, so 
many believers, he grabbed so much, the last wolf demon Hard to give 
birth to him is robbed! Look at the present, your site is getting smaller and 
smaller, how much is left? How do you have a foothold?" 


Yin Yudao: "How do you count? I didn't use a knife to force people to 
believe in him, everyone 1s willing to do things. And the wolf demon..." 


He sighed and said frankly: "I can't really deal with it. It's useless to ask 
me, I will find him naturally." 


Jian Yu’s heartache said: “I am... I am afraid that if you go on like this, 
you will not be able to fight for it! Mom, even these subordinate priests 
are so snobbish, one by one to find an excuse to quit our temple. There are 
no other good things to go there!" 


Yin Yu sighed again and sat down on the futon. He said, "Which fight does 
not fight... Why care about those things? If you want to go, you will 
always go. If you want to stay, you will stay. Iam not going to follow up. 
Who can fight for power and grab the temper, why can't you think about 
it?" 


The so-called "one mountain can not accommodate two tigers", look at the 
ready-made example: the same in the south of the letter and admiration, so 
many years to fight you to die. If you are not on the same site, it will be a 
little better, but the so-called "not a family is not gathering heads", where 
are you flying up and making a name for yourself, where is your place. 
The old people who have a long history are often crowded into one place 
after flying. It’s so embarrassing to be a **** in the sky. It is impossible 
for Quan Yizhen to give up the West and go to other places. The two are 
arguing, and suddenly someone knocks on the door, Jian Yudao: "Who?!" 


Outside the door: "I." 


Jian Yu silently yelled at the jade: "...this stinky boy, how come you come 
to the door?" 


Yin Yu gestured to let him go to the back, slightly calming his look, and 
opened the door. Sure enough, standing at the door is the right to one. 
Compared with the previous paragraph, it was a lot higher. When I saw it, I 
looked at it almost, and finally I stopped looking at the window. 


Leading the jade opening, it is also peaceful: "It's true. You didn't attend 
the Mid-Autumn Festival? How come?" 


Quan Yizhen was introduced to the temple by him. Zhangkou was a 
sentence with no brains: "I am born." 


It turns out that the Mid-Autumn Festival is actually a true birth. And 
when he came here, he came to discuss the birthday ceremony. 


Thanks to the pity, the right to live in the past, as a brother, the jade will be 
gifted. This year is probably because of all kinds of embarrassment, not 
sent. Before the teacher Qing Xuan said at the Mid-Autumn Festival, it 
was probably a while for the jade to deliberately avoid him. People who 
are sensitive to others, if they don’t meet each other, they will be aware of 
it when they don’t give gifts. They will not take the initiative to discuss it 
anyway. He is good, and he doesn’t feel that something is wrong at all. He 
just comes to his door. wanted. Xie Pity has never seen such a terrible 
anecdote. If it 1s not necessary to reach the forehead with Huacheng, he 
really wants to slap on his head and squint his eyes. 


Yin Yu laughed and said: "... ah, yes, today is your birthday. However, the 
temple is a bit busy recently, so..." 


Right one really listened, widened his eyes and said: "No?" 


The jade seems to still feel wrong, and the words turned to the corner and 
said: "No, don't forget. In the back, you wait." 


Quan Yizhen sat down in the original place, hands on his lap, nodded again 
and again, a look of expectation. Leading jade fled to the partial hall, Jian 
Yu sat face in his face. The jade is definitely not prepared. After I went in, 
I rummaged through the box and didn't find the right thing. I had to say to 
Jian Yudao: "You can help me find it, what can I replace the gift 
temporarily?" 


Jian Yu grabbed a piece of cloth towel and threw it on the ground. He 
stepped on two feet and said, "Give him." 


Yin Yudao: "Jianyu!" 


Jian Yudao: "I still feel that he is cheaper to send this, he also has a face to 
ask." 


Yin Yu helplessly said: "He didn't understand. I have sent it in previous 
years. I don't send it this year. It's too deliberate. Just send something to be 
good, anyway, it means something. So, go find it last time. The King Kong 
Volt is too big, but it is better than nothing." 


He urged several times, and Jian Yu was able to go down. Yin Yu returned 
to the main hall and sat in front of the right, said: "Wait a minute, things 
are a bit messy, I let Jian Yu go looking for it. Right, what have you been 
doing lately? It should be quite smooth. I heard that the believers in your 
temple have turned five times in the past few months, congratulations." 


Quan Yizhen said: "I don't know any believers. I only do it myself. They 
are inexplicably squeezing into the temple. It's strange. Recently, I played 
a wolf demon." 


The smile of the jade is a bit more dry. If he can't get down, the right is 
really easy to get down. It's like a beloved woman you can't ask for. I don't 
care about you, but I cried and shouted and put myself in the hands of 
others. People still don't bother to look at it. At a glance, I told you that the 
woman is not too flat, nothing is so rare, it is not a big taste. Quan Yizhen 


talked for a while, and suddenly said: "I saw you at the Mid-Autumn 
Festival. I still want to talk. I didn't expect you to come back so soon." 


Hearing that he finally managed to check his recent battles with 
enthusiasm, he threw a sigh of relief and said: "Oh, something, I will come 
back first." 


Right suddenly nodded, said: "Someone told me because I admit it." 


Hearing the words, the face of the jade was changed slightly, but Quan 
Yizhen was unaware of it. He raised his mouth and said: "It’s so funny, 
stupid!" 


Thanks for the pity, I couldn’t bear to look at it. I buried my face in the 
arms of Huacheng and said, "This... this is a terrible thing..." 


Of course, he believes that Quan Yi really feels that someone else admits 
that the person is very funny, and that he really does not understand it. 
This is a completely unspeakable thing for the introduction of jade, but 
this does not prevent him from feeling that two people will talk again. It 
will be suffocated. Fortunately, before he suffocated, Jianyu finally came 
out with a gift box. He handed the gift box to the jade, and went in without 
saying a word. The jade was also redeemed in general, and the gift box 
was handed to the right. He was very happy. He jumped up to catch the box 
on the spot, and the smile of the jade has revealed his tiredness. He said, 
"Let's take it back and see it." 


Quan Yi really nodded: "Good. I went back. I will go out next month, and 
my brother will have time to go." 


The jade has been unable to listen to his words, and a few words are 
perfunctory. As soon as the person was sent away, Jian Yu couldn’t bear it. 
He slammed the door and shouted: "The deceit 1s too much! I think he was 
thrown down by his mother for a hundred and eight times when he was 
born?! Otherwise it was deliberate Disgusting of you, what do you not 
know about believers, inexplicable, what is going on a tour, deliberately 
show off? Black through the heart!" 


This time, he yelled at him, and he did not stop the jade. He went to the 
temple and could not come out. Xie pity instinctively felt that the gift box 
that the right one took away had a problem, saying: "Is there a jewellery in 
it?" 


Huacheng Road: "Guess it." 


Thanks to pity: "The blame for the Jinyixian incident should be right in 
Jianyu. Why is it so heavy to punish jade?" 


Huacheng Road: "My brother will know it after three days." 


Say three days, three days. The cold introduction of the jade palace 
suddenly shot | into a few sunshine, I saw the jade into the temple, seems 
to be looking for something, rummaging. Who knows, turning over and 
turning over, suddenly turned out a golden sacred, engraved mantra from 
the book file. He didn't care about it first, put it aside, he had to squat, 
suddenly grabbed it and said: "Jianyu?" 


Jian Yu came in from the outside and said: "What is it?" 


Yin Yu took the scorpion and wondered: "How is this King Kong scorpion? 
Isn't you giving it to me? I am not letting you put a gift box?" 


Jian Yu said: "Give him? He does not deserve to spit on him." 


The jade is funny and gas-filled. "You shouldn't really give that piece of 
rubbing cloth to him? Why should you offend people?" Jian Yu said with a 
smile: "No. I sent a good thing." '"" 


His tone is a bit weird, and he attracts a slight frown, saying: "What are 
you sending?" 


Jian Yudao: "The last time you grabbed the dress." 


The face of the jade has changed suddenly, and I don’t feel funny. “What? I 
said how can I not find it everywhere. That dress can control people’s 
minds, it will **** blood!” Going out in a hurry, Jian Yu grabbed him and 
said: "Hey, what are you worried about! That dress can control people's 


minds, but the person who sent him clothes is you, others can't control 
him. There is also blood sucking, sucking mortals. The blood is okay, but I 
still don't believe how it can take the gods. You see it for three days. Does 
he have anything?" 


Yin Yu thought and thought, walking around in the temple. Jian Yu said 
again: "Why is this kid not very capable? Young and promising, this time I 
will see how much he can bear." 


In the end, the jade is still a wrestler: "No! I don't know how dangerous it 
is. If something goes wrong, why don't you know it! Hey!" 


When he spoke, he went out and knocked down many of the priests. He 
rushed to the Qiying Hall, and the people were absent. He also asked 
people everywhere: "I am in a hurry to find Qiying. Where is he?" 


Others said: "Qi Ying? His Royal Highness is in the Shenwu Hall! Today, 
the gods who are in the top of the heavens are there..." 


The jade did not hear it and ran away. It was only to the Shenwu Temple 
that he could not enter. First, this gathering was called "the **** of the top 
of the heavens", did not call him; second, he just went in and could not say 
this in front of everyone, had to wait outside the temple. Through the 
window flower, Xie pity glanced at it, and sure enough, a few familiar 
faces, such as Feng Xin, admiration, sorrow, etc. are all in the temple, and 
they are listening to each other. Yin Yu saw that the right is really inside, 
and the body is wearing a pretty, bright and bright armor. 


He did not have any abnormalities. The spirits standing on the side of the 
palace were quite abnormal. God did not keep the house and frequently 
made mistakes. Junwu had no choice but to say: "Lingwen? Lingwen?" 


After shouting a few times, Lingwen suddenly returned to God and said: 
"What? What happened?" 


Jun Wu smiled and said: "What happened to you today? I have been 
staring at Qi Ying, is it like me, I think he is a good new girl?" 


Several of the gods in the temple also laughed, and the spirits snorted, and 
the cold sweat was wiped off without a trace, but the hand holding the pen 
seemed to tremble slightly. 


If it was at the same time, Xie Pity probably smiled, but now, it is very 
clear that the spirit must be seen in the right to wear the **** clothes that 
he personally made hundreds of years ago, under his own eyes. I feel 
creepy and shocked. 


Leading jade walks around the temple, sometimes squatting, sometimes 
standing up, suffering. It’s easy to get to the meeting, and Quan Yizhen 
first came out and saw him outside. He said, “Senior, how are you here?” 


Leading jade quickly stood up and whispered a few words, and 
immediately said: "You are this armor..." 


Quan Yizhen said: "Very good! Just now the emperor and the spirit both 
praised it. Thank you brother." 


Leading jade strong and calmly said: "It's good, but the person who made 
this armor said that there is a problem. I want you to take it back to him 
and rebuild it." 


If you directly order the right to "take off this armor", afterwards, he can 
be aware that he is controlled by evil elements, and this thing is not good 
to wear, so he can't make him feel strange, so he has to do so. 
Euphemistically requested. Quan Yizhen is strange: "Is there any problem? 
I didn't think there was any problem." 


After all, it’s embarrassing to ask for the gift you sent out. The jade is 
thinking hard about the countermeasures, and the right is true: "Yes, my 
brother, we can go out together next month." 


The jade instantly looked up and shouted: "What?" 


He almost forgot the things of Jin Yixian, hesitated: "I don't have my place 
on the tour." 


Quan Yizheng seems to be very happy to tell him: "Yes. I just mentioned 
you, the emperor said that you can consider." 


For a moment, Xie pity almost saw a burst of blood rushing straight to the 
face of the jade. 


The anger and grievances that have accumulated over the years have 
finally been detonated at this moment. Leading jade directly sighed, said: 
"Are you sick?!" 


For the first time, Quan Yizhen saw the look of jade so angry, blinked and 
revealed the color of doubt. There were also a few passing officers who 
sneaked over. Yin Yu said: "I have said that I am going to go?! What is the 
relationship between Wu Shen’s patrol and me?! I have not asked you, why 
do you mention me with the emperor?!" 


Some people may not know why the jade is so rude, but the pity is clear. 
Because, for a very self-respecting Wu Shen, this is really a shame. 


The martial arts patrol is a ritual that the top martial arts of heaven can 
participate. The selected Wushens in the process of patrolling, with their 
own power to retreat from the demons and demons, not only can make a 
name for themselves, expand the believers, and have the opportunity to 
learn from each other, and to enhance their strength and close the 
relationship. In short, it is a grand event, but it has high requirements for 
the family and strength of the martial arts. For example, the palace view is 
more than 4,000, or it ranks in the top ten. 


In order to attract the foundation of the jade, it is certainly not enough to 
qualify for the martial arts. Even if you can go, you can get the actual 
benefits, but how can people who know his status in the heavens and the 
heavens not chew on the tongue? People with thick cheeks don't care. 
Numerous small priests have broken their heads and want to go to see 


them. But the jade is obviously not a thick-skinned person. I know that I 
don’t have that qualification. How can I rely on others to lift and put 
myself? Strongly stuffed in? What's more, this person, or the original right 
to rely on him did not get rid of the human right! 


The power is true but it is completely incomprehensible. He probably 
thinks that this is a good thing, and he mentions it. He doesn't feel that he 
needs to care about other things. But because the jade looks really too 
angry, the first time on his face, there is a expression of words and words 
that he can't talk. He is half-shouldered and sulking: "Senior brother, why 
are you angry? What am I doing wrong?" ?" 


This is another sentence! 


Xie pity simply wants him not to talk. And the jade forehead blue violent 
violent, is already on the verge of collapse, grabbing his own hair, said: 
"Enough! I am fed up! I am going crazy! I am **** to drive you crazy!" 
He points to Shenwu Temple Road, "I don't want to talk to me right! I will 
withdraw the proposal immediately! Add me less! Now, hurry!" 


After he finished, the right to speak without saying a word, immediately 
turned and ran back to the Shenwu Temple. When I was jealous of jade, I 
remembered that he was still wearing the brocade. This move was not 
because he knew that he was wrong and wanted to remedy, but that he was 
controlled by the brocade! 


In the Shenwu Hall, several martial arts gods who did not walk were 
strangely watching the right of the wind and the fire, and the jade was 
outside the temple. He shivered and shouted: "Stop!" 


When Quan Yi was about to rush to the front of Jun Wu, he suddenly came 
to an emergency and really stood still. After a while, he wondered: "What 
happened to me?" 


Jun Wu also frowned, said: "You are not moving! You come over and show 
me. Just look at your eyes and your eyes are smashed, and the evil spirits 


appear, it seems to be in the sorcerer." 


Right one really caught the hair, inexplicably, said: "Good." Going 
forward. As a last resort, the jade has to say: "Come back! Go!" 


As soon as he shouted the order, he immediately turned around and rushed 
out of the hall and rushed to lead the jade. Perhaps it was because of the 
fainting of the head and the madness of the madness. These steps went 
very badly. The jade also ran away with a sloppy look, and it seemed to be 
like a sin. Jun Wu could not have seen it, stood up and said: "Get it!" 


The public martial arts officials answered in unison: "Yes!" 


The jade is almost desperate, completely messed up, and screamed: "Go! 
Go! Take off your clothes!" 


Quan Yizhen’s eyes are straight and he is running fast, taking off his 
armor. Who knows, a group of Wu Shenguan surrounded the way, and 
directed him. Seeing someone interrupted his action to execute the order, 
the right eye was fierce, and the chaos was out. On the spot, the body of a 
dozen martial arts officers was used as a target and penetrated a row of 
holes! 


"Ah, ah! Go to heaven, kill people in heaven -!!!!" 


In the screams of the past and the blood of the sky, the jade has been pale 
and stunned. More pale than his face, probably only the spirit. 


I never thought that this Jinyixian is so strong and so evil! The situation is 
completely out of control! 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 162: This jade 
quality can be used to throw bricks 4 


The lower-level martial arts officers who came to intercept were able to 
block the real fist and kill themselves. Seeing the situation is serious, Feng 
Xin, Yu Su, Lang Qianqiu have jumped to the right of the real one, seems 
to attack. Leading Yu Road: "Don't care for him! Don't move him! He 
won't kill anyone again!" 


As long as he does not block the right to complete the order, he will not 
hurt. However, Quan Yizhen has already killed more than a dozen martial 
arts officials. Who dares to come from him? Naturally, I will not believe 
the words that lead the jade. If you change someone who has strong 
reaction ability and is in danger, then you should immediately scream the 
order of "Sudden surrender and not move", but things happen too quickly, 
and within a few moments, there is no time to react, and the jade is afraid 
of the past. I have never experienced such a squad, and I am flustered. The 
decision-making is a mess, a step by step, and a step by step. Being 
chaotic, the feelings suddenly appeared behind the jade, saying: "I still 
want to run?" 


Leading jade, he discovered that he was also running aimlessly, quickly 
slamming, and arguing: "I am not..." and the feelings of love can not help 
but twist his backhand, thank you for hearing the crisp "kala" sound, cited 
Jade's face was slightly twitching. 


As a **** of martial arts, it is a double blow of the body and the soul. And 
the crickets that did not join in the back view were far and wide: "How 
does he seem to suddenly increase his strength?" 


What he said is the right to one. That is nature, the right one is really 
capable of playing, and Jin Yixian is able to play, and at least double the 
level. It is unfair that other martial arts fight alone with him. It 1s unfair, 
but because I don’t know the mystery, everyone is embarrassed to join 
forces to besiege him, or not to lose face? Fighting, Quan Yizhen was **** 
to the streets of Xianjing, and suddenly saw a palace view on the side of 


the road, and then he went in. The crowd shouted: "He introduced Jade 
Palace!" 


The order under the jade was to let him "go", but did not say where to go, 
so he just left. Several martial arts also followed. Because other people are 
conscious, they have left a few feelings for the right to really, but the right 
is really desperate to fight with the people who block him. So, several 
martial arts are also angry. Fengxin said: "This kid is very evil, first smash 
him and say it!" 


Everyone had this intention long ago. When he shouted, he did not hold it. 
When he came up, he was beaten up. The sword and the palm of the hand 
flew in the air, and the original Yinyu Temple, which was originally old, 
suddenly collapsed in half! 


The jade jade, who was swayed by the feelings of love, saw his palace 
collapse in a melee, and suddenly shouted and shouted: "Don't fight!" 


With such a shout, the other martial arts will not stop, but the right to 
listen to his orders, suddenly stopped. This is good, the swords and fists, 
all of them hit him on the ground, it is a tragedy! 


Lang Qianqiu did not have time to accept the epee, and suddenly cut into 
the right shoulder. Fortunately, his sword was blunt, and immediately 
stopped the offensive, this did not make the right one in two, said: "Don't 
fight, he seems to be unable to move!" 


The wind letter wiped the blood on his face and said: "Mom, finally 
stopped!" 


Right is really lying on the ground, as if it was **** by the five flowers. 
And there was a bundle of sacred ropes in the hands of the jade, and he let 
go of him. Yin Yu sat unconsciously on the ground, staring at the 
impetuous jade palace, looking around for a circle, his eyes fell back to the 
right of the right. Quan Yizhen’s vitality was very tenacious, and he was 
beaten by several martial gods. He almost did not play adultly. He didn’t 
lie for a while, and suddenly sat upright and inexplicably said: “What 
happened?” 


Several martial arts were suffocated by him, and they sang together: "You 
are so moldy!" 


Lingwen has been closely followed by the onlookers, so it is easy to take a 
breath, white face, but also emphasize the allocation of human hands, **** 
close together on the temple, in the psychic array: "medical officer, come 
to the emergency! ” 


Quan Yizhen is still very confused. When he looks back, he sees the jade 
sitting on the ground and climbs up. He seems to want to help him. Look 
at this completely ignorant face, the background is the temple that was 
smashed by itself, the jade is silent, and the face is slightly distorted. 


Quan Yizhen did not know what happened, said: "Brother, what are you 
doing?" 


The jade seems to have suddenly lost his sense of reason and smiled 
abruptly. Then, his eyes became red and authentic: 


"The right is true, why don't you die? You can't go to die?!" 


Hearing this sentence, Xie Pity, like many of the officials in the room, 
instantly widened his eyes. And Quan Yizhen got the order, did not 
hesitate to think, immediately executed, picked up a sword on the ground, 
grabbed his own hair in one hand, and held the sword in one hand, aiming 
at his throat. 


When he moved, the first reaction of several martial arts was that he 
wanted to sneak attack. He immediately retired a few dozen feet, but did 
not expect him to be self-satisfied. At this time, it was too late to go to the 
sword, and they smashed. The introduction of jade 1s also a spirit, but still 
did not respond, turned his head. When I saw the blood on the spot, 
Junwu’s figure suddenly flashed behind him! 


In Titicaca, between the moments, Quan Yizhen’s limbs have been 
removed. 


Jun Wu also cut a little on his neck, and the power was completely lost. He 
fell to the ground and the whole person was not adult, and became a 
bloody. 


At this point, everyone, including thank you, was relieved. However, Jun 
Wu did not. 


He turned around, his face was not happy, he was extremely serious, and 
he said to him: "It is already here, I think, you should have an 
explanation." 


Yin Yufang only buried his head in his hands, heard the words, and raised 
his head subconsciously: "I don't know. Not me. Yes...!" 


Having said that, he is another singer, as if this was the reaction, what he 
said. 


He actually succumbed to the death of so many eyes. And Quan Yizhen 
really did it! 


No one can see any clue again. Admiration: "The emperor, Qi Ying's 
reaction just was in the middle of the sorcerer. There must be something 
on his body that would allow him to obey the instructions issued by the 
jade. I don't know what it is." 


The spirit on the side is naturally clear what it is, but where she dares to 
say more, it is already the limit to deploy the man on the spot. Lang 
Qianqiu is unbelievable and said: "There is such a thing in the world???" 


At this time, a figure rushed into the crowd and rushed in, it is Jian Yu. He 
apparently went out to find a circle before he found it. I don't know what 
happened. He said, "What are you doing? This is... How do we lead the 
jade palace? How can it become like this?! Who is jealous! ” 


Jun Wu slowly walked to the side of the jade, saying: "What do you use to 
control him?" 


Although his tone is not severe, he is unprovoked and unstoppable. 
Looking down on such a condescending, it is even more fearful. Xie Pity is 
not a big disaster, but I have never seen such a monarch. From this point 
of view, Jun Wu was really open to him, and he was very kind. 


The original jade was confusing, and thanks to his pity, his mind was not 
strong enough, and his ability to respond on the spot was not strong. At 
this time, he was speechless. See him not answering, Jun Wu said: "But. 
You don't say, I know. It's the armor." 


It’s over. It’s over. It’s all over. 


The jade was sitting on the ground and hugged the head again. Surrounded 
by crowds of people: 


"I was really shocked by me... For hundreds of years, I have never seen 
such an incredible thing in Heaven!" 


"A priest controls the mind of another priest, let him kill, kill more than a 
dozen priests, and let him die?!" 


"What a good poisonous heart..." 


In the crowd, Jian Yu heard such a big thing, his face was white. But he bit 
his teeth, but he rushed out and said: "The emperor! That armor, yes, I 
give the right to a real thing, it is not a matter of attracting jade." 


This is a little bit of a return to the soul, dumb voice: "Jianyu..." 


Jian Yu hardened his scalp and said loudly: "I originally wanted to give the 
kid a little color to look at. I didn't expect it... I didn't expect to make such 
a big thing..." 


The right side of the one was really unconscious, lying on a large pool of 
blood, and the pharmacists and priests who had rushed to have surrounded 
him. Jian Yudao: "I have always hated the kid, but the jade has always 


been very polite to him. This lot of people can testify. He didn't know 
anything about this armor!" 


However, this step is already late. There is no longer anyone who believes 
that this is not a matter of attracting jade. When even someone said: "You 
are the lower-level priest of the jade palace, you are really resentful of the 
right to hurt him. I can imagine that the main priest you serve will be 
better?" 


Some people even ridiculed: "He doesn't know? How can he tell people to 
go to death without knowing it? Don't say he is just joking." 


If the reaction in front of the jade is all excusable and fussy, then his last 
sentence "go to death" is really unable to excuse him anyway. 


Thanks for the pity, the spirit that told him at the time was "to joke jokes", 
but it was also a cover for jade. Jian Yu is unbelievable and said: "What? 
You are less nonsense, how can you tell this kind of words? He has always 
been polite to the kid, how can he be called to die? Lead jade, you Didn't 
you say? You didn't say that?? You won't say it!" 


However, Yin Yu did not answer him and closed his eyes. Seeing that Jian 
Yu refused to recognize him, others were speechless. "We have heard it all 
by hand. Can this be deny?" 


Jian Yu said: "There must be some misunderstandings! You don't know a 
lot of things!" 


"No matter what the misunderstanding, do we know that Tianda’s 
misunderstanding can’t stop killing your own younger brother?” 


Wen Yan, Yin Yu and Jian Yu are all speechless. Therefore, the next priest 
continued to argue: "I heard that since the right to independence, I went 
out and set up a temple. The people who lead the jade palace don't care 
much about him. Every time the right comes to the door, they always say 
that they are not in the temple. I It’s strange to come, it’s because I’m not 
pleasing to see people early...” 


“Speaking, wasn’t someone acknowledging the mistakes of the Mid- 
Autumn Festival a few days ago? At the time, my face was very ugly.” 


These are all facts and cannot be rebutted, but the conclusion 1s not: "I 
know that, it 1s quite embarrassing, but it is not going to harm others..." 


"Yeah, the volume is too small..." 


Jian Yu's eyes are red, loud: "I have said nothing about our Highness, that 
is, I am doing it alone! I have admitted, what else do you say?!" 


However, it is now too late to jump into the Yellow River. In the eyes of 
others, this can only prove that the jade has a vicious and loyal 
subordinate. Moreover, with one sentence, you can block all excuses: "If 
you call the right to die, it’s not someone else!" 


Seeing the more trouble, Junwu said: "Take it all. Lingwen, you are here 
looking at Qiying." 


Ling Wen bowed his head and said that Jun Wu had left the Yin Yu Palace 
with his hand. Several martial arts officials pulled up the jade, and cited 
the jade soul not to keep the house, saying: "Forget Jianyu. Don't say it." 


Jian Yu was also pulled up and **** with a bundle of celestial ropes. He 
said: "If you forget it before, this is not a million! If you forget it, you will 
be finished! It will be embarrassed, it will definitely be embarrassed!" 


Yin Yu sighed and said: "Forget it. If you are shackled, you will be 
defamed. I am staying in this place... It doesn't mean anything." 


Jian Yu hated: "...you, you should not do it, you should not, the wrong 
sentence should not be the last sentence. In this sentence, you can't turn 
over! You never yell at him, how? Just let him die at this time? Just like 
this!" 


The jade seems to be a teenager in the moment, and his eyes are gray. He 
seemed to be a little confused. He shook his head and said, "I don't know 
why. I was... oh, no excuses." 


After taking a few steps in the escort, Jian Yu suddenly said: "Why?" 


Everyone looked at him. Jian Yudao: "You are not without him! You are 
ten thousand times better than him, ten thousand times better! Right one, 
count a fart! I just hate him? Why ts he now, you are like this "It’s not him 
who 1s being shackled!" 


He hates to gnash his teeth, hate the true feelings, hate to fall into tears. 
However, many things in this world are not useful in the past. 


Maybe he understood it in his heart, but he was not reconciled, and he 
could not swallow this breath anyway. 


When he heard him shouting, the jade could not move. 


He buried his face in his hand and sat in front of the jade palace. He 
snarled: "Enough! I said nothing! Let me go!" 


He covered his ears and screamed out loudly: "Don't remind me again and 
again, don't talk about it, I don't want to say anything!" 


Xie pity can't bear to look at it again, said: "... forget it!" 


As aresult, Huacheng removed the image and the two separated their 
foreheads. 


After arriving for so long, Xie pity felt that his forehead was a bit numb, 
and there was a bit of itching, hot, and he reached out and tried to take a 
look, but he couldn’t take it. Huacheng seemed to see his subtle 
discomfort. He raised his hand to help him squat and naturally let go. 
Outside the stone wall, the ghost-faced jade walked around and walked for 
a while, and coldly said to the right: "Do you want to come out?" 


He deliberately changed his voice. Quan Yi nodded and said: "Think." 


Yin Yudao: "Good. Look here!" After that, the speed of the Thunder is not 
in a hurry, a shovel is on the right! 


"Bang!" was a loud resound, and the right to have a voice immediately, the 
head also hanged down. Thanks for the pity: "No. This is dying?? Really 
killed??" 


Huacheng Haha said: "My brother is relieved, not dead. It 1s dizzy." 


The jade shovel went down and spit out. In the end, it seems that I decided 
to dig up the right from the wall, so I picked up the shovel and dig it up. 
Thank you for your pity. 


If the right to rescue directly is true, the jade can't beat him, and maybe 
even reveal his identity. That's really bad. The origins of the two brothers 
are really bad, and they can't tell who is worse than anyone. Still 
pretending not to know well. Thanks to the pity: "Saro, do we have to find 
a way out?" 


Huacheng seems to be quite comfortable in the inside, saying: "Well? Is 
this going out?" 


Thanks to pity and laugh, said: "Otherwise? Do you want to live in it?" 


Huacheng Road: "If you are with your brother, you can't help it. Okay. Just 
kidding." He was stunned and reached out and thanked his ears. Thanks: 
"What is this?" 


Huacheng smiled and said: "I am too lazy to go out step by step and 
directly blow it up." 


Xie Li is thinking about whether he will blow up the same person who was 


swallowed by the mountain monster, but suddenly his face changed 
slightly and said: "Wait." 


Huacheng’s face was like him, and he put down his hand. The two men 
listened carefully and asked, and thanked the whisper: "Have you heard 
it?" 


Huacheng also said: "Hear it." 


On the side of the stone wall, the jade is used to dig the pit. On the other 
side of the stone wall, there is also a person who is talking. 


They did not use the silver butterfly to monitor, this voice was directly 
heard by them, because this person is very close to the stone wall, almost 
talking to the stone wall. Thanks for listening and listening, I heard some 
embarrassing, intermittent fuzzy words, such as "eat?" "Shangtianting" 
"Wu Shen" such words, my heart fretting, and Huacheng looked at each 
other, trying to come to the sound The other side 1s close. 


The voice is a man, it seems to be talking to people, because every time he 
says a few words, he will pause for a while. However, thank you but did 
not hear the voice of the person talking with him, perhaps because the 
other party is far away. 


After quietly moving, the voice was clearer, although it was still vague, 
but thank you for hearing a more complete sentence. 


The humanity said: "His Royal Highness is here too. I don't want to go this 
step, I believe you are, but he has not saved." 


Thanks for your pity: "I? Why didn't I save? Wait, this voice..." 


This voice is very familiar. He must have heard it, and he has heard it for a 
long time, not a time. But because it has been a long time, he can't keep 
his voice and people on time. Just as he was thinking hard, the man said 
another sentence: "Let him end here." 


Suddenly, thank you for remembering who the owner of this voice is. 
His lips moved and silently said: "National teacher?!" 


The person outside the stone wall on the other side, the sound 1s exactly 
the same as his professional teacher in Xianleguo! 2k novel reading 
network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 163: Fans of 
the country 


Thanks for a heart mad, and even his fingertips shook a little. 


But he was suffocated, did not say anything, just looked up slightly, in the 
ear of Huacheng: "...Sanlang does not move. The voice outside is very 
similar to my master. Don't be discovered first..." 


Although it is very similar, he can't insist on it. Because the world is not a 
person who has no similar voice, and he and the national teacher have not 
seen it for hundreds of years, it is not impossible for him to remember. 
There is no need to act rashly and wait and see, and maybe you can find 
more secrets. Huacheng also bowed slightly, grabbed his waist and 
whispered: "Well... you don't move." 


The two were squeezed by the earth and stone in all directions, and the 
ears were smashed and the ears were slightly hot. Although it was out of 
date, Xie pity quickly flashed a sentence: "The taste of ‘death in the same 
hole' is not bad." 


At this moment, the voice said again: "They are two? Where have you 
gone?" 


"They two"? Xie Li first instinctively thought that he and Huacheng were 
in the heart, and he was shocked. He wanted to listen carefully to who he 
was talking to, but the strange thing is that the "National Teacher" - let's 
call it "National Teacher". After he asked, there was no response. 


It's really weird. Under this distance, both Xie and Huacheng can hear the 
question of "National Teacher". It is reasonable to say that his voice is not 
very big, and he does not shout with a scorpion. Then, the other party 
should not be far from him. If they answer, they can hear more or less 
here. However, the truth is that you can't hear anything at all. 


"National Teacher" said again: "It's hard for them. But don't worry about 
those small weeds, it can't be weathered. Now we have more important 
things to do." 


Thanks to this, I understand that "the two of them" did not refer to him and 
Huacheng, but to the two associates of the "National Division." 


Things are getting more and more strange. The tone of the national teacher 
is obviously echoed, but it sounds like he is talking to himself or talking to 
the air. There was such a strange scene in the mind of the pity, and 
immediately collapsed. There is still a possibility in the mind that the 
"national teacher" can hear the voice of that person, but others can't hear 
it. 


His mind is getting more and more skeptical, and he is more and more 
breathless. The "National Teacher" opened its mouth and said that it was 
worth pondering. "There are so many people in the mountains? In short, 
you should bring them to the copper furnace first. Then I will find a way to 
deal with them one by one." The sooner the better, you must arrive within 
two days." 


Copper furnace! 


Moreover, it is still "within two days", and it is impossible to use a 
thousand miles in the Copper Furnace Mountain. How can it arrive in two 
days? Still bring a group of people. "Processing", what is the "handling" 
method? 


After a pause, the voice said again: "Call them both too. Let's go to the 
copper furnace. To deal with the Highness of Prince Edward, there must be 
one less. Now the Highness 1s still in a state of no complete awakening, if 
he waits for him to wake up. ...I can't imagine what he will do this time." 


Thank you for your pity. 


Is this talking about him? 


At this time, the mountain was booming, and the feelings of the 
surrounding earth were shaking slightly. The outside country said: "What 
happened?" 


He also said to Huacheng Road in the stone wall: "What happened?" 
Huacheng whispered: "There is a change there." 


The two foreheads are attached again. Thanks to the right eye, there was a 
situation in which the jade and the right side of the cave were introduced. 
Moreover, it should be a little earlier. Yin Yu finally took the right from 
the stone wall, dragging down and panting. Who knows, the right to stun 
the past suddenly leaps in the ground, picking up the mask on his face! 


Fang Cai, Quan Yizhen actually turned out to be dizzy! 


When he wants to come, he is very familiar with the habits of walking 
around when he thinks about it, the tone of his voice, and the strength of 
his beating. I am afraid that when he takes a shovel and shoots it, he knows 
who it is. Unexpectedly, this temper of Quan Yizhen also had a day of 
fraud. Although this is just a common little trick, but it is a breakthrough 
in Quan Yizhen. Therefore, no one is prepared, under the mask, it is a 
shocking and bleak face that is obviously shocked. Quan Yizhen was very 
excited, jumped up with blood and shouted: "Brother!" 


The jade mouth was twisted for a while, as if I saw something terrible, 
suddenly my hands clasped my head: "I am not!" 


After shouting loudly, he ran away with his legs and ran back to bombard 
the person behind him. He said, "Don't come over! Don't follow me!" 


Quan Yizhen also chased after chasing, completely ignoring the 
bombardment, only shouted: "Brother! It is me!" 


The jade can't help but roar and screamed a thick one: "Mom is you 
terrible! Say don't follow me!!!" 


All the way, the mountain was booming. Here, the national teacher 
wondered: "What is there over there? How is it so noisy?" 


Still no one answered him, but the national teacher seemed to get the 
answer, saying: "It turns out that the children are really so, so noisy. I am 
leaving, I have to prepare. After you get to the copper furnace, we will 
meet again!" ” 


He is actually going to leave. Wen Yan, Huacheng regained her thanks and 
pity, and she closed her eyes, and she was stunned. The whole body was 
violently shaken. The stone wall that had been bent for a long time was 
finally blasted. The two jumped together, lightly landing, and re-breathing 
fresh. air. However, there is an empty cave outside, there is no national 
teacher, and there is no such a mysterious second person. It has already 
gone without a trace. 


Xie Li and Hua Cheng looked at each other and did not hurry to catch up. 
They had not yet separated. The opposite side of the cave rushed into a 
black man, which was a jade. He waved the shovel and rushed to the two, 
saying: "City Lord!!! Your Royal Highness!!!" 


Behind him, the right to have been smashed by the blood has also rushed 
in. Huacheng did not lift his head and waved his hand. Quan Yizhen 
immediately raised his hand to cover it. However, the trick that Huacheng 
used was not blocked by the fist. He only heard a bang, and a red smog 
exploded in the right. Come. After the smoke spread slowly, there was 
only one round red tumbler left in the place, and it dripped. 


The tumbler squinted with a pair of eyes, a very innocent look. It was the 
last ttme Huacheng had dealt with Lang Qianqiu. This led to the jade, 
stopped running, wiped a cold sweat, and came over, said: "Thank you, the 
city owner." 


Huacheng Road: "Don't you be so scared?" 


The jade heart has a lingering fear, and smiles bitterly: "I don't care. I now 
see this prince, and I just want to run as far as possible." 


Thank you for listening, it is funny and sympathetic. It seems that the 
introduction of jade is really a serious shadow of the "personality" of the 
right. The tumbler was still on the ground, and Baba’s eyes widened, and 
no one ignored it. Xie Pity looked pitiful, was about to pick it up, suddenly 
felt the ground violently shaking, the body also followed the East, almost 
even more powerful than the tumbler, busy fixing the figure, said: "What 
happened? Earth moved?" 


Although thanking the pity does not need help, but Huacheng still helped 
him, and said to Yu Yudao: "Go out and see." 


The recovery status of the jade is extremely fast, saying: "Yes!" 


When I should have taken it, I shoveled the shovel. When I was a little, I 
quickly opened a hole in the stone wall on one side. The outside sun came 
in, and the jade looked at it and it was shocking. Thanks to the pity: "Is the 
imperial lieutenant, is the earth moving or is this mountain going to 
collapse?" 


Yin Yudao: "Nothing! It is this mountain monster... It is running!" 


Is it running? Xie Li and Hua Cheng looked at each other and rushed 
forward to see the outside of the mountain monster. 


It is really running! 


Outside the mountain, the scenery along the way is rapidly retreating, 
almost becoming a colorful line. It seems that they are riding on a fast- 
moving carriage or sitting on the shoulders of a giant who is running wild! 


The hills, rivers, plains, and woods were all leveled by the mountain 
monster, crushed by it, and gave way to it. The whistling wind rushed out 
of the hole, and the hair and the belt of the three men flew together, and 
the jade said: "I am afraid that in two days, I will go to the copper 
furnace..." 


Two days? 


Thanks for your heart and suddenly. That's it! 


No wonder, it is no wonder that I can't hear the voice of "another person". 
It is no wonder that the national division asked the other party to bring 
them to Tonglushan within two days. Because at that time, the "National 
Master" was not talking to people at all, but talking to this mountain 
monster! 


Huacheng must understand, and said: "Exactly, borrowing its wind, you 
don't have to go slowly. He said that when he meets in the copper furnace, 
he will know what he wants to do when he gets there." 


Thanks for the pity, but the look is dignified. Huacheng was aware of this 
and said: "Brother, what happened?" 


Thanks to the pity: "What is not completely awakened?" 


The voice said, "Now the Highness is still in a state of no complete 
awakening. If he waits for him to wake up... It is hard to imagine what he 
will do this time." Xie pity said: "If that person is really my master, say 
‘Prince. Your Highness is me, what does that mean?" 


Huacheng Road: "My brother should not think too much. First, that person 
is not necessarily your master. Second, he said that 'His Royal Highness' is 
not necessarily you. Don't forget, Prince Wu Yong, also the Royal 
Highness Prince. ” 


Thanks to pity: "But if it is? I have some unfounded guesses, you can help 
me to listen, there is no reason." 


Huacheng Road: "Good. Brother, you said." 


Thanks to pity: "There are three big mountains in Tongluoshan: old, sick, 
dead, but there is no life. If you are the only master of this class, it is a 
mountain monster who talks with him. He can communicate with the 
mountain monster, then he Said 'the two of them’, it is very likely that 
there are two other mountain monsters." 


Huacheng Road: "I agree with this. Is there?" 


Thanks to the pity: "And, I am thinking, are these three mountain monsters 
all aware of people? Even, they themselves are made by people. Why is 
there no 'life' mountain? Because 'life' has not yet Shape, 'life' is still a 
person, and this person... is the national teacher!" 


The more he thinks, the more he feels that he is justified, his heart 1s mad, 
he continues: "The Tonglu Mountain was once the realm of Wuyong. "The 
old and the sick are dead", a total of four; Wu Yong’s protector is also 
four; and from small to large Teach me the teacher of Xianle, there are just 
four in total! One master, three deputy. Generally, there are so many 
national teachers in a country. I didn’t think there was anything wrong 
with it. I thought it was a routine. Later, I discovered that there is no such 
practice. Do you think this is a coincidence or is there any connection 
between them?" 


Huacheng said: "It’s not surprising that coincidence. Isn’t the four scenes 
also four? The four majors are not enough for four, but they are forced to 
pull one to make up the number." 


Thanks to the pity: "But I don't know why, I have a strong feeling. I am 
sick and sick, Wu Yongguo protects the four gods, and Xianle four 
kings...may be all the same four people." 


He walked down his own way and said: "If my four masters are really the 
four gods of the Uighurs, why should they come to be our national 
teacher? Why should we teach? Why? Why should the National Teacher 
tell me the story of Prince Wu Yong? Why do you want me to be a person 
like Wu Yongzi? Is there anything I have, that I don’t even know it 
myself? What am I still not awake? Will it be that I am..." 


He was thinking about a little konjac, Huacheng took his shoulder and 
firmly said: "No! I can guarantee that you are you, not any other person. 
Believe me. Don't think about it." 


Thanks for this, I just woke up like a dream, saying: "...you are right. Iam 
a little cranky." 


The national teacher is the person he is most familiar with except his 
parents. Although the national teacher often dislikes him for disobedience, 
he often cares that his identity is inconvenient, but in general, he is a good 
master. Suddenly, I found that I might not know a person who I thought I 
was very familiar with, and it was really easy for people to fall into myths. 


And, there is another point, it’s too much like it. So far, the experience of 
the Uygur Prince, which was displayed on the murals of the Wuyong 
Temple, is incomplete, but it has faintly given him a sense of recurrence of 
a near-horrible reincarnation. 


Huacheng slowed down the tone and said: "But, brother, think about it 
first, your master, what is the origin?" 


Xie pity thought carefully and said: "...not clear." 


Really, he couldn’t even remember where his master came from. After a 
moment of indulgence, thank you: "The national teacher was the national 
teacher before I was born. I only know that he is called Mei Nianqing, but 
I don't want to say that this is definitely a pseudonym. I also thought about 
it before. The national teacher is so powerful, why is there no? Soaring, 
but if the person is him, then he will live longer in this world, certainly 
longer than me. If he really wants to deal with us..." 


Flower City is full of instinct: "Nothing. Live a little longer. No matter 
what he is, the soldiers will stop, the water will cover the earth. Remember 
that everything has me. I will always stand on your side." 


Thanks for the slightest glimpse. The sense of existence of the jade is 
inherently low, and it has been almost unspeakable, and almost all have 
been forgotten. At this time, it 1s said: "The city owner, do you need to 
find someone else?" 


They are out, but they still don't know which corner of the mountain 
monster to swallow. Thanks for your help: "Look! Let's find it together. 
Please ask your lieutenant." 


Yin Yudao said: "His Royal Highness, do not have to call His Royal 
Highness... I have not been a **** official in heaven." 


Thanks and smiled: "Then you also called my name, so you don't have to 
be so polite. I haven't been Prince Edward for a long time." 


Yin Yu looked at the flower city behind him and said: "This... I dare not 
dare not dare." 


Thanks for the pity: "Is there anything that I dare not?" After two steps, I 
was about to pick up the right tumbler. Suddenly a figure fell from the sky 
and fell heavily in front of him, sending out a crisp bone break. 2k novel 
reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 164: Fanguo 
teacher fascinating heart 2 


The first reaction to thanking the pity is to bring up the heart. Fortunately, 
he is used to it, and he glanced at it before he started, and he stopped, 
saying: "Hey general?" 


It’s awkward to stand up and stand up. He licked his shoulders and 
smashed his shoulders. He was still calm and glanced at them. He said: 
"His Royal Highness and Lord Ghost King are very happy here." 


Thanks for your pity: "Fortunately, okay. Don't you worry about the 
general? I just heard the ‘karaoke’...” 


He said: "Oh, it doesn't matter. Thank you, Your Highness, my wife. I don't 
care about my bones. It's not my bones. It's this." He raised a thing, it was 
the unlucky man's thigh bone that was not boned. It 1s. He said: 
"Fortunately, this kind of dear friend helped me to find a way out in this 
mountain monster. Although it is a man's bone, it can be regarded as a 
good man with a bone." 


The voice just fell, not far away, the second person shadow fell from the 
sky, and fell heavily. Everyone walked over and saw that this time it was a 
shack. In fact, it is two people. He is guarded for half a month in his arms. 
In the half-moon arm, he protects two black pots filled with grinds and 
covers. Both of them were gray-faced, but it didn't seem to cause any 
serious problems. They quickly climbed up and vomited a few stucco. 
They said, "Yes, the army! Prince's Temple, down." 


He said: "It seems that this mountain monster feels that we are not good at 
eating and vomiting." 


Huacheng and Xie Pity looked at each other and whispered: "Not 
necessarily. Maybe, just someone called it to spit it out." 


After walking a few steps, I noticed an unusual vibration and frowned. 
"What happened to this mountain? Why is it so powerful?" 


Thanks: "Because it is carrying us, driving towards the copper furnace." 


He walked to the hole that led the jade to look out and said: "Hurry! Very 
good, just to help us save our strength." 


However, at this point, there is still one person missing. Thanks to the 
pity: "What about the spirit?" 


Huacheng seems to look at it with his right eye. He said: "The silver 
butterfly that is on his back is swallowed by the mountain monster. He is 
gone." 


In other words, Lingwen and Jinyixian can now move freely. This is 
incredible, thank you: "Hurry to find him!" 


Then, the group of people ran around in the body of the mountain monster. 
Huacheng released nearly a hundred deadly butterflies, a search, and 
finally, found another hole with the crowd. 


This hole was struck by people, and the edge was extremely irregular. The 
outside was a scene of rapid retreat, and the screaming wind rushed 
straight into the mountain to make people cry like a ghost. I want to come, 
after the spirit 1s spit out by the mountain monster, I opened a hole here 
and ran. Thanks for looking down on the edge of the hole, Emei said: 
"How can this be good? Jin Yixian is too destructive, can not be so lost." 


Huacheng Road: "Don't worry. Anyway, he will eventually go to the copper 
furnace, and he will return the same way." 


A few people gathered together, thank you for saying that you only heard 
about it, and omitted some details. After the lecture, everyone sat on the 
ground in a daze. After all, there is nothing to blame now, and I don’t have 
to hurry. I can’t help but be boring. 


Because Yin Yu said that he did not know how to communicate with the 
right to really, seeing him a headache, it is really afraid, thank you also 
feel that it is not a wise choice to decentralize the right now, and 
temporarily let him maintain the form of the tumbler. I can't play the 
tumbler to play, thank you for watching the tumbler smashing the West, as 
if a child who is being beaten, feels a little pitiful, then coughs, said: 
"General general, don't play." 


First, it should be on the mouth. However, after waiting for the pity and 
the ups and downs, he began to bounce again after leaning against the 
mountain wall. No one cares about him, and the jade has been counting the 
distance from the hole. He looked at it from a distance, and he tried to stop 
and talk for several times. He finally did not speak. Who knows, the music 
is extremely sad, the bullets are playing, and the squatting on the side 
suddenly slams and slams. This is a relative and a descendant. I didn’t 
have any thoughts at the moment. I grabbed the road and said: "Small? 
What happened to you?!" 


The jade machine sneaked over and took the tumbler away, and went to the 
side of thank you. Huacheng Road: "Nothing, can't die. Your Highness is 
not seen when you sleep." 


Xie pity was suddenly woken up, stumbled and found that he did not know 
when leaning on one shoulder, the voice of Huacheng was in his ear: 
"Brother woke up?" 


Thanks for pity and blinking, the right side of the body is really a tumbler 
dangling, he collected it and said: "I fell asleep on you? Sorry... What 
happened?" 


Huacheng looks like a self-satisfaction: "Nothing. If you are sleepy, you 
can sleep again. It will be soon." 


Thanks for seeing the opposite side, clutching the collar and swaying, 
stunned, and woke up most of the time, thought that something went 
wrong, and quickly went forward to help. After reading the words: "Oh, 
the generals don't have to worry, the generals are only hungry and forced, 
and they don't support it for a while." 


After all, it is a personal body. Tossing this for a long time has not eaten 
water, and there is no thankful and rich hungry anti-play experience, and 
finally can not support it. I think his an understatement is very 
problematic: "What is ‘hunger and ruthless, not for a moment’?” 


no way. It’s not blowing, thank you for eating for a meal for three days, 
and ten dozens of fights can be climbed up immediately and there’s 
nothing to do with the ruin. Which priest has his experience in this area? 
Thanks for the pity: "This, cough. Who has eaten?" 


No one answered. Only half a month took out one thing, said: "I'm sorry, I 
only have this..." At first glance, it was the jar with the bumps and 
phoenixes. Immediately said: "How do you still hold this stuff? Who do 
you want to kill? ? Lost!" 


There was noisy over there, and Huacheng said with respect to him: "Look, 
I said nothing. It is better to sleep again." 


The mountain monster carried them for a long time, and thanked the 
outside world for being dark, saying: "How far have we gone? How long is 
it from the copper furnace?" 


The jade replied: "It has already circulated nearly eight hundred miles." 


This is much faster than they walked, and Xie pity also stood up and came 
to the hole. He used to just look at it casually. Who knows, once swept 
away, suddenly saw something, and when he was on the back, he stood up 
and said: "What is that?" 


In the middle of the night, overlooking the mountain monster, there is a 
huge face on the ground below! 


This face 1s curved and the corner of the mouth is tilted up, as if a strange 
smile blooms on him. Thanks for the pity, he took a step back and 
Huacheng caught him behind him. His mind was fine-tuned, and then he 
took a closer look. It turned out that the "face" was a combination of 
mountains and rivers, but it was a visual illusion. However, this illusion is 
vivid, and at first glance, it is inevitable to teach people to be shocked. 


Thanks to the pity: "What is the ditch like the eyes and mouth?" 


Huacheng said behind him: "That is the Wuyong River, which is called the 
"Mother River' by the Wuyong people. It originates from the mountains 
and is the river formed by the melting of snow. Of course, it has 
completely dried up now. Here, The description is very close to the copper 
furnace." 


Thanks again, "What about the 'nose beam?" 


Huacheng Road: "That is a bustling city on the bank of the Wuyong River. 
Going and seeing?" 


Thanks to the side of the road: "Is there anything good to see below?" 


Huacheng Road: "There is also a Wuyong Temple in the city. I guess 
maybe my brother will want to see it." 


If there is a temple, then there may be murals. Thanks for the moment: 
"Go down." 


He can't wait to know more about Prince Wu Yong. He also said: "Go on. 
You have to find some food and water for Xiaoxiao. But how can it go? 
The sword is folded again." 


Huacheng waved, and several silver butterflies appeared on everyone's 
side, shining with phosphorescence, perched on their shoulders, back, head 
and cuffs. When someone sees such a small silver butterfly, it 1s inevitable 
that they will be able to bring them up, but they will not ask one sentence. 
If they throw all the people together, they will not be separated in midair. 
Leading the jade to open the hole bigger, big enough for five or six people 
to enter at the same time, ready, the group went to the hole, thank you: 
"You, prepare -" 


Shouted: "Wait." 
Thanks for turning his head, said: "What else is there for the general?" 


Ruan said: "Is this in the hands of two?" 


Following his gaze, thanking him for looking down and seeing his own 
hand. He discovered that the red line between him and Huacheng was still 
connected. 


"..." Xie pity and cough, said, "This, this is the same magic weapon used to 
contact." 


He said: "Oh. Is it not inconvenient to move? After all, it is a line. If it is 
caught or twisted, it may happen." 


His reminder is very reasonable. I don’t know if I’m pity, as a **** of war, 
I’m afraid to have something to do when I’m shooting. However, for some 
subtle reasons, thank you for not wanting to break this line. Seeing his 
look slightly condensed, it seems to be tangled, Huacheng glanced and 
smiled: "It makes sense, this is indeed inconvenient to move." 


After that, thank you for seeing the red line between the two men 
disappeared. Huacheng Road: "It's much more convenient now." 


Xie pity stared at the air that disappeared from the red line, slightly 
stunned. The red line was only briefly for a while, and it was gone. 
Although it is not a big deal, no, it should be said that this is a big bit of 
sesame, but he is still slightly lost. Afraid to be seen, Xie Li quickly 
smiled and said: "Go! Prepare - jump!" 


The mountain monsters rushed forward, and did not realize that these 
small and small people fell quietly from themselves. The group of people 
floated under the backdrop of a group of dead butterflies, unscathed. The 
landing place is the "nose bridge" of the huge smiling face. 


After getting up, Xie Pity was very strange. He looked around in a circle 
and said: "Sanlang, Wuyong Temple and City Pool are here?" 


Huacheng Road: "Yes." 


Thanks and pity: "But... nothing here?" 


really. He thought that when he fell to the ground, he would see the 
scenery of the town like the first temple. He could see the streets, shops, 
houses, ancient wells, temples, etc. However, what he saw was a flat open 


space, empty. Nothing is not like having a city. an asia ath Pais hl oh eae 


PK DDD DD Oe D:D 


Huacheng Road: "At your feet." 
"what?!" 


Everyone is surrounded. At the foot of the foot is the stone. Thanks to the 
pity: "Is this a block?" 


Huacheng put his hand on the handle of the machete, and Shiran went over 
and said: "Come here, come over." 


Everyone walked according to the words, only to see him pull out | out of 
the machete, the tip of the knife down, to the speed of lightning, and broke 
into the ground next to the stone. The ground in the tip of the knife, first 
slammed, cracked a layer of spider-like cracks. Then, the crack spread 
quickly, the more cracked, the deeper the crack, and finally, the ground 
collapsed and revealed a cool black hole. 


Huacheng took the lead and jumped down. She regretted that he suddenly 
took the lead and threw himself to the hole. He said: "Sanlang?" 


After a short while, the sound of Huacheng came from the bottom, and 
with an empty echo, said: "There is nothing underneath, you can come 
down." 


It turned out that he was going down the road first. Thanks for a sigh of 
relief, and immediately jumped. Huacheng took the hand of thankfulness 
and pulled him to stand up. He thanked him: "It’s so dark." 


The voice just fell, and a few silver butterflies appeared in the darkness, 
flying with the glittering stars, and a few more ghostly fires, instantly 
illuminating the depths of the cave. Presented in front of everyone is a 
long street. 


Before the millennium, this should be a bustling street with dense shops 
and tall houses. The big stone that just stepped on the foot was the roof of 
a house. The rest of the people jumped one by one, thanking them to the 
top, saying: "It turns out. Is this city buried? Earth moving? Landslide? 
Or..." 


Huacheng Road: "Volcanic ash." 


Thanks for turning his head. Huacheng Road: “The volcanic ash that is two 
feet thick has buried the whole city underground. What you are seeing now 
is the part of the demons that came to the trial of the Bronze Mountain. 
More parts are still buried. In the volcanic ash." 


Xie Li immediately remembered the mural on the second shrine, and the 
bright red to the dazzling red seemed to come to the fore. The scene of the 
demise of the dream of the Uyghur Prince has come true! 


Putting the squatting on the side of the road, said: "No matter how much, 
there is no water? Give him two first." 


Huacheng Road: "The river at the surface has dried up. However, I 
remember that there is groundwater in the depths of the city. It is unlucky 
to look away." 


So, hey, half a month, and lead jade will go to find water first. Thanks to 
the pity, Huacheng came over and said: "Brother, look at your hand." 


Xie pity subconsciously, only one hand found that although the red line 
between the two disappeared, but Huacheng personally gave him the 
Yinhong knot tied on the third finger has not disappeared, still bright, as if 
Only a small red butterfly perched on the back of his hand. 


Huacheng clearly said that the red line between the two was broken and 
the knot would disappear. Thankful, thank you: "This is..." 


Seeing him surprised, Huacheng smiled and said: "Before it was a small 
obstacle. The red line is hidden, the distance is not restricted, and there 1s 
no need to worry about being caught, but it is not broken." 


He raised his hand and looked at the identical knot. He said: "As long as 
the edge is still there, 1t means that the other side of the red line is safe and 
sound. Near the copper furnace, the danger has increased. I don't know 
what is ahead. Waiting. So I thought about it, this red line still can't be 
taken down. What did my brother say?" 


I learned that the red line is still there, and she can't help but rise up. Once 
she is aware, she will immediately press down. "Oh, yes. If you can, you 
can always know if the other person is safe. Very good, very practical 
spells." wen 


Huacheng also smiled, and then smiled and said: "But, Your Highness, I 
have to say something, I hope you can listen." 


Seeing his look turned abruptly, and thanking him for being serious, said: 
"What? You said." 


Huacheng looked straight into his eyes and said: "I know that you will not 
die, nor are you afraid of death. But even if you are stronger, don't be 
yourself and you will not be hurt." 


Thank you for your pity. Huacheng said again: "It doesn't mean that you 
won't die, it won't hurt, it doesn't mean it won't hurt. See what strange and 
dangerous things don't touch, first find me, let me handle it." 


Xie pity suddenly remembered that before he was underground, he used 
his hands to hold the two skulls covered with corpse poison. The face of 
Huacheng suddenly became very good. Could it be that Huacheng was 
angry because of this? Not because of anything else, because he saw 
dangerous things, but he took it up indifferently? 


If this is the case, he really does not know what to say. For a long while, 
thank you for your pity: "Well... I won't." 


Listening to his sincere dedication, Huacheng seems to be satisfied, 
slightly nodded, turned and walked forward. Thanks for your 
compliments: "Sanlang and so on!" 


Huacheng stopped to look back. Thank you for a long time, only to 
whisper: "...you, you too. If you see something dangerous, I don't touch it, 
don't touch it. Don't touch anyone, okay?" 


Wen Yan, Huacheng slowly raised his mouth. Thanks to this sentence, a 
little nervous, unconsciously smiled, and saw Huacheng take a step closer, 
is about to talk, and suddenly heard that he is not far away: "What ts this 
stuff?" 


Half Moon Road: "It seems to be a person." 
Ruan said: "It's true! But how can people become like this?" 


Huacheng and Xie Pity looked at each other and walked in the direction of 
their voice. Thanks for the pity: "How is it?" 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 165: Yingxiang 
keeps the saint born 


He and others entered the courtyard of a family, probably want to see if 
there is a well. Xie pity stepped into the yard and said casually: "The 
houses on this street are all very good." 


Huacheng Road: "The copper furnace is located in the Imperial City of 
Wuyong National Center. This place is very close to the copper furnace. It 
means that it is very close to the Imperial City in two thousand years. It is 
also a rich place, naturally high-altitude, because most of them live here. 
Valuable, rich people." 


The well is indeed a bite, but the scene at the well is terrible. Seven or 
eight people were kneeling at the well, as if the dying person was dying 
and moved here, or broke. Going closer, thank you for your pity, saying: 
"This is not so much a person, is it more like a stone statue?" 


Of course, these are not living people, but they are not corpses, not even a 
shackle, but a gray "stone statue" that is extremely rough. 


Xie Li just wanted to go up and touch, and Huacheng looked at him at the 
side. He immediately remembered that the two had only agreed on the 
strange things that did not touch the danger and forcibly held back. Then I 
thought about it again. Is there anyone who has nothing to do with so many 
stunned stone statues? It should be a person, but somehow it has become 
like this. 


The door of the family opened wide. He looked out into the room. He saw 
two people lying on the floor of the house. The posture was distorted and 
hugged. Although the face is vague and I can't see the expression, but with 
the action, I can feel the fear of these two people. There is still something 
in the middle of the two, and it looks like a baggage, and then look closely, 
thank you for your pity. 


That should be a baby. 


Things are clear. Thanks to the pity: "The outside are the servants of this 
family, and the inside is the master family of three." 


Huacheng Road: "Well. After the volcanic eruption, the river flowing 
through the Wuyong River turned into a rushing magma. The residents 
living in the highlands were not burned by magma and fire, but they could 
not escape the volcanic ash everywhere in the air. Die." 


The overwhelming volcanic ash instantly wrapped their entire body, 
forming a hard shell on the surface, which saved the moment before the 
death and turned into a petrified image. At the moment of the end of his 
life, the husband and wife horrifiedly embraced their lover and children 
and became one. 


Of course, the ancient well had already been done, and he was not 
interested in studying the model of the dead. He went out to build a squat 
and continued to look for water. Suddenly, thanking the pity for a little 
strangeness, turned into the house and squatted next to the petrochemical 
image of the family of three. Huacheng also came in and said: "What do 
you want to see?" 


Thanks for the slightest brow, said: "I just think that they are a bit strange. 
These two adults are holding each other with one hand, but the other is..." 
The other hand, but placed on the chest, seems to hold tightly. what. 


Huacheng Road: "Do you want to see what they are holding in their 
hands?" 


Xie pity just nodded, Huacheng took a picture on the integrated 
petrochemical image, thanked and said: "Wait, this is not too much for 
their body..." However, Huacheng moves faster than him, this A family of 
three instantly turned into a pile of grayish white pieces. Huacheng 
whispered: "Do not worry too much. People are already dead, and the 
remains are gone." 


There is nothing in that pile of debris. These "stone statues" are actually 
hollow. 


Also, although the volcanic ash on the surface layer forms a hard 
protective shell, the corpse wrapped inside will eventually rot and 
decompose. After the rot is complete, only the gray shell on the surface is 
left. 


Those who have lived will eventually die, but those who have never had a 
life will live forever. 


Pieces of volcanic ash shells contain some uncorured fabric and jewelry on 
the owner's body, such as rings, earrings, necklaces, etc. Xie Li felt that the 
couple were not likely to catch these gold and silver jewels before they 
died. They were picking and picking them inside, and Huacheng picked up 
the same thing from the ground and handed it to him. Thanks: "What is 
this?" 


Huacheng Road: "This is what they are holding in their hands." 


It was a pendant, a sparkling gold piece and a bone-like ornament. There is 
a pattern on the gold piece, thank you for gently wiping off the ash on the 
top, and watching it for a moment, said: "Flooring and defensive?" 


This gold film is actually a picture of the sky. Gold is the sky, and agate is 
the star. It is the so-called "following and punishing" phase, which is the 
phase of the phoenix star in the heart. 


The illusion star has always been regarded as a war and a star of death, and 
the confession and loyalty are even more ominous signs, especially the 
ominous signs of the lords, emperors and other leaders. Why do you want 
to portray such a picture of heaven? On the jewelry? 


No, this should not be jewelry. Thanks for looking for a while in the empty 
shell fragments, I found two other identical pendants, a total of three, even 
the small baby in the couple's arms, how can the general jewelry be 
prepared in three? Thanks to pity: "Is this not a talisman?" 


Only the amulet will make people have the urge to hold on to the moment 
before dying, and pray with the last hope in fear. Huacheng Road: "Exactly. 
I also dig a part of this city. Many petrochemicals have found this amulet." 


Xie pity said: "Wu Yong people believe in their princes, then this should 
be the amulet of the prince. But why do you want to paint this? Does the 
Prince have anything to do with the confession?" 


Huacheng Road: "Because the day he was born, the heavens are confusing 
and punishing. Therefore, the Wuyong people will refer to him by this 
heaven." 


Thanks to the pity: "How did Saburo know?" 
Huacheng turned over the gold piece and smiled. "Write it." 


Sure enough, the reverse side is engraved with a line of text. Huacheng 
pointed out to him and said: "The meaning of this line is ‘Ying Yingshou, 
the saints are born.’ Now in our eyes, it’s ominous to be stunned, but not 
necessarily two thousand years ago.” 


Thanks for touching the line of words, a heart slowly sinks. 
Because, the day of the day he was born, it is also a confession! 
Is this a bit too clever? 

Xie pity stood up and said: "Let's go to the temple." 


The two walked side by side and walked along the long street. He and 
others have found nothing in this area, and they have followed up. There 
are many horses and horses on the street, some are resting on the side of 
the road, and some are overturned on the ground. Also scattered scattered 
to see some petrochemical people lying on the ground, different postures, 


most people hide at home to take refuge, this is homeless or passers- 
by who can't come home. The shackles and struggles of the moment before 
death were preserved, and everyone walked through this strange crowd. 
Huacheng refers to the pity, what are the rich merchants' houses, and 
which are the places where the banquets are fun. Thanks for the pity: 
"Sanlang, Wuyong State has been ruined for more than two thousand 
years. Before that, there was no biography of the world. How did you learn 
the words?" 


I can't always learn hard from time to time. How can I have a doorway? 
Huacheng Road: "It's not too difficult. My brother can see that there are 
some Wuyong texts, which are very similar to the current text." 


Thanks to the pity: "Yes, the words "Uuyong" are very similar to the 
present." 


Huachengdao: "Yes. So these two words are one of the earliest Wuyong 
texts I have learned. There are some like this, mixed in the sentence, you 
can infer more new words before and after. There are also different 
meanings. But a few." 


Cheering nodded, Huacheng continued: "Then, those characters that appear 
more frequently. For example, these two." 


He pointed to the two buildings on the street and said: "It is obvious where 
this is. The words on the signboard are different in front and the back is 
the same. So, you can determine what the last two words mean, not the 
restaurant. There are many ways to eat in the restaurant. My brother still 
wants to hear, I will tell you one by one." 


It turned out to be the case. In fact, there are people in the world who can 
use their own efforts to find out who has passed through one thing without 
any help. Thank you for your pity. 


The Wuyong Temple is still the most atmospheric building in the city. The 
group of people came to the front of the temple and did not go in. They 
suddenly said, "What sound?" 


Hey, hey. Far from coming, far away, thank you: "Mouse?" 


Huacheng Road: "Not a normal mouse. However, if there is a mouse, it 
means there is water nearby." 


Entering the temple, this time, there is no residue on the wall. As soon as 
you look up, you can see large and large murals with bright colors. 
However, this time, the murals are more than one, but left, center, right, 
and three! There are three walls, one for each! 


Everyone came to the first mural and looked up. I saw Prince Wu Yong 
sitting in the clouds, and the whole body was golden. But his face was 
grim, his left hand was holding a light, the halo was a hill with a flame; 
the right hand was five fingers, and the palm was moving forward, 
seemingly waving. 


Below is a palace. There are more than a dozen people standing in the 
temple. The dress accessories are gorgeous. Each person has different 
movements, some open their arms, some armor pulls the bow, and some 
are excited to point to the distance. 


The details of the picture are complex and the content is very wide. After 
watching it for a while, I turned my head and said: "I want to talk about 
the meaning of this painting I understand? 


"The widow of Wu Yong’s left hand holds a small volcanic eruption, 
indicating that he told his dreams to the people below. The gesture of his 
right hand is obviously a negative posture, it should be What is rejected." 


He said: "What is it that refuses?" 


Thanks to pity: "That depends on the movements of this group of people. 
This palace is in the world, magnificent, it should be the palace. This 
group of people should be the princes of the Wuyong Kingdom. This open 
arms, look at the posture Is it more than 'expanding' and expanding? This 
depends on what is in his hands." 


Everyone took a closer look, and what he took in his hand was a map. This 
cockroach can no longer be familiar with it, saying: "Expand the 
territory!" 


Thanks to pity: "Yes. And these generals, dressed up, seem to have been 
ready to go, to be armored. There are people next to them to guide them. 
You see, their movements are very obvious, it seems to say: 'Go there, 
fight there.’ 


"So, the meaning of this painting 1s easy to understand--comprehensively: 
Prince Wu Yong told his ministerial dreams to the ministers in the palace. 


Once the volcano erupted, the consequences were extremely serious. The 
disaster of extinction. The territory of the country will not be enough, 
because the volcano is at the center and the important city pool will 
disappear. So how to solve it?" 


Huacheng Road: "If your own site is not enough, go to occupy someone 
else's territory." 


Thanks to the pity: "Yes. Therefore, the ministers proposed to open up the 
territory and attack neighboring countries. 


"But, Prince Wu Yong did not agree to do this. So, his right hand, put on a 
gesture of rejection." 


After the first frame was solved, everyone came to the second wall. The 
color of this mural is much more gloomy than the other two, perhaps 
because it depicts the situation of strangling on the battlefield. 


In the battlefield below, the blood flowed into the river, and the soldiers of 
both sides could not be beaten. Xie Pity can tell which side is the soldier 
of Wuyong State, because their armor is the same as the generals in the 
previous mural. The Wuyong soldiers looked fierce. They put the enemy's 
head under their feet, the body was picked up on the scorpion, and they 
threw their arms and thighs, and they were **** and cruel. Other soldiers 
smirked and reached out to the arms. And the woman, the horror of war. 


There was a cloud over the battlefield, but there was a glimmer of white 
light in the dark clouds. Prince Wu Yong poked out half of the body from 
the clouds and saw the scene below. The look seemed to be angry. He 
stretched out one hand and put down a lot of golden light. The Wuyong 
soldiers at the office were all taken up. 


The meaning of this picture is better than the previous one. After bowing 
for a while, he whispered: "It seems that the generals and the ministers did 
not obey the advice of His Royal Highness, or sent troops to attack the 
neighboring countries. The soldiers killed too much and bullied the old 
and weak women in other countries. The Prince found This matter, very 
angry, once again intervened to prevent the atrocities of Wuyong soldiers." 


Hearing, whispered: "It's moving. But to be honest, if you must have a 
country's life, you can't help but choose a country. The soldiers are in front 
of the battle, not hacked to the enemy on the battlefield, maybe you have 
to give this first. His Royal Highness is dying. You may not want to fight 
for such a monarch." 


Thanks a few times, and a little helplessly said: "General General said, 
hey, it makes sense." Huacheng sneered a little. He said: "So, the volcano 
is going to break out. What should the Prince of the Crown plan to do? You 
can’t let your nationals die." 


Thanks to the pity: "Look at the third one, it should be solved." 


The people finally came to this last mural. This pair of murals formed a 
strong contrast with the color of the previous pair, and it became very 
bright and full of light. However, thanking him for seeing it at first sight, 
he was shocked and widened his eyes. 


At first glance, said: "Heaven, is this the way Wu Yongtai thought of? Ha, 
the courage is really big enough. I admire." 


On the third mural, the bottom is painted by Wu Yongguo, and the 
Wuyong River flows across the earth. The Prince and the four guardian 
gods are also on the screen. However, these are not the main points. The 
most striking and central part of the whole picture is a bridge. 


A white bridge was pushed up by Prince Wu Yong and his four guards. The 
people on the ground were rushing to the bridge with a smile. 


This Prince Wu Yong actually created a bridge of heaven and wanted to 
extradite people to heaven! 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 166: Ying 
sacred sage is born 2 


Thanks, I can’t help but see it. He said: "Is it OK?" 
Huacheng said: "Why not?" 


A few people looked at him. Huacheng Road: "Isn't it going to point the 
mortal to the sky? He just wants to temporarily put the Wuyong people 
near the Imperial City to the sky. When the volcano erupts, the dust settles 
and then puts it back. Why not?" ” 


He said: "Don't say it is so easy, but you don't know it. It will cost you too 
much. How many people do he have to go up?" 


Point, in fact, is to use their own mana to "raise" the mortals who have 
been picked up by themselves, for their own use. Otherwise, if there is no 
limit, the various priests will not fight desperately to bring people to 
heaven. The emperor counted the three palaces and six courts, and the 
generals counted their entire army. 


Huacheng Road: "From the remains of the remains, the entire Wuyong 
country is about 100,000 people. There are tens of thousands of people 
near the Imperial City." 


Thanks and whispered: "Although it is hard, but ... barely fight, it may not 
work." 


Ruan said: "Even if there are tens of thousands of people, there is never 
any sergeant who dares to order so much. If this is the case, it is difficult 
to say whether he is courageous or stupid. It is also unbelievable." 


Thanks to the bridge on the mural, I couldn’t keep my eyes on it. The face 
of the white prince under the bridge and the face of the four guardian gods 
are more and more strange in his eyes. The more they look at the face of 
himself and the four national teachers, the more they think of the 


confession, which seems to be reincarnation. The story made him want to 
know what would happen next, but he felt that he was already faint. 


He didn't dare to look at the mural again, turned his head and said, "Is it 
water?" 


Half a month dragged the road, said: "The brother went to find." 


She is talking about jade. Thanks for looking at the closed eyes, and for a 
moment, he said: "I see, then we go to the copper furnace, and the generals 
will stay here." 


After all, it is a person, and it is inconvenient, and I don’t know what is 
waiting for them. I looked down and looked at it. "Oh, I agree. But don't 
tell him what the reason is when he is in front of him. This child will 
understand. I will tell him about it." 


Thanks to the pity: "The general is relieved, this I save, or I will not say 
that he did not wake up." 


After all, I have been a young Wushen who has a good future in heaven. 
Now, if I can’t keep up with the team, it’s inevitable that it’s not a taste. 
However, if you do something wrong, you have to accept punishment. The 
taste of exile is just like this, and you can only suffer. 


Several people stayed in the temple and discussed it for a while. Xie pity 
said: "What about jade? Why haven’t you come back so long? Have you 
not found water?" 


Huacheng is staring at the few dead butterflies that inhabit his fingertips. 
Those silver butterflies have come in handy, and now they have returned to 
him, collecting and accumulating energy. He looked up slightly and said, 
"It won't be so long." 


Thanks to pity and vigilance, stood up and said: "I will go and see. General 
General is watching here, Saburo with me?" 


That is naturally to be with him. Therefore, Xie pity left Ruo evil and let it 
form a circle of protection. The two left the temple and walked deeper into 
the underground city. 


There are quite a few houses and messy things on the road. Thanks to the 
pity, I looked at the jar that was very pleasing to the eye. The flower city 
seemed to be funny, saying: "What do you do?" 


Thanks to pity: "If you find water later, you can bring a little back to 
General Xiao Yan." After all, he used to get rid of the tattered, could not 
help but patted the jar in his hand, said, "Say, this is still a thousand years 
of antiques. It." 


Huacheng laughed and said: "If you like this kind of thing, go back to me. 
I have a few pieces, you see if you have any good intentions." 


After a scent, the two faintly heard the sound of water. After a short time, 
thank you: "Here!" 


There is a dark river underneath. Thanks for putting the pot that came in 
the water into the water and scrubbing it hard. The millennium ash has 
been condensed into a thick layer of shells that can't be washed away, but 
it can also be used by brushing off the surface dust. He used this jar to fill 
the water, bowed his head, and just thought that he would take a drink too. 
He was watching and watching the flower city around him, but he said, 
"Don't drink." 


Xie Li has put his face close to the jar, listened to him, and wondered: 
"What?" 


At this moment, suddenly there was a voice saying: "It's hot." 
Only two of them were present. Where did the third voice come from? 
Thanks for the subconsciousness, looking at the sound, and the sound is 


actually from the jar in his hand! 


He slammed his head down and saw a pair of tiny scarlet dots in the jar, 
staring in the water and staring at him. 


How to look, this is also a pair of eyes! Is it difficult for someone to hide 
inside? ! 


At the moment when the eyes were looking at each other, the thing 


slammed into the door of thank you. " " The first splash of water, 
Xie pity eyes fast, on the spot, the cans were thrown to a few feet, hit the 
wall, "When he!", the millennium antiques opened the flowers, and the one 
hidden inside Things fell to the ground and instantly broke into the 
darkness. Under the rush, thank you for not seeing it. I only thought it was 
a big group of dark things. "What is that?" 


Huacheng stopped in front of him, thanked and said: "Is there something 
in the jar before?" And why would you say "hot"? In the water, shouldn't it 
be cool? 


Huacheng Road: "No, it is specially swimming in from the water. There 
are often things in the underground river that swim in groups, so don't let 
your brother drink this water." 


Thank you for your pity: "Would you let General Xiaoxi casually drink 
it..." Suddenly, he had a cold on his back and said, "Who?!" 


At that moment, he heard someone who coughed far away. 


That is definitely not his illusion, and immediately God is on alert. Soon, a 
wave of whispering whispers spread. The two men’s red and white in all 
directions, lit up and surrounded them in the center. Huacheng Road: 
"Don't worry. Not people." 


Thanks for thinking: "It’s not that talents need to worry about it..." 


Listening to those whispers, he distinguishes what those people’s voices 
are saying: 


"Cough and cough..." 


"It's so hot and hot..." 


"I am dying of me..." 
"WOO WOO WOO WOO...... 
"I want to be suffocated...who is there..." 
"Can't move, can't move!" 


These sounds are small, but they are clear and painful, as if they were just 
a small ant, and they drilled into the ears. Xie pity just had to put his hand 
on the heart, and suddenly heard a voice sternly said: "His Royal Highness, 
His Royal Highness Prince!! Help me, save me!!!" 


When I heard the last sentence, thanking me for a burst of creeps, the 
illusion of the moment is calling for myself. And Huacheng waved his 
hand, and thousands of dead butterfly slammed openly, and rushed to the 
pair of red and shiny eyes! 


Silver Butterfly silver light everywhere, illuminating the countless things 
whispering in the dark. They are really not people, actually - mice! 


Huacheng took him and said: "I said, there are a lot of mice here. Go!" 


Thanks to pity and walked and said: "Is that a mouse? How do I look more 
like a cat..." 


Really, the mice are bigger than the kittens. The whole body is black and 
black like a steel needle. A pair of small red eyes are shining in the 
darkness. Many of them are climbing on the wall, staring at them, in their 
mouths. Also speaking the human language, it is very strange. After the 
silver butterflies rushed up, they smothered them. The red and silver light 
flashed in unison, and they could not see the battle, but they also knew that 
the fierceness was fierce. Thanks to pity: "Where should the jade be 
dragged to where they are?" 


! 


Huacheng said: "It’s not so waste. It should be dragged by something else.' 


Listening to the first half of the sentence, thank you for your slightest 
relief, and the latter part of the sentence was raised again. He said: "The 


mice are so big, they just have to count, how are they still so much? What 
are they eating so long?" 


Huacheng Road: "Simple. Nature is dead. These are corpse rats." 


It turned out that when the city was covered by volcanic ash, large animals 
such as people and cattle, horses and sheep were nowhere to be avoided. 
However, the rats got into the deep underground and survived the air and 
stored food deep in the hole. . 


After the dust settled, they re-drilled the hole and ran around in the city 
that had become a **** to find food. However, everything was destroyed, 
either buried in magma or covered with volcanic ash, ruining many things 
and not finding food for a long time. 


Until one day, they smelled of rancid smell. 


The rancid smell is transmitted from those humanoid petrified images. 
Some of the bodies were wrapped in volcanic ash shells. The shells were 
thinner and began to rot, and they smelled out of the corpse. 


As aresult, the hungry red-eyed mice swarmed around the fossils, biting a 
small hole in the surface of the stone statue, drilling in the hole and 
feeding on the body inside. 


The most subtle things are often the easiest to survive. The bodies of the 
dead people were wrapped in fossils. Their fears, anger, unwillingness, and 
other strong emotions were also wrapped in them. The rats ate their bodies 
and ate these emotions together. Speaking to people and saying what they 
wanted to say at the moment before they died did not say anything. 


Thanks for the pity: "It turns out so, so they only say those words. I 
wonder why this is the case..." 


Who knows, Huacheng suddenly said: "What do you say?" 
Thanks for your pity, said: "What did I say?" 


Huacheng stared at him and said, "What did they say? What did you hear?" 


Xie pity said: "Isn't you heard of Saburo? It is ‘hot,’ suffocating, ‘not 
moving’, ‘helping me’...” 


However, Huacheng did not answer, he reacted. 
wrong! 


Those corpse rats repeat the slang of the Wuyong people before their 
death, and of course the Uyghur language. 


So why can he understand Uyghur? ! 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 167: What is 
the vinegar ghost king? 


Huacheng learns Wuyong's writings by inferring his own learning ability. 
He can solve the meaning of the words, but because the people who have 
not survived read the words to him, he can't put the sounds and words on. 
Therefore, he could not understand the whispers of those corpses. 


However, I have never heard of the thanklessness of Tonglushan. What can 
this explain? 


When Huacheng saw it, he knew what he was thinking. He immediately 
said, "Brother, don't be nervous. I will repeat those words now, you can 
listen." 


Thanks for your pity: "...good." 


Huacheng has a very good memory. As soon as he leaves the place where 
the corpse is gathered, he immediately repeats one side clearly. Cheering 
staring at his lips, he heard a bunch of unhappy, slow, and strange 
pronunciations. 


This series of strange words and sounds are confusing, and they are spit 
out from the mouth of Huacheng. The tone 1s low and beautiful, and it is 
very beautiful. For a moment, I will pray: "I don't understand." 


This is very strange. The corpse rats spit and said that he could understand, 
and the retelling of the flower city at the moment was not bad, but he 
could not understand. However, the moment he understood could not be an 
illusion. 


Huacheng continued: "When you hear those voices, you understand them 
in an instant and understand them naturally, right?" 


Thanks to pity: "Yes. At the time, I didn't have a process of translating in 
my mind." So I didn't realize that it was another language. 


Huacheng picked up his arms and thought for a moment, saying: 
"Understood." 


Thanks for your pity: "What do you understand?" 


Huacheng said: "What you understand is not Wuyong, but the emotions of 
these dead." 


Thank you for your understanding. Huacheng further said: "It is said that a 
long time ago, some people heard the voices of these deceased, 
understood, and remembered, and then, unknowingly planted this memory 
to you, infected with this emotion. about you. 


"Because that person knows Wuyong himself, he has already done the 
‘understanding' step, so you don't need to understand Uyghur. These sounds 
are always hidden in the depths of your mind when you hear them. At that 
moment, you can be directly brought to that mood." 


Xie Li felt that this statement is possible, and said: "But the question is, 
who will pass these memories and emotions to me? When did it pass to 
me?" 


After a pause, he murmured: "...national teacher?" 


Huacheng said: "Undecided. Brother, you have already assumed that your 
master is a Wuyong. But have you ever thought about a problem, if so, 
then they should also use Uyghur to communicate in the mountains. Why 
not?" 


This is not difficult to explain, thank you: "Because the Wuyong country 
was destroyed two thousand years ago, that is, in the last two thousand 
years, if they have been active in the world, the use of more must be after 
The language of the person. When communicating, it is natural to use a 
more sophisticated language." 


Huacheng took his shoulders and added a little more tone. He said, 
"Brother, don't always lead yourself to think about it." 


Thanks to this, I turned back and said, "Okay. Then, Saburo, what kind of 
conditions do you usually need to plant some memory and emotions to 
others?" 


Huacheng Road: "Two conditions: First, you are absolutely trustworthy, 
undefended, and willing to guide this person if necessary." 


Thinking for a moment, thank you for having a choice. Huacheng 
continued: "Second, you have no resistance to this person, and you are 
completely suppressed by the other side, and you have deep fear. Brother, 
you think about it, those people you know over the years. What are the two 
conditions?" 


Thank you for a while, hesitating for a moment, slowly said: "Jomo, there 
are three." 


Huacheng Road: "Well, which three?" 
Thanks to the pity: "The first one is the national teacher." 


Although he loves his parents deeply, he has no defense, but he is deep in 
his heart, but he is different from his father. Therefore, he cannot say that 
he is willing to guide his father. However, the national teacher who 
introduced him and taught him all is in line with the conditions of this one. 
This is expected, Huacheng Road: "So, the second?" 


Thanks for your pity: "Junwu." 


He admires Jun Wang, does not have to repeat it, and also meets the first 
condition. Huacheng’s look is not taken for granted, but it is not evaluated. 
“Well, the last one?” 


Thanks to the pity: "The third one is not in line with the first condition, but 
is in line with the second one." 


The flower city is clear. He sighed: "...white no phase?" 


Xie pity closed his eyes, nodded, and put his hand on his forehead, saying: 
"...I don't want you. Although it seems to everyone, I have never revealed 


this, even if it is the original letter and admiration, I have not said 
anything that is frustrating, but I actually..." 


But in fact, deep inside him, he is deeply afraid of this thing. 


For a while, he even went to the point where he heard the name and 
chilled. However, thankfulness never dared to be seen by others. Because 
he is all hope of fighting against white, if he is afraid, will others be more 
desperate? In that case, it will be completely paralyzed! 


Of course, everything is much better now. Huacheng took his shoulders 
tighter and said: "Nothing. It is not shameful to fear something." 


Xie pity smiled and said: "It's just not brave enough." 


Huacheng said: "If you don't care, you don't have to be brave. You don't 
have to be so harsh on yourself." 


Hearing words, thanking me for a slight glimpse, Huacheng followed: "So, 
are there only three people?" 


Thanks for your nod. That is to say, the person who instilled the memory 
and emotions of the Wuyong people when the volcano erupted was among 
the three. If the flower city is thoughtful, slightly frowning, and thankful 
for a while, suddenly said: "More than." 


Huacheng turned his head and said: "What?" 


Xie pity took a breath and said: "Actually, not only these three people, but 
also the fourth person. This person meets the first condition. However, he 
must have nothing to do with the memories and emotions of these 
deceased." 


After hearing this, Huacheng turned completely and said: "Oh? Why do 
you see it? Your Highness and this person are also deep-handed for many 
years?" 


Thanks for the years, not counting, deep dating... He thinks it is. But he 
was embarrassed to say this, but he was vague: "In any case... he may be 


the person I trust the most, more than trusting my master and Junwu." 
Huacheng Road: "How is this?" 


Xie pity and cough, a little embarrassed to say: "Speaking of it. Because... 
If I have made a big mistake, or what a big scorpion, what I first thought 
of, it must be him... Moreover, with my master and the emperor, it is not 
the same kind of trust..." Before he finished, he found that the expression 
of Huacheng was a bit strange. He took the words and hesitated slightly, 
"Sanlang?" 


Huacheng was only fascinated, and he took a look at his eyebrows and 
said, "Oh. Nothing, I was thinking about something else. Is Your Highness 
really trusting this person?" 


Although he usually raises his eyebrows to be arrogant or teasing, it is not 
very natural. 


Xie pity nodded: "Well... is there any problem?" 


Huacheng bowed slightly and finished the silver wristbands of the cuffs. It 
looked like a casual innocence: "There is no big problem. However, my 
personal opinion. My brother should not trust others so easily." 


Listening to him, Xie Pity is a little bit unacceptable. He did not hear who 
he was talking about, but he did not dare to expose it further. It was just 
"Oh..." 


After a while, he couldn't help but ask: "Samsung doesn't ask who this 
person is?" 


Huacheng Road: "Well? Me? Since my brother said that he trusts him and 
believes that he has nothing to do with this matter, then there is no need to 
ask." 


Thank you for your pity, and then Huacheng said again: "However, if my 
brother is willing to say, Saburo is willing to listen." 


Although his words sounded decent, if he prayed to tell him this time, he 
would be a bit embarrassed, as if chasing someone to ask who you trust 
most. It’s really indifferent to thank you for being polite. At this time, the 
deadly butterflies who had been bitten by the corpse and the corpse rates 
flew back. After a fierce battle, the silver butterflies flew a little low, as if 
they were slightly tired. Xie Li quickly greeted him, reaching out and 
catching a very small and small silver butterfly, said: "It's hard!" 


He could reach out with his hand, and the butterflies were slow in the air. 
The next moment, like smelling a scent, rushed toward him like crazy. 
Thanks for holding the little silver butterfly, I was almost shocked. 
Huacheng coughed without a light weight, and the butterflies condensed 
and flew honestly toward him, falling on the silver wristband between his 
arms, blending with the silvery butterfly on the sculpture. 


The two continued to search for jade. After a while, Huacheng suddenly 
said: "Not a wind letter." 


Xie Li has begun to think about other things, heard a word, said: "Ah? 
What?" 


Huacheng Road: "The man that my brother said." 
Xie pity immediately waved: "Of course not!" 
Huacheng’s eyebrows pumped and said: “It’s not a love.” 


Thanks to the forehead, a drop of cold sweat, the hand is placed faster, 
said: "This is even more impossible! However, how did Saburo suddenly 
ask again now?" 


Huacheng smiled and said: "I thought about it and suddenly felt that this 
fourth person was the most suspicious. So, just in case, please ask my 
brother to tell me, who is the most trusted person you have for many years, 
can you?" 


" " 


Thanks to the smile on his face, there is always a kind of instinct that this 
smile is very fake. Just as he took a deep breath and prepared to speak, the 
faint silver light on the silver butterfly of the pathfinder suddenly 
disappeared. 


It was surrounded by darkness, and the flower city quickly took the hand 
of thankfulness and walked to the side of the street. The pity was not right, 
and the voice was lowered: "Samuro, is there something coming?" 


Although he suddenly fell into the darkness and could not see things, he 
followed the pace of the flower city and accidentally turned into a family 
to hide. The voice of Huacheng said in his ear: "Come." 


In the darkness, a very strange sound suddenly sounded. 


9 9 


Although it is still far apart, but for a moment, it is extremely heavy. 
Every time it rings, the sound is approaching a large section, and the speed 
is amazing. Xie Li always felt that the sound was inexplicable, and he had 
never heard of it. When the sound approached not far away, he looked out. 


really! On the street of the underground city, there was a girl with a 
wedding dress. 


Although the girl was wearing a wedding dress, her clothes were ragged 
and sullen. Although she has a long face and a beautiful face, she has no 
trace of anger. The green faint fire of her head is reflected in her pale face. 
She is holding a child in her arms, her face is pale and pale, but she 1s still 
more angry than her, obviously a living person. 


Huacheng Road: "See old friends again." 


It was actually a female ghost Xuan Ji and Guzi! 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 168: WISP 
hood lock password 


They even came to Tonglushan! 
Thanks to the pity: "Is there a millet here, is it also graceful?" 


Huacheng Road: "Look at the green light on the top of her head, no doubt." 


Millet seems to be a little afraid of Xuan Ji, and she does not dare to move 
in her arms, but it may be uncomfortable for Xuan Ji’s body to be cold. He 
quietly twisted twice. Xuan Ji said: “Don’t move!” 


As soon as she spoke, her face muscles became more and more distorted 
by the green fire of the wildfire. WISP is also one of the signs of ghosts. 
This taste is really terrible. Chery feels that any female ghost who tastes 
normal and cherishes her image will refuse to put such a group of green 
ghosts on her head. Needless to say, absolutely She asked her to wear it. 
The green fire and the red skirt form a landscape with great visual impact, 
which is even more frustrating than forcing the disciples to wear ugly 
uniforms. 


Guzi tearfully said: "Sister, I drank that water, my stomach was a little 
uncomfortable." 


water? Thankful, I couldn't help but squeeze a sweat. The groundwater is a 
group of corpse rats swimming in groups, although it 1s not poisoned, but 
the child's resistance is weak, and drinking may cause diarrhea. Xuan Ji 
didn't like the type of little child at first glance, and he didn't have any 
patience with him. He said: "Forbearance and forbearance. It is already on 
the way back." 


Their backs are dissolved in the darkness ahead. No need to say a word, 
thank you and Huacheng quietly keep up. Not long after, they followed 


Xuan Ji, turned a few intersections and transferred to another street. At the 
end of the street, there is a room with extraordinarily gorgeous rooms. 
There are people coming from inside, and it must be the destination. Xie 
Li and Hua Cheng were secretly hidden in the dark, and they first turned 
over the roof of the house, looking through the cracks and looking down. 
Sure enough, the graceful spurs sit in the middle of the hall of the big 
house. 


He moved more than a dozen petrochemicals and headed towards him, 
because these petrified people were lying on the ground and seemed to 
vote for him. He enjoyed the "worship" while smirking a **** arm. There 
are five or six peasants sitting in the corner, and one of them is buried with 
a head that has no sense of presence. It is the introduction of jade! 


He really was cut off by grace. Although there is no rope restraint on 
everyone, there is a green fire in the top of the head. Look closely, the 
different groups of wildfires and Xuan Ji's heads are different in 
appearance. They still have five senses, their eyes are squatting, their 
expressions are insidious, as if they are an evil villain, they are closely 
monitoring the people below. 


Thanks and whispered: "The fire is strange." 


Huacheng said: "That is the graceful ghost lock. After being stared by the 
fire, if they dare to escape, they will scream and scream, as long as the law 
is activated, the hostages will be burned to death in an instant." 


Yu Rongzheng was eager to relish, and suddenly heard Xuan Ji in the 
outside: "Adult, I am back." 


He suddenly threw his hand and wiped the blood of his mouth. Thank you 
for your pity, what is this move? Afraid to be seen? Grace is also 
embarrassed to let others see the day he eats? 


Xuan Ji has not come in yet, let go of the millet first. Millet rushed in and 
ran to the front of the room, pointing at him and yelling at him: "Hey, he is 
stealing something bad!" 


Grace: "No!" 
Guzi said: "I smell it! I will have bad breath when I eat it!" 


Grace calmed a few breaths, I must have heard the **** taste of my 
mouth, irresponsible, annoyed: "Mom! Xuan Ji! Why did you suddenly 
bring him back? I am not saying that when I eat, you put Did he take it out 
for a while?!" 


Xuan Ji walked in and said: "He was uncomfortable after drinking the 
water, and I brought it back first. Adults, please don't let me take the child 
anymore, I don't know how to deal with him!" 


Graceful, blaming: "What! You are not a female ghost! How can a female 
ghost not like to bring a child?! You are not qualified!" 


Xuan Ji said: "This is not my own child!" 


Guzi grabbed the graceful clothes and said: "Hey, you don't want to eat 
those things anymore, it's not good..." Grace was annoyed by him and 
shouted: "Go out and go out! Don't be annoying here, little children." I 
also managed to get out of the adults and go out to play!" Millet had to go 
out to play with mud, and looked at the people in the corner of the room 
before leaving. After he left, Xuan Ji said: "I am really puzzled by adults. 
If you suspect that this child is in trouble, why should he take him on the 
road? It is eating and drinking, crying and being sick, if not The mountain 
monster on the road carried us a ride, I am afraid that it is still being 
dragged down." 


Grace and laughter said: "The cheaper son has to call me to scream and let 
him scream. I am, nonsense, of course, because I have to eat this little silly 
**! Such a big child is fresh and tender, It’s delicious without raw food! 
Oh...” 


Xuan Ji said: "So why are adults not eating yet?" 


Graceful eyes green, said: "You don't understand this! Let's kill and kill 
again! The best to stay until the end! And we still have so much food, not 


in a hurry!" 


Speaking of depositing food, Xuan Ji stared at the jade and said: "I think 
this new person 1s very suspicious and very suspicious. Do you ask him 
what is his origin?" 


To express the hatred of Huacheng, if you know that the jade is a 
subordinate of Huacheng, would you not take the first one to take him? 
But I heard the sadness: "Ask the question. This kid is also following the 
rain teacher to help." 


The sense of existence and personality are not prominent, and sometimes 
it is also a good thing. The average person may not associate the jade and 
the blood and rain. It seems that the successful lie has been filled with his 
own identity, and Xie Pang has a sigh of relief. Xuan Ji’s face has changed: 
“Is the Yushi’s face already here?!” 


Graceful said: "No. This kid is like us, inadvertently found this dungeon, 
the rain teacher has not found us yet. Fuck!" He suddenly screamed, "How 
is this rain teacher so difficult? All the way to chase and beat, we hurt to 
drill into the ground to hide! Do not catch them to eat in several kinds of 
land in the village? As for such a small gas? Still priests, I know that the 
gods in heaven are not a good thing! Narrow-minded!" 


He is always so arrogant, first grasping the peasants who have cultivated 
the land well, but also blame others for not being open to the public, not to 
give him a few more to eat, and he can’t help but feel the itch. Xuan Ji 
said: "Would you like these people to put them down?" 


Grace feels that this is very faceless, blink of an eye: "Do not let! I have 
already eaten half, and now it is useless to put it back half. This beam has 
already been formed! Or don't grab it at first, or eat it." It’s over! ’m ina 
hurry, I’m burning them all, I don’t think too much!” 


Xuan Ji said: "I didn't expect it to be like this. Rain Master is not like this 
in the past. It is said that everyone can be bullied. I thought that even if 
Yushi Township was robbed, I will not be able to make a sound when I 
swallow, and who knows that I have such a big trouble, I can’t afford it!” 


Xuan Ji actually knows the rain teacher, and it seems that he still can't 
afford it. It seems that I know it when I was a human being. Thinking 
about all kinds of legends, thank you for your whispering: "Is it a general 
of the Yushi Kingdom?" 


Huacheng Road: "My brother guessed it well. It is." 


Thanks and pity: "But isn't it? Rain Master is a descendant of the Yushi's 
national royal family. His status is honorable. Xuan Ji is only a general, 
and the next minister, why dare not look down on the royal family? And 
also said that everyone can deceive. '..." 


At this time, Grace said: "That he is a rain teacher, wait for the ghost king 
to enter the copper furnace to cultivate, become a world-shattering, heaven 
and earth, all have to worship at the feet of Laozi, kneel down to eat the 
mud at the feet of Laozi! I want to demolish the ghost city and sink the 
Blackwater Island. Even if Junwu wants to give me face, I am polite to 
Laozi, hahahahahaha..." 


Listen to him blowing the cowhide, Imagine the infinite scenery of the 
future, thank you for feeling nothing but laughing. Huacheng is not even 
interested in laughing. Grace also said to Xuan Ji: "At that time, I will cut 
the cockroach's ** for you to play, so that he can only be a slave to you." 


Hearing that name, Xuan Ji clenched his fingers, and there was a trace of 
anger on his pale face. "No! As long as the adults promised to hand him 
over to me, Xuan Ji is extremely grateful!" 


When it was not involved, Xuan Ji looked like a normal female ghost; but 
when she mentioned the general, she thanked her from the face and saw 
the shadow of Junshan’s crazy female ghost. She actually pinned this 
ridiculous hope on the sadness, and only explained it with love and 
wisdom. Thanks for raising his head, said: "Sara, attracting jade and these 
farmers are in the face of grace, how is it?" 


Of course, they can go in directly, screaming grace and Xuan Ji, but those 
farmers and jade are hostages, and they are a rogue. If you hit him, he 
burns a person, but passively, they are like him. It’s also possible to rush a 
fire and burn it. Huacheng is not in a hurry, said: "The Ghost Lock of 
Grace is a password. First, find a way to unlock the unlocked password." 


Thanks to the pity: "Who is going to set? How to set it? We certainly can't 
help." 


Just after asking, the eyes of the two men fell in the same place, and the 
mud outside the house was playing on the mud. 


After a moment, thanked the pity: "No, it is too dangerous. Grace has 
always remembered to eat the millet, in case he was seen by him..." 


Huacheng said: "His mind can't see it and say that if he wants to do this for 
the child, let's start by saving the child. Brother is better to worry, this 
child is so close to the grace, there is Without being assimilated by him, 
his mind will not be abnormal." 


Thanks to pity: "I just want to see the reaction of the millet, it should not 
be. So... let's try?" 


So, Huacheng opened his fingers and flew out a small silver butterfly, and 
flew down. 


Grace and Xuan Ji continued to talk in the room. Guzi sat in the mud on 
the ground outside, painted an adult, and took a small man. Suddenly, he 
saw a butterfly with a faint silver light flying. Come over, suddenly looked 
up and widened his eyes, was about to "wow" out, but listened to the silver 
butterfly issued a thin voice, said: "Muzi don't talk, I will be gone when I 
talk, it is me, remember me ?" 


If the millet is still yelling, the flower city will let the silver butterfly 
fascinate his mind with light. However, the millet stunned his mouth and 
was obedient. He said: "Remember. It is the voice of the broken brother." 


"..." thanked the pity. "Hahaha, it’s good to remember. Yes, yes, it’s the 
broken me. You come quietly to the side, don’t give it... don’t show it to 


99 


you. 


Guzi nodded and stood up, and was about to walk quietly to the side. The 
room was suddenly found, and shouted: "Hey! Don't run and hear no! Dare 
to go here, the big mouse ate you! Come back!" 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 169: WISP 
hood lock password 2 


The silver butterfly flew to the side. Millet squinted and replied: "I... am 
going to pee!" 


Grace said: "Children are more than a lot of urine!" Ignore it. Millet 
touched one side and whispered: "Broken brother, broken brother!" 


Thank you on the roof: "...just call the long man. It’s a bit strange to break 
the brother. Hahaha... Millet. The few people you caught, very poor, and 
they are subordinates of other people’s families, other owners will If you 
are chasing you, can you help them?" 


Guzi nodded: "I know! It is the man who rides the fairy house of the **** 
cow!" He grabbed his hair and said, "I want to let it go... But I am sick, he 
said he must eat human flesh. In order to get sick, eating human flesh is a 
normal thing. I still don't understand. When I grow up, I will teach me to 
eat. But I don't think it is very good..." 


. this is not so good! 


Thanks for your pity and good fortune, and staying with you for a long 
time, Millet has begun to faintly a little embarrassed, and then let him be 
taken down, maybe he is used to it, accepting the idea of eating human 
flesh is nothing, busy: "Very bad! Eating human flesh will cause a very 
serious illness. The ghost of the person being eaten will wrap you and you. 
You are not ill, he just refuses to quit, you have to find a way, you must not 
Let him eat again, or you will become a child!" 


Millet Road: "That, what to do!" 
Huacheng thanked him: "Brother, I am coming." 


He said a few words to the silver butterfly, and the millet listened over 
there, trying to remember. After that, Huacheng looked up again and 


thanked him: "You must first take Xuanji away." 


Inside the house, Xuan Ji said to her, "I still look at this person very 
suspicious. He said that he is a subordinate of the rain teacher, but he is 
full of ghosts. I don't even tell the truth. I will ask him again." 


Seeing that the millet sneaked away, the gracefulness just took the 
opportunity to carry over and continue to pick up the hand, with a vague 
saying: "With you." 


Don't look at Xuan Ji's encounter with the cockroach and go crazy. At 
other times, she is more suspicious than sad, after all, it is a woman. And 
Guzi is still a little afraid of her, she is present, it is easier to reveal the 
stuffing. Thanks for your nod and said: "How to lead?" 


The two looked at each other and once again agreed: "The general." 


Thank you for your hands and fingers: "There is no way. Please sacrifice 
yourself for the time being. General, everyone will thank you after you are 
saved." 


Huacheng laughed and said: "Thank you brother." 


Said, the silver wristband's ornamentation also turned out a dead butterfly, 
flew to the ear of pity, came a man's voice, it was awkward. It turned out 
that before the flower city left, a few silver butterflies were left, and the 
voice over there was passed. Thank you for listening for a while, 
whispered: "Can you. Let's take a look at it, just pick these few words..." 


Xuan Ji back to the window, staring at the jade. Yin Yu’s face is honest and 
honest: “I am in charge of helping the hungry ghosts who have no way to 
go. When they wandered to the door, I gave them a meter and sent them to 
the road, so they only Ghostly..." 


The rest of the captives are the real peasant farmers. Although there are 
such reliefists in Yushi Township, nature is definitely not a jade. I know 
that this person is talking nonsense, but no one 1s snoring. Grace said: 
"Oh! I am also a hungry ghost, how can I not help me? Only after eating a 


few people will chase after death, what kind of generosity?" Xuan Ji did 
not agree, said: "The world is so hungry More, can you get over it? It’s a 
gesture." 


At this time, a silver butterfly that had caught the light flew silently 
behind her, flashing and hiding. All the captives saw this scene, but they 
were still very calm, and they all pretended to be ignorant. Xuan Ji also 
asked, suddenly, faintly heard a man's voice: "... In this case, first put this 
... you still ... no? Come ..." 


The original sentence of this paragraph is "If this 1s the case, first roast the 
mouse. Do you still have a snake? Come a few." 


When Xie Li heard this sentence, his heart was shocked and sympathetic. 
There must have been a corpse crawling over there and being beaten to 
death, as an ordinary mouse, ready to add food to the shack. This mouse is 
eating no problem? It seems that I have to go back and stop. However, 
after being blurred by a few words in the flower city, the effect is very 
fascinating. It seems to be a bit interesting, and it seems that I can't hear 
anything. Xuan Ji was shocked and turned back. However, the silver 
butterfly was very flexible, and it didn't shine. When she turned back, she 
flashed a flash and hid. 


Xuan Ji was shocked and asked questions about the prisoners: "Have you 
heard anything? Did you see anything?" 


Leading jade took the lead and shook his head. The captives also shook 
their heads again and again, and they all looked like an honest Pakistani. 
The mouth is full of blood and looks back: "What have you heard?" 


Xuan Ji was slightly confused and said: "I seem to... I heard the voice of 
you." 


Graceful words: "Ah? You listen to it? I didn't hear it." The silver butterfly 
is close to Xuan Ji, and others can't hear the voices from it. Xuan Ji 
suspected: "Is it? I always think...he may be nearby." She sighed for a 
moment and sighed. "Maybe, this is the so-called telepathy... adults, or I 
will go out again." Look?" 


I didn't expect it to be so smooth. Xie pity secretly clenched his fist and 
smiled at Huacheng. Huacheng also smiled at him. Who knows, but calmly 
poured a cold water, said: "Hey! Have you just gone out for a trip? What 
telepathy, I think it is auditory hallucination. You have nothing to think 
about him eight days, of course, it is easy to imagine. listen." 


It seems that Xuan Ji was a little convinced by him, and he gave up the 
plan to go out with suspicion. Although he failed, Xie Pity was not 
discouraged, because he also cut a few words and left it. Xuan Ji is about 
to continue to ask questions about jade, and once again heard the 
screaming voice: "...you are this little fool! Come over, I will teach you." 


Immediately, it was the voice of a young girl: "...1 have been a general, I 
have done it once, I have experience, or am I coming..." 


Of course, it’s a trick to guide the half-month how to eat the corpse and eat 
it for the little cockroach. However, falling into Xuan Ji’s ear is not the 
case at all. The original dissatisfaction and speechlessness turned into 
tenderness and helplessness. Depression and refusal turned into shyness 
and sorrow. Xuanji screamed, his eyes were covered with bloodshot eyes, 
and the fires above his head were soaring, such as the bonfire in her heart. 
Usually blazing, she tore her own hair: "It's him!!! Yes, it must be him, he 
is here, I sensed it, my heart sensed him!!! Oh! You again So, what woman 
is this time? I want to kill you!!!" 


She screamed and “jumped” out with two broken legs. Graceful shouting: 
"Hey! Xuan Ji? Mom! The leg is broken and still running so fast! For the 
kind of horse|Ma, as for it!" 


Thanks to the back of Xuan Ji’s stumbling and twisting and twisting, he 
felt slightly sad and pity. Huacheng probably thought that he was worried 
about the safety of several people in the temple. He said: "Don't worry. 
The dead butterfly will lead her in the opposite direction. Even if she finds 
it, she can't enter the circle if she is protected by evil spirits. We are here. 
Quick fix." 


Xuan Ji retired, and it was the turn of the millennium. He stood up and 
rubbed his muddy hands on his buttocks. Xie pity is still a little worried, 


said: "Is it really okay?" 


Huacheng whispered: "Brother, believe me. This trick can't be done, but 
the next step is to choose another method. If you can't talk again, you can't 
talk again, and then slowly try to annihilate his wildfire." ” 


When Guzi entered the house, Grace had already eaten the blood on his 
hands. When he saw him, he said, "Son, come over and give you an old 
man!" 


So the millet went up and gave him a lame. He groaned for a while, he 
said: "Hey, these people in the corner, why are they not tied to the rope, 
but they dare not move?" 


This question, grace can come to the strength: "Oh, of course, I am afraid 
that you, I am afraid that my legs will be soft and can't move!" 


" " 


The eyes and mouth of the millet are round and round, saying: "So 
powerful?!" 


Grace's vanity has been greatly satisfied, said: "That is! Listen well, today 
I will tell you how powerful I am. How can I see the fire? As long as I 
make a decree, I will take a look at them. They will be burnt to death, they 
are of course afraid of me! Also, there are two little devils, you 
remember." Millet chicken nodded like a glutinous rice, gracefully said, 
"They are called Huacheng, a nickname black water, 1s two There is 


nothing to do with the stuff, the villain has to go to the dog|__, in fact, the 
name is not true. What is the meaning of the name? Do you understand? I 
teach you, this is an idiom, meaning that they seem to be very powerful on 
the surface, in fact, on the strength , can't compare with me!" 


Guzi seems to understand, "Oh..." 


Grace said: "They are not lucky? If I have their luck, I am ten times more 
developed than them! Wait! This time, I must pass this pass, and I will 
swollen them soon. Face! No one wants to look down on me anymore, only 
I can't look down on others!" 


He was very angry and shouted. Although Guzi didn't understand what he 
meant and what he meant, he still gave his face to the ground: "Hey, you 
can!" 


Thanks on the roof, he covered his face. 


The high theory of grace is really confusing. It’s also a cousin to think of 
how to say it. It’s really shameful. I’m on Huacheng Road: “Sanlang, 
this...he...1...” 


Huacheng smirked a little and said: "Brother does not have to care. He has 
too many verses, this is just the tip of the iceberg." 


To be honest, since the ancient times, men under the sun have not loved 
bragging. A gust of wind blows the handkerchief of the Fragrant House 
girl into his hand. When he turns back, he says that he is being swayed by 
the country. The name is entangled in love; the little wife who gave the 
emperor’s little wife’s grandson’s grandfather’s shoes Going out will 
inevitably become an important manager of the emperor’s family, and his 
status will be important. Therefore, men who do not like to blow are very 
valuable. 


The man who loves bragging, first, likes to blow to women, and second, 
likes to blow to his son. I still remember that when she was a child, his 
father often told him all kinds of great achievements in government affairs 
in various concealed or unconcealed ways. It is because of this that he was 
convinced that his father was a wise and wise monarch. Later, when I 
found out that it was not, I would have the feeling that "you are just like 
this". The difference was great, which led to the anti-inverse heart after 
growing up. Thinking of this, Xie Shi shook his head and couldn't help but 
laugh: "Why would I compare my sadness with my father?" 


It’s really inexplicable. Probably because I like to raise myself in front of 
my son. However, whether it is his father or others, at least in the normal 
range of bragging, this is already a shameless and straightforward. It is no 
wonder that He Xuan, who has always been low-key, is very disgusted with 
him. When he meets, he finds an excuse to beat him. Xie pity only feels a 
bit strange, how can I only listen to others and not listen to him? Is it a 
change? 


However, thanking the pity seems to understand a little bit why the grace 
has not yet eaten the millet. If you brag about a normal person or a person 
with a little experience, the other party may not be able to buy it. Even if it 
is superficially attached, it may still make people feel less sincere, or they 
may be too greasy. See the reaction of the gang under the hand. . The 
praise of Guzi is different. The sentence is from the heart and soul. He 
really thinks that he is the best in the world! 


Grace hasn’t been so hearty for a long time, and finally satisfied, 
threatening: “Do you want to obey? Do you obey, I will also wear a 
wildfire for you!” 


Millet really was afraid, and quickly grabbed his head and said: "No, I 
don't want to wear... yes, hehe." He remembered the flower city and 
thanked him for his grievances: "This, this green fire is put on." You can't 
get it?" 


If he asks to wear it, can you still get it? Grace doesn't necessarily tell the 
truth, but he asks, "Can't you get it?" The question with doubt is of course 
Huacheng and Xie. Grace on the spot kicked a petrified man's hollow head, 
saying: "Fat! I want to lock the lock, I want to solve it! Look! Look at this 
one to show you!" 


When he finished, he pointed to a farmer and said: "Dog | Day of thanks!" 
Thanks: "..." 


Flower City: "..." 


The wildfire on the head of the farmer went out and jumped up. However, 
after a few steps, the sound of the screaming, and spit out a green fire from 
the mouth, covered the head of the farmer. Grace laughed and patted the 
head of the millet: "How are you, my son, I am amazing?" 


Thanks to the sweat on the roof, the flower city seems to be cold but the 
voice is authentic: "This waste is a bit more thorough." 


His finger joints seemed to be buzzing, and Xie pity said: "Fortunately, it's 
okay. It's easier than imagined!" 


Originally, they also taught a lot of questions about the response of the 
millet. It seems that they are not used. It is no wonder that Grace has not 
been grateful for the past. It turned out that it was not a change of 
sexuality. Instead, the phrase that most often slandered him was set to 
unlock the password, and the emotion was deep. At this point, the two do 
not need to hide, immediately broke the roof and jumped down! 


A loud noise, grace scared to fall from the chair: "Who?? Who?!" Look at 
it: "Dog, dog..." Probably wanted to think, but think of this is a key 
password, busy Covered my mouth. The farmers in the corner said: "He 
just seemed to shout out the password, or can we try to see if we can 
unlock each other?" 


"Yeah, it’s slamming, although it feels like I’m sorry for this, but others 
are not here, it should be nothing!" 


Huacheng raised his eyebrow slightly and looked at it. The jade forehead 
shed a cold sweat and said: "This... no matter if he is not there, I suggest 
that you should not shout this sentence, but then it must be more serious 
than now..." 


Over there, Grace grabbed the grain and blocked it in front of him. He 
changed his mouth: "Thank you for the dog and the dog! You don't want to 
face! Eavesdrop! Despicable!" 


Thanks to the pity: "What is the dog's upper body?" 


Grace is proud again: "But, hey, even if you know the password is useless! 
Do you want to blame yourself? Flower City, can you not export?" 


Wen Yan, Huacheng's face was gloomy, and the phalanx rang twice. Xie 
pity did not notice, and inexplicably, said: "Yes. What is this?" After that, 
he did not hesitate to repeat the password five or six times. One person for 
the first time. The prisoners already knew that he was the one in the 
password. He couldn’t help but erect a thumb in his heart: "Dare to be 
insulted, true man!" 


However, the ghost locks on their heads did not unravel. Thanks for the 
subtle discoloration, graceful laughter said: "Ha ha ha ha ha! Be fooled! 
Tell you, it is not my own unlock is useless! You are white! Hahahahaha..." 


A silver butterfly flew over the eyes of the millet, his eyelids smashed 
twice, hit the shelf, and soon fell asleep. Grace is still laughing and 
laughing, suddenly turned into a circle by 18 sleeves, embedded in the 
wall, blurted out: "Dog | Day of thanks!" 


After the end of the battle, the group of wildfires on the head of the jade 
disappeared, and the jade jumped up and the body was withdrawn. I know 
that I accidentally said that I slipped my mouth and gargleed immediately. 
Thanks and pity: "It’s okay to come and come, don't suppress yourself, 
release your nature, continue to linger." 


He said so peacefully and sullenly, he rolled up his sleeves and grabbed the 
grace. This situation really didn't know what to do. Grace screamed 
exhaustively: "You fight! Kill me and I won't say this again!" 


But listening to the sound of the flower city, Sensen said: "I am right." 


Looking back, Huacheng showed him a smile that could not be faked 
again, and it was fleeting. 


The next moment, his head was taken three inches underground. 


" " 


Huacheng pulled his head out of the ground|Exit|come, and he said, "You 
dare to do this to me! I am going out, I want to burn everyone out! 
Everyone goes to the end! Dog flower city! Burn up !" 


It seems that this "dog flower city" is a burning password that is paired 
with another sentence. However, after he shouted, he did not hear anyone's 
screams, opened his eyes with doubts, and saw that the group of farmers 
were standing opposite and watching him. Graceful: "What is going on 
here? Why are you still not dead? Come to die, give me to die! Who will 
give you the lock?!" 


Thanks for your pity: "You yourself." He said, pointing to a silver 
butterfly. The silver butterfly is making exactly the same screaming: "You 
are white! Hahahaha..." 


It turned out that this dead butterfly completely recorded and copied the 
sound of grace, including his password, and he could unlock it infinitely if 
he slammed it. Huacheng is cold and succinct: "You go on the road 
yourself, and the number is not accompanied." 


It was another crit, and he was shot into the heart of the earth by his palm. 


After the smoke broke out slowly, the farmers all went up and looked at it 
for a while, saying: "This... is this still coming up?" 


The jade jumped out of the deep pit shot by Huacheng. After a while, he 
jumped up and held a green tumbler in his hand. He said: "The city owner, 
His Royal Highness, the green ghost is recovered." 


The green tumbler licks his mouth, flips his eyes, spits his long tongue, as 
if he is laughing at someone, and seems to be daring with his life. In short, 
the taste is very bad, and the children will be thrown aside. I don't know if 
his own traits have decided to become like this, or Huacheng deliberately 
turned him into this. Huacheng Road: "Do not give us this kind of thing. 
You can take it far away." 


Leading Yu Road: "Yes." 


To be honest, Xie Li did not want to take this thing and hug the millet on 
the ground. Several dead butterflies flew from the other side and landed on 
the back of Huacheng. He looked down and said, "We have to go back to 
the temple." 


Thanks for turning his head, said: "Is there something wrong with the 
temple?" 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 170: Resentful 
sorrow 


Huacheng raised his hand slightly and held up the silver butterfly and sent 
it to Xie. The silver butterfly fluttered, and he heard the groaning sound 
coming from there: "Little fool, have you heard any strange noises?" 


Probably because of the long time of the flower, even if it is clear that he 
does not have the meaning for half a month, it also makes people feel 
subtle. Half a month, boring: "I am not an idiot... I heard it. This sound is 
so strange, I think it should not be the generals who are coming back." 


of course not! Because, that is clearly the voice of Xuan Ji’s broken legs 
on the ground! 


After a few moments, I heard that both of them were silent. Instead, it was 
the voice of a woman who was "hey, hehe, hahahaha...". 


The laughter echoed in the empty dungeon of the empty dungeon, and then 
passed through the silver butterfly and turned it around. It was a bit noisy, 


and it was more terrible than in the ear. Nature is finally seeing : 
ecstasy hate the confession of Xuan Ji laughing. 


Thanks to the pity: "Isn't the silver butterfly directed her in the opposite 
direction?" 


Huacheng said: "She is smarter than she thought." 


It turned out that Xuan Ji was chasing the dead butterfly all the way, and 
the speed was very fast. He ran to the end of the street and saw nothing. 
After all, she was also a female general who had been on the battlefield 
and immediately found herself being led. It is reasonable to say that she 
should return to her face immediately after she noticed it, but she was bent 
on finding a shackle, so she ran directly in the opposite direction and left 
her boss's grace behind her head. 


Xie Pity is inexplicably funny, and it is difficult to say a word. He quickly 
took several prisoners who escaped from the birth to rush to the Wuyong 
Temple in the center of the town. The female ghost Xuan Ji waited for too 
long, and she could imagine how crazy a distorted face she was at this 
moment. I was probably shocked by her, and I was shocked for a while, 
then said: "You are..." 


Xuan Ji issued a sneer. Who knows, for a moment, he said: "Who are 
you?" 


Xuan Ji hated the sound and trembled: "You... are you deliberately mad at 
me? You actually asked me who?" 


Thanks for giving me a cold sweat on my forehead, saying: "Isn’t it a 
general? Is he deliberate or really unrecognizable?" 


Huacheng Road: "I am afraid the latter." 


After all, if the legend is true, then the beautiful women who have been 
handed over over the past few hundred years have said that they have 
thousands of them. How can they remember each? Moreover, it is still a 
good old man hundreds of years ago. Moreover, the last time with the 
Junshan ghost bride, he was also handed over to Xiaoyan, and he did not 
come out at all, and did not look at Xuanji. 


Xuan Ji murmured to himself: "Yes. You are mad at me. I am not fooled. 
Oh. I want to lie to me and say that you don't remember me, I want to lie 
to me, huh, huh." 


After muttering, her voice was sharp again, and she asked: "Hey, who is 
this little monk? You don't always have a high vision! Why, this time, I 
want to change the taste?" 


Half month: "?" 


a Wagon 


Although both of them sent out the voice of doubt, the tone of this 
resentment seemed to evoke the memory of the embarrassment. He 
frowned slightly and said: "Xuan Ji? How did you become like this?" 


Thanks to this, I remembered that Xuan Ji at this time must be the 
appearance of a pair of shawls. The eyes are the red color of the evil 
spirits, a red wedding dress, the hem is dirty, crawling slowly and 
sinisterly like a crocodile on the ground. What they only saw, it was 
almost like this, it is impossible to connect such a heroic woman like her. 
Xuan Ji listened to him and asked him to come. He said: "Why did I 
become like this? You actually asked me why it would be like this! Not all 
of your faults, I am not for you!" 


Huacheng has been listening to it. Any slight movements can't beat his 
ears. "She is rushing to the protection circle." 


Thank you for your pity, don’t worry, said: "If the evil can hold it." 


Sure enough, there was a scream from the silver butterfly, and Xuan Ji, 
who had swooped up, must be bounced off by Ruo, flying out a dozen feet. 
The voice of the embarrassed said: "This is really a magic weapon for His 
Royal Highness. I will also refine one day." 


Thank you for your pity: "If you know how to refine it, you won't say 
that..." The thoughts haven't disappeared yet, and he listened and shouted: 
"What are you doing?! Stop!" 


Xuan Ji also shouted: "You want to hide inside!" 
Booming! 


Thanks for the pity, he said with a sigh: "What is that sound? What is it? 
What did Xuan Ji do?" 


Huacheng always walked side by side with him, saying: "She pushed the 
temple down. The stone zenith collapsed." 


It turned out that Xuan Ji was bounced off by the protective circle of Ruo, 
unable to enter the circle, and lost his temper, and collapsed the entire 
temple. Thanks to the pity: "The generals are all right? Xiao Yan and half a 
month are also there!" Especially in the shackles, he is now a mortal body, 
don't squash. Huacheng Road: "Nothing. I will protect them." 


At the moment when the stone top collapsed, he smashed the meat shield 
and kept the people around him and the half moon. Thanks for a sigh of 
relief, said: "That's it. The protection circle can't be broken." 


Over there, smashing a slate crushed on his own body, angered: "What 
crazy are you doing? You just can't get into the sky!" Xuan Ji was laughing 
and laughing. Road: "The generals are careful!" said: "Wh..." 


This series of reactions almost happened in an instant. In this chaos, Xie 
Li heard the sound of the sword passing through the chest. There is no 
doubt that it is a sword. He said: "What happened?! Who smashed the 
general? The protection circle was broken? Impossible... Wait, sword?" 


For a moment, he finally understood the purpose of Xuan Ji. 
That's it! 


Xuan Ji smiled enough, cold and authentic: "Who said that I want to come 
in?" 


Another sudden sound came out and laughed: "Hey, look at who is this? 
Your old friend, Xuan Ji, is coming!" 


Rong Guang! 


It turned out that Xuan Ji’s collapse of the temple was not mad at the 
moment, nor was it intended to enter the circle of protection. Her purpose 
is to let the fallen stone tops smash the two clay pots that have been placed 
in the circle for half a month, and release the ghosts sealed inside them to 
make them break through the inside of the protection ring! 


After Rong Guang escaped from the jar, he couldn’t wait to break the 
protective circle that was surrounded by evil spirits. He seems to be 
pulling him out, but Rong Guang is not willing to live and die. He wears it 
firmly on him and says, "You can't think about it! Let's die!" 


Bite the teeth: "Half-month national teacher! Another jar is all right?!" 
Xuan Ji and Rong Guang inside and outside the pinch, if there is one more 
grind, it is completely finished. Half Moon Road: "No! The carving is still 
inside!" 


The situation was critical, thanking the pity and feeling anxious, and was 
about to speed up the pace, but Huacheng suddenly stopped. Thank you for 
your pity, and turned back: "Sanlang?" 


Huacheng inhabited another dead butterfly on the back of his hand, and 
seemed to be quietly telling him about new changes. After listening to it, 
he looked up and said, "Don't worry about my brother. I see, we can't go 
over it." 


Over there, Rong Guang’s possessed Mingguang sword passed through his 
chest, and Xuan Ji was like a red gecko. He grabbed his boots and climbed 
up his thighs. Her dress and the fires on her head are all completely 
maddening, and she said, "You...!" 


Xuan Ji muttered: " us: Vive 


Her two broken legs and the whole body were completely distorted and 
wrapped around her body. In this position, I really don't know if I want to 
kill him, or to hug him. Suddenly, her eyes lingered in the back of her 
back, thinking that the last time was this cold and indifferent descendant 
who kept himself under the mountain, biting his teeth: "This little hybrid!" 


Seeing that a paw is going to go down, halfway through the other hand, 
suddenly the other hand intercepted her. These two wrists are also pale, 
and they look at it for a half-month. When Xuan Ji sees other women 
around him, he burns his heart and says: "I haven't asked you for the life of 
this little monk. Come on the door!" 


After she finished, she grabbed her hand on the half-moon head. However, 
half a month is not the little bride who is waiting for her to slay, and Xuan 
Ji’s other hand has been intercepted by her. Xuan Ji was a female singer 
before her death. She knew that many men would be self-proclaimed than 
the power. The ordinary female and female ghosts met her only when they 
were beaten. I didn’t expect this little girl to look thin and weak. Blowing 
down, but the strength of the hand 1s terrible, 1t seems to be stronger than 
her, not only lock her double wrists, but also let her move, the two eyes on 
the pair, Xuan Ji is even more surprised. The little girl's eyes were full of 
killing and enthusiasm, as if it was a sandstorm, reminding her of the 
battlefield, a guilty heart, and waved openly. Half a month caught the 
shackle, borrowed her power to turn over a few feet, fluttering and 
floating, said: "Let the generals open!" 


Rong Guang said in Mingguang Jian: "Hey, you are still so beautiful. Fu, 
see you? Two female ghosts are jealous for you! Hahaha..." 


Xuan Ji’s entire body is twisted around the body like a blushing giant, and 
the ten fingers lock the throat. The cold voice: "You little lover is a bit of a 
skill." 


He coughed up a blood and said: "I don't! She is not my lover." 


Xuan Ji said: "I still want to deny it! Not your lover, why did she let me let 
you go?" 


Ruan said: "If my aging mother is here, she will also ask you to let me go. 
According to what you mean, is it that my aging mother is also my lover?" 


It’s strange to blame him for being contemptuous, and there’s nothing to 
call someone a little fool. Xuan Ji is now willing to believe him, and he 
has to go crazy: “How? Don’t you admit it? Don’t you call it very? You 
didn’t have it before. Does Xinhuag directly admit it? I don’t care about 
my heart at all. Tell me frankly, do you know how painful I am? How can I 
not admit it now? Is it that you are afraid of death? Or do you really like 
her? Let me move her a finger?!" 


In the distance of the temple, thank you for seeing this scene far away. I 
feel that I can't stand and watch it any more. I look back: "Sanlang, or else, 
let's go to save people first?" 


Huacheng smiled and said: "My brother doesn't have to worry, someone 
will replace us. Moreover, even if we go up now, Xuan Ji will not let go." 


This is also true, the hostage is in the hand, how is it convenient. Yin Yu 
and several farmers also looked very nervous and said: "Yeah, I feel that 
the female ghost is going crazy because of love and hate." "I don't think 
so, she can't get it. Come and eat. Guazi?" "Give me another thank you." 


Thanks to the pity: "How do you still have the mood to eat melon seeds 
now?" 


Everyone said: "This Highness, have you not eaten a lot?" 


"Ah?" Xie Pui found that when I saw God, I accidentally took over a 
handful of melon seeds handed over by the other person. I had already 
finished it. I grabbed my forehead and said, "This is really rude... ” 


Over there, you can’t stand it anymore. “Xuan Ji, can you think of 
anything else in that area? It’s been so many years, can we get together and 
do it? Why are you?” 


Xuan Ji grabbed his neck and used his hands to force him. The apricot eyes 
were round and said: "No! I want to gather well, you want to get together! 
No way!" 


He sighed: "You really are... nothing has changed. It is because of this that 
we can't have good results." 


Xuan Ji violently pushed his face to his eyes and angered: "I am like this? 
What am I? I am not beautiful enough? You said that I am beautiful! I am 
not willing to give you the layout and secrets of the Yushi country." Is it 
your own rejection! I am not enough to love you?! You say no, I want to be 
strong, I can not even these legs! Who can love you more than I?! But 


what about you? These centuries You don't even look at me! When have 
you seen me?!" 


He pushed away the face she had brought up and said, "Because you know 
that you will be crazy if you see you, I will not come!" 


Xuan Ji grabbed the Mingguang sword that had pierced his chest and 
smashed it a few inches and pulled it out. He vomited a few big mouthfuls 
of blood. Xuan Ji’s eyes were beaming and he said: “Say! In the name of 
your priest, swear that you will always be me alone, and swear that you 
will never look at other women again. If you look at it, you will have a bad 
eye! ” 


Rong Guang also gloats: "Quickly say, you can get back a little life!" 


Ruan said: "Shut up! Fuck. I didn't expect that Zou did not die on the 
battlefield and did not die under the sword of the world, but died in the 
hands of a crazy woman!" 


Unable to get the answer he wanted, Xuan Ji was completely irritated by 
him, grabbing his heavenly cover. Thanks, I can’t wait any longer, and put 
my hand on the handle of the back of the heart: "Sanlang, I think this 
situation is a little critical, can you catch up with the people you are 
talking about? Can't catch up with me first!" 


Huacheng Road: "Catch up. Brother, this is not coming?" 
His voice just fell, and the arrogant Xuan Ji was condensed. 


She seems to have been fixed by someone, from the look to the action, all 
froze. She had been smashed back and forth five or six times by her sword, 
and the blood spit out of the ground, and in the darkness there suddenly 
came a burst of crisp hooves. 


Not too slow, answering. After a short time, a man riding a black cow 
appeared in front of everyone. 


The man riding the black cow is a Tsingi girl with a clear eyes and a calm 
look. Slowly approaching, slightly headed, as if I saw a long distance. The 
lips are all blood, and they swear, saying: "...the rain master?" 


The girl bowed her head and looked at him. Her gaze did not change. She 
smiled slightly and bowed her head. 


Xie pity was also shocked, said: "... Rain Lord?" 


Huacheng Road: "Yes. The current Heavenly Court is the Rain Master, the 
16th Princess Yushi of the Rain Masters, and the last generation of the 
Yushi Kingdom." 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 171: The last 
princess is in front of the palace 


Thanks to pity: "I have never had the chance to meet the rain teacher. I 
don't know if the rainmaster is a princess..." 


Over there, Xuan Ji gnawed his teeth: "What are you doing... Why... I can't 
move!" 


The rainman took his gaze back from the cockroach and replied: "I 
brought the rain dragon sword." 


Thanks for your pity: "Rain Dragon Sword?" 


Huacheng Road: "The sword of the town of Yushi is owned by the lords of 
the dynasties. It has been retouched by the rain lord as a magic weapon. It 
has a natural power for the rainmen. Xuan Ji is a rebel, fearful, guilty, 
natural. I can only do it." 


When the rain guard asked Xuan Ji to move, she couldn’t move any more. 
Rong Guangdao: "You can't move, I will come by myself!" He said that he 
would smash another sword, and he just stabbed in half an inch, a burst of 
red smoke exploded, and slammed through the chest. The long sword 
disappeared, and a small sword with a long index finger fell to the ground. 
Rong Guang angered: "What happened? How can I not move?!" 


Xie Li and others finally stopped looking and went out. Huacheng glanced 
at the bright light sword on the ground that looked like a toy. He smiled 
and said: "This is more pleasing to the eye." 


Rain teacher Wen said: "Let go, Xuan Ji." 


Xuan Ji’s hand began to take off from the throat uncontrollably, but she 
was unwilling, and her hands screamed: “I’m not letting! I’ve got my 
hand, I’m not letting it go!” 


Yu Shi said: "If you must grab something to be willing, why not throw you 
on the ground and regain it in your hand." 


After all, the power of the national sword was too strong, and Xuan Ji was 
suddenly pulled down and fell to the ground. She was embarrassed and 
distracted. "What qualifications do you have to teach me? Do you really 
think that you are the lord? I see you forgot how your lord came! I don't 
admit, I don't admit you!" 


The rainman groaned and shook his head slightly. On the side of the side, 
half a month, the opportunity to slam a can, rushed directly into the Xuan 
Ji, and quickly sealed! 


At this point, a messy source was finally conquered. Thanks for the pity, 
he walked to the side of the donkey and helped him. "Why is the general 
general okay?" 


He said: "I can't die...but, Your Royal Highness," he suspected. "I said, you 
won't come long ago?" 


Thanks: "...hahaha, how come?" 


He picked up the Mingguang sword that had been shrunk into a few inches 
on the ground, and looked at the things in his hand. He said: "Blood rain, 
flowers, your seal is not secure? It won't break again." 


Huacheng Road: "Crap. Unless you hold the hilt, enter the mana, and at the 
same time decide to release it, otherwise, in any case, it will not 
unintentionally unravel or unravel." 


Oh, this spit out a long breath. The farmers who escaped from the graceful 
place rushed up, such as seeing the aunt: "The Rain Master!" 


Several people turned around here. Thanks for the slightest sorrow, said: 
"The Rain Lord." 


The rain teacher has also come down from the black cow, holding the rope 
in one hand, owing the first return: "His Royal Highness." 


This ceremony, thanking the line of sight inadvertently sweeping her neck, 
a Slight glimpse, then said: "When the Xianle was a drought, I was thanked 
by the grace of the rain, the charcoal in the snow, I did not thank you in 
person, today I finally got what I want." It is a deeper ritual. The rain 
guard stood still, and waited for him to finish the ceremony, he slowly 
swallowed: "I think, if you don't let the Prince's Temple down this 
ceremony, you will not be willing to rest. Since it has been done, it has 
forgotten since then. Let's go." 


She speaks quietly, speaks slowly, and has a little smile, which is 
extraordinarily calm. Suddenly, one voice said: "Hey, humiliating? Want a 
woman to save, or a rain teacher! Hahahahaha..." 


The Rainmaster's look is unchanged, calm and still, but not very calm. The 
black cow suddenly spurted and squirmed, shaking his head and tail. 
Although it is not a rushing city, but Xie Pity also knows that the cow is 
angry when he sees red. He remembers the painful experience of being 
chased several times. He quickly stopped in front of the flower city, 
fearing that the cow would see the red color of the flower city more 
excited and at the same time Zhang Wen was posted on the little sword and 
sealed the mouth of Rong Guang. It’s not like talking about it again, so he 
touched his nose and politely said: “Thank you for the help of the 
rainmaster’s lord.” 


The rain teacher is also very polite, and he said, "Do your best." 


Half a month came over and pulled the rainman's sleeves and said: "The 
rain teacher is an adult, and my brother is hungry..." 


Huacheng looked up and said: "Go back to the ground first." 


The problem of food and clothing, it is most useful to find someone to 
solve in Yushi Township. Because the rain guards are farming, they often 
keep eating. Back to the ground, the night has passed, the sun has come 
out, the rainman took the seeds from the black calf, found the piece of 
land, sowed on the spot, and grew a small crop in a short time. 


A few hungry for a long time, thank you for thinking that the millet had 
not eaten well in the past few days and woke him up. However, the first 
thing after Guzi woke up was to ask him where he was, thinking that he 
had left him again, and he cried for a while, and he had to give him the 
ugly green tumbler. Guzi heard that this is his jealousy. If he is a treasure, 
he will not cry again, while holding a sweet potato while holding it. 
Thanks to pity, Huacheng, Yushi, and Sui are sitting on the other side to 
discuss the business. 


In front, I can see the copper furnace. Recently, I found that the mountain 
below has a large block of reddish red, as if the body is blood-stained, and 
the top is snow. Thanks to the pity: "If necessary, we are afraid to climb 
the snow-capped mountains. Not only the generals, but also the half-moon, 
the millet, these are to stay here, and can't go any further." 


While holding the medicine bottle to stop the wound, he shook his head 
and sighed: "The teacher is unfavorable and frustrated." 


This singular character is really a portrayal of him all the way. It is really 
bad luck and depressed. The rainman sat on the side of the pity, and 
thought a little bit, saying: "Your Highness, you are coming to the scene to 
make the devils and ghosts who are likely to become extinct. Then, there 
is one, I am afraid I need to pay attention." 


Thanks for the spirit, said: "What happened to the rainman on the road?" 
The rainman nodded slightly and said: "On the way, I saw a white boy." 


Xie pity gently "ah", said: "You said this on our way, many devils and 
ghosts are very afraid of him, we almost encountered. You saw him with 
your own eyes? How to get out? ” 


Yu Shidao: "Hey. The whole Guardian Law is very amazing. The boy has 
no entanglement interest. Otherwise, it is difficult to say what the result 


is." 


Thanks again, "How is he?" 


Rainy said: "The appearance is not clear, because he is wrapped in a 
bandage." 


Wrapped in a bandage? ! 


Thank you for your kindness: "Lang Ying??" 


frowning: "His Royal Highness knows?" 


Thanks to pity: "I am not sure." Immediately turned to Huacheng, asked, 
"Sara, Lang Sui is indeed in the ghost city?" 


Huacheng is also a dignified look. After a moment, he said: "Before, now, 
is it difficult to say. My brother can't help asking again." 


Xie pity will continue to confirm: "Yu Shi adults, you said this bandaged 
white teenager, is not in his early teens, or barely a little bigger, in short, 
is a very thin teenager?" 


Who knows, the rain teacher said: "No. The boy is about sixteen and 
seven, and his body is close to His Royal Highness." 


"Ah?" This is beyond expectation. He said: "16 or 7 years old? Lang Ying 
is not that big." 


Is it him? Based on the existing news, I can't guess anything. Hey, throw 
away the used bottle, and said: "In any case, I will enter the copper furnace 
at the end, and wait." 


After all, it is the Valkyrie, his ability to recover is very fast, a bottle of 
spirit is finished, and the serious wound has healed six or seven percent. 
At this time, the rainer slightly bowed his head and said: "Why didn't the 
generals have a sword?" 


I didn’t seem to expect that the rain teacher would ask myself questions, 
but I didn’t think how to answer it, but I finally woke up and ate the baked 
sweet potatoes, saying: “Hey, the general’s, the sword, the fold.” 


Shouted: "Eat your sweet potato." 


So I don’t talk. The rain teacher listened, thought a little, took off his own 
sword, and handed it to him. 


She didn't have any strange look, her manners and demeanor were very 
decent, but her face was slightly changed. It seemed as if she had handed 
over a poisonous snake and hesitated for a moment. "Thank you. But this 
is the national sword of Yushi Guozhen. I am afraid that it 1s not 
appropriate in the hands of a certain person." 


The rain teacher is gentle and authentic: "The rain teacher country has 
already been destroyed for a hundred years. The general is a **** of war, 
with a sword master, and now it is to stop the ghost king from being born. 
This sword is in your hands, and it is more effective than in my hands." 


He was hesitating for a while, but he was still politely refusing, saying: 
"You have thanked the rainmaster. You don't have to." 


Seeing the situation, the rain teacher is no longer stubborn. A few people 
chatted a few more words, and the rain teacher also asked if they had the 
news of the wind teacher. Thanks to the pity, the relationship between the 
two divisions was good. Shi Qingxuan often went to Yushi Township to 
eat, drink, and play. After the black water incident, he did not go again for 
a long time. The rain teacher also sent people to look for it, no fruit, no 
help. 


Everyone agreed that they would continue on the road when they were 
repaired. Xie pity walked a long way. I wanted to find a tree and lay down. 
The flower city didn't know where to find a pile of ropes and fabrics. Two 
swing beds were placed between the two trees. Two people went up. 
Enough, lying very comfortable. Lying for a while, thanking and praying 
for his own hands, strangely said: "Sanlang, what do you think the generals 
do not accept the rain swordsman's sword?" 


A martial art has no weapons, and is not hurrying to find one, waiting to be 
beaten? 


Huacheng also puts his hands on his hands and walks casually: "This kind 
of person, although like a woman, has not seen a woman very much. For 
someone who is saved, a woman, or a woman she knows before, she must 
be very annoyed and humiliated." In the past, the rain guard also took his 
descendants. He probably felt that the rain teacher was deliberately 
watching him jokes this time. How could he take the sword?" 


The two men’s swing beds swayed together. Thanks to pity: "Hey, it’s a 
mysterious self-esteem. Right, Saburo, I don’t know if you noticed it, 
there is an old wound in the neck of the rainmaster." 


Huacheng Road: "You can guess without paying attention. 'The princess is 
self-proclaimed." 


Thanks for the slightest rise, said: "Sure enough." 


Huacheng Road: "My brother can find out that the rain teacher talks 
slightly slower? It is also caused by old injuries in the neck." 


Thanks to pity: "Ah, I thought it was caused by personality. In other words, 
it is a princess, why do you want to be self-proclaimed? Xuan Ji said, 'You 
forgot how you became a lord'? Also teach people how to be happy, can 
How is it?" 


Huacheng also got up and said: "It’s a long story, a long story." 


It turns out that although Yu Shiyi is a descendant of the royal family of 
Yushi, the first is the daughter, the second is the palace, the status 1s not 
high, and the character is awkward, not good words, the fifteen brothers 
and sisters above The younger brother and sister below, which one is more 
favored than her. 


The Yudao State Royal Dojo is Yulongguan. According to the usual 
practice, the dynasty of the dynasties must choose a descendant of the 
royal family to send it to the Qing Dynasty, and pray for the good weather, 
Guotai and Min'an. It sounds like an atmosphere, but it is actually a 
bitterness, because the rain dragon view is a hardship method, and no 
servant is allowed to take it with ease. It used to be pushed and pushed. It’s 


really bad luck to buy a substitute for yourself. It is the turn of this 
generation, and there is no need to pick the pick. 


When I heard this, thanked Shake and shook his head. Although the same 
as the royal family, the same as entering the Royal Dojo, the experience of 
the Rain Master can be very different from him. He said: "It's no wonder 
that Xuan Ji's words don't really look like a rain guard." 


Huacheng Road: "Nature. Although Xuan Ji is not a princess, but also born 
a prominent, many pursuers, in the Wang Gong nobles than the rain 
teacher, more attention." 


However, now that Xuan Ji has made himself like this, it is no wonder that 
he can't stand the rain guard who can still grow the land safely. The rain 
teacher advised her to let go, and in her eyes she was afraid of the high 
winds. 


In short, since then, the rain guard has been in the Royal Dojo to clean up. 
Until a certain day, Yulong watched several guests. 


Xu Liguo and Yu Shiguo did not rip their skins at once, but there were 
some illusions and snakes before. In order to maintain a false peace, Li 
Guo sent several royals, generals and writers to the Yuguo State Banquet 
to visit the Royal Dojo of Yushi. On this day, the rainman went to clean up 
the tiles on the roof of the Taoist temple. When he came down, he found 
that the ladder did not know who was removed. 


Underneath, I saw a person who couldn’t come down and felt fun. Even the 
princesses of the Yushi Kingdom were laughing and laughing. Only a 
general of Li’s country laughed a few times and flew to take her down. . 


This general 1s naturally paralyzed. Thanks to the pity, I want to marry the 
general. This person is really quite awkward. Suddenly, a voice said: 
"Where is this virtue, wherever you go, you have to pee with the dog 
everywhere!" 


Thanks for a moment, he was pulled back by his malicious and vulgar 
metaphor. Looking back, he picked up the small sword that had shrunk 


countless times and said: "Yong General, when did you break the seal?" 
Come on, you really want to talk." 


Rong Guangdao: "Don't seal me! Let Laozi say! I have done a good job of 
what I have done. I know that I can't finish it for three days and three 
nights! He knows that Li Guo will soon want to play the rain teacher 
country. The seven princesses of the rain-stricken country are all 
fascinated by death and are jealous. Do you say that he is a wicked man?" 


It is really not kind. Who knows that you still smiled with me yesterday, 
and today I will ride the blood to level my home. Thanks a little pity, and 
said: "So, is the relationship between the rainmaster and the generals in 
the past?" 


Rong Guang said: "It doesn't matter. I have seen the rain teacher twice. 
This is too much for Yu Shiguo. I forgot the next day." 


This is not only the woman's face is fast, but the man's face 1s actually 
faster, but the consequences are different. A woman turning her face may 
end up with a few slaps of light and a few claws; and once a man turns his 
face, maybe your end is dead and there is no chance to complain. After 
Li’s reluctance to maintain false peace, he compiled a name in the 
division. He directly led the army to the front of the palace and forced the 
head of the rain lord to hide in the depths of the palace, guarding the last 
line of defense. But with a little effort, you can crush the crunchy 
protective shell of the palace like a snail shell. 


However, he did not crush it so easily, but had more considerations and did 
one thing under Rong Guang’s suggestion. 


The Lili soldiers arrested hundreds of death row prisoners, pretended to be 
civilians, and went to the front of the palace to ask the rainmasters to 
come out and scream three times, repent of their own fish and people, and 
confess their sins. In this way, the people were let go and no other 
members of the royal family were moved. Otherwise, they cut the heads of 
these people. 


He only gave the royals hiding inside for three days, three days, and killed 
one in a day; three days later, he rushed in to kill the royal family and then 
kill the rest of the people. 


Thanks to the pity: "Yong General, your move is really poisonous and 
beautiful." 


Rong Guang is not angry and self-satisfied: "I will be complimenting you 
when you are." 


Xu Liguo is a rainy country, and the reason is to sum up: "The rain lord 
lord ruling the government and ruling the people, I am incapable of 
accommodating the country, and the country is determined by the heart of 
the benevolence and righteousness to take the initiative to save the people 
of the rain-stricken people who are trapped in the heat." Very beautiful. 


If the rainy lord refuses to come out, then the lord is selfish, faint, and 
does not care for his own people. What is embarrassing is that the rainy 
lord has always declared that he "sees the people as parents", and the 
ruthless contrast between words and deeds will surely make the people of 
Yushiguo resentful and think that they have been deceived: "You Doesn't it 
mean that the people are like parents? Why do you want all the people to 
sacrifice for your royal family?! So, they hold the heart of the Yushi 
nationality, and they are scattered. 


After killing these "civilians", when the people of the rainmen are afraid 
that they will kill the city in the next step, they will announce that these 
people are actually posing as death row prisoners. They should have died, 
only to expose the selfishness of the Yushi royal family. True face and lies. 
Such a huge contrast can instantly appease the feared Yushi nationals and 
make them meek and incomparable. Then the process of incorporating the 
Yushi country into the territory of the country will be smoother. Because 
the people's hearts have already cooled. 


And if the rainmasters are really out of the cut, casually, it doesn't matter, 
they don't have to kill them themselves. What's more, both Yan and Rong 
Guang believe that the rain lord will never come out of sin. It should be 
said that no aristocrat will be willing to end his life after suffering such 


shame. Kneeling to civilians and enemy forces, self-identification, and 
then die? Dreaming! 


Who knows, just after a day, when the squad is preparing to kill the first 
batch of "civilians", the rain lord really came out. 


When the palace gate opened, the king of the country walked out with the 
sword of the kingdom of the country. He smashed three heads against the 
nationals, pulling the sword and smashing the blood. 


Xie Li has already guessed what happened, and said: "Is it a rainman?" 
Huacheng Road: "Exactly." 


Later, I carefully examined the palace people and other descendants of the 
royal family who were hiding in the palace at the time. Only then did they 
know that this was the case: 


On the same day, Yan and Rong Guang and other officers shouted outside 
the palace, walked around, laughed, and arrogant. The palace is in a mess, 
crying and grabbing the ground. It is natural for the rain lord to be able to 
go out and cut himself, sitting on the throne and looking blue. A large 
group of brothers and sisters who struggled for the first time in the week 
to succumb to the **** flow and did not see him after the move, began to 
persuade him one by one carefully. 


For various reasons, what is "this is also for the country for the people" 
"Even if it is dead, it is still a long time." "If this continues, the people will 
suffer." All of them came out. However, the persuasion did not move. 
Seeing that the day was about to pass, several sons were anxious, and they 
rushed to his father with a few excitement. 


The lord is still not dead yet, and immediately angered and rushed to the 
crown, and swung back with a stick. In normal times, the grandsons of 
your sons must not be able to repay their hands, but at the moment, this 
section 1s so eye-opening, who still manages those, so a prince did not 
hold back, and he still handed it down, but he did not want to be too heavy. 


The head of the country, who has been in his 60s, was beaten and could not 
climb. 


The Princess of the Emperor first frightened, and then found that there was 
still gas, and then let go of the heart, began to discuss how to drag the 
unmovable king of the country, how to complete the difficult gimmicks 
and apology, even like the manipulation of the puppets The absurd method 
of hanging him was discussed in full swing, and the old countryman who 
was so angry that he was over half a hundred had some strokes on the spot. 
Later, they decided to find two people to hold the old kingdom to complete 
the apology. However, this has new problems. Who are these two people 
looking for? This is too dangerous, maybe one of them is not happy, and 
one shot is shot. You don't want to, I don't want to, don't want to. 


Noisy, noisy. At this time, the sixteen princesses who had been silent and 
no one noticed suddenly said a word to the old lord lying on the ground. 


The rainman said: "Please pass me." 


The rain lord looked at the daughter who had never seen a few eyes, and 
the corner of her eyes finally shed a drop of turbid tears. 


However, there is only one drop. 


The position of this lord, everyone on the week is vying for the blood, but 
no one is fighting now. Who is going to die. Thus, after half an hour, the 
most rudimentary ritual in the history of Yu Shiguo and the lord who was 
the least likely to become the king of the country were born. 


The new lord of the rain sergeant cut a throat with a sword, blood is like a 
spring, and it seems that life is not enough. 


I didn’t expect that things would turn like this. When I was drinking, I 
took time to look at it and the whole person was paralyzed. Can it still be 
like this? Rong Guang is unlucky, can you still do this? The lord is indeed 
a sin, but it is not the original owner! If you die of an insignificant person, 
you can't distract the people, and you can't kill the old thief. Until now, 
Rong Guang still felt incredible: "Why didn't you think that there was a 


temporary transfer of the trick, and I found a replacement ghost. It really 
has this reason!" 


Although the soldiers of Li’s country could not stand the ridiculous rumor, 
they all said that they would not hurry to save people, but it was because 
the injuries were too heavy, and the medical officers said that they could 
not be saved. I have to abide by the previous promises. I will not move the 
people outside the palace. I will not kill the royal family for the time 
being. I will wrap the throat of the "national lord" and send it to 
Yulongguan. I will wait for her to breathe. Then choose a better place and 
bury it in the Imperial Tomb of Yulongguan. 


That night, just at the last moment when Yu Shi’s sigh was about to sigh, 
the sorcerer’s statue on her head gave a sigh. 


Lightning thunder, the new rain gear has soared. 


Thankfulness and thoughtfulness: "No wonder the general saw the sword, 
it was that face." 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 172: Riding 
black cattle flying hoof 


This is the sword of the town that the rain teacher used to swear! It is the 
artifact, but it is also a weapon. Rong Guangdao: "The rain teacher is also 
big enough, or else it is deliberately scared to remind him to actually use 
the rain dragon for him. He dare? Hahahaha..." 


Thanks for the pity, he said, "Why do you want to be so dark?" Raising his 
hand is a sign, sealing his mouth. Just right, at this time, there is a long 
way to go: "His Royal Highness, blood and rain, do you have a good rest? 
The bed should be closed, hurry." 


I didn’t have a rest for a long time, and I was gone when I chatted. 


The rest stayed here, thanking the pity, the flower city, and the scorpion. 
The rainer took the mount and offered them a ride to the foot of the copper 
stove. Xie pity thanked him. So, the black cow turned into a change, the 
original two or three times as large, can accommodate six people. Its 
forefoot first landed, fell down, the rainman went up, sitting at the front. 
After a long distance, sit behind it. Finally, it is the pity and the flower 
city. 


Thanks for the cross-sitting, the black cow got up and was off the ground. 
He touched the black and shiny black hair, and said: "The mount of the 
rainmaster is really amazing. Saburo seems to mention it, how is it made?" 


The black cow spreads four hooves and runs up. The scenery on both sides 
is backwards and backwards. Huacheng sat behind him and gently rubbed 
his waist. He seemed to be afraid that he would fall. He said: "It is the 
door knocker of the side door of Yulongguan, the royal road in Yushi." 


It turned out that Yulongguan had a small custom, saw the golden beast of 
the door knocker, went up and touched it, and could gather popularity and 
accumulate goodness. Believers are coming to the end, most of them are 
dragons, tigers, cranes and other fairy beasts. The head of the cattle is 


generally not touched, it is very lonely and lonely. Therefore, when the 
rain sergeant was in the rain dragon view, every time he took the water 
through the door, he would touch the golden ring head. The head of the 
cow on the door knocker caught her popularity. After the rainer flew, the 
cow flew together. As for the others, none of them will be. 


The black cow rushed forward, and the pity was brought back slightly, as if 
leaning against his arms, listening to the smile: "Sara really knows 
everything, it seems that all the stories are hard to beat you." 


Huacheng also smiled: "What else does your brother want to know? I don't 
know what to say." 


He sat in front of him, the rain teacher didn't talk, he didn't talk, and he 
listened to the movement behind him. He said casually: "The Lord Ghost 
King said it really well. It is better to ask the blood of the Prince to ask 
about his life and see if he will Answer you?" 


The smile of thankfulness was slightly converged immediately. Asking a 
ghost king's life experience is not very polite, and his intimacy is almost 
equivalent to asking another man's size in his pity. He was afraid that 
Huacheng’s heart was unhappy, and immediately turned the topic away, 
underestimating the authenticity: “The general.” 


Hey: "What?" 
Thanks: "Before the bumps, be careful." 
Hey: "What?" 


The voice just fell, and the black cow under the four-seat screamed for a 
long time, and the scorpion was smashed down. He said in a nutshell: "Is 
there such a reason?" 


It’s unheard of, never seen! If you go down, you will lose it. If you don’t 
have a slap in the face, why don’t you sit in front of you and sit down in 
the middle, but you are sitting in the middle? Usually what is the case? 


The cow kept on the hoof, thanking him for going back in front and 
throwing a string of far-talking voices: "Speaking of the bumps in front, 
the generals are careful..." 


After all the way down for seven or eight times, the four people finally 
took the mount of the rain guard and came to the foot of the copper stove. 


The copper furnace was originally a lush green hill in the center of 
Wanegdu. It has beautiful scenery and is similar to Tai Cang Mountain. At 
the foot of it, it is the most prosperous imperial city. 


The imperial city was originally buried deep underground. It was probably 
experienced several times and it was shaken out and seen again. Thanks to 
sitting on the black cow, watching it for a moment, I was thinking about it, 
and found that Huacheng stood underneath, and extended a hand to him. 
He moved his heart and gave him his hand. He turned over and said: 
"There is also a temple in Wangcheng." 


Huacheng Road: "That is certain." 


Although he was thrown seven or eight times along the way, he was not a 
martial god. He was very tenacious. He walked without taking a nap. He 
also reached for the cow’s neck and mixed with the cow’s dangerous tooth. 
. Ruan said: "The tallest building in the city is not a palace or a temple." 


Huacheng said: "No. The Wuyong Temple in the Imperial City is on the 
mountain." 


He reached for his finger. Sure enough, a deep red half-mountain showed a 
corner of the cornice, and more of it was hidden in the red shadow of the 
dragonfly. Thanks to the pity: "Why is that mountain red?" 


One sentence 1s not finished, suddenly, the black cow that turned back to 
the original shape screamed. A few people have gone forward, and they are 
shocked, and the cow slammed his head and rolled on the ground. The 
rainman firmly held the rope of his hand and said, "What happened?" 


The black cow actually screamed with a human voice: "Ah, ah, ah, ah 
ah! tt" 


After the rain teacher heard this scream, pull out the rain dragon and kneel 
down to the black cow! 


The sword light crossed, and the same dark thing was picked out, and he 
fell on the street wall, splashing a bunch of scarlet huge blood. 


The corpse mouse! 


It wasn’t the black cow that shouted, but the corpse rat who didn’t pay 
attention to the cow’s body and bite it. Although it will die, it is still 
screaming: "His Royal Highness - His Royal Highness the Highness! Save 
me to save me!" 


"boom!" 


Xie pity was screamed by his scalp, his brain hurt, and Huacheng quickly 
stopped him behind him, raising his hand slightly, and the corpse was 
blown into a **** fog. But there is still a pair of small eyeballs stuck to 
the wall, emitting a scarlet fierce light. Huacheng Road: "His Lord Rain, I 
suggest you check your mount." 


The rainman is already turning the hair of the black cow, saying: "Small 
injury." 


However, more and more vocals have come together in all directions, one 
after another: 


"Cough, cough... Take me away, who will take me away!" 
"It’s good to escape early..." 
"I am so reluctant... Don't believe his ghosts, I am so dead!" 


"Brother, brother? Your Highness!" 


This sentence is particularly clear, is the voice of the flower city. Thank 
you for returning to God, saying: "Sorry!" 


Huacheng looked dignified and said: "Do you understand what they are 
talking about?" 


Thanks for your nod. Huacheng reached out and grabbed his ears and said, 
"Don't listen. They are not telling you." 


The pity of the scalp is still numb, and stubbornly said: "I know." 


Thousands of corpse corpses are like black tides, spreading toward the 
center. Here is the capital of Wangdu. The population is denser than the 
previous dungeon, and there are more dead people. The rats are richer in 
their food, so the number and size of them are more impressive. Seeing 
that they are about to be surrounded by overlapping stacks. He looked 
serious and covered his face with a touch of aura. He said, "Let's go first, I 
will lead..." 


Who knows, he hasn't finished talking yet, and he saw the massive corpse 
rat screaming at him, staggering him and rushing to the rear. Looking 
back, they actually chased the rainman! 


I don't know when the rainer has re-entered the black cow and ran in the 
opposite direction. The cow has already rushed a few feet, not too fast, so 
fast that the corpse rat can't keep up, nor too slow, slow to be surrounded 
by the corpse mouse into a skeleton, but kept in a position that can just 
lead them, The speed at which they are chasing behind. The rain teacher 
said far away: "Please leave first, I can open them." 


The rain guard rode the cow while he sprinkled a lot of white rice along 
the road. After all, the nature of the mouse | love rice, do not know how 
many years have not seen such snowy and fat food, swarming. This is a 
slap in the face, but it took the rain sergeant first, making him have 
nothing to do, his look is extremely subtle. Huacheng loosened his hand 
and said: "Brother, let's go." 


Thanks to the sound of those corpse rats, they had a headache. When they 
couldn’t hear it, they let out a sigh of relief and nodded. He turned his 
head and said: "And slow. Are you leaving?" 


Huacheng raised his eyebrows: "Do you?" 


frowning: "What about the rain sergeer? She can't cope, don't come, 
just run, isn't it messing?" 


Xie pity strangely said: "Why does the general think that the rain master 
can't cope? Look at the situation, the rain master is more than enough." 


b Ea ak ine ac Ta Bac Fay a> J i a a a> fl ah RL ea as a> Ji Dal Se a> I a Re Ee > ae eae a Pa a 


3999955399955 - Chased up. Xie pity shouted a few times in the back, 
Huacheng said: "Let's go to my brother. Don't worry, you can't stand being 
protected by a woman, you must find it back." 


Taking time, the two crossed the empty shell of Wangcheng and countless 
petrochemicals and rushed toward the mountain. After half an hour, I 
finally set foot on this copper furnace. 


The reason why this mountain looks like blood is because the large forests 
in the mountains are red. It is distinctly non-Maple, but reddish like 
maple, **** color. Xie pity also faintly smelled the bloody, I am afraid 
that nourishment and human blood are in the land that nourishes them. 


This fourth temple of Wuyong, built on the half of the mountainside of the 
copper furnace, protrudes slightly from the rock, so it escapes the bad luck 
engulfed by magma. It is the largest of the four shrines and the relatively 
best preserved one. There are many petrochemical people in the temple 
with different postures, and they are the waiters in the temple. The two 
went straight to the main hall, and when they entered, there were murals 
on the walls. However, Huacheng glanced at it and said: "It seems that 
someone is ahead of us." 


In the hall, there is only one mural, and the other two walls are intact, but 
the wall has been smashed. 


This situation is still the first time, thankful and pity, said: "Who is the 
hand?" 


They even did not unravel the paintings of the murals, and there was an 
unsolved mystery of the murals. But since you are all stunned, look at the 
murals first. I only glanced at it, but I didn’t look at it. The cold hair on 
the back of the politeness was all upright. 


What is this! 


This mural and the first three shrines are all different. There is only one 
person on the screen. However, the color is dark, the lines and the face are 
distorted. I can’t see what this person looks like. It can only be seen as a 
ragged civilian. 


This is not a big deal. What makes you grateful is that this person’s 
expression seems to be extremely painful. In the midst of madness, he tore 


his clothes and reveals his body. 


And on his body, there are actually three faces, each of which is as 
distorted as his own face! 


Human face disease! 


Under the huge impact, the pity of the eyes was all invaded by the black of 
the mural. He muttered: "It's just... exactly the same..." 


The nationals of Wuyong State also suffered from human epidemics! 


Why is the experience of the Uighurs who existed for more than 2,000 
years, and how similar is he to such a horror? 


Seeing the situation is not good, Huacheng stabilized him: "His Royal 
Highness, don't read it." 


But the distorted picture gave the impact too much. The shadow left by the 
human face in the pity was too heavy. He was a little demon and stared. 
So, Huacheng simply pulled Xie Pity over and pressed it into his arms, but 


his tone was strong but soft and soft: "Okay! Your Highness, listen to me. 
Listen to me." 


After a pause, he sighed: "Look, the first few murals are developed in 
chronological order, with some causes and consequences. The last one was 
built by Wu Yongtai, a bridge, and the next one must be followed. But this 
mural cannot pick up the last one, is it?" 


Thanks for the reaction, it was also very quick. "Yes, there must be some 
omissions in the middle. Someone has been here before us and destroyed 
the other two murals." 


Huacheng Road: "Since this person ruined the other two murals, why 
didn't he destroy this one? Why should he stay?" 


Thanks to pity: "Two possibilities. First, he feels that it 1s irrelevant to 
leave this one, but you can stay or not, not afraid of being seen by me." 


Huacheng Road: "The second one?" 


Thanks slowly and calmly: "Second, this person ruined all three murals. 
The one left behind is actually fake, and he later painted it!" 


Huacheng Road: "Very right. May wish to be bolder again. Maybe all the 
murals along the way are lie, maybe. We are very close to the answer. 
Before that, don't think too much, okay?" 


Buried in his arms for a long time, Xie Li finally digging the horrible 
picture from his mind, only to notice the two poses, and quickly prepared 
to pull himself out of the Huacheng arms | out | come, ": ... no Nice, 
Saburo, that I..." 


Huacheng did not let him go, but he tightened him tightly and smiled: 
"Nothing embarrassed. But..." 


He bowed his head and said: "There is still a third possibility." 


The lower half of the face was buried on his shoulder. The voice of the 
flower city was in his ear, and the pressure was extremely low and low. No 


one could listen to him except him. 


He gave a slight breath and heard the flower city sinking: "The third 
possibility is that this person does not want to destroy all the murals, but 
he is too late. He just destroyed the other two, we will arrive. Now, he will 
hide In this hall." 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 173: The Great 
Gods of the Gods 


Huacheng’s breath is warm, but the words are listening to people’s hearts. 
Hidden in the hall? 


After the light stone fire was read, Xie Li immediately grabbed the flower 
city. 


Of course not because of fear and embarrassment. Rather, if someone is 
hiding here, but they are not aware of them, it is definitely a powerful role. 
If he is told that they have found clues, they may fall into passive. If only 
Huacheng is holding him, so close, it is easy to provoke doubts, both of 
them are stunned and look normal. 


Thanks to peeing around without a trace, whispering: "Where do you 
think?" 


There is only one door to the entire hall, which is the way they come in. 
The temple was empty and unobstructed. There was no box for Tibetans. 
Except them, there were only the temple servants who became petrified. 


The two whispered at the same time: "shell." 


The interior of these petrified people is hollow, that is, it can contain 
things inside. 


Can't hide, but you can hide ghosts! 


After confirming this, they thought about going together. Thanks to pity, 
they wanted to talk, and they looked up inadvertently. They looked at a 
petrified person at the back of the flower city and suddenly collapsed. 


It seems to be a young man with a high status. Because the petrochemicals 
recorded the death of the Wuyong people, most of the postures were 


trumpets or huddles. This one is a very small number of standing figures. 
However, it is not his appearance, but his face that makes him pity. 


Although the face is vague, but still can be seen clearly, this petrified 
person's face, on the left is a half-bent smile, but on the right, it is half a 
cry! 


Xie pity said: "This is it!" 
He raised his hand and smashed it out. Huacheng said: "Brother?" 


The petrified man was crushed by him, leaving only one empty shell. 
However, there is nothing at all. Xie pity did not dare to let go, rummage 
in the debris on the ground. Huacheng grabbed his hand and said, 
"Brother! What did you see?" 


Thanks for raising a few pieces of debris, said: "This petrified person, his 
face... 1s a white mask." 


Huacheng’s face changed slightly, but he still said: “Wait.” 


He put the pieces together and made a complete face. When they look at 
each other, they are all silent. 


Fang Cai, Xie Li saw clearly a half-cry and a half-faced ghost face, but 
now the face of Huacheng spelled out, but it is very vague, and is no 
different from other petrochemicals. 


Illusion? Still in the illusion? 


If you sit still, you won’t get an answer. The two searched in the hall and 
broke all the petrochemicals. They didn’t find more clues. After a 
moment, I felt that someone might have taken the mountain at the moment 
and decided not to Ming Pei, etc., to go straight to the summit. 


The mountain of this copper furnace seems to have a strange attraction. 
The two tried it. The silver butterfly can't bring people here. I am afraid 
that the sword will not work. Therefore, it can only be climbed on foot. As 
the road climbs higher and higher, the mountain road becomes steeper and 


colder. First, I stepped on a thin layer of snow. The thicker I went, the 
thicker I was. I couldn't have half a boot. After the two hour, I have not 
seen snow knee, climbing more difficult. 


Due to a large number of walking, and Xie pity feel cold, but a thin layer 
of hot sweat, pink face, reveals little blush. He raised his hand wiped the 
sweat, was about to go back to the Flower City to speak, suddenly a foot 
space, two feet short of the whole person out of thin air! 


Fortunately, Flower has been behind him, seems well prepared, he will pull 
easily put up, he said: "Brother careful." 


Xie pity stood on his side, and then looked back at the place where he was 
trapped. It was actually a large depression, revealing a dark hole and 
nowhere to go. As long as Xie did not pity timely Pazhu edge, or the 
Flower City and slower movements, certainly he fell out. Huacheng said 
again: "This mountain is full of pits. It’s okay to follow me slowly. My 
brother is going too fast." 


It turned out that the mountain under the snow was very fragile. There 
were large and small potholes everywhere. I don’t know how many, and I 
don’t know how deep. Huacheng actually remembers the location of these 
pits. Thanks for giving a sigh of relief, he proposed: "Okay. Then let's get 
closer. Some snow screams can't be yelled. If you accidentally encounter 
something, you can't help out..." 


Who knows, the voice has not fallen, just heard a roar from above: "There 
is no end -!" 


Which dear friend dared to yell at this steep and steep snow-capped 
mountain? ! 


Thanks for looking up and looking up, I saw that there were two small 

black spots in the white snow that covered the world. One of them holds a 
longbow, and the other is holding a long knife. The other person is holding 
a long knife and slashing the wind. The feathers are blocked, and the blade 


winds are all wrapped in a layer of aura. Both of them are rushing to each 
other. Shouting, the man with the knife shouted: "I said that the kid was 
killed by someone else! I am also looking for them!" 


Actually it is the south wind and the shake! 


It’s too late to think about why they are here, thankful and sorrowful: 
“Shut up!” However, he responded promptly and swallowed before he 
shouted. If they rush out like they are, and the three people are facing each 
other, can this snow mountain be stretched? ? ? 


Huacheng held his arm and raised one eyebrow. He said: "They don't know 
that roaring in the snowy mountains may cause an avalanche?" 


Thanks to pity: "This... not so stupid! It should be known, but they are like 
this, nothing is angered!" 


The south wind and the swaying were extremely annoyed, and they were 
playing at the edge. Because the distance was too far, they couldn’t hear 
clearly what was going on, and they did not find the following newcomers. 
Xie pity wants to rush to open two people, can accumulate snow and seal 
the mountain, and the snow is full of deep pits. I can’t get there at once. I 
ran two steps and it was empty at the bottom of my feet. I almost fell off 
the pit and had to close the foot: “No. Let them fight like this, stop them!" 


The voice just fell, a silver butterfly pulled out from behind him, and the 
arrow generally swept upwards, thanking me for a moment, then the heart 
was wide, and the dark road was a good idea! They can't go up 
immediately, let the dead butterfly fly up and pass a word, can't it? 


The silver butterfly was so fast that it rushed to the side after almost three 
sounds. However, thanks to the fact that there is still no word, I will see 
the city face a cold. He was not aware of it and said: "What happened?" 


The smiles on the lips of Huacheng disappeared, and the look seemed like 
the snow-capped mountains were generally cold. Thanks for asking, 
"What's wrong with Saburo?" 


Huacheng's lips were slightly moving, but he still didn't answer. Thanks 
for the sudden sigh of no reason, he looked up and looked up and widened 
his eyes. 


On the towering snowy mountain wall, there was a large white mountain, 
and the trembling collapsed. 


The south wind and the swaying over there also sensed this silent pressure, 
both of which looked up, and finally realized what was going to happen. 


The next moment, the mountain is like a thousand miles of dykes, a 
thousand miles, with a wave of snow and whistling, rolling down towards 
them! 


Really avalanche! ! ! 


Xie pity grabbed the hand of Huacheng and turned and ran. I ran two steps 
and thought of the two above the avalanche peaks, slammed, and looked 
back, sure enough! Both of them refused to fight, and they fled together. 
They ran away without two steps. They stepped into a pit and the body 
collapsed. The white snow buried in the chest. The south wind ran faster 
than him. He also looked back and hesitated. He seemed to want to go 
back and save. However, just as hesitant, a large snow wave has already 
been killed! 


Just before they were about to be swallowed, Xie pity threw out the evil. 
The white scorpion was long and smashed out, and it immediately caught 
the swaying and southerly winds, and took them out of the snow. Huacheng 
glanced at them, with anger in his eyes, saying: "Brother! Leave them 
alone, leave it alone!" 


Xie pity firmly grasped the evil, dragging the two men and running: "No! 
It will be buried for a hundred years!" 


Huacheng Shen Sheng: "It's too late!" 


Thankful, "What?!" 


As soon as he turned around, he saw the overwhelming white shadows of 
the head collapsed. 


Thanks to the south wind and the swaying of the footsteps. The cold, heavy 
snow and waves rushed and rushed him and Huacheng. 


Xie Li was rushed to the west, mixed with white waves, turned over 
several fights, and actually struggled. However, the amount of snow that 
collapsed was too large, and the impact was too fierce. From time to time, 
I didn’t have to thank my head and bring a sudden suffocation. Xie pity 
finally shouted: "Sanlang!" Finally, I couldn't stand it, and was swallowed 
up by the huge stream of ice and snow. 


I don't know how long it took, Snow Mountain finally calmed down again. 


For a long while, in a flat snow, a snow arched twice and suddenly broke 
out a hand. 


The hand squatted on the snow, and then he got an arm and arched a 
shoulder. Then he had a head and covered his face with broken snow. When 
he came out, he took a deep breath and coughed again and again. 


Not long after, this man finally climbed out of painstakingly, licked his 
head and sat down on the snow next to him. 


It is thanks. The feeling of burying himself from a thick layer of snow is 
almost the same as staking himself out of the grave. Xie's face and hands 
were all red and almost numb, and he sneaked a few times. He took a few 
hot breaths and looked up. 


In the white snow, I did not find the dazzling red. 


However, you can't find out where you are when you can't find pray. If 
there 1s another avalanche, it will be finished. 


He had to stand up and walk alone in the snow and ice, and whispered as 
he walked: "Sanlang? Saburo? South wind? 


It’s strange to say that it’s clearly on the same hill, but now he’s walking 
alone, it seems to be much colder than when he was with Huacheng. If the 
evil does not know when to let go, thanking the pity is very strange, if the 
evil should not let go, even if he let go, if the evil will entangle him, how 
can this be? 


He felt that something was wrong, but he couldn’t figure out where it was, 
or walked away in confusion. I don't know how long it took, and in front of 
the snow, suddenly came a person. White-haired brunette, hunting in the 
wind, head down, slowly coming. 


When I saw the pedestrian, I thanked me with a slight joy and greeted me. 
"This friend! You..." 


He just finished the words and the man raised his head. On the face, 1t was 
a white mask, half smiled and half cried. 


Thanks for being punished by a person, yelling out! 


When he called out, he opened his eyes and sat up. After a respite, he was 
shocked to discover that at this moment, he did not walk alone in the 
snow-capped mountains, but lying in a black space. 


It turned out to be a dream. 


It's no wonder that the dream always feels that something 1s wrong, thank 
you for your long breath and wipe your forehead cold sweat. 


After a while, I found that the stone that seems to be under the grass is 
hanging on the waist side. If the evil is clearly wrapped around the hand, 
thank you for your heart and mind, holding up a palm of your hand and 
illuminating where it is. The first time: "Sanlang? Are you there?" 


Who knows, when the fire shines, he immediately discovers that 1n the 
darkness next to him, there is actually a person standing silently. 


This horror is not small, thank you for a cold sweat when you boarded, and 
immediately grasped the heart. Standing alone in this closeness, he can't 


be unaware of it anyway! 


However, after a closer look, the cold sweat disappeared. It turned out that 
this is not a living person, but a stone statue. 


Moreover, this is not a petrochemical portrait formed by the bodies of the 
victims after the volcanic eruption, and it is obviously a statue from a 
human hand. 


Thanks to the palm of my heart, I was more and more convinced. 


The place where he lies is a grotto for spiritual practice. He has been 
quietly rehabilitated in this place, so it is no stranger. Then, what is offered 
in the cave is not an ordinary statue, but a statue. 


The statue stands in an arched cave. It is long and graceful, graceful and 
graceful. The right hand is pressed on the hilt of the long sword on the 
waist. The streamline of the pleats is very delicate. However, there is a 
very strange thing. 


The face of this statue was covered by a layer of veil. 


The gauze, like a haze, flows, even though it covers the face of the god, it 
is very weird, but it is not ugly, but it adds a mysterious beauty. But Xie 
has never seen anything like a **** hiding his face. He subconsciously 
reached out to remove the veil. Suddenly a voice came from behind him: 
"Brother." 


Thanks and pity, I turned back and saw the scene of the grotto. I don’t 
know when a red figure appeared. It was the flower city. 


He immediately threw the face of the **** behind his head and greeted 
him: "Sanlang! Great, I was still thinking about where you are. Nothing? 
No injury? The avalanche was too sudden." 


Huacheng walked in and said: "No problem. What about my brother?" 


Thanks to the pity: "I have always had nothing to do. What is this place?" 


When he went out, he discovered that this world is far more than just a 
small cave. There is also a gallery outside, which looks short and doesn't 
know where to go. Xie Pian has long been accustomed to Huacheng to 
answer all doubts. However, this time, Huacheng said: "I don't know. Most 
of it is under the snowy mountains." 


Thank you for your pity: "I thought this is the sanctuary you asked for 
Saburo. Even you don't even know where this is?" 


This is really the first time. Huacheng has several pits on the mountain 
road and remembers how to go, but I don't know where it is. This cave is 
not small, has he never seen it before? 


Xie pity could not help but feel a little strange, but did not ask too much, 
raised the palm of the fire a little higher, said: "How did we come here?" 


Huacheng also called out a few silver butterflies, let them shine with a 
light, faintly flying, whispered: "The avalanche is empty, and it is out of 
the pit." 


I can only think so, or someone can only get them here. When I got here, I 
couldn’t help but think of the dream he had just done. The back was 
slightly cold and he remembered something. “We are here, what about the 
south wind and the sway?” 


Listening to him mentioning the two people, there was a twilight flash on 
the face of Huacheng, and then they didn’t care about the tunnel: "It’s 
buried in the snow. Don’t worry, it’s the official, you can’t die.” 


Thanks to the pity and laughter, said: "Although it is impossible to die, but 
if no one has put them out, it will be uncomfortable to be buried for 
decades. Maybe they also fell in? Or look for it here first. Sanro, before 
your silver butterfly went up, did you hear what they said?" 


Huacheng smiled and said: "It’s nothing more than quarreling. Can you 
hear anything good?" 


Xie pity always feels that it is not so simple, otherwise there is no way to 
explain why the face of Huacheng suddenly changed after the dead 
butterfly flew over. Even now, when Huacheng laughs at them, his eyes are 
extremely poor. But since he did not say it, he couldn’t ask more 
questions, and the two walked along the promenade. 


After a while, I discovered that the terrain of the caves under the snow is 
far more complicated than they think. It is not a road to the end, but a lot 
of roads leading to different sizes of grottoes. 


In every cave, there is a statue. These gods are young, and young people 
have it. Each pose has its own merits, lazy and lying, like drunken leaning, 
sitting in danger, holding swords and dancing... The costumes are also 
ever-changing, Chinese clothes, plain clothes, shackles, half-red... and the 
standards are different, some crafts are poor, extremely rough, there are 
The exquisite anomaly, fine to the point of horror, should not be from the 
hands of the same craftsman, but the number, the richness of the pattern, is 
spectacular. Thanks for the way, I couldn’t help but marvel and said: "This 
is a Wanshen Cave! I don’t know who chose to make a cave here? It must 
be a devout believer." 


However, all the gods have a strange common ground. They are covered in 
a layer of gauze. Some are directly covering the whole body, only 
revealing the skirt or the feet. It’s strange to thank you. I want to take the 
veil of the next statue to see what 1s on his face. Huacheng is behind him: 
“Brother, don’t recommend it.” 


Thanks for turning back, Qidao said: "Why? Saburo doesn't think these 
gods are weird?" 


Huacheng took the hand and walked up, saying: "It is because of the 
weirdness, so it is best not to. If this face is covered, there must be a 
reason for him to cover it. The head is the place where the human body is 
gathered. If it is taken down, let These weird gods have gathered in the 
aura and don’t know what will happen." 


After a pause, he said again: "Isn't your brother looking for your two 
servants? Since you haven't found it, don't move them now, so as not to 


have more branches." 


Although these words are singular, they are not unreasonable. If you take 
the following yarn to wake up these gods, it is not fun at all. Xie Li is not a 
person who owes a hand, think about it or let go of his hand, saying: "I just 
curious about what these gods are." 


What is strange about him is that with the character of Huacheng, he is not 
afraid of many branches. If he wants to see it, he will see it. He did not 
expect to use this reason to persuade him. 


Huacheng underestimated the authenticity: "This is the Wuyong national 
territory, perhaps the image of Prince Wuyong, it is not unusual." 


Thanks for the pity: "I am afraid not." 
Huacheng Road: "Oh? Why?" 


Thanks to him, he said: "From the murals we are chasing all the way, the 
costume styles of Wu Yong and Wu Yong people are distinctive. After all, 
it is a country two thousand years ago. It is both ancient and rough, and 
there is a little wild. It’s not the same as the costumes of these gods. So, I 
think these gods may have nothing to do with Prince Wu’s. Even, it may 
not be from the hands of Wuyong.” 


Huacheng smiled and said: "Is it? My brother is very careful." 


Thanks for the slightest smile, said: "No, no. Just, the style of these gods, 
regardless of the details of the carvings, costumes, or the streamlines of 
the clothes, are more like the style of later generations, and I compare 
Familiar...the style of Xianleguo." 


Huacheng raised an eyebrow and said: "It seems that my brother's 
accomplishments in this area are also quite profound." 


Thanks to the pity: "Where, where. The gods look too much like this, there 
will always be a little bit of it." 


Although I don't know why, but he instinctively, from the beginning, 
Huacheng seems to be somewhat wrong. When it comes to this, he finally 
realizes what is wrong. 


That is a faint tension. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 174: The Great 
Gods of the Gods 


However, he still did not ask much, "Since Saburo does not think it is 
better, then we are cautious." 


Huacheng slightly nodded and the two continued to move forward. At this 
time, I met another fork in the road. Huacheng went straight to the left. 
She thanked her and did not keep up. Huacheng turned back and said, 
"What?" 


Thank you, "Is Sanro never been to this cave?" 

Huacheng Road: "Nature." 

Thanks to the pity: "Why did Saburo choose the left side so calmly?" 
Huacheng Road: "Don't be sure, let's go." 


Thanks to pity: "Since I haven’t been there, how can I take it away? 
Shouldn’t I carefully consider which side to choose?” 


Huacheng smiled and said: "It is because I haven't been here, so I have to 
take it away. Anyway, I don't know anything about the situation here. It's 
better to take a chance." My luck has always been better." 


Although this is indeed the truth, in fact, every time in the past, the two 
traveled together, and on the other side, they all looked at the pity, and 
Huacheng took the initiative to lead the way, but it was rare. Xie pity 
nodded, the two are about to enter the tunnel on the left, suddenly, thank 
you: "Wait! - Saburo, you heard no?" 


Huacheng Road: "What?" 


Thanks to the pity: "On the right, there is a voice." 


Huacheng’s look changed slightly, and he listened for a while, saying: 
“Brother, I’m afraid you got it wrong. No.” 


Thanks for the pity: "Really! You listen carefully, it is the voice of a man!" 
Huacheng listened for a while and frowned: "I didn't really hear it." 
Thank you for your pity, thinking: "Is it an illusion?" 


Huacheng Road: "Your Highness, there are things, I am afraid there are 
frauds. I suggest that we go out and say." 


For a moment, thank you for saying: "No! Maybe it is the south wind and 
the help of them, | still look at it in the past!" 


After that, he took the road and ran, and Huacheng said behind him: 
"Brother! Don't go away!" 


However, listening to the screams of faint screams, the other party must 
have fallen into an extremely dangerous situation, I am afraid that there is 
no time to delay, and I will not dare to care for it, and quickly rush to the 
right. The deeper the depth, the clearer the voice of the man roaring, thank 
you for your kindness: "It is really the south wind and the swaying!" 


I don't know how long it took to go around, and finally found the source of 
the sound, it is a big cave. There is no statue in this cave, but there is a 
deep pit. The sound of the south wind and the swaying sound is from the 
bottom of the pit. It seems that both of them are trapped at the bottom of 
the pit and can't climb up, but they are still confronted with enthusiasm, 
and there should be no life worry. Black can't see clearly, thank you on the 
top, hands on his lips, shouting down: "Hey -! What's the matter with 
you?" 


When the two people at the bottom of the pit heard someone coming, they 
immediately stopped the quarrel and shook the voice: "His Royal 
Highness? Is it you? Come and pull us up!" 


The south wind did not speak. Xie pity said: "You can't climb up? This pit 
is not deep? What is the situation underneath?" 


Probably because of a noisy road, the current anger 1s very strong, said: 
"Crap! Can climb up and climb up early, you will not see yourself under 
the Prince?" 


Thanks to pity, blinked, said: "I can't see clearly, do you still have mana? 
Can you take a palm of your hand and see what happens below? If you 
can't do it, I will throw a fire..." Who knows, voice is not Fall, the 
following two people sing: "No!!!!" 


Their suppression is simply frightening. Shake again and said: "Don't 
ignite!" 


If you can't ignite, you can only illuminate it in other ways. The first 
reaction to thanking is to turn back: "Sanlang..." 


However, Huacheng did not keep up. Behind him, there is no one left. 
Thanks for the slightest sigh, first of all, it was a little uneasy, and then it 
was strange. Can't you lose it? 


Since entering this Wanshen Cave, the whole city of Huacheng has become 
strange, and Xie Pity can't say where it is wrong. He looked left and right 
and suddenly found that he had a small silver butterfly on his shoulder and 
tried to touch it gently. He said, "...Hello?" 


The dead butterfly was gently touched by his fingertips, fluttering his 
wings, but did not fly away, it seems that he just flashed him. Along the 
way, Xie Li listened to Huacheng and said that his silver butterfly is 
divided into several categories. I don’t know what kind of class and what 
is responsible for it, but no matter what kind of class, it’s always possible 
to do it. So he asked: Can you help me with it?" 


The silver butterfly flew up and flew down. Thanks for the pity: "Thank 
you!" Waiting for it to fly to the bottom of the pit, the faint silver light 
illuminates the situation below, and the pity can't help but slightly widen 
his eyes. 


The bottom of the black lacquered pit, the white ones, all of them are thick 
layers of silk bed! 


The southerly wind and the swaying two were wrapped in two silkworms, 
which were wrapped in two silkworms, like small flying insects stuck by 
spider webs, and they all had swollen noses and broken heads. I don’t 
know if they were beaten each other. Thanks for your pity, fortunately, he 
is not reckless in his work, otherwise he will throw a fire and it is 
estimated that the entire bottom of the pit will burn. He said: "What is 
this? Is it a spider silk? Is it the nest of spider essence?" 


Fudao said: "I don't know! I can't earn it anyway!" 


He is eager to get out. The look of the south wind is somewhat subtle. It 
seems that I wanted to ask for help, but it seems that people are pity and 
sullen and swallowed. "You don't want to go down first. This is very tough. 
It is very difficult to open it." "" 


Thanks, "I won't come down." 


Thinking for a moment, he tied the end of the evil spirit to the handle of 
the heart, ready to hang the sword and try it. Who knows, if the evil 
sneaked into the half, was noticed by those spiders, and quickly greeted it, 
it seems to give it a color to see, scared if the evil straightened back. 
However, it was a step late. It was wrapped in a spider's silk, tied a knot, 
slammed down, and the pray of holding it, was also smashed. 


Never imagined! This spider silk is so strong and sharp! 


When Xie pity fell into the bottom of the pit, the white silk quickly rushed 
up and tied his five flowers. The rest of the spider silk 1s slowly crawling 
and crawling, reinforcing the south wind and swaying the body. He was 
mad and died. "How come you fall down! This is good, all three are 
dumbfounded! Let's die here together!" 


Nanfeng Road: "What are you complaining about! Not all to save us!" 


Xie pity started to roll, said: "Ha ha ha, ha ha ha, ha ha ha ha ..." 


The other two people looked at him stunnedly and yelled: "Don't you fall 
down and break your mind, you are out of heart?" 


Thanks for the tears in his eyes, he said: "No... No, hahaha... What are the 
spider silks? What are you doing... Itchy, not good... Hahahaha..." 


As soon as he fell, the silk bed under his body caught him softly, and the 
spider silk wrapped around him was very gentle and lingering. Although 
he was tied to him, he squatted and made it seem to be scratching his itch. 
. Thanks for your pity, stubborn resistance, said: "Don't you, wait! Stop! 
Stop! Fear! Stop!!!" Those white silks tied his hands behind his back and 
tied them. The south wind and the swaying look at him, half a sigh, and 
swayed: "Why are these spiders tied to us so tightly, and it is so casual to 
tie him? The face is not covered." 


Thanks for your pity, it’s easy to breathe, and said: "You, your face is not 
blindfolded?" 


He shook his eyes and said: "Before I was blindfolded, I woke up and then 
tore with my teeth, otherwise I couldn’t speak out." 


Thanks for praying and earning earned, the spider silk is really tough, and 
he just laughed too much, the ribs were faintly painful, and temporarily it 
was not strong. He decided to take a break and lie flat: "What are you two? 
How come here?" 


He yelled: "I don't know. Just avalanche, the snow covered like a sky, and 
when I woke up, I came here." 


Thanks for your pity: "No, no, no, no, no, no, why are you coming to 
Tongluoshan?" 


When I talked about this swaying, I was angry: "I am chasing the female 
ghost Lancome who came to the mother of the fetus. Who knows why he 
is?!" 


Nanfengdao: "I! I am also going to trace the pair of mothers and sons..." 


I waved and said: "Then go to chase them! What are you doing?! I... the 
generals all said that the fetus is not his thing, not that he killed! It is a 
good heart to be a liver and lung, a good person can't do it!" 


Thank you for your pity: "Well, don't quarrel, I understand the situation. 
Let's stop, don't make a noise. Just now Snow Mountain has been stabbed 
by you, can't you stop? Let's find a way." ” 


The south wind is also angry: "You, the general of the family is a virtue, he 
is not clear? Do not blame others for doubting him at this time!" 


Shake your eyes: "What do you say? There is another kind of saying!" 


The southerly eyes are more powerful than him: "You have more than you! 
I will say it again after you say it again: You are not kind enough at all, but 
you think that you can be kind to someone you can’t understand, secretly 
smug, you are To satisfy yourself, wait to see other people’s jokes. If you 
don’t say anything, you should be a good person, and don’t be a good 
person. The real good person is not like you, you are never!” 


The forehead climbed up the blue veins, and the corners of the mouth 
twitched. "You simply think about becoming sick and talking nonsense!" 


Nanfeng Road: "Is it nonsense? You know it clearly, I don't know you yet!" 


The swaying blue veins have climbed to the neck: "What qualifications do 
you have to say to me? Stand tall and look down on others, not afraid to 
accidentally break your leg?" 


Nanfengdao: "How can I be stronger than you! Do you know that the 
broken thing you did? Nobody knows?!" 


When he mentioned this, he seemed to be angry and angry: "... Yes! I admit 
it! But how much better than me?! It is loyal to you. It is not the wife who 
forgot the boss, the wife and son are the most important! Everyone is for 
the sake of I am the most important thing for myself! I am always stunned 
by my broken things, and you are not harmful!" 


Listening to his "wife son", the south wind was furious: "I am fucking... 
you!... me? You?" 


Although they can't move, they are already crazy. Unconsciously, their 
name for each other has changed from "your general" to "my general" to 
"you" and "me", and because they are too excited, They didn't realize what 
they were exposed at all, and they only reacted a little. And thank you have 
already said nothing. 


The south wind and the supporter brushed their heads and turned to look at 
the side. I saw thankfulness and silently rolled on the silk bed, turned over 
and gave them a back, saying: "That... I didn't see anything. No, I didn't 
hear anything." 


Thanks to the stone wall, Wen said: "Do you want to continue? This, about 
what you just said, the other will not comment, but in fact, I think that the 
wife's son is the most important, yes, this. People's common feelings. If 
you are old, you don’t want to go to the car. Let’s find a way to go out and 
talk about it...” 


"..." He interrupted him. "You already know?" 

Seeing that it is really perfunctory, thank you for saying: "Well..." 
Unbelievable: "When did you find out? Why did you find out?" 
Xie pity can't bear to tell the truth, just said: "Forgot." 


The real answer is very early and very early. From the time he was with 
Junshan, he had a faint suspicion, and by the end of the half-month, he had 
already confirmed this. 


What is the small military officer in the heavens? nonexistent. "South 
Wind" and "Shake" are just two small points that are out of the wind and 
the feelings of the situation | 


It seems that I can't believe that his true face has been debunked. I don't 
care for it. "When did you find it? How did you find it? There must be an 
opportunity. Where is the flaw?" 


Thanks for the pity, I can’t bear to tell the truth. There is no need for an 
opportunity at all. These two people are all flawed! 


After all, the three of them are also grown up together. Can you still be 
familiar with what they say and do? From the unintentional pseudonym to 
the incomparable character, it 1s really good to guess. If he can't guess who 
the two skins are, what haven't they been so many years? 


However, some words cannot be said by myself. Some things are not 
convenient for me to do. For example, if you want to take into account the 
image as a priest, you can't just turn your eyes or swear, but if you change 
your identity, you will be more and more arrogant. Therefore, thank you 
for not having to poke. 


Shake, no, now, it should be called a feeling of love. Muqing bites his 
teeth, Sensen said: "... So, you already know who we are, but still have not 
said, just, watch us play quietly, right?" 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 175: The gods 
of the gods 


Seeing him as if he couldn’t think of it, thank you for thinking about it, or 
to open the guide: "Actually, this is not a big deal..." 


Mourning sneer, said: "I really did not say wrong! Interesting? Look at me 
show you are very happy? Um?" 


Open the skylight and say something, tear the fake leather and pull the 
leather. The south wind on the side, no, the wind letter was originally a 
slight color, but I really couldn’t hear him, and said: "What tone do you 
have?" 


Mu Qing face white face thin, **** gas is very glaring, the whole face is 
red, and suddenly turned his head: "What tone? Don't forget that you are 
also one of the jokes, giving him so long fun. No complaints, I am not as 
big as you are!" 


Thanks: "I don't want to see your jokes." 


Feng Xin also said: "You are less careful than others to think of you. If you 
go out of the sacred thing, you will want to help you..." 


Mu Qing said: "Hah, that's really thank you. But I am not all your son in 
the dungeon? How! Want to fight! Dare to dare to let people say!" 


He mentions his son, and Feng Xin really wants to kill him. Unfortunately, 
nowadays, all three people have been wrapped up in spider silks, and they 
have no temperament and no temperament. They can only smash each 
other. Seeing the wind and blushing blushing neck thick, thank you for fear 
that he will start the Wushen Street when he is excited, and he is 
reluctantly twisted, rolled over and rolled to the side of the feelings, 
saying: "Muscle, love? You look, can you? Going over?" 


The feelings of silence stopped breathing and said: "What do you want?" 


Thanks: "The wind is too far away from me. I can't get away. Since these 
spider silks can be bitten with their teeth, I will try to loosen your hands." 


He was stunned by his feelings for a long while, his face suddenly cold, 
and the dead fish looked at heaven: "No." 


Thanks for helplessly: "I really want to help." 
Admire the feelings: "I can't afford to work for the body of the Prince." 


Feng Xin said: "I am really fucking! This time you are still a demon! He 
helped you save you still owe you?!" 


Mourningly raised his head and said: "Who wants him to help? Thank you! 
Why do you always appear at this time?!" 


Thanks for the slightest glimpse, suddenly vaguely remembered, it seems 
that he had asked him this question long ago. How did he answer that at 
the time? Can not remember. He said: "What happens when you appear at 
this time?" 


I am lying back and saying: "I don't need your help anyway." 


Thanks to the pity: "Why? Sometimes it is necessary to help others to get 
past." 


Wind channel: "Don't ignore him. He hangs in the air and feels that you 
want to help him. He lost his face and no face." 


There was a feeling of enthusiasm, and the dead butterfly, which was 
smeared with silver, surrounded the blessings and danced. It was not slow 
or slow. He remembered something and immediately shifted the topic: 
"Don’t quarrel, let people see. It’s a joke, someone will come to us later." 


Admire the feelings: "This ghost place is called every day should not be 
called the land is not working, who will come to save? Unless it is ..." 


When he was not finished, he thought of one person and the card was 
finished. The wind letter directly asked: "Is the blood rain flower coming 


with you?" 
Suspicion: "Do you believe him so much? He will come?" 
Xie pity definitely said: "He will come." 


Although the performance of Huacheng Road 1s a bit strange, on several 
occasions he simply suspects that there is a fake flower city nearby, but the 
intuition tells him that it is impossible. The feelings are again: "Even if he 
will come, can he find this pit?" 


Fengxin proposed: "Or else we will make a few more noises. People will 
be louder together." 


Thanks for your pity: "No. We are sitting, no, lying down, etc. Because 
there is a red line between me and Huacheng..." 


When the voice did not fall, he saw the windy letter and the face of the 
sorrow twitched as if he had climbed into a bug in his ear. Thank you: 
"...what are you doing? Don't misunderstand, the red line I said is not the 
kind of exaggerated thing like the 'red line of fate’. It is a magic weapon, a 
magic weapon." 


The two stopped the convulsions on their faces. Wind channel: "Oh, it 
turns out to be like this." Muqing is suspicious: "What kind of magic 
weapon is that? What use?" 


Thanks to pity: "It's very useful. It's a red line, tied to the hands of two of 
us. There is an invisible link in the middle. One can find another person 
along this red line. As long as the breath 1s still there, the red line will 
never break... ..." 


When he hadn't finished, the two couldn't listen, and interrupted him: 
"What is the difference between this and the red line of fate? It's just a 
thing!" 

Thank you for your pity, said: "No. Not the same!" 


Admire: "Do you think about what is different? It's like it!" 


Thank you for your thoughts, this is what you found, really! The definition 
and function of this magic weapon, the more I think, the more I feel that it 
is similar to the so-called "definite red line". I felt that I couldn't think 
about it anymore. There was a voice coming from it and said, "Brother? 
Are you below?" 


Listening to this voice, thank you for your wideness, and immediately 
looked up, said: "Sanlang! I am here!" 


He bowed his head and said to the other two people at the bottom of the 
pit: "Look, I said he will find it." 


Look at his smile, the look of the wind and the feelings of love are very 
subtle. Huacheng did not have a probe, but all three could hear his helpless 
voice: "Brother, I said, don't run around. What should I do now?" 


Listening to his tone, thank you for a sigh of relief, and received a happy 
color, said: "Ah, is this spider silk very tricky? Is it too embarrassing?" 


He seems to faintly hear the flower city say: "It's not the tricky thing..." 
but I'm not sure if I said it. In a few moments, Huacheng whispered: "The 
current state 1s not very good." 


Thanks for the pity, the embarrassment of the last time is still quite alive 
and well, how can it be in a bad state now? 


Aside, I said, "You don't have to ask him. Is the state of the curved knife 
still bad? It is just that you don't want to help make excuses." 


Thanks to pity: "Don't say that." It would be better to say that he feels 
more likely to be taught by the embarrassment, and the flower city is not 
allowed to come out. Just thinking about it, the shadow above the sky 
flashed, the next moment, a red figure silently fell to the side of Xie Pity, 
bent down to hold his hand. Thanks for looking at it, busy: "How did you 
jump from Saburo? Be careful of those spiders!" 


Sure enough, the white silk smashed at the bottom of the pit. Huacheng did 
not return, and he waved his hand. Hundreds of silver butterflies were 


behind him, forming a butterfly array, and fighting with the claws of the 
claws. Huacheng smashed the white silk of Xie Pity, his left hand grabbed 
his waist, and his right hand shook a red umbrella, saying: "Go!" 


The rest of the two people saw that he did not come to save people, but 
they all said: "Have you forgotten something?" 


Thanks to the pity, Huacheng looked back and said, "Oh, I forgot." 


After that, the heart wrapped in the heavy spider's silk came straight and 
fell into his hands. Huacheng handed the sword to Xie, and said, "Brother, 
your sword." 


"Forgot" is actually this, the wind and the feelings of love: "Hey!!!" 


Huacheng will be more grateful, and his right hand will open the red 
umbrella and say, "Brother, hold on to me!" The umbrella actually took 
them and flew up. Xie pity insisted on holding him tightly, flying two feet 
away from the ground, listening to the following two people shouted, 
crying and laughing, said: "will not forget!" Right hand throws if evil. The 
white scorpion rolled a few of the two big white pelicans at the bottom of 
the pit and brought out the pit together. In midair, the wind and the wind 
said: "Wait! Wait! I have something left below!" 


Xie pity shouted at the top: "What is it?" 
Wind channel: "A sword! Fall in the corner!" 


Thanks for looking down, and sure enough, the white silk in the corner 
could see a hilt, so that if Ruoxue had a glimpse, the sword was also 
wrapped up and brought out. At this point, the four finally returned to the 
ground. 


If the evil throws two thick cockroaches on the ground, he immediately 
retracts the princess and puts himself on the wrist. It seems that he 1s 
scared by the white silk that looks a bit like it, but more fierce and 


enchanting. Thanks to pity and appease it, while holding the heart to cut 
the spider silk on the two. Fengxin and admiration can move, and 
immediately jumped up and snarled. Thanks to the sword that brought the 
evil spirits to the wind, and looked down, Qidao said: "This is ... red 
mirror? South wind, your general will fix this sword?" 


He said casually, and after that, he reacted incorrectly. Now the wind and 
the feelings of love, or the shape of the "South Wind" and "shake", but pity 
has forgotten that their identity has been exposed, still subconsciously 
accompany them to act. Although the intention is considerate, but the 
thoughtfulness is not good at this moment, the two are silent silence. 


Fengxin couldn't hide his expression, his face was smashing, and he 
returned to his original shape. He took the sword and said: "...has been 
repaired. After all, there are many ghosts in Tongluoshan. It is convenient 
to take photos." 


Cheer looked at the culprit next to the red mirror shattered, and coughed, 
saying: "It's hard for you." After all, it's not easy to break it into **** and 
fix it. 


Mudging also turned back to the original, photographed the cuffs of the 
cuffs, said: "Fixed well. After all, most demon ghosts will disguise the 
shape, if you don't love your brain, take a red mirror and take care of it 
will not be deceived." 


The wind letter is not happy: "Do you secretly say that no one has a brain? 
I thought I couldn't hear it?" 


Again. Xie pity shook his head and said to Huacheng Road: "Sanlang, I 
was too eager to run, and I fell down, I am sorry." 


Huacheng received the umbrella and said: "Nothing. I just hope that my 
brother will not run this again." 


Thank you, Charlie, suddenly seeing the feelings swept over the flower 
city, his eyes condensed, his face seemed a bit weird, changed his mouth: 
"Muscle? What happened to you?" 


When he asked this question, he immediately returned to God and looked 
at him. He said, "Nothing. I haven't seen the **** rain and look like this. 
It's strange." 


This explanation, thank you, is not very convinced. Although this should 
indeed be the first time to see the complete flower city, but he has not seen 
the 16-year-old flower city before. Huacheng's two kinds of skins are not 
very different. How can they show such eyes? 


The four people went out of the grotto, didn't take a few steps, and the 
wind was stunned: "...where?" 


The feelings of love are also embarrassed, said: "What is going on?" 


They were trapped at the bottom of the spider silk, and they did not have 
the opportunity to explore the outside world. Therefore, when they came 
out, they saw one successive cave, a different statue, and thought that 
under this snowy mountain, there was such a mysterious dream. They are 
extremely shocking. 


Thanks: "This is a cave." 


Looking around, he muttered: "This cave, I don't know how many years it 
takes, how much effort it takes to build it. Really... really..." 


He seems to have been unable to find words to describe it. Thank you for 
understanding his feelings. After all, the grotto was used for spiritual 
practice and for God. When his parents opened a cave for him, no one of 
the priests could see such a huge cave. If you can provide a statue of 
yourself in this place, you will certainly have a great gain in the realm. 


Fengxin wondered: "What **** is this cave? Why do you cover your 
face?" 


Thanks to the pity: "Nature is because I don't want to be seen by later 
people like us." 


Mourning feelings: "That's weird. It can directly smash the head of the 
gods, why do you want to do this? If you really want to see it, a thin veil 
can't stop anything." 


Said, he is going to uncover the veil of the most recent statue. Xie Pity was 
too late to stop, only to see the cold flash, a silver blade, hanging in front 
of his finger half an inch. 


The sudden killing made the atmosphere between the four people tense. 
The wind and the police are savvy: "What is this?" 


Although the blade was in front, the feelings were not revealed, and said: 
"Is your machete not good? Why is it 'not good?" 


Huacheng is behind him, slowly and succinctly: "No one has taught you, to 
other people's sites, don't mess things." 


Admiration: "It is not your territory. What kind of justice do you preside 
over?" 


Huacheng whispered: "I don't want to have more branches. After all, here 
is Tonglushan. No one knows what will happen when the veil is 
uncovered." 


Admire the feelings: "Why are the **** rain flowers and other arrogant 
characters, there will be a day of fear of more branches?" He said, his 
wrists moved down, and he had to touch the clothes of the gods. The blade 
of the scimitar is also moved down, and the **** fort again. 


Mu Qing said: "This time I am not going to reveal his veil, but I want to 
see the stone, why should **** flowers stop me?" 


Huacheng smirked: "Prevent your troubles." 


Thanks for inserting them into the middle of them, saying: "Hold and stop. 
People build caves here for gods. We don't want to see them. It's not a long 
time to stay here. Let's go out and talk. Don't forget, we all have 
something to do." '"" 


Huacheng stared at the hand of admiration and said: "Since my brother 
said so, then he will stop, I will not care." 


Thanks for your pity: "Muscle, let go." 


He admired him: "Have you made a mistake? Why didn't he first stop? 
What if I don't close my hand?" 


God officials and ghosts, Fengxin naturally choose to stand on the side of 
the priest, saying: "At most, accept both sides and close your hands." 


Huacheng did not let it go, saying: "Infatuation." 


Seeing both sides refused to retreat, Xie pity put his hand on the empathy 
arm, Wen sighed: "Muscle, let go, after all, at first, you are the first to do 
it, so you should let go first, okay? Even give me a Face? I promise that 
you will let go of Saburo and keep your promise." 


Although the enthusiasm was not convincing, but the stalemate was a 
long-lost, he slowly withdrew his hand and returned to the road. At this 
point, it seems as if a tight bowstring has finally come loose, and Xie Pity 
is relieved. Just in front of it was a fork in the road. He asked Huacheng: 
"Which side do you think should go this time?" 


Huacheng seems to have chosen a road at random, saying: "This side." 


The wind and the feelings of love walked behind them, and it seemed to be 
on the other side. In the gap, the feelings asked: "How do you choose? 
Why go here?" 


The two of them turned their heads and said: "Choose whatever you want." 


Fengxin frowned: "How can this be chosen casually? Or don't leave it, be 
careful to be brought into the pit." 


Huacheng smiled and said: "Even if I enter the pit, I have a way to bring 
my Highness out. You can follow, you can go without it. But to be honest, I 
don't want to save you any more." 


Huacheng speaks like this. Even if the smile on his face is polite and 
polite, it makes people feel that they can't do it. The more they laugh, the 
more they can suffocate others. The air was on the wind and the bow was 
on the shelf. Xie Li knows that he will not really do it. He said: "Sorry for 
the letter. But in this case, it is almost the same." 


Huacheng laughed and said: "Awful, terrible. It seems that I have to go 
far." He said that he had chosen an eyebrow for Xie, and he went far. Xie 
Li knew that he just wanted to stay away from the two people behind him. 
He shook his head with a smile and was about to keep up, but he suddenly 
lifted him. Thanks for turning back, strangely said: "Muscle? Is there 
anything?" 


Who knows, a feeling of love does not answer, grabbed the pity and went 
to the other road, and said: "Do it!" 


The flower city in front is also aware that it is wrong, and turned back. The 
wind letter has been punched on the stone wall, and a few large rocks fell 
and blocked the intersection. The two quickly stepped forward, and 
between the electric and light stone fires, they took more than 50 
characters on the rock. In this way, Huacheng and the three of them were 
separated by this pile of big stones. 


It turned out that the two of them were not in the back, but they were 
negotiating to come to this sudden attack! Thanks for your pity: "What are 
you doing?" 


He earned his enthusiasm and wanted to see the flower city that was 
blocked by them. The wind letter stunned him, and he kissed him with one 


arm, dragged and ran, and ran: "Hurry up! Those can't drag how long!" 


Mourning resentment: "What do you still ask! He is weird, can't you see 
it?!" 


Thanks to the pity: "Where is there a weird?" 


Admire the feelings: "I see you are stupid, and he is full of quirky two 
characters on his body, so you can't see it!" 


Feng Xin said: "Don't talk about running! Mom seems to have a dead 
butterfly catch up!" 


Admired and said: "Clog the hole!" 


Therefore, Fengxin ran all the way all the way, and several holes were 
blocked by the big stone that he shot down. The two dragged their thanks 
to the underground gallery on the back of the nine songs. Xie Li was 
almost fainted by this road, shouting: "Stop! Stop!" 


After running for a long time, the two talents stopped breathing. In this 
gap, thank you: "No, you two, why did you suddenly run me? What did 
you find?" 


Fengxin’s hands still hold his knees and gasp, saying: “You let him, tell 
you again!” 


The feelings straightened up, and thanked the pity: "So obviously you 
haven't found it yet? Beads! Do you remember that bead?" 


Thank you, "What beads?" 


Muaging is literally and eloquently: "The Shangyuan Festival Tour, 
Yueshen Warrior Suit, the pair of crimson coral beads earrings, the one 
you lost!" 


Thanks for a long time, I couldn’t remember it. I pinched my earlobe and 
confused me: “I was a red coral bead at the time? Have I lost it?” 


The mouth of the mouth was pumped, and he said: "You two told me at the 
time that the beads were stolen by me. How can you not remember this 
kind of thing?" 


Thanks to pity: "After all, it’s been eight hundred years..." Fengxin 
retorted: "You are less bullshit, no one 1s stealing you, you are suspicious!" 


Xie pity waved his hand and said: "Don't make a noise, don't make a noise. 
You suddenly told me what the beads are doing?" 


Mourning feelings: "Because the beads have been found! The red beads of 
the flower city, do you see it?" 


Thank you for your pity: "You mean that is...?" 


The feelings of love are ruthless: "Yes!" 


It turned out that the strange look when I saw the flower city was because 
of this. Thanks to the pity: "Why is that red coral bead in him? Are you 
sure you remember correctly?" 


Mu Qing interrupted him: "I have been looking for a whole year of the 
beads, and I have been looking for it. I will remember correctly if I 
remember correctly!" 


Thanks for the hands and sleeves, I thought about it, and said: "I still think 
you may be wrong. There is no reason for the beads to be in his hands? 
The red coral beads are not all good." He has always liked to collect rare 
treasures. He still has thousands of antiques." 


Mourning nodded, said: "Yes, OK. You think I read it wrong? Well, then 
look at this." 


He stood next to a statue of God and said, while he violently pulled down 
the veil on the face of the god, saying: "Then you look at what it 1s, this 
will not be wrong!" 


When the veil was pulled down, Xie pity swept over and the eyes suddenly 
shrank. 


There is nothing terrible and horrible in the face of the statue. It was a 
smiling young man with a good eyebrow and a bright look. However, 
thanking the face, the scalp suddenly burst into a layer of cold hair. 


Can you not be awkward? That face, root and thankfulness is carved out in 
a mold! 


Looking at the statue so close and face, it is like looking in the mirror, 
even the original pure smile has become very different. Thanks, the scalp 
numb, and said: "This..." 


The feelings are cold and cold: "Do you still have to say that you are 
wrong?" 


Thanks for your pity, it’s easy to say: "...How can there be a statue of mine 
here?" 


The feelings of admiration are: "One? Not only. You are optimistic." 


He said, he pulled the veil on the face of another god. This face is also a 
thankful face! 


The veil of the face of five or six gods was pulled down, and they were all 
exactly the same! 


Admiration: "It is indeed a temple, but in fact, only one **** is here." 
All are him! 


In all directions, it is his own face, and Xie Pity seems to be caught in a 
psychedelic and strange dream. The dizzy turned for a long time, he 
suddenly remembered something, said: "Wait, love. You have not had the 
chance to look at the face of these gods before? Just you want to pull the 
yarn, isn't it blocked by him?" 


Mu Qing said: "I don't need to look at the faces of these gods, I know that 
you are carving." 


Thanks to the pity: "How do you say this?" 


Mu Qing smashed a pile of veil into a group and smashed it to the side. 
The forehead was slightly green and said: "How do you say that? Because 
all your clothes, accessories, and living, I was responsible for it. I will 
wash you for you. Every piece of your clothes is not the same in the world. 
The stone statues are too detailed, and everything is carved. It is exactly 
the same. I certainly know who the face is when I see the clothes!" 


',.."" Xie pity grabbed his forehead and began to think back to the strange 
performance of Huacheng. The wind channel on the side: "He doesn't let 
us see these gods, which shows that he knows what is strange like this. I 
am afraid that what avalanches are inadvertently falling in 1s a ghost, he 
must know where this is." 


Mu Qing said: "Oh, I think maybe he threw us into the pit full of spider 
silk. He really wants to kill us." 


Thanks to the pity: "But... what the **** 1s going on?" 


Look closely, each of the statues here is lifelike, the details are fine, and 
the simplicity is so creepy. It is conceivable that the sculptor's 
observations of the gods themselves are nuanced. Thanks to the courage, 
even the statue of the most famous craftsman of Xianleguo did not reach 
this point. It seems that the craftsman’s mind 1s all this person, only the 
person can be seen in his eyes. 


The three were surrounded by these gods with the same face. The wind and 
the face were cold, and said: "Really... I am fucking... I am so confused... 
Too **** like it." 


Moreover, the number is still so much. Mu Qing said: "I suspect that these 
gods are the props needed for the sorcerer, first ruined and said." He said 
that he would kneel down with a hand knife, and the thoughts of 
thankfulness were pulled back, blocking: "And live! ” 


Look at him with love: "Are you sure? This sorcerer may be for you." 


Thank you for thinking about it, or saying: "Don't act rashly. I think the 
possibility of sorcerer is very small." 


Wind channel: "I feel quite big. I am really fucking... Are you afraid of 
watching these things?" 


Admiration and respect for each other, said: "According to what?" 


Xie pity shook his head and said: "There is no basis. However, these gods 
are very good at carving. If you don't figure it out, you will rashly ruin it. I 
am afraid of causing regrets." Suddenly, again, "Sanlang... Maybe it hurts 
me, but I think, at least it won’t be harmful to me." 


The feelings are simply unbelievable: "... Are you really fascinated by 
what he has done? I think that if he writes suspicious words on his face, 
you will become illiterate." 


The two of them are talking about it, and the winds and winds suddenly 
come to the enemy, saying: "Be careful!" 


Both pity and admiration are a policeman. "What happened?" 
Wind channel: "That spider silk is coming again!" 


Sure enough, the fire of the palm of the heart shines on the stone wall in 
front, and a large piece of dense white silk is attached to the wall. The 
three people are not good at heart, fearing that there must be another fight. 
Who knows, that white silk is not as fierce as the bottom of the squad, no 
motion, no attack, it is no different from the ordinary ivy. The three waited 
for a while, thanking the pity: "These screens don't seem to be alive." 


Wind channel: "What is it for living?" 


Thanks for your care, I went forward to check for a moment, and this 
confirmed, saying: "They seem to be covering something." 


The three people came to the stone wall, thanked and tried to pull and 
pulled off a large piece of white silk. That white silk is very tough, tearing 
is not easy, but it is not completely impossible to tear off. 


Under the veil is the true face of the god, then what will be hidden on the 
stone wall? 


The other two also joined the team of the tearing spider web. The three 
were responsible for different areas. In a short time, thank you for 
revealing a stone wall. He said: "It is a mural!" 


On the stone wall, covered by a large number of spiders, 1s a large piece of 
murals. The entire stone wall is densely packed with lines, colors and 
villains. It is divided into many small pieces, the styles are different, some 
are rough, some are beautiful, some are exquisite, some are different. 
After watching it for a while, thank you: "...this is what he painted." 


Admire: "He? Flower City? Can you be sure?" 


Thankful and whispered: "Yes. There are words on it, the words are written 
by him." 


He pointed to a blood-red little man on the wall, and wrote a bunch of 
twisted, unintelligible twisted words next to him, as if he was unconscious 
or extremely painful when he wrote it to vent. It is possible to guess by 
text that this blood red villain is painting Huacheng himself, but for some 
reason, he painted himself ugly and ugly. Fengxin glanced at it and 
couldn’t help but say: "This word... ugly my eyes. I dare say that I am 
better than him." 


It’s ugly than the letter, which is really ugly and hopeless. Thanks for the 
confusion, I don’t know where to look, but once I confirm that this is the 
handwriting of Huacheng, it seems that I suddenly found a huge treasure, 
and my fingertips are slightly shivering. At this time, the feelings seem to 
have found something not far away, saying: "...His Royal Highness, you 
are coming over. Come and see!" 


Thank you for your return to God. "What happened?" 


The wind and the feelings of the silence have been speechless, only 
pointing to a picture on the wall to show him. The painting 1s also a big 
one in the whole wall. In the middle of the painting, a tall tower is built. 
Underneath is a crowd of people and a magnificent platform. The lines are 
simple, but a few strokes, the shape is extremely accurate. 


The feelings point to the center of the picture, and he trembles: "The 
original... is... is he?" 


Xie Pity is also staring there. 


The entire picture is colorless, only the two characters in the picture have 
color. There is a little man below, it is white, as if the whole body is 
shining, looking to the sky, reaching out, is about to pick up a villain who 
fell from the tower. 


And the little man is blood red and red. 


Mousse whispered: "...[s he? Is it him? Shang Yuan Festival Tianyou that 
fallen child? How could it be him? Actually? Blood rain and flowers? Is 
he???" 


The wind letter beat them both, pointing to the side: "There is still 
behind!" 


Xie pity walked over and saw another painting, it was a broken small view. 
There was a statue on the platform of the gods. The whole body was also a 
faint layer of white light, one hand smashed the sword and the other hand 
held a red umbrella. , handed down. There is an ugly blood red villain 
below, and he holds a bunch of small flowers in his hands and gives it to 
him. 


Thanks for a moment, I felt that my head was a little bit painful, and I held 
the temple that was suddenly jumping, and continued to look down. 


The next one, it seems to be the battlefield. A large number of soldiers 
were ready to go, and a white little man was hanging in the sky, holding a 
long sword and devotion. There is also a blood red villain in the army 
under the pressure of Uganda, looking up at the man in the sky. 


Xie Pity is seeing God, and the unbelievable voice of the wind is sounding, 
saying: "This red one is all alone? They are all?? Are all flower cities? I 
am a mother... He has been following you. ?!" 


The feelings are also unbelievable, saying: "Not only followed, he is still 

staring. It is very tight, very tight. Wherever there is him! Look, there are 
streets, no trees, what is this? My God... those gods should not be carved 

by him?!" 


Fengxin looked all the way down, and it was awkward. He said, "I am 
fucking... Who is this? I have been staring at you since more than 800 
years ago!! I still follow you today? I am fucking! This is too horrible. He 
is evil! What does he want to do? The average believer will not do this at 
all. What does he want to do?!" 


Admiration: "There is a conspiracy... there must be a conspiracy! Keep 
watching, you can find clues here!" 


Thanks have been shocked. 


He stared at the blood red villain on the wall. He still didn't react. He only 
thought that many memories that had not been forgotten, but did not care, 
were mixed, rushing into the mind, and even breathing could not keep up. 
At this time, I heard the two people yelling over there. Thanks to a spirit, 
said: "What happened?" 


The wind and the feelings are standing in front of a stone wall, and it 
seems that something has been seen. When he saw that he was going to 
pass, Fengxin quickly turned and pushed him back and said: "I|Fuck, don't 
look!" 


Thanks: "What's wrong? What? Why can't I see?" 


The feelings are also black, and said: "... don't look. Nothing looks good, 
run quickly!" 


The two men grabbed him with one arm and ran all the way. Thanks for 
being dragged by them, "What are you doing? I haven't finished reading 
the mural yet?!" 


Fengxin ran and yelled: "Don't look! That kind of thing can't be seen! I 
*e** It! T really haven't seen this kind of thing! This kind of person!!!" 


Xie Pity is inexplicable: "You have never seen anything? What happened 
to Saburo?" 


Mu Qing reprimanded: "Also called Sanlang, don't call it! It's too late to 
run! You don't want to approach him anymore. He is not normal, he is sick, 
he is a madman!!!" 


Thank you for listening, and said, "What are you doing to marry him? Isn't 
I saying that everyone is not going to go where?" 


Wind channel: "Don't ask! You don't understand! He is different from us! 
He is crazy! He, he is against you... for you..." 


Thanks for your pity: "What happened to me? Trouble let me go, let me go 
back and see for myself?" 


One has to go back, the two are going to pull, the three are deadlocked, and 
suddenly there is a cold voice from the front: "I didn't say it, go to 
someone else's site, don't mess things." 


The trio was a stiff, turning to look. I saw a red figure standing in front of 
it. The flower city was leaning against the stone wall, blocking their way. 
He smiled and said: "Otherwise, there will be any end, I can't say it." 


Although he was laughing on the face, there was no smile in his eyes, but 
he was dark and muddy. He holds an arm and the other hand 1s playing 
with the little things carelessly. 


It is the deep red coral beads that are bundled with thin hair. The coral 
turns red with the streamer, and the red line between his pale fingers is 
generally dazzling. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 176: The gods 
of the gods are really 2 


The hundreds of spells and heavy stones have not stopped him! 


The wind letter and the feelings of the love are extremely fast, the wind 
letter and the arrow are out, the feelings are hollowed out, sending out the 
attack, grabbing the pity and running. The wind and the tactics were re- 
applied, while slamming the stone and saying: "I am fucking! How could 
he find it here so soon?" 


Admire: "How do I know?!...Red line! Red line! He is still connected to 
the red line! !" 


The two dreamed of waking up, brushing and brushing to grab the hand. 
Thank you for letting them succeed, the other hand holding the one with 
the red line, said: "Can't solve!" 


Wind channel: "His Royal Highness, you will find this red line, and you 
will not find it if you don't catch up with him!" 


Xie pity took his hand and said: "I don't have to worry about it when he 
catches up? I... want to ask him carefully." 


Mu Qing looked up and said: "You still want to ask him? I think you are 
going to be eaten by him to know how good he is." 


Thanks to pity: "He was very powerful. You didn't tell me what the mural 
was, and asked me not to be close to him. It was totally impossible to 
convince me." 


Mu Qing said: "He is a ghost king, his behavior is very different. There is 
no need to persuade others. If you see these two things, you should know 
that you should not be close?" 


Thanks for extending **** and saying: "Two choices: either let me go 
back and ask him to ask, or let me go back and see the murals." 


The wind and the feelings seem to think of something terrible, a corner of 
the mouth twisted, a brow jumped, and stopped in front of him, the same 
voice: "Two will not work!" 


Therefore, Xie pity picked up the sleeves and said: "I can't say it, then we 
still use the fight to solve it! Who are you first, or two together?" 


Admiration for the wind channel: "You first!" After returning to the side. 
The wind letter does not seem to be sure that it will win the pity, but in 
order to save the demented youth, he has to fight out and hold the bow 
tightly. He said: "Good! Your Royal Highness, offended!" 


Xie pity also said: "Oh..." Who knows, the opening of the guest set is not 
finished, the vest is hot, there is a person behind the road: "Stay, don't 
talk!" He became a piece of iron plate. 


Not only that, but the sound can't be released! 


The feelings flashed from behind him, on the wind channel: "Pull it. This 
can temporarily let him stop, but it doesn't take long." 


The wind letter is slightly stunned: "What are you doing to attack him? 
Isn't it a good fight?" 


Xie pity did not expect that the feelings of the real situation immediately 
went out of the way. If he didn't trust the two former subordinates, he 
wouldn't have been so easy. Mu Qing said: "Where is there time to give 
you a dozen, he deliberately, I will know at a glance, I want to drag the 
time and wait for the flower city to catch up. Didn't you see him like it? 
The ghosts who are detached are fascinated, you are with you now. He 
didn't know what he was saying. He might have met him and he confessed 
to him. He said something, and he believed, and he was blinded by the 
fox." 


Fengxin thought for a moment and thought that he said something a bit 
reasonable. He sighed and said: "Your Highness, it is not that we 
deliberately marry you, but that he is against you... it is really unsightly, 
simply can’t say it! You go with us. Let's go." 


The feelings of love also said: "Go." 


The word of love is not a suggestion or a request, but an instruction. Only 
when he took the picture behind the pity, he must have previously 
smothered the spell of his life with his blood. The sequel can make the 
stalker follow the instructions of the operator. However, in fact, only a few 
simple instructions can be implemented, such as: non-verbal, 
accompanying, stationary, fast running, etc., complicated instructions are 
difficult to implement, Nor can you confuse people's minds. Only the big 
ghosts of Jin Yixian can do that. 


The two of them took a pity and a burst of sin, and suddenly they were 
blocked by a pile of rocks. When Fengxin saw no way, he said, "How can 
this stone be blocked? Can't you go?" 


Admiration: "Is this stone not you down? Ask me what to do." 


Fengxin questioned: "But are you leading the way? How do you lead the 
way, we have been here before, how come back?" 


The feelings of love are not questioned: "Jokes, I don't recognize the road 
here, how do I lead the way? Are we not all running all the time?" 


Seeing that it is going to quarrel again, the wind letter is waving: "Forget 
it, don't have time to talk nonsense with you, excavate and excavate!" 


Huacheng chased behind them, so they can only move forward, not back, 
otherwise they are likely to hit the front. It is easy to open the road, and 
the two of them let Xie pity stand in the corner, and the wind and the letter 
smashed a fist, and the feelings of the forehead and the forehead of the 
forehead smashed his smashing horse to smash the big stone, three or two 
I will dig this road, and the stone will roll and the plaster will fly. I am 
going to thank you for the past. Who knows, after the smoke has been 


exhausted, a red figure stands on the opposite side. When you pity, your 
eyes are bright. It is the flower city! 


His eyes were cold and cold, and he held his hand and said nothing. 
Fengxin blurted out on the spot: "How do you not scream!" 


This is the true spirit of the real thing. Only when he was clearly left 
behind, how could he appear in the front again? ? ? I don't know when he 
was here, but he was so quietly waiting for them to dig through the 
obstacles and send them to the door. Isn't it the ghosts and the strangers? 


The wind and the feelings of the moment retreat and pull out a distance. 
Huacheng did not look at them, his eyes moved to one side, and he took a 
step toward thanking him. The wind and the feelings reacted to him. He 
came to see who was coming. He jumped to the front and thanked him. He 
said, "You don't come over!" 


The face of Huacheng is very gloomy. 


If you change to the weekdays, who dares to let the blood rain detect the 
flowers, he will not put this in his eyes. It is strange to laugh at the past 
and look at it. But this time, he seems to be like When I was really jealous, 
I didn’t dare to act rashly, and I stopped. 


For a long while, he slowly said: "What is the intention of the two?" 


This tone sounds calm. The wind letter is very straightforward: "You don't 
need to reload it. This is your old nest. These gods have already seen what 
happened, and your paintings, we have all seen it!" 


Huacheng was standing sideways in front of them. He heard that the hand 
behind him seemed to twitch slightly, and it seemed that **** were 
unnaturally curled up. 


" " 


He bowed slightly and whispered: "His Royal Highness, have you seen it?" 


This sound is extremely low and low, although the tone is not as shocking 
as it is, but with a little hoarse voice, it is obviously different. Thank you 
for your compassion: "No!" 


In fact, he did not see much, but at this moment, the politeness of the 
moment could not be heard, and he couldn’t make a sound. He could only 
lean on the stone wall in the corner, as if hiding behind the two, not dare to 
come out to face the flower city. I don't want to talk to him. Fengxin 
opened the bow and said: "Yes. What are you... Thoughts, we are clear. You 
are a ghost king. If you still have a little self-respect, please don't 
approach the Prince." 


The mood of thanking the moment is like a thatched cottage in the fire, the 
smoke is rolling. Huacheng should be able to find out that he is different. 
She is only looking forward to him asking questions and asking himself, 
but he feels that something is wrong. However, Huacheng seems to have 
no thoughts on it, and he said coldly: "Don't be close to him? You two 
What identity and qualification did you use to say this to me?" 


Before they answered, Huacheng raised his eyes and said: "You remind 
me, or continue to calculate your account!" 


The voice just fell, countless silver butterflies screamed to the two! 


In the face of such an offensive as the storm, the only choice is to open the 
shield. Fengxin and admiration shouted: "Shield is open!" 


The butterfly rain was blocked by the invisible shield, and it burst into a 
sparkling silver in the air, and quickly condensed into a new silver 
butterfly. It was attacked again, and it was endless. As they step back and 
retreat, Huacheng 1s approaching step by step. His black hair was swayed 
by the winds of the court, and his eyes were full of fury and anger, and he 
was unobstructed by the bright silvery butterfly. So when it was 
unilaterally blocked, it was too passive. The wind and the feelings looked 
at each other and decided to take the initiative to attack. They held up the 
shield and rushed up, and each showed their weapons. The three men 
fought in this not-so-wide grotto. The wind letter is against the dead 


butterfly, and the love is on the flower city. Flower City reached out and 
handed out the curved knife to the left hand, facing the front! 


This is the first time that thank you for seeing the errands fight. The 
scimitar is slender, glamorous and murderous, and the silver light is dead- 
-it is really a demon knife that is full of evil and evil! 


This battle is really wonderful. Huacheng has not fallen into the wind with 
an enemy. He sees his breath and sighs. When he is not long, he picks up 
his knife and picks it up with a sigh of relief. Ma | Knife smashed into the 
rock. Although the lover still holds the handle, he can't pull it out. He was 
shocked, and Huacheng had already punched him on his lower jaw, hitting 
his whole person to fly to the sky, and the handle finally got out. Over 
there, the feather arrows of Fengxin were also cut off by the sharp silver 
wings of the dead butterfly. After all, the number is too large to handle! 


The outcome is a foregone conclusion. The corner knows that Soso has 
climbed out of countless white silks and re-wrapped the two men into two 
big white urns. The more they earned, the more they wrap around, the 
more they wrap around, the more they scream, the side: "Sure enough, you 
threw us into the pit!" 


Wind channel: "This is not a spider silk! This is...!" 
Thankfulness is also realized. It is silk! 


The first step in breaking the butterfly into a butterfly is the phlegm, and 
the strange white silks of the spider silk are simply the things that the 
flower city has made, and maybe even related to these fierce dead 
butterflies! 


The war situation has been decided, Huacheng received a machete and 
ridiculed: "I am throwing you into refuge. After all, if you don't scream an 
avalanche on the snowy mountain, you will not have the opportunity to 
enter this cave." Don't thank me for saving your life?" 


Huacheng’s original plan should be to wait for the avalanche to pass, and if 
the snow-capped mountains are calm, let’s go out and let the wind and 


faith fall here. Who knows that the two people bite open and yelled, and 
they thanked them for discovering them, which triggered the next series of 
things. Otherwise, thank you, maybe you don’t even look at a statue, just 
go out with him. 


Now, it has become the worst situation, all the secrets have been torn out, 
oh | exposed to the sun. 


Xie pity is anxious, but the body is still sitting in the same place. The chill 
in the eyes of Huacheng is getting heavier and heavier. Looking down at 
the affair, he whispers: "It seems that it is me who ts talented with a knife, 
not you." 


The throat of the affection was entangled in a few white silks, and his face 
was suddenly red and red, and the corners of his mouth overflowed with 
blood. He said: "You!...you...? It’s so, I understand..." 


Fengxin also bit his teeth: "...you...what you know!" 


Admired: "I understand... why this kid is so hateful to me... you may be 
the same reason!" 


Wind channel: "Wh... cough, why?" 


Mourning feelings and hate: "Because he is crazy! Have you forgotten how 
to paint on the mural? He is the one... the little soldier who is going to be 
brought back from the back of the son of the Prince, and he said that his 
knife is good, suitable for him. Use a knife... cough..." 


Wind channel: "What does this have to do with his hatred?!" 


I don’t talk because of my feelings." ", Huacheng punched him on the 
face, smiled and replaced him, saying: "Because he drove me out of the 
military camp." 


I did not expect to have done this thing! 


Feng Xin was shocked: ".... am fucking! Why are you driving him out of 
the military camp?! He offended you?!" 


The face is full of blood. "I just let him go back. It’s not a good thing to 
fight. How do I know that he will be crazy like this, and vengeance 1s 
now!..." 


He didn't finish it, and he gave it a punch. He slammed his face. Huacheng 
smiled and said: "Why did you drive me away, when I can't guess? Ah?" 


Mourning eyes flashed. Huacheng is also awkward: "Where is the waste, it 
is Clear, isn't 1t?" 


Appreciation seems to have been poked, and spit a blood, word by word: 
"Fortunately, you are taken away, or you will stay in the army, let you 
slowly approach the prince, stare at his mind all day, do not know what to 
think. What are you doing? That is disgusting!" 


Thank you for a heart and a tight heart. Mucheng said the previous 
sentence, Huacheng has raised the boxing, and when it comes to the latter 
sentence "disgusting", Huacheng's hand is frozen in the air, the pale hands 
of the back of the blue veins appear, the five fingers clenched and loose, 
loosened and clenched. 


For a long while, his voice is succinctly said: "I will not care about you in 
this matter. You give me honest account, is it true that you shouted before 
the avalanche?" 


The feelings of the awkward eyes widened and looked at the wind. Feng 
Xin also looked at them, and his eyes were round. 


Neither of them knows how to answer. Huacheng Li said: "I have limited 
patience, and you can answer within three voices. One! Two!" 


He was so resolute. At this time, the enthusiasm is in a hurry, and shouted: 
"Prince Edward runs fast!!!" 


As soon as this sentence came out, the thank-you with the blood on the 
back escaped. Huacheng immediately turned his head, and the two corners 
of the white silk smashed out, entangled in the pity, and he fell down 
without two steps. 


This situation seems to be that he has been scared for a long time, or is 
unacceptable, or unwilling to intervene in the battle, and has been standing 
for a long time, and finally decided to escape, but has not succeeded. In 
fact, he never thought about running at all! 


Thanks to the hands and feet, the white silk was tightly tied, lying on the 
ground, black hair and white sleeves scattered all over the floor, and the 
fighting fell off. Huacheng slowly turned over, and for a long time, walked 
to him. He walked a few steps, and the wind letter couldn’t help but say: 
"Flower City!" 


Huacheng has a footstep and a slight head. 


Fengxin daringly said: "You...you have let go of His Royal Highness! He is 
already miserable. You, don't be against him..." 


Huacheng did not speak, walked to the side of Xie Pity, copied his knees 
and back, and hugged him. 


Thanks for the pity in his arm, just to see the expression of the two big 
whites behind. Feng Xin looked as if he saw the sheep into the tiger's 
mouth, and was about to be ruined by the tears. He shouted, and he began 
to try to tear the white silk with his teeth, but he suffered from the angle 
and was in vain. Huacheng knows all these gods and caves, and when they 
turn around, they can't see their figures, and they can't hear their voices. 2k 
novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 177: The gods 
of the gods are really 3 


Xie Li was held in the arm by the flower city and walked to the darkness 
inside the grotto. 


The light source around them is only the silver dead butterfly that faintly 
dances. Xie Fu couldn't see the expression on Huacheng's face, but he 
could feel that Huacheng's arms and body were stiff. 


In the past, Huacheng didn't hold him, but it was obvious that there was 
something different at the moment. Huacheng didn't even touch his neck 
and hands. Xie Li has been glaring at the face of Huacheng, blinking hard, 
but Huacheng has always avoided his eyes, and he did not meet his eyes. 
He went to a grotto, and there was a stone bed in the grotto. Go up. He was 
about to let his pity lay down, suddenly noticed something, and checked 
the back of the pity, saying: "They cursed you?" 


Thank you for your great joy: finally found out! 


However, it is only now that I feel that there is something wrong with the 
pity. It can also be seen that the flowering city is too unprepared. Xie Pity 
is waiting for Huacheng to help him erase the affair. Who knows, 
Huacheng’s hand has already been extended, but he has condensed 
halfway, and finally, he has recovered it and put Xie Pity on the stone bed. 


Probably to make thank you not have to worry, he said: "His Royal 
Highness. I will not kill the two wastes for the time being. Although I 
really want to kill them." 


There was a thick layer of soft new grass on the stone bed. She was lying 
softly on the top of her bed. It was not awkward at all. It was just that the 
internal organs were smoking, and I wondered why I would not curse him. 
Struggling with strength, I saw Huacheng stretched his hand to the belt 
around his waist and untied the tie. 


Coincidentally, at this moment, thankfulness and feelings began to fade on 
the back of the life of the life, and forced the leg, "ah!" 


Although, it looks like a dead fish suddenly dying and struggling for a 
moment, issued a protest, and no deterrent, but Huacheng immediately 
stagnated, and immediately received his hand, said: "I will not!" 


It seems that I feel too much in my tone, and I am afraid that I will be 
scared, so that he will resist his heart. The flower city has taken a few 
steps back, slowing down the tone, looking pale and uncertain, cautious 
and forbearing, Shen Sheng: "His Royal Highness, I Nothing to do. You... 
don't be afraid." 


Thank you for your understanding. 


Huacheng is still not sure what kind of response he will receive from the 
pity after the curse, so he simply does not listen to the response. 


Huacheng seems to be restraining the impulse, once again with a swearing 
tone, low and low: "His Royal Highness, believe me." 


Although, this sentence "believe me" is not too emboldened compared 
with what he has said before. Xie pity still wants to answer him, but can't 
answer, struggle and fear that he misunderstood even more powerfully, but 
he has to lie flat, motionless, honest and so on. Seeing that he was no 
longer "resisting", Huacheng went up again, reached out and learned about 
Soso, and untied the clothes belt of Xie. 


Thanks for your pity: "Sanlang???" 


Of course, he completely believes that Huacheng will not be in danger, but 
this development is completely out of his expectation, and he can't help 
but widen his eyes. Although Huacheng solved the clothes of thanking 
him, he tried not to touch his body as much as possible. Therefore, the 
speed was not fast. It took a long time to remove his coat, and then it was 
the middle. Until a dead butterfly flew to the shoulders of Xie, and 
perched, the feeling of warm and itching climbed onto the skin. He swept 
away the corners of his eyes, only to find that his shoulders were purple 


and slightly swollen, and some places were slightly cracked. After the 
silver butterfly inhabited, the situation improved slightly. 


It was actually a frostbite left after crawling in the ice and snow. 


Xie pity did not find it at all, because he was not very sensitive to the pain, 
and he was frozen when he was frozen. Even if he found this injury, he 
probably left it waiting for himself. However, Huacheng is more aware of 
his own injuries than himself. He still remembers this and must treat him 
with wounds. 


Being slightly fascinated, Huacheng held up his arm again. Above the 
hands and feet, there are more frostbite, and because of the violent running 
and pulling, some places have already bleed. Thanks for the pity, but he 1s 
not afraid of itching. Moreover, the mind can not help but emerge from the 
fragmentation of many years ago. Dark caves, juvenile trembling and hot 
hands, flustered indiscriminate touch, messy wheezing... 


These were already diluted in memory and could not be faded again. They 
were sealed up by the dust and thrown into the corner. Now recalling, there 
is acompletely different taste, forcing people to scream, especially now 
that Huacheng is in front of him, almost doing the same thing, thankful 
face and brain are burning, really I am afraid to show him. However, 
Huacheng did not look at him, and he did not look at the promise. He 
never crossed the line and turned his head too far. He did not look at the 
half-white shoulders that were exposed. 


Who knows, at this time, there is a voice suddenly emerging behind the 
flower city: "Flower City! What do you want to do to the prince of the 
Prince?! This is too disgusting!" 


Huacheng jerked back and thanked him for crossing him and looking at the 
grotto. What you are talking about is actually a love! 


Feng Xin is also next to him. The two were only wrapped up in Huacheng, 
I do not know how to break free and find here. They saw this scene in the 
grotto, and they all turned pale. The face of thankfulness is also white. 


This scene is too bad! 


Fengxin refers to Huacheng, and then refers to the half-fat of the clothes. 
Thanks a few words: "You...you...get him away!" 


Huacheng quickly pulled up the clothes of thankfulness and said coldly: 
"You two dares dare to find them, is it too long?" 


Mourning and mocking: "Take your dirty hands away. | |I want to eat 
swan meat. Don't say that you think about it for eight hundred years, you 
just look at it for a thousand years and 10,000 years, don't even think about 
it. Prince Edward’s finger!" 


Hearing words, thank you for your sigh. At the same time of anger, it is 
also faintly aware of something wrong. 


What happened to these two people? Even if they only hit them in the city, 
they would not be so swearing, especially the feelings, as if they were 
deliberately irritating the flower city. They irritated the flower city and 
they didn’t have good fruit to eat. They couldn’t beat it. What is the 
purpose? Moreover, in their discourse, they also faintly pointed the spear 
to the pity, as if they were afraid that the world would not be chaotic, for 
fear that the flower city would not do anything to thank for the pity. 


Huacheng was really irritated, and the pale face flashed. He whispered: 
"Since you are desperate for death -" 


Thanks to pity, he saw that he had not concealed the killing intentions in 
his eyes, and his heart shouted: "Don't!!!" 


late. The scimitar is out of the sheath, and the cold is over, it flashes! 


Both the wind and the love are both stunned, and the subconsciouss bow 
their heads. Fortunately, I have not seen the wound. 


Who knows, they have not had time to breathe a sigh of relief, or to 
counterattack, the next moment, their upper body, "squeaky", fell from the 
lower body. 


The blood is mad, and the blood is everywhere. 


In any case, Xie Li did not expect that things would develop like this. It 
was soft on the stone bed and it was already stunned. 


Flower City, actually, the wind and the feelings of love! 


The two men have not completely died, they fell to the ground, a bite, a 
roar, the scene is terrible. Huacheng's face was cold and closed, and only a 
small half of his face was stained with a little blood, and a bright red 
lining the demon spirit between his eyebrows became more and more 
dazzling. 


He stood in the pool of blood for a moment, turned back and walked 
toward the pity. Watching the flower city calm a face, the closer and 
closer, thank you for returning to a little god. At this time, Huacheng had 
already pushed him in front of him, holding him one hand and pressing 
him into his arms, whispering: "...how could I let go." 


Xie Li was tightly held by him, unable to speak, Huacheng whispered in 
his ear. His heart screamed wildly, like jumping out of his chest, and 
suddenly his body was loose. 


The love symbol painted by him in the back was finally erased. 


Although he said that he would not let go, but after helping him unravel 
the sequel, Huacheng still let go of his hand and let go of his thanks. 
Thanks for taking a deep breath, he jumped up and threw himself into the 
pool of blood on the ground. He said: "Wind letter? Amour? How are you 
two?!" 


The feelings of the situation are heavier, and the blood has been bleeding 
and his eyes are dim. Fengxin still breathed a sigh of relief and grasped his 


hand, saying: "Prince...His Royal..." 


Xie Li also clung to his hand and said: "What? What do you want to say?" 


Feng Xin swallowed a blood, biting his teeth: "Be careful... Flower City... 
Don't approach him... He... is a monster!" 


He seems to be desperate to tell this warning before he dies. Who knows, 
the look on the face of the pity has gradually calmed down and said: 
"Monster?" 


He let go of his hand, and stood up and said, "I am very curious, are you 
blaming?" 


Hearing words, a glimpse of the wind. When the voice just fell, Xie Pity 
pulled out the heart with the speed of the Thunder, and pierced the heart of 
the wind letter, and nailed his life to the ground! 


Feng Xin looked incredulous and said: "His Royal Highness, you!..." After 
he had finished, he broke his voice. And thankful from his heart pulled out 
| out | Fang heart, fell blood, retreated to the side of the flower city, the tip 
of the sword pointed to the body of the two people on the ground, said: 
"have seen the blood, do not talk to these two skins What?" 


"Ha ha ha..." 


On the ground, suddenly there was a sneer, but the body of the sorrowful 
sorrow that was smashed into two sides turned over and gave a laugh. 


His upper body was kneeling on the ground. Even if he had to turn his 
head, he could only half face his face. However, his head turned 
completely, and he smiled and smiled face-to-face! 


really. These two are simply not true morality and admiration, but two 
counterfeit goods that do not know where to come out. 


The real morality and admiration are still trapped in the great white, and I 
want to get rid of it. It was this thing that whispered in his ear when Fang 
Huacheng came over to help Xie pity to unravel the life. 


Their blushing faces are not because of surprise or fear, but because they 
are not humans! 


Xie Li has already brightened the sword. "Fengxin" and "Music" are all 
smiles. They say the same thing: "As you wish." 


After that, they turned into the same thing as the two-hole pus. Huacheng 
stopped in front of Xie pity, the two pools of pus blood flow on the ground, 
and simmered, boiled the bubbles that generally appeared, and gradually 
became adult. Looking at this group of things, a little bit twisted and 
formed, the more "long" the bigger, a chill came from the waist to the 
vest. 


Speaking, the "wind letters" and "compassion" in front of them 
disappeared. Instead, they were a long-shouldered white boy. 


Looking at the figure, the boy was about seventeen or eight years old, with 
a mask on his face, half-faced crying and half-faced laughing. Although he 
could not see his face, a clear juvenile voice came out from behind the 
mask. 


He sighed: "Hello, thank you." 


Thanks for the unconscious movement of the lips, the entire scalp is numb. 
Huacheng blocked him in front of him and took the knife! 


In the face of the demon-fighting demon, the white man was completely 
afraid, and staggered by a millimeter. He flashed behind the flower city 
and reached out to thank him. He seemed to want to touch his face. The 
silver light passed, and the flower city stopped in front of him again, 
coldly and quietly: "Take your dirty hands away." 


It was the original sentence. The white man’s right hand was cut off by the 
embarrassment and fell to the ground. But this has no effect on him at all. 
The wide sleeves shook and covered the broken arm. Then, with one hand, 
a new hand was formed at the broken arm, pointing to the claw, which was 
directly directed to the right eye of Huacheng. ! 


The whole process is only between one sound. Huacheng also flashed very 
fast, however, he still left him with two blood marks on one side of his 
cheek. 


This is the first time in the world. Huacheng actually can't completely 
crush the other side in speed. He blinked his eyes and immediately 
changed his strategy. He summoned thousands of dead butterflies and 
rushed to the other side. Countless silver butterflies wrapped the white 
man into a silvery human figure, but I am afraid it won't last long. 
Huacheng is going to pull the pray, and listen to the silver butterflies that 
scream and blow up the thousands of silver powder! 


Seeing the face of the flower city changed slightly, thank you for knowing 
that ruined so many dead butterflies, fearing that the situation is not good. 
After the white people who had blown up the dead butterfly, they were 
hiding in the scattered silver powder, and they smashed out the new born 
hand and dig again to the right eye of Huacheng! 


This time, it’s my turn to pray for the heart and go down! His sword not 
only cut off the white man's arm, but almost cut his half body. Take this 
opportunity, Huacheng Road: "His Royal Highness, go!" 


Xie pity also knows that you can't fight, 1f you see it, you will receive it. 
The two will rush out of the grotto and run all the way in the black 
lacquered tunnel. Thank you for running and saying: "It's him! He... really 
didn't die!" 


Huacheng is running with the road, the speed is faster, but it is more calm. 
On the other side, the butterfly array and the silk thread are set up along 
the road, and the road is said: "It is not necessarily the original one." 


Xie pity stopped his footsteps and hugged his head slightly. He said, "No... 
I can feel it. It must be the original one! Not only did he not die, but he 
was stronger. There was something that made him born again... otherwise 
he Can it be directly transformed into a style of honesty and admiration? 
The soaring priests are difficult to fake, and it is almost impossible to 
make their fake skin!" 


Listening to his tone is not correct, Huacheng also set his body shape, 
turned around and pulled him, said: "His Royal Highness! Don't be afraid. 
Not necessarily he is stronger, there is a possibility that he is very familiar 


with the wind and love! So can Make their fake skin. You must be this 
person..." 


The voice did not fall, and the gratitude of the eyes fell on his hand. Upon 
seeing it, Huacheng’s words and looks were all condensed, the color was 
collected, the hand was withdrawn, and behind him, he turned and 
continued to move forward. Xie pity did not keep up, said: "Sanlang." 


Huacheng’s body was stiff and he stopped his footsteps, but he did not 
look back. He just said: “His Royal Highness.” 


His voice sounds calm. Xie pity stood behind him and said: "Fangcai, a lot 
of things happened, everyone is a little busy." 


Huacheng Road: "Well." 


Xie pity continued: "Although it is still very busy, but I still want to ask 
you a question first, please be sure to answer me truthfully and seriously." 


Huacheng Road: "Good." 


Thanks for the awkwardness: "Who is the noble person of the golden 
branch?" 


The finger of the flower city with the red line knot twitched twice. 


After a long silence, he slowly said: "His Royal Highness has already 
learned, why bother to ask." 


Xie polite nodded and said: "It turns out. Nothing is wrong with you. 
Really." 


Huacheng does not speak a word. 


I paused, thankful and polite, and said: "You, don't want to know, what do I 
think of this?" 


Huacheng slightly sideways, seems to want to look back, but still seems to 
dare to look straight with respect, only revealing the two bright red blood 
marks on his face, said: "His Royal Highness, don't tell me." 


His voice is dumb. Thanks for your pity: "Sorry. This is not a good thing." 


Huacheng didn't need to breathe, but after hearing this sentence, he took a 
deep breath. 


Although his face was very white, he smiled a bit and was very graceful: 
"It’s right. Yeah." 


He seemed to be a prisoner of death waiting for the verdict, and closed his 
eyes. Who knows, not closed for a while, the eyes are suddenly open. 


Behind him, he came up with a pair of hands and hugged him. 


Xie pity buried his face behind him, but also did not say a word. Although 
nothing was said, but enough. 


For a long time, thank you for feeling that the person who hugged him 
turned around and turned his back on him. 


He heard the voice of the city of Nana coming from above: "...His Royal 
Highness. You are really... I have my life." 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 178: The gods 
of the gods are really 4 


At this time, there was a burst of explosion in the depths of the cave 
behind the two. There was a white light that smashed the darkness, and 
there was a scream of silver butterflies. 


The two men looked up and their faces were slightly changed. Xie Li 
released the sleeves of the flower city that he was holding and said: "We 
will talk later!" 


So, the two continued to move forward, but this time, but there is more 
action to hold the opponent's hand tightly. 


Xie's face is still hot, strong and calm, if nothing happens: "Sanlang, how 
did you find that the two styles and feelings are fake? How 1s the real thing 
now?" 


The state of Huacheng is similar to him. He said: "I still have two dead 
butterfly guards in the two wastes. How can I have two more? The 
Highness is relieved, so good, I can't die!" 


Thanks to pity: "We have to go out and let the wind and the feelings come 
out of the shackles first, otherwise it will be bad if he hits him and does 
not fight back!" 


Huacheng Road: "Here, let me go!" 


This Pantheon is really his site. Even if a road junction has five or six, he 
can immediately and accurately determine which one to take, and soon 
return to the place where he was separated. I heard that the two men were 
accusing each other again: "What do you want to run under the temple?! 
This is good, take the person away!" "Don't run here and wait for his 
poisonous hands?!" Hey? You just want him to lead the flowering city!" 


Thank you for your regret. The two great white storks on the wall were 
biting each other and facing each other. When he saw him coming back, he 
was forgotten to vomit and said: "How did you escape?" 


The blessing of the blessings also fell on the original land, and he quickly 
squatted, carrying a back. Heavy white silk let go of the two people, 
retracted into the dark, the wind and the feelings were swept away, and the 
face was swollen, and it was easy to see the flower city from the darkness 
behind the pity, probably thinking that it was necessary, Things are in 
trouble, all of them are a convulsion of the face. Fengxin is about to seize 
the Xie pity arm and pull back, thanking the pity to take the lead in pulling 
the flower city. 


Fengxin: "??? Your Royal Highness Prince?" 
Flower City has begun to lead the way: "Brother, go here." 


The two men dare to go with him, the wind channel: "His Royal Highness, 
how are you still with him?" 


Mu Qing said: "I said that he was lost and lost his mind?" 


Xie Pity did not conflict with them, but he was very soft and determined to 
hold the flower city. He said: "There is no time to explain. In the end, let's 
go first. There are enemies chasing after!" 


Huacheng was pulled by him, his eyes flashed slightly, and he smiled. He 
said: "I suggest you talk nonsense and follow. Just in a good mood, don't 
care about you for the time being." 


When you see it, both of them are unspeakable and unbelievable. With 
their thoughts, I can't figure out why, thank you for being able to walk with 
a dead ghost who is so horrible, spy on him for more than eight hundred 
years, and thinking about something ulterior in his mind all day long. Just 
playing with fire**. He was skeptical and chose another key point. He 
asked: "Do you say that there are enemies? This is the land of the gods. Is 
there any enemy? Can the wound on his face be enemies? Can the blood 
rain be damaged? There are not a few under the sun." 


Thanks to pity: "It is nothing." 


When I heard the name, the face of the wind and the feelings of the love 
changed. Then I will talk about it and keep going. 


Because, they are all clear, but it is possible to thank you for taking 
something to joke or lie, but this person, he will never be. He will never 
admit his mistakes. The party was still fighting in this Pantheon, but now 
they are running wild. Admiration: "What is going on?!" 


Xie pity said that the white man turned into two of them, and both of them 
were shocked: "Is it like us?! How is it possible!" 


Thanks to pity: "It’s true! Although it’s too hasty to look carefully, at first 
glance it’s two of you!” 


The wind and the letter said: "But how can the white phase not be in this 
world? Is he not killed by the emperor?" 


Admiration: "I want to know that this kind of thing is so easy to be killed. 
Maybe it was killed at the time, but the opportunity to recover can still be 
revived!" 


Thanks to pity, I turned to Huacheng: "Sanlang! Before we first entered the 
Copper Mountain, you suddenly woke up from the state of slumber, urging 
us to immediately evade something. At that time, what did you feel about 
him? ” 


Huacheng slightly nodded and said: "It is him." 


Thankful and muttered: "Sure enough! Later, I chose the fork in the west. 
It was also the one who killed thousands of demons and ghosts in the east. 
He was born again, but he was still weak, and he needed to kill the 
monsters who entered the Copper Mountain. Stepping stones to 
accumulate mana... Now, he is recovering, and I am afraid it will be 
stronger." 


After all, that is the world's first desperate ghost king! 


As I said, I felt that something was wrong, said: "His Royal Highness, 
where is he taking us to know you? We don't seem to be on the way out?" 


Huacheng said: "This is certainly not the way to go out, because now it is 
impossible to go out." 


Feng Xin said: "What? This cave is not your site, you will not get lost." 


Thanks to pity: "Of course not..." Huacheng said: "Because Bai Wuxiang is 
now on the way to leave this cave, you feel that if you can fight this state 
now, don't follow me. I must not stop. Please." 


After all, the wind and the feelings are also the people of Xianle. Like the 
pity, there is an indelible shadow on the thing. It is not a last resort, and I 
absolutely don’t want to confront him. Fengxin looked over the grotto and 
said: "Can you go straight through the top of the cave?" 


Huacheng sneered: "The above is the snowy mountain, do you want 
another avalanche?" 


It is a pity that the division shovel left the jade emergency, they did not 
bring it, and no one has studied how to use it, or they can dig out silently. 
Wind channel: "So what are we going to do now?" 


Thanks to pity: "As long as we go chaos, he will catch up and leave the 
path that must go through, and the rest will be able to take the opportunity 
to go out." 


The feelings are sensitive and authentic: "Wait, the rest? You mean to be 
divided into two ways? When the bait leads him, the other way to escape?" 


Thanks to the pity: "This is the case! White must be re-born. You must 
inform the emperor. After you go out, find a way to bring the news to 
heaven." 


The feelings interrupted him: "Let's wait! You have already decided who is 
the bait who left?" 


Xie pity shook his head and said: "It is not my decision, but the white is 
not decided." 


I feel awkward. It 1s not up to them to decide who to pursue. If you want to 
choose a person who is most interested in chasing between them, then you 
must be thankful! 


The wind letter does not hesitate to say: "I am staying with you to deal 
with him." 


What happened in the past, the feelings must be the one who sent back to 
the letter, and the wind letter will be the one who stayed to assist him. 
Right now, it seems that I have to reproduce this scene. Xie Pity has 
looked at Huacheng and said: "Thank you! But don't. Sanlang will stay." 


Fengxin blurted out: "How can he stay? He..." 


Huacheng Meifeng is slightly stunned, but she politely said: "He can. I 
believe him." 


His tone is soft, his attitude is resolute, and his style can't help but he said, 
"His Royal Highness." 


Xie pity took a look at his shoulder and said: "You go together. 
Tongluoshan has closed the mountain. It is hard to say if you can get out. 
And, are you still looking for... Lancome and their mother and son?" 


He was reminded that the face of the wind letter was gray. A dead butterfly 
flies out of the totem of the wrist of the flower city arm, and Huacheng 
Road: "Follow it." 


The two looked at the flower city and looked at the pity. In the end, the 
feelings were lost: "You pay attention to it." Then he turned to follow the 
silver butterfly and plunged into another tunnel. After a short while, 
Fengxin also followed the past. 


The four men split at the fork in the road. Xie Li just watched their back 
disappear, and there was a burst of bursts in the distance. The rest of the 


two looked at each other and Huacheng said: "Come." 
Thanks for your pity: "You take me away." 


The white man really came to pray. Huacheng continued to set up a dead 
butterfly array along the road, forming obstacles, ensuring that the white 
people will always keep a distance from them while monitoring several 
different roads. Every time there was the sound of the explosion and the 
screams of the dead butterfly, he looked a little dignified, and thanked him 
for hearing the slightest pain. He turned around and turned around and 
turned to a grotto. He couldn’t help but say: "Actually... I lost so many 
silver butterflies." 


Although the dead butterfly is not very famous outside, but in the eyes of 
gratitude, they are just some cute and cute little monsters, so they go on 
suicide attacks, only to block the enemy’s footsteps. Can't help but feel 
sad. Huacheng sneered, his eyes seemed to penetrate the heavy rock wall, 
Shen Sheng said: "Reassured. He killed one, I made ten more. The wind 
and the rain, never stop, to see who can't hold it." 


Thanks to the inexplicable movement, the secret said: "...worse, bad." 


Although the look of Huacheng is only inadvertently revealed, his 
confidence in this kind of enthusiasm and rebellion is really a bit 
overwhelming. 


After a while, Huacheng slowed down the steps and seemed to receive any 
signal. He said to him: "Take him away. The two are already going out." 


Thanks to pity: "Great! We can slowly find a solution." 


Huacheng Road: "Well. No hurry. I have already opened a long distance for 
him. Now I can hide here and think about the countermeasures." 


" " 


Who knows, suddenly, the atmosphere of the two becomes a bit awkward. 


It’s not the kind of ugly embarrassment, it’s a bit embarrassing to be 
inexplicable. The original things behind are urgently chased, and there is 
also a feeling of courtesy and admiration. This feeling is not obvious. 
Although I just said "I will talk later", but now I have a slight sigh of 
relief, it is already "waiting for a while", but I don't know what to say. 


Thanks for the pity and two coughs, one finger rubbed his cheeks and felt 
that his posture was not right. I want to speak, and I am worried that I will 
not get into the wrong, too boring, or too deliberate. I can only hope that 
Huacheng will speak first. However, Huacheng is also a stretch of face, 
seems to be seriously thinking about the strategy of the enemy. However, 
it is difficult to say whether it is really thinking, because he is behind the 
hand, it seems to be a little shivering. 


At this time, the two passed by a statue. Most of the gods in the Pantheon 
are in the same way as the real people. This craft is rough and the size is 
also reduced by half. When thanking the pity, he picked up the veil that 
was covered in his head, and his eyes lit up, saying: "Sanlang, is this what 
you did?" 


Huacheng looked at it and was silent. Half a sigh: "The hand of the early 
years. Brother don't watch." 


This is absolutely true. Because this statue is really ugly, although it can 
be seen that the statue man has tried his best to restore the perfect image 
in his mind, but the craft is limited, not satisfactory, although it can not be 
said that the nose is slanting, squatting Melon cracked jujube, but it can 
also be said that this little elephant is not like the head, and laughs like a 
mental barrier. 


However, despite this, he did all the details with meticulous attention. 
Therefore, thank you can see that this is a statue of Prince Edward. Even 
his pair of red coral beads earrings were clicked. 


Thanks for the silence, he turned his head and turned his head. In order to 
be as natural as possible, he also slammed his face. Huacheng was 
speechless and said again, "Don't watch your Highness." Saying that the 
veil will be re-covered. Thank you for your help: "You don't 


misunderstand! I really think it's cute!" But think about it, isn't it the 
flower city sculpture? Boasting this stuff is cute, isn’t it to be cute in 
disguise? Squinting and swearing, he was also cheeky, still could not help 
but laugh. Upon seeing it, Huacheng also bowed down and laughed. 


So, both smile, the inexplicable oyster atmosphere, was diluted a lot. 


Going forward, passing a portrait, lying on a stone bed, but the whole body 
was covered with a layer of light smoke-like white gauze. Xie pity is very 
curious, just want to open the white gauze covering the idol, Huacheng 
suddenly grabbed his wrist and said: "His Royal Highness!" 


Since entering this Pantheon, Huacheng has called him "His Royal 
Highness" most of the time. Thanks for seeing him, Huacheng released the 
hand that clung to him and looked a little uncomfortable. 


Thanks: "I already know that this is my god, can't I see it?" 


Huacheng Road: "If your brother wants to see the image of God, the best 
brother I have ever seen has not seen it before, and I will show it to you 
later. Don't look at it 1n this cave." 


Xie pity said: "Why? I think that the statues in this Pantheon, you all 
carved very well, really good. If you can't see, I will feel a pity. Say, that 


Who knows, Huacheng immediately said: "I am going to ruin." 


Seeing that he really wants to leave, Xie Pity quickly took him and said: 
"Don't stop! Why ruin it! Just because I saw it? Well... I am telling the 
truth, actually I only saw a little bit. On the Yuan Festival, the days of the 
military tour and the military camp, many of them have not been read, 
because the two believe that the two of them do not let me see, so I don’t 
know what you painted. You don’t want to destroy it!” 


" " 


Huacheng turned his face and said: "Really?" 


Xie pity took him and sincerely said: "Really. You don't want me to see, I 
don't see it." 


Huacheng seems to be in a sigh of relief, smiling: "There is nothing to 
look at. What you want to see, let me paint directly." 


His reaction, thanking pity is really strange. But he did not want to force 
the city to ruin those precious murals, and forced to press himself. After a 
few steps, suddenly frowned, said: "... is not right." 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 179: The gods 
of the gods are really 5 
The author has something to say: December 14th notice: fever, tonsil 


inflammation, really uncomfortable, take a day off. Today, we don't have 
to brush it. 





The last time I had a good cold, I was still coming back again, and it was 
more serious than the last time. The tonsils were inflamed... I don’t know 
how much I wore. I haven’t brushed too early in the daytime. Look at it... 


Huacheng Road: "What?" 


He looked back at Huacheng and said: "White is no phase, why come to 
Tongluoshan?" 


Huacheng Road: "Maybe his strength has not fully recovered, and he wants 
to re-born with a copper stove." 


Thanks to pity: "So that is the case, that 1s to say, now he is not... 
absolutely?" 


Huacheng Road: "Not without this possibility." 


Fang Cai, Bai Wuxiang pretending to be "wind letter" and "Music", 
suddenly smashed out, appeared in the monks, plus the first reaction of 
thanking is "can't beat, run!", then pulled the flower city to escape, the two 
did not How long has he been directly confronted with him, so he has not 
tried to find out, and now the white is no phase, what is the strength in the 
end. 


Is it a bluff? Still more than enough? There are a few tricks in the flash of 
the light stone, which cannot be judged at all. Xie pity said: "I just saw the 
two fake skins and thought that he was stronger, but maybe... he has not 


fully recovered yet, maybe it is his weakest time now? Otherwise why 
should he Come to Tonglushan? Maybe... I can try." 


Try to win him now! 
Huacheng immediately said: "Okay. I am going to confront him." 


Thanks for a moment, I returned to God and said, "Don't, don't face him. I 
will try it!" 


Between the desperate ghost kings, it is generally not easy to fight up, 
such as the black water sinking boat and the blood rain and the flowers, all 
year round and peaceful. Because the ghost kings are not like the gods in 
heaven, the strength, the palace view, the believers, the sphere of 
influence, and the minds of the people. They will hide their true strengths 
like hiding their lives. They don't know each other's strengths, and no one 
knows what the consequences of the two fights will be. Therefore, if you 
can maintain balance, try to balance. Huacheng Road: "Don't worry. The 
outcome is unknown. Otherwise, does the brother think that I will let you 
alone against him?" 


Xie pity shook his head and said: "No, Saburo, we are different. He...will 
not kill me, I promise." 


Huacheng Road: "Why?" 


After a moment of hesitation, thank you for choosing not to answer, just 
saying: "You don't know how terrible this thing 1s..." 


Huacheng interrupted him quietly and said: "His Royal Highness! - I 
know." 


Thanks to this, I remembered that Huacheng had participated in the Xianle 
Army. He also experienced the battlefield of Xianle and witnessed the 
horror of the corpse. However, after all, Huacheng did not witness the 
battle of Junwu and Bai Wuxiang. He has never dealt with Bai Wuxiang. 


Thinking of this, Xie pity shook his head and said: "I don't believe you, 
just me... I don't want you to go out of the pool." 


Wen Yan, Huacheng eyes flashed, hey, he smiled: "Brother 1s relieved. I 
am already dead, not so easy to die again. What's more, you forgot what I 
said? As long as he did not find my ashes, then I can't help me." 


After he reminded him, thank you for remembering that there is still such 
a thing, busy: "Wait! Don't say anything else. Saburo, your bones and 
ashes are hidden?" 


Huacheng Road: "I have already hid it." 


Xie pity nodded, paused, still could not help but ask: "Are you sure you are 
hiding? Is that place safe enough? Will not be found?" 


Flower City calmly said: "For me, that 1s the safest place in the world." 


Xie pity feels that there is no absolute in everything, saying: "Is it so 
sure?" 


Huacheng smiled and said: "If its hiding place 1s destroyed, then I don't 
have to exist. Of course, I am sure." 


Although thankfulness is very concerned about the meaning of "do not 
have to exist", but the place is not safe, there may be ears listening, it is 
inconvenient to talk in depth, press not to mention. But when it comes to 
this, thank you really want to ask Huacheng - how did he die? 


I really want to know, but I can’t ask. After death, the reason why the soul 
can stay in the world is to rely on obsession. In most cases, the obsession 
with pain and resentment is the strongest. And can become a ghost king, 
obsessive is not a general deep. He was afraid that he would not be able to 
accept the flower city as if he had been stabbed, and he might not be able 
to stand it himself. How did Huacheng come over in the past 800 years? 


When I thought of it, I suddenly had a terrible thought in my mind. When I 
got out of the cold sweat, I immediately said, "Saburo!" 


Huacheng Road: "What?" 


Thanks for the slightest twitching of the fingers, said: "I have a question to 
ask you." 


Huacheng Road: "Although ask." 


Xie pity stared at him and said: "In the past 800 years, you have seen me 
in Xianle, what other time have you seen me?" 


" " 


Huacheng slowly turned around and said: "Unfortunately, although I tried 
to find it, I never gave up, but no." 


Xie pity asked: "Really?" 


Huacheng looked straight into his eyes and said: "Really. Why did my 
brother ask this question?" 


Xie pity was not easy to detect and relieved, and barely smiled: "No, just, 
over the years, it has been ugly, confused, and very frustrating. I think if I 
saw it for you, I am afraid it is not very good." 


Huacheng Haha said: "How come?" 
Cheer, but did not laugh at all, said: "Not a joke, really failed." 


Wen Yan, Huacheng gathered a smile, right color said: "That doesn't 
matter. Didn't you have said that you have already said it?" 


Thank you for a moment: "I? What have I said?" 


Huacheng is very leisurely: "For me, it is you who have unlimited scenery. 
It is also you who fall from the dust. The focus is on 'you', not on what 


mf 


kind of ‘you’. 


He rushed to pity his eyes and raised an eyebrow, saying: "I am the same." 


Thanks for listening to it for a long while, suddenly a "squeaky" sound, a 
hand on his face, feeling the whole head 1s cooked, said: "I, have I said 
such a thing?!" 


Huacheng Road: "Yes! Brothers don't want to deny." 
Xie pity arm blocked his face and said: "No, no!" 
Flower City: "Do you want to see your brother? I am looking for you?" 


Thanks and pity, he raised his face: "Is you... can't... No, you can't 
remember all of them!" 


"Just kidding, kidding." 

"To be honest, I don't believe it..." 
"Brother, believe me." 

"I don't believe it!" 


The two went to a fork in the road. At this moment, suddenly the wind 
came, and Huacheng was slightly sideways, blocking him in front of him, 
raising his hand and seemed to want to protect him. 


The wind is actually not big, of course, there is no need to block, but the 
action of Huacheng is completely natural. The wind went away, and the 
hair was harassed and troubled, and Xie pity suddenly found that when 
Huacheng did not look at him, his expression and contour lines were cold. 
Absent-minded, indifferent, and even the city did not realize that he was 
moving without thinking, it seems that protecting him is an instinct. 


Thanks and pity: "Sanlang!" 


Huacheng looked at him from the side, and then he smiled and said: "His 
Royal Highness, what happened?" 


Thanks to pity, Huacheng should not realize that he smiled. 


A clear and strong voice said in his heart that this person really regarded 
him as a god. 


Xie pity fingers secretly tightened his hand and said: "When we go out 
from Tongluoshan, I have a lot of words to tell you." 


Huacheng slightly nodded and said: "Good. I am waiting." 
Thanks to the pity: "Is it true that they are out?" 
Huacheng Road: "It has already gone out." 


Thanks to pity: "Is there nothing to say? He didn't catch up with us, and 
didn't stop them? Where is he now? How far is it from us?" 


Huacheng Road: "He 1s..." 


One sentence 1s not finished, the look is slightly changed, the second 
finger 1s lighter than the right eyebrow bow, and you must say: "...he is 
gone." 


wen 


Thank you for your pity: "How could it be gone?" 


Huacheng still does not panic, staring at the view, said: "It disappeared out 
of thin air." 


Even if it is a ghost, it is impossible to disappear in the darkness of the 
Pantheon and surrounded by the dead butterfly! 


Xie pity said: "I look?" He said, holding the shoulders of Huacheng with 
both hands, slightly rubbing his feet and touching the foreheads of the two. 
Huacheng’s hand rubbed his waist and seemed to move away, but in the 
end it was put up and tightened. 


Xie pity flashed in front of the scene just before the flower city saw it. The 
white man came to a grotto, and countless deadly butterflies rushed up 
again, wrapped him into a silvery human figure, stalemate for a while, and 
he was shaken, silver burst, smashing, silver butterflies were The 
earthquake became a flood of phosphorescence. However, after this silver 
deposition, he disappeared! 


Next, Huacheng's right eye also swept through countless tunnels with his 
sight, and found the figure of white. Xie pity slightly moved his face and 
wondered: "Don't you leave?" 


However, others may not know, but he knows best that as long as he has no 
seeing him, he will surely stalk him. Huacheng Road: "Maybe our 
inference is true. His priority is to rebuild the body with the help of a 
copper furnace, so he left first." 


The voice came directly from his ear. Thanks to this, he returned to God 
and found that Huacheng’s face was in his hand. He was slightly bent over 
by him, and he quickly loosened his hand and said, “Knuck him! ” 


This time they came to Tonglushan to stop the task of blocking all possible 
candidates. The two men have been avoiding the white man. After clearing 
the situation, they walked through countless statues and actively searched 
for it. After a while, I came to the place where the white man disappeared. 


Sure enough, except for a few statues, there is no one. The silvery silver, 
and the silver butterflies that were not completely shattered, fluttered on 
the ground, and bowed down. Although they didn't know if it was useful, 
they still wanted to pick them up by hand. At this time, he heard the sound 
of Huacheng sounding behind his back: "... Brother, come to me." 


The voice was with repressed anger, but the anger was not directed at him. 


Xie pity looked up and found that Huacheng had a fire in his eyes, staring 
at a statue in front. 


It was a statue that was covered by white yarn from the head to the end. It 
was motionless and could reveal a large outline. He seems to be pointing 


his hand to somewhere, so one end is extremely sharp. 


However, at this moment, the sharp tip of the sword slowly oozes a layer 
of blush, and is constantly expanding, smudged, soaked the white gauze. 


There is blood on the sword! 


Anyone who sees this scene will also know that this statue 1s weird, 
maybe, at this moment, this white gauze is not the original idol, but 
something else. Thanks to pity, and stood side by side with Huacheng, the 
heart of the sword pointed to the statue. When Huacheng calmed his face 
and waved his hand, the white gauze was opened. 


The pleasurable eyes suddenly contracted. 


Under the white gauze, it is still a statue of his god. This is a statue of a 
prince, a sword in one hand, a flower in one hand, and a smile. However, 
this smile was a bit bloody. 


The source of blood is the sword in his hand. On the blade, a teenager was 
pierced, with a bandage on his face and blood. It is Lang Firefly! 2k novel 
reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 180: The 
copper furnace must have an out 


His head turned to one side and seemed to have lost consciousness. At first 
sight, it was Lang Ying, thanking him for saving, but he quickly stopped 
and reacted: It was only here that there was only white phase, how could 
Lang Fire suddenly appear? 


Seeing that the original sacred prince of the sacred priest was so smeared 
with the blood of the patter, the flower city was very angry, his face was 
angry, and the curvy smothered his hands in the cold. 


He said word by word: "Go down." 


The head of "Lang Ying" was really back, and opened his eyes, slowly 
pulling himself out of the sword and falling to the ground. 


Fang Cai, after he shattered the wave of the silver butterfly, the silver 
flashes in the flash, hid under the white gauze of this statue, turned into a 
look of Lang Ying. 


Since he can be transformed into Lang Ying, then he must have seen Lang 
Ying. Thanks to the pity: "What about real firefly?" 


m 


Huacheng said: "Maybe, there is no such thing as 'the real Lang Firefly. 


If, from the beginning, "Lang Ying" does not exist, but the state of nothing 
is completely restored, things are well explained. However, thanking her 
for thinking about the little girl who died in Junshan, I would rather not do 
this. He quickly thought of another possibility, slowly said: "And maybe... 
he ate Lang Yao." 


The opposite "Lang Ying" body is gradually lengthening and pulling high, 
and the bandage on the face slowly falls off, revealing the sad face inside, 
smelling the words, slightly looking up, seems to smile, said: "Guess it." 


Sure enough. 


After the white phase was dispelled by Junwu, he left a sorrowful soul to 
wander around the world. I don’t know how long it has been floating. I 
don’t know when it was, I found Lang Ying, who is also a ghost. 


He must use any method to confuse or deceive Lang Ying, so that Lang 
Ying promised to let him board on himself. Otherwise, with his remaining 
weak soul, he may not be able to swallow Lang. 


After he sticks to Lang Ying, he slowly recovers. The final result is the 
way that Xie Li and Huacheng see at the moment. The ghost eats the ghost, 
and the white does not have the opposite of the host. Just like He Xuan ate 
the vernacular true fairy, Lang Ying became his vassal. 


Not a moment, "Lang Ying" has completely turned into a white 
appearance. Huacheng stared at him and said: "Why did Lang Ying 
promise you to borrow his spirit?" 


It should be noted that this kind of thing is similar to a stranger asking for 
“open your door and let me go in and eat and live with you”. Lang Sui Hao 
is also a ghost who has lived for hundreds of years. Although he is afraid 
of shrinking, he is not stupid. White has no phase temperature: "Of course 
I can answer you. However, you are sure of the person next to you, would 
you like me to say it here?" 


Huacheng looked to the side. The look of thankfulness was slightly weird, 
but he did not notice his gaze at all. White has no direction and said: "Last 
name Lang, Yongan, human face disease. Why did you promise me to eat 
him? Do you still don't know why?" 


The face of thankful pity was white, and the back of the hand was raised 
with blue veins. A sword went and shouted: "Shut up!" 


The white has no escape, and the sword is actually a "squeaky" sound that 
cuts off the long sword held in the hand of his own god. 


This is good, the statue of Prince Edward, the sword of the Prince has 
become a broken sword, and this statue has become a remnant. Thanks to 
the time when he came back, it was like being poured a cold water. The 
dead butterfly butterflies were irritated in general, swarming up, and the 
whites did not make a string of laughter from the cold and the heat. From 
the tolerance, the sleeves were covered, no longer entangled, and quickly 
plunged into the darkness. Xie pity looked at the truncated stone sword on 
the ground, subconsciously to Huacheng Road: "I'm sorry..." 


Huacheng interrupted him: "Your Majesty said sorry to me, isn't that 
funny? He is gone, how?" 


Thanks for your pity, and said: "Have you escaped? Can't let him enter the 
copper furnace!" 


The two chased the Wanshen Cave and climbed over the snowy mountains. 
Just emerging a head, I felt a shake in the mountains. Looking up, the 
avalanches are more than just the only ones. It seems that what has been 
buried under the heavy snow is awakened, and it is raging, shaking off the 
millennium of snow. Thanks for your pity: "Is this still going?!" 


Huacheng firmly grasped the hand of Xie's pity and said: "Take me away!" 


The two went against the torrent of snow and ice. Although it was 
extremely difficult and dangerous, almost stepping back three steps, but 
still avoiding the most violent snow and stone flow and countless pits, 
rushing out of a road up the mountain. 


Finally climbed to the highest point, frozen the top of the mountain, thick 
frozen, I don't know how many layers, thank you for feeling a little faster 
to slip a little faster, but Huacheng took him steady and did not fear. The 
two came to the crater, and the mountain pass was like a giant mouth 
roaring to the sky, very spectacular. Looking down, it was dark. I don't 
know if it is an illusion. In the deepest part, there is a red light that bursts 
into the horror. Xie pity is somewhat inexplicable, hold your head and 
fight, let it be blown away by the wind and snow, said: "Has he already 
gone in?" 


Huacheng only glanced at it and he smiled and said: "I have already 
entered." 


“How come you see?” 
"The copper furnace is being closed." 


Thanks for the pity, I was caught off guard: "What happened? It was closed 
so soon? Isn’t it necessary to get in a few ghosts to start killing?" 


Huacheng Road: "That is the general situation. But if the copper furnace 
thinks that the entrant has great potential to break through the copper 
furnace, and the ghost has asked him to seal the mountain, it will also be 
closed." He paused, he said, "In the beginning, I did just that." 


Thanks to the pity: "Is it absolutely? The ghost king who has become a 
must, if you enter the copper furnace again, what will happen?" 


Huacheng Road: "It’s the same as what the already-rising priest wants to 
do again." 


In other words, stronger is stronger! 


If you let the white phase break through this barrier, the consequences are 
unimaginable. 


And when he broke out of the copper furnace and went out of the 
mountain, the first one to find, it must be thankful! 


Staring at the bottomless, endless abyss for a while, thanked slowly and 
calmly: "Sanlang, I...may go down and make a break." 


Huacheng whispered: "Let's go. I will accompany you." 


Xie pity looked up at him, Huacheng also raised his head, looked at him, 
raised an eyebrow, and smiled: "It is nothing more than killing an 
inconvenience, and then breaking through a copper furnace. It 1s not 
difficult." 


Seeing him so relaxed, thanking the original tightness of the mood can not 
help but loosen some, a slight smile. Immediately, Huacheng Road: 
"However, there is something." 


Thank you: "?" 


He tipped slightly, and Huacheng suddenly took his waist and took it to his 
arms. The other hand gently lifted his lower jaw, which contained his lips. 


The kisses of the wind and snow for a long time, the lips of the two were 
slowly separated. Xie pity stayed for a while, finally a spirit, woke up, 
blushing, squinting: "... dry, what suddenly?!" 


Although it was not the first time to do this kind of thing, but before they 
used the grand reasons of "borrowing mana", "difficulty", "inadvertent". 
Now, when it comes to certain things, these reasons are suddenly exposed 
to the true face of hypocrisy, and the meaning of such things is not the 
same. He simply doesn't know where to put his hand. Is he grabbing the 
arm of Huacheng, or pushing the chest of Huacheng, or blocking the face 
of Huacheng? 


Huacheng was in his ear, and seemed to breathe a sigh of relief. He 
whispered: "...I, first borrow a mana to give it to my Highness, in case I 
need it... Can I accept it?" 


Xie pity and unconscious swallowed his throat and stuttered: "Is this, is 
this a bit? It seems too much... I haven’t paid off yet..." 


Huacheng Road: "Not much. Don't worry. If you have time, you will pay 
off." 


Thanks a lot of chaos, "Hmm er," a few times, just waiting to escape, 
Huacheng pulled him again, reminded: "His Royal Highness! Where are 
you going. Direction, wrong." 


Thank you for discovering that I actually ran back. I immediately walked 
back, and my feet still fell on the ice. I quickly held the fight and said, 
"No, no. I, I am just a little cold, I want to turn a few. Circles, heat up..." 


He put the brawl on his back and put it on. Finally, he grabbed the hand of 
Huacheng and held it tightly. The two stood side by side, looking at the 
huge abyss below. 


Huacheng tone casually said: "After the solution, I will show my brother 
the most satisfactory statue of my sculpture." 


Thanks: "Okay." 
After that, the two jumped together. 


The whistling wind blew from the ear, and the strong impact was like a 
huge wave, but the hands of the two were not washed away, but they were 
tighter. 


Who knows, in the air, thankful hand suddenly caught an empty. 


It wasn't that he slipped, or was opened by the flower city, but suddenly, 
the hand that was in his palm disappeared, and there was no entity. 


Thanks for the tight heart, shouted: "Sanlang?!" 


He was in the midst of a rapid fall, just shouting out the moment before, 
and the next moment the voice was over a dozen feet away, it sounded 
unreal. I don't know how long it took, and the pity finally settled down. He 
immediately stood up and said: "Sanlang?" 


No one answered. Only the empty echo told him that at this moment he 
was in a huge open space. 


All sides are dark, only the top, thankful to the top of the head. Above, 
there is a white sky, which is gradually shrinking. That is the crater of the 
copper furnace, which is slowly closing. 


However, where did Huacheng go? 
"Boom", thanked the pity for a palm of his hand, want to take care of what 


is underneath. However, the darkness is unfathomable, and there is nothing 
in the fire. The fire seems to be absorbed by the darkness. And he was not 


careful, did not control the mana, the flame was too high, almost burned 
his hair, and quickly threw the fire to the side. Coincidentally, the fire just 
reflected a faint white back not far away. Xie pity was immediately alert, 
saying: "Who!" 


The white back turned and whispered, "You know who I am." 


Although the answer, but the muscles on the face of the person did not 
move. 


Because, that is not a face at all, but a mask that is half-smiling and half- 
smiling. 


Xie pity said: "Sanlang!" 


Although he couldn't help but feel the horrible back when he saw this face, 
he was not scared at the moment, but worried. Naturally, no one answered, 
and the sad and happy face was a little closer to him. "You don't have to 
shout. The copper furnace is closed. Here, only you and me, there is no 
third person." 


Thanks for the subconsciousness again looking at the sky. 


There was a small piece of white sky behind the top, and now that small 
piece of light has been completely swallowed up by the darkness of the 
surrounding. 


This means that the copper furnace is really closed. 

I didn’t expect it, but it will become the current situation. 

He, no white, two people, was locked in the copper furnace? 

Are they two? Why are they two? ! 

Thanks for the hand and the heart, the sword pointed to the white shadow, 


said: "What the **** is going on? Is it a ghost you are doing? Others? 
Where is it now?" 


White has no hands and **** in the heart of Jianfeng, and the other hand 


has bounced on the blade. The sound of" "is crisp and extremely, 
saying: "Go." 


Thanks for seeing this movement, his eyes were cold, and the bones 
creaked. "You said clearly, what is going away?" 


White has no reason to say: "I don't want to follow you, leave, die. Pick 
one." 


Thanks to the heart is a cold first, then a burst of anger surged, a sword 
smashed: "You are less nonsense!" 


White has no chance to catch Jianfeng again and said: "Okay, okay. I am 
really talking nonsense. Don't worry, he has been sent outside the copper 
furnace, even if it is too late to come." 


Thanks for the pity, I am not afraid to catch up, as long as the flower city 
is fine, I am relieved. 


White has nothing to say: "But he still doesn't come in. Otherwise, even if 
he doesn't have that idea now, seeing you later, will you want to follow 
you, it's hard to say." 


Thanks for being unbearable, and a sword, he said: "Shut up!" 


White has never flashed his swords with ease, and thanked him with anger: 
"I am fed up with you, what do you want! What do you want?" When are 
you going to wrap me up? Why aren't you dead yet? Why are you coming 
to the copper furnace!" 


White has no reason: "Because you!" 


Thanks for the stagnation, he took a breath and said: "What do you mean?" 


White replied calmly: "Because you are here, I am here too." 


When I heard this answer, the face of thankfulness was somewhat 
distorted. 


However, even if he is angry again, the killing intention is heavy, and the 
white phase is always like how he can see how his next sword will come 
out, staggered by a millimeter. The more you pray for the sword, the more 
you understand the cruel facts: 


Can't win! 


"Yes." It seems as if he can see his heart, white and nowhere. "You can't 
win." 


As soon as the voice fell, he slashed his hand on the wrist. A sharp pain 
spread to the whole body, thanking the pity and letting go of the sword, 
and then he grabbed his hair and smashed into the ground! 


The ears creaked, the nose was bloody, and the brain was turbulent. 


For a while, thank you for feeling that one hand had lifted his head out of 
the broken ground, and a voice was on the top: "Poor, poor." 


Thanks for giving me a blood, my eyes were blurred by blood and 
darkness. White has no reason: "Every time I see His Royal Highness, you 
always look like this. It is heartbreaking and enjoyable." 


Xie pity bit a bite of blood, don't let it come out, dumb voice: "...you don't 
want to be too proud. Now I can't win you, but...someone can. Even if you 


can go out from the copper furnace, Jun I may not be able to kill you 
again." 


Moreover, there is a flower city! 


Who knows, there is no such thing as white: "Who said that it would be me 
to come out of the copper furnace?" 


Hearing words, thank you for your pity. 


not him? Not who he will be? 


Bai Wuxiang lifted his face and looked at him. He said: "His Royal 
Highness, I think, you may have misunderstood. There 1s indeed a place in 
this copper furnace, but it is not me. It is you. "" 


Thanks for the horror: "...What are you talking about? I am not..." 


When the voice did not fall, he recollected and was shocked by a cold 
Sweat. 


White is irrelevant: "This is the case, congratulations, finally understand 
my true purpose. Isn't this your favorite 'third way'?" 


In the current copper furnace, there is only one ghost and one priest. It 
seems that there are only two roads. Either the white does not kill him, and 
then break through the copper furnace; or two people do not want to go 
out, together forever in this copper furnace. 


However, in fact, there is a third road. 


As long as thank you for committing suicide immediately, incarnate as a 
ghost, kill white no phase, he can stand up and break through the copper 
furnace! 


Thanks to pity, it is easy to get back from the shock, saying: "...What do 
you want to do? You don't have to think about it! Why do you want to do 
this?! Just to make me a success? I am not as crazy as you! Even if you I 
want to kill you, I can't win you! If you deliberately lose to me, the copper 
furnace may not recognize it!" 


White has nothing to say: "Yes? You can't win me? That's not necessarily." 
Said, he reached out the other hand. With the fire not far away, thank you 
for seeing it, and there was a mask on the hand, exactly the same as the 


one on the white face. 


White has no reason: "Remember this sad face? It is for you." 


Thank you for your eyes wide open. 


Fear is like a worm, and it is densely packed. He reluctantly said: "...take it 
away, take it away... take it away!" 


White did not smile, said: "It looks like, the memory of His Royal 
Highness is not very good. If so, I will help you think about it, okay?" 


After the words are finished, they can't help but say that they will combine 
the pale sorrowful face with the boundless darkness and press down on the 
face of Xie. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 181: Lantern 
night, a dollar to buy a lonely soul 


The author has something to say: Come back~ 


This volume is in the past, the timeline is the first time after the death of 
Xianle. Take the second volume. Not too long~ 


Xie pity is awakened by life. 
He was shocked by a cold sweat, sitting up and slamming his face. 


The reason for awakening is a dream. In the dream, his father and mother 
hanged their own beams. He saw it, but he had no joy and no sorrow, no 
tears to flow, and he was prepared to prepare himself a white scorpion. Just 
put his head in and saw that there was A white man wearing a sorrowful 
face sneered at him, and he was shocked. The rope loop tightened and the 
suffocation came and he woke up. 


The sky outside the window was white, and there was a voice outside: "His 
Royal Highness! Are you awake?" 


Thanks for saying: "Wake up!" 


After violently breathing for a while, he discovered that he was not on the 
couch, and there was a straw mat on the ground. Although it has a lot of 
straw and is soft and soft, it is still not very comfortable for him. He still 
can't get used to this simple bed. It is not an inn palace, but a dilapidated 
Prince Temple. The place where he lies is the apse that has been smashed 
and then evacuated. 


It was the wind letter that uttered his voice. He went out to eat in the early 
morning and urged him to go out to eat outside. Thank you for your pity, 
and got up. 


The suffocation in the dream was too realistic, and his hand involuntarily 
touched the neck. The intention is to confirm that there is no whitehead or 
deadly trace of the twisted head. Who knows, actually touched one thing. 


Xie pity was shocked first, and fluttered to the mirror that was thrown to 
the ground not far away. When I took it up, a black collar was looped 
between the white necks. At this point, it was finally calm and all 
remembered. 


Curse. 
Cheering fingers tried to touch this thing. 


Once you are degraded as a mortal, there is no more privilege than aging is 
a little slower than ordinary people. However, when Jun Wu gave him this 
curse, he still left his hand and opened the door of convenience. 


Although this curse locked his mana, he also locked his age and flesh, so 
that he would not die. Moreover, Jun Wu told him that if you can fly 
again, how to get rid of the dust, this thing will also be taken down for 
you. 


However, this thing is worn on the body, like a sinner who has been 
smacked on the face of a prisoner. It is undoubtedly a shame. Thinking of 
this, thank you for holding your hand to the side, grabbing a white 
scorpion and putting it on your head. When I raised my arm, I suddenly 
remembered the fear of the neck being slowly tightened in my dreams. I 
hesitated for a moment, but I finally wrapped it up and wrapped my neck 
and the lower half face meticulously. Then I went out. 


The wind and the feelings have been waiting for him outside. Fengxin 
brought a steaming steamed bun back, and the love was slowly eating. 
Fengxin handed two to him, but thanked to see that the white and dry food 
was not appetizing, or shook his head, did not pick up. Wind channel: 
"Your Highness, you have to eat something in the morning, what we have 
to do next, can not cope with sitting still." 


I don’t want to lift my eyelids and say: "Yeah, there is no other thing to eat 
without eating this. If you faint again, you should not eat this too." 


Feng Xin slammed him: "What do you say?" 


Xie pity flew for a few years, forgot the taste of eating, and some days 
ago, I almost fainted, only to think that he had not eaten anything for three 
or four days, and he said this is what he said. On the sidelines, I refused to 
let the two men fight up early in the morning and open the subject in time. 
"Go, don't know if you can find a job today." 


The original thanksgiving is not only the golden branches and leaves, but 
also the body of the heavens and humans. It does not eat human fireworks, 
and naturally does not need to worry about livelihoods. But now, saying 
that he is a prince, Xianleguo is gone, saying that he is a god, has long 
been shackled, and is generally the same as mortals, naturally have to 
worry about how the days have passed. The old man of the monk is of 
course the practice of catching ghosts, but it 1s not that every day there are 
demons and ghosts to give you and legal things to do for you. Therefore, 
most of the time, they still have to find some scattered work, such as 
helping people unload. Unloading, out of force or something. 


Even if this kind of scattered work, it may not be able to grab it. Because 
today, there are too many poor people displaced. These poor people saw 
that they had a living, they didn’t need to pay for their work, and they were 
willing to do a half-bowl of rice, and they rushed to the top. How many 
people here have robbed them? Even if you can **** it, thank you for 
weighing it, maybe you will feel that others need it more than they do. 
Sure enough, after shaking for a long time, it was nothing. Admiration: 
"Can we not find a stable and decent job?" 


Wind channel: "nonsense. Can be found early found. Decent work can not 
look at the face? On the face of the temple, who does not recognize, who is 
recognized, who is stable?" 


I don’t talk. Xie Pity wrapped the white plaque with the lower half of his 
face tighter. Indeed, if you recognize who he 1s, either they will run away 
on their own feet or they will be beaten. For example, the dartmaster, who 


would be assured that the person with unknown origins and faces would 
not be exposed would be a dartmaster? They can't do the black beatings 
that kill people, and the choice 1s very limited. 


God is unlikely to worry about not eating enough. But people are going to 
eat. Sincerely, I don’t have to think about this kind of thing since I was a 
child. This is a problem that has really plagued him for more than a 
decade. And if God does not know how the taste of hunger is, then how can 
God know the mood of the hungry believers? How can you be in love with 
it? Things can only be done now, and this is also a kind of experience. 


At this time, there was a sound of knocking and drumming in the distance. 
A large group of people had gathered together. The three people looked at 
it with the flow of the past. Several warriors and harlequins screamed in 
the crowd. In the art. Mu Qing also proposed: "It is really not going to sell 
art." 


Xie Pity is also considering this, but has not answered, Feng Xin looked at 
the side: "What a stupid thing, the power of His Royal Highness, how can I 
do that kind of thing?" 


The feelings turned a blind eye and said: "The bricks have all moved. Is 
there anything different about the art?" 


Wind channel: "The bricks are to rely on their own strength to eat, but the 
art is for people to enjoy, to give people a joke, of course not the same!" 
Said, the harlequin that fell and jumped, everyone laughed, he I climbed 
up and nodded, and smashed a few rewards on the ground. When I saw it, I 
thanked my heart and gave me a sense of resistance. I shook my head hard 
and took the road of "selling art" from my mind. Mu Qing met, said: "Yes. 
Then be something." 


Wind channel: "There has been a lot of things, or else I can't get it now, 
and the rest can't be done anymore." 


Suddenly, there was an exclamation in the back of the crowd. Someone 
shouted: "The soldiers are coming! The soldiers are coming!" 


As soon as the soldiers came, the crowds watching the crowds were 
scattered. In a short time, a group of soldiers armed with a blade, the new 
armor was bright, the prestige was swaying, and the street was swaying 
and swaying. When they saw suspicious ones, they caught the cross- 
examination. The three people are hiding in the crowd and listening to 
others talking about: 


"Who is this arresting?" 


"Reassuring, it is not to arrest us. I have heard that it is the Xianle royal 
family who has sneaked away." 


"It is said that some people have seen suspicious people in the vicinity, so 
recently they have been very strict in the city." 


"The truth? It’s awful, and actually fled to us!" 


Hearing the words, the three exchanged a few eyes, thanked and 
whispered: "Hurry and see." 


The other two nodded. They left the crowd silently and walked for a while 
without notice. This was converged and flew away. 


Going to a deserted hillside, Xie pity saw a thick smoke rising in the 
forest, and my heart was screaming. Did the soldiers of Yongan have 
already found this place and set fire to the fire? 


Going forward, there is a dilapidated hut hidden in the woods. I don’t 
know which house the hunter left behind when he was watching the 
mountain. The smoke was floating from the house, thanking the pity: 
"Mother! What happened? Are you there?" 


Shouted, a woman greeted her and said, "I am coming, you are here?" 


It is the queen. She was dressed in a cloak, and she lost a lot of weight, 
slightly different from the past lady. Seeing that the mother is fine, and 
full of joy, there is no difference, and she is relieved, and she is busy 
asking: "What is the smoke?" 


The Queen is embarrassed to say: "...nothing is going on. I want to cook 
some food today..." 


Thanks for the pity and laughter, said: "Don't! What kind of meal? You eat 
the wind and believe in the things they sent over every day. This smoke is 
too noticeable, there are people who smoke, will recruit Yongan soldiers, 
only we They have already met them in the city, and the city will be 
martial, and we have to change places." 


Fengxin and admiration entered the house to destroy the smoke, and the 
queen did not dare to care about it. After going to the house, he discussed 
with the king. The wind letter came out and whispered: "Your Highness, 
don't you go and see the Lord?" 


Xie pity shook his head and said: "No." 


They are two fathers and sons, one is the king of the country, one is the 
*k* Of the gods. I really can’t say who is more boring than anyone else. I 
don’t have any face. If I sit down face to face, I will only blink and I won’t 
talk, so I can’t see you. I will not see you. Thank you for your enthusiasm: 
"After the mother, you will pick it up later, we will leave today. Come over 
to pick you up at night. Let's go first." 


The queen quickly came out again and said: "The emperor, are you 
leaving? After so many days, how come?" 


Thanks to pity: "I still have to practice." 


In fact, it is still necessary to find a job, otherwise it will not be able to 
make up the rations of so many people. Queen's Road: "Did you eat in the 
morning?" 


Thanks for shaking his head. The three people are now hungry. Queens 
said: "This is the worst body, but fortunately I only cooked a pot of 
porridge, come in and eat." 


Thank you for your pity: "When you cook a pot of porridge, how can you 
get so much smoke, like burning a palace..." 


The Queen also said to the wind and the feelings: "You two children also 
come and eat together." 


The wind and the love of the two did not expect to have this treatment, 
even after resigning, the Queen insisted. The two had to sit down carefully 
at the table, and they were somewhat flattered. Surprise is a surprise 
surprise. 


However, after waiting for the pot on the back end of the king, their 
surprise turned into a horror. 


After returning to the city, the nausea of the love has not stopped, 
stumbled into the ground: "I thought... that porridge, the smell smelled 
like stewed water, I didn't expect it, it tasted like it!" 


Fengxin gnawed his teeth: "Stop! Don't force people to recall the pot 
thing! After all, the queen is... the body of Wanjin... never cook... this is 
already very... vomit!..." 


Mu Qing said: "Is it wrong? If you don't feel like stewing water, 
you...request for the queen and reward you a bowl! Vomit!..." 


The two vomited and vomited, thanked them for grabbing them, and 
repeatedly shot the back, saying: "Don't vomit! Look, the front... seems to 
be working!" 


Sure enough, the three men went forward, and a few pretty little heads 
were sipping on the street to help people, the rewards were not bad, and 
the number of people was not limited, how much was used, the three 
quickly responded Mixed in a group of ragged, skinny poor people, they 
came to a muddy open space in droves. It seems that someone is going to 
build a new home, so to start the repair, fill it in first. The three worked 
hard and they were all covered with muddy water. Fengxin, while carrying 
the soil, squinted and licked his stomach: "...1 am fucking! I feel that the 
pot of stewed water is fine in my stomach!" 


Xie pity turned back with a basket of soil, whispered: "Can you still insist? 
Should you sit next to you?" 


Thank you for your kindness: "You still have to stay next to you." 
Thanks for your pity: "No. I can still hold on." 


Mu Qing turned his eyes and said: "You still don't insist. If your clothes 
are dirty, I have to wash them for you. I would rather do your work 
together." Someone shouted: "Work hard, Don't talk! Don't be lazy! Do you 
want to take your money?" 


The wind letter is very tenacious, or continue to persist, but also backed 
twice as much dirt as the original, saying: "There is not much money, is it 
worth screaming for a good fortune?" 


It’s easy to struggle from the day when the sun is raging to the sunset, and 
you’re done. Physically, the three are not too tired, but they are so tired, 
but only for a little rich labor and rations, the heart is more tired than the 
body. They were so easy to get empty and lay on a piece of land that was 
slightly clean. At this time, another group of people came in a noisy way. 
Several men moved a stone statue and walked slowly. 


Thanks for raising his head slightly, said: "What is that like?" 
Mu Qing also took a look and said: "The new statue of the town here." 
Thank you for your words. 


If in the past, there is no doubt that the preferred image of the town, must 
be his prince, but now I do not know which god. Most of them are Jun Wu, 
and it may be a new priest. 


For a while, thank you for still can't help but want to see, who replaced 
him, so he barely got up and went to the crowd in front to look at it. The 
stone statue is facing him, he can't see his face, but it seems to be 
squatting. This makes him even more curious. Which **** statue will be 
squatting? He circled another big circle and turned a corner to see. 


This time, his whole brain is blank. 


The face of the idol is actually himself! 


The squatting image was placed on the ground, and someone patted its 
head rudely, saying: "It’s finally shipped, this grandson 1s quite heavy!" 


"What do you do with such an image? It’s ugly, can you get a **** Wuwu? 
Isn’t that who..." 


"That, isn't it? Now isn't it bad to say that he would be unlucky? You dare 
to worship? Also shipped specially..." 


"You don't understand this. If you worship God, it will be unlucky, but this 
stone statue is not brought to worship, it is used to step on. If you step on 
the feet, can you bless your good fortune?" 


Everyone suddenly realized that they all said: "Good meaning, wonderful 
meaning!" 


The wind and the feelings of the truth are also aware of the wrong, and 
when they come up, they can’t speak. The wind letter is about to explode 
on the spot, and the feelings are pulling him, his eyes are warning, 
whispering: "The Prince did not shout, what do you want to shout?" 


Thanks for the lack of voice, the wind letter is not sure if he has other 
considerations, and it is not easy to act rashly, barely swallowing, but in 
the eyes is to spurt fire. Finally, some people shouted: "Is this... is it a bit 
wrong? It is a god, it is His Royal Highness." 


"Hey, Xianle is dead and still the Prince." 


More people said: "This is a different statement. We are swearing at God, 
but not without it, he wants to thank us." 


Xie pity suddenly said: "Oh? Why thank you?" 


The man plausibly said: "Is the threshold of the temple ever seen? 
Thousands of people step on the masses, but, how many wealthy people do 
not see the threshold of a temple to buy themselves as a substitute? 
Because every step on the door, then The threshold will redeem a sin for 
them, and they will pay a share of debt and accumulate a yin. The meaning 


of this sly image is the same. Every time we step on one of his head, or 
spit a spit, it is not Give him Prince Edward's merits? So he should thank 
us for being..." 


Thanks again, I can’t listen anymore. 
The man said the word "thank you". He raised his hand and punched it. 


The crowd blasted the pot: "What are you doing!" "Calling people!" "Who 
is making trouble?!" 


Fengxin had long wanted to swear, and he also screamed and joined the 
battle. I don’t know whether I’m investing in it or being affected. In short, 
all three have started. In the melee, thank you for being forced to tear off 
his face for a few times. Fortunately, there is no. The three of them all got 
their hands, but the other people were so crowded, and later they took the 
two people and warned them if they wanted to kill the mortal sin. This one 
was frightened and finally, though I had a good time, but the three were 
also driven out. 


Walking along a river, the three men's steps slowed down. Mu Qing with a 
blue-faced face, angered: "It took a whole day to work hard, and finally I 
got a fight, I didn't get anything!" 


Fengxin wiped the blood on his mouth and said: "At this time, are you still 
paying?" 


Mu Qing said: "It is because of this time, so it is more necessary to raise 
money! When is this? When the food is not enough! Even if it is not 
recognized, it 1s useless, no money is not enough! Can you bear it?" 


Thank you for your words. Wind channel: "How to endure? It has been 
made into a kind of sly like a person to step on the face! It is not you who 
dare to be trampled on the face, so light." 


Mu Qing said: "From the defeat to the present, it is not the first time I 
have encountered such a thing, and I will certainly encounter more in the 


future. If he can't learn to take it as soon as possible, I am afraid I will not 
have to live." 


The wind is resentful and authentic: "Is it accustomed to? What is 
accustomed to? Is it insulting to others? Is it common for mortals to step 
on his face? Why should you take this kind of thing for granted?" 


Thanks to pity and irritability: "Oh! Don't make a noise. Is this little thing 
worth making such a big noise?" 


The two men shut up in unison. 


After a pause, thank you with a sigh and said: "Let's go. Look for a car, 
pick them up after the mother. I have to leave the city tonight." 


Wind channel: "Good." 


The two walked side by side, and suddenly found that the feelings did not 
keep up. Thanks for turning back, wondering: "Muscle?" 


Silence for a while, admire: "His Royal Highness, I want to say something 
to you." 


Thanks to pity: "What?" Fengxin impatiently said: "What happened to 
you? They said that they didn't argue with you. What do you want?" 


Admired: "I want to leave." 


Although he had an ominous premonition before his opening, but he really 
said this sentence, thank you for holding his breath. 


Fengxin suspected that he had got it wrong: "What? What do you say?" 


The feelings straightened up the waist, a pair of eyes like an obsidian, 
calmly said: "Please allow me to leave." 


Wind channel: "Leave? What do you do when you leave the Highness of 
the Prince? What do they do with the Queen of the Lord?" 


Mu Qing opened his mouth and finally said, "Sorry, I can't do anything." 
Wind channel: "No, you make it clear, howl can you do nothing?" 


Admiration: "The Lord and Queen are the parents of His Royal Highness, 
and I also have my own mother. She also needs my care. I can't say that I 
am going to take care of others and other parents, not to care for my own 
mother. So please understand that I can't continue to follow you." 


Xie pity felt a little dizzy, leaning against the wall. Fengxin said coldly: 
"Is this the real reason? Why didn't you hear what you said before?" 


Mu Qing said: "This is only one of the reasons. Another reason is that I 
feel that we are all in trouble now, and we have different ideas about how 
to get rid of the difficulties. Excuse me, go on like this, 10,000 It is 
impossible to get rid of this predicament in the year. Therefore, the Tao is 
different." 


The wind was very angry and smiled. He nodded and thanked him. "His 
Royal Highness, have you heard it? Remember what I said at the 
beginning? If you are defamed, he must be the first to run. I am not wrong. 
What?" 


The feelings seem to be slightly irritated by him, whispering: "I don't want 
to kidnap me. I just tell the truth. Everyone has their own heart. No one is 
born to be the right path of the world, the center of the world. Maybe you 
like it. Turn around another person, but others may not be like you." 


Wind channel: "Where are you so many obscured words? Do not bother to 
listen. Directly say that I am ungrateful, how can I not?" 


"enough!" 


Listening to thank you for your voice, both of them stopped. Thanks to the 
hand, he took his hand off the forehead and turned to the affection. He 


stared at him for a while and said, "I don't like to force others." 
The feelings of sorrow licked his lips, still standing straight. 
Thanks for your pity: "Let's go." 


He looked at him with a look of enthusiasm, did not speak a word, bowed 
to him, and turned away. 


Watching his back disappear into the night, the wind is incredulous: "Your 
Highness, you really let him go?" 


Thanks a little sigh, said: "Otherwise? I said I don't like reluctance." 


Wind channel: "No? This kid! What is he doing? He is really gone?! Runs? 
I am fucking!" 


Xie pity squatted down the river and glared at his eyebrows: "Okay. Since 
his heart is no longer here, what can he do with it? Take the rope and tie 
him and let him wash my clothes?" 


I don’t know what to say, I fell down together, half awkward, and airy: 
"Mom, this kid can be rich, can't share trouble, and ran away when 
something happened. You don't remember his kindness to him!" ” 


Thanks to pity: "I told you not to let him remember, you too... don't hang 
on your lips." 


Wind channel: "Then he can't really remember it? I am really fucking! But 
your Highness, you can rest assured, I will definitely not leave." 


Xie pity smiled and couldn't speak. Fengxin stood up again and said, "Are 
we going to pick up the king and the queen? I am going to find a car. You 
are waiting here first." 


Xie polite nodded and said: "I am bothering you. Be careful." 


The wind is ok, leaving. Xie pity also stood up and walked along the river 
for a while, and the whole person still had some unfamiliar feelings. 


The departure of the affection really shocked him. 


Once, he never thought that a person so close would say to leave and leave. 
Second, thank you always believe in "forever", for example, a friend is a 
friend forever, will not betray, will not deceive, will not break. There may 
be a difference, but it should never be because of the reason that "the days 
are too bad to go on." 


It is like a story, heroes and beautiful people, the combination of heaven 
and earth, you should look forward to it forever and ever. Even if it can't, it 
must be because of the tragic death, not because the hero loves to eat meat 
and beauty, but also because the hero is too expensive to be a good man. 


I suddenly walked on the ground and found myself still in the world. This 
taste is really bad. 


After a messy walk, there were many sinister Venus floating on the front. 
Thanks for this, I came back to God. I looked at it and found that it was a 
lantern that floated on the water, coming along with the river. There are 
still a few children, laughing and playing around the river. 


Thanks for the pity: "Ah, today is Zhongyuan." 


In the past, in the Royal View, the Great Fa Conference was held in the 
Mid-Autumn Festival. It was impossible to forget the early expectations. 
Now I don’t remember it at all. He shook his head and continued on. At 
this time, there was a voice coming from the roadside: "Little doll, can't 
you buy it?" 


This voice is so old that it is also with a ghost. Xie pity instinctively 
noticed that it was wrong. He looked up and saw that the two children were 
holding the lights in their hands and stopped at the side of the road. They 
were curious and looked at something. 


In the darkness opposite them, there is a man sitting. It seems to be a black 
robe old man, dirty and integrated with the night. He held a lantern in his 
hand and said to the two children: "The lights here can be different from 


the ordinary lanterns in your arms. These are rare treasures, and you can 
make a wish. "" 


The two children will be suspicious: "Really, really?" 
The old man said: "Of course. Look." 


The lamp in his hand was clearly not lit, but suddenly an unknown red 
light was emitted. And a dozen lights on the ground are also hidden, when 
the faint green light is hidden, it is very strange. 


The two children looked very strange, but thanked and looked at the score. 
Where is the strange baby’? It is clearly the phosphorescence of the dead! 


The lantern will surely seal the soul of the devil, and will make the 
ominous dawn. And this old man must be a half-brother of the wild 
priests, do not know where to catch such a group of unlucky ghosts and 
ghosts, became a lamp. The two children are unknown, so they are happy 
to clap their hands. Xie pity quickly went up and said: "Don't buy. He lied 
to you." 


The old man blinked: "You kid, what to say!" 


Xie pity straightforwardly said: "The lamp is not a baby, it is a demon 
device, it contains ghosts. If you take it back to play, you will be entangled 
in ghosts." 


When the two children heard a ghost, they dared to stay there. "Wow," he 
cried and ran away. The old man was three feet high and mad: "I dare to 
break my business!" 


Xie pity said: "How can you buy and sell in such a place? Don't say this 
kind of ignorant child, that is, the lanterns that adults have bought you in 
this evil spirit will also be badly smoldered, maybe they will be entangled 
in the soul. Don't make a big mistake? Even if you have to sell this kind of 
thing, you should go to a special place to sell it." 


The old man said: "You said it is light, how can I sell these places! 
Everyone is not just looking for a place to set up a stall on the side of the 
road!" He said, holding a bunch of ugly lanterns, discouraged The land is 
about to leave. Thanks for your help: "Wait!" 


The old man said: "What? What are you doing? Do you want to buy it?" 


Thanks: "No, you really want to go somewhere else to continue selling? 
Where are the ghosts in your lights?" 


The old man said: "The battlefields of the wilderness are caught 
everywhere." 


Is that the dead soul of the soldiers wandering? 


Hearing here, thank you can't care, and he said: "Don't sell it. Today is 
Zhongyuan. If anything happens, it's not fun. And these are the heroes of 
the warriors. How can you put them? When the gadgets are sold?" 


The old man said: "When a person dies, it is a smog. What kind of soul is 
not the soul of the soul? Of course, it is more important for me to have an 
old bone. Everyone is going to ask for life. Don’t let me sell me to drink 
the northwest wind? You are so enthusiastic. Are you paying for it?" 


In the end, Xie pity still admit defeat, said: "Well, I buy." He reached into 
his pocket, searched all corners, took out a few small money, said, "Is this 
enough?" 


The old man glanced at him and said, "Not enough! Just so, how 1s this 
enough?" 


Xie pity does not know how much it costs to be a dozen or so lanterns. He 
never looked at how much money he used to buy, but in desperation, he did 
not learn to bargain: "You don't look good at these lanterns." It’s still very 
embarrassing, it’s cheaper.” 


The old man said: "You have told me that this price is cheaper? I have 
never seen you more sour than you, too shameful!" 


Thanks to him, he said that his face was a little hanged. He said, "I am a 
prince. Hasn't anyone said that I am so poor in my life?" He just regretted 
the voice, but the old man did not take his words seriously. , smiled and 
said: "You are a prince, then I am the emperor Laozi!" 


Thanks a little bit fortunate, but a bit embarrassed, simply broken the cans, 
and frankly said: "Sell not to sell? I have no money." 


After a lot of care, the two finally sold. Thanks for the pitiful money, I 
bought a dozen ghost lanterns and hugged the river. The old man ran away 
with money, and Xie Pity sat by the river, untied the red lines that were 
entangled in the lanterns, and released the little devils who had been 
sealed by the spells. By the way, they gave them simple rituals. . 


The faint ghosts of the stars floated out of the lamp. These souls are new 
ghosts that have just died, and they are not weak, so they are still weak, so 
they will be caught by the old man. After they were released from the 
narrow lanterns, they were surrounded by thanksgiving, and they turned 
around closely, and smashed him from time to time. Xie pity stood up and 
whispered: "Go, let's go." 


After being gently picked up by his hand, the ghosts rose higher and 
higher, drifted to the sky, and gradually dispersed. This is also the so- 


called, the soul is back to heaven and earth. 


Xie pity stared at the starry night, for a long time, suddenly heard a small 
voice behind him. 


That voice said: "His Royal Highness..." 


Thanks to pity, then I looked at the sound, and found out that there was 
still a small group of wildfires, no ascension, and no disintegration. 


It seems that this little devil is stronger than other devils, not only has his 
own consciousness, but also can speak. He walked over and wondered: "Is 


you calling me? You... recognize me?" 


The little ghost fire was noticed by him. It seemed to be very excited. It 
seemed to be a teenager to beat and listen to the sound. It said: "Of course 
I recognize you!" 


Thanks for the pity, he is now muddy, strange, and more stunned, holding 
his fist into his mouth, really want to admit it, saying that you admit it 
wrong. Hey, he is right: "Why are you still here? I haven't crossed you yet? 
Is there a step in my place?" Otherwise, how can I pass the ritual, and 
there is one left? 


The unknown ghost floated in front of him, not too far away, and replied: 
"No. You have done nothing wrong. I just don't want to leave." 


Thanks for thinking, said: "Do you have any unfulfilled wishes and 
obsessions?" 


Unknown ghosts say: "Yes." 


Thanks to the pity: "So, let's talk about it, what is it? If it 1s not difficult, I 
will try my best to help you." 


Unknown ghosts, behind the three thousand floating lights that flow with 
the night, it said: "I have a beloved person still in this world." 


Silence for a moment, thank you: "It turns out. Is it your wife?" 
"No, Your Highness. We are not married." 
"what." 


Unknown ghost said: "In fact, he may not remember me very much. We 
have not even said a few words." 


Thank you for your pity: "Have you said a few words? If so, why would it 
be the "loving person" who left your soul in the world? What kind of 
national color?" 


For a moment, he said: "So, what is your wish?" 
Unknown ghost A: "I want to protect him." 


Usually, the wish of this ghost will be "I want to tell her that I like her" "I 
want to be gentle with him", or awful: "I want her to come with me." 
"Protection", but it is really rare, thank you for your pity, said: "But, you 
are no longer in this world." 


Unknown ghosts say: "What about that." 
Thanks for your pity: "If you stay strong, you will not rest." 
The unknown ghost is full of care, saying: "I will never rest in peace." 


This lonely soul is stubbornly stubborn. According to the saying, such a 
paranoid ghost, eighty-eight | nine dangerous extreme, but I do not know 
why, thank you did not feel any murderous in it, so do not worry, and said: 
"If your loved one knows that you are for yourself I can't rest in peace, I 
am afraid I will apologize and worry." 


The unknown ghost hesitated for a moment, saying: "Then I won't let him 
know why I don't leave." 


Thanks to the pity: "I will know more when I see more." 


Unknown ghost said: "That would not let him find that I am protecting 
him." 


Hearing this, the heart of pity can't help but move a little, the heart, this 
person's "love" is not just talking about it. 


These lanterns are the free ghosts that the old man captured from the 
battlefields of the wilderness. In front of him, it must be a young warrior. 
He slowly said: "This war has made you leave your loved one... sorry. I 
didn't win." 


The unknown ghost said: "It is my supreme glory to fight for you." 


Thanks for a moment, I stopped. 


"The death of the prince is the glory of the supreme soldier of Xianle." 
This sentence is a slogan used by a general of Xianle Kingdom to teach 
soldiers to inspire the morale of the soldiers, claiming that even if they 
die, They will also die in their own places and will go to Wonderland after 
death. That is of course a lie. Unexpectedly, this young warrior has died, 
and the soul is still in the world, but still remember this sentence. 
Moreover, the answer is cherished and solemn. 


Suddenly, thanking me for seeing fever, the line of sight is blurred. He 
said: "Sorry, forget it." 


The flames of the unknown ghosts are brighter, saying: "I will never 
forget. Your Royal Highness, I will always be your most loyal follower." 


Xie pity resisted and choked: "...I have no believers. I believe that there 
will be no good things, and there may be disasters. Do you know? Even my 
friends have left me." 

Unknown ghosts swear by the truth: "I won't." 

Thanks for your pity: "You will." 

The ghost insisted: "Trust me, Your Highness." 


Thanks, "I don't believe." 


Do not believe in others, nor believe in yourself. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 182: A penny is 
a hero 


Before the martial law in the whole city, Xie and others waited for the 
night and went to another city. 


He still placed the kingdom and the queen in a hidden place, and he and 
the wind letter went out to earn money. However, those who did not earn 
any money in the previous city would not suddenly be shipped in another 
city. 


The two still struggled to get a modest amount of money after a busy day, 
and because the three people who were inseparable in the past suddenly 
lost one person, the other two were extremely unaccustomed. For example, 
before, it was the responsibility to collect the money bag and count the 
number at any time. Now that the feelings have gone, the wind bluntly said 
that he might lose the money, and he had to put the money bag on himself. 
Every time he clicked on a little bit of pitiful number, he couldn't believe 
it. This is the reward of his labor day. It should be noted that in the past, 
even if it was a reward, it was not only the number. 


Without the admiration, and no one who gave food to the Queen of the 
Lord, thank you for taking the wind letter every day and personally 
sending all the necessary items to the hiding place of the Queen of the 
Lord. I can often see my son, but this makes the Queen very happy. When 
she is happy, she will cook. On this day, she let both Xie and Fengxin taste 
the soup she had burned, and took them to the table and said, "You both 
have to make up for it, all of them are thin." 


Fengxin cold sweat DC, the buttocks bounced on the stool, and waved: 
"No, no, the queen is kneeling, the wind is not dare, never dare!" 


The Queen and Yan Yue said: "What are you afraid of this kid? Come and 
sit down." 


How can you say it? Really did not dare, after sitting down with the scalp, 
the Queen sent her work results. Fengxin took a sigh of relief, suddenly 
unveiled the lid, and thanked him for sitting on the table. The two saw the 
things in the pot, and they all looked terrible. 


Thanks and whispered: "This chicken... died so badly." 


"..." Fengxin’s lips twitched slightly, saying, "Your Highness, you are 
wrong, there 1s no chicken at all." 


"222" thank you: "What is this dead chicken floating in it?" 
Fengxin: "I guess it is a paste... the shape is a bit wrong?" 


The two studied for a long time and couldn’t guess what this was in the 
pot. The Queen gave a bowl of thanksgiving, and Fengxin himself rushed 
to a bowl. When the queen entered the house and went to the country, they 
immediately dumped the soup in their bowl and pretended to drink it. The 
appearance of the mouth is being wiped, saying: "The fullness is full." 


Upon seeing it, the Queen was quite happy and said, "Well?" 
Thanks to pity: "Good, good!" 
The Queen was pleased to say: "If you drink, drink more!" 


Thanks for giving up the soup that didn't exist, lifted the handkerchief and 
wiped the corner of his mouth. At this time, the queen seemed to hesitate 
for a moment, said: "I am a question, "I am asking you a question. Don't 
blame the mother." 


Thanks for the slightest tightness, put down the handkerchief and said: 
"What? You ask." 


The queen sat down beside him and said, "What about the child? How have 
you not been here for a few days?" 


really. 


Listening to her mention of affection, the heart of thankfulness is even 
tighter, said: "Ah, I explained some of his tasks, so he went to somewhere 
else." 


The queen seemed to be relieved, nodded, and then said: "When will he 
come back?" 


Thanks to the pity: "Maybe, it will be outside for a long time... can't come 
back." 


It is said that the queen looks a little embarrassed, thanked and pity, and 
said: "What happened?" 


The Queen immediately said: "Nothing." 


Still windy and sharp, suddenly said: "Where is your queen? What 
happened to your hand?" 


hand? 
Thanks for looking down, I was shocked. 


His mother had a pair of well-maintained and graceful hands. At the 
moment, it looked awkward. The knuckles were broken and there was 
some blood in the faint. Xie Pity suddenly stood up and took her hand: 
"What is going on?" 


The Queen was busy: "Nothing 1s going on. I just washed some clothes and 
quilts, but I don't wash it very much." 


Xie pity said: "Why do you wash yourself? You can..." 


When the voice did not fall, he was stuck. What can I do? Can the maid 
maid help wash? Can you let the love help wash? It is impossible. 


On the road to escape, for a long time, as a near-servant, he has embraced 
the various personal things of the pity and the kingdom and the queen. As 
soon as he left, all the trivial things were made. 


No one cooks, no one has washed, no one has been stacked. The days that 
were originally simple and incomprehensible suddenly became 
uncomfortable. Thanks to pity, you can barely endure it, because he has to 
worry too much about things, but he used to be a mother of Qing Fu who 
did such a rough job? And if the queen does not personally, who can do it 
for the sake of doing it? 


Silence for a long while, thank you for your pity: "Let's let go. I will 
wash." 


The queen smiled and said: "No. You have to do your own thing. I haven't 
cooked and cooked. Anyway, I am idle every day. It's quite interesting to 
do it myself. Especially when you have a good time, I am also very good. ” 


That pot of soup was made by his mother with such a pair of hands. 
However, they did not take a sip and dumped the soup. Thanks to the pity 
and the wind letter, it is not a taste. At this time, the queen said again: 
"Yes, there is one more thing. Is that you can bring some medicine back 
tomorrow?" 


Thanks for the slightest blink of an eye, said: "Medicine? What 
medicine?" 


The Queen was full of sadness and said: "Oh, I don't know, if you go to the 
medicine shop, ask what medicine to use for hemoptysis?" 


"Coughing blood?!" Xie pity said, "Who coughs blood? You? Father 
Huang? Why don't you say it earlier?" 


His voice was louder, and the queen immediately said: "Low!" However, it 
was already late, and an angry voice came from behind the house, saying, 
"I told you not to talk too much!" 


It is the king of the country. Seeing that he has been heard by him, the 
queen is not obscured, and he rushed to the house: "But, it is not the way to 
go on like this!" 


After the walk into the house, see the country's main nest in a broken quilt. 
He didn't look at it carefully these days. Now, the head of the country is 
sick, his cheeks are almost sunken, and he looks more and more bad in the 
horrible house. Where is the aura of a king of a country, it is simply a bad 
old man with a gray face. 


Xie pity does not need to know his veins. He must have been ill for a long 
time, and he is not very sick. Even the whole room is filled with a smog- 
like illness that makes it difficult to breathe. When I thought of the queen, 
I was talking about "the disease of hemoptysis." When he was in a hurry, 
the voice suddenly rose: "What is going on?!" 


The owner of the country said with a blue face: "What is your tone?" 


Both the queen and the wind letter came in. Thanks for your pity: "Don't 
worry about what kind of tone I am. Why don't you say it soon?" 


The Lord angered: "Are you teaching a lonely king? Any time, the lonely 
king should say nothing and should not say anything that you don't need to 
teach!" 


Seeing that he is still awkward, thank you for being unbelievable: "You are 
simply unreasonable? Are you still emphasizing your identity authority at 
this time?" 


The Lord angered: "Get out! Fast roll!" 


The queen and the wind letter quickly pulled out the pity, saying: 
"Imperial! Don't do this. He is your father, and he is ill, let's make it." 


Escape from illness, especially wins. Xie pity buried his face in his hand 
and said: "After the mother! Why don't you say it earlier? As soon as you 
say, you may not be dragged into a hemoptysis! Do you know how difficult 
it is to cure this disease?" It should be said that With their current 
conditions, it is impossible to cure! 


The queen was a little scared and still sad. "We...we don't know, it will be 
SO serious." 


Feng Xin also said: "Yes. And before all the way to escape Yongan chasing 
soldiers, how can I stop?" 


Thanks for taking his face out of his hand, said: "I am taking him to the 
city to find a doctor." 


The lord is in the house: "No!" 


Thanks for turning back, I was thinking about the top sentence. Now I have 
the final say, but I listen to the wind channel: "His Royal Highness, if you 
take the national lord and go down to the medical hall in the city, you will 
definitely be noticed." 


Hearing words, the gesture of thankfulness suddenly froze. The Queen 
said: "We are afraid of this. I haven't said it in the past few days. You are 
still the first to see the way. Let's find a way to get some medicine back." 


After the house, the king of the country coughed up fiercely, and the queen 
went in to look after him. Thank you for a long while, turning around and 
going out, the wind channel: "His Royal Highness! What are you going to 
do?" 


Thanks for the pity, I started to rummage in the house. Wind channel: 
"What are you looking for?" He did not answer, he was embarrassed, and 


he pulled out something from the bottom of the box. 


It is an ancient sword. Feng Xin took a look and said: "What do you take 
out with the red mirror?" 


Silence for a moment, thank you: "I want to be it." 
Fengxin was shocked and immediately said: "Do not make it!" 


Thanks for the heavy closure of the box, said: "So many swords have been 
taken, not bad." 


Along the way, in order to make up for their car and horse fees and the 
necessary check-in fees when passing dangerous levels, Xie Li has already 
lost most of his original beloved swords. And because they can't go to the 


big pawnshops, and sometimes they are found to be embarrassed by the 
black-hearted businessmen who are going where they are going. Wind 
channel: "Not the same! Do you not like this sword? Do you still have to 
press it at the bottom of the box? And this is the sword that the emperor 
sent you, when it is said that it is not good?" 


Thanks for the tireless and tired: "I don't like to be important anymore, 
let's go, let's go." 


The two took the sword and went all the way to the city, all of them were 
frustrated. Before arriving at the pawnshop, she politely stopped and 
looked at the red mirror in her hand. Feng Xin looked at him and said: "Or 
else, don't be down. Let's try... think of something else?" 


Xie pity shook his head and said: "It's too late, and I don't know if there is 
any other way, I can definitely make enough money." 


If they go to steal, rob, and lie, no mortal can stop them, and the money is 
much faster. However, the partiality 1s because it is necessary to abide by 
the rules of mortals and the principles of good and evil, and honestly 
trying to make money, it will be so difficult. Determined, thanked the pity: 
"When it is to be done, when you go, you can buy medicine." That is to 
say, but still did not move at the foot, the wind letter knows that he is 
reluctant, this is the last hand in his hand The sword is gone, said: "Let's 
see it again." 


At this time, there was a noisy, horrified, and shouting on the street. 
Someone shouted: "Who is making trouble?!" "Be bold!" "Catch it! Grab 
it!" 


Both of them were shocked, thanking the police and flashing aside, saying: 
"Who?!" 


Fengxin was also very vigilant. I went to check it out, let go of my heart, 
and came back, saying: "Nothing! Don't worry! It's not about us, not 
looking for us, not Yongan soldiers." 


Thanks to the tight heart, this was a little loose, and said: "What is going 
on?" 


Wind channel: "I don't know, it seems like a few evil servants fight, go 
see?" 


Thanks to pity: "Look, don't be a bully." The two men went together and 
saw that a few people in the middle were wrestling, and the crowd was 
applauding. Fengxin patted a passerby who was looking at the ecstasy, 
saying: "Brother, what happened?" 


The passerby smiled and said: "You don't know? It's so wonderful! The 
servant hit the master!" 


Actually it was such a thing, thank you for a moment without words, said: 
"Why is this? Why is it good?" 


The passerby said: "Of course, please cheer! This master, really is not a 
thing! This servant has followed him since childhood, loyal, he! I know 
that exploiting people, not giving much money, but also calling people to 
give him a cow, this The servant can’t stand it anymore, this is not what 
you see! It’s being hit!” 


Sure enough, the beating side beats, what "I have been holding you for a 
long time!" "Do you calculate what you gave me?!" "The family is too 
poor to open the pot, but also ride on the head of Laozi." "Blessing!" 
"From today, Laozi is no longer your dog!" Yunyun, the owner of the 
beating screamed, everyone clap their hands and said, thank you for the 
tightness and tightness, I don’t know why the cold hair is upright 
Involuntarily go to the face of Feng Xinxin. The wind letter did not notice 
his strangeness at all. He listened to other people’s allegations of the 
master’s misdeeds. He said casually: “It’s so, the master is really not like, 
and the servant is resentful.” 


He said it was unintentional, but he was screaming in his heart, clenching 
his red mirror. 


Some headaches, when the red mirror fell, the two finally got the money, 
immediately went to the medical hall to ask the doctor, bought dozens of 
herbs to bring back. 


The medicine for treating hemoptysis is expensive, and the amount 
required is large. It is not a blind taste, two days a day, so it is necessary to 
pay attention to what to follow. In the evening, Fengxin first dismantled a 
few packs of medicine, decocted it outside the house, and held a fan of the 
broken pupa fan, and thanked him for rummaging inside the house. After a 
long time, I finally pulled out a golden soft belt from the bottom of the 
box. 


Originally, there were many golden belts in the pity, and like the end of 
those swords, they all fell. Only the last one left, originally wanted to be a 
commemoration. Right now, he decided to use it to do one thing. 


Just as Fengxin looked up at him, said: "His Royal Highness, what do you 
do with that belt? You don't want this to fall." 


Xie pity went over and handed this golden belt to him. 


Upon seeing it, Feng Xin suddenly opened his eyes and inexplicably said: 
"...What do you give me this? Your Highness, you just closed the box, 
didn't put your mind together?" 


"..." Thanks to this, I remembered that in the heavenly court, there was a 
special meaning in the golden belt. When I was on the face, it was dark. 
"You think more, I don't mean it at all. You take it as ordinary gold." Just 
fine!" Say it and plug it in. Fengxin’s neck was hung with a golden belt and 
blinked. “No. You have to tell me why you suddenly stuffed a gold for 
me?” 


Thanks to pity: "You should be a slumber that you have owed you for so 
long." 


The wind is sighing: "No. What happened to you suddenly? This time, 
what do you say to me? Give me a meal, you might as well buy a few more 


medicines for the Lord. If you don't, you can stay." This is something that 
a priest can have." 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 183: A penny is 
stumped hero 2 


The author has something to say: Sorry to be late! I went out at 9 o'clock 
in the evening and got off at 10 o'clock in the hotel. These days will be 
outside, so it will be late, and there is no wifi, the computer can only use 
hotspot networking tut 


Although I have said it before, I will talk about it again. The fourth 
volume is the prequel, which is now the penultimate volume. The fifth 
volume is now, it is the final volume, and it solves everything. I also want 
to be more and more! However, the speed and energy are limited, and you 
can only do your best. If you can't wait, you can fatten. If you decide to 
chase together, thank you very much, be harmonious and happy! 


good night! 


Listening to his medicine, thanking him for looking back, looking at the 
house, the king and queen are resting inside. He said, he said: "I can think 
of the medicine again, you accept it." 


He insisted on giving, the wind is unclear, so inexplicably and funny, 
shrugged, picked up the broken Pu fan on the ground and continued to fan 
the decoction, saying: "That line, I will help you first. When do you want 
it again?" Go back to it and find me again." 


Xie pity shook his head and said: "I won't be coming back. You can do 
whatever it wants." 


When I was in the red mirror, I was a little more satisfied. They finally ate 
a few good meals. In view of the amazing craftsmanship of the Queen, 
thank you for asking the mother to take care of his father. Don't cook, let 
him cook the ingredients. Although he had no experience, he had never 
seen the pig's trotters and saw the pigs walking. The things he made were 
still able to enter the entrance, which saved the suffering of everyone. 


After the dispute with the country on that day, Xie pity actually regretted 
it, but he couldn’t pull his face again, but he tried his best to take care of 
it. Hemorrhagic disease can not be cold, he added some quilt stove to his 
father. 


The Yongan soldiers were very tight on the escaping Xianle royals. Soon, 
the city was also martial, so it was easy to settle down and had to leave 
again. 


This is already the first few cities on the way to pass the parents with their 
parents. To be honest, all the way to see, much quieter than he thought. 
The most tragic, that is, the city of Xianle. However, many places outside 
the Imperial City do not seem to have such a big impact. 


After all, the lord, the prince, the imperial city, and the nobility are 
extremely distant things for the ordinary people, even like the gods that 
exist only in the legend. It seems that there is not much difference in 
changing a country. Especially when the new lord is not a tyrant, he has 
not issued any strict laws and regulations after he came up. There is no 
more emotion than the intense discussion of the topic after a meal. 


"The name of the lord thanked me for planting this acre of land. I don't 
know if I still plant this acre of land!" Xie Li heard someone say. 


The words are not fake. But the strange thing is that for the rumor that the 
prince is invincible and has lost all over the battle, everyone’s attitudes are 
surprisingly united, as if they talked about him instantly as a loved one in 
the country. This made him puzzled and unwilling. 


However, he did not care too much about this. When the red mirror was 
replaced, the money was not spent for a few months, and it was drained. 


The disease of hemoptysis is difficult to cure, and the heart of the country 
is stagnation. If you have a lot of medicine, it will not be bad. Once you 
break the medicine, it will definitely deteriorate. Thanks to the hand, there 
is nothing left to do. On this day, I wandered the streets for a long time, 
thinking about it and thinking about it. In the end, it was still on the wind 
channel: "Or else... let's try it?" 


Feng Xin looked at him and said: "So, try?" 


The two did not hesitate to "try" for the first time, but they did not make 
up their minds before. Moreover, after they talked for a certain time, the 
meaning revealed by the owner of the house was heard, he was furious and 
made a fuss. A fire, resolutely refused to pray for the shameful thing for 
the money, or would rather not drink medicine, had to give up. At the 
moment, I don't have to say more clearly, I understand. Xie pity nodded, 
wrapped his face with a white scorpion more tightly. Wind channel: "You 
are not used by Your Highness. I will be alone. So if the king of the 
country asks, it will be fine!" 


After he finished, he took a deep breath and sighed for a long while. He 
suddenly yelled at the pedestrians on the street: "Don't miss the passing of 
the folks." 


The pedestrians on the street were shocked by him, and they came around 
in threes and threes, and they said, "What are you doing so loudly!" "You 
are doing it?" "What is the skill to take a look at?" "I want to Look at the 

broken stone!" 


Fengxin took the bow off his back and smacked his scalp: "I... I nicknamed 
the 'Archer', and walked through Yang in a hundred steps, to everyone, to 
show one hand, to offer an ugly. If you are happy, please, Reward a few!" 


What archer, what is ugly, this set of words are learned when they watch 
other people's art on the road. Although they always say that they will 
never go to the stage of art, but unconsciously, I have been paying 
attention to what others have said. Everyone shouted: "Let nonsense! 
Quickly!" "Wait for a long time! Hurry!" 


Fengxin took the arrow and pointed to a free-lived man in the crowd: "This 
uncle please stand up and put this apple on his head. I can shoot it in three 
hundred steps!" 


The idler shrank his head and shrank it into the crowd. He said, "I don't do 
it!" 


Wind channel: "I won't hit you, rest assured! I will pay you how much I 
can pay you!" 


That leisurely man said: "I am not a fool! It’s useless to shoot me how 
much you lost. Since you are out of the show, you don’t even have a 
family? Shouldn’t you shoot next to you?” 


Everyone said: "Yes!" Xie pity also said: "I will come." I don't know who 
throws a fruit in the crowd, thank you for taking it, I will put it on my 
head, but the wind is intended to prevent the reconciliation. And, how can 
I call him? He was in a hurry, grabbed the fruit, ate it himself, turned the 
arrow, and pointed at the corner of a high-rise house. He said, "I shoot 
that!" Then he flew out. His arrows are perfect, natural shots, crowds of 
people laughing, all said: "Oh, a little skill!" Laughing, there are a few lost 
a few dollars. 


The round little money was dripping on the ground, and the wind letter 
went forward, and Xie pity also squatted silently, but the heart always felt 
lost, as if lost something. 


Fengxin used to be a servant of the prince. Don’t say that it is such an 
ordinary people. It is the ordinary officials who have seen him and he is 
also polite and even wants to get rid of it. Before moving the stone to 
transport the soil, it was very wrong to be called by the little head, and 
now I have to endure that I see myself as a monkey. That hundred steps to 
wear Yang's ability, actually not used to kill the enemy, but for people to 
have fun, think about it is not a taste. 


At this time, a sharp female voice: "Who is the archery on the street?!" 


Thanks for listening, my heart is hanging. All the people pointed to the 
wind and said: "It is him!" 


The wind was inexplicable, the crowd was separated, and several women 
walked over and took an arrow, which was the one that Fengxin had only 
shot. A few women surrounded him and said: "Dead kid! Are you 
shooting? You are so bold! The ray of weapons in the sky is broken, and 


the screen in our yard is broken. You said, how are you going? Lost?!" 
"Yeah, scared away some of our guests!" 


It turned out that Fang Zhixin’s arrow hit the bunting, and the cast was not 
lost, falling straight into the yard. Fengxin did not like to deal with 
women. These women were even more glamorous and fragrant, and they 
were suffocating. I am afraid that the origins were not good, so he even 
waved back and forth. Xie pity quickly stopped in front of him and said: 
"Sorry, sorry. He is not intentional. As for compensation, we will find a 
way..." 


The women of those few people were very angry, pushing and shouting: 
"Who are you! You..."" Who knows, this push and pull, the whiteness 
wrapped around Xie’s face slipped unintentionally, the couple As soon as 
the person saw his face, his eyes brightened and his tone suddenly 
slammed a little. He said, "Hey, a handsome little brother!" 


Thankfulness: "???" 


A woman clap her hands and smiled and said: "Good! Decided! You are a 
group of people? Just take it for you!" 


Thankfulness: "???" 


Not yet reacted, he was dragged away by the women and pulled to a 
gorgeous small building. Looking up, the above are all dressed up ina 
woman, oh, thank you for understanding this, he was actually dragged 
away by a few old ladies! 


He got a goose bump on the road and said: "Wait, I have no money, I really 
have no money!" 


A few old smirk smiled: "Of course you have no money, just take you to 
make money!" 


"222" thank you: "I'm sorry, | am a man?" 


The old man said: "Know that you are a man, we are not jealous!" 


The wind letter surrounded by the group finally broke through the crowd, 
rushed over and said: "Hurry up and let go of the temple... let go of him!" 


The two men were embarrassed, they ran away, and they knew that they 
were losing money. They did not dare to do it. The angered old people 
called for twenty or thirty beaters and chased them into the city. I have 
never seen such a squad. In short, they never dare to approach this area 
again. 


However, the two confirmed that the art of selling is able to make money. 
When they changed places, they sold the shelves and sold them. When 
they first arrived, the locals were fresh, and the wind letter was also a 
good-looking man. It was quite good-looking. In the first few days, it 
really earned a little money by selling art, and could cope with food and 
medicine. But the good times are not long. In less than half a month, some 
people have found them. 


On this day, after thanking the pity and the wind letter, seven or eight big 
men were found. Xie pity is very vigilant, for fear of being a Yongan 
soldier, the hand in his sleeve is ready to go, whispered: "Who are you?" 


The headed Dahan said: "You have been on our site for several days. I 
don't know who we are?" 


Both pity and morality are inexplicable. Another man also said: "We have 
robbed us of so much business, don't give a statement, can't you say it?" 


The two talents figured out what happened. It turned out that these are 
other local sellers. 


Everyone on the land of the rivers and lakes 1s a gang of gangs and each 
has its own territory. When they came, they pulled all the guests from their 
homes, and others couldn't make any money. Naturally, they wanted to find 
their anger. They are not old rivers and lakes, where do you know the 
doorway? 


Thank you for your pity: "If there is no way, who do you want to grab this 
business with you?" Wen Wen said: "There is nothing to grab the business. 


Everyone wants to see what will naturally go to see, we are not forced Let 
others see us...the art of shooting." 


The other party would listen to him, and screamed: "I haven’t robbed yet? 
The big guys have confiscated a few dollars in the past few days, so that 
both of you will take up the oil!" 


"Boom!" Everyone was shocked. Looking back, I saw the wind letter 
taking the fist off the side of the wall, and there was a big punch on the 
wall, and the crack climbed around. 


He said coldly: "Are you looking for trouble?" 


This group of people probably wanted to come to trouble, and the fists 
spoke, but the wind letter was so loud, there was no doubt that the fists 
were harder than them, and the arrogance went down more than half, but 
they were not willing to forget this. The man smashed for a moment and 
changed his mouth: "In this way, according to the rules, let's draw the road 
to compare, win the left, lose the sneak, pack up and leave, and no longer 
bring this out!" 


When you listen to it, you will be happy. Of course, music. How can 
mortals compare with them? Stable! 


Xie Pity also breathed a sigh of relief and said: "I am in line with you. 
How are you going to compare?" 


The man said loudly: "Use our best sellers!" 


During the speech, the other two men carried a few long square slabs. The 
man patted the slate and said: "The chest is broken! How about? Dare to 
come?" 


Seeing his expression is very proud, it seems that this is his unique skill. 
Xie pity also squatted down and touched the slate, and looked up: "Of 
course I have no problem, but you have no problem?" This slate is not 
fake. The man haha said: "As for your body, still worry about yourself." 


Feng Xin was beside him and said: "His Royal Highness, or am I coming?" 
Xie pity shook his head and said: "No. I have worked hard for you these 
days. I am here this time." He always has some strength. . 


Then, both pity and the man were lying on the ground, and a slate was 
pressed on his chest. Fengxin took a sledgehammer and smashed it. He 
was about to kneel down, and thanked him for saying: "Slow." 


Others liked: "Why, you have to admit defeat? It doesn't matter if you 
admit defeat now, let's go!" 


Thanks: "No. I want to add a slate." 
The words were heard, everyone was shocked: "You are not crazy?" 


Xie pity is slow and reasonable: "Isn't that what you said? This 1s a test, 
and if both of us are a slate, there is no difference, how can we count it?" 


The sellers will be suspicious, some feel that he is stupid, and some feel 
that he is bluffing and discussing for a while, really giving him a slate on 
his chest. Who knows, thank you and let them add another piece! 


This time, everyone decided that he was stupid and simply added a piece 
to him. So, thanking the chest, thickly stacked three slate, it looks very 
awkward. 


In the eyes of the public, Fengxin took a sledgehammer, his eyes didn't 
blink, and he slammed down, and the three slabs were completely split 
into more than ten pieces! And the bursts of good voice, thankful and 
unscathed, calmly and freely climbed from the ground, calmly 
photographed the dust on the clothes, seeing others stunned. For the first 
time, the man’s face was green and white, and he said with pity: “This is 
always a difficult time to retreat.” 


He thought that the other party admitted that he won, and no one would 
come to trouble anymore. Who knows, the man's face changed and 
changed, and his teeth suddenly said: "Give me two more! No, give me 
three!" ” 


Everyone said: "Big brother, this can not be done, this person will 
definitely make the demon law, you do not have to accompany him!" "Yes, 
he must be fake!" 


Fengxin anger said: "Fuck? You have no ability, you say that others are 
making fake tricks?" 


The head of the man said loudly: "Slate and hammer are our things. Is it 
not clear whether there is a demon method? This kid is really a bit of a 
skill, but he can stack three pieces without any great, I can stack four! As 
long as we win, they have to go!" 


Wind channel: "Impossible, you give up! Don't kill your life." The man 
insisted on comparing the four stone slabs on him, saying: "You are 
optimistic!" 


Xie pity looked a little wrong, whispered: "Wind letter, do you want to 
stop? Four slate, mortals can't hold it." Fengxin also whispered: "Do not 
move first? Don't stop, don't worry, how many times? He should know that 
it is amazing." 


Thanks for the slightest frown, nodded, first wait and see. Sure enough, the 
younger brother of the hammer only trembled, and the face of the man 
changed. The hammer didn’t dare to move at the moment, but the man 
yelled: “Use some strength! Didn’t eat, how can you get rid of it?” 


The younger brother didn't dare to be sloppy. The second one used enough 


strength. The loud noise of the" ", the man's face burst into red, as if a 
big mouthful of blood. Thanks to the pity and the wind letter are not right, 
busy: "Wait, don't force it!" 


The man yelled: "Who is stubborn! This is my master! Look, let you lose 
your conviction, continue!" The little brother bitter face, but also a 
hammer. This is good, the man’s blood slammed into the ground, scared 
the younger brother to lose the hammer, and everyone went up and said: 
"Forget it, big brother, these two boys are going to rely here. Let them rely 
on it, your life is important!" 


The man’s forehead bursts with blue veins and his mouth vomits blood. “I 
can’t count it! The big guys haven’t opened the pot for a few days, and 
then go on like this, don’t you want your life? Continue! I don’t believe, I 
Couldn't it be better than this little skinny boy? This is my skill!" 


Thanks to pity, I can’t stand it anymore. I took the initiative and said, 
“Forget it. In this case, I admit defeat. From tomorrow, we will not come 
again! Fengxin, let’s go!” 


When you are finished, turn and leave. After the crowd cheered, Fengxin 
followed up: "Your Highness, let's give up here?" 


It’s hard to find a way to make money, but I have to give up. Thanks a little 
sigh, said: "No way. Just a few times ago, he has suffered a very serious 
internal injury, I am afraid that it will be half-dead, and it will be dead." 
Go on." 


Feng Xin scratched his head and said: "This person really does not want to 
die!" 


Thanks to pity: "It's all about life." 


He still regrets it. I knew it was like this. I shouldn’t have folded it three 
times. I will admit it early. Otherwise, this person will not have to stack 
four pieces. Although quite awkward, there are also some things to admire. 
He added: "If you say it again, you don't have to sell art here, hang on a 
tree." 


However, at night, back to the hiding place, the Queen told him with 
sorrow and sorrow that the suffocation of the lord became more serious. I 
am afraid that I would not be able to stay in the car for a period of time. In 
other words, they can't leave the city for the time being. 


Thanks again, it was a rummaging, not finding out what could be done, 
sitting in the box and staring. Fengxin was in the decocting medicine, 
while singing and screaming, screaming, the more difficult it was to listen, 
the pity that he didn’t want to pay attention to him, he couldn’t pay 
attention, and said: “What are you doing? Is it in a good mood?” 


Fengxin looked up: "Ah? No?" 
Thank you for your unbelief and said: "Is there really?" 


He noticed that since the beginning of the art, in recent days, the wind 
letter has been a bit strange. Sometimes I suddenly have nothing to smirk, 
and sometimes I suddenly start to worry. When the feelings are in the 
mood, the two of them are inseparable most of the day. After the feelings 
are gone, the wind letter sometimes has to go back to the king of the king 
to give a meal or do something else. There is a time in the day, thank you 
for always feeling Did he encounter something, but he did not have the 
strength to pursue it. Looking at the jar of medicine in front of the wind 
letter, silent for a moment, thanking the pity: "Is this the last pack?" 


Fengxin flipped over the medicine bag and said: "Yes. I won't go 
tomorrow..." He remembered that the Lord was in the house, could not be 
heard by him, and lowered his voice: "If you don't go to the art, what 
should you do?" 


For a long time, Xie pity Huo Ran got up and said: "You are here to guard, 
I will find a way." 


The wind is suspicious: "Where are you going? What can you think of?" 


Xie pity did not go back to the road, said: "Don't worry. Don't follow me." 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 184: The 
Prince of the Mountain Road defeated the robbery 


He was so tens of thousands, let Fengxin stay here to guard the king of the 
kingdom, and he had a small broken house. Going all the way back, my 
heart beats very badly. Going out of the long way and making sure that the 
wind letter really didn't keep up, this is reassuring. 


Set the god, stop and stop for more than a dozen miles, thank you finally 
picked a place he feels appropriate - a mountain road in the wilderness. 


Looking around at no one, thanking the pity for covering the face with 
white, covering his face with rigorousness, jumping into the tree, hiding 
his body shape, holding his breath. Next, just wait for passers-by to pass. 


Yes, his "method" is the so-called "robbing the rich and helping the poor." 


In the past, Xie Pian only heard stories of such martial arts and family 
robbing the rich and helping the poor in the storytelling and textbooks. 
They have never done it before, and they never thought about doing it. 
Because, he originally thought this way: no matter how beautiful, no 
matter how legitimate the purpose, robbery is robbery, stealing is stealing. 
Otherwise, with the polite hand, let alone the flying scorpion to steal some 
things, killing the light guard, emptying a silver library is not a problem. 


But at this point, there is really no way. If you have to say it, "grab" is a 
little better than "stealing", probably because the former ts still "bright and 
fair". Struggling for a long time, thanking the pity or playing the original 
one slap in the face, intending to rob others' wealth and help themselves 
poor. 


This is the fastest way! 


Thanks to pity in the tree, the black wind is high, the four wild is silent, 
there is no one, but he is a heart mad jump. 


Even when he hunted the most ferocious monster, he was not so nervous. 
He pulled a chilly **** from his sleeve and his hands trembled slightly. 


If you can still pick and choose food, it can only show that you are not 
really hungry. After thanking you for knowing this, you suddenly get used 
to the taste of steamed bread. 


The winter is approaching, the night is very cold, thanking the pity while 
licking the cold head, while taking a bite of white gas. Because I didn't 
want to be seen, I refused to think about the crowds. I specially picked the 
remote places and waited for two hours. At the end of the mountain road, I 
walked slowly to a pedestrian. 


Thanks for the spirit of pity, two or three mouths put the hoe, staring at the 
pedestrian who was slowly approaching, and found that it was an old man. 


Such an old man, although the clothes are still pretty, should be very rich, 
but of course, not within the consideration of pity. I don't know if he is 
disappointed, or he is relieved. In short, he decisively ignores it and puts 
him in the past and continues to wait for the next person. 


After an hour, Xie pity to his feet and numb, the lower body 1s almost stiff, 
and waited for the second person. He saw that the person walked very 
slowly, and said: "Is it an old man?" 


When the man slowly approached, he discovered that he was not an old 
man but a young man. 


The young man looked so thick, smiled, and walked slowly because he was 
carrying a bag of heavy rice. Thank you for your sweat, and your heart said 
to yourself: "...do you do it?" 


Hesitated for a moment, he still gave up. 


The reason for giving up was that the young man was ragged and the 
sandals on his feet were worn out, revealing his toes, which was a poor 
home. He is so happy, it must be because there 1s finally a bag of rice to 
eat, maybe his family has been hungry for many days, maybe this bag of 


rice is the only one he sold in his family. If you are robbed, don't you 
despair? 


Thanks to myself, I thought about a lot of things, and later I thought that 
maybe only half of the rice, but this time the young man has long since 
gone. Therefore, thankful and decisive no longer consider, continue to wait 
for the next one. 


In this way, he waited for several hours on this tree, from dark to dawn. 
During this period, about a dozen pedestrians passed through this 
mountain road. Every time they thanked and wanted to start, they let them 
go because of various reasons that were not suitable for starting. Several 
times he was thinking, forget it! Go back! No robber is robbery like him. It 
is a ghost to have something to gain. However, once I thought of going 
back, the medicine did not have any food, and I still had to wait for the 
scalp. 


After a long time, finally, the last passerby came far away on the mountain 
road. 


It is a middle-aged man, dressed in gorgeous, non-rich and expensive, 
looks fierce and oily in the oil, making people feel resentful, at first glance 
it is not like a good person. 


However, the so-called people can't be seen, and Xie pity can't help but 
think: "In case this person is only a fierce god, what should he do if he is 
actually a good person? Even if he has money, should he be robbed?" 


Struggling to overcome the danger in his heart, a sudden burst of screams 
in the belly awakened him, thanked the pity and sighed, said: "But it can't 
be managed so much. It's you!" 


As soon as he made up his mind, he jumped down from the tree and said, 
"Stop! " 


Halfway through a masked man, the man was shocked and warned: "Who 
are you? What are you doing here with a sneaky face?" 


Thanks for the hard scalp, said: "... put ... put ..." 1s always a hindrance in 
the heart, he stuck a few times before shouting out the sentence - "put the 
money out of you!" 


The man opened his mouth and looked at it three feet high. He said, 
"Come on! Help! Robber!" Compared to being escaped by him, Xie Pity is 
actually more worried that he yelled and screamed at others. Although it is 
not likely to be recruited here, even if he is recruited, he can immediately 
escape, but after all, he is a guilty conscience. Road: "Stop! Don't shout!" 


Where did the man listen, fleeing into the woods, and screaming. Thanks 
for the fear that the forest had a beast that attacked the man, and said: 
"Wait! Beware!..." Who knows, chasing it in, seeing it, and his face turned 
pale and white! 


In the woods, there are already a few people standing, and he is looking at 
him. Thank you for your attention, and if you find it wrong, these are not 
people at all. Because the middle-aged people did not seem to see them at 
all, they were still flustered, and many of them were very familiar. 


Of course, I am familiar with it. These are the ones he had seen in 
Xianjing before. They have the heavens and the heavens. All are **** 
officials! 


The man was only screaming because he fell and grabbed a bunch of 
amulets in his hand. He said: "Da Xian Daxian! Come and save me! Save 
me!" and the "Big Immortals" he shouted are also true. As he wished, it 
has already arrived. 


At this moment, the eyes of several pairs of priests are staring at the 
patience and staring at him. Seeing that the masked geek who robbed 
himself was in the same place, the man quickly climbed up and ran away. 
Xie Pity also couldn’t take a step to chase. He was already stiff and had a 
cold sweat, full of fear. 


Yes, fear. 


He only hoped that this white scorpion would pack his face tight enough. 
These little priests who had dealt with him in the past could not recognize 
him. However, it turned out to be counterproductive. A priest looked at 
him and wondered: "...isn't this...the Prince Edward?" 


Another priest was even more shocked and said: "Ah, what is it! How can 
the Prince of the House be here? How can I still dress this?" 


Thanks to a heart, the deeper and lower the heart, almost sinking into the 
heart of the earth. 


"The man who just yelled was ‘Help’ ‘Robbery’ ‘Robber’? Is there a 
robber chasing him? The robber is... Your Royal Highness?!” 


"Oh my God! Your Royal Highness... will you do this?!" 


Hearing these words, Xie pity almost fainted on the spot. I don't know how 
long it took, he dumbly said: "I..." 


He wants to say something, but it is difficult to open his teeth and get 
stuck in his throat. And the faces of those priests are also very subtle. For 
a long while, a priest patted his shoulder and said: "Nothing, nothing, Your 
Royal Highness, we know." 


Thanks to him for taking a few shots, not at all, but almost unstable, and 
said: "J..." 


The priest laughed a few times and said, "You are too difficult to 
understand. You can rest assured that we will not tell others." 


It’s this that the pity is hard to tell. After the other party said it, he didn’t 
know what to say. He said, “Hao, thank you. Then, I... I went back. .gone 
back." 


He didn't know how he left. In short, when he woke up, he was already 
standing on the deserted mountain road, and was awakened by the cold 
night wind of winter. 


At this point, thank you finally reacted, what a terrible thing happened just 
now. 


He, thank you, Prince Xianle - robber? ! 
Why is this happening? ! 


At this moment, the pity is extremely regrettable. Before him, he must be 
crazy to think of going to the road to rob, and getting it out now is out of 
control. Why is it so unfortunate that nothing has been done, but it just 
happened to be hit? ! 


I have never encountered such a thing in the past, and I don’t know what to 
do. The whole person has a fever from head to toe, and there is chaos in 
his head, and his face is buried in his hand. If he can turn the clock back, 
he is even willing to use several years of life and repair. I was annoyed, 
and the corner of his eyes suddenly swept to the front and blurted a white 
figure. When he was shocked, he suddenly looked up and said, "Who?!" 


As soon as he looked up, the figure disappeared instantly, and Xie Pity was 
a cold sweat. 


Although he did not see the man's face, he always felt that the man's face 
was like a mask! 


However, after sweeping a circle, I did not see anyone's trace. Xie pity 
couldn't help but suspect that the figure I saw was just the illusion of my 
own panic. Whether or not he did not dare to stay here more, and hurried 
down the mountain. 


After returning, Fengxin had already waited for him for a long time. When 
he saw him, he said, "Where did you go, what did you go to? What did you 
think of?" 


Thank you for telling me. He can't say anything to anyone, and it's even 
more impossible for the wind. Xie Li couldn't imagine it. He always 
believed that his virtues were unparalleled. He knew that his method 
would actually be thought of after he ran into a robbery. He only hoped 


that he would be buried in his heart forever, and that he would be rotten in 
his stomach. Therefore, thankful and vague said: "No." 


The wind is stunned and said: "Ah? What have you been doing for so 
long?" 


Thanks for being a little embarrassed, said: "You don't ask. I have nothing 
to do." 


The wind letter is very strange, but how to ask for the pity does not say, he 
is not too much to ask as a servant, but whispered: "Then we will go out to 
sell art tomorrow?" 


Thanks for the pity: "I don't go out." 


He is now completely confused, and his mind is full of incredible 
concerns: What should I do if I happen to meet the middle-aged man? 
What should I do if I have already started to pass the city? Fengxin also 
felt that he was not feeling right. He said, "Are you tired? This is good. 
You should not go out under the Highness. I will go out alone. You 
concentrate on cultivation." 


However, he did not know that Xie Pian did not even care about 
cultivation. 


Originally, thanking and patience, because only then did he have the 
opportunity to return to heaven, but now he 1s also afraid of returning to 
heaven. 


Although the few little priests said they would not say it, would they really 
not say it? Will the current heavenly court have already spread this thing 
today? 


When I think of this possibility, I can't breathe. He is absolutely incapable 
of enduring the brand of being stained, and is poked by the whole heaven 
and earth, or even the whole person! 


Difficult and tired, Xie pity fell asleep. This sleep was not stable, tossed 
and turned, did not know what nightmare, and suddenly woke up, and look 
at the window, the sky is already dark. 


The wind was not there, and I was alone in the art. I haven’t returned yet. 
The cough and voice of the king and queen came from the next door. Xie 
pity lay on the ground, and when I woke up, I couldn’t help but imagine 
that if this matter really spread, what would happen to the parents, they 
would be incredible. The lord may be angry and thunderous, while 
coughing blood and swearing at him is the shame of Xianle, and the queen 
will certainly not marry him, but she will be heartbroken, because her 
most painful children make them shamed. 


Thinking of this, thanking and starting to breathe again, he must find a 
place to calm down, so he climbed up from the straw mat and rushed out, 
rushing toward the cold wind for no purpose. . 


He didn't dare to stay in someone's place, because he always felt that 
others were staring at him and looked at how unbearable he was. He went 
to a graveyard and no one was there. He finally stopped. 


This night was even colder than the previous night. When I arrived here, 
Xie Pity discovered that his cheeks and hands were frozen and his body 
was slightly stunned. Not just cold, there may be fear. Xie pity could not 
help but hug his arm, spit a few mouthfuls of heat, his eyes turned, and 
found a tombstone in front of the two jars of wine. 


It seems that the tombstone was a wine-lover before the Lord's life, so the 
people who accompanied the tomb after the death also brought him wine. 
Thanks for the pity, he never drank the wine, but I heard people say that 
the wine warmed up, but also forgot things, for a moment, suddenly picked 
up the jar, open the plug is a pass. 


This wine is not a good wine, cheap altar, the taste is very strong, thank 
you pity a few mouthfuls, slammed a cough, but it seems to be warmer. So, 
thanked the pity, wiped his cheeks, sat on the ground, hugged the jar, and 
continued to sip. 


In the meantime, it seems that I don’t know where to fly out of a faint 
little wildfire, and it seems to be very urgent around him. Xie pity only 
cares about drinking, just like not seeing. The group of wildfires seemed to 
desperately want to be close to him, but because it was a vain fire, every 
time he greeted him, he could only pass through and never touch him. 


A jar went down, thanking the pity, I was already dizzy, drunk, watching it 
fly around, it was pitiful, it was so funny, I couldn’t help but laugh out, my 


elbows were on the edge of the jar. , said: "What are you doing?" 


The group of wildfires condensed in the air. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 185: Thirty- 
three **** officials fight for blessing 


Xie pity asked: "Is this your grave? Is it your drink?" 


He was so confused that he didn't understand what the ghosts had 
answered. He thought that the owner of the grave was dissatisfied. He was 
rushing to go and muttered, saying, "Know, I will leave." 


Thanks for holding up the jar and climbing up, swaying and stepping. Who 
knows, did not take a few steps, suddenly the foot is empty, "squeaky" - 
the whole person fell a bunch of onions. 


It turned out that there was a big pit in this graveyard. About to dig up and 
prepare to bury the dead, knowing that the dead have not yet been buried, 
let the first pity come in. 


Thanks to the forehead at the edge of the pit, it hurts, and the more dizzy. 
He fainted for a while before struggling to climb, both hands are mud and 
blood, I do not know where to break. 


He raised his hand and looked at it for a while, trying to climb out of the 
pit. But he just drank a jar of wine, his hands and feet were soft, so he 
didn't work hard, and he climbed down several times. Thanks for the pity, I 
went back to the bottom of the pit, and stunned the dark night sky for a 
while, very angry: 


This pit is not too deep, why can't it climb? 


The more I thought about the more angry, the pity couldn’t help but 
mutter: "...I fucked." 


Thank you for your pity. This is the first time he spit out the word from his 
mouth. The wonderful thing is that after he finished, his chest was sulking 
and it was a moment of distraction. Therefore, thanking the pity like a 


child who tasted the sweetness, struggling to kneel on the edge of the 
grave, raising his voice and swearing: "I am **** fuck!" 


He patted the ground and shouted: "Is there anyone? Is there anyone who 
pulls me?!" 


Of course no one. There is only a group of faint wildfires that do not go 
out. After the blessings fell, the ghost fire rushed over and seemed to want 
to pull him, but never touched. Xie pity didn't care about it at all, and he 
said: "Come and let me personally bury me!" 


, climb or climb. Oh, thank you for being so easy to climb up on 
your own. It’s already a mess, lying on the ground panting. For a long 
while, he rolled over and hugged himself. 


Thanks for the small voice: "It's so cold." 


He said very quietly, afraid of being heard. The fire was heard, and it flew 
over to his body. The flame suddenly turned a lot, and seemed to burn 
himself. 


However, the wildfire is cold. 


Even if it is close enough, burning will not bring a touch of warmth to the 
living. 


In the middle of the night, thankfulness seems to have heard a tiny voice. 


The sound seems to be far away, and the dream 1s also true. Desperately 
said: "God, please wait for me, wait for me... Please give me some more 
time... let me... let me..." 


" " 


Thank you, "God? Is it calling me?" 


However, even praying to him 1s useless. 


Because, when he 1s God, there is nothing to do. Now, no longer the **** 
of him, nothing can be done. 


"...His Royal Highness? Your Highness? Your Highness!" 
Xie pity is awakened by the wind. 


He barely opened his eyes and found himself lying in a small alley. The 
face of the wind letter hung on the top. When he saw him waking up, he 
finally breathed a sigh of relief. Then he dyed a few anger on his face and 
said: "His Royal Highness! What the **** are you doing? I don’t say a 
word, I ran out for more than two days. If you don't come back, I can't help 
but leave them!" 


Cheering slowly sat up and said: "Two days?" 


When these two words were exported, he found that his throat was dry, his 
voice was hoarse, his brow was also jumping, his headache was splitting, 
and he seemed to remember something, and he seemed to remember 
nothing. Feng Xin was beside him and said: "Yes! Two days! Where have 
you been?! How did you get crazy like that?" 


Did he get drunk for two days? Is he not in a wild graveyard? How can I 
lie here? And listening to the tone of the wind, thank you for an ominous 
premonition, said: "What happened to me?" 


The wind letter is not good-spirited: "You are evil! Go everywhere, beat 
people everywhere, and go to the Yongan soldiers patrolling the streets! 
Before you did anything, I don't know!" 


I heard that he actually stopped Yongan Bing, and he was shocked and 
said: "I stopped the soldiers? Then... what about the soldiers?" 


Wind channel: "Fortunately, you were hit by me. You look like this. They 
think that you are a drunkard madman. After a few words, you don't pay 


much attention, or you will die. What happened to you? How do I? Seeing 
you look like drinking?" 


Thanks for looking down, he is now full of mud and dirt, grabbing his hair, 
and it’s just as chaotic as if he’s going to pull down the prisoner after the 
fall. It’s like the night’s sleep. Drunk madman. 


For a moment, he got up and vaguely said: "Well... drink some." 


The wind was still not responding, and said: "Hey? How can you drink 
alcohol? How much has it been drunk for two days?" 


Seeing the wind letter, I can't believe it. I feel a little upset about the lack 
of reason. I walked forward and said, "I said something I didn't drink. I 
didn't do anything. Why can't I drink alcohol." 


Fengxin didn't expect him to answer this way. He stumbled and chased 
him. "What is it that doesn't do? Why? Have you forgotten your Highness, 
because you can't break the ring, or how can you do it? You have to fly 
again. of." 


"..." As soon as I heard the cultivation and soaring, I wouldn’t want to 
listen again and speed up my pace. Wind channel: "His Royal Highness!" 


He chased him up again, hesitating for a moment, saying: "What 
happened? Tell me?" 


Listening to the wind letter so cautiously asked, thank you for opening 
your mouth, and want to stop. 


If you don't find someone to say it, he may be going to collapse. But he is 
not sure, what will be the reaction of the wind letter after speaking out. 


He does not dare to gamble. 


Seeing him sluggish, the wind and the letter said: "Really, it is not murder, 
arson, robbery, what else can you tell me?" 


Hearing that "1t is not killing and arsoning," Xie pity suffocated. 


If he had already given birth to a little shake and a little luck, then this 
moment was completely broken. Xie pity lowered his head, turned and 
continued to walk, vaguely said: "Nothing... just, I am really tired. You..." 
He was trying to make an excuse, suddenly found something on the side of 
the cheeks, and stopped. Road: "What happened to your face?" 


The wind and letter touched the cheeks, it seemed to touch the pain, and 
the muscles pumped. The thing on his face 1s a scar. Moreover, a bandage 
was wrapped around one arm and carefully wrapped in layers. 


This bandage 1s definitely not a wind-fighting bandage. However, thankful 
is the injury under the bandage. He said, "How are you injured?" 


With the skill of the wind, the mortal can not easily hurt him, and the 
injured is still the arm. Fengxin didn't take it for granted. He said, "Oh, 
nothing, those rogues are stumbling." 


Thanks for being suspicious, said: "Is it the locals who sold art that day?" 
Wind channel: "It's them." 


Thanks to the pity: "Why are they going to marry your booth?" Then they 
suddenly realized, "Because we admit defeated that day, but you went to 
the stage again, so they came to chase you?" 


This is mostly the case. After understanding the reason, Xie pity suddenly 
a rage. 


He bluntly said: "Don't go!" 


The wind letter is full of carelessness: "Take them! I want to go. I admit 
defeat is you, not me. I don't admit defeat anyway, no regrets, I just want 
to sell art there, they can take it in addition to sneaking and throwing 
things away. How am I? This time I am not prepared, I will not be next 
time, I am not afraid of them when I fight!" 


After listening to this, the sudden sigh of sorrow and sorrow dissipated and 
was replaced by a guilty guilt. 


The wind is so convinced that he is still dejected by himself alone. How 
can he live up to the loyal attendant who has not given him this step? 


Thinking of this, thank you with a sigh, said: "I'm sorry, Fengxin." 


After a glimpse of the wind, I waved my hand and said, "What are you 
doing under the Highness and I say sorry, is this not nonsense?" 


Thanks to pity: "These days are all you earning money alone, and you are 
working hard." 


Wind channel: "As long as you practice well, fly again soon, stronger than 
anything!" 


He also heard the word "flying up" and thanked him with a heavy nod. 


The king and the queen were shackled by the wind and believed that they 
had prayed for a few days. When he saw him back, the Queen was happy to 
make another meal. Thanks for the unbearable heart, took the bowl of the 
wind letter, and replaced him. No sleep for one night. 


On the second day, Fengxin got up early and went out to pray. 


However, although he has already played the spirit of 120,000 points, he is 
still unable to concentrate. 


This is just like everyone knows that the only way to get ahead 1s to study 
hard. However, among the 10,000 people, how many of them can really do 
the hard work and hard work? In the same way, even if he tells himself in 
his heart that there are no distractions in 10,000 times, how can he say that 
he can do it? 


For more than a dozen days, the progress of cultivation has stagnated, and 
nothing has been gained. Especially in the middle of the night, the wind 
letter dragged the tired body back, and asked the queen to see if he had 
progress today. Thanks for the tremendous pressure that was unspeakable. 


But he did not dare to tell the truth, only vaguely answered the progress, so 
the wind letter and the queen were very happy. It’s not a way to go on for a 


long time. Two months later, Xie Li finally could not let this situation 
continue. 


One day, Fengxin returned late at night, and the two men were eating the 
leftovers left yesterday at the table. Eating and eating, thanked him and 
said to him suddenly: "I am afraid I have to leave for a while." 


When I was convinced of the meal, I stumbled: "Ah? Leave? Where are 
you leaving?" 


Thanks slowly and calmly: "I am going to find a quiet place with a good 
aura, retreat and practice." 


If the land of cultivation is full of aura, it will be of great benefit to the 
practitioners. Before, thanks to the fact that he could not make up his mind 
to leave his parents and two attendants, and this has been unable to pull 
out. Right now, he changed his mind. The wind letter didn't think much, 
said: "Great! Your Highness, you should have done this! Cleaning is the 
most effective." 


Thanks for the nod, he paused and said: "When I left, I was bothered to 
look after the father and the emperor." 


Fengxin was about to answer, but hesitated for a moment. Although it was 
fleeting, but thanks to his familiarity, how can he not see his hesitation in 
this moment? 


At this moment, the owner of the house said: "You go. The lonely king 
does not need to be looked after." 


Fengxin and Xie pity put down the tableware and looked into the room. 
The lord did not rest, heard their conversation, and made a sound. Xie pity 
shook his head and whispered: "It’s reluctant." Fengxin smiled, then = 
"Your Highness is relieved. That's for sure." 


Now he is very happy, but thank you for not forgetting, only before, the 
wind letter seems to hesitate for a moment before answering, as if there 
are other concerns. 


However, think about him and think that maybe it is wrong. Apart from 
them, the wind letter does not know other people, and there is no other 
concern. What other concerns can there be? I don’t want to, but I will 
consider tomorrow’s itinerary. 


The next day, Xie Pity took a simple bag and said goodbye to his parents 
and the letter. 


He walked on foot for a few dozen miles, and after a few days of sleep, he 
finally found a secluded mountain that is suitable for the place of repair. 
Some investigations, thanking the pity first is a glimpse, then, the heart is 
ecstasy: 


"Too lucky... The feng shui is very good here, it is a rare hole in the sky!" 


Unlucky until now, actually suddenly came to work, thank you for some 
unbelievable, repeated confirmation, this is no doubt. This is really an 
apocalyptic treasure. If you can practice for a few months here, you will be 
able to do more with less and make more progress! 


Thanks for seeing hope, the mood of bleakness has been clear for a while, 
and my heart is full of joy: "Father, mother, father, and so on. I will be 
back soon!" 


Walking along the steep and rugged mountain road for three or four hours, 
Xie Li finally entered the depths of this Lingshan before sunset. 


Walking through the heavy woods, it is obvious that you are getting closer 
and closer to the origin of the aura. The steps of thankfulness are getting 
more and more brisk. Who knows, just as he was picking up the location 
of the repair, there was a sudden flow of footsteps behind him. 


Such a secluded mountain land, there will be so many footsteps, thank you 
for looking back. Unexpectedly, this look, his smile on his lips froze. 


Behind him, there were many people, about thirty, tall and chunky, with 
different looks and costumes, but without exception, they were all priests. 


The minority is the last priest of Heaven, and most of them are the same 
priests in the heavenly court. 


Among them, the awesome still stood the last few small priests when they 
hit the road to rob! 


They saw pity, their looks changed slightly, they pulled this, and they 
whispered, and they didn’t know what to say. And when they saw them, the 
hand of thankfulness shook a little. 


Both sides are opposite each other. For a long while, there was a cough 
who coughed over there and said, "So smart, I have met Prince Edward 
here." 


"Yeah, how come the Prince of God has come here?" 


Thanks a little bit, and tried to calmly and calmly replied: "I came here to 
practice." 


Although he is not the same today, but Xie pity is still trying to speak in 
the same tone as when he was not shackled, not letting himself whisper, 
nor letting himself be short-sighted. 


The opposite officer smiled and said: "More skillfully, we are also coming 
to practice." 


"Yeah, yeah, I didn't expect to hit a place. Hehehe..." 


It turned out that this place was a blessing, not only discovered by him. 
These dozens of priests are also fancy. 


In the face of such a situation, Xie pity hesitated. Do you want to practice 
with so many **** officials? 


To be honest, he resisted practicing with other priests. First, he came to 
retreat and retreat. If you can't be alone, you have to be disturbed with so 


many people. Some people like to practice in groups, "I have a good care 
for each other", but thank you for always retiring alone. 


Second, after the last road robbery, he now sees the gods who used to deal 
with the past, and he feels uneasy. He always feels that the other person’s 
eyes are so uncomfortable. For example, at this moment, he has a kind of 
use by everyone. The subtle gaze examines his illusion, and so he has no 
intention to practice. 


Although, for the sake of Fudi, there 1s a rule that 1s first-come-first- 
served. As long as it is tough enough, thank you can say that I am coming 
first. Please look for another place to practice, but those few people who 
broke his robbery. The priest is on the opposite side, not too strong. 
Moreover, he occupied a blessed land by himself, and drove away so many 
priests, and he said he was also overbearing. Even though she refused to 
practise with other priests, she could not do anything. For a moment and a 
half, he couldn't find another aura of cleanliness, so he nodded and said, 
"Yeah, it's too clever. Then I am advanced, please take care of yourself." 


When you say it, you want to leave in a hurry and find a quietest cave. 
Who knows, he just turned around and there is a **** official behind him: 
"And slow?" 


Thanks for the rest, he turned back and wondered: "What?" 

Some of the thirty priests exchanged their eyes and some whispered. 
Speaking, stand up one person and smile. "There is a lot of good fortune in 
the past." Is this one, let us give it to you?" 

Thank you for your pity for a while, and this is how it reacts. 

What do they mean by letting him leave alone? 


Inexplicable, deceiving too much! 


A **** rushed to his head on the spot. Thanks for thinking: "I came first. I 
didn't let you leave. Why do you still let me go?" 


But he is also not good at rash. After a moment of silence, the fingers 
holding the binding belt slowly grasped, and prayed hard and said: "You, 
what is this?" 


A sacred official said: "This...hasn’t you already said it?... The temple has 
been occupied by the princes of the Prince." 


Xie pity interrupted him: "But what does it have to do with this? Is it that I 
have had a lot of spirituality in the past, and I will not be allowed to 
practice again in the future?" 


The priest was blocked by him, and he didn’t talk. Xie pity and try to be 
calm and authentic: "But also, I don't understand very well, and I am not 
practicing here. You can't cultivate here here. Is it a very common thing to 
share spiritual cultivation? What are you doing? Why? Must I let me go?" 


At this time, I only heard someone say: "... don't pretend to be stupid. 
There are already thirty people. You are practicing here, and others can 
cultivate something..." 


Although the man was quickly pressed by others, thank you for 
understanding it in an instant. 


That's it! 


The aura of a blessed land is limited. When practicing, if one person 
occupies half of the time, the later person can only occupy the other half. 
And if one of them accounts for 80%, the other person can only account 
for 20%. The stronger the ability to absorb aerobics for your own use, the 
more aura you can take. 


These priests are worried that if he is practicing here, he will take up most 
of his aura. And the rest of the Aura gives them more than 30 people, and 
everyone has nothing left! 


I figured this out, and the blood in the brain was more fierce. He clenched 
his fist and said coldly: "...1 want to practice here." 


There is a sacred official on the opposite side: "His Royal Highness, we 
are respectful of you, and now I am willing to call you a Prince. You are 
the mortal body at the moment, why bother to rob us of the spirit?" 


Thanks to pity: "Since I am a mortal body, you are all priests, then I am 
practicing here. What are you afraid of? If I don't leave, would you still 
force me away?" 


That is of course not acceptable. If a mortal is not overgrown, the priest is 
arrogant to him, and he is to be punished. The priests really can't help him. 
However, thank you for forgetting one thing. 


Just as he stubbornly confronted the 30 or so priests, he suddenly said, 
"The imperial elders are smashed down, and the bones are harder. Not only 
will they rob the mortals, but they will also collide with the priests, 
hahaha!" 


When I heard this sentence, thank you for being like an ice cave! 


He jerked his head up and saw that he was talking to an inconspicuous 
lower-level priest, but it wasn't any of the priests who broke that thing that 
day! 


Sure enough, they have already said it! The genius is not the illusion of 
pity, everyone is really looking at him with that subtle vision. Everyone 
knows that all these priests know it! ! ! 


In an instant, thankfulness seems to have suddenly been smashed out of 
the bones, and the arrogance of the whole body has disappeared. The eyes 
are trying to congestively, turning their heads stiffly, looking at the little 
priests, dumb voice: "...you said, Will not tell others." 2k novel reading 
network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 186: Thirty- 
three **** officials fight for blessed land 2 


Perhaps his eyes under the emotional turmoil were too stinging. The few 
little priests he stared at him quickly waved his hand and said, "We didn't 
tell the outsiders!" 


Thanks to the red eyes: "How do they know?!" 


After the words of the thirty priests who heard the words, there were not a 
few faces that were surprised. Since so many priests know, how many 
priests know in heaven? 


He questioned him, and the few priests stuck a bit and argued: "They are 
not outsiders. They are all familiar friends. There is no secret between 
them. Tell them not to tell others, except We will not say the official of the 
gods..." Waiting for him to finish, thank you for your sigh: "Lie! Lie!" I 
don't believe!!!" 


He was interrupted so badly that the little priests couldn’t hold their faces 
and retracted into the crowd. At this time, suddenly a singer said loudly: 
"Do you believe in what you believe? What do you want to do under your 
shackles? It is not bad for people to tell you on the spot. Do you still ask 
others to keep you secret? We have What obligation is to keep you secret? 
It’s so funny!” 


Thanks for the pity, 1t was suddenly poured into a basin of water and Ice, 
and was smashed by a knife. "I am not..." 


I heard someone say: "We don't worry about things on weekdays, and we 
don't fear ghosts knocking on the door at night. If you don't clean yourself, 
how can you blame others for not keeping your promises? If someone is 
holding this unjust thing for you, then it is dereliction of duty." !" 


Thanks: "Not!!! 1..." 


He wants to say that I have a reason, and I don't want to, but he knows in 
his heart that it doesn't matter for any reason. The important thing is that 
he did rob! 


Such a stain, as if a shame brand was branded on his face, so that he 
became infinitely small in front of these **** officials, and even dared not 
speak loudly for himself. Seeing that his momentum has gone down, a Wu 
Shen stood up and said: "His Royal Highness, you should understand now, 
why don't we want you to practice here too?" 


Thanks for bowing his head and clenching his fist. 


The martial **** went on to say: "We are not all the way, the road is 
different, you still leave on your own." 


Seeing that he was plausible, he said that "the Tao is different and not 
looking for a way", thank you for suddenly understanding. 


To put it bluntly, in the final analysis, don't you want him to give up this 
spiritual land! 


His hands and fists skull creaked, his throat suppressed for a while, Shen 
Sheng: "...I don't go. I want to practice here." 


At this moment, the anger of these thirty priests has overwhelmed his 
shame. 


Anyway, I have already reached this step. I just broke the can and broke it. 
He would rather be cheeky than to escape from the dingy, teaching them 
that they couldn't succeed. Thanks for raising his head and repeating it 
again: "I want to cultivate here. This mountain is not your territory, you 
are not qualified to let me go!" 


Seeing his tough attitude, the 30 priests were black. Thank you for hearing 
someone whisper: "Why is this?" 


"I have never seen such a cheeky..." 


However, whatever they say, thank you are in the same place. Even though 
my heart has been bleed by the slap in the face, I still barely swayed and 
motionless. 


That martial art said: "It seems that His Royal Highness is a sinful act. Do 
you have to make everyone unhappy?" 


Thanks for the cold and cold: "If you have the ability, come and chase me. 
Anyway, even if you think, you don't have that skill!" 


As soon as this sentence came out, more than a dozen priests on the 
opposite side were discolored, and they took out the blade! 


This is natural. For Wushen, the sentence is a big provocation. Many of 
the players present are martial arts officers. Where can I hear them? 


Surrounded by the group, thank you for not being afraid. He had no sword 
in his hand, only holding a branch that was used as a cane when climbing. 
A martial art official said: "His Royal Highness, if you apologize 
immediately, we can be yours and not offend us." 


Xie pity said: "If I have something to make you unhappy, I will never 
apologize." 


He clings to the branch and points to the front, saying: "Because you are 
not worthy of God!" 


There was a commotion across the street. 


Someone shouted: "We don't deserve it? Are you a robber who robs a 
mortal?" 


Xie pity can no longer be tolerated, and he did not want to endure it. He 
copied the branches and attacked him. He said: "Tear too much!" 


The dozen or so martial arts officials also fought against the enemy. In the 
back row, there 1s a sacred official saying: "It’s not that we let you go to 
rob, you blame us for what reason!" 


They are happy too early. I thought that thanking me can neither force nor 
have a blade. It must be well dealt with. Who knows, it is not the case at 
all. Although she was only a branch in her hand, she was made to look like 
a poisonous front, aggressive and powerful. It didn't take long for the two 
sides to confront each other. Several swords of the martial arts officers 
almost gave him a fly. They even dared not to dare to the wind of this 
branch. They quickly rushed to the back row. 


It’s too shameful to beat a mortal mortal with the honor of the **** 
official! 


At this time, a spectator of the battle suddenly screamed, saying: "What?!" 
This shout, other priests were shocked: "What happened?!" 


The priest seemed to be hurting a lot, and his face bent over and said: 
"Just, just now, there was a group of wildfires hitting my eyes... Is ita 
ghost he made?" 


Thanks for the pity, this 1s the priest who pointed at his nose and shouted 
at his robber. He laughed with anger: "What kind of wildfire? You have to 
rush to say it, you don't need to smear me!" 


He was angry and shot more sturdy. A ring of Wushen's sword and sword 
gave him a shot that was thick and thick, and said that the fine branches 
were broken and the ground was broken. Suddenly, one shouted: "Catch it! 
Grab it! Look!" 


Thanks to the psychic shape, I saw the opposite of the gods in a mess, 
someone holding something in the hand, held up high, said: "There is 
really a wildfire, he is engaging in ghosts! Grab the evidence!" 


Thanks for taking a closer look, it was a small fire that was burning in a 
secluded atmosphere. He angered: "I don't know what's going on! Why do 
you catch a group of wildfires and say that I am a ghost? WISP 1s not a 
rare thing! Does it write my name?!" 


The screaming sergeant squinted: "How can ordinary ghost fires pounce on 
my eyes? How can you not do this?" 


Thanks to pity: "Then I said that it is also possible that this is the soul of 
the mountain. I was inadvertently stunned by you and stunned! What 
evidence?" 


The first Valkyrie who took the first hand took the wildfire and said: "Who 
is the person who is instructing it? This kind of harmful thing 1s broken 
up!" He said that the hand was forced to put the wildfire. Pinch the soul 
and fly. See you, thank you for saying: "Let it go!" 


After all, I couldn’t bear the sorrow of the soul, so they were affected by 
their farce. He grabbed it and went to fight with the **** of war. Because 
of the intention to rob the soul, the shot converges, the two are deadlocked, 
and the few priests in the rear suddenly shouted: "You are coming? Come 
on! Come and see, this is all!" 


It sounds like someone has arrived. The gods went back and said: "You can 
count it!" "Wait for a long time, come help!" 


Hearing words, Xie Pity was shocked first, and said: "Is it something that 
is so powerful?" Then I thought about it: "Who is the one who comes to 
him, if you want to come and be embarrassed, then how can you play it 
again?" I am not afraid of anyone!!!" 


He is now full of grievances and is ready to fight. Who knows, after the 
crowd was separated, the late arrival came forward, and the pity was 
completely stunned. 


I never thought that coming, it is a feeling of love! 


Appreciation is also unexpectedly expected, and in this case, there will be 
a pity, and the two of them will face each other with sorrow. Thanks for 
your pity, you forgot the martial arts who are fighting with him, and said: 
"...4ow are you here? You are not..." 


Speaking a few words, he noticed one thing, and when he got it, he closed 
his mouth. 


The love is now worn, not the old black clothes when they fled all the way, 
but the official costumes of the gods in the heavens. 


Originally, when the wind and the feelings were the deputy activities of the 
pity, the ability of the two was quite appreciated and attracted attention. 
Later, thanked and pity, many of the priests deplored the wind and the 
feelings and were smashed with him, and secretly asked the line to ask if 
they would like to go to other temples to serve. It is not impossible to have 
a **** officer out of appreciation and to bring his feelings back to heaven 
to use it for himself. 


This must be the case. Moreover, he should be well mixed now, or he will 
not come out with the group of priests in groups to find a place to practice. 


Xie pity is still the body of a mortal, but the feelings have already returned 
to the next heaven. This situation is inexplicably ironic. 


Over there, it is easy to make a god, and doubt: "What is going on?" 


The priests rushed to tell him about the cause and effect. Thanks for 
standing far away, the body is extremely stiff. 


He noticed that they did not specifically tell him about his robbery. What 
does this mean? 


Explain that Mu Qing has long heard of this. Mu Qing also knows that he 
is going to rob! !! 


A drop of cold sweat rolled down from the head of Xie, and he couldn't 
help but step back two steps. The only man who was confronted with him 
was panting and yelling: "He wants to grab the spirit, drive us away, and 
come to help!" 


What are you doing? 


Let the love help to fight him together? 


I am shocked by the scalp and numbness. He reacted so easily that he 
stammered and said: "...you, you are really black and white, shameless! It 
is not like this! I obviously don't!" 


The feelings of admiration were watching. He was anxious in his heart, 
and he was beaten out again. The martial arts were unable to stand up, and 
they retreated. They shouted: "Muscle! What are you doing?" 


Other priests also shouted, but the feelings were always hesitant, and it 
seemed that they should not be shot. Thank you for listening to them and 
urging them to besiege with them. They are furious: "Mu will not be like 
you, he is my friend, he will not help you!!!" 


Angry and angry, he used his hand and flew a row of soldiers. The rest of 
the priests saw him fighting more and more bravely, the momentum was 
wrong, and busy: "Muscle! You just watched him mess up?!" 


The face of the face is unpredictable, stepping forward, the fingers are 
slightly pumping, and the officer standing next to him urges: "Don't move, 
help!" 


At this time, some people yelled at the yin and yang: "It is understandable 
that you don't want to move. After all, people used to be the personal 
servants of His Royal Highness. Even if the prince is robbed and robbed, 
he should also care about the old servants. The help of His Royal Highness 
has been very good. How can I count on him to help us?" 


This seems to be excusing him, but it is extremely sinister, and I feel a few 
blue veins in my head and neck. 


The atmosphere is subtle, and the pity is not right, saying: "Muscle..." 


He only called a name, and in the next moment, his hand suddenly became 
light, and there was a sound of something being cut off. 


Thanks for pity, look down, cut off, is his only "army blade", that branch; 
then look up, opposite the face of the feelings, has turned out a long | 
knife. 


At this moment, the blade is pointing to pity. The person holding the blade 
is cold and cold: "... please leave." 


Thanks for holding half of the branches in the hand, looking at the 
feelings, for a long time, said: "I don't really want to rob. I have not seized 
the spirit. I came first." 


Mu Qing repeated with no expression: "Please leave." 


Cheering at him, hesitating for a moment, said: "...Do you know that I am 
not lying?" 


When asked this sentence, he was somewhat hopeful and a little scared. 
There is a voice telling him, don't ask, turn and go! But he still couldn't 
help but ask. 


The feelings of the aunt have not yet been answered, and the body of the 
pity has suddenly tilted forward, and the whole person has fallen heavily 
on the ground. 


The ground is the mud of the mountain road, and the pits are full of rocks 
and broken leaves. Thanks to pity on the ground, suddenly widened his 
eyes, and still unbelievable. 


I don't know which priest is, and he stunned him in the back, letting him in 
front of so many pairs of eyes, so ugly. 


It is really ugly. All directions are high and low, overwhelming vocals, 
thank you for listening to your ears, a pair of eyes wide open, looking at 
the dark ground in front of you, slowly and slowly looking up, standing in 
front of him Not far from the feelings. 


The empathy stood in the middle of the gods, did not look at him, looked 
sideways, like everyone else, and did not want to stretch his hand. 


So, thank you for understanding, no one will pull him. 
After a long while, he slowly climbed up from the ground. 


The priests thought that he would still be in trouble, and he was very 
vigilant. He thanked him but did not do anything to anyone. Instead, he 
looked down on the ground and found a small parcel that the queen had 
packed for him. He silently picked it up and put it back on his back. I 
walked down the hill step by step. 


Walking, his steps are getting faster and faster. After a while, thank you for 
running wild. 


He sighed and rushed down the mountain, not stopping for a moment. I 
don't know how far I ran, suddenly I didn't pay attention to my feet, and I 
fell again, and the breath spit out with a **** smell. 


In a panic, he didn't expect to get up, just sitting on the floor and gasping. 
When the breath gradually subsided, Xie Pity did not expect to stand up, 
but instead sat and started to stay. 


Suddenly, one hand reached over. 


Thanks for a slight slow squint, followed the hand, slowly looking up, 
actually is a feeling of love. 


He stood in front of the pity, his face was slightly blue, and he stretched 
his hand, half a sigh, and his voice was hard and said: "You are fine." 


Thanks for watching him, didn't talk. 


Perhaps it was uncomfortable to see him with such a creepy look, and his 
feelings avoided his eyes. 


But his hand stretched out and said, "Get up." 
However, this hand has been stretched out late. 


Xie Li did not pick up his hand, did not get up, or stared at him. 


The two stalemate for a long time, the face of admiration is getting more 
and more ugly, just about to take back the hand, but the pity suddenly 


grabbed a piece of mud from the ground, and the" " sound was thrown 
into the body. 


I didn’t expect him to do this kind of thing. I just didn’t know whether it 
was rude or childish. The chest suddenly blew up a dirty mud, and my face 
splashed a few times. After a short while, the anger surged, but he was 
forced to go down and whispered: "...[ have no way!" 


He really has no way. Now he and the priests should have a good 
relationship. If he looks at his peers and is beaten and beaten, but he does 
not stop, or is thought to be standing on the side of thankfulness, he is 
probably not good. 


Thanks for the pity, he wouldn’t talk, and he would only grab the mud on 
the ground and smash him. The admiration blocked a few times and 
couldn’t stop it. He said: "Are you crazy?! I said that I have no choice. Is 
there no way to go to robbery?!" 


roll! roll! roll! 


There is only one word in the mind, but he can't even say this word. He can 
only madly grab everything he can grab and smash it. He doesn't care who 
he is. Finally, the feelings of love could not be overwhelmed by him, and 
Tie Qing went away with his face. Thanks for a few mouthfuls of gasping, 
squatting back and starting to stay. 


He has been sitting in the dark for so long. 


After dark, I don’t know where to float a lot of phosphorus fires. Thanks 
for the pity, I didn’t see it, and I couldn’t lift it at all. 


However, those phosphorus fires seemed to be unwilling to be noticed by 
him, and more and more gathered around him. Xie pity still ignores. 


Until the phosphorus fire, a figure appeared. 


The coming of the man is always accompanied by a huge ominous 
premonition. Thanks for the pity, and slowly looked up. 


Ten steps away, a white figure standing in the midst of countless floating 
phosphorus fires, half of the mask on the face is smiling. 


He and the air of authenticity: "Hello, Your Royal Highness." 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 187: Cold 
white ghost warm confusing child 


In the dark night, the pupil of the pity eyes instantly shrank into two tiny 
points, and the trembling voice: "...1s you?!" 


White no phase! 


Thanks for the horror of the bones, jumped up, and the backhand was 
going to pull the sword but pulled it out. It was only remembered that all 
his sabre had been destroyed. Even the branch that he had previously used 
as a weapon was cut off. That is to say, now that he is unable to work, he is 
unarmed, but he is on this thing! 


After the destruction of Xianle a few years ago, the white phase 
disappeared from the world. Xie pity never looked for him, and did not 
think about going to find it. He only hoped that he would never appear 
again so silently. Who knows that this thing will suddenly appear in front 
of him today! 


The white figure slowly approached him, thanking the pity for a burst of 
chills from the heart, first could not help but back two steps, then reacted: 
can not back! It’s no use to escape! 


He snapped: "What do you want?!" 


White has no answer, and continues to take the hand closer. The pleading 
hands and feet, together with the white gas exhaled from the lips, are 
shaking. 


He forced himself to recall the faces of more than 30 priests who were 
either indifferent or indulgent or laughing, and the side face of the feelings 
turned over. Suddenly, he forgot the fear, shouted, and slammed up. ! 


However, this palm has not yet arrived, and a sharp pain first arrived. The 
other party actually expected the trick of thanking the pity, stepping ahead 


of him and stepping on his knees! 
too fast! 


Xie pity and knees have been "plopped" and slammed into the ground, and 
this horrible thought came out of his mind. 


The action of this thing is actually faster than he thinks! 


The next moment, thank you for feeling a more horrible thing - the five 
fingers of an icy palm are wide open, covering his heavenly cover! 


He yelled, and the hand lifted his head and attached his entire body with a 
slight force. Thanks for the lack of suspicion, with the power of this thing, 
as long as the five fingers are gathered, they can directly crush his skull, 
and his head will instantly become a fleshy bone. He also has no doubt that 
the next step after he has seized him, he plans to do so! 


Thankfulness and arrogance, I thought that I must die, and I closed my 
eyes with force. Who knows, the thing behind him did not continue to use 
force, but instead converges and sighs. 


After a short sigh, the other party did not continue to move. In a dead 
silence, thanks a little bit, opened his eyes. 


The ghosts of the sky are ecstatic and dancing. Every flame is a dead soul 
who is watching the excitement and laughter. However, many ghosts seem 
to have been shocked. They dare not approach them, only a group of 
flames are especially bright. The wildfire hovered over them, and they 
were using their own flames and violently slammed into the people behind 
them. I don't know what to do, but how to look is like a banyan tree. 


Daddy, thank you for your body. 
White has no phase, actually hugged him. 


Thanks to pity, sitting on the ground, slanted by a pair of cold, powerful 
hands, in a lifeless arms. 


When I was white, I didn’t know when I sat down and muttered: "Poor, 
poor. Your Royal Highness, look, what you are like." 


He muttered and whispered, stroking the head of thankfulness, his 
movements soft and pity, as if he was touching a wounded puppy, or he had 
a child who was seriously ill and was about to die. 


Under the moonlight, half of the smiles of sorrow and joy are hidden in the 
darkness. Only half of the crying face seems to be tearing heartfeltly for 
the pity. 


Xie pity stiffened and shook, and the white man behind him raised his 
finger and wiped the dirty mud on his face. 


In his movements, Xie Li actually felt a strange kind of love. Like in the 
arms of the best friends and the most familiar relatives, the body that was 
frozen and snoring also miraculously returned a little warm. 


Unexpectedly, in such a situation, giving him such kindness and warmth is 
actually such a strange thing. 


Thanks to the sore throat in his throat, the more he trembled. The ghost 
fire flew to his heart, as if he wanted to heat him, but he was not sure if he 
could help him dispel the cold and dare not close. 


Bai Wuxiang helped him wipe the mud off his body and said: "Come to 
me." 


" "thank you, "I...1.." 


One sentence was not over, he suddenly slid out and attacked the white 
mask! 


The raid succeeded, and the mask was kicked high by his palm, and Xie 
Pity had jumped over to a few feet. The fear of the genius was swept away, 
and he screamed: "Who is going to your side?" Go, you...the monster!" 


The pale sorrow and joy fell to the ground, and the ghosts of the sky 
seemed to be scared, suddenly out of order, dancing wildly, silently 


screaming. White no phase squinted and smiled low. 


The smile was heard and the cold hair was upside down. "What are you 
laughing at?" 


White has no sigh and said: "You will come to me." 


He is so sullen, thank you for not knowing what he means, can't be 
channeled: "Which side are you on the side? You ruined Xianle and let me 
go to your side? Are you crazy? You are sick!" 


He won't swear, even if he is angry, he will only say those words, 
otherwise he will curse this thing with the world's most vicious and most 
venting words. White no smile, happily smile, hand over the face, headed: 
"You will come. In this world, no one but me, I will not really understand 
you, no one will accompany you forever." 


Thanks to the chilling heart, but still retorted: "Roll! Less self-righteous 
nonsense, you say no one is no one?" 


A group of wildfires flew to his side, moving up and down, as if nodding 
in favor of him. But in all directions, this kind of evil thing, thank you and 
did not notice this one. 


Over there, there is no white temperature channel: "Oh? Anyone? 
Someone used to be, do you guess there will be in the future?" 


Thank you, "What do you mean? What are you suggesting?" 


White did not answer, cold and cold turned and turned, it seems to be 
drifting away. 


He whispered: "I will be here waiting for you, Your Royal Highness." 
Of course, thank you for letting him go, saying: "Wait! Don't go! What 


have you done to them? Have you moved my father and mother and the 
wind?" 


He chased him up and reached for the white figure. Who knows, the other 
side fluttered a sleeve and grabbed a bunch of wildfire. 


He did not specifically attack the pity, but thanked him for a terrible 
attack. The whole person flew high and slammed into a tree. A loud noise, 
the tree that the two men embraced was smashed by his body shape! 


If in the past, such a tree thank you 1s that it will not wrinkle its eyebrows 
when it hits ten, but at the moment he is the body of a mortal, so that the 
bones of the body must fall apart and fall heavily, and faint. 


At the last moment before closing his eyes, he seemed to see the white 
figure sticking out his hand, holding a raging flame of fire in his palm, and 
laughing: "Ghost, tell me, what is your name? This is too interesting..." 


After waking up, nothing happened. 


Xie pity on the lower foot, the chest cavity is full of **** gas, dizzy turned 
for a while, suddenly climbed up, muttered: "... Father Huang! Mother! 
Fengxin!" 


He remembered what happened before the coma, and did not dare to delay 
for a moment. He ran for dozens of miles and finally returned to the hiding 
place of the king and others in a late night of more than 20 days after he 
left the bag. 


Xie pity all the way to heart burning, fearful, fear of white no phase has 
been a poisoned hand to friends and relatives. Going back to the small 
broken house, I opened the door and I couldn’t get enough breath. I lost 
my voice: "Father! Mother! God!" 


Fortunately. In the house, there was no such miserable situation as he 
imagined, even the things were not chaotic, or the way he left before he 
left. 


Thanks for the sorrow and sorrow for a few dozen miles, the scorpion is 
going to smoke, and put a little bit of heart, then swallowed his throat and 
went on, saying: "Fengxin! You are..." 


As soon as he opened the door, the scorpion got stuck. The wind letter was 
in the house, and when he saw the pity back, he said: "His Royal Highness! 
How come you are back?" 


However, thank you did not look at him, but stared at him. There is a black 
man standing opposite the wind letter. 


It is a feeling of love. 


Mu Qing looked back at him, rubbed his lips, his face was not too good. 
The wind circumvented him and greeted him. He said, "Are you not 
practicing? How? I thought you have to go for several months. So come 
back so early, is there any big progress?" 


Xie pity stares at the feelings, said: "After the father and mother?" 


Wind channel: "There is asleep in the house, I have already lie down and 
rested. How dirty is your clothes? What is the face hurt? Who did you 
fight with?" 


Thanks for your pity, I heard that my parents are safe and sound, and this 
is completely reassuring. I am very passionate about it: "How are you 
here?" 


He did not speak, and Feng Xin replied on his behalf: "He came to give 
something." 


Thanks: "What?" 


The feelings slightly raised his hand and pointed to the side. He refers to a 
few clean bags, which should be the rice. 


Seeing the silence and silence, the sighs whispered: "I heard that you are 
short of medicine, and I will try to get some more." 


Wind channel: "Oh, then I say thank you, now I am missing these. The 
priest can not give things to the mortal privately, you should be careful." 
He joined the praying side, whispered: "I am also very surprised. He 


actually came back to help, before I counted my eyes. In short..." Xie pity 
suddenly said: "No." 


The face of the affection was grayed out and he shook his fist. The wind is 
strange: "What do you need?" 


Thanks for the word: "I don't need your help. I also... don't want your 
things. Please leave." 


Hearing the words "please leave you", the face of admiration is more gray. 


The wind letter also noticed that something was wrong, said: "What 
happened?" 


The feelings fell, and said: "I'm sorry." 


I have known the empathy for so many years. This is the first time I have 
heard him say these three words. It is also the first time I saw him a solid 
apology. Thanks to the pity, I was already surprised. "Please leave!" 


Some of his emotions are out of control, and they grab the bags and throw 
them away. The rice of the white flower was scattered all over the place, 
and the feelings of the white flower were so embarrassed that he was 
embarrassed, but he only held his hand and stopped it. He was still patient. 
Fengxin pulled the pity and said: "His Royal Highness! What happened in 
the end, what did he do?! Are you not practicing yet?! What happened in 
the middle?!" 


Xie pity was pulled by him, red-eyed: "...you ask him. I am going to 
practice, why am I coming back, you ask him!" 


The outside was too noisy. The queen who had fallen asleep in the house 
was awakened, and the cloak came out. "Emperor, are you coming back? 
What happened to you..." Fengxin said: "Nothing! The Queen is squatting 
fast. Go in!" Hard to push her back again, close the door and ask: "What 
are you doing? What are you doing in the end?! Your Highness, is this 
injury on your face?" 


The breath of pity is getting more and more rushed and messy, and I can’t 
speak at all. Mourning feelings: "Not me! I didn't play for my Highness. I 
just let him go. Besides, I didn't say a word, and I didn't do it to him! They 
are determined to win. In that case, you don't leave the fundamentals. 
Can't take it off!" 


In a few words, the wind letter finally figured out what happened. He 
widened his eyes and pointed at his affection, and could not say a word. 
For a long while, he bent over and grabbed the bag on the floor. He lost his 
face and snarled: "Fast roll! Roll fast!" 


Mu Qing was stunned by the rice bag she brought, and she stepped back 
two steps. The three people in the room were gasping, and the wind 
channel: "I said how suddenly you turned to sex? I really fucked, this 
fucking... don't let me see you again!" 


Mute and mute: "Yes! I am wrong, I recognize, I apologize! But I want to 
solve the problem at hand, and then talk about something else! If I don't go 
back to heaven, everyone will be finished! Your parents and my mother. 
Three of us, I don’t know when to struggle in the mud! If I go back first, 
there is still a chance..." 


Feng Xin said: "All the nonsense nonsense, less nonsense! No one wants to 
listen to your excuses, rolling!" 


Admiration: "If you and I are easy to use..." Fengxin interrupted him: "Let 
you not talk nonsense! Don't listen! I only know that I will not do the same 
thing with you no matter what the situation, I don't need it. Everywhere, 
you are ungrateful!" 


Mourning face is green, step forward, said: "His Royal Highness 1s not 
forced to rob during difficult times? Why come to me, you can not 
compare your heart?" 


The wind letter squirted, saying: "Ha? Robbery? Who is robbing? His 
Royal Highness? What the **** are you talking about?" 


Thank you for your sigh. 


Seeing the wind and anger, the anger gradually turned into a mistake, and 
the feelings of the situation were not right. I hesitated and turned to thank 
you. "You...you didn't...?" 


He did not expect that Xie Li did not tell the matter to the wind! 
"Ah, ah, ah ah ah!!!" 


Thanks to the madness, and I copied the same thing and rushed out. Mu 
Qing also realized that he might have smashed a big scorpion and was 
afraid to speak after being beaten several times. But when I fled outside, I 
saw that the thing I used to beat myself was actually a broom, and my face 
was dark. "You don't ridicule me like this?!" 


Thanks for the collapse of the tunnel: "Roll!" 


He took the boxing with a good wind, and his affection was swept by him, 
barely flashing, and his face was swept away with a trace of blood. He 
reached out and touched it. He looked at the blood in his hand. It was 
cloudy and uncertain. He said: "... OK. I am leaving." 


Thanks for the trembling, he bent down deeply. After a few steps, I put the 
rice bag on the ground and said, "I am really gone." 


Xie pity suddenly looked up, and his feelings saw his eyes, his throat 
moved, no longer staying, his sleeves left. 


The stunned wind letter in the house was chased out, saying: "His Royal 
Highness! He is pulling his dog? What happened to the robbery?" 


Thank you for your forehead: "... Don't ask, Fengxin I beg you not to ask." 


Wind channel: "No, of course I don't believe it, I want to know what's 
going on..." 


Thanks a little, screaming, covering his ears, fleeing into the house and 
locking himself up. 


Fengxin 1s really convinced that he will never do this kind of thing. But 
because of this, it has become the worst situation! 


Xie pity wants to simply flee and flee to a place where no one knows him, 
but he thinks of what he said nothing, and he dare not go too far, and can 
only shut himself in the house. No matter how the voice and the queen call 
him, he will not go out. 


It was not until two days later that Xie Pity felt a little calmer. When the 
wind letter knocked on the door again, he silently opened the door. 
Fengxin took a plate and stood at the door. "This is what the Queen has 
done for you during the day. I must send it to you." 


The color of the dish was blue, purple and purple, which made people 
horrified. Fengxin said again: "If your Highness 1s afraid of life, I will 
help you solve it. I will not tell the Queen to squat, huh, huh." 


It can be seen that in the wind confidence, I still want to ask how the 

robbery is going, but I am afraid that I will lock myself up. I have to force 
it to press, pretending that I am not going to ask, so it is easy. But he is not 
good at making jokes, and the jokes that are made out are so embarrassing. 


To be honest, the taste of the food he made after his mother is really 
terrible, and the more the number of cooking, the more careful the 
attitude, the more progress toward a direction that should not advance. Xie 
pity has never been to the kitchen, but he cooks well, it seems, can only be 
interpreted as talent. Despite this, thank you still took the plate and sat at 
the table and ate it. Anyway, what he eats now can't taste anything. 


Fortunately, unfortunately. Although he thought that he had been heard that 
night, he would have heard it, but according to the situation in the past few 
days, the king and queen seem to be unclear about his robbery. Otherwise, 
with the temper of the country, he has long been stunned by a dog. The 
wind letter will definitely not say to them, so for the time being, you can 
let go of your heart. 


Thinking of this, the wind letter suddenly got up, thanked and awakened, 
said: "What are you doing?" 


Fengxin took the bow and said: "It’s time to go out and go out and sell." 
Xie pity stood up and said: "I will go too." 


For a moment of hesitation, the wind channel: "Forget it, you should rest 
and rest." 


Although the wind letter did not ask again, Xie Pity was also 
uncomfortable. I always felt that after being told by the wind, I couldn’t 
go back to anything between the two. Every word of the wind letter 
seemed to have nothing to look at. The meaning is worthy of further 
investigation. Xie pity shook his head and sighed, saying: "I tell you the 
truth, I don't think about cultivation now." 


This kind of letter is expected, and I don’t know what to say. Thanks again 
and again: "In this case, instead of sitting in the house, it is better to go out 
and sell art, at least to earn some money, not to be like..." 


Not as a waste. 


I don't know why, the last two words, he could not say it. Probably because 
I really feel that I am already a waste person, I dare not confide these 
words easily. 


Fengxin ts still not at ease, said: "I can do it alone. Your Highness will 
only eat a meal in these two days, or rest for a few more days." 


The more he said, the more eager he was to prove himself, turned and 
looked in the mirror and said, "Nothing, I will sort it out..." 


He originally wanted to sort out the appearance, at least not to mess up 
like a madman, who knows, but saw a picture of horror in the mirror. 


In the mirror, he didn't have a face—because his face was reflected with a 
half-smile and a half-smile. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 188: Cold 
white ghost warm confusing child 2 


Xie pity yelled on the spot, and the wind and cold letter was shocked by 
him. "What happened?! What happened!" 


Xie pity palely pointed at the mirror: "He! I... I, I..." 


Feng Xin followed his hand and looked into the mirror. For a while, he 
turned his head in a blank voice and said: "...What happened to you?" 


Xie pity is not too scary, hold on to him tightly, so it is easy to say a few 
more words: "I! I! My face! You didn't see it? I have a face?!" 


Feng Xin stared at his face and sighed. Xie Li still wondered why he didn't 
respond, but listened to the wind channel: "His Royal Highness, did you 
find yourself hurt on your face?" 


Thanks for falling into the ice. 
why? How could this be? Why does the wind letter say so? 


Is it a wind letter, can't see the mask on his face in the mirror at the 
moment? ! 


Thanks to pity: "Can't you see? There is something on my face!" 
Fengxin wondered: "What? What exactly? I didn't see it?" 
Cherish and go to the mirror again: "Impossible! I..." 


However, he looked again, the mask on his face in the mirror disappeared, 
and his horrified face was reflected. 


The face was staggered with black and blue scars. It looked like a lost 
soul, and it was as if it was a small long-term worker who was beaten by 


the rich man. Thanks for the pity, I couldn’t help but smothered it. I tried 
to touch the edge of my cheek and thought: "...Is this me?" 


At this time, I only listened to the wind channel: "His Royal Highness, are 
you... are you too tired? Or are you angry with that stinky boy? Listen to 
me, don't go out recently, or take more rest." 


Thanks for your pity, it’s easy to go back to God, see the wind letter back 
the bow, and put the stool to go out, busy: "No! I..." 


Fengxin pushed the door and turned back: "What else?" 


When the words are on the lips, they are swallowed again. Because he 
suddenly had a strange thought in his mind: 


The present day is already very difficult. If you tell the wind letter, the 
white phase may come back and wrap them up. What will the wind letter 
do? 


The shadow of the wind and dialogue is not shallow, what will he do? Will 
it sprout back and leave like a passion? 


When he was thinking about it, Fengxin had already gone out. Xie Li was 
awakened by the closing of the door, had to retract the bed, stuffed the 
quilt, and planned to sleep again. 


Suddenly, he smelled a strange smell. 


Thanks for the pity, I thought it was the queen who was cooking again or 
the mouse died in the corner. I looked up and looked for it. Finally I found 
out that the source of this strange smell was actually myself. 


Thanks to this, I remembered that he had not changed clothes and washed 
for dozens of days, and of course there was a smell. 


Xie pity held his breath, and his heart suddenly burst into a disgust with 
himself. I thought that my parents and the wind letter must have been 
aware of it, but I didn’t tell him that it was a shame. I sneaked open the 


door and looked at it. No one was outside, so I found new clothes and 
planned to take a bath. 


Some toss, finally in the bath. He sank his whole person into the bottom of 
the water, suffocated, and then fainted and floated out, washing a few 
faces. 


After brushing the whole body up and down, thanking the pity to reach out 
to get the clothes, absently shaking the clothes and dressing, suddenly 
found something wrong. 


This is not his clothes at all, but the white, big sleeveless mourning! ! ! 


Xie pity only felt that the hot water he had soaked instantly turned into a 
pot of ice, and his hair was stunned, and he lost his voice: "Who! Who did 
it?!" 


Who is he not paying attention to secretly changing clothes? ! 


He jumped out and knocked down the tub, a loud noise, and the whole 
house was filled with water, and the queen of the country in the next room 
was scared. The queen helped the king of the country to come in and saw 
it. She prayed and fell to the ground, and the ground was full of water. She 
was scared to pounce on him and said, "Hello, what happened to you!" 


Thanks to pity, draped his head, scattered his hair, raised his face, and 
hugged her backhand: "Mother, ghost, ghost, ghosts around me! He has 
been following me!" 


He looks like this, it looks like he is crazy. The queen can no longer stand 
it, and his son is so sad that he cried out. The lord also looked at the pity, 
and the forties were now more than the years of the armor. The coldness of 
winter is thankful for a spirit, and he said: "Clothes. Look at the 
clothes!..." 


However, he went to see the clothes again. What is the white mourning 
service? Isn't it his white robe? 


Thanks for a moment of anger, a hammer on the barrel, roaring: "What do 
you want? You are playing me?!" 


The Queen resisted tears and hugged him: "The emperor should not be 
angry. You should put on your clothes first, put on it, don't catch cold..." 


On this day, Fengxin came back very late, and his face was tired and 
deeper than ever. 


Xie Li has been waiting for him for a long time, can't wait to be authentic: 
"Faith, I have something important to tell you." 


Although the white phase is too strange, even if it tells the wind, it is 
useless to predict the police in advance, but he thinks about it, or thinks 
that this matter should not be humiliated, so he decided to tell him the 
truth. Unexpectedly, Fengxin did not immediately ask him what he was, 
but said: "Exactly, I also want to tell you something." 


Thanks for the fact that it is more important to be sure that nothing is 
wrong. The important thing is to put it behind and say, sit at the table and 
ask: "You say it first, what?" 


The wind was hesitating, saying: "Let your Highness, let me talk about it." 


Xie pity also unwilling to quit, whispered: "Fengxin, you must be careful, 
white no return." 


" " 


The wind letter changed: "White has nothing to come back? Why do you 
say that? You saw it?" 


Thank you, "Yes! I saw it." 


Fengxin’s face was white and said: “Yes... but why are you seeing it? Why 
are you still safe when you see it?” 


Xie pity buried his face in his hand and said: "...I don't know! But he not 
only did not kill me, but also..." 


He also touched his head like a loving elder and said to him, "Come to 
me." 


After listening to the encounters of these days, the shock on the face of 
Fengxin gradually faded and was replaced by confusion. "What does he 
want to do?" 


Thanks to the pity: "There must be no good intentions anyway, and he 
seems to have followed me. In short... you are careful! Help me remind 
my father and mother to be careful, but don't scare them." 


Wind channel: "Good. I won't go out these days, the things that the kid 
sent... should be able to hold for a while." 


It is really embarrassing. When he was in love, he left everything he 
brought. Although she was out of control at that time, he said that he didn't 
need his things and help, but when he calmed down, he still slammed 
things back. Thanks a little sigh, nodded, and said: "Yes, what are you 
going to tell me?" 


Mentioning this, the wind letter hesitated. When he paused, he spoke up, 
and it was a rare spit. While holding his hair, he said, "In fact, your 
Highness, where are you, there is money? Or what can be pawn?" 


Xie Pity did not expect that he would actually ask this question that was a 
fool at this time, and said: "Ah? What do you ask this?" 


Fengxin daringly said: "...nothing...just if there is, can you...take me first?" 
Thanks a bitter smile: "...Do you think there will be?" 

Fengxin also sighed and said: "I think so too." 

Thanks for thinking, said: "But I did not give you a gold belt before?" 
Fengxin muttered: "That is not enough, not enough..." 


Thanks to pity, he said: "Faith? What did you do? How could a gold belt be 
enough? Are you playing outside to lose money? Tell me about it?" 


The wind letter came back to God and said, "No! Don't worry, I will ask!" 


After repeated questioning, the wind letter guarantees nothing, thank you 
for not saying: "If there is anything, you must tell me, we can find a way 
together." 


Wind channel: "You don't care about me, I can't think of a way to think 
about it. Your Highness, you still have to solve your problem first!" 


When he mentioned this, the heart of thankfulness sank again. 


As he expected, for the next few days, that thing was always entangled in 
him. 


Xie Li can always see the sad face in a lot of unexpected places, or a white 
figure if there 1s nothing. Sometimes it is in the bed at night, sometimes in 
the water, sometimes at the door of Horan, sometimes, even behind the 
wind. 


White no phase seems to be intimidating him, and deliberately only let 
him see it alone. Whenever the pity can't stand yelling and pointing at 
him, the other person rushes over, or when he turns back, he disappears. 
On such a day, Xie pity was amazed, and I hated that I couldn't wait to 
catch this thing, but he couldn't even step on the shadow of the other party. 
It was inevitable that he would be upside down day and night, and his body 
and mind would be exhausted. 


One day, he woke up in the middle of the night, feeling thirsty that was 
difficult to suppress, remembering that he didn't drink water all day, got up 
and prepared to go out to drink some water, but he heard the faint faint and 
weak candlelight outside. Thanks for the pity, immediately hiding behind 
the door, his heart screaming: "Who is it? If it is the father and the mother 
and the wind, why bother?" 


Who knows, this sneaky, really is his father and mother and the wind letter. 
The voice of the wind letter is extremely low: "Have your Highness rest?" 


The Queen also whispered: "Sleep down." 


The country owner said: "I just fell asleep, you must not call him too early 
tomorrow, let him sleep for a while." 


This sentence made Xie pity a bitter, and then listened to the Queen: "Oh... 
this way, when will the Queen be good?" 


Xie Pui felt that there was something wrong with this. At this time, 
Fengxin whispered: "He 1s also too tired to do so recently. There are too 
many things happening. Both of them are also hung up, if there is 
something under Your Highness. If something is wrong, please let me 
know. But don't be aware of it, and don't say something exciting to him..." 


Thanks for hiding behind the door, there was a blank in his mind, and the 
blood rushed straight up. 


What do you mean? What does it mean? 


He growled in his heart: "I am not crazy! I am not lying! I am telling the 
truth!" 


Thanks for raising his hand," "slammed the door, and the three people 
in the room were surprised. The wind letter stood up and said: "His Royal 
Highness? Why didn't you sleep?!" 


Thank you for your kindness and face: "You don't believe me?" 


A windy letter, said: "I certainly believe in you! You..." Xie pity 
interrupted him: "What do you mean by those words? Is it that all the 
things I see are hallucinations, my own delusions? ” 


The Lord and the Queen wanted to interject, and thanked immediately, 
"Don't talk, you don't understand!" 


Wind channel: "No! I believe in your Highness, but you are too tired 
recently to be honest!" 


Xie pity looked at him, did not speak, there is something in my heart, but 
it is pouring cold wind. 


He believes that, in general, Fengxin still believes in him. At least eight 
points. 


Not entirely believe. After all, thank you for the recent days, it is too sick. 
If you look at any outsider, you will definitely judge that this is a madman. 
What qualifications make you fully trust? 


But it shouldn't be like this. The previous letter of truth will believe him 
without reservation! Even if there are only two points of suspicion, it is 
unbearable! 


Xie pity is full of anger and resentment, I don’t know who it is, no 
dialogue, no wind, no one, no one. He didn't say a word, turned around and 
went out, and the wind letter went up and said: "His Royal Highness, 
where are you going?" 


Xie pity forced to calm down: "Don't worry, don't keep up, go back." 
Wind channel: "No, but where are you going? I am going with you." 


Xie pity made up his mind and suddenly ran wildly. The windsmanship 
was not as fast as he was. He was far away from him by a long time. He 
could only shout at the back. The king and the queen also came out to call 
him, but the pity did not turn a deaf ear. The sooner. 


He must take the initiative to attack! 


If there is no reason to kill the pity, or the wind, or his parents, no one is 
not easy, but he does not kill, but he wants to play like a toy, and then treat 
him as a joke! 


Cheering and fleeing, facing the night, he said: "Get out! You are the 
monster in this gutter!!! Get out!!!" 


The white phase is completely rushed to him alone, so he believes that the 
white phase will definitely follow him. However, after a vocabulary-poor 

curse, there was not a sneer from the unexpected dark corners as usual, or 

a figure appeared behind him, and put a hand on the cold. He is on his 


head. In the rushing number, Xie Li finally drained his physical strength, 
bent down deeply, his hands on his knees, panting, and the chest tube filled 
with a rust. 


For a long time, he jerked up and continued to move forward. He 
whispered: "...Do you want to consume it with me? OK, slow 
consumption!" 


He did not know how long he walked on foot in the wild mountains and 
deep forests, and the fog gradually became rich. 


The old black-painted trees of the four sides were all tilted forward and 
tilted to the extreme, as if they were invited to step into a forbidden place. 
Thanks for knowing that the front is not good, but it is inevitable. 
Moreover, we must make a break, come sooner or later, so, calmly 
continue to move forward. Walking and walking, in front of the white 
mist, it is a glimpse of a row of glittering things, like a glowing wall. 


Xie has never seen this kind of thing, frowning slightly, and fixing his 
footsteps. And that "wall" is actually approaching him slowly! 


Thanks to pity and vigilance, folded a branch, and held it in his hand. 
When the "wall" forced him to less than two feet in front of him, he 
suddenly realized that it was not a wall, but a myriad of ghosts. Because it 
is too much, it looks like a wall of fire or a big net. 


Although the wildfires are weird, they are not killing. They just float in 
silence and refuse to let him move on. Thanks for trying to circumvent 
them, these wildfires immediately changed direction and stopped in front 
of him. At the same time, he heard many voices: 


"Don't go." 
"Don't go." 
"There are bad things in front." 


"Go back, don't go on any more!" 


These sounds are dense, but they are like tidal water. Thanks for being 
surrounded by them, he noticed that there was a group of flames in these 
wildfires that were exceptionally bright and exceptionally silent. 


Although the Ghostfire has no eyes at all, but looking at the group of 
wildfires, he seems to be able to feel a burning gaze and greet him. 


It seems that this ghost is the strongest of these wildfires. Other wildfires 
are all following it. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 189: Cold 
white ghost warm confusing child 3 


Thanks for the cold and cold: "Get away." 


The wildfire did not move. Thanks for your pity: "Why are you blocking 
me?" 


That fire does not answer. Other small wildfires are still repeating "Don't 
go on." Xie pity did not want to entangle with these things, waved his hand 
and broke them. 


It’s not that it’s a slap in the air. It’s just a dispel of the wISPs that formed 
the block, as if they had dispersed a group of fireflies or small goldfish. 


Thanks for passing quickly, and stepping on the ground, the dead leaves 
and the leaves whispered, but looking back, the wildfires quickly followed 
up and seemed to be coming back again. Thanks for warning: "Don't 
follow me." 


The brightest and hottest group of wildfires flew in the front, and turned a 
deaf ear. Thanks for giving up the hand and making a slap, and said: 
"Follow me, beware, I will beat you away!" 


So intimidating, many of the wildfires are scared, fluttering, timid and 
shrinking back. The head of the wildfire stagnate in the air, still following 
the five steps behind him, let the pity feel that it seems to say "the soul 
does not matter," or it is, it knows, thank you will not really Hit it. 


Thanks for the sudden anger that did not come from. He used to drink, and 
which little ghost dared to entangle again? I have long been stuck with my 
tail. Nowadays, not only do individuals dare to trample on him, but even 
this small group of ghosts don’t listen to him. They don’t take his threats 
seriously. They are so angry that they are red and mutter: “... even you 
This kind of devil is also like this... all this... no one is not like this!" 


It’s a bit funny to be mad at this little thing, but thank you for being angry 
at this moment. Unexpectedly, after he whispered this sentence, the group 
of wildfires seemed to understand that he is now angry and sad, set in the 
air, no longer moving forward, with hundreds of small fires, slowly 
receding. After a while, it disappeared into the night. 


Thanks for giving a sigh of relief, turned and continued. 


After seven or eight hundred steps, a few corners of the flying smog 
appeared in the fog ahead, which seemed to be a deep mountain view. 
Thanks for the pity, I went to the front, and fixed my eyes, my eyes were 
slightly enlarged. 


This is actually... a prince temple. 


Naturally, it is the ruined temple of the Prince. It has long been ransacked 
by mobs, and the shackles fell to the ground and fell into two halves. Xie 
pity paused for a moment at the entrance of the temple, and lifted his foot 
across the broken plaque and entered the temple. The statue in the temple 
has long since disappeared. I don’t know if it was smashed or burned, or it 
was sunk. The sky was empty, leaving only a black base. On both sides, 
"the body is in the middle, the heart is in Taoyuan" was divided into 
twenty-seven knives, as if a good beauty was scratched with a knife, no 
longer beautiful, gloomy. 


Thanks for the pity, he sat down in the temple and waited for the 
appearance of white phaselessness. After a fragrant incense, there was a 
figure in the fog outside the temple. 


However, this figure is not the right shape, not as self-satisfied as white; 
the footsteps are not right, more hurried, not as quiet as nothing. 
Therefore, the person who comes here is definitely not white, nor is it 
anyone he knows. 


So who is it? 


Thanks to the police, he waited until the man rushed to the Prince Temple 
before he saw the other side. However, unfortunately, the comers did not 


agree with all his guesses - how to look at them is completely a passer-by, 
can not see the clues. 


But thank you for still not relaxing your vigilance. Who knows if it will be 
a white disguise? 


In the barren hills and mountains, the Taoist temple was defeated, and one 
person was met, and the other side was warned and the other party was 
also wary of pity. For a long while, he only tried to ask: "This...do you? Do 
you know where this is?" 


Thanks a little frown, looked up: "You don't know where this is? Then how 
did you come?" 


That person said: "I lost my way! I can't turn around for a long time." 


Thank you for knowing that he is definitely not lost. If this person is not 
white and disguised, then most of it is being turned into something. 


He said: "Don't turn, you can't go out." 

"Hey? What do you say?" 

Xie pity no longer answered, continue to meditate. If it 1s nothing to do, it 
is useless to worry. He does not want to leave without letting everyone go. 


It is better to wait and see what he wants to do. 


The man was also tired, sitting on the side of the rest, and the two were 
safe. After a while, there was a figure in the fog. Before going to the 
temple, it was also a passerby. When I saw someone in the temple, I 
quickly greeted me: "Two dudes! Ask, what is this? local?" 


The two passers-by talked and thanked him for giving a hunch. 
This is not over yet. Someone will come. 
Sure enough, less than an hour, this Prince Temple has come to dozens of 


people. Men, women and children, or one person, or two or three, or 
dragging their families, most of them are lost, but the way to get lost is 


strange, and some can even be here on the street, it 1s incredible. Inside, 
Xie Pity also saw the busker who had to break the stone with him before 
his chest. His face was not very good. It seems that the last time he tried to 
make him hurt, the two men took a face and did not speak. Nod. 


Obviously, these are all ordinary people, and all of them are white and 
inadvertently brought to this deep forest! 


Thanks to the heart, the alarm bell is getting louder and louder, but it is 
quiet. Take a cold **** from the sleeve and sip it hard, chew it hard, and 
then swallow it hard. He wants to save his strength as much as possible to 
cope with the possible battles that may come soon. 


After two hours, the crowd in the Prince Temple was smashed by the 
"lost", and the praying was dark, about 100 people. No one has come to the 
forest. 


When there were more people, the scene was noisy, and everyone was 
screaming: "You are also inexplicably coming? This is really evil!" 


Someone suggested: "Would you like to find it again?" 


Someone immediately agreed: "I don't believe if I walk around, so many 
people have not gone out!" 


The pity that sat in the corner was cold and looked up: "It doesn't matter 
how you go. You can't get out." 


Everyone looked at him: "Why?" 


Thanks for the cold and cold: "Because you are all brought here by a 
monster. You are all his toys, will he let you go so cheaply?" 


Everyone feels that he is alarmist. He feels that he 1s a god, and he feels 


that he should not be underestimated. One stood up and said: "Who are 
you? Why do you say that?" 


"He seems to be the first person to come. He was sitting here when I 
came." 


"strange...... 
"Yeah, still covering his face." 
"Do you have any documents?" 


Thanks and pity: "There is no voucher. If you believe in it or not, the 
monster will definitely not invite you to dinner. Be careful not to mention 
more." 


The voice just fell, no one responded, and there was a rush of footsteps in 
the distance. The spirit of the people immediately revive, saying: 
"Someone is coming!" 


When even someone wants to go out and have a look, they have just 
stepped out of the temple door and hurried back. Because, along with the 
sound of running, there is a burst of screams of madness! 


This call is not like a person can send out, everyone's face changes greatly, 
and they all go back to the temple, saying: "My mother, who is this? Can 
you be a beast?!" 


And the shadows in the fog are getting closer and closer, thank you for 
your pity: "No, that is indeed an individual!" 


However, the man screamed and screamed and screamed at his hands. 
Seeing that he was going to the Prince’s Temple, thanking the crowd and 
crowding out the crowd, standing on the outer layer to see what was going 
on, the man seemed to have no long eyes and went straight to a tree at the 
entrance of the Prince’s Temple. "", on the spot was bounced off the 
ground, fell to the ground and passed out. 


Everyone was shocked and shouted in the temple and stretched his neck 
and said: "...this... what happened to this person?" 


Including the busker, there are a few daring ones to look at, and Xie pity 
immediately said: "Don't get close!" 


Several people were shocked by his harsh tone and said, "What should I 
do? Let him lie there?" 


Thanks, "I will go see it." 
Everyone said: "Are you careful?" 


Cheering nodded, slowly approaching the tree, kneeling down, was about 
to remove the man's face, and the man suddenly jumped up and made two 
screams. 


Yes, it is two screams. Moreover, it 1s two sounds that are emitted at the 
same time. One is from the mouth of the person, and the other is from his 
face - there is a face on the face of this person! 


Human face disease! 


Thanks to the psoriasis, the pupils swelled and the pupils in the temple 
were scared by this terrible scene. After the man bounced up, he opened 
his hands and rushed to the crowd. Thanks to the gratification of his eyes 
and his hands, the palm of his hand was photographed and he was shot to 
fly a few feet away. Xie pity quickly stepped back and stopped at the 
entrance of the temple. All the people behind him were terrified. "Is this 
disease not only on the Imperial City? The Imperial City has killed so 
many people. Is this disease already extinct?!" 


"Isn't it true? Is it really a personal face on his face?!" 


What is even more frightening is that in the next moment, more screams 
came from all directions, and more than a dozen figures swayed toward 
the Prince's Temple. 


I don’t have to look at it, it’s all human face disease patients! 


Someone shouted: "Everyone runs! Spread! Don't be close to them!!!" 


Thanks for the pity, he said: "Don't let go! I don't know how much in the 
forest!! If it's more outside, it's over!" 


"What should I do?!" "You can't wait for them to catch up!" "Is this not 
waiting to die?!" 


The branch that had been folded on the road had never been on the waist. 
He pulled out, like a sword, and said: "Reassure, they can't come over. Can 
you get close to here, of course, I have the final say!" 


Here is his place, Prince's Hall! 


Waiting for everyone to ask again, thank you for flying out, "brushing" a 
few branches, and instantly dumping those people with epidemic disease 
on the ground, this is not difficult for pity, when it comes to doing, these 
strange people really One did not get close. Everyone in the temple was 
gasping, and he was scared when he saw it. He saw him win, and he 
applauded. Thank you very much. In the night sky of the forest, I don’t 
know when I swam a lot of wildfires. When I was dancing in the air, I 
wonder if I was helping to drive out those people who were infected with 
the epidemic. Anyway, thanking them, they felt that they did not hinder 
their own affairs. After sweeping a circle, he habitually took the sword 
back into the sheath. After collecting an empty space, he found that he was 
not holding a sword in his hand but a branch. After a moment, he saw a 
white silhouette not far away. Waving to him. Xie Li has just fought a 
round, is boiling, immediately chased up: "Don't want to run away!" 


The group of wildfires also rushed to follow him, as if to illuminate the 
way for him. White is no longer natural to escape, not slow or slow, but 
calm, but always on him so seven or eight steps. Thanks for a few steps, 
my heart lit up and I immediately turned back. Seeing that he is not 
chasing, but no white, but not leaving, said: "Why don't you come over?" 


Thanks for turning back: "You just want to lead me away and spread a 
human face epidemic. Why should I let you succeed with the past?" 


White is nothing but smiles: "No, you are wrong. My purpose is not to 
"lead you", my purpose is you." 


Although he couldn’t see his expression on his face with sorrow and joy, 
but for some reason, thankfulness can be felt, he is smiling. 


It’s really unreasonable to adjust the tiger to the mountain. If you want to 
spread the human face epidemic once again, you can’t stop it in the north, 
and why can’t you stop it in this deep mountain? 


Thanks for the rest, said: "What do you want to do?!" 


He has asked this question countless times and has lost patience. White 
has no reason: "I said, I want you to come to me." 


Thanks for pulling out the branches and pointing him, although there is no 
deterrent at all, it seems a bit funny, but this is the only weapon in his hand 
at the moment. Fortunately, a group of extraordinarily bright ghosts fell on 
the front of the branch, adding a bit of momentum to him. Thanks pity: 
"What do you want me to do to your side? Want your life?" 


White no smile, a few low voices, warmly said: "His Royal Highness, you 
are a beautiful jade, let me teach you." 


Thanks for being funny and angry, I couldn’t help but swear: "Through you 
also teach me? My master is a teacher of Xianle, what are you! Where are 
you coming from!" 


White no one stretched out a finger and shook it. "You are wrong again. 
Your Royal Highness, you should say that in this world, only I can teach 
you. Your Master? Xianle Guoshi?" 


He arrogantly and arrogantly said: "In front of me, this kind of thing is not 
worth mentioning. Instead, I teach you, you learn very well." 


Thank you for your anger: "What have you taught me? What are you 
doing? Don't understand!" 


White has no smile and said: "The first thing I teach you is: There are 
many things in the world, you can't do anything about it." 


Hearing words, Xie pity has flashed a lot of cluttered sounds and pictures. 
In the end, he bit his teeth and stabbed a "sword", and the white light 
flashed easily, saying: "The second thing -" 


He grabbed the pity, and thanked him for a pity. He almost fell and felt a 
hand touched his head. He said, "Do you want to save the people? 
Cangsheng does not need to be saved by you. They are not worthy. ” 


The gesture of thanking me was a little stagnation, and it was a thorn to 


shoot the backhand. The sound of" _" was that the white branch had 
broken the branches in his hand, and flashed behind him, the cold fingers 
were already deadly on his head! 


Thanks to him, he resisted the back of his head, feeling that he would pass 
through his brain and stiffen his body at any time. There was a voice 
behind him: "If you don't come to me, you will never win me, and you will 
always be defeated by me." 


Thanks for a few breaths, Shen Sheng: "...even though!" 


After a pause, he said in a word: "Can't win, just now. You can beat me 
countless times, but you can't kill me. And as long as you can't kill me, 
one day, I will beat you!" 


The wildfire heard his words and burned even more fiercely, as if to 
illuminate the entire night sky. Bai Wuxiang was silent for a moment 
behind him and asked, "Can I kill you?" 


Thank you for your breath. 
In fact, he did not know the extent to which Junwu gave him the undead 


body. If the white is in anger, really dig through his brain? Will he still be 
alive? 


At this time, there is no such thing as white: "I can't kill you. I won't kill 
you." 


"But, don't be too confident now. After that, don't regret this." 
regret? Why regret? 


Xie pity still did not want to understand, a hand knife slashed on his neck, 
and it was dark in front of him. 


In the darkness, there seems to be light and heat coming from far away. 
Thanks for the light and go away, a little bit awake. 


Slightly open your eyes, the first thing that caught your eye was the ghost 
fire above. It seems that the light and heat felt in a coma is it. 


Seeing that he woke up, the wildfire was posted all over, and it seemed as 
if he was too close to people, and he retreated a little. Xie Li always felt 
that this group of wildfires seemed to be exceptionally unusual. If you 
remember correctly, it was just that it was blocked on the road. He wants 
to reach out and explore, and he can't reach out. 


Thanks for your pity, when you are awake. Looking down, I discovered 
that the reason why I couldn’t get out was that his hands and feet were 
tied. 


He was tied tightly to the platform, and the broken base was under him. 
Many people crowded under the platform of God, staring at him with a 
pair of eyes. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 190: Hundreds 
of swords 


The author has something to say: Notice: qaq everyone... immediately on a 
business trip, take a day off. The fourth volume has already passed most of 
the time. Everyone who is chasing the text is a brave angel. Thank you! ! ! 
And rest assured that the fifth volume and the outside will certainly 
sweeten back to love love. After all, the rumor of this article is, for love, 

to enter the earth, for you, to be invincible! 





The flower is now only transformed, and it has not yet become a must. 
Why are you looking at him like this? 

Thank you for listening to someone whispering: "It seems..." 

"It's not like... it's exactly the same!" 

"Is it really him?" 

Someone asked directly: "You are... that, Prince?" 

Xie pity subconsciously said: "I am not..." 


However, when the voice did not fall, he found that the original white he 
used to cover the real purpose, I do not know when it was solved. At this 
moment, he tied his five flowers, that is the day. His face has been seen in 
front of everyone. 


The heart of thankfulness hangs on the eyes of the blind man, and the scalp 
is on the line of sight. 


I don't know if he is psychologically guilty. He feels that everyone's eyes 
are strange. However, fortunately, perhaps because of the current situation 
of crisis, these eyes do not have the disgust or anger he imagined. The 


reason why he thinks this is because the next moment, there is a sudden 
burst of inhuman screams! 


Thanks for turning his head, he found that the people who were screaming 
were actually those who had been punished by him. They didn't know 
when they climbed again, and they were many times more. They were 
outside the Prince's Hall. They held hands and stopped them in a circle. 
They shouted around the Prince's Temple, as if they were some kind of 
horrific ritual, and they seemed to be pure. The group of devil dances. 
Everyone in the temple was scared, and the young child cried out, and his 
parents held their arms in their arms and covered their ears. Every face is 
full of fear: "What to do? What should I do?" 


"These people will not rush in..." 


"Even if we don't rush in, they are so close, we will get sick... What should 
I do if I have that disease?!" 


Xie pity struggled, but there was no way to make a profit. It seems that 
this day has been passive, and it is estimated that it was injected with 
mana. He earned a swell on the blue ribs and shouted: "White has no 
phase!" 


No one answered, but a cold hand patted his head. Thanks for a pity, the 
cold hair was upright, and I turned around and looked at the scalp for a 
moment. 


It is no wonder that the eyes of the following people are so strange when 
they look at it, not only because his face is exposed, but also because the 
white phase is sitting in the darkness behind him! 


In the face of such a strange white man, the atmosphere of the people did 
not dare to go out, and even dared not act rashly. The consequence was that 
they had nothing to look at, as they had nothing, and they raised their 
thanks in the eyes of the public. 


Xie pity changed from lying down to sitting, sitting on his platform, like a 
living, detained god. He could only turn his eyes and his head. Other than 


that, he could hardly do anything. 


Although this situation is extremely different, it is even more terrible for 
people who are screaming outside. The eyes of everyone underneath 
quickly returned to the outside. Someone muttered: "...I have heard of it. I 
have heard that people living in a region can infect each other. This disease 
is very infectious! So close, at such a distance, we are sure, sure!" 


I think that they are likely to suffer from the horrific plague, and the 
temple is desperate. One person said: "Or else, let's find a few people to 
rush out and kill these strange people. Others rushed to escape?" 


However, it does not mean that those who rushed out can kill so many 
geeks, as long as they rush to scuffle, they will certainly suffer from 
human epidemics, which is to sacrifice themselves and save everyone. 
Who is willing to go when it comes to the death? No one wants. 


Thanks for the pity, but he is now subject to white no-phase, and he is okay 
with seven or eight tricks. This is a fewteen or eighty. It’s inevitable that 
there will be fish leaking through the net. Come in the Prince's Temple. As 
for the direct killing of white phaseless? Don't think about it, I don't think 
about it. 


However, now there must be someone who can calm down everyone's 
emotions, and thank God for setting the mind, saying: "Everyone should 
not mess up! Not so fast, we still have time to find a way." 


However, just guaranteeing that "it is not so fast" is not able to appease 
people. 


Breaking this desperation, it 1s actually nothing. Cold, he said: "People's 
face disease can be isolated and cured." 


As soon as this statement came out, everyone brushed their heads and said, 
"Can it be cured? What is the solution?!" 


Xie pity a heart suddenly hangs. White no phase is a long way to go: "Ask 
your Highness Prince. Your Royal Highness knows the way." 


So, a hundred pairs of eyes brushed and looked at the pity. Those eyes 
stabbed him back, and he was blocked by white and pushed back. Several 
people are full of hope: "His Royal Highness, do you really know?" 


Xie Li did not answer, just listened to someone excited: "I heard people 
say, he knows!" 


Some people also suspected: "When you know, why is the Imperial City 
still...? Do you know that he does not tell others?" 


"His Royal Highness, tell us now? Ah? 
Xie pity quickly denied: "I don't know!" 
White has nothing to say: "You lie." 


Thanks to the anger and anger, but I am afraid that nothing will be said. He 
has a hunch, no matter whether he accepts it or not, it will definitely be 
said. After struggling for a long time, he reluctantly said: "The way... there 
is no. It is useless!" 


After a while, the crowd began to commotion: "What does it mean to use 
nothing? You don't say how do we know if it works?" 


Cold sweat ran down his forehead, thanking the heart: "I really can't say..." 
can not say! 
Once you say it, it’s all over, it’s all messed up! 


Some people couldn’t stand it, and stood up and said: "I have come to this 
life and death. What can't I say? Don't you say that everyone is here to die 
here?" 


White has no phase temperature: "I will tell you." 


Thankful and angry: "Stop!" 


His swearing is naturally not a bit of deterrence. White has nothing to say, 
"Do you know that people inside and outside the Imperial City have the 
least face disease?" 


Everyone was watching and watching him. Although he did not dare to 
approach, he had to ask: "What, who?" 


White has no reason: "Soldier." 

It’s over. 

White has no way to continue: "Why are soldiers? Because most soldiers 
have done one thing. And this thing is not done by ordinary people, so they 


have suffered from human face disease." 


Everyone's eyes are getting bigger and bigger, and even the throat doesn't 
dare to swallow. "That thing, is...?" 


Xie pity hit him at the end, nothing more than a futile effort. Bai Wuxiang 
laughed and took him back and said: "What is it?" 


He faintly said: "Killing." 
Finished! ! ! 


He really said it. Thank you for your pity on the platform, a heart like an 
ice cave. For a long while, several talents were shocked: "... murder? Can 
murder be ill? Can murder be cured?" 


"1s that a lie!" 

Desperate is, no! Not a lie! 

This is absolutely true. Xie pity personally confirmed that people who 
have blood scarves and human lives on their hands will not suffer from 


epidemics! 


Everyone did not expect the immune condition to be this anyway. They 
were all shocked and said: "Does this make sense?" 


"I used to feel weird. It seems... I really didn't hear about the proliferation 
of people in the army! I am afraid it is true!" 


"it is true!" 
"But the meaning is that we have to kill people first to avoid illness?!" 
"Who kills?" 


The person who asked this question was immediately besieged: "What 
‘killing who’? It’s hard that you really want to kill!” 


The man didn't dare to speak at once. But in this hundred pairs of eyes, 
compared to the pure fear and helplessness, there are a lot of other things, 
extremely subtle and extremely strange. 


This is the situation that Xie Pity does not want to see. Once the law of 
immunization of human face disease is exposed to the world, there will be 
another inevitable happening. 


Kill each other! 


This is the way that thank you for discovering immunity, but never dared 
to tell others. As long as murder is free from human plague, perhaps most 
people will restrain themselves, but there will always be desperate people 
taking risks. And once someone commits the first **** case for 
immunization, there will be a second and a third soon... 


There will be more and more emulators, and in the end, the world will be 
chaotic. So, it’s better to be strict from the beginning, no one knows! 


Thanks and smiles: "You know now, why do I say this method is useless?" 


Everyone does not speak. Thanks a lot of sighs, strong spirits, and a warm 
breath, said: "In any case, don't panic, don't act rashly, otherwise you will 
be trapped in this thing." 


There was a couple of people who looked like Sven in the bottom. The 
woman hugged her child and said, "How is this? Why is this? Why is it us? 


We obviously have nothing to do!" 


One person nearby was annoyed: "Cry and cry, cry and cry, you know 
crying! Who is not doing anything here! Is it bad for you alone?" 


The woman’s husband angered: “Why, you still don’t want to cry?” 
"What is the use of crying people's upset? Give me a shut up!" 


Actually quarreling for such a small matter, I can only say that everyone's 
emotions are on the verge of collapse, and they are on the verge of death. 
Thanks to the pity: "Don't be noisy! Calm! Calm to think of a solution!" 


The more calm, the more excited everyone is: "What is cold? How calm is 
this situation? You are calm, you think about it? Is there any way!" 


'..."" Xie Li was asked to be speechless. any idea? 
No! 


He desperately tried to think hard, thinking that his brain would burst and 
he couldn’t think of any solution to the situation at hand! 


Suddenly, he felt a tight cheek, one hand pinched his face, smashed the 
past, facing the people under the platform. Thanks for your pity, I don’t 
know what it means. A cold voice rang behind him: "Who killed? You see 
this face, don't you know who to kill?" 


This statement is not only the top and bottom of the platform, but even the 
ghosts that hang in the air are condensed. 


White has no phase and said: "Have you forgotten? He is God. That is--" 
The voice did not fall, thank you for a cold feeling. 


After a moment of stiffness, he looked down and saw a dark sword blade 
piercing from his lower abdomen. 


The sword is slender and long, and the body is deep like black jade. The 
sword heart is long and silvery. The sword front is like a cold night. It is 
definitely a rare sword. In the past, the pity will definitely try to collect 
the kind that you can't put it down. 


Thanks for watching it for a while, then Jianfeng slowly took it back and 
disappeared into his lower abdomen. White has no way to say: "--He is, 
not dead." 


The crowd did not react, and the white no-handed waved the sword. The 


sound of" ", the sword front into the ground, obliquely inserted on the 
ground, in front of the eyes of countless pairs of eyes, quietly exudes a 
deep chill. 


A burst of blood rushed into the throat, and the ghost fire rushed to him, 
seeming to gamble on his wound. Xie Li was stunned by the blood, biting 
his teeth: "You...you!" 


His eyes were slightly faint, and the wildfire suddenly became mad, 
rushing to the white, but was caught and locked in the palm, saying: "Look 
at it." 


He said, his other hand slammed his face with gratitude and said: "What 
are you? You are not claiming to save the people?" 


Thanks: "But!!! But I, I..." 
But he did not think about using this method to save in this situation? ! 


Someone under the gods has been scared by this **** scene, and some are 
still courageous to see: "...he...he really won't die?!" 


"Really... you see, blood doesn't flow much... still alive, live well!" 


Thanks for a fierce cough. Hearing humanity again: "Is it even if he kills 
him, he will not die?!" 


"Great!" 


Say that the man was stunned again: "What is it? Is there anything good?" 


The man who was defamed said: "Since he is killed, he will not die... there 
is no solution." 


"But it’s too much to be a sword..." 


"But he is a god? Even if he is desecrated, he will not die? We are just 
ordinary people. If you get a human face, you will die!" 


There is a dispute underneath, nothing to say: "Cangsheng 1s here waiting 
for your rescue. Please." 


Xie pity spurred anger in both eyes and said: "The only way to save the 
most thorough is to destroy your monster!" 


White has no sneer, and said: "What happened? Prince, you are not 
confident that you will not die? How can you be afraid now? Anyway, you 
will not die, sacrifice yourself, solve the suffering of others. Why not do 
it?" 


Thank you for your pity: "Do you mean this idea? Do you think everyone 
in the world is as dark as you?" 


Indeed, many people under the face are not ecstatic, but hesitant, but they 
are vaguely divided into several factions, and opinions cannot be unified. 
Moreover, no one went up to move the black sword. As if he understood 
what he was thinking, he laughed and laughed. He shook his head and 
sighed: "Stupid child, silly boy." 


Thanks for turning his head and not letting him shoot, he said: "Roll!" 


White has no reason: "Do you think that because they don't want to do it? 
Wrong, they don't want to start, they just don't want to be the first one." 


"Ah! " 


Suddenly a scream under the platform, the woman in the Sven couple 
cried: "Child, my child!" 


The children in her arms were crying, and a few black and white shadows 
appeared on the pudged arms. The surrounding people vacated a large film 
and said: "Bad, the child is infected!!!" 


The couple looked awkward, and the two looked at each other and stood 
up. They walked up to the platform and pulled up the black sword on the 
ground, letting the child hold it in his hand, biting his teeth and stabbing 
him. 


" iA 


The black sword was really sharp. Xie pity just felt that the abdomen was a 
sharp pain. The couple had pulled the sword out of his belly. He slammed 
it on the floor and said, "I’m sorry... our children are still small, really. 
Yes...no way. Sorry, sorry, sorry..." 


They apologized, and looked pale and grateful to the head, holding the 
child back to the crowd. Thanks to the throat, the blood is more 
concentrated, and I am going to vomit. Suddenly, I heard a white laughter. 


He gritted his throat and said: "Laughter, do you think you saw what you 
want to see? It's all you forced!" 


The group of wildfires held in the palm of your hand was even more 
fierce. He is slow and succinct: "If people are forced, they will reveal their 
true colors." 


Among the 100 people, one already has no need to be afraid of a human 
epidemic. The black mark on the arm of the child gradually dissipated, and 
the throat of the crowd swallowed a throat and did not speak. 


After a while, a dead man, another young man stood up. 


He smacked his head and approached the platform. He first made several 
groans, weakly: "I can't help it, I don't want it, I really don't want it, but I 
really can't help it. I just got married soon, my aging mother. And the lady 
is still waiting for me at home..." 


As he spoke, he couldn’t say it anymore. He pulled up the black sword 
with his eyes closed and jerked his thanks. 


However, because he closed his eyes, the sword was stabbed and only 
stabbed to the side of the pity. He opened his eyes and found that the 
position was not fatal, so he panicked and pulled out | Swords, squatting, 
and stabbing A sword! 


Xie pity has been gnashing his teeth and not making a sound. He was only 
stunned by the two stabbing swords, and a blood came out from his lips. 


He really does not die. However, it does not mean that he will not hurt 
when he is injured. 


Every inch of flesh and blood is stirred by the sharp weapon, and the 
feeling that every bone is wiped off makes him feel unhappy and wants to 
be mad. This is the same as ordinary people. 


The second person has gone down, and this time there is no gimmick. His 
face is mixed with joy and the rest of his life. It is hard to say which side 
is more. After he went down, the crowd returned to death again. 


For a long time, several people hesitated to stand up. I don’t know what 
reason to use this time. I haven’t gotten up yet, but I suddenly heard one 
person: “I really can’t stand it.” 


Everyone looked for their voices, and Xie pity also looked up pale. 
Speaking, it is actually the big man who sells art. He said: "How does the 
monster tell you how to do it? I see him is a swearing. Even if it is not a 
swearing, he will not die, you are not killing?" 


A few people next to me: "Big brother, you don't look at this time, 
everyone is going to die!" 


The busker said: "I am not here too? I am not going to die yet? Have I 
started?" 


A few people were blocked by him. For a long while, some people said: 
"When you look at you, there are no old children at home? One person is 
full of family and not hungry. Many people here are dragging their 
families. How can you compare with you?" ” 


The busker pointed to the couple who went up the first time and said: "I 
don't have a wife's son. If I have it, I will die and I won't let my son watch 
me do this, let alone teach my son. I have done this kind of thing. I think 
your son will grow up and become a bad embryo. It is all harmed by your 
aunt. How can you not let your son marry you?" 


The woman covered her face and cried, saying: "Don't curse my son! 
Curse me!" The husband angered: "Are you talking about people? You 
want my son, my father, my mother?! People!" 


The busker probably doesn't know what it means to care for people. He 
said, "Who is killing? Isn't it killing you? You let your son kill you and 
have some bones. What do you do to kill the masked strange stuff?" 


Hearing words, white no one laughed. The people were afraid and angry, 
and the fear was against this monster. The anger was against the seller, and 
they all lowered their voices: "You...! Shut up!" 


What should I do if I am annoyed with this monster? 


The busker said: "Oh, you dare not kill the worst evil person, so you are 
jealous of others?" 


Probably not being ridiculed by such a rough man, some people couldn’t 
help but say: "This brother and sister have been talking for so long, I 
thought that there 1s any high opinion? I look at him again, and I look at 
death, no blood, It is estimated that it will take a few days to live a good 
life in order to blame others. If you are righteous, why don’t you sacrifice 
yourself to solve the big guy?” 


The busker said: "I don't want to sacrifice myself, but everyone doesn't 
want to sacrifice themselves, which one thinks? Do you think? Do you 
think? But I don't at least ignore others." 


Someone said: "He is different." 
“Is there something different?” 
"He is God! To save the people is what he said. And, and he will not die!" 


The busker still wants to talk, and the pity can't help anymore. He coughs 
and says: "Brother, brother Taiwan! This brother!" 


Just licking a few swords, he opened his mouth and his voice was a little 
weaker than usual. The busker turned his head and thanked him with a 
gratitude: "Thank you! But... forget it." 


If you go on, someone might hit him. Thanks for the pity that this person 
suffered such a serious internal injury because of his previous test, and he 
apologized, and said: "Thank you! Last time your chest broken the stone is 
good?" 


The big man said: "Ah? What are you talking about! What hurts me? The 
broken stone in the chest is my master!" 


Seeing this person still insists on losing face in such a situation, it is like 
vomiting blood and saying "I have no problem at all", thank you for not 
being able to laugh. At this moment, someone suddenly pointed to the 
busker yelling: "The attack! Attack!" 


Thanks a little pity, the busker was also surprised, followed by others to 
guide the face, and surely touched a bumpy thing on his face! 


When the people around him pulled out a few feet away, thanked Zhang 
for opening his mouth and wanted the seller to come over. But how about 
coming over? Come over and give him a deadly sword? 


He can't say anything. 


Just as he hesitated, the busker touched a few more faces and walked 
outside the temple. See you, thank you for saying, "Where are you going? 
Come back! No cure will happen!" 


The busker ran up and said loudly: "I won't come back! I won't do this if I 
don't do it..." After a while, he ran away. The geeks who surround the 
Prince Temple probably know that he is already the same and has not 
stopped. Thanks a lot of voices, and finally I can't see him. Everyone in 
the audience said: "I am finished, he ran!" 


"This fool! It will be happening wherever it goes. It 1s already late! He has 
been infected!" 


"He... isn't it going to go down the mountain to kill?" 


However, a few words before the great man were holding all the people in 
the temple. For a while, no one went up to mention the black sword and 
thanked him. The situation is so deadlocked. 


I don’t know whether it’s happiness or fear or fear. What’s more, he 
doesn’t know what to do next. He is trying to sort out his thoughts. 
Suddenly he stands up and says, “Do you say anything?” 


It is a middle-aged man. Xie pity looked up and found that this person was 


very familiar, but he couldn’t remember where he had seen it. Thinking 
about it, he listened to the man: "It doesn't matter, he robbed me before!" 


It turned out to be that person! ! ! 

Everyone 1s amazed: "Robbery?" 

"Is he not a prince? Is he not a god? Robbery?" 
That person said: "It’s true." 

"So? What do you want to say?" 


That person said: "Nothing, just want to remind everyone, he robbed!" 
After that, he shrank back. 


After this sentence, the entire temple was silent. That sentence seems to 
have buried a black seed in their hearts. 


Robbery... 


Suddenly, there was another scream in the bottom, one person said: "My 
legs, my legs, it seems... a bit strange!" 


Again? ! 


Who knows, more than one person, almost at the same time, another 
person shouted: "I am also! My back! You can help me see my back!" 


No one dared to approach the two men. The two had to pull up their 
trousers by themselves. One of them took off his shirt. After everyone saw 
their bodies, they screamed in horror. 


The human face of these two people has actually been fully formed! 
“How come you grow so fast?!” 

"Have you forgotten? The time we stayed here 1s not short!" 

"But why didn't they find out about themselves?!" 


"It’s not in a conspicuous place, it’s just a little itchy, how do I know it will 
be!” 


"It's over, it's over. We shouldn't have grown too long?" 

"Fast! Everyone is checking! Check your body!" 

The chapel in the Prince's Hall was in turmoil. As soon as he checked, the 
screams came one after another. really! Many people have already seen 
human faces, but they are not aware of them. When they are aware, those 


people are already full of facial features! 


The strangers outside the Prince's Hall seem to have sensed something, 
and they are more madly holding hands. The atmosphere in the hall was 


quickly spread, and the heart of the pity was mad, and almost jumped out 
of the chest. 


He remembers that the episode of human face disease is not so fast, why is 
it so fast? 


White has no phase, of course, it is nothing! 


He slammed into the cold-eyed starter, but he didn't speak. Suddenly he 
bounced up, gasped a few mouthfuls, and crimsonly said: "You...you are 
God, you are a prince, are you actually robbing?" 


Thanks for the slightest pity, I don’t know why he said this thing at this 
festival, saying: "I..." 


The man interrupted him: "We are offering you like that, what have you 
done? Robbery! What have you brought? Plague!" 


The plague he brought? 
Thanks for your pity: "...1? Not me?! I am just..." 
However, at this moment, the patience of everyone has reached the limit. 


Nearly a hundred people were red with one pair of eyes, and the group was 
surrounded. The nearest one pulled up the black sword that was inserted 
obliquely on the ground. Thanks for a moment, I held my breath. 


The man held the black sword in his hand and said: "You...you have to 
make up for it? You want to redeem it?" 


The cold light of the black sword circulated, and the fear of pity reached 
its peak at this moment. 


So many people, if everyone uses this sword to slap him, what will he 
become in the end? 


It’s not just that he might be riddled with holes and smashed into a 
bolognese. He is more afraid of something else. He vaguely felt that if 


they were allowed to do so, he might have something in his heart and 
could never go back. 


Thinking of this, Xie pity could not help but blurt out: "Save..." 


However, this "life-saving" has not yet slammed the exit, and the cold 
black sword once again penetrated into his body. Thank you for your pity. 


The sharp black sword stabbed in and out, and then changed one person, 
and the next sword penetrated almost without gaps. The sound of thanking 
the lock in his throat could not be sealed, and he screamed for a long time. 


The screams were too stern, and the people around him were chilling. 
Someone closed his eyes, don't look over his face: "... Don't let him call. 
Let's move faster, quick fix!" 


Xie Pity feels that someone has blocked his mouth, holding down his 
hands and feet, still confessing: "Hold down and don't let him roll down. 
There is nothing to be stabbed, not to stab the fatal place is not counted!" 


"One line up, don't grab it! I don't want you to grab it, I will come first!" 
"Where is the fatal position? How do I know if the stab is not counted?" 
"In short, take care of the heart, throat, and abdomen!" 

"Not sure if you have stabbed the deadly and pricked again!" 

"No! You have stabbed someone else where to start?" 

The hesitation and unbearableness at the beginning, the more they 
disappeared, the more smoothly they became, the more smoothly they 
became. The dark swordsman continued to pierce and pull out | Xie pity a 
pair of eyes to the extreme, tears rolling down, there is a voice in the 
bottom of my heart silently. 


Help. 


Help, save your life, save your life. 


Help, save lives, save lives, save lives, save lives, save lives, save lives, 
save lives, save lives, save lives, save lives, save lives, save lives! ! ! 


Pain, pain, pain, pain, pain, pain... pain, pain, pain, pain, pain, pain, pain, 
pain, pain, pain, pain, pain, pain, pain, pain, pain, pain, pain, pain, pain It 
hurts, hurts, hurts! ! ! 


Why can't you die? Why can't you die! ! ! 


He wanted to use the most tragic sound, but he couldn't figure out a word 
in his throat, probably already cut. He is so mad that he seems to have all 
the pain in his life all over here, and he will never feel any pain anymore 
in the future. He couldn't see anything. The whole world was black. Only a 
group of fires burned wildly in the distance, getting brighter and stronger. 
However, it is in the hands of nothing, and it can’t be broken. 


He couldn't hear his screams, but he heard another scream of 
heartbreaking, which seemed to have come from the fire. Although it was 
not his, the pain in that scream was exactly the same as him, as 1f he had 
sent it. 


However, he can no longer stand this step and be able to awake himself. 
Thanks for the low voice in the throat, the consciousness is completely 
broken. At the same time, there was a wave of raging flames in the temple 
of the Prince. 


"Ah, ah, ah ah ah ah ah ah ah ah!" 


Numerous high and low voices screamed at the same time. The fire broke 
through the industry and the flames burned. No one can escape. The 
wildfire burns the waves, and instantly burns hundreds of living people 
under the gods in the Prince's Hall into a hundred black bones! 


When the fire gradually subsided and slowly gathered, the original group 
of little wildfires had disappeared. Instead, it was a young figure that 
gradually formed. 


The boy squatted on the dark ground in front of the platform, and bent 
down deeply, holding his head in his hands, and screaming in pain. 


He didn't dare to see what the man lying on the platform was like now. 
Because, absolutely, it 1s not adult. 


In the temple of the Prince, the corpse is full of land. White did not smile 
and turned and came to the temple. The range of anger burning is far more 
than a prince's temple, and the eccentric strangers outside the temple are 
burnt to dry bodies and dregs. He did not see it, and stepped on these black 
charcoal corpses and walked over. 


This whole forest, no, it should be said that this whole mountain is 
trembled and mourned! 


Countless black shadows floated above the night sky, and the undead who 
were scared to have to escape from the habitat, were blown away by the 
wind. A huge cloud of black clouds over the Prince's Hall is slowly 
spinning, as if it were a huge magic eye. 


That is the appearance of evil spirits, the ghosts formed by the ghosts! 2k 
novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 191: No 
sadness, white clothes, this world 


Xie pity does not know if he is awake or asleep. 


If he is awake, he has no reaction to everything in the outside world, and 
he has no memory. If he is asleep, he has been holding his eyes. 


When he was awake, Bai Wuxiang had already put the black sword on his 
waist, like an elder who rewarded the child, saying: "This is the gift I gave 
you." 


Speaking, patted the hilt, meaning profound and gentle: "It is definitely 
more sharp than those you collected from the past and those I gave you." 


Thanks to him, he helped him with the sword, did not speak, and did not 
resist. Because any resistance is useless. 


In this way, he put on a new dress, put on a new sword, dragged a new-like 
body, and walked outside the dark Prince. White has no phase and said 
behind him: "Wait." 


Thanks for the rest of his life. White came to him without a word, and put 
a white scorpion in his hand, saying: "You forgot this." 


It was the day before he used to cover his face and later was tied. 
Thank you for being alone, swaying down the mountain. 


It’s already a day, the sun is coming out, but the sun shines on him, and she 
doesn’t feel warm at all. 


On the way down the mountain, he saw a small stream, oh, very clear and 
lively. Going to the stream, the river reflected his appearance, and looked 
at the pale face. 


The face is smooth and white, there is no trace of scars, the neck 1s also, 
then, the chest, the abdomen and so on must be all. But after he looked at 
it for a while, he couldn't look any further. He buried a few streams of 
water, washed his face, and drank a few more mouthfuls. Drinking and 
drinking, I suddenly found something in the upper reaches. 


He slowly raised his head and saw the upstream shore not far away. Next 
to a large stone, there was a corpse and a dress. It was the man of the art. 


This person did not go down the mountain, but died on the road. There was 
a particularly obvious blood stain on the big stone. It seemed to be a pain 
or fear under the stone. The corpse was rotten, half of it was in the water, 
and it smelled like a stink, but it didn't move, but the half-faced face gave 
birth to a few small deformed faces, still squirming. 


Thanks to pity at the side of the stream, vomiting for half an hour, 
vomiting to see the blood. 


After going down the mountain, he walked for a long time and wandered 
aimlessly on the street. Suddenly, one hand patted him on the shoulder and 
grabbed him into the alley. Thanks to pity, when I didn’t see the other’s 
face, I saw an oncoming fist first: “Where have you gone these days?” 


Behind the fist is the angry face of the wind, and when she saw it, she was 
already beaten by the punch and fell to the ground. 


The wind letter did not expect him to be knocked down so easily, look at 
his fists, and then look at the ground for the pity, for a while, not to help, 
thank you have climbed up. The face of the wind letter has changed, but it 
has not eased down. He said: "You are so angry, you ran out and said 
nothing for two months! But do you know what they are worried about?" 


Xie pity wiped the nosebleed on his face and said: "I'm sorry." 


Seeing the blood on his face was getting dirty and dirty, the wind sighed 
heavily and said: "Your Highness! Sorry, even if we say this, it’s really 
boring, but you... What the **** are you doing? What have you been doing 


for so long? What? Is there anything that can't be said to me?” He noticed 
the black sword on the waist, and said, “Where did you come from?” 


Thank you for your pity. However, when I thought about the dispute with 
the wind letter before leaving, the look of hesitation on the face of the 
wind, and the experience that he didn't even want to think about it, just 
said another: "I'm sorry." 


The two returned to the original hiding place, and the queen cried out 
when he saw the pity. The lord looked old and a lot older. He used to look 
for white hair in his black hair. Now he is looking for black silk in his 
head. But he didn't get angry and rushed to the crown. He said nothing 
after a few words. Probably because he was excited and ran for ten days 
and a half, but he was careful with him. 


"Wind letter." 


After a simple meal, thanked the black sword on the waist and handed it 
over, saying: "This sword is for you, take it and get rid of it." 


The wind was aware that his hand holding the sword was shaking, but he 
did not guess why it was shaking. He said, "Why should I take it?" 


Thanks for your pity: "You didn't ask for money before." 


It was said that the color of the letter on the face of the letter suddenly 
flashed past, and then he shook his head and said: "Now no need." 


Xie pity no longer speaks, throwing the black sword aside and not falling 
asleep. 


This time, thanking me for seeing nothing happened, I hope to return to 
the original state as soon as possible and fight for everything as usual. 
Soon, he went out with the wind letter to go out and sell. 


The original letter was not reassured, said: "Forget it, you still have to rest 
for two days." 


Thanks to the pity: "I have been resting for two months. If the buskers 
come to you again, we both have to cope." 


The wind is not convinced: "The ones who have been selling art have long 
since come." 


It’s not because the original man of art was dead, no one led, but because 
of the fact that Fengxin has been here for a long time. When I first arrived, 
everyone still felt fresh, but after a long time, people almost passed the 
fresh energy. It is no different to see him and other local sellers. Compared 
with the past, Fengxin lost its competitiveness. After the threat is not a 
threat, other buskers will not come to him for trouble. Anyway, everyone 
earns almost the same money, all the same. 


Therefore, Ren Fengxin is no longer trying to shoot arrows, and how to 
make perfect shooting skills. The number of people who come to watch 
and reward is also less than the original. Not even the original one tenth. 
After a long time, the wind letter was full of sweat and sat down. Thanks 
for your pity: "Change me." 


Wind channel: "Can't you?" 


Xie pity is self-sufficient. When I looked at the individual, the pedestrians 
came to the interest and said, "What is this little brother's unique skills?" 


Thanks for the pity, I took the roots and started to make a set of swords. 
Although it is a branch, the sword method makes it beautiful, and the 
sound of the wind is still with a sharp sword. Therefore, some people 
appreciate their faces. Fengxin looked at it and looked complicated. After 
looking at it for a while, he turned his head. 


There is no shame in the heart, and there is no psychological burden. 
Continue to seriously make the sword. At this moment, one of the people 
in the crowd suddenly shouted: "It's not good to look good! It's ugly! Who 
wants to see you holding the roots and licking the chicken | Ba stamp?" 


The wind letter stood up and shouted: "Put me a clean mouth!" 


Thanks for the slightest movement, I looked at the past. I saw a man in the 
crowd eating seeds while spitting seeds, which is a lively look. He cried to 
the wind letter: "I am looking at the art! I want to say how to say, how do 
you want to reward us for the reward? For the real sword! For the real 
sword, come on, then consider whether you want to reward you. Personal!" 


As soon as he shouted, others shouted. Fengxin was furious and was about 
to shoot. He saw a white flash, and Xie Pity had already appeared beside 
the man, grabbed it and threw it high. 


When he shot, the power was huge, and the idle man was thrown a few feet 
by him. The melon skin landed, and everyone was shocked. The man 
screamed and landed, and the seven blews blew and screamed loudly. 
However, Xie had not stopped, and went up to catch him again. He said 
plainly: "There is no real sword, really want to see it?" 


The audience stunned and fled, saying: "Come on! Help! Kill!" 
Fengxin is even more shocked: "His Royal Highness!!!" 


Xie Pity turned a deaf ear, ready to throw the leisure man a few more feet 
to let him land, the wind letter went up and hold him, even for concealing 
his identity, he forgot, said: "His Royal Highness!!! You wake up! This 
person I am going to kill you!!!" 


Thanks to the black fire in the eyes, he patted his hand and pressed the 
man into the ground. The idler stretched out his legs, and then he did not 
move. The wind letter rushed up to explore his breath, but at the end of the 
street, someone pointed at the scorpion: "It is them! There!" 


broken! Yongan soldiers are coming! 
The wind and the letter ran, but seeing the pity still standing in the same 
place, staring at the Yongan soldiers, seems to want to go up and fight, and 


folded back and pulled, said: "What are you standing on, run fast? !" 


The two men went all the way to Tibet to escape the past and return to the 
hiding house. As soon as he entered the door, in the face of the queen, the 


wind letter shouted: "How can you do such a thing?!" 


The original style of the wind, naturally, is not so dare to be so arrogant 
before the second place, but after so long, many things have changed. 
Thanks to the Queen, "Go back to the house." 


Queen's Road: "The emperor, this is what..." Thanks to the pity: "Go back 
to the house!" 


The queen wanted to ask if she couldn’t ask, and went back to the house. 
Xie pity turned to Feng Xin: "What have I done?" 


Feng Xin said: "You have to kill that person!" 
Thanks for resentment: "He hasn't died yet. And what about killing?" 
The wind is stunned: "What do you say? What is it like to kill?" 


Thanks to pity: "Who is going to let this people find death? If you find me, 
you will be fulfilled. Is there anything wrong?" 


It seems as if he was stunned by his words. For a moment, Feng Xin said: 
"He...1Ss a sinister, but he will not kill him? If he beats him, then this 
sentence will die?" 


Xie pity interrupted him: "Yes. He dares to say that he has to pay the 
price." 


The wind letter is incredible: "How do you say this?" 
Thanks: "What?" 


Wind channel: "You used to use the word "the people." You never said this 
word." 


Thanks to pity: "What do you mean in the end? I am not a god, I can't be 
angry, can't I hate it?" 


The wind letter stunned, and for a long while, barely squeezed out a few 
words: "I don't mean this, but in any case, it doesn't mean..." 


Xie pity did not want to listen again, did not talk to him, went into the 
house, and fell heavily on the door. 


When he closed the door, he shouted and slammed himself into the bed. 
Self-deception! He is deceiving himself! 


In any case, it’s impossible to do anything that hasn’t happened, and it’s 
impossible to go back to it! ! ! 


In the evening, someone knocked on the door, thanking him for being a 
wind letter, not. For a long while, I heard the voice of the Queen: "The 
emperor is the mother. Let the mother come in and see you, okay?" 


Thanks for the sake of lying down, but lying for a long while, still got up 
and opened the door, tired and said: "What?" 


Wang backed a plate and stood at the door, saying: "Is the emperor not 
eating?" 


She looked at her for a long time, and for a long time, she endured the 
phrase "I didn't eat anything and didn't want to eat what you did". I opened 
my body and let my mother come in. The queen put the plate on the table 
and said, "Look." 


Thanks for your pity, I was so angry that I laughed and said, "What is 
this?" 


The Queen is as authentic as the treasure: "Look, this is the 
“Yanzhizhiwan’, this is ‘flowering a good moon’...” 


Calling the wings of a branch like a corpse and two lives, called the full 
moon is not uneven, thank you have to interrupt her: "How do these things 


give the name?" 
Queens said: "Do you not have a name for dishes?" 


Thanks to pity: "That is the royal meal in the palace. No one in the 
ordinary people gives the name to the dish." 


Royal Palace, Imperial, ordinary people. The queen paused for a while and 
smiled and said: "No one has stipulated that you must take the imperial 
meal to get the name. Just take a picture of Geely. Come, eat and see? The 
mother has spent a long time doing it for you." Speaking of handing 
chopsticks. Cheer but did not laugh, did not move chopsticks. 


The queen sat for a while with a smile, and the smile gradually slowed 
down, saying: "The emperor." 


Thanks: "What." 
Queens said: "How do you quarrel with the wind?" 


Xie pity did not want to explain at all, and did not have the strength to 
explain, said: "You can do it in your house, don't worry about it." 


The queen hesitated for a moment and said: "Mother knows that it should 
not be said, but these days when you are not here, it is the wind that the 
child has been watching..." 


Thanks to the pity: "What do you want to say after your mother?" 


The Queen is busy: "I am not angry with the emperor, I am not accusing 
you. Really not, I know that you are also very hard. I just said that it is not 
easy for the child to follow us and follow you. I feel that Come out, he 
didn't want to go, but he stayed today, all because he remembered your 
feelings..." 


When I heard this, thanked Huo Ran and got up. He said, "Who is easy? I 
am very easy?! After the mother, don't ask if you can't do it. You don't 
know how to mix it!" 


Seeing him take the door, the queen panicked, got up and chased out, said: 
"Hello, where are you going? I don't say it, the mother doesn't say it! You 
come back!" 


Thanks for your pity: "I know! It's not easy for everyone, you can rest 
assured! I will make it easier for everyone! !" 


The queen couldn't keep up with him, and soon he was opened. Until the 
evening, Xie Pian came back with a few bags. When he opened the door, 
everyone did not sleep, waiting for him, his face was very poor. Thanks for 
closing the door, said: "What happened?" 


The king of the country seems to have fallen behind the queen. Her eyes 
are still red. Seeing the pity and coming back, Chang Shu breathed a sigh 
of relief. "Huanger, you are back! I will never ask more in the future, you 
should not suddenly Turn around and leave, what must be heard after 
you..." 


Everyone 1s afraid. Afraid that he turned around and left, it was not seen 
for more than two months. Thanks for your pity: "You think more, I don't 
have to go. You go in for a break." 


After the Queen of the Lord went into the house, silent for a moment, the 
wind channel: "Even if I ask you where you are going, you will not answer 
it." 


Xie Pity did not speak, threw the bags on the ground and made a crisp 
sound. Wind channel: "What is this?" 


Thanks for opening the bag upside down, shaking off a lot of gold and 
silverware from the inside, almost reflecting the whole house. The wind 
letter stood up and said, "You... Where did you come from?!" 


Thanks to the pity, he did not lift his head. He sat on the ground and 
counted it. He said, "You don't need it. You have to go to the big house in 
the city. You can rest assured. No one found it." 


Fengxin binocular round: "You!... 


He remembered that the Queen of the Lord was still next door, and 
lowered his voice, saying: "You steal something?!" 


Thanks to pity: "You don't need to look at me like this. It's not easy for 
everyone. It's much easier to have them." 


Wind channel: "Then you can't steal anything?! We can sell art!" 
Thanks to the pity: "Are you going to die a day to earn a few dollars?" 


Fengxin stepped back two steps. For the first time, Xie Pity saw this 
expression on his face that was about to faint. 


The wind letter is easy to stand, and it is determined that this 1s not a 
mistake, and muttered: "How do you become what it 1s now?" 


Thanks for raising his head, he asked: "What is it?" 


Fengxin said: "I don't want to say you! You look at what you are like now! 
I have not asked you about the robbery. How have you become more 
serious?!" 


Thanks a sneer, said: "Sure enough." 
Wind channel: "What really?" 


Xie pity stood up and said: "You really remembered the robbery. I want to 
ask me, I am embarrassed to ask, is it? You have imagined how it 
happened thousands of times. Don't think about it, I tell you." 


Step by step, he pushed to the front of the wind and said: "It is true. I am 
robbed." 


Fengxin was forced to take a step back and said: "You..." He went further 
and whispered, "What have we been suffering, what are we doing?! If you 
are willing to do this, we have long been Do, why bother to get to today?! 
What are you doing?! Are you abandoning your work?! Are you still the 
former Prince Edward?!" 


Thanks to the pity: "Yeah, why bother to survive today?" 


A glimpse of the wind. Thanks again and again: "What was it like in the 
past? Do you not pay back? Can you fight back? Do you want to save 
yourself? What is this? Is this not an idiot? You think that such an idiot is 
good. Do you think I have to be like that? If not, you are very hard hit?" 


The wind was scared: "Are you crazy? Why do you want to say this?" 


Thanks: "You are wrong. I am not crazy, I just suddenly wake up. Then I 
found out that I was crazy." 


" " 


The wind whispered, "How come you? When did you become like this? I, I 
really don't know, I am like this, what am I going to follow you..." 


Thanks for your pity: "Then don't follow." 
The wind letter has not responded: "What?" 
Thanks, "I said, then don't follow." 

When he finished, he slammed the door. 


After two hours, the outside of the house came to learn about the 
movements and the low voices. 


It seems that Feng Xin and his father and mother are saying goodbye. The 
sound of the wind is very low, the Queen's language is sobbing, the king of 
the country is not much, and the cough is mostly. After a while, the door 
opened, the door closed, the voice of the wind letter disappeared, and the 
footsteps went away. 


The wind letter has gone. 


Thanks for the pity in the house, Mu Mu no expression, half awkward, 
closed his eyes. 


Finally left. 


Since the admiration left, thankfulness has been afraid of this matter: one 
day, the wind letter will also leave. 


Because it is too fearful, today, thank you can no longer endure being 
tortured by this fear. 


Instead of slowly consuming it, like a slow knife, you will slowly squander 
those sinful feelings a little bit. The last two look disgusting, hate each 
other, it is better to explode at this moment! 


Before the wind and letter went, he was afraid. After the wind letter left, 
he was not afraid at all. 


However, although he is not afraid, it is even more painful. 


Originally, Xie Pity still holds one-tenth of the expectation in his heart, 
and expects that even if he admits that he should not do something, even if 
he becomes such a bad thing, the wind letter will still remain. After all, 
since he was 14 years old and picked up the wind as his own personal 
attendant, the two of them almost always followed. It is a master and a 
slave, and a friend. In addition to his prince, Fengxin does not have any 
objects to care about. At most, I will take the king and queen. 


However, the wind letter really went away. 


Xie pity has already guessed this result, and he can fully understand the 
result, but he still can't stand it for the time being. 


At this time, the voice of the queen came from the quiet house. 
She said: "I am sorry, royalty." 


Thanks for getting up from the bed, opening the door, going out, and 
tiredly saying: "It's none of your business." 


The queen and the king of the country are sitting at the dilapidated table. 
The Queen said: "It’s the father and the mother who dragged you down. I 
want you to do bad things for us, and let you quarrel with the wind." 


Xie pity and smiled: "What's wrong, isn't there a story of robbing the rich 
and helping the poor in this legend? The wind letter 1s gone, it's good, he is 
easy to go. It's easy on both sides. Let's talk about the doctor first, and you 
can buy the best medicine tomorrow." 


The lord stared at him and said, "I don't need this money." 
The queen secretly held him. Thanks for your pity: "What do you want?" 


The king of the country coughed a few times and said: "You... go back to 
the wind letter. I don't want the money." 


Although the queen looked at him, he also said: "Yeah, go to the wind 
letter. He is your most loyal attendant, and your good friend..." 


Thanks to pity: "There is no loyal attendant. If you have money, you can 
use it. Don't ask too much. I said, you don't understand these things." 


Silence for a long time, finally, the Queen said: "I'm sorry, the emperor. I 
can see that you are struggling, but you are just a mortal, you can't help 
you a little, you have to take care of you." 


Xie pity did not have the strength to say more, with a few words of 
comfort and perfunctory, sent them back to the house. In order to keep 
myself awake, Xie pity took off the bandages and all the clothes, took a 
shower, went to sleep, and went to sleep the next day, stumbled: "Why 
didn't you call me?" 


For a while, he remembered that the wind letter had gone. 


Thanks for turning over and sitting up, and made a while, remembering 
something. 


Even if the wind is gone, what about his father and mother? How did his 
father and mother not come in? 


At this time of the day, I heard the cough of the Lord, and the sound never 
stopped. Today it is extremely quiet. 


I don't know why, thankful and pity felt uneasy. He put on his clothes and 
got out of bed. He grabbed two of them and grabbed them. They found that 
they had lost their white face and pushed the door next door. "Mother, you 


" 


As soon as he pushed the door, his pair of pupils instantly shrank into two 
tiny points. 


His white hair was found. 


The white shackles, hanging above the stilts, still hung two unmoving 
figures of the elderly, and they were already stiff. 


It is after his father and mother. 


Xie pity suspected that he was still in a dream, shook, forced to hold the 
wall, and dangling, did not hold, slipped down the wall. 


He sat on the ground, his hands covered his face, and suddenly he had 
difficulty breathing. He cried and smiled and said, "I, I, I, I..." 


I don't know who is incoherent for a while, and he said: "No, no. I, wait, I, 
no, I..." 


In the end, a complete word could not be said. He turned and shouted and 
slammed his head against the wall for more than a dozen times. 


He should have thought of it. His father is an old-fashioned monarch, and 
his mother is a mother who can't see her loved ones at all, especially for 
them. Both of them are nobles who are pampered, and it is a miracle that 
this road can actually persist until now. 


After thanking him for hitting the wall a few hundred times, he muttered: 
"The wind is believed, my father is gone." 


No one is listening. 


At this time, he thought of putting the parents' bodies down. After putting 
it down, thanking him as if he had nothing to do, walked around the house 
and saw a few cold, ugly dishes on the table. He did not eat the queen and 
took it away last night. Now, he was picked up by the six gods, and all of 

them ate, and a dish did not dare to leak, for fear of eating a grain of rice. 
After eating, he began to vomit. 


Suddenly, Xie pity grabbed the white scorpion and threw it on the beam 
and put his neck in. 


The suffocation came, however, he was always awake. Even if the eyes are 
congested and the neck bones creak, he is always awake. Moreover, I don’t 
know what happened, hanging and hanging, the white cockroach was 
automatically released. Xie pity fell heavily on the ground, dizzy, and 
found that the white cockroach actually had no wind and automatic, as if a 
poisonous snake, slowly swelled up. 


This thing is actually giving birth to its own spirit! 


Infused with mana, dyed the blood of thankfulness, and hanged two royals 
- if thankful will die, it is three. Such a white sigh, with such deep 
grievances and evil spirits, is not a strange, but rather strange. 


The little monster who just came to the world did not understand how he 
was born in a desperate situation. He happily swam to the person who gave 
his own spirit. He seemed to be looking forward to a relative’s move. But 
there is no such thing. He snarled and said: "Who!! Who will kill me!!!" 


He only hopes that anyone can immediately come to his life and help him 
free this endless pain and torture! 


At this time, there was a sound of knocking and drumming in the distance. 
Thanks for the gasping, his eyes are red, his heart: Who? What is it? 


Some kind of power drove him to pick up and go out to see. After a long 
walk, he finally found out that it was the celebration of Yong'an Xinli, the 
imperial city moved to the capital, and the completion of the new palace. 


Celestial celebration! The old people of Xianleguo are now cheering for 
Yongan. On the street, the smile on everyone's face is so bright and so 
familiar. Thanks to the pity, when the Yuan Festival was a day trip, the 
people of Xianle City also cheered like this. 


Thanks and pity, he walked back and sat down on the ground. 


Why do you want to see the joy and laughter of the "Yongan people" when 
the mother body of Xianle Guojun is lying at his feet? 


Xie pity buried his face in his hand, crying and laughing, hahahaha, hehe. 
For a long while, he said: "It's not that easy." 


A voice flashed through his mind: human face disease, resentment... the 
method of making human face disease, is... 


The flash of fierce light in his eyes suddenly turned his voice and said: 
"You can't think better." 


His face looked like a cry, like a sorrow, and slowly stood up along the 
wall, saying: "Yongan, Yongan? I don't think about it. I will never think 
about it again! I curse you. I curse you!!! I want you all. Dead light, die!! 
Haha, haha, hahahahahahahahaha!!!" 


Laughing and laughing, thanking the pity as a gust of wind rushed out, 
passing the mirror, suddenly a meal, suddenly turned back! 


He in the mirror has completely changed his appearance. 


What he wore was not the white robe that was washed and worn, but a 
white sleeved mourning. His face 1s no longer his face, but a half-smile 
and a half smile! 


If it is the former pity, seeing yourself in the mirror at this moment, I will 
be scared and shouted, but now he is not afraid at all. He turned a blind 
eye, laughed and screamed, stumbled, slammed the door and ran out. 


The city of Xianle in the old country 1s now a ruined ruin. 


Near the ruins, there are still residents who are unlucky and have no way 
to go. Although since the outbreak of the human epidemic, the imperial 
city has been destroyed, this formerly gorgeous king has always been a 
chilly wind, but today, it seems to be particularly chilling. A few ragged 
squats ran away and ran to look at the sky. People feel that it seems like 
something is going to happen, or don't stay. 


In front of the imposing city gate of the Imperial City, it was the 
battlefield. Usually no one dares to go. Now, only one old Taoist ran in the 
east and jumped in the west to capture those lost souls. When they caught 
it, they stuffed them into their bags and prepared to tie them into lanterns. 
Caught and catching, he suddenly found out that when I saw the end of the 
battlefield, there was a strange white figure. 


It’s really weird, it’s really weird. A mourning service, white robe big 
sleeves, a piece of white shackles on the sleeves, drifting in the wind, if 
there is life. Wearing a white mask on his face, half of his face crying, half 
of his face laughing. 


The old Taoist was a bit cold, and before he reacted to why he had to run, 
his legs had taken him out of the battlefield. There was still a sense of 
horror in his heart, and he stopped to look back. 


The white man did not speak a word and walked on the battlefield. 
Hunting in the hurricane, every step of the foot is on the bones of the dead. 


Countless souls are struggling to mourn in this land, so that even the air is 
black of resentment. 


The white man is cold and cold: "Hate?" 


The undead screamed. The white man took a few more steps and said: 
"The people you swear to defend have become nationals of the new 
country. Hate?" 


In the screams of the undead, there was a scream. 


The white man slowly said: "They forgot those who died on the battlefield, 
forgot your sacrifice, and cheered for those who took your life. Hate?" 


Screaming, mixed with humming and roaring. 

The white man screamed: "What is the use of light, answer me, hate?!" 
Over the entire battlefield, there are countless resentful and painful voices. 
"Hate..." 

"Good hate..." 

"Kall... I want to kill them!!!" 


The white man opened his arms to them and extended his hands and said, 
"Come to me." 


He said in a word: "I promise: Yongan people, never safe!" 


In the screams, screams, and roars of the screaming screams, the souls of 
the Xianle soldiers and the death spirits of the people of the Imperial City 
were all in harmony, and in the overwhelming black fog, the illusion 
formed! 


The old Taoist who watched in the distance took a panoramic view of this 
scene and dared to fight: "This is... this is...!!" 


For a moment, only four words appeared in his mind. 
White clothing disaster! 


At this time, the white man heard the voice of a young man behind him: 
"His Royal Highness..." 


He turned back. I don't know when, standing behind him, a black boy, is 
bowing down to him, kneeling on one knee. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 192: White 
sorcerer 


The reason why it is said to be "juvenile" is judged from the sound and the 
figure. 


He was dressed as a neat martial artist, and his body was long, but it was 
like a new piece of bamboo, without losing the sense of youth. The black 
clothes are like ink, and the hair is like ink. Waist hanging a knife, slender. 
He slowly raised his head, and his face was covered with a white mask. On 
the mask, it was a curved smile. 


A group of black gas was formed in the humming sound, and the white 
man was carefully put into the sleeves, as if the river was included in the 
jade bottle. And the boy did not move in the dark wind of the sky, and the 
white man said: "Who are you calling?" 


The black boy still squats on his knees, as if surrendering, and as if he took 
the oath, he replied: "I am calling you, Your Royal Highness." 


The white man was cold and cold: "I am not your Royal Highness." 
The black boy said: "You are. Your voice and figure, I will not forget." 
The white man’s voice was a little angry: “I said, I am not.” 


This white man is naturally wearing a mourning dress and wearing a sad 
and happy face. 


His face is hidden behind the mask, no one can recognize who he is, and he 
does not want to be recognized. However, the black warrior who swayed 
on the battlefield directly called out his identity. 


Suddenly, the white cockroach, which was held on the big sleeves, was 
thrown out like a poisonous snake, and rushed to the black boy. Although it 
was a soft, soft white, it was fierce and violent, and the black boy was 


about to be caught in it. He raised his hand and firmly grasped the white. 
damask. 


The white scorpion was wrapped around the wrist of the pity, and one end 
was wrapped around the wrist of the black boy, slowly tightening. It didn't 
want to break free, but the black boy always clung to it, as if he had 
pinched a seven-inch snake, and his hands were constantly chilling. 

There is no doubt that this is a dead soul. 


Moreover, it is a powerful soul! 


After perceiving the power that could not be passed from the other end of 
the day, thank you: "What is your name?" 


For a moment, the black boy said: "I don't have a name." 

Xie pity did not ask too much, said: "There is no name, that is, no name." 
The black boy said: "You can call me in any way you want." 

Thanks and pity: "Are you a soldier who died on this battlefield?" 

No name: "Yes." 


Thanks for this, he only took over his hand, and the white scorpion 
slammed back on him, far from the black-haired boy, swaying his head and 
swaying his head, as if spitting a poisonous letter. 


It is not only the soul of death, but it is no wonder that he can respond to 
him. The black warrior is also full of resentment against the "Yong'an 
people". On the other hand, it can be used for him. Because their purpose 
is the same. 


So, thank you: "So, follow me." 


He extended his hand to the black warrior: "I will let you get what you 
want." 


The face of the black boy was hidden behind the mask, and he could not 
see what he was looking at at the moment. Both are the same. 


But after a moment of silence, he did not hesitate to hold the hand that Xie 
pity handed to him, and bowed down deeply, sticking the cold forehead on 
the back of the pity. 


For a long while, he sighed: "Swear to follow your Highness." 


Xie pity took back his hand, his hands were caged in his sleeves, and 
turned and said coldly: "You are already dead. Let's go." 


The black warrior stood up and thanked him for looking back. Only then 
did he discover that this boy was bigger than he thought. He was about 
sixteen or seven years old. He was a very tall man at this age. A little 
higher. However, this is nothing to say, he looked back and went on. 


Xie Pity walked in front, the nameless black warrior really followed him, 
saying: "His Royal Highness, where do you want to go?" 


Thanks to the distant eyes, said: "Yong'an Palace." 


Yong'an Palace is located in another big city in the West. This city was 
originally a quite prosperous town, but it was always pressed by the East 
Emperor City. After the Xianle Emperor City became an epidemic city, the 
new monarch chose the new king to be here. It will take a long time for it 
to overwhelm the old imperial city. 


Thanks for the late night. In the moonlight, he was silently flying like a 
white cat on the dense roof of the New Emperor City. The black warrior 
was like a black fox, and he was always behind him. Not long after, the 
two figures fell in front of a gate. 


Xie Pity is not right, this door is actually able to feel the bad atmosphere, 
and stop. Just about to reach out and explore, the black warrior stepped 
forward, stopped in front of him, stretched out a palm, whispered: 
"broken!" 


There was a fire leaking from the crack in the door, and it seemed that 
something had been burned. Then, the black warrior reached out and 
opened the door and said, "His Royal Highness." 


Xie Pity is getting started, looking down the ground. As expected, there 
was some black residue on the ground. Thanks for taking a bit, smelling 
the smell of vanilla and fuji, and glanced at the black warrior. 


This ghost is really powerful. 


These burnt marks are obvious that some people have set up a protective 
method in the door, and the protective force is not weak. If the ordinary 
little devils want to open the door or wear the door, they must not be 
burned. This black warrior destroyed the battle only in a flash. 


I don't know if it is a new completion. This Yong'an Palace is not so 
gorgeous. On the contrary, it 1s a bit chilly. It is far worse than the Xianle 
Palace. This is not surprising. The strange thing is that along the way, 
almost obstacles continue, and the arrays and traps of various evil spirits 
are constantly set. However, whenever she feels that there is something 
blocking the road ahead, the black warrior will take the first step to get rid 
of the obstacles and clean the road, so it is still unimpeded. 


Half an hour later, above the high hall of the Yong’an Palace, two slender 
figures stood on the ridge and overlooked the bottom. 


Both wear a mask. The white man fluttered in a big sleeve, holding a white 
scorpion and dancing with the wind. The black man was skillful and neat, 
with a long knife hanging from his waist and holding it on the side of the 
white man, staring in the same direction as him. This picture under the 
moonlight is unremarkable and unreasonable. 


The new Yongan Guoguo is in this hall. Xie pity sneered: "There are so 
many levels in the palace that block evil spirits. It seems that he 1s really 
afraid of being found by something?" 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 193: White 
Ghost Point Black Warrior 2 


No name: "His Royal Highness, I am going to clear the way." 
Thanks for your pity: "No, I come in person." 


When he finished, he jumped down, as if a white flower had been blown 
down by the wind, and silently fell before the palace. 


Just as he was about to push the door of the temple, there was a cry of 
babies in the temple. 


Lang Ying has no scorpion, and his son has already died. Where is the 
baby in his temple? 


Cherish does not care about this. Not to mention that there is a baby, even 
if there is a thousand troops in it, he is not afraid, and raises a foot to open 
the temple door! 


The strange thing is that there is only one person in the hall, there is no 
second person, and there is no baby. As soon as I saw the people, the man 
looked up and said, "Are you coming? I am looking for you." 


The man in the temple is Lang Ying. 


Although he was already a lord, he did not have a Chinese costume and sat 
on a throne. Xie pity also wondered how he reacted for a moment, and then 
he became clear. He was wearing a mask and wearing a mourning dress at 
the moment. Lang Ying recognized him as nothing. 


There is also a formation in this palace, and when she enters, she 
obviously feels that something is blocking. But with a little force under his 
feet, he stepped on the ground in the temple, and the sound of something 
shattered in the air. 


The winter and the night outside the temple rushed in, filling the sleeves 
with joy and enthusiasm. He said happily: "What are you looking for?" 


When he heard his voice, Lang Ying looked slightly changed and said, "Is 
it you?" 


Cheering slowly approached him, and the white boots stepped step by step 
on the cold and cold stone. He said: "It is me." 


Lang Yingyi introduced the coward, and took the soldiers to destroy the 
Xianle. The emperor’s temper was added, and the general evil spirit could 
not reach his body. But at this moment, thanks to the pity, there are 
thousands of battle death souls! 


He did not believe that the number of such a large, resentful so strong 
grievances, but also Lang Ying has no way? Sure enough, the grievances 
are instigating and can’t wait to break free and parasitize the enemy’s 
fresh flesh and blood. The sound of incitement could not be heard by 
anyone, but Lang Ying was not shocked. He said, "Are you coming to kill 
me?" 


Thanks for the pity, the next moment, he flashed to Lang Ying, grabbed his 
hair and pressed it to the ground. 


Successful! 


Under the sorrows and sorrows, Xie Pity’s mouth is unconsciously rising. 
Sure enough, sure enough! He can defeat Lang Ying! 


Originally he was bound by the identity of the priest, and there was no way 
for the person who had the power of the emperor, but he who abandoned 
the body of the priest could finally defeat Lang Ying. Xie pity heart jumps 
wildly, is about to take the next step, but suddenly changed: "What 
sound?" 


Hey, hey, he heard the tiny baby crying, but within this hall, there is no 
baby at all! 


Confirm again, not right. The cry was from the mouth of his man Lang 
Ying! 


More accurately, it is Lang Ying's body. Thanks for pulling aside his 
clothes, his eyes suddenly screamed, Huo Di got up: "...What is this?!" 


Lang Ying slowly rolled over and sat up and said, "Don't be afraid." 
This sentence is not to say thank you, but to what he said. 


On Lang Ying's chest, there are two faces, each of which is the size of a 
real person, protruding a huge tumor. The big face is beautiful, it is faintly 
a woman's appearance, the small one is crumpled, like a baby, and there is 
a burst of crying sound, which is from the mouth of this "baby" . 


Human face disease! 
Thanks for your pity: "How come you have a face disease?!" 
Lang Ying said: "This is not a human face disease." 


Thanks to pity: "Where is this not a human face disease? Is this not a 
human face disease?" 


Lang Yingdao: "This is my wife and son. It is not the kind of thing you 
said." 


As he whispered, he raised his hand and gently stroked the two faces on 
his body. It was really a husband and father who were touching his wife 
and children. But the two faces are not even open to the eyes, they just 
open their mouths, cry, empty, and not adult. 


Speaking, Lang Ying looked up: "Where 1s the white phase? He said that 
my wife will come back, but it has been so long, how can she still not 
speak? What is going on? Call him to come to me!" ” 


Hearing words, thank you for understanding, said: "You, let the white 
phase, the grievances of your wife and son, raised to you?" 


It turns out that the methods in the palace all the way are not to prevent 
foreign things, but to prevent things hidden inside from escaping! Lang 
Ying, who has become the head of the country, is secretly feeding these 
two grievances with his own flesh and blood! 


Xie Li still wants to come to him to settle accounts, who knows that he 
does not need him to do it, Lang Ying has planted a human face disease for 
himself. The time when the two epidemics grew on him was certainly not 
short. Even the small hands and feet grew together, and they hang down 
cumbersomely, deformed and terrible. Moreover, they have already 
drained the nutrients of the host. Lang Ying's two rows of ribs are 
unusually prominent, and the lower abdomen is also smashed. The 
complexion is sallow and the body is sturdy. It looks like it is not a few 
days to live, and the brave and fierce warrior on the battlefield. Not a 
person at all. 


It seems that although he won the battle and became the head of the 
country, it is not very good. Thanks for your pity, I didn’t feel very happy. I 
grabbed Lang Ying and angered: "What joke?!" 


He still has no enemy life, and the enemy is dying! what is this? What 
should I do? ! 


This catch, something falling from Lang Ying, Ying Ying red light, a 
bomb, a long shot. Lang Ying grabbed the hand of Xie's pity, and seemed 
to find it difficult to do this action. He gasped: "Beads... that bead." 


Thanks for turning around and looking at it, the scroll on the ground is 
actually the red coral bead he gave to Lang Ying. Lang Yingdao: "I always 
wanted to tell you, thank you for your beads." 


Hearing this sentence, thank you for a moment, I did not expect that he 
would suddenly say this sentence, my heart seems to have something 


turned up, and he was forced to press it, said: "You!..." 


Lang Ying whispered: "You will give me breakfast soon. Unfortunately..." 


The voice did not fall, and the body that Xie pity grasped was sinking, and 
Lang Ying fell down with such eyes. 


Thanks for not responding, no name: "His Royal Highness, he is dead." 


Thanks for your pity: "Dead?" 


Looking down, Lang Ying’s pupil has begun to scatter, and he is really 
dead. 


Xie pity muttered: "How ts he so dead?" 
He still did nothing to Lang Ying, how did he die? 


Moreover, it is quite happy to say that he is still dead. He completed his 
revenge on Xianle, with his close relatives, ready to meet under 
Huangquan. He was fed up in the world, and death was a relief, and he 
died. On the contrary, it is thanks to the pity, and now even the object of 
revenge 1s gone! 


Full of grievances and resentment, eventually turned into a feeling - 
hateful, hateful! It is so hateful! 


Lang Ying fell and did not move. The two faces on his chest seemed to 
know that the host was dead. Suddenly, he cried, screaming, squeaky, and 
the sound of rubbing on the goldware of the fingernails. Unbearable. Xie 
pity has to be mad, he pulled out the black sword, just want to go down 
and let them shut up, then the black warrior slammed the knife. When the 
knife light flashed, Lang Ying’s body was smashed into several pieces, 
dozens of pieces, hundreds of pieces... flesh and blood. Xie pity did not 
start to be one step ahead of him, cold channel: "Who made you do this?" 


No name: "You don't have to dirty your hand." 


At this time, a rush of footsteps sounded outside the door, a teenager’s 
voice shouted: "Uncle!" 


Who? Thanks for turning his head, I saw the temple door wide open, a 
teenager standing at the door, looking to this side. He was full of smiles, 
and as soon as he came in, he saw that the body was full of land and stayed 
on time. Thankful and indifferent: "Who are you?" 


The boy said: "I..." His eyes turned and he saw the body corpse, and he 
said: "Uncle!" 


At this time, someone called outside: "His Royal Highness! Don't run 
around, the Lord said, you can't run around in the palace! Don't make it 
difficult for me to do it in the middle of the night..." 


Your Royal Highness? 


Lang Ying’s son is already dead. This boy shouts Lang Ying’s “uncle”, and 
it’s definitely Prince Lang’s prince, Prince Yong’an! 


This little prince also reacted and panicked: "Ghost! There are ghosts! 
Come..." Didn't scream a few words, the black warrior slammed on his 
neck, and the eternal Prince Yongan fainted in the blood pool Among 
them. However, the shouts have already been passed out and they are 
picked up outside: "What? Did you hear that?" "Guards! Guards!" 


Thanks for the movement of the eyes, the black warrior slightly bowed his 
head, gestured to him to solve, and went out. For a moment, the outside 
sputum was cut off. When I stepped out of the temple, the large guards fell 
to the ground, and the black warrior stood in the middle, and the slender 
long knife dripped blood, but it was a knife. And in the distance, there was 
a new embarrassment. A group of new guards came and shouted "Protect 
the Lord!" "Protect Your Royal Highness!!" 


Thanks for the indifferent turn and ignore. Sure enough, in less than a 
moment, those vocals seemed to be harvested with a knife, and they were 
all annihilated. Immediately, the black warrior followed it silently. 


Thanks for the slightest side, said: "The palace, burned." 


The nameless slogan said: "Yes." 


The raging fire ignited, and the two black and long silhouettes stood 
before the fire, and the shadows on the ground were constantly distorted, 
deformed and elongated. 


So much trouble a, Palace Wing palace of people give all long been 
awakened, or fire, or shouting at escape, cries floating the sky, and the 
Sound of the case when the palace was burned exactly the same. 


That black Warrior said: "Your Highness, what you want to do next." 
That white man cold channel: "Lang children go to the Bay." 


Sound destroy the country before, Xie pity Jiro children have been to 
numerous Bay. Every time I go, is to save rain, physically and mentally 
fatigued, heavy pace. This time, he is for exactly the opposite purpose, but 
it is one easily. 


After the drought, and the strong support of the new head of state, Langer 
Bay has already resumed its vitality, the streets and alleys, and the 
pedestrians are all elated, and the bleak days of a few years ago are 
different. Only one place is still bleak, and that is the Prince of Xianle. 


No one will come to the ruined Prince's Hall, and Xie Pity chose the place 
of residence here. At the moment, he is meditating in the temple. 


These grievances should have quickly found the host, that is, the cursed 
object. However, because Lang Ying is already dead, they are still 
struggling, and they are crying and crying to the pity, and they are closed 
with sorrow. Let it go. He frowned and said: "Wait, don't worry, you will be 
free!" 


At this time, one voice said: "His Royal Highness." 


Xie pity opened his eyes and saw that the black warrior was in front of 
him, kneeling on one knee. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 194: The 
nameless ghost worships the nameless flower 


His emotions are still immersed in the screams of the grievances. For a 
moment, he is not able to return to God. The face under the mask 1s cold 
and sweaty. The soul is not obedient: "...Do not use those two words to call 
me." 


Every time I heard someone call him so much, it was like reminding him 
of something that made him extremely irritated. Every time he called, he 
was shocked. Nameless but said: "His Royal Highness is always His Royal 
Highness." 


Thanks for the past. Of course, I can't see the face of this black warrior, I 
can only see a smile. When the other person looks at his face, he can only 
see a pale mask. 


He whispered: "If you call me this way, you will let your soul fly away. 
Don't think how strong you are." 


The black boy bowed his head. Thanks for calming down, said: "Go and 
explore the Langer Bay area and find the best place to set up the practice." 


No name: "Yes." 


Thanks for closing his eyes, paused, and opened his eyes, looking at the 
black warrior, frowning: "Why have you not gone yet?" 


The black warrior said: "The location is fixed, then what time?" 
"time?" 


"The souls of the dead can't wait, they must help them find the object of 
the curse, and can't delay for too long." 


It really can't be delayed for too long. Silence for a moment, thank you: 
"After three days." 


Nameless and said: "Why is it after three days?" 


I don't know why, thank you for talking with him, and he was a little angry. 
He said: "Three days later, it is the full moon night. At that time, the 
human face will be greatly increased. You ask too much. Going fast." 


The nameless dagger, retired silently. Thanks again, closing his eyes and 
holding his forehead, hoping to ease this headache. At this time, he heard a 
few cold sneers from behind. 


As soon as | heard this familiar sneer, the blood of the pity seemed to 
freeze. He turned around, and sure enough, behind him, sitting in a snow 
white shadow wearing a sorrowful face and wearing a large sleeve of 
mourning, holding his hands in his sleeves and looking at him on the 
platform. 


White no phase! 


Thanks to the sword, the white man slammed, and the **** caught 
Jianfeng and sighed: "As I expected, this look is really suitable for you." 


If you don't uncover the mask, the two men are almost exactly the same 
from head to toe. When they fight, the two white people fight back and 
forth, and the outsiders can't tell who 1s who. White has no way to easily 
avoid the swordsman who prayed, and said: "His Royal Highness, you 
buried your parents in the poor and poor land of foreign land, do you not 
feel wronged?" 


Thank you for your pity, and said: "After you moved my father and 
mother, you ruined their bodies?!" 


White has no reason: "No, just the opposite. I helped you to bury them." 


I heard a word, thank you for a sigh, and nothing to say: "I will help you 
bring them to the Emperor's Mausoleum, and put on them a rare jade coat 


to protect the body for thousands of years. So, next time you go When they 
visit them, they can still see their loved ones." He told the location of the 
imperial mausoleum and how to enter it. This should have been told by the 
king and the national teacher, but they did not have time to go. If you do 
this, you will die and die. Thanks for being suspicious, said: "How do you 
know how to enter the Imperial Tombs?" 


White smiles and smiles: "As long as it is about your Excellency Prince, I 
know everything." 


Thank you for your pity: "You know a fart!" 


He was not used to such a vulgar word when he spit out his mouth. White 
has no phase but seems to see through his thoughts again. He looks at him 
for a moment and sighs: "It doesn't matter. From now on, there will be 
nothing to bind you, no one will have extra expectations for you, not even 
Someone will know who you are. So, you can do everything you want to 
do." 


After listening to this sentence, I feel a strange feeling in my heart. 
What is this monster looking for? 
court. 


Yes. Although it sounds ridiculous, but the intuition of thankful tells him 
that this thing is to show him. Whether it is to bury his father and mother, 
or to comfort him, it is for this purpose. 


He must be very, very happy, and be happy than any time he saw him. It 
seems that seeing such kind of pity makes him particularly pleasant and 
involuntarily soft and intimate. This kind of kindness makes Shimi feel a 
little bit grateful for a moment, but then, more, still disgusting. 


Thank you for your cold voice: "You don't be too happy, don't think that I 
will let you stay in the world, wait for me to destroy Yongan, get ready for 
me to settle for you!" 


White has no way to talk: "Welcome to the extreme, happy. Even if you 
want to kill me, I will be here waiting for you. When you can really kill 
me, you can go out." but--" 


The smile under his mask seemed to converge, saying: "You, will you 
really destroy Yongan?" 


Thanks: "What do you mean?" 


White has no reason: "You can definitely do it now, why should you 
choose it specially after three days? Is it because the matter is coming, and 
hesitant?" If you have gone to the country to break the family, even the 
power of revenge is not Do I have to see another defeat of His Royal 
Highness?" 


The word "failure" is extremely sloppy. Thanks to the sword, but he was 
picked up by a kick and stepped on the ground. 


White has no idea how to win the black sword in his hand, only then the 
gentle and amiable tone is steep and scornful, saying: "Do you know what 
you are like now?" 


Xie pity grabs the white boots on his chest, but no matter how hard he 
uses, he can't move without scoring. He is firmly slammed and can't turn 
over. White has no inclination to lean down and said: "You are like a child 
who is angry. You have no determination at all." 


Thankful and angry: "Who said that I did not make up my mind?!" 


White has no reason: "What are you doing now? Your curse? Your death, 
death? Your father, your soldier, your nationals, you are such a god, really 
poor! They were born before You can't protect them, you can't even 
revenge for them after they die! You waste!" 


His foot was hard, and the sadness and sorrow of thankfulness spilled a 
few drops of blood on his face, which was pouring from his throat. 


White has no swords, and the black jade-like sword points to the throat, 
and passes through the curse, awakening some memories. 


He said: "Would you like me to help you review the taste of the sword?" 


Excessive fear made Xie pity hold his breath, and he did not dare to move. 
After being scared of him, the white phase has once again become 
amiable. 


He removed his boots and sat up with the thrill of the floor, and glared at 
his face and made him look in one direction: "Look, see. This is what you 
are now." 


What he let the pity look at 1s the dilapidated image of God on the stage. 


The prince was like a flower and a sword in his hand, and he was burned 
by the fire. He was chopped by the axe and was thrown up and fell on the 
ground. His body was black and incomplete, and he was terrible. It is 
indeed very similar to the self in the memory fragment of thanking the 


pity. 


White has nothing to say: "Who are you like to be like this? Do you think 
it is me?" 


The brain of thankfulness seems to have been forcibly washed once by 
him, and he has repeatedly poured in new things, becoming more and more 
confused and more and more skeptical. He even forgot his anger and 
confused him: "...what 1s your purpose? Why are you pestering me?" 


White has no reason: "I said, I am here to teach you. The third thing I 
teach you is: If you can't save the people, then destroy the people. If you 
step on the feet, they will worship you. !" 


He finished this sentence, and the head of the pity suddenly screamed and 
screamed. 


It is those grievances! 


Countless grievances screamed and cried in his mind, thanking him for 
having a headache and wishing to roll on the ground. White has no smile 
but laughed at the side, Wen Wen said: "They can't wait any longer. After 
three days, if you can't launch a human face disease, you can't give them 
cursed objects, their cursed objects will become you. You Know, what will 
you be like at that time?" 


Thanks for feeling that the cold black sword was stuffed into his hand 
again, a voice in his ear: "You have no chance to look back!" 


When the headache suddenly faded, Xie pity opened his hand and opened 
his eyes. In the ruined Prince Hall, he was alone. The other white man who 
was exactly the same as him disappeared. 


I don't know how long it has passed, the night has already come, and the 
Prince's Hall is dark and dull. Thanks for the move, I realized one thing. 


The three-day period has passed a day. 


At this time, in the darkness of the Prince's Temple, there seems to be a 
touch of white. 


The ghost made the difference, and the pity turned over the head. After 
seeing what the white color was, the pupil under the mask contracted. 


He took the thing and said: "This... what is the flower?" 


It was a bunch of fresh and weak white flowers, placed on the left hand of 
the incomplete black-eyed statue, which was extraordinarily white and 
snowy, and it was particularly bleak. It seems that this statue is to protect 
this bunch of small flowers, and it is full of scars. 


Xie pity does not know why he saw this scene will be so angry, shouted: 
"Ghost, come out!" 


Not long after, the black martial art of the Sabre really appeared. He still 
didn't talk, thanked him and said: "What is this flower? Who did it? You 
did?" 


Anonymous slightly bowed his head, his eyes were condensed for a 
moment in the hands of Xie’s hands, which seemed to be suffocating. 
Finally, whispered: "Not me." 


Thanks to the pity: "Who is this thing?!" 


Anonymous said: "Why does His Royal Highness see this flower so 
irritating?" 


Thanks to the deeper face, throwing the flower on the ground, said: "...this 
kind of mischief is disgusting." 


Nameless but said: "Why does His Royal Highness think it is a prank? 
Maybe here, there are really believers of His Royal Highness who are 
offering you." 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 195: The 
nameless ghost worships the nameless flower 2 


Hearing this sentence, thanking him as if he was suddenly slapped and 
looked at him: "Are you laughing at me?" 


No name: "No." 


Thanks to pity: "Then you don't want to say this kind of ghost! How could 
there be such a thing?" 


Suddenly, no name: "Not necessarily not." 


Xie pity couldn't help but said: "Enough, what do you want to say? You are 
not a Xianle soldier? I wake you up from the battlefield. I don't want to 
hear you speak for Yongan people. You only need to listen to my orders. 
Just fine!" 


The flower on the ground tied his heart and stabbed his eyes, making him 
suddenly embarrassed. In general, venting anger and rushing to smash it. 
After stepping on it, he found that this kind of move was inexplicable. 
Why did he have to send such a small flower to such a big temper? The 
prince temple was rushed out. When the cold wind blows, it gradually 
calms down. 


Behind him, the black warrior also followed, thanking the pity: "You have 
explored this area, what can be abnormal?" 


No name: "No." 


Thanks to pity: "Is it confirmed? To launch a human face epidemic, there 
is no difference in the weather." 


No name: "There is no." 


Thanks for the pity, there is nothing to say, look up at the sky. 


Silent for a moment, no name: "His Royal Highness, do you think about 
how to launch the epidemic of grievances?" 


Thanks, "I am thinking." 


He looked down at the black sword hanging from his waist. Thousands of 
grievances were sealed in this black sword, but they could only be sealed 
for a while. 


At this time, there is no name: "His Royal Highness, I have a ruthless 
request." 


"Say." 


Anonymous said: "I hope that my Highness can give me this sword and let 
me launch the human face epidemic." 


Thanks for turning back, said: "Why?" 


The eyes behind the mask of the black warrior looked at him and said: 
"My beloved person has been seriously wounded in this war. It is better to 
die than to die. I watched as he was suffering and suffering." 


Thanks to the pity: "So?" 
"So, I hope that I will do this sword-bearing person and avenge him." 


His reasons are very reasonable, but thank you is not very trusting. He 
blinked a little and said: "I think you are a little weird." 


He turned around and walked around the nameless, coldly saying: "As far 
as I can see, you are not like a resentful avenger. You ask me so much, 1s it 
really to launch a human face epidemic?" ” 


That is to say, but what if it is not for the purpose of launching a human 
face epidemic? 


The nameless black warrior bowed his head slightly and said: "His Royal 
Highness, I hope that these people will die than anyone else. And I hope 
they will die in my hands. If you don't believe me, I can prove it now. 
show you." 


Thank you, "How do you want to prove?" 


The black warrior put his hand on the sabre and slowly retreated. When he 
retreated to three steps, thankfulness suddenly reacted to what he wanted 
to do. 


He is going to kill, prove to show him that he has a heart of revenge! 
Thanks for the moment: "Stop!" 


The nameless person stood still. Examining him for a moment, thanked 
and said: "No. I want to start myself." 


The black warrior lowered his head and wore a mask, not knowing how he 
reacted. Xie pity did not care about the reaction of others. He turned and 
whispered: "...but, before that, I still have one thing to do." 


Said, thank you for mentioning the black sword of the cold jade, staring at 
the sharp edge of the hand, the eyes flashed a strange light. The black 
warrior perceives that it is wrong, saying: "His Royal Highness, what do 
you want to do?" 


He had no time to stop it. The next moment, thanking the pity, he reversed 
Jian Feng and stabbed the black sword into his belly! 


On the second day, the streets of Langer Bay. 


The recent days are not very good, the yin of the yin, sometimes the wind 
is raging, and sometimes the evil rains. 


Speaking of it, there has been no flatness recently. I heard that the newly 
built palace has also caught fire. The king and the prince are seriously 11], 
and even the sick can't see it. It is a mess, full of ominous signs, making 


people feel in their hearts. It’s not very comfortable to be guilty. Only the 
young children do not understand anything, carefree, and still chasing. 


A gust of wind swept over and fascinated the human eye. Then, on the 
street fork, a loud bang was heard, and a figure fell from the sky! 


Everyone on the street was stunned by the sudden loud noise and looked at 
the streets. I saw a human-shaped pit on the ground. The pit was flat with a 
person, the head was scattered, covered in blood, and the white clothes 
were stained with stunned people. 


When I was at the time, everyone on the street gathered here: "Who?!" 
"My God, where did he fall from? From heaven?" 

"Will it die?!" 

"Okay, it seems not, it seems to be still moving!" 

"Can this not fall to death?! Wait, what is his chest? Is it a sword?" 


When the crowd was close, people gradually saw the appearance of this 
person. Although the hair is scattered, the face is quite white and clear, but 
the eyes are straightforward, not like a living person. But he said that he 
was not a living person, he was still breathing, and his chest was weakly 
undulating with a black sword piercing the internal organs on his 
abdomen. 


At this time, some people were shocked: "Wait, this... this is not... that, the 
Prince's Highness!" 


As aresult, others have recognized it: "...1s true. It is the original Prince, 
the Prince of Xianle! I have seen it before!" 


"Don't you say that the prince is missing?" 


"I heard that it is flying." 


"How could this be the case... What happened to the sword? Is it really 
worn? Scary..." 


"Don't look at it, let it go, let it go? I have to hurry!" 


This street is a fork in the road, leading to two different roads. At this 
time, it was blocked by the crowd. Later, the horses and horses couldn’t 
get through, and they all got off the bus and looked at it. Suddenly, 
someone said: "Wait! He seems... what are you talking about?" 


The crowd was quiet, breathless and careful. For a long while, the people 
outside did not hear the movement, shouting: "What did he say? What 
happened? Did he say?" 


Humanity in the front row: "No!" 
"What is he talking about?" 
"He said, 'Save me." 


Xie pity lay on the ground, and after saying these two words, there was no 
more mouth. The people around him are different in appearance, in a 
variety of ways, and strange. A fat cook looks like a human being: "Save 
him? How can I save it?" 


Someone guessed: "Should it be said to pull this sword out?" 


The cook looked quite bold, and was about to go up and try it. He was 
immediately stopped by others and said, "Don't stop, don't!" 


That person is puzzled: "Why?" 


Others told him why: "You can't! You haven't heard of it? Xianle is not 
defeated? Why did you defeat it? Because of the person who had the 
epidemic. Why is there a face disease? Because there is a god, it is ...... 


"Hey God?! Really?!" 


When this statement came out, no one dared to owe it, and the huge 
humanoid pit was surrounded by a large piece. 


After all, no one knows what happened to the former Prince of the Prince. 
Is he a god? Does it hurt him to suffer from the legendary terrible face 
disease? Or will it become unlucky? Moreover, it seems that even if he 
does not pull out the sword, he will not die for a while. Since he never 
knows how high the place is, and he slams so loudly, he is not dead. It is. 


Someone said, "We are still reporting to the official..." 


"Don't you say that the Prince's Highness is flying? What is the use of the 
official?" 


"What should I do?" 


The words are screaming, and finally, what results are not discussed, just 
called people to report, and the rest, they have no choice. 


Lying down? Then lie down. Let it go. 


Then, thanking her, she slept in the humanoid pit, and looked at the crowds 
that were swaying around and gradually disappeared. The blocked horses 
and horses bypassed him and walked away. The young children who had 
been playing on the street were pulled back to the house by their parents. 
Somewhere away, people passed by. He is always expressionless and does 
not speak a word. 


There was a hawker selling water who couldn’t bear it. He whispered to 
the wife who was watching the booth. He said, "Is it really okay to throw it 
like this? Or, give him a glass of water?" 


The hawker wife hesitated for a moment, looking around, whispered: "... 
Don't worry. If you really are blasphemy, what happens when you are too 
close, no one knows." 


The hawker was hesitant and looked around. A group of hawkers who were 
standing like him were staring at him. His look was tense. It seemed as if 


he had gone up with him and he was far from him. In the end, he still 
didn’t dare. In the early days, I gave up this plan. 


Thanks to this, from the morning of the thin dew, lying to the noon of the 
high sun, from the sunset, to the late night. 


During the period, there were many people who saw him. There were very 
few people close to him. There was no one who helped him pull out the 
black sword in his belly. 


In the middle of the night, there was no one on the street. Xie Pity was still 
lying on the ground, facing the sky, the dark night, the stars were shining, I 
didn’t know what I was thinking, I heard a clear laugh from the top: "Ha 
ha ha ha... you are What are you doing?" 


The pity in the pit was slightly moved, however, it did not get up. 


After several visits by the main man of this voice, he has not been as 
intense as the original reaction. Without the "welcome" that he was 
angered, the master of the voice took the initiative and stood in front of 
Xie, and bent down, listening to the voice seems to have some regrets. He 
bent down and said, "What are you waiting for?" 


A half-smiling and half-smiling mask fell over, just covering the whole 
line of sight. One person is opposite, close at hand, thankful and coldly: 
"Go away, you block me to see the sky." 


The called was rolled away, but there was no disappointment but no 
disappointment. He smiled straight and looked like an elder who was 
tolerant of a wayward child. He became more and more cordial. He said: 
"What good day is it?" 


Thanks for your pity: "It looks better than you." 
White has no reason: "Why is this so angry? This sword is not for me, this 


time I am not here to throw you here, all this is done by yourself. Whether 
you have got what you want or not I can't blame me for the results." 


Thank you for your silence. 


White has nothing to say: "You are wasting a day here today, what do you 
want to prove? Or do you want to convince yourself?" 


Thanks for your pity: "Turn off your ass." 


White has no smile and pity, said: "Stupid child, do you think someone 
will help you pull the sword?" 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 196: People in 
the middle of the world have a rain 


Thanks for forcing the top to go back: "I know no one will come. Turn off 
your ass." 


White has no reason to ask: "Why are you going to poke yourself a hole 
like this? With whom to be angry? No one will feel bad about you now." 


Thank you for your continued return: "I am happy. Turn off your ass." 


White has no reason: "If someone comes to help you, how are you going; 
no one will help you, how are you waiting?" 


Thank you for your pity: "How are you so far? I have to vomit! Turn off 
your ass, shut your ass!" 


His words are becoming more and more vulgar and rude, but his tone is 
getting more and more violent, but he said that he will only lick these 
words. White is as if he is amused by him and laughs. He sighs: "Silly 
boy." wey 


He turned and said: "But. Anyway, there is only one last day left, and it is 
no harm to make you stupid. Anyway, no one will come over to give you a 
glass of water, or help you pull this black sword out. .remember--" 


White Nowhere reminded him once again: "After tomorrow, when the sun 
goes down, if you haven't launched a human face, the curse will come to 
you." 


Thanks for listening quietly, not moving. 


On the third day, Xie Pity was still lying in the deep pit of the fork in the 
fork, and even the posture did not change. 


Today's crowd is no different from yesterday's crowd. It is far from him 
and goes all the way. Although the whimsical things have already been 
reported, but the other party heard that it is likely to be a god, and did not 
commit anything, just lying dead like a dead person, they do not want to 
go, perfuse the road to see a few days. This means almost no matter what. 
Who knows what it will become in a few days? 


Several young children ran over curiously, squatting at the pit to see the 
man in the pit, licking the branches, secretly pokeing, and thanking the 
dead fish as unrelenting. They are new and novel, and they want to try to 
throw something away from him. They were discovered by several 
parents, smashed a meal and turned back home. 


The hawker who sold the water yesterday has been squatting here. Thanks 
for the day and night, the dripping water did not enter, and there was a dry 
dead skin on the lips. The hawker looked pitiful. He seemed to want to 
send it in a bowl of water. He was shackled by his wife’s elbow, and the 
bowl turned over and had to give up. . 


I don't know if it's a day to come and join in the fun. After noon, the air is 
floating in the rain. 


The hawkers on the street quickly took over the stalls, and the pedestrians 
shouted to go home quickly and rushed. After a while, the rain grew bigger 
and bigger, and the pity of the face was washed away by the rain, and it 
was paler and the body was soaked. 


Quietly, a white figure appeared in front of the pity. 


Other people on the street didn't seem to notice this weird figure. White 
looked down on him and said: "It’s going to be sunset soon." 


Thank you for your silence. 


White is nothing to say: "You are not blasphemy, but they would rather 
believe that you are, and do not want to believe that you are not; when you 
acted against the sky and acted for Yong'an rainfall, now they even 
succumb to you with a glass of water; I’m forced to do nothing, but now 


they even help you to pull a sword out | out | so simple things are not 
willing to do, they feel difficult." 


He pityfully said: "I told you, no one will help you." 
There is a voice in the heart of jealousy shouting hysterically: 
Admit it. He is right. No, no, no! Really no, no one! 


As if he heard this in his heart, the white phase seemed to smile a little, 
reaching out and holding the hilt of the black sword, saying: "But it doesn't 
matter. They don't help you, I will help you." 


After he finished, he lifted his hand a little, and pulled the black sword out 
of the pity, and he slammed it on the side of the pity. 


Immediately, the white figure in the rain whispered softly, as if he had 
retired, and then he gave it to him, and he disappeared. 


After pulling out the black sword, the wound of thankfulness was exposed, 
and it was washed and washed by the rain, and the pain that had already 
been numb spread again. This is the only thing he can clearly feel at the 
moment. 


Kicking and kicking, a burst of mad rushing into the water came, it seems 
that there are pedestrians rushing in the rain. However, thankfulness has 
not been as secretly concerned as before. 


He slowly sat up, who knows, just got up and listened to the scream of 
"ah!!!", one person fell heavily beside him. 


The man carried a large basket of things and brought a bucket of rain. 
Probably because the rain 1s too big, he did not see that there was a person 
in the pit on the road. When he came to the front and thanked him for 
sitting up, he realized that the person was running very fast and he was 
very fierce. Extremely heavy, a person with a fight in the corner of the 
human figure lying on the side, smashed on the spot: "I | Fuck | Your 
mother!!!" 


The fighting flies, the basket on the back is also turned over, and the white 
flowers are sprinkled on the ground. The man sat on the ground and yelled 
and slammed it down. The mud and rice on the ground splashed and 
thanked him. He was furious, and he was stunned. He pointed to the pity 
and said: "What is the stuff?! I am so hard and tired that I have to earn 
some money to buy some rice. It’s all gone, I fell. Blood mold for several 
years! Lose money!! Don't pretend to die, lose money!!!" 


There is no such thing in the eyes of Xie, and he does not intend to pay 
attention. The man did not hesitate, grabbed the chest and bowed his head 
and said: "Do you want to die, I ask you?" 


Thanks for the cold and cold: "Yes." 


The man shouted: "Then you **** to die, not rolling, quietly, alone, to die, 
to block other people in the middle of the road, die not to die, no virtue!" 


Thanks to him, he swayed his own collar, his face was blank, and he was 
very numb. 


Hey, hey. It doesn't matter, just let it go. 
Anyway, it will not be long before it will disappear. 
It’s going to be sunset soon. 


The man grabbed the wood and did not respond to the pity that he had to 
lose money. He did not lose his **** head and did not get rid of it. Pushing 
it for a long time, he picked up his own fight on the ground and walked 
forward. It 1s. Xie Pity was thrown back into the pit by his "squatting", and 
gradually, he heard a louder noise than the rain. 


It was the scream of thousands of undead who were sealed in the black 
sword. 


As the setting sun sinks, they go crazy in their minds and scream, cheering 
for the coming freedom and revenge. 


Thanks for raising his hand and covering his face. 


Just as he shuddered and stretched out his other hand to catch the black 
sword on the ground, suddenly he found a strange thing. 


The rain seems to have stopped. 
wrong. 


It wasn't rain stopped, there was something, it was covered on his head, 
helping him to stop the heavy rain! 


Xie pity squinted and looked up, only to see a man in front of him, and 
buckled his head on his head. 


... actually the person who just yelled at him! 


He yelled at each other, and the other party also yelled at him. "Why are 
you looking at me like this? Why, if you are really dying to live, you have 
to die?" said a spit, saying, "I don’t want to cry." Hey?" 


The man was only fierce, and at the moment it seemed to be a bit guilty. 
After a few words, he defended himself: "I have done it, but I am not. But 
I am also you, you should be sick, who made you sick?" Who hasn’t been 
beaten yet?” 


Thanks and pity, I can’t speak. 


The man was impatient and said: "Well, I am unlucky, rice does not want 
you to lose. What are you still lying here? How old is not a child, waiting 
for your aunt to pull you up? Get up stand up." 


While urging him, he pulled the belt and pulled the praying back. He shot 
two slaps behind him and said: "Stand up, go home quickly!" 


Thanks to the pity, the humanoid pit was pulled out, and the two palms 
were almost shot on the ground, one by one. When he returned to God, the 
man had already left. 


Only the straw that was still in the straw was still on his head, reminding 
him that he was pulled out by people, not an illusion. 


I don't know how long it took, and the white phase appeared behind him. 


This time, he didn't smile, and his tone was not so leisurely. Instead, he 
seemed to be faintly unhappy and upset. He said, "What are you doing?" 


The rain was still underground, and Xie’s head was wearing a fight from 
someone else. Although the body was already soaked, the face of the girl 
could not be drenched. 


However, his cheeks are still soaked. 


Seeing that Xie Pity did not answer his words, Bai Xiangxiang and Shen 
Sheng said: "It is going to be sunset, pick up your sword, otherwise, you 
know what will happen." 


Xie Pitou did not return, whispered: "I am going to your mother." 
The white phaseless tone brought a chill, saying: "What do you say?" 


Thanks to him, he calmly said: "Don't you hear it? Then I will say it 
again." 


Suddenly, he flew up a foot, and the thunder slammed and stunned and 
flew out of the sky! 


One foot fell, thanked for a handful of wounds, one finger white no 
direction, with his greatest voice, tried his best to say: "I go to your 
mother!!! Who do you think you are, dare to follow I speak?! I am Prince 
Edward!!!!" 


In his face, two lines of tears have already emerged. 
A person. Just one person. 


Really, as long as one person is enough! 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 197: People in 
the middle of the rain have a rain 2 


Bai Wuxiang was kicked by his foot, turned over in the air, and steadily 
landed, and said: "Are you crazy?!" 


He is angry! 


For a long time, Xie Li was the first time to see such a strong emotional 
fluctuation in this thing, which made him very happy. He grabbed the 
black sword on the ground and attacked it. He said: "I am not crazy, I am 
just coming back! ” 


It’s not so easy to get rid of it. White no side flashes and whispers: "You... 
forgot? How your parents left you, how your nationals treated you, how 
your followers betray you! Just one person, a little passerby! Forgot all of 
this?!" 


Thanks to the pity: "I have not forgotten! But -" 
He screamed with a sword and angered and said: "Turn off your ass!!!" 


White has no grasp of the sword front, holding it very tight, blood flowing 
down, and the bones are also squeaking. 


He was out of control, and some incredulously muttered: "...waste, waste! 
You are really waste! At this step, you can still regret it, but you can turn 
back!" 


Xie Pity is also pushing the sword down hard, and gnashing his teeth: 
"you have disgusted me, so I definitely don't become as disgusting as 
you!" 


" " 


The white phase seems to be a little calmer, and it restores the tone of 
everything in his grasp. "Well, you are just dying. Have you forgotten what 
I said to you?" 


Thanks for the pity, the white is nothing to say: "The battlefield undead, 
has been recalled by you, now, it is already late. They are unstoppable!" 


In the midst of heavy rain, Xie’s black sword on his hand gave a sharp 
squeak, screaming in his ears and in his head. White has no reason: "What 
are you going to do? Is it worth it? For these people, bear the curse of the 
world?" 


Since the beginning of his slap in the face, Xie Pity has always been in a 
state of blood boiling and feverish minds. He speaks his sword and speaks 
his heart. He did not think about what to do next. Listening to him asking 
questions and not knowing how to answer, said: "You can't see what I plan 
to do. Before that, I will get rid of you!" 


White has no cold and screams, saying: "Not self-reliant!" 


The voice just fell, and the pity only felt that the body was light, and the 
whole person flew up. 


He immediately stabilized his mind to find the center of gravity, but this 
focus has not yet been found, the white shadow flashed above, and it was a 
violent attack. Thanks for the pity, it turned into an iron ball, and was 
thrown down by people. A loud noise broke into the ground. 


If the original thank-you pity still holds the "three-point lucky" that can be 
won when it breaks out, he will be completely awake when he hits it. 


Can't win! 
Too strong, this thing is overwhelming for him! 


Xie Pity never gave birth to such "overwhelming" thoughts when 
confronting any enemy. Only in a few times on the king, I only 
occasionally flashed a moment. However, Junwu is strong and not fake, 


but it is a kind of strong restraint and retractable, which is completely 
different from white. Among the toughness of this thing, there is a fierce 
fierce and full of resentment. 


Therefore, as long as one stroke, thank you for understanding, he is 
absolutely not to win the white. I am afraid that only Jun Wu, this thing is 
a level opponent. 


However, his voice now cannot be communicated to Junwu! 


A fierce foot, white, white boots, stepping on the chest, Senran said: 
"From the very beginning, it is because you are not self-reliant, delusional, 
only led to all this!" 


Xie Li was trampled by the internal organs, and it was difficult to be a 
painful one, but he endured a blood, saying: "No. Not me!" 


White has no reason: "Ha?" 


Xie Pity stretched out his hand and grabbed his boots. His eyes were 
unprecedented, and his eyes were clear. He said, "It is you who brought the 
human face disease. It is you, it has caused all this!" 


White did not say anything: "Maybe. If you must think so." 


Immediately, he smiled and said: "But you have to be clear, if you are not 
self-sufficient, and you are trying to go against the sky, I will not appear in 
this world. I am born in accordance with the destiny." 


The flame in the eyes of the pity was not only drenched by heavy rain, but 
burned more and more. He said: "You are less self-righteous! I don't need 
you to teach me, I will learn by myself. If you represent the destiny, then 
the destiny should be destroyed!" 


The sky is full of thunder and the wind is raging. The white phaseless 
voice went down again. 


He whispered: "I am so careful to teach you, but you are stubborn. Prince, 
I lost patience." 


Thanks and pity a few times, nothing to say: "But there is no difference, 
anyway, you have already awakened them, only the last step. This last step, 
let me help you." ” 


Thanks the police, "What do you want?" 


White did not bend down, grabbed the hand of thankfulness, forced the 
black sword into his hand, held it, and lifted the sword to heaven! 


The sky smashed a thunder and lightning, injected into the sword of the 
black sword, and reflected | went back. The dense dark clouds began to stir 
up, and a black cloud appeared in the sky above Yong'an. Countless human 
faces, human hands, and human feet were tumbling inside, as if the **** 
had moved to the sky. 


At the same time, the sunset is over. 


Xie pity lay on the ground, his eyes reflected the rolling black clouds and 
the thundering sky, and the white did not throw him down, and the black 
sword fell to the ground. 


The cloud was uploaded like a scream of a thousand horses. This 
screaming can be said to be destroying the earth. In the streets and alleys, 
many people were shocked and looked at them with umbrellas. They said: 
What's wrong?" "What's the noise?" "My mom?! What is it in the sky?! Is 
that a face?!" "The world is in chaos, the world is full of chaos!" 


Thanks for the mud on his face, he climbed up from the ground and 
shouted: "Go back! Go back to the house!! Don't come out! Go back to the 
house and run!!!" 


The human face is going to explode again! 


Xie pity struggled to wave his hand here, and Bai Wuxiang smiled softly 
on the side. Thanks for turning back and glaring at him. White no-phase 


hands and sleeves, calm and quiet: "Why must you be so angry? Anyway, 
you can no longer look back, it is better to appreciate the sweetness of 
revenge. Enjoy it, this is your masterpiece." 


"..." Thanks, "Do you think I have no choice?" 
White has no reason: "If you still have a way, please?" 


Thanks for taking a deep breath, grabbed the black sword on the ground 
and walked to the street crowd. 


Everyone recognized that the prince who was lying on the street for two 
days, who was not a ghost, a god, or a man, was carefully retreating. 
Thanks and pity: "Stop!" 


I don't know why, although he was covered in mud, he had a strange 
momentum, and everyone really stood still. Thanks to the pity: "Do you 
see those things in the sky?" 


The people nodded inexplicably, thanking the pity: "Those who are the 
grievances that cause the human face epidemic, will soon be erupted 
again!" 


The black sea of clouds is really stunned, and does not need more 
persuasion. Everyone believes this. He shouted: "People, people face the 
disease?!" "How come again?" "It’s not true..." 


Some people have no gods, and some people turn and run, but most of 
them are uneasy and stay in place, waiting for him to say more. Xie Pity 
did not say it, but held the sword in his hand and moved forward. 


He lifted the cold weapon, and scared everyone to brush back a few feet, 
but thanked and said: "Hold!" 


Everyone shouted: "...what?" 


In the rain, Xie pity held the sword and said: "As long as you use this 
sword to stab me, you will not get a human epidemic." 


The white smile didn't seem to be broken. 

Hey, he calmly said: "Prince, are you crazy?" 

Everyone also shouted: "This... what is this?" 

"Is he crazy?" 

"Take the sword to stab him? Really? What does he want to do?" 


The crowd knows about Soso, and there is a burst of laughter in the white 
phase, saying: "Are you losing your mind or not having enough of a sword 
to wear your heart? No, this time, I am afraid that Wan Jian will wear my 
heart. Take a good look at the sky!" 


He suddenly didn't smile, pointing to heaven: "The grievances cover the 
whole of Yongan! That is, if you want to 'save the lives,' you have to let 
everyone in Yongan come to slap you a sword, and within a day you will 
change. Into a muddy mud! Is this stupid practice different from what you 
used to ask for rain? Do you think you are saved?" 


Thanks to his face, he said: "One day is not good, then one month, one 
month, no two months, three months! If you can't save ten thousand, you 
can save a thousand, and you can't save a thousand. Save one hundred, ten, 
even one!!!!" 


White has no anger: "Why are you?!" 


Thanks for raising his sword with both hands, he shouted: "No why! 
Because I want to!!!! Even if I told you..." 


He turned back slightly and scornfully said: "--you can't understand this 
kind of waste." 


The scorn in his eyes is too explicit and too boneless. The white phase 
seems to be involuntarily inconsistent. He said, "What do you call me?" 


Xie pity no longer cares for him, calmly turns to everyone, saying: "It’s 
okay to stab a sword. I won’t die. You have seen it in these two days. But 
one person is only allowed once, and no one is allowed to mess, listen to 
me. Otherwise, whoever chaos me will blow the head first. Believe me, I 
can blow you one hundred in one hand." 


White has nothing to do with the channel: "You have made yourself a 
waste of the country's broken family, actually called me waste?" 


Where did everyone dare to take the sword in the hands of Xie, but did not 
dare to pick up, did not dare to run. White no phase was colded by him, 
more and more anger, cold voice: "...good. Then I will see what you will 
do with your own eyes. But no matter what the end, you are looking for 
yourself. Don't cry at the end and crash, saying that you regret coming 
back to me." 


Pushing and squatting for a long while, the dark clouds in the sky are 
getting more and more heavy, as if they are going to fall down. The 
screams of countless human faces are still in my ears. Finally, a father is 
scared and can’t stand it, dragging a child. Come over and pick up the 
sword, said: "I, I will take my family Xiaobao first to try it..." 


Others are still hesitating, and they are surprised to see: "Do you really 
want to try?!" 


The father actually hesitated, and daringly said: "This... this, he seems to 
really not die! Can't help, the big brother really can't live! My little 
treasure..." Say, use The hand covered the eyes of the child in his arms and 
let him hold the black sword. White no phase does not interfere, only a 
cold smile, thankful pity slightly clenched, waiting for the pain of the next 
moment, said to himself: nothing, has been hurt too many times, and soon 
got used to it. 


Who knows, when the black sword is about to penetrate his lower 
abdomen, when he slams, he is knocked down. 


Xie Pity did not wait for the unexpected pain, but waited for a loud "No!!" 


He slammed his head. The one who sold the black sword was actually the 
hawker who sold the water! 


The hawker was mixed in the crowd. It seemed that he couldn’t stand it 
anymore. He stood up and said: "I said this is not very good? You look at 
his belly, this bloody, is it really not dead? Even if not Will it be dead, will 
it bleed?" 


The father frowned and said: "This... this..." 


The wife of the water seller sneaked at him in the crowd, but the hawker 
whispered back and said: "Don't worry about anything going back and say 
it again!" He turned back and said: "Why 1s it really a stab? I don’t know if 
I will get sick, or don’t you sting?” 


The father said Tiandao: "But, right away..." 


At this time, the child in his arms cried, and the hawker immediately 
pointed out: "Look at you, you call your son to take a sword, your son is 
scared and crying!" 


Sure enough, the child cried as he wowed, and while he was throwing his 
black sword on the ground, he probably didn't understand what his father 
wanted to do, but he felt scared. At this point, the father's mind was 
completely dispelled, and the son was taken back to the crowd. A few 
people have already been eager to try, but when the first person is 
frustrated, the nature behind is not good, so he shouted in the crowd: 
"Don't listen to what he said? The human face epidemic is coming again! 
He It’s a god, it’s brought to the top of the head!” 


The hawker said: "But if he is a god, he will not voluntarily do this kind of 
thing?" 


He kept talking, causing some people to be impatient: "You also know that 
he is voluntary, then what is the problem? Do you want everyone to die 
together?" 


"You are selling your water, and you usually have a head when you are 
short of two..." 


The hawker wife has been secretly screaming at him. He immediately 
blew it up when he heard this sentence. He blushes and screams: "Let your 
mother's shit, who is short of two?! Roll it out and say it again?!" 


The other party immediately shrank. The hawker also blushed, and then 
stalked the neck: "I said! He volunteered to be his voluntarily. It 1s our 
business to do this. Is it a knife to swear?" If I gave him a glass of water in 
the past two days or how, I might still want to try this sword now, but... I 
didn’t give it! Who gave it? This face... I can’t pull it anyway!” 2k novel 
Reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 198: People in 
the middle of the rain have to rain 3 


He said this, everyone is silent. Because he said the idea, these two days, 
really no one has come to help thank you, this sells water hawkers, there is 
also the thought of sending water, but did not send it, and others have 
fundamental Did not dare to look at it! 


Someone shouted: "What should I do now? Don't let you give me a way!" 


Seeing that the crowd was turbulent, and some people were desperately 
rushing forward. At this time, another voice screamed: "Who is noisy? 
Who is noisy, Laozi has a knife!" 


Looking at it again, it was the first fat cook who wanted to come up with a 
sword when he fell down on the first day. He seems to have been angry, 
said: "This brother is right! Yesterday, if not many people have to stop me 
from letting me go up, I almost pulled the sword out! How can I not move 
now, then A few of them stopped me the most fierce? I am, you are also 
worthy? It’s so rare to be so shameless!" 


The cook was big and loud, and he was still copying a kitchen knife on his 
head. It seemed that he had just come out of the kitchen. The ones who had 
the loudest voice before immediately dared not call again. Someone who 
didn't know the situation for the past two days inquired about what was 
going on, and said: "No, you don't have anyone going up?" 


"Yeah, just let him lie there for two days? Didn't you help?" 


Some of the people who were said couldn’t hang on their faces. “Don’t say 
that you’re going to help you, you’ll be able to help yourself. Don’t forget 
that the ghosts are coming down later, and you can’t run. !" 


"Hey, I will tell you, if Iam present, I will definitely go up and help him 
pull the sword!" 


"Of course, it’s not too tired to move your mouth..." 


"Wait a minute! You are all vying for something, now it’s not a problem of 
pulling a sword without drawing a sword!" 


Striving for contention, the two people will be quarreling, and the rain will 
gradually become smaller. However, the black cloud is more concentrated, 
and hundreds of people under the pressure can't breathe. Suddenly, the 
crowd burst into a scream, and a few fingers said: "Come on!!!" 


Xie pity also raised his head sharply. I saw those people who rolled in the 
black clouds suddenly violently | Moved, dragging the long "tail", such as 
the black meteor falling rapidly! 


The human face is coming! 


Everyone was awkward, and they were in a hurry. Some of them ran away, 
some hid in the house, and several of them went to grab the black sword. 
However, the black sword that was shot down on the ground did not know 
when it actually disappeared and caught an empty space. 


Xie Pian was shocked by the reaction of the people. Now that he has 
noticed this, he also said: "What about the sword?! Who took it?!" 


No one has the time to answer, and everyone is running wild. But how can 
they fall with the grievances? Soon, the screams of the living and the 
screams of the grievances came from all directions! 


After the grievances catch up with the living, they are like a billowing 
black smoke, entangled, pervasive, and slowly into their bodies. Thanks 
for the hard drive to drive away, but the resentment is ultimately too much, 
he alone can not drive. Seeing countless people being chased in front of 
him, the hawker couple who sold the water and the fat cook were also 
smothered by black smoke, and the white phase was not far away, sneer, 
and stood by. 


Thankfulness and anger and urgency, the heart is swaying, simply 
confronting the most intensive grievances: "Hey-!" 


After all, he was the ambassador who awakened these grievances, so 
shouting that those things naturally noticed him. Thanks to open their 
hands to them, saying: "Come to me!" 


The grievances that have been entangled with the living are hesitant, I 
don’t know if they want to go, but the grievances who are still in the air 
immediately change direction and rush to pity. 


Successful! 


The heartfelt heartbeat is about to stop. He didn't know what would 
happen, and he didn't know what he would be. However, he rushed with a 
sudden blood in his head. He only felt that even if he had to sigh in front 
of the despicable monster and beat his nose and face, he must not back 
down; even if it is a thousand times again. The undead, he will also be 
invincible! 


Do you want to see me swearing and blaming myself? 
I am not biased! ! ! 
Never! ! ! 


The overwhelming Kuroshio surrounded the pity, and a grievance cried 
through his body. In an instant, the heart of pity seemed to be frozen, and it 
was a shackle. Then, it is the second one, the third one... 


These things rushed through the body of thankfulness like a knife and 
sword, and each time he took away a few minutes of warmth, and thanked 
him for getting paler and paler, but he insisted that he did not regress. 


Only a few hundred, he insisted on it for a while, and there will be more. 
It’s all over the sky, all! 


Xie pity closed his eyes and was ready to take on the anger of all the wits. 
Who knows, the next grievance has not arrived. Under doubt, he opened 
his eyes and suddenly found that the overwhelming Kuroshi that 
surrounded him disappeared. 


Because, they all turned into a black stream, sucked in the other direction! 


In the horror, thanked and looked around. I saw a black warrior at the end 
of Long Street, and the black sword was in his hand. 


nameless? 


Xie pity had already explained to him in advance, let him go away, waiting 
for him to launch a human face epidemic, why he would appear here at 
this time? ? 


Thanks to pity, I don’t know what it is. I don’t know what the black 
warrior is doing. After a while, I rushed to him and yelled and said, “Wait! 
What are you doing? Don’t touch it! Give me the sword!" 


The black warrior seemed to hear his voice and looked up slightly. 
Cherished couldn't see his real face, only saw a smiling face. However, he 
has a strange feeling. 


He felt that the face under the mask of the black warrior seemed to smile 
really. 


However, this feeling is fleeting. The huge black torrent and the screaming 
tide mixed into a storm, gathering to the other side, instantly engulfing the 
black warrior. 


At that moment, Xie Li heard a heartbreaking scream. 
He seems to have heard this voice. He must have heard this voice! 


pain. It hurts to feel the same feelings, the pain is not as good as death, the 
pain is both physical and mental, and he has to kneel down on his knees. 
He shouted his head and shouted: "Ah, ah, ah, ah, ah!" 


The sudden pain from the heart suddenly came, and suddenly went, I don’t 
know how long it took, and it was quiet all around, and the hands of Xie’s 
head hung down. 


He looked up slightly and glanced at the people, lying in all directions, and 
most of them were unconscious, and all the wraiths that had been 
entangled with them disappeared. 


This scene made him confused. What happened to the human face disease? 
What about the grievances? What happened to him? 


The black torrent has long since vanished. And the black nameless ghost 
was originally standing, only a black sword fell to the ground, next to the 
sword front, there was a small white flower. 


Thanks for the pity, climbed up, went forward, picked up the flowers and 
the sword. 


He touched his face and looked at his arm. He didn't feel that there was 
something different in his body. It didn't seem like he had suffered a great 
curse. Being confused, a voice came suddenly behind him and gently said, 
"Oh." 


Thanks for turning back, white no hands clasped his sleeves, standing 
behind him, wide sleeves fluttering in the wind. 


Xie pity has not responded to what happened, but there is a bad feeling in 
the heart. 


White looked at him without a look and chuckled. The bad premonition 
became more and more thick, and thanked and frowned: "What are you 
laughing at?" 


White did not ask the opposite: "You still don't know what happened?" 
Thanks: "What?" 

White has no reason: "Do you know, who is that ghost?" 

"..." thank you, "War, the battlefield undead?" 


White has no reason: "Yes. But at the same time, he 1s also the last 
believer in this world. Now, no more." 


nerisait believer? 

In this world, he still has believers? 

For a long while, thank you for finally able to say a few words. 
He said hard: "What, call, no?" 

White has no phase and long way: "The soul is flying away." 
Xie pity is a bit unacceptable: "How come the soul is gone?!" 


White has no reason: "Because he was cursed instead of you, the undead 
you called back, he did not have enough to eat." 


The undead that he was called back? 
Is he cursed instead of him? ! 


White has nothing to say: "Oh, yes, you are not seeing him for the first 
time." 


Thank you for watching him. White has no interest and is interested in 


authenticity: "This ghost seems to follow you all the time. Originally I just 
watched it deeply resentful, then I grabbed it and asked it. Who knows, the 


result is very interesting. Zhongyuan Festival, Lantern Night, WISP Soul. 
Remember?" 


Thanks and pity: "Chinese Lantern Festival? Lantern Night? Ghost Fire 
Soul?" 


White no phase slowly reminds me: "This ghost, before you were a soldier 
who was under your arm, after death, is the soul that follows you. Because 
you are dying, because you have become a ghost, and because you are 
launching a human face, The epidemic is dying." 


Cheering seems to be vague and remember something. However, he did 
not even see the face of this believer, even his name did not know, and 
what can he really remember and remember? 


"Maybe here, there are really believers from His Royal Highness who are 
offering you..." 


Yes. some. 
Moreover, it is the only believer! 


Bai Wuxiang seems to say a lot of other things, but thank you for listening 
to it, but he didn’t know what to say. Until the end, he said: "The **** like 
you is sad enough. Being a believer is even more sad and ridiculous. "" 


In front of him, he ridiculed his pity, and thanked him for not responding, 
but listening to this thing is self-righteous to evaluate his believers sad and 
ridiculous, but pity seems to suddenly wake up with a sword, an 
unstoppable rage. 


He rushed up, but he was slammed down, and he said nothing, "You can't 
win me, how many times do you want me to recognize the facts?" 


Xie pity did not want to win him at all. It doesn't matter if he can't win. He 
just wants to beat this thing and anger: "What do you know! Why do you 
laugh at him?!" 


That is the only believer in this world! 


White has no reason: "A believer who follows the loser, why can't I laugh 
at it? You are stupid, your followers are more stupid. Listen! If you want 
to defeat me, you must follow my teachings. Otherwise, you will never be. 
I want to win me!" 


Thanks to him, he tried his best to "snap" and even breathe. White has 
nothing to do with another hand, and there is a sad face in the palm, 
saying: "Now, start again!" 


He is pressing this mask on the face of Xie, and, at this time, it is booming 
and booming. 


The sky flashes and thunders, and the clouds shine in the strange light. 
White did not stop the action, and said: "What is this? Heaven robbery?..." 


After a pause, he vetoed: "No!" 
wrong. 
It’s a day of robbery, but it’s not just a robbery! 


A man’s voice rang through the sky and said: “He can’t win you, how am 
1?” 


Thanks for raising his head. 


I don’t know when, at the end of the long street, there was a young 
Wushen wearing a white armor and a sigh of relief. The whole body was 
covered with a layer of white light, hand-held on the sword, step by step, 
and smashed out in the dark world. A clear road. 


He couldn't help but widen his eyes. 
Junwu! 


After the rain had cleared, the pity was sitting on the blackened land and 
gasping slightly. 


Jun Wu received the sword into the sheath and walked over and said: 
"Xianle, welcome to return." 


He looked tired and had blood marks on his face. It was nothing to leave. 
In addition, Junwu also suffered dozens of injuries, large and small, not to 
be heavy, but the white is no more heavy, and he is so heavy that he is 
beaten, leaving only a broken sad face. It is. 


Listening to him saying "homing", thanking me for a moment, touching 
the neck, only to find that the curse has disappeared. 


Jun Wu smiled and said: "I really did not read it wrong. The time you 
came back to spend is shorter than I thought." 


Thankfulness gradually returned to God, but also smiled, but it was a 
smile. 


After calming down, he said: "Im, I want to ask you." 
Jun Wudao: "Yes." 
Thanks: "You don't ask me what is it?" 


Jun Wudao: "In any case, if you go back to Xianjing, you will have to 
discuss it. This is your gift of homing." 


Thanks for the pitiful corners, stood up and looked straight at Junwu, 
solemnly said: "That, I invite you to take me down again." 


Wen Yan, Jun Wu condensed a smile and said: "Why is this?" 


Thanks for the frankness: "I did something wrong. The second human 
epidemic was launched by me. Although the consequences did not seem 
too serious." 


Because, just disappeared an unknown ghost. In this world, there may not 
be anyone who cares about such a nameless ghost, so it seems that the 
consequences are not so serious. 


Jun Wu slowly said: "Know what is wrong, then you are already right." 
Xie pity shook his head and said: "Just know, it is not enough. If you do 
something wrong, you should be punished. However, the mistake I made, 


instead of being punished by me..." 


He looked up and said: "So, as a punishment, I ask the emperor, and then 
give me a curse, no, two. One seals my mana and spreads my air." 


Jun Wu slightly frowned, said: "Distribute the air? Then you will not be 
unlucky, really become a god?" 


In the past, thankfulness would really care that he was said to be a god, 
very resistant, and felt insulted, but now he has no idea about it. He said: 
"Hey God will blaspheme. I know that I am not right." 


After he disperses his own path, they will naturally be diverted to other 
unfortunate people. It is also considered as compensation. 


Jun Wu reminded: "It will be very shameful." 


Thanks to pity: "I lose face when I lose face. To be honest, I feel like... I 
am getting used to it." 


Although I don't want to get used to this kind of thing, it seems that I am 
really accustomed to it. 


Jun Wu looked at him and said: "Xianle, you have to understand that 
without mana, you are not a god." 


Thanks a little sigh, said: "I will understand more than anyone else." 


After a pause, he was a little annoyed and somewhat awkward: "People say 
that I am a god, I have a mana. But in fact, I...not the gods they are, they 
may not be as arrogant as they wish." 


"Does God fail so much? I want to protect my people, but let them corpse 
all over the country; if they want revenge, they will lose their hand at the 
last minute. The ‘failure’ is nothing to say. 


"No, it is not." 
Jun Wu stared at him carefully, for a long time, said: "Xianle grew up." 


This should be said to the elders of the pity. Unfortunately, his father and 
mother did not have the opportunity to say this. 


Speaking, Jun Wu said: "Since it is the road you choose, then, good. 
However, if you want me to marry you, there must be a reason." 


I can’t just slap a **** official like a play, what is it like to go to heaven? 


This thankfulness has an idea. He said: "Is it, the emperor, we seem to 
have never tried to do it once?" 


When Jun Wu went to understand his meaning, he smiled and said: 
"Xianle, I am hurt." 


Thanks to the pity: "I am also hurt, just to level." 
Jun Wu nodded: "If this is the case, then I will not be merciful." 


Thanks for the slightest smile, the light flashed in the eyes and said: "I 
will not." 


His Royal Highness, Prince, was smashed again. 


After the vigorous second annihilation, Prince Xianle thanked the pity, 
punched and kicked back to heaven, and only flew less than a musk, and 
was beaten by Shenwu Emperor. All the priests don't understand, what 
exactly does this person want to do? ? ? 


However, thank you also can't understand what other priests want to do. 


Is it so curious? Look at every day to see, dressed as a mortal to see into 
animals, this is a voyeuristic to him for a few days! Is a big man moving 
bricks so beautiful? ? ? 


I was wondering, and the foreman was called up: "New, you, you, say you! 
Don't be lazy!" 


Thank you for sitting up and screaming loudly: "Oh!" 


In response to this, he grabbed a broken fan and fanned it. In front of him, 
several bricks were placed on a small stove, and a large pot of rice was 
being cooked on the stove. 


Here is the site where he moved the mud. However, the bricks have 
already been moved, and not far away, two new temples have been 
completed. Now, his task is to cook rice. Cooked and cooked, it was very 
hard, and two carriages brought two tall statues. Thankful and absent- 
mindedly throwing things into the pot, he took a look at the busy schedule. 


The two gods were carried into two temples. The temple on the left 
cheered: "The generals of Xuan Zhen are good! The generals of Xuan Zhen 
are very sweet!" 


Thanks for being speechless. 


Praise the love and use the word "home heart and benevolence", are these 
believers serious? ? ? 


However, they seem to have good reasons. After all, it is well known that 
the admiration is soaring because he has cleaned up the residual 
grievances of the old imperial city of Xianle, and understands that it is not 
a good thing. Anyway, all the old imperial city people are very grateful to 
him. 


In the temple on the right, he did not hesitate to swear: "The generals of 
the yang are good! The generals of the yang are brave and invincible!" 


Thanks for your nod. He has no objection to this. However, it is not 
necessarily the case for women. 


The believers on both sides are screaming at each other, and they want to 
cover each other. They feel thankful for their ears and hurt. He sighs, 
frowns, and heart, why bother? 


So hate each other, don't build the temple on the opposite side of the other 
side. 


The answer is - of course not! Because here is the most popular and feng 
shui site in the city. The believers of these two priests will certainly not 
give up such a fat land because they want to avoid each other. Of course, 
they must grab the other party's incense and make them feel disgusting. 


In a short while, the followers on both sides have developed from 
confrontation to confrontation. Here, thank you for feeling that the fire 
was almost the same. The spatula knocked on the lid and shouted: "You, 
don't fight! Come and eat!" 


Fighting right, who cares for him. Xie pity shook his head and uncovered 
the lid, and the fragrance floated ten miles. This is good, everyone did not 
fight, and they shouted: "...1 am fucking... What is this taste?!" 


"Who is cooking?!" 
"Is it still a pottery?!" 
Xie pity argued: "What! This is the royal secret collection of dishes..." 


The foreman took a look at his nose, his face turned green, and he jumped 
up and said: "The top secret of the shit, which is the royal! Just you? 
Rolling! Don't be disgusting!" 


Thanks for the compromise, said: "Well, it’s OK, but I’m tired of putting 
my money first...” 


The foreman angered: "You dare to mention the money! You talk about it! 
You! Since you came! How much loss I have! Ah? It’s raining, and it’s not 
awkward, I’m looking at you! The house is on fire three times. It has 
collapsed three times! You are a god! I dare to find me to work! Roll it! 
You will call me once again!" 


Thanks to the pity: "You can't say that, you said it was coming to me. 
Every time someone else 1s not okay, I think you want to pay the bill?" The 
voice has not fallen, the foreman and the workers can no longer stand it. 
The smell of the pot floated out, and the wind ran away without a shadow. 
Thanks for your pity: "Wait?!" 


Looking back, the two groups of people who had been fighting earlier had 
long been smoked away. Thanks for being speechless and self-speaking: 
"If you don't eat, let me cook such a big pot. If you have money, you can 
just waste it?" 


Shaking his head, he thought about it, and he had two big bowls of rice. A 
large bowl was put in the temple of the Yangyang. A large bowl was put 
into the Xuanzhen Hall for the purpose. Finally, I felt that everything was 
used, and my hands were taken together. One palm, satisfied. 


Going outside to pack things up, carefully rolled up the mat on the ground, 
* With the sword, and the white shackles wrapped around his wrists 
sneaked twice, thanking him for taking a shot and helping the fight on the 
head. , said: "Well, don't give money without giving money. I am going to 
sell art." 


How to say, he also has a unique skill - the chest is broken! 


Walking out of the road, Xie Pui suddenly found a small red flower on the 
side of the road, very cute, kneeling down, gently touching the petals of it, 
feeling very good, said to it: "I hope to see you later." 


When he walked far away, the little red flower was still swaying in the 
wind. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 199: Litiandi 
Shenren Copper Broken Furnace 


Xie pity lay on the cold ground, his face covered with the half-smile and 
half-smile sorrowful face, white nowhere, seems to appreciate his 
appearance like himself. 


The sorrowful face was closely attached to the face of thankfulness with a 
strange force, and he could not pull it down. White has nothing to say: 
"Have it. Don't be in vain. Do you want to go out? As long as you do what 
I say, you can break through the copper furnace very quickly." 


Thanks only when he does not exist. 


Bai Wuxiang always asks him for boring, but he always refuses to give up. 
He sighs: "We could have become the strongest mentor and best friend. 
Why do you have to be so rebellious?" 


Xie pity finally stopped the action, and resentfully said: "You use less of a 
vicissitudes of life to teach me, I really don't want to have your teachers 
and friends." 


His dislike has been revealed, and White has no sneer: "I know, in your 
mind, those who can teach you, one is the national teacher, the other is the 
prince, is it?" 


He was amazed, as if he was disdainful and funny. Xie pity does not intend 
to entangle this with him, and asks something else: "Lang Ying, is the first 
prince of Yong'an?" 


Lang Ying is a Yongan person who has suffered from a human epidemic. 
The little prince is the only person who can think of pity. White has no 
reason: "Yes, after you have smashed the body of Lang Ying, you stunned 
and threw it at the Yong'an Palace, and put a fire to send him the Prince." 


The Prince of Yongan was a nephew of Lang Ying. I was afraid that at that 
time, the human face infected with the body of Lang Ying had infected 
him. Thanks again: "Why is his human face epidemic not transmitted to 
others?" 


White has no reason: "Because the people of Yong'an Palace found him 
sick. In order not to let him infect others, he sent someone to quietly 
suffocate him with a quilt, but he was struggling to fight back and escape." 


While Yongan declared that the Yongan lord and the prince were seriously 
ill, the inside did not know how to fight, and established another scorpion 
of Lang Ying as the prince. This is the ancestor of Lang Qianqiu. 


Thanks for your pity: "How did you lie to him?" 


White has no reason: "I didn't lie to him. I just told him the truth, who is 
the chief culprit to make him become such a monster. As long as he 
borrows me something, I will avenge him." 


Thanks for your pity: "You call me something to borrow you? You 
swallowed him as a nutrient." 


White has no faintness: "He looks like this, people are not ghosts, no one 
really treats them, and staying in the world is also a crime." 


Suddenly, thank you: "His Royal Highness?" 


" " 


For a moment, thank you for feeling that that thing 1s what you want. 
However, he resisted. 


Then, thanking and praying and asking: "You, Prince Wu Yong." 


As soon as he spoke, he felt that the hot air in the copper furnace solidified 
instantly. 


From the moment he fell in, he was thinking about this. 


The reason why he can understand the words of the corpse rat mouth must 
be that one of the three kings, the national teacher and the white non- 
phase, gave him a certain memory and emotion. In other words, at least 
one of these three people is Wuyong. When Junwu was born later than 
Wuyong, the national teacher and Bai Wuxiang were the most suspected. 


Why is Huacheng rejected by the copper furnace? It won't be because he is 
absolutely, because Xie pity has confirmed to him that the ghost king who 
has become a singer can enter the copper furnace again, and the gods who 
have already risen can be robbed again. But he still disappeared halfway. 
The most direct reason why Xie Pity can think of is this copper furnace, 
obeying the instructions of the white phase! 


So, what is the most likely role of white phaselessness? 


Half a sigh, a dead silence in the darkness, thank you for repeating it 
affirmatively: "You are Prince Wu Yong." 


Finally, the white phase is no longer silent. 


He slammed into the pity, and his hand was very fierce. This time, it was 
his turn to shout. He jumped up and flashed and said: "His Royal 
Highness, I ask you a question, why don't you ever have a real face?" 


There is no such thing as white: "His Royal Highness, I warn you not to 
call me that." 


Thank you, "You can call my Highness, Prince, why can't I call you like 
this? If you don't answer, I will guess it myself. I don't want to let others 
see the reason for the truth. It's nothing more than two. Or, you are me. 
Someone who knows, or I don't know you, but as long as I see your real 
face, it 1s easy to find out who you are; or, it is your true appearance, ugly, 
ugly to yourself and can't stand it! such as...... ‘ 

‘ "two sounds, a sharp pain from the arm, white nowhere to screw 
him, said: "Prince, prince, is not that I am kind to you, you feel that I do 
not need to fear Already?" 


This voice is chilly, and the pain is still awake. The white phase seems to 
be really angry. He carried the black sword and approached the pity. He 
said, "You named this sword as a heart?" 


Seeing that the blade of Sensen was getting closer and closer to his throat, 
thanking him for the same look, said: "Can't you?" 


White has nothing to say: "You don't take a name at all. Listen, the name 
of this sword is called 'heart."" 


Suddenly, thank you for your eyes and said: "Who?!" 


White has no phase but does not return to the head. He said: "Do you want 
to use this kind of trick to deal with children?" 


'..." thank you very much, said, "You... didn't find it?" 
White has no cold channel: "There is nothing, what do I have to discover?" 
He did not find it, thank you for discovering it. 


Fang Cai, the heart of the sword reflected the fire on the ground, the fire 
flashed over the stone wall above the two. At this moment, thank you for 
seeing a face. 


Thank you for making sure that you are absolutely not mistaken. He is 
absolutely a face, a huge face! 


White no-phase repair is only lower than thanking the pity, how can he not 
find it? 


Unless... that is something more terrible than nothing! 


The time he saw the face was too short, but the vision remained in 
memory, the face was full of facial features, and... still somewhat familiar. 
Thanks for the slightest sensation, and said: "There is something else in 
the copper furnace!" 


White has nothing to say: "In the copper furnace, except for you and me, 
there are only stones and magma." 


Thanks for the pity, but suddenly said: "Wait... stone? face? familiar?" 


When the flash of light flashed, he suddenly realized and understood what 
he saw. 


That's it! 


Once I understood it, I thanked my hands and I quickly printed on the 
back. Bai Wuxiang discovered his change and said: "It's useless, you 
just..." 


Who knows, the voice has not fallen, and there 1s a huge bang in the back 
of the two. At the same time, the falling stone dirt is generally down like a 
rainstorm! 


White has no sense to see something coming to him, flashing rapidly. He 
flashed really fast enough, no longer someone can move faster than him, it 
should have been avoided, but unfortunately, the things that hit him are too 
big. 


It was a giant hand, and the five fingers became a fist, and he slammed it 
down — it was in the middle of nothing! 


This hand is a rock giant. 


It is too big. It is a fist that can rival a big house. The fire on the ground 
can only illuminate this part, and the parts above the wrist are all 
immersed in the darkness. 


In the rolling stone sound, it turned his hand to thank you, palm up. 
Although it is giant, it is a slender finger, and the knuckles are slender, can 
be smashed, and can also be a sword. Thanks for the sword, he climbed up 
from the ground and jumped into the palm of his hand. The hand just had 
to hold him up, thanked Pity suddenly remembered forgetting things, and 
said: "Wait!" Jumped again and grabbed the fight, then jumped up. Then, 


the giant hand rose, getting farther and farther away from the fire, and 
thanking the pity also felt higher and higher, and the hands were printed 
again, saying: "Chong out!" 


With a command, he felt a slight sense of falling, as if the giant holding 
his back slightly bent his knees and was preparing. The next moment, he 
felt the whole body slammed, and the giant skyrocketed and slammed into 
the crater closed by the copper furnace! 


Bang! Bang! Bang! 


With the violent vibration, Xie Li heard a very obvious crack of the " 


That is the rock can not support the fierce impact, the sound of breaking! 
Immediately, the top blew a white light. 
Rush out! 


The copper furnace cap was broken, and a lot of glare white light poured 
like a waterfall, and the wind blew into it. 


Xie pity stood on the palm of the giant, holding his head on one hand and 
covering the blizzard in the face. The sultry air swept away and took a 
deep, cold air. He said loudly: "Sanlang-!!!" 


The first echo was still echoing, and he was pulled into the arms behind 
him with one hand. Xie pity is a stiff first, a bow, and a pair of red sleeves 
and silver wristbands around his waist, which relaxes. A heavy voice was 
above his ear: ".... am going crazy!" 


Hearing words, thanking and turning quickly, his hands held his cheek and 
comforted: "Don't go crazy, don't go crazy, I'm already out!" 


It is a flower city. Huacheng black hair is messy, and there are still some 
disappointments in his eyes. He couldn’t pick up the sad and happy face, 
and he took it off and threw it away. Xie Pity does not know why he wants 


to hold his cheeks in his hands. He is subconsciously doing this. He 
probably wants to comfort, or he may be afraid that his face will be frozen 
by the snow. After all, how long has the pity stayed in this copper furnace, 
the flower city must have been on this crater for how long. 


I went in with a good one, and one of them was suddenly thrown out. I 
didn’t know what was going on inside, but wasn’t it crazy? 


Huacheng held her thanks and politely said: "...I can't enter the copper 
furnace, I actually want to let you out alone! My mother is really..." 


Thanks for your help: "Samuro 1s fine, really okay! And, I am not out of 
my own!" 


Huacheng finally calmed down a little and said: "What? Brother, how did 
you come out?" 


Thanks for your pity: "You helped me out. Look." 
Said, he pointed up, and Huacheng looked in the direction he pointed. 


I saw the snow and the snow, a giant statue carved from the mountains and 
stones, full of flying frost, faint, as if standing on the ground. At this 
moment, the two stood on the palm of this megalith. 


The stone statue has a soft silhouette, a long eyebrows, a good lip line, and 
a Slightly raised mouth, like a smile. To say passionate and not 
contemptuous, the road is ruthless but not indifferent, it is a 
compassionate and beautiful face. 


- It is the face of pity! 


Cheering looked up at its face and whispered: "This is what you said, the 
best statue you carved?" 


Huacheng also looked up to it. For a long time, his eyes fell back to his 
side and thanked him. "Well." 


This huge rock statue must be engraved in the inside when the flower city 
is trapped in a copper furnace, and it is extremely painful and painful. 


For centuries, it has been hidden in the darkness of the deep copper 
furnace, and some of it has been covered by green vines. The copper 
furnace is its natural and sinister cave, the only **** in this most 
spectacular cave. 


It is integrated with the copper furnace and the material is the same. 
Otherwise, if it is just an ordinary rock-carved statue, it will not be able to 
break through the copper furnace, it will only be broken; if it is not pity, or 
if they jumped, Huacheng did not give a strong enough mana. Can't call 
this statue. 


Xie pity turned to Huacheng, said: "So, Saburo, I came out. It 1s you and I 
came out together." 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 200: Litiandi 
Shenren Copper Broken Furnace 2 


At this time, the two suddenly felt a tremor at the same time, both of 
whom smiled slightly and watched. Thanks a little nervously: "What's 
wrong? Is this statue shaking?? Isn't it going to collapse?" 


After all, the copper furnace cap is also a megalithic boulder. If this 
megalithic portrait is really broken because it broke through it, then he 
will have to repent. After all, this is the most carved by him. Good idol. 
Huacheng said: "It doesn't matter, it's okay. The whole mountain is 
shaking." 


Sure enough, the snow underneath is generally collapsed, and some places 
have already exposed the mountain. It seems that there is something to be 
rushed out of the copper furnace. 


Huacheng stopped in front of Xie. Thanks to pity: "It 1s nothing." 


Of course, he wouldn't think that this megalithic statue would be able to 
succumb to death without a fist. At most, he could only let this thing 
linger for a while and be alert. But in a short while, the two felt a burning 
air blowing in the air. 


The hot breath was ejected from the bottomless crater, and there was a 
smell of sulfur. 


Thanks for the instinctive intent to feel the danger approaching, Huacheng 
also sighed: "Brother, leave!" 


Thanks for turning over the fingerprints, and then, along with the flower 
city, stepped on the wrists and arms of the megalithic statue and stood on 
its shoulders. The gods listened to his orders, strode forward, followed by 
the rolling snow, a slip is a few miles, the whole body is flying, but 
because of the hands, although it is a thousand pounds, it is well 
maintained. balance. However, they only slid to the halfway of the copper 


furnace, the tremor of the whole mountain was more intense, and the 
statue was also shaken a little more. Xie Li and Hua Cheng looked up, only 
to hear a loud bang, the copper furnace, a dark smoke column sprayed out! 


This earth-shattering loud noise, coupled with the smoldering pillar of 
smoke, shows that the whole person is shocked. However, in the twinkling 
of an eye, the entire sky is covered by a black cloud of smoke. In the dark 
clouds that cover the sky, countless faces, human hands, and human feet 
are tangled and horrified. 


This picture, thank you for seeing it once a few hundred years ago, and 
now, finally met again! 


Thanks to the pity: "What are those?" 
Huacheng condenses the sacred road: "The undead of Wuyong nationality." 


I am afraid that all the Wuyong people buried by the volcanoes are all 
there. Suddenly, Huacheng Road: "Brother, below ten feet!" 


His voice did not fall, and Xie Pity had driven the right hand of the 
megalithic statue and took a shot. 


Outside the snow ten feet below, in a white, standing in a white figure, it is 
white. He is almost integrated into the snow, but he still can't see the eyes 
of the two. The thick snow was shocked by this palm and it was a huge 
white wave, but it didn't hit. 


I had already made a move in the dark before, and there was no natural 
precaution in white. The white shadow flashed, and the next moment, the 
figure appeared on the knee of this megalithic statue. The megalithic 
statue is not thinking, but also a palm to shoot to his knees, but the palm of 
the hand halfway, thanking the reaction, gritted his teeth, and gave birth to 
his heart, said: "Good insurance!" 


The only copper furnace cap was broken by the megalithic statue. If you 
pray now and let it take a palm of your hand, it’s hard to control a hard 
one. I am afraid, this is the purpose of the white innocence to jump up, in 


order to let him lift the stone to lick his own feet. Here, thank you for the 
sudden sorrow, and there, Huacheng slowly pulled out | a slender silver 
scimitar, no dialogue: "Go down." 


White looks up and looks at them. Huacheng said coldly: "This statue is 
not something you can get." 


Suddenly, thank you: "Sanlang!!!" 


He pointed to the top of the copper furnace. After the black smoke column, 
there was something that followed the spout. 


Red gold, flowing, male and male burning. 
magma! 


The red gold magma and the smoky black smoke were mixed together and 
rolled over to the bottom of the copper furnace. Taking advantage of this 
opportunity, Bai Wuyi jumped into the snow and disappeared into the 
snow. Xie pity also refused to catch him, and said: "Run!" 


The megalithic statue listened to his drink, strode forward, and slammed a 
few loud noises, and jumped off the copper furnace. The feet are flat and 
the foot is flat, and the ground shakes! 


However, it is fast, and the magma and black smoke are not slow, almost 
followed. After landing, she did not dare to stay, driving the statue to stand 
up and continue to carry them. Running and running, thanking him for 
feeling that its speed seems to slow down, and his heart is strange and not 
good. He is thinking about whether it 1s an illusion, feeling the body, and 
being carried by the statue, slamming down. 


It was the statue of the megalith that did not listen to him. He stopped and 
slammed on one knee! 


After squatting, the upper body was slowly tilting forward. It seemed that 
he was physically weak and he would faint. The heart of pity hangs into 
the eyes of the blind man. 


Oops! To fall down! 
And the fire smoky, it is necessary to catch up! 


At this time, Xie Pity suddenly felt a tight waist, but it was Huacheng who 
pulled him over, rubbed his waist in one hand, lifted his lower jaw in one 
hand, and put the cool lips on it. 


Thanks to pity and big eyes, a cool and refreshing moment filled the chest 
and flowed through the limbs. The whole person seemed to be alive. The 
kiss was very short, and the flower city separated the lips and said, 
"Brother, try again!" 


Thanks to the time when he was awake, the fingerprints came out again, 
just before the megalithic statue was about to fall face down, it jerked out 
his hands and held the ground. 


Next, stand up again! 


It turned out that this megalithic statue does not look like physical 
strength, but it is really physical. The mana consumed to manipulate such 
a huge statue is terrible. The wave of mana that the city used to lend to has 
been burned, and it naturally slows down the speed. It was not "lived" until 
it was reinjected into mana. This time, it ran faster than before and the 
movements were more flexible. Huacheng said: "Brother, run faster!" 


Xie pity also wants to be faster, but he is worried that such a driving 
method is too consuming mana, and 1s uncertain: "Can you hold it any 
faster? What if the mana is not enough?!" 


Huacheng is arrogant in his ear: "No, you just run! Never be afraid, I am 
here!" 


Huacheng stood behind him, his hands firmly holding his waist, as long as 
such a person, it is as if the whole world station is behind him. Xie pity 
took a deep breath and closed his eyes and said: "Okay." 


Shou, he extended his hands forward, released all the mana, and sacrificed 
the strongest French seal, and said: "- Run!" 


boom! boom! boom! boom! 


The megalithic statue rushed all the way. In one step, the gully smashed 
him one step at a time. The hills leaped in one step, and it was far behind 
the black cloud and magma. It is really a giant that can't be ignored at all. 
Every step is like a piece of celestial stone, which creates a strong wave! 


Countless zeros scattered in the copper furnace mountain monsters and 
ghosts feel the ground mad, shocked. Looking up, many of them saw the 
dark clouds that swirled in the sky, which was a bit surprising, but not very 
concerned. It is not unusual for the wonders to appear in Tongluoshan. 
Anyway, the black cloud is not the grievance? They are all things that are 
similar to the grievances. They see much more every day. Is there anything 
to be afraid of? 


However, when they saw the huge statue of the gods rushing past, they 
were all shocked - 


What it is? ! 


When I was on the scene, I was crying and crying: "A big man, ah, ah, ah, 
ah, ah, ah!" 


Such big people like they have never seen before. It’s terrible! ! ! 


Xie Pui wanted to circumvent the Wuyong Imperial City, lest his gods step 
on the ruins of these two thousand-year-old houses, and remembered: 
"Sanlang, General Shun, Yushi adults Is it near here?" 


Huacheng Road: "Yes." 


Thanks for your help: "Come back, something forgot, take it and take it 
away!" 


Then, the megalithic statue that ran over the head took a few steps back. I 
was about to fold back, but she felt that the whole body was shocked, and 


the whole man flew up. 
In midair, he reacted to what had just happened. 
The idol fell! 


Xie Li and Hua Cheng landed firmly on the chest of the gods, and thanked 
him for driving it to stand up again and look forward. It is not his own, but 
something else that makes this megalithic statue fall. 


A winding mountain. 


Of course, this mountain is far superior to the bronze furnace, but it is still 
taller than this giant stone statue. When thanking the pity, I remember very 
clearly that they did not climb over such a mountain at all, so his eyes 
crossed the mountain and looked behind him. 


Sure enough, behind it, there are two mountains that are almost tall. Three 
big mountains were in front of the statue of the megalith. 


Huacheng Road: "Brother, beware. They are the 'guards' of Tongluoshan. 
'Old', ‘ill’, 'dead'." 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 201: Litiandi 
Shenren Copper Broken Furnace 3 


The megalithic statue just slowly climbed from the ground, and the first 
mountain monster rushed over him. 


Thanks to the flower city, he said that he was chased by the three 
mountains in Tongluoshan. He naturally did not dare to take a nap. He 
planned to volley over the top of his head, but he never tried to manipulate 
such a tall one. The idol is doing such a complicated movement, and it is 
inevitable that he will be in a hurry, not jumping, but being knocked down 
again. 


The bang was booming. The statue of the megalith fell to the vicinity of 
the Wuyong Imperial City, squashed a street, and heard a "kick-up" when 
it was slightly moved. It was the sound of those gorgeous house palaces 
crushed by the giant stone statue. In the shock bumps, Xie pity almost 
gave it down, but Huacheng firmly grasped his hand and said: "Follow 
me!" 


With a pity, he jumped a few steps to the top of the megalithic statue. It 
turned out that this large corolla Wushen used a small jade crown, like a 
small terrace, the two jumped on the jade crown, finally had a foothold in 
the foot, more stable than standing on the shoulder of the statue. The 
breath was still not loose, and the mountain monster came again, hitting 
the megalithic statue and stepping back a few steps. Fortunately, this time, 
the pity was precautionary and was not pushed down, but the foot 
accidentally stepped on a string of houses, thanking I couldn't help but feel 
a heartache, and my heart was guilty of sin. Manipulating the gods and 
squatting away from the house, thanked and said: "Why are they chasing 
me? What have I done?" 


Huacheng Road: "It's not chasing your brother, they are chasing and 
playing, and your brother looks like you are particularly eye-catching." 


Thanks to pity: "This big one is quite eye-catching..." 


The voice did not fall, and the three mountain monsters were attacked 
together, surrounded by the megalithic statue, and constantly pressed to 
the middle, as if trying to crush it. That **** can't move, thank you for not 
moving, and force it to push it, but it doesn't move, I am afraid it is 
powerless! 


He is thinking about whether there is any other way to get out, 
inadvertently taking a step back and leaning on a chest. In a moment, 
Huacheng supported his shoulders and said: "Let go and fight! No 
problem, they are not your opponents. There is nothing in this world that 
can stop you!" 


His chest seems to be the most solid backing. Suddenly, thankful and 
determined to be confident, the whole body is filled with a clear stream, 
and struggling to strike - finally broke through the encirclement! 


The bangs banged, and the three mountain monsters were launched by him 
nearly a mile, flying sand and smoke. However, they are retracing and will 
be attacking again. Thankful hands changed five or six French seals in a 
flash, saying: "No, want, block, me, road!" 


The statue of the megalith rises up, and the feet are on the top of the two 
mountain monsters. At the same time, put the hand on the hilt of the sabre 
on the waist - pull the sword! 


This series of movements are like flowing water, and the megalithic 
statues are extremely smooth, like Changhong, and there is no stagnation 
at all. It is completely different from real people. With a bang, thank you 
and said: "I am oh... I will wait for a while?" 


He is ready to make a gorgeous sword, and the mountain is broken, and it 
is not right. As soon as I look at the top, I am ashamed. The megalithic 
statue 1s indeed a sword, but... is there a sword in its hand? ? ? 


What about the blade? ? ? 


Thanks for the pity, the flower city is on the side, the second finger is 
against the forehead, saying: "... brother. Sorry, I forgot to tell you that the 


sword of this statue, I did not carved it together. My mistakes. 


of course! Huacheng is a mountain statue in the copper furnace. The 
megalithic statues are layered on top of each other. The waist sabre is 
covered under the sleeves and not exposed. Therefore, only one hilt is 
carved. After the idol is injected into the mana and moved, because there 
is no special carving of the blade, it is naturally impossible to change the 
blade from the air. 


Huacheng slightly frowns, looks dignified: "The miscalculation. Still not 
fine enough, next time I will carved every detail." 


"..."" Xie Pity feels that he is serious, busy, "No, no, it is very fine. Really!" 


In short, without a blade, there is no way to break the mountain. So, pity 
immediately changed the strategy - run away! 


He quickly manipulated the statue of the megalith and jumped from the 
top of the two mountain monsters, throwing the stone handle with no use 
and throwing it away. The two stood on top of the jade crown at the top of 
the idol, and the wind screamed in the face, and the black and white 
smocked red sleeves flew. Even if they were running away, the picture was 
not beautiful. A silver butterfly flew to the ear of Xie, and there were 
several voices inside. He quickly grabbed it and said: "Where 1s the wind 
and the love? Is there a rainman and a general?" 


Sure enough, there was a familiar voice from the silver butterfly. He said: 
"I said, Your Royal Highness, you don't have to be so loud when you ask a 
question." 


Thanks, "Oh, sorry, I have too much mana now, I control it." 


" " 


The voice of love also came: "What? You said that you have too much 
mana? You?" 


Thanks to pity: "How many of you have joined together? Is it now?" 


Mu Qing said: "We have merged with General Sui and General Xiao Xiao, 
and now everyone is in the forest near the Wuyong River, ready to go out 
together." 


The voice of the wind said: "What happened to you? Just like the copper 
furnace, there was a strong change! Would you like us to go back and 
help?" 


Thank you for your help: "No! You will stay there, we will pick you up, 
meet and say! Ah, we are here!" 


The front is the dry Wuyong River. The megalithic statue crosses the gully 
and squats down the dense forest. It is just right, thank you for seeing the 
wind and the feelings of the love from the forest, looking around, seems to 
be looking for someone. But they looked in the wrong direction, and they 
just didn't expect to look up, so they didn't expect to see the pity and the 
flower city. Fengxin is facing the silver butterfly road: "You haven't come 
under Your Highness? Where are you?" 


Xie pity hands close to his mouth, shouting directly below: "I have come, 
above, look above, above your head!" 


The two men discovered that they were all shrouded in a huge shadow and 
slowly looked up. 


So, they also saw a huge "thank you", lying on the edge of the forest, 
looking down at them. On the face, I also had a very kind and kind smile. 


Huacheng was too lazy to look at the two people below, holding his arms 
and standing on one side, looking lazy. Xie pity rushed below and said: "Is 
it? Here!" 


However, because the visual impact of this giant "thank you" 1s too great, 
it is really difficult to notice something else when you first see it. The 


whole sight of the love has been completely occupied by this face, 
muttering: "...1 am afraid not crazy..." 


Fengxin’s eyes are all this face, muttering: “...?’m fucking, I’m fucking, 
I’m really fucking, what the **** is this?” 


Thank you: "Hey..." 


Huacheng raised his eyebrows and seemed to be restrained before he 
laughed. To be honest, no one has ever seen such a vivid statue of such a 
large, still carved statue. The biggest statue before it was Junwu, but it was 
only half of this megalithic statue... 


The wind and the feelings were too shocking, causing the pity to call out 
several times before he noticed where the deity was. Others have also 
come out of the forest one after another. As soon as they look up, they are 
almost all scared by this giant statue and twisted their necks. Thanks for 
the pity and tears, let the giant **** put his hand on the ground and spread 
his palm. He said: "The copper volcano erupted. I was afraid that the fire 
would be burned here, and there were three mountain monsters who didn't 
know when to catch up. Come up, I will take you away!" 


Everyone climbed up the hand of the gods and found their place. Xie pity 
smelled the sulphur smell in the air in the crown. Looking back, the black 
smoke and fly ash were spreading rapidly. He took the palm of the giant 
statue and started to make strides. 


After he was shocked, he was still fine. The wind and the feelings have 
never returned to God. Probably because of the face, demeanor, and figure 
of the lord statue, they are all too familiar, so the impact 1s extraordinarily 
large after zooming in so many times. The wind letter has stood on the 
shoulder of this idol. It is still unbelievable: "Who did this? Who carved 
it? Why have I never seen this thing? Have you heard of it?" 


Huacheng smirked: "There are too many things you haven't seen before." 


Although no one has said it, almost everyone, especially the guise and 
admiration, has locked the answer: 


This is what this person does! 


Admire the feeling: "I can't believe it... How do you make it move? How 
much mana do you have to do? Are you enough? Are you not completely 
powerless?" 


This time, Huacheng did not answer, thanked him for looking at him, his 
fist against his mouth, vaguely saying: "Hey, this is..." 


Ruan said: "Nothing can be borrowed. Is it simple?" 
"Hahaha, yeah..." 


The devils and ghosts along the way saw the magma pouring, the raging 
fire, and realized that the big things were not good. Seeing many people 
climbing on the megalithic statue, busy saying: "Also wait for me!" 


"T, I, I, I will come!" 
"Let's meet us!" 


Huacheng said: "Go down." A wave of silver butterflies flew out, the cold 
light, a ghost crying. The jade is holding the slumber of the slumber, and 
said: "The lord! Your Royal Highness! The squad and the corpse rat 
suddenly violently|moved, and the squadrons flowed, as if they were going 
to rush outside the Copper Mountain. !" 


The rainman rode the black cow and stared at the sky. He said: "The things 
in the black cloud seem to want to fly out." 


This is true. The things that are struggling in the dark clouds are all 
grievances. They are eager for fresh living people to come and become 
human face plagues. There are no living people in the Tonglu Mountain. 
They are not demon ghosts or gods who cannot invade them. They 
naturally want to fly out. Thousands of twisted faces dragged long black 
smoke tails, like a deformed snake worm hovering in the sky. The hand of 
thankfulness shivered slightly, but still said: "The copper furnace is 


bounded, the outside can't come in, and the inside can't go out. Those 
grievances should not fly out temporarily..." 


Who knows, the voice has not fallen, Huacheng suddenly grabbed his 
hand. The heart of thankfulness was also tight, and he grabbed him and 
said: "What? Is it too much for me? Sorry, I really saved it." 


Huacheng squinted his right eye and said: "No. Brother, you don't have to 
worry about this. It is the boundary of Tonglushan." 


Thank you for your pity: "What? Broken?" He just said that there is no 
need to worry about bounds. Do you want this? ? ? 


Huacheng Road: "Broken. I am afraid that it is open to nothing. Those 
things have to fly out." 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 202: Four 
Wushen Shenjian is in charge 


If it is really for these grievances to fly out, isn’t it going to break out of 
the third human epidemic? 


Xie pity immediately said: "I have to find a way to stop!" 


The black hair of the black hair in the lower shoulders was blown up and 
messed up. "Can there be any way to stop?" 


The megalithic statue stopped in the footsteps and stirred up the dust, 
thanking the pity: "You will hold your breath first!" 


After that, the smoky fly ash that was pressing hard was chased up. The 
statue of the megalith is a palm, and the palm of the hand 1s earth- 
shattering. If it is on the ground, it is a hurricane that can uproot the 
century-old tree. However, after all, part of it was broken up, and part of it 
was scraped away. Xie pity couldn’t help but say: "If there is a sword, it 
will be fine!" 


Huacheng seemed to see through what he was thinking, saying: "Brother, it 
is not impossible to have a sword." 


Thanks for the joy: "What is the solution?" 


Huacheng Road: "Then it depends on the following few of your fairy tales 
are happy." 


Wind channel: "If you have a way to say it, don't tell him something." 


Thank you for your pity, and said: "You mean, let the generals join forces 
to make a sword?" 


Huacheng Road: "Yes. The power of the gods in the Tonglu Mountain is 
limited, but there are several martial arts here. If there are four people who 


have the body and fight together, they should be weak." 
The first response, said: "Zou feels that this idea 1s feasible." 


The feelings are still doubtful: "Is this really feasible? There are several 
martial arts here? Three?" The shacks and the jade manpower are lost, the 


rain sergeant is not the martial arts, but the top is also the , the wind 
letter Love. Ruan said: "No, it's four. Qi Ying is here too." 


"what?" 


The jade was hesitant for a moment, holding a millet in one hand and a 
tumbler in the other. Who knows that the seal has not been unlocked, the 
tumbler is shaking wildly, and there is a screaming scream. Everyone was 
called by his ears and it was a stinging pain. They all screamed and 
slammed the jade and quickly re-closed it. They turned over another 
tumbler and said: "Sorry to take the wrong one. Just that is the green 
ghost. This is the only thing." Yes." He said that the tumbler was thrown 
into the air and burst into a burst of red smoke. A teenager’s figure 
appeared in the smoke and fell down. 


The statue of the megalith raised his hand, and the boy turned over and 
settled on the palm of his hand. He scratched a curl of blood that was 
lumpy, looked up, and saw a bunch of people, suddenly. The jade has been 
secretly hiding behind others, but it was discovered by the right, and 
jumped out and shouted: "Brother!" 


Right one really rushed up in an instant, and when he saw him, he had a 
headache. Maybe he would rather listen to the screaming for three days 
and three nights and didn't want to say a word with Quan Yizhen. 
Fortunately, I grabbed the right to take it, and said: "Come and come, work 
for Qi Ying. Finish the work and revisit the old!" 


Right one is inexplicable, and he has a lot of opinions on , 1t seems 
that he wanted to make a punch, but when he looked up, he saw the pity on 


the top, and his hands clasped him with sincerity: "Working hard, Qiying. 


Although he was completely confused, he scratched his head and joined. If 
you want to be a sword of other Valkyrie, he doesn't have no opinions at 
all, but he has four people together, and he can't say that he suddenly has a 
hand and doesn't talk. Thus, in the palm of the hand, the four people 


arranged arrays in the order of , Fengxin, right and truth. 


Huacheng elbows stayed on the edge of Yuguantai and glanced at it: "Is the 
order of the last two people reversed?" 


It is reasonable to say that it should be a more reasonable order of 
jealousy, morality, empathy and right. Because the relative power of the 
right is not stable, if it is in the middle of the sword array, it may be 
"broken" in the middle. Xie pity but wiped a sweat, said: "No, no. The two 
people of wind and love are absolutely not together, because the wave may 
start to swear, so the middle must be separated. other people." 


Wen Yan, Huacheng picked up an eyebrow, and that look seems to ask 
them to kill each other best. Looking down again, the four people gave off 
a glimmer of light, getting stronger and stronger, stretching out, 
connecting together, and finally, turned into a sword of aura! 


When the sword is formed, the megalithic statue will throw it up, reach 
out and grasp it! 


Li Jian is in the hand, thank you for being a tiger, and the momentum is 
flourishing, and a sword is gone! 


The grievances who dragged the smoky tails were screamed by the sword 
and then stopped. Pursue by victory, thank you for the sword dance into a 
piece of madness, and the ghosts are divided, such as the wind and the 
clouds. The blade sweeps over, as if the sky fireworks blasted, it was 
beautiful. The demons and demons all looked at them, and when the jack- 
up boots of the megalithic statues stepped on, they only remembered to 


flee. It was awkward, and suddenly, the megalithic statue was awkward at 
the foot of the statue. It seemed to be stumbling again. Thanks for the 
patience and the support of the sword, and barely stabilized it. Several 
martial arts composing the sword array said: "What happened to His Royal 
Highness?" 


"And then fight! They are getting together again!" 


Thanks to the manipulation of this megalithic statue for so long, the 
sensation of fatigue, sweating, and the heart is also very tight, said: 
"Nothing! Just..." 


Only the mana was burned out! 


He turned his head sharply, and the flower city stood behind him, 
seemingly reaching out to him. So, thank you for going out. 


He rushed to hold the face of Huacheng with his hands, slightly raised his 
toes, and put his lips on his eyes with his eyes closed. 


13019, 6 bt haere 


Admiration: "............. 
Right one true: "?" 
Hey: "Oh." 


Holding the face of Huacheng is not enough. Anyway, it is like this. 
Thanks for the pity, I just want to **** more at once, so my arms are 
tightly wrapped around his neck and kissed deeper. The tiredness of the 
genius was swept away, and all of them were full of spiritual power. And 
there was a mess of screams in the great sword of the light that was held in 
the hand by the megalithic statue. Fengxin was shocked: "What is this 
doing? What are you doing? Your Highness?" 


Xie pity accidentally stunned, this is separate, do not dare to look down, 
shouted to the sky: "borrow, borrow mana! Just borrowing mana! Very 
legitimate!" 


Mourning feelings also shocked: "By the use of mana, there is no need to 
do this. ah, you can swear by the clap?!" 


Xie pity does not know what he is talking about, and arbitrarily said: "Ha 
ha ha ha! You are seen through! Actually not borrowing mana! 
Hahahaha..." 


Seeing him like this, Huacheng also laughed happily, holding the face of 
thankfulness in both hands, bowed his head and kissed him on the 
forehead, softly said: "Don't be nervous, brother." 


It is strange to say that after this, thankfulness 1s suddenly normal. He 
pretended not to hear the voice of the wind and the feelings of love, a look 
of awe, and coincided with the fingerprints. The megalithic statue pulled 
up the sword of the Spirit of Light from the ground, slashing and slashing, 
as if there was a lot of energy! 


Quan Yizhen suddenly admire: "It turned out that I was really borrowing 
mana! It suddenly became stronger." 


The feelings can't help but say: "It's a dog, you know..." Then I thought 
about this kind of thing without teaching the big child like this one in 
detail, and it was hard to change. "Yes, yes, that is Borrowing mana." 


Hey, hahaha: "It's right, but you can't just know it, you know." 
Fengxin: "What are you talking about? Are you really convinced?" 


However, although the power has increased, but those grievances have 
been overwhelming, and there is no one to cover them all. Seeing this 
giant god, they have turned around and fled, squatting in the air and 
swimming to the distance, as if huge. People face each other. Thanks for 
your pity: "Chasing!" 


Who knows, after chasing a few steps, the megalithic statue suddenly 
disappeared without warning, and fell to the side! 


It is only clear that he has already taken in ample mana, and the pity is in 
excellent condition. There is no reason to suddenly do this. When he is not 
leaning, he will pray and look down. This shows that there is actually more 
on one leg of this statue. The big hole, the broken rock is rolling down 
from the hole. A white figure flutters from it, and it settles down, and then 
disappears. When the gods are gone, there is no trace. It is nothing to be 
white. 


He actually broke the leg of this statue by hand! 


The statue of the megalith crashed down. Fortunately, everyone who was 
riding on the stone statue was not a mundane generation. The reaction was 
extremely fast, and it jumped first and landed safely. 


Xie Pity and Huacheng jumped on the chest of the gods. Xie pity tried to 
call it up, but it was extremely difficult. The megalithic statue squatted on 
the ground, slowly struggling, and looked quite awkward. In the sword 
array, he said: "How? Can you stand up?" 


Quan Yizhen said: "Is there no mana? Do you want to borrow again?" 


Ruan said: "No. This is not a question of mana. You must not remember 
this again, and forget about it." 


Thanks to the pity: "I am afraid that the injury is a bit serious... it 1s not 
necessary to move again." 


Although the stone 1s not painful, if you force it to get up and continue to 
attack, I am afraid that this injured leg will fall down. Not only is the 
attack power greatly reduced, this is, after all, a masterpiece of Huacheng's 
most dedication, and also a favorite statue of Xie Pity. If it is really 
destroyed, it is inevitable. Seeing the enemy fall, the grievances in the air 
are ecstatic and danced, and they are flying around. Is it necessary to 
watch them sneak out like this? 


He looked to the side, the flower city looked angry, it was the anger of the 
dialogue, and for a moment, he said: "Brother..." 


At this time, in the dense black cloud, there was a dazzling white light. It 
seemed that something was lit up above the clouds. 


Then, the second, third, fourth... 


Numerous dazzling white light punctures, piercing the dark clouds and 
piercing the grievances! 


This is so strong that it almost flashes the white light of the human eye, 
and all the priests are no strangers. The entire Xianjing, almost all the 


time, was filled with such aura. 


Jun Wu is here! 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 203: Bai 
Dijun's Judgment 


The powerful spirit shines on the grievances, and a large piece of smoke 
disappears. A white armor is holding the sword and breaking the clouds! 


It really is Junwu. Everyone seems to have seen the reborn parents, and 
they shouted: "Ah! Emperor!" It was almost tears. Jun Wu walked in the 
wind and walked down, saying: "Don't panic, don't panic. You are all 
right?" 


In the Lingguang Jujian sword array, four people quickly dismantled and 
turned back to themselves. Ruan said: "You are not guarding Xianjing? 
How come in person?" 


Jun Wudao: "The rain teacher told the spirit that the Tonglushan boundary 
was broken and the situation was critical. I came here." 


Everyone looked back and the rainman was riding on the black cow. Since 
the boundary is broken, I think it can be used. Only when they were in the 
blood of their brains, they all thought that they had to fight down these 
flying things, and almost no one could think of going to psychic. Thanks 
for taking a step forward, said: "The emperor is white and nothing. He is 
back." 


Jun Wu slightly nodded and said: "I guess he will not sneak." 


Thanks to pity: "He is a ghost. When you come, he doesn't know where to 
go." 


Junwu said: "No problem. Dispose of those grievances first, then go to 
him." 


Everyone looked up at the sky, and the dark clouds in the air rolled and 
rolled, and the glare that was brought down by Junwu was purified. Ruan 
said: "So this time the ghost king was born is stopped?" 


Thanks to pity: "Okay, after all, it is not anyone who breaks through the 
copper furnace, but this one." 


The eyes of the people looked side by side. After the blessings were not 
manipulated, the statue of the megalith was still on the ground, a 
beautifully carved behemoth, and fell down like a hill. Xie pity stood 
close, raised his hand and touched his cheek and turned to Huacheng: 
"Sanlang, what should it do?" 


Huacheng seems to be thinking about it. He listened to him and asked him 
to come back. He said: "Brothers have to worry. Just fix it before you fix 
it." 


Thanks to the pity: "Can you fix it?" 


Huacheng Road: "Of course, as long as there is a rough stone of copper 
furnace. I will fix it and let it stand up again." 


Thanks for the pity: "That is still the first to let go. Now the volcano is 
still erupting on the copper stove, I don't know when it will be safe." 


At this time, the wraiths hovering in the air suddenly screamed into a 
tornado and rushed to one place. Everyone did not know what changed, 
and fixed their eyes and saw that there was actually the underground 
temple of Wuyong. 


Originally, these things have nowhere to be avoided under strong light. 
Sooner or later, they will disappear. However, after a large number of 
grievances poured into the underground temple, it is like being sucked out 
and disappearing. Enthusiasm: "What happened?" 


Thanks for your poor feelings, said: "It is nothing to be white! He has 
shrunk thousands of miles there and sent these grievances away!" 


When Jun Wu waved his hand, he smashed the top of the temple and even 
picked up a large piece of land. However, there is nothing but a big one 
that has just been painted. Wind channel: "What does he want?" 


"Where did he set up the line? Where did he go?!" 


If in the past, this time the spirit will be on. If you don’t have a half- 
column, you will be reported to the place. However, I don’t know which 
kind of gods are in the temporary replacement. In this section, I can’t find 
anyone, and I’m so angry: “Mom, usually Blowing yourself to blow the 
sky and screaming for the face to ask for performance, now where should 
the performance go?! I will not say that the Lingwen Hall is inefficient 
again!" 


At this time, the voice of Huacheng passed over: "In the Imperial City." 


Everyone turned to him, just as Huacheng moved two slender fingers from 
the temple and said: "He sent those things to the seven or eight different 
cities. Now I only found one imperial city, because there is a sudden evil. 
The sky has skyrocketed." 


... The gods of Xianjing are not used, but they still have to rely on the 
heads of the ghosts to help them determine the position of the hooligans. 
There are several sacred officials who are indifferent to the face. But the 
situation is critical, and the feeling of shame is fleeting. Admire the 
feelings: "What is the idea of a white-clothing catastrophe is clear, and it 
is specially sent to places where there are many people. Once the human 
face epidemic breaks out, it will be extremely fast. The Imperial City has 
the largest population and the most dense, and certainly will not let go. ” 


Yan also said: "Hurry up and deal with it, there is no time to delay, 
otherwise the consequences will be unimaginable." 


Jun Wu also had a headache for the replacement of the Lingwen Temple, 
and turned to Huacheng: "Can you explore the detailed location of other 
cities?" 


Huacheng Road: "Now it is being verified. It will not take long. Lead the 
jade, you pick it up." 


Leading jade is busy: "Yes." 


He was originally slain by Jun Wu. Although Jun Wu was only a business 
official, he still couldn’t help but see Jun Wu, and the subordinates of the 
ghost city had a psychic moment. This carefully reported the specific 
position: “South Three hundred miles, two hundred and seventy miles in 
the north..." 


Junwu on the wind channel: "Nanyang, you go to the south." 


The wind letter did not immediately respond, but hesitated for a moment. 
Xie pity guessed that he was looking for the mother of the swordsman, just 
want to speak, but the wind letter responded, and he went to the side to 


paint. consciously said: "I am going north?" 
Jun Wudao: "Nature is what you go." 


Nodded a little, turned and walked a few steps, and then went up, so he 
turned back and said: "You are not hurt, the poison is not clear, or first 
follow the Rain Master." 


I am wondering: "General, I am not, medium, poison?" 


He patted his shoulder with pity, saying: "The sentence is not good until 
now, and it is said that it is not poisoned?" After that, he slightly bowed his 
head and compared it with the rain teacher. He went on his own. Jun Wu 
said: "Qiying goes to the west. Remember not to mess..." 


Right is really doubtful: "What are you going to the west? What are you 
doing now?" 


Nor can you blame him for not understanding what happened. It is 
estimated that he is inexplicable on the road: Why is it being beaten? Why 
are you buried in the wall? Why is it turned into a tumbler? Why do you 
have to become a giant sword? There is no moment to figure out the 
situation. Upon seeing it, Yin Yu sighed and said: "I will take him there. I 
will say it on the road." It is estimated that no one else has the patience to 
tell him what is going on. Quan Yizhen said: "Oh!" 


After waiting for a long time, he did not wait for him. He couldn’t help but 
say: "Imperial, what about me?" 


Jun Wu looked at him and said: "Xuan Zhen, have you forgotten one 
thing." 


Doubtful doubts: "What is it?" 


Jun Wudao: "You are still in confinement." 


" " 


The face of love is suddenly green. He really forgot about this. And not 
only him, almost everyone forgot, the feelings of escaping from the 
sorcerer with the sorcerer to create a fetal spirit escaped from the Jingjing, 
this matter he suspected has not been cleaned up! 


Jun Wudao: "You don't have to, go back to Xianjing later, and lengthen the 
confinement." 


Admiration: "...Imperial, really not me!" 


Junwu said: "Things are found out, the water will fall out of stone, and 
naturally will let you out. Otherwise, you will let you go out and go, how 
to become a system." 


I was so unwilling, but I couldn’t help but whispered: "Yes." 


Seeing the feelings of grievances, Huacheng laughed out without 
hesitation. Look at him with a look of affection, then look at the pity next 
to him, I don’t know what I thought of, my face is getting more and more 
beautiful. 


The rest of the people, the rain teacher is not a **** of martial arts, nor 
reluctant, saying that if necessary, you can sing aloud, then silently retired. 
Xie pity is naturally the most imposing and most difficult task. And Jun 
Wu stayed, dealing with the three mountain monsters, and probably still in 
the vicinity of the white phase. Huacheng’s nephew was thrown away, and 
he shrank a thousand miles. Xie pity walked with him. 


The Imperial City is late at night, and the streets are quiet and silent, and 
every household closes the door. Xie Li and Hua Cheng flashed from an 
alley, walking on the side of the road, while searching for traces of non- 
human things. After a few steps, thank you and take two fingers, arrived at 
the temple, launched a psychic, whispered: "Imperial?" 


Jun Wudao: "What happened to Xianle? Did you arrive at the Imperial 
City?" 


Thanks, "We have arrived. I have something to say to you." 
Jun Wudao: "How is your blood rain flower?" 


" " 


Huacheng seems to be aware of what, picking an eyebrow, and praying: 
"No, he doesn't have any problem with me. It's something else, the 
situation has not been able to talk about the crisis." He caught his look and 
said, "Emperor, you are against me." Master, is there still an impression?" 


Listening to him mentioning this person, Jun Wu seems to be slightly 
surprised, must be embarrassed, said: "You mean the original Xianle 
Guoshi?" 


Thanks: "Yes. In the past, you should have a lot of contact with him? Have 
you found anything strange about him?" 


The ceremonies and rituals of the Xianle Kingdom are all handled by the 
national teacher. The national teachers are the bridge connecting the gods 
to the gods. Silence for a moment, Jun Wu said: "Yes." 


Xie pity held his breath and said: "...What is weird?" 
Jun Wu said: "Xianle, do you really want to listen?" 
Thanks for your pity: "Yes." 


Jun Wudao: "Even if you listen to you, you will be disappointed?" 


Thanks for seeing Huacheng, said: "Yes." 


For a long time, Jun Wu slowly said: "Your master, who is a teacher of 
Xianle, is a talented person. His knowledge and skills are far beyond your 
imagination." 


Thank you for listening quietly. The next sentence will let him sink his 
heart. 


Jun Wudao: "I think that the real year and month that the national teacher 
spent in this world may not be lower than me or even higher than me." 


" " 
His guess was confirmed a part. 


If the national teacher is really alive in the world longer than Jun Wu, then 
he is one of the four guardians of the Uyghur Prince. 


Thanks for your pity: "Why have you never said this to me before?" 
Jun Wudao: "Because I have been uncertain for a long time." 
Thanks to the pity: "How was it later determined?" 


Jun Wudao: "After Xianle destroyed the country, I found him and started. 
Now it seems that he finally escaped." 


In addition to the white phase, there are other people who can escape from 
Junwu. Xie pity always thought that the national teacher had escaped 


because of the war. I didn’t expect it to be the hand that Junwu personally 
moved! 


Thanks to the pity: "That... why did you want to do it to him? Why did you 
tell me after confirming?" 


Jun Wudao: "You are actually a problem." 


Thanks: "What?" 


Jun Wudao: "I said, maybe I will be disappointed. But maybe you, even if 
you are disappointed with others, can hold on." 


Thanks to the heartbeat, the heart beat more and more, and I couldn’t help 
but grasp the hand of Huacheng. The other hand of Huacheng also covered 
his back. 


Over there, Jun Wu said: "Because I found out that he seems to want to 
wake up something from you." 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 204: Looking 
for five hundred people to visit their old friends 


Thanks: What is it? " 


Junwu seems to have some concerns. After considering it for a while, he 
said: "What happened to Xianle, why did you suddenly ask your master? 
What did you encounter at Tongluoshan? Is it related to him?" 


Thanks to pity, I am going to talk about it, and I have to explain it briefly. I 
heard a lot of noise coming from there. Junwu said: "I saw the three 
mountain monsters you said, and they are really surprised! I will deal with 
them first, then Talk about it. However, since Xianle asks you, remember 
one thing: Your Master is not a simple character. If you really meet him, 
be careful!" 


After that, the other side fell into silence, thanking the pity: "Imperial?" 


Junwu did not respond again. It’s hard to deal with the mountain monsters. 
The three blocks are even more difficult. Before you can’t solve the useful 
mana and manipulate a giant statue, you can’t solve it. I’m afraid that I 
need some energy. The flower city simply said the psychic content, the two 
stopped. 


At this moment, they are in a wide and open street, looking to the sky, the 
clouds cover the moon, faintly can see a glimmer of black smoke floating 
in front of the cold moon, as if in the clear water of the dark color. 


Those are the grievances who have been passed down from the Wuyong 
Temple by the White. They have not yet come in, because the atmosphere 
of the emperor in the palace and the palaces and temples of the gods in the 
imperial city complement each other, forming a majestic atmosphere. A 
natural layer of enchantment will block such a large number of evils 
outside the gas field, so they can only wander above the high heavens. 


Almost every city has a similar gas field, because there are a few 
unacceptable characters in the place, the great priests, the so-called 
outstanding people. However, it is impossible to stop it forever. Huacheng 
Road: "Just reinforce this layer." 


However, the question is how to strengthen it? Thanks to the pity: "Fell? 
Magic weapon?" With the words, "I am afraid not." 


This is the grievance that covers the entire Imperial City. Unless you find 
thousands of spells and magic weapons, you may not be able to live. 
Walking around, thanking me for a bite, said: "Sanlang, I have a way, 
maybe I can strengthen this layer, but... I need people." 


Huacheng Road: "How much?" 
Thanks: "A lot. The more the better, at least five hundred." 
Huacheng Road: "Death live?" 


He listened seriously, not joking. Thanks to pity: "Living people. Ghosts 
can't do it. I need to take the yang and the spirit of the living to repel those 
grievances." 


Huacheng Road: "If this is the case, it means that it has to be voluntary." 


Thanks: "Yes. It must be voluntary, and it has the spirit of counterattack 
and defending. If you are worried or lack of energy, you may be 
squandered." 


Huacheng slightly decapitated, said: "As the soldiers on the battlefield, 
they must be the ones who want to win the most. If they are forced to help 
or escape, without morale, they will never win. Lose your helmet and 
abandon your armor. 


Thanks to pity: "This is the truth. Can Saburo find it?" 


Thinking for a moment, Huacheng slowly said: "Brother, if you are going 
to die, I can find it for you. It is easy to live involuntarily. But it 1s not 
easy to be voluntary." 


After a pause, he went on to say: "Many people in the world do worship 
the ghost king, but I know that they are afraid of me, and second, they are 
asking for me, so I am afraid that I will serve me. I can coerce. I am 
tempted, but this method, I am afraid I can't find the kind of person your 
brother needs. Sorry." 


Thank you for your kindness, saying: "You don't have to apologize. Let's 
find a way to find it." 


Huacheng Road: "Well. But my brother, there is good news. There are a 
group of living people at the corner of the fifty steps." 


Xie pity also felt it. I rushed forward to see it. There was also a group of 
people on the opposite side who wanted to turn around. He suddenly yelled 
and shouted: "Ghost!" 


Thanks for looking at it, recognizing people, and saying: "You are not 
ghosts, it is me!" 


The group of people swear by the customs and the customs are very 
familiar, and the head of the Hua Yi Dao, is not the eyes open? The big 
bunch behind, isn’t it the group of wizards who had been entangled in the 
two roads before, and the black-hearted shop opened in the barren hills 
was stunned by the roof? 


After praying for the pity, Huacheng took the hand down. He is not a child 
in the present, casually, smiles, scares the eyes and waits for people to 
retreat three feet: "It is not a ghost! It is a ghost is a ghost! Or a ghost 
king!!!" 


Huacheng smirked and snorted impatiently, even lazy. Thankfulness is now 
looking for people everywhere, and quickly raised his hand: "You, come 
right, there is something..." 


Unexpectedly, he raised his hand and the opposite reaction was 
exaggerated several times more than he had imagined. He was arrogant 
and wary, and said: "Beware of the hidden weapon!" 


Thank you for thinking for a while before I think about what the so-called 
"concealed weapon" ts, silent for a moment, saying: "You don't have to be 
afraid, I don't have a hidden weapon on it." Ice Qing Yu Jie Pill is not so 
easy to make, just the knife must be fine It took a long time to sculpt. He 
said again: "And last time you made us like that, we didn't take you 
anymore, now we don't need it anymore." 


Hearing the words, everyone thought, it was the reason, and they quickly 
got up from the ground. They patted the dust and finished the clothes, but 
they still kept the distance, and they did not put down the swords such as 
the sword and the sword. Tianyan said: "I said that this road 1s long. I 
haven't seen you for many days. The ghosts on your body are more serious. 
I think you will return to the shore as soon as possible. Why is it so heavy? 
Is it not you, I have to look down? Clear your face." 


"..." Thanks to the pity, I just wanted to blush, I didn't dare to look at the 
flower city, and interrupted. "I will talk about it later. You, I watched the 
sky at night and saw some bad things. Have you seen it?" 


The sky is clear: "Of course I saw it! The night view is the homework we 
must do every day. I am still telling what monsters are doing ghosts, 1s it a 
flower city... Lord?" 


Thanks to pity: "Nature 1s not, otherwise it will not remind you. We are 
also coming for those things, and we are trying to strengthen the 
atmosphere of the Imperial City." 

The sky is open to question: "You? Think of a way?" 


"Ghost king will be so kind?" 


Huacheng Wan, said: "It is not good, but if I want to do something in the 
Imperial City, this layer of gas can not stop me." 


The Master's look is unpredictable. Xie Li knows that the alert is not so 
easy to eliminate, nor reluctant, said: "I have dealt with the things in the 


sky, it is very tricky. If you let them break through the protection of the 
Imperial City, it will be chaotic, so now I am looking for someone to help. 
It takes five hundred people to defend against it." 


The sky is open and screaming: "Five hundred people?! What kind of 
battle are you, there are so many people! I have never heard of it?" 


Xie Pity is not very embarrassed to say that 500 people are the minimum 
requirements. In fact, if he wants to let go, he is afraid that there will be 
800 people. A group of masters also said with a sigh of relief: "I have 
never heard of it. Which book has you seen in any book?" "Is those things 
so powerful?" "I only heard that the goblins eat a bite." Hundreds, I have 
never heard of setting up so many people." "Is it dangerous?" 


After careful consideration, thank you for being honest: "I can't say it. 
There may be, maybe not. Only seven or eight percent is grasped. Because, 
I have never tried this formation." 


It is impossible to find the records of the predecessors, because this 
method is not for the sake of reading from the book or from whom, but for 
more than 800 years, he kept thinking and thinking while walking. What if 
you do one day when the epidemic will break out, can you just sit still? 
Think of it like this. At that time, he did not really feel that he would face 
this big crisis again in the future. I did not expect it to come in handy. 


A group of people over there had been discussing for a long time. Finally, 
the eyes turned and cautiously said: "We can't make up so many people. 
And..." 


Moreover, they do not trust Xie and Huacheng. 


This is also a helpless thing. After all, they don’t know what a human face 
is, how powerful it 1s, and in the past, Huacheng and their grievances have 
made it a lot to play them as bugs. Xie Li originally thought that these 
people were all masters. They should have their own sects and disciples. 
Maybe they could add up to three or four hundred people, and the rest 
would think of ways, but it seems that hope is lost. 


Huacheng Road: "Brothers don't have to talk nonsense with them. Let's 
go." 


Cheer nodded, not discouraged, and went with him. However, the eyes 
open and others have not left, but the ghosts are behind them, and they 
think they are well. Xie pity is very speechless, but I think that this group 
of mages is probably afraid that they will follow the evil city. It is also 
kind and funny. No matter what. At this time, Huacheng proposed: "If you 
go to the gathering place of the poor, there is no shortage of people who 
are desperate and daring, and you may gain something." 


So the two turned to the darkness of the Imperial City. Going to a temple 
that had been demolished and ruined, he glanced at the temple, and he 
slept in the temple and slept outside the temple. This seems to be a group 
of tramps, or swearing. Frozen in the cold, almost a ragged, both men and 
women, and do not shun. Some occupy a straw mat, some hold straw to 
warm, and some simply sleep on the ground. Was not awake by the rotten 
sores on the body, but also the scorpion that peeled off himself on the 
body, and the individual dragged a lame leg to walk around the temple, 
seeming to give the patient a water bowl. If you didn't go in, it would be a 
sweaty smell and a strange sigh. It was suffocating. 


The most prosperous area and the most dirty and ruined slums are actually 
so close, almost one street apart, the two are relatively embarrassing, but 
thankful that there is no time at this moment. He stepped into the 
threshold and said, "Can you help me?" 


No one answered, just someone shouted: "Help your mother! I want people 
to help me! Let no one sleep, roll!" 


Xie pity is not angry, said: "It is very important thing, if you are willing to 
give a helping hand, be sure to be a good fortune!" 


He originally wanted to say that he would like to thank him. Xie is 
naturally thankful, but if he started to "reward", it is not pure. The crowds 
in the temple are even more fierce: "Benefit the people to shut me down!" 
Someone said: "Is there any compensation?" 


Xie pity looked back and saw the unpleasant light in the eyes of Huacheng. 
It seemed to be a bit embarrassing. He took him and whispered: "Don't go. 
Saburo, you can't do it. I will say it well. Seven or eighty people here can 
always find a few that can be used." 


The light in the eyes of Huacheng is so concentrated. At this time, a 
micro-sand voice said: "Hey, hello! Everyone listens to me! Listen to me! 
Don't make a noise! Let him talk about what it 1s!" 


Xie Li heard the words and turned back. I saw that the squatting legs were 
sloppy, thin and thin, and I couldn’t see what it was, but the sound seemed 
quite young. He greeted everyone in the temple, but the strange thing was 
that only one hand was placed, so the posture was a bit awkward. The 
crowds seem to listen to him quite a bit, and the voice is weak. Thanks to 
pity: "Thank you!" No nonsense, the backhand is a palm of the heart, and 
the old high, scared the crowds of horror, and woke up without awakening, 
said: "What kind of magic?! ” 


Thanks for the righteousness: "It’s not a magic, it’s a fairy, it proves that 
what I say is non-virtual. It’s not like this. It’s like this. Now there are a lot 
of demons and ghosts that surround the Imperial City and will attack 
immediately. Now it takes 500 people. Voluntarily join the squad to 
protect the Imperial City. Who is willing to come? I don't hide, I may be in 
danger, but I am not reluctant, just volunteer!" 


In the temple, there was a silence. The public face each other, but no one 
stood up and said that I volunteered. A long while, one person: "Guarding 
the Imperial City? Forget it." 


Thanks for turning around, the man fell down and said to himself: "The 
Imperial City does not protect me, hey, I still guard the Imperial City? 
How about how to love, shut my ass!" 


He was angry and angry with his tone. Xie pity is not incomprehensible, 
but it is not easy to do. Obviously, the temple is crowded with the poor 
people who are similar to this person, and his thoughts are similar. I didn’t 


say that I was paid. I didn’t see how good I was in the Imperial City. What 
are you going to do at this time? The big winter nest is cold in the temple. 
Who wants to go out? 


Thanks for trying to make the final effort, "If those things invade the 
Imperial City, there will be a terrible plague outbreak, and finally 
everyone will suffer." 


An old squat lying on the ground: "What plague can be more scary than 
my old sore on my body?" 


"If there is a plague, it will not be a big deal. It is not necessary to stay 
here, nor 1s it a good place. It is not the same where you go." 


"Then let the great old man and the big lady of the imperial city go. There 
will always be people who go, why do we want us to go?" 


"This..." There is no way to say thank you. Those big-faced grandfathers 
and big ladies will think so too: I don’t go up, naturally others will come. 
Moreover, because they have a foundation in the family business in the 
Imperial City, in the face of danger, more things can not be reluctant, this 
idea will be more intense. It’s not that thinking like this is wrong or bad. 
It’s just that if everyone thinks so, things can’t be done. 


After waiting for a while, no one came out, thanked the pity and said: 
"Okay. Excuse me." 


He turned and quit the temple, Huacheng Road: "Brother does not have to 
worry, there are people on the side of me. The news can always find 
enough." 


Thanks for your nod. He didn't worry about finding 500 people in the end, 
but he was worried that time was not enough. It would be 
counterproductive to catch people and look at the sky. The dark clouds are 
still obscured by the sky. 


At this moment, suddenly a sound came out behind him: "Wait! Wait! 
Wait! - Iam going!" 


Hearing words, thank you for a sigh, and suddenly turned back. I saw that 
the squatting leg dragged a leg and jumped out of the temple door. "You 
just want to find someone who just needs to live or how? If the hands and 
feet are broken, is it okay?" 


It turned out that this man’s movement looked awkward because he did not 
only have a leg, but also broke his arm and hanged softly and weakly. 


Seeing that someone finally came out, the heart of thankfulness was hot, 
and immediately said: "No problem at all!" 


That person is also very refreshing, said: "That's good! Come on me!" 


The temple was shocked: "You dry up? Didn't listen to him, it may be 
dangerous!" 


"Yes! And I still don't give money. I haven't mentioned the reward for a 
long time!" 


"Don't take this water, the old wind is coming back!" 


" " 


From the beginning, Xie Pity always felt that this person 1s very familiar 
with it. But because this appearance is too different from the one in his 
memory, and the sound is also slightly sandy, not quite the same, so it is 
not recognized. When he heard the other person screaming out the word 
"wind", he finally suddenly realized. 


Xie pity stared at him, incredulously said: "...the wind master?" 


The monk laughed and stretched out his hand to open his face and said: 
"You are recognized by you, Your Royal Highness!" 


Under the dirty black hair, a pair of extremely bright and bright scorpions, 
as clearly as ever. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 205: Looking 
for 500 people to visit their friends 2 


Thanks for being shocked and unable to speak. 


Shi Qingxuan grabbed his hair and said: "Oh, hahahahahaha, I originally 
wanted to disguise myself as another person, secretly observing you. I 
didn't expect your eyes to be very sharp! No way, it must be because of 
me. The style is still the same, it will be unforgettable! 
Hahahahahahaha..." 


'..."" Xie pity hands on his shoulders, Shen Sheng, "...the wind master." 


Shi Qingxuan didn't haha, but he still rubbed his hair and rubbed his hair, 
as if he felt that his hair was full of itch, saying: "His Royal Highness, I 
am not a wind teacher." 


Thanks for your pity: "Good. Qing Xuan." 
After a pause, he said: "How do you become like this?" 


Shi Qingxuan: "Hey, this is hard to say. In short, it is like this. Here, it will 
become like this." 


At this time, everyone in the temple said: "What? Old wind! Do you know 
these two?" 


Shi Qingxuan turned around and took a look at the shoulders of Xie's pity. 
He vigorously patted: "I know! This is my good friend, wow!" 


"What! Is it your friend? The old wind does not say it early!" 


"Old style, you are a virtue, actually know this little white face that is used 
to meticulous skin tender meat?! Blowing it, you!" 


The audience was fussed, it should have been funny, but thanking me was 
not a taste. You must know that among the three of them, only the original 


windshield was a real "small skin and tender skin, a small white face that 
was used to honey." Shi Qingxuan angered: "How do you say? I don't have 
a cowhide!" 


"Get it, when you were sick, you would say a few days all day, thinking 
that we all forgot!" 


Shi Qingxuan wow la la la shouted unclearly, and said: "I am going to help 
my friends now, and I am gone! Anyone is coming?" 


This time, everyone looked at each other, half awkwardly, saying: "Well, 
it’s a friend of the old wind, it’s not the same." 


"Go with the old wind, lest he lose his arms and legs, and kill people." 
Teacher Qingxuan: "Hey!" 


Others asked uncomfortably: "Is it really unpaid? Even if you don't give 
money, how many chicken legs can you do?" 


Xie Li and Shi Qingxuan briefly said a few words. Both sides understood 
the situation. Shi Qingxuan thought about it and said: "This thing can't be 
tempted to lure me. But let's eat something? Everyone, too. I haven’t eaten 
well for a long time.” 


As long as it is not holding the temperament, it 1s no problem, thank you: 
"It should be. But, you said so." In a few words, Shi Qingxuan said: "T 

think so too." Turned to the big voice, "Run this Things, go back and ask 
everyone to eat chicken legs and drink soup. If you don’t come, everyone 
will have a share! Note, it’s not only that you have to go, just volunteer!” 


This statement is wonderful. "Everyone has a share." If you don't come, 
you have to eat it. Then, if you choose to come, it 1s very valuable. Shi 
Qing Xuanzang said: "There are no more people! The more the better! 
Come and tell them, there is no money, it 1s to help me, by the way, save 
the people surrounded by the imperial city, whatever, just as long as 
Volunteer! Please wait for the big guy to have a good meal!" 


Perhaps because of the people, in the twinkling of an eye, the temple 
suddenly turned from cold and clear to hot, and the group also split to 
inform more of the tramps they knew. Xie Li, Hua Cheng, Shi Qingxuan 
three stood in front of the temple, thanked and looked up, saw that there 
should be a plaque on the top but it was empty, could not help but think of 
the ruined Feng Shui Temple in Bogu Town, and the temple. The navy’s 
unskilled navy and the wind-powered elephant with no arms and legs are 
unable to press the shackles and turn to the teacher’s youth. Unsure of the 
authenticity: “...Qing Xuan?” 


Shi Qingxuan took his hand off his shoulder and said, "What is it? Your 
Royal Highness is embarrassed, I am a little dirty, your clothes, haha." 


Sure enough, his arm left a dirty gray mark on the shoulders of the praying 
white robes. It seems that he wants to help the praying, but immediately 


reacted, only the more dirty, the more he received, The ground licked 
the nose. Xie Li will care about this, he is just worried about one thing 
now, saying: "Wind... Qing Xuan, your life..." 


Shi Qingxuan sighed and said: "What happened to my life?" 
Thanks to the pity: "Don't the black water change...?" 


Shi Qingxuan suddenly realized this and said: "No, no, no. You 
misunderstood, he didn't do anything." 


Xie Puiben also felt that Blackwater did not change the life of Shi 
Qingxuan in the end. He said, "Where is your hand and foot?" 


Shi Qingxuan grabbed his hair and screamed: "This is not him. How do 
you Say this... there are accidents and unfortunate things. Actually, I made 
it myself." 


He did not elaborate, thank you for not asking. However, in the midst of 
the gloom, the status quo of Shi Qingxuan should be the result of the anger 
of prophecy that He Xuan predicted in the Feng Shui Temple. I don’t know 
what it is. 


Thanks for the pity: "I was really sorry that my mana was suddenly taken 
away that day and I couldn't help you." 


Shi Qingxuan waved: "It’s not a matter of yours. If you are not the Prince, 
you will tell me what happened. I will still be squatting at the end." 


Thanks to the pity: "What happened after that day?" 


It turned out that after He Xuan’s hand broke the head without a head, Shi 
Qingxuan was sluggish. He Xuan told him what he could not understand. 
He only vaguely remembered that He Xuan took him out of Blackwater 
Island. Later, he was thrown into the Imperial City. I don't know why it 
would be an imperial city, but Shi Qingxuan used to be clamoring to go to 
the Imperial City to drink tea and eat a feast. It was quite familiar to this 
place, and it was awkward for a while. After being completely awake, he 
simply buried his name and was stationed here. . 


Because he has no mana, no identity, and he has been immersed in the 
pickles that he has never set foot in the past. He can't find his traces in 
heaven. 


Shi Qingxuan: "In short, it is not his business. Later I have never seen him 
again." 


It’s good to see you. This fact is difficult to do, so personally, is it killing 
or not killing? Moreover, the last time before the Navy’s death, he was 
disgusted with He Xuan’s hand, and thanked him for being a cold sweat. 
Just at this time, the crowd came back with people, mixed with Lala, and 
said: "Old style and old wind! We brought you so many people, how?" 


Shi Qingxuan raised his thumb and said: "Good job! Everyone eats 
chicken legs!" 


"So many people can't afford it?" 
Shi Qingxuan waved his hand. At that moment, Xie pity simply realized 


that he would squander 100,000 merits. He only listened to him: "What is 
this! Don't say so many people, you can afford to eat ten times more!" 


It’s easy to go back, a little bit rough, and I’ve gotten more than 200 
people somehow. This is beyond the imagination of the pity. He likes to 
say: “The wind teacher... Qing Xuan, really helped!” 


Shi Qing Xuanyang proudly said: "That is of course, where I am all over 
the place, I might be able to form a gang to help a gang, dahahahahaha..." 


The group behind him said: "The old wind is sick again." 
"No, it's blowing!" 
Teacher Qingxuan: "What, I really are not blowing!" 


A few of them wanted to dismantle his desk, and thanked him: "This 
friend, you don't know, when the old wind just came, you can be guilty. All 
day, the gods and gods are bragging to say that they are gods. ” 


Shi Qingxuan’s face was slightly bright, and immediately shouted: “You 
can’t listen to your nonsense, keep your mouth and lick your chicken 
legs!” 


Thanks to the ears, the smile is slightly converged, but the heart is like a 
piece of rice paper that 1s smashed into a group and slowly stretched out. 


The wind master has changed and has not changed. 
Great. 


Teacher Qingxuan: "His Royal Highness, what should I do next? People I 
found and handed it over to you." 


Although the number is not enough, it is also temporary. Thanks to the 
pity: "Well, then find another open space that can accommodate so many 
people." 


In the course of their conversation, Huacheng never interrupted, and I 
didn’t know what I was thinking. At this time, I said, “It’s easy. My 
brother is here with me.” 


Xie pity nodded, Shi Qingxuan jumped abruptly, and turned back and said 
hello: "Let's come over, don't lose it!" 


Thanks to pity, I wanted to help him, but I saw no one to help. He did not 
go slower than others, and he understood it. A group of messy hustle and 
bustle crowded out the slums, rushed to the street, did not take a few steps, 
and suddenly heard a violent drink: "Stand up! What are you doing? You 
so many people, the crowds in the middle of the night want to make 
trouble?!" 


The public alarmed: "Well! It’s a patrol!" 


Xie pity did not return, because Huacheng did not look back, said: "Do not 
care." The voice did not fall, the soldier fell. 


The crowd was amazed, and the words were green, and the teacher said: 
"Quiet! Don't bring more soldiers!" Then everyone snorted. Huacheng 
paused and said: "Brother, let's just go to this street." 


Thanks to the pity: "This is indeed the most appropriate position, but will 
it be too eye-catching?" 


This street is very wide, flat and paved to the front, it is the main road of 
the Imperial City, of course, attracting attention! Everyone said: "Yes, if 
you find someone to drive away, it will be bad!" 


Huacheng said: "It doesn't matter, they found out that they can't go." 


Xie pity nodded and said: "You, I must say, then, what we are about to deal 
with is very dangerous, and it may be dangerous. And once it breaks in, the 
entire imperial city will be in danger. So it is necessary Make sure 

everyone is voluntarily, has no intentions, does anyone feel afraid to quit?" 


unmanned. Thanks to pity: "Well, then please ask one by one now, pull the 
other person's hand and make a circle." 


Some people wondered: "What is this array? How does it sound like a 
little doll hand in hand?" 


Shi Qingxuan spurs: "There is so much nonsense, just do it." 


"When you are old, you are not right, you know, no one has more 
nonsense!" 


In the hustle and bustle, everyone said that more than two hundred people 
joined hands and formed a great circle on the broad and open main road of 
the Imperial City. Shi Qingxuan: "When you pull those things, you can't 
get into the Imperial City?" 


Thanks: "No. They will rush down sooner or later." 
Shi Qingxuan wondered: "What is your use of this array?" 


Thanks to pity: "It is a trap. After this battle is set up, those things will 
break through the imperial city protection circle and will not flow around, 
but will all be attracted to this circle and fall into the trap." 2k Read novel 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 206: Light two- 
language ghost king 


Shi Qingxuan: "After falling into the trap?" 


Xie Li and Huacheng have already stood in the middle of the people's 
array. They said, "Take us the money. We will solve them slowly in the 
battle. One is not leaking. It only takes time. It is imperative that they 
cannot be allowed to spread. And why do I say it will be dangerous, 
because we don’t have enough people in the present, it’s hard to say that 
the circle won’t be able to survive, and the things inside will not be 
washed out.” 


Someone swallowed a throat and asked, "What will happen when you 
punch and punch?" 


Thanks to pity: "That is very bad, will be accustomed to the spirit, the first 
to get infected with the plague." 


"If, I mean, what if someone ran away?" 


Thanks to the pity: "The circle will be broken, and it may be possessed by 
grievances." 


"That's not all the same to be possessed by grievances!" 


The more intelligent people understand, said: "Not the same, the former is 
10% will be accustomed to the grievances, infected with the plague; the 
latter is 'maybe', that is to say, let go and have a chance to survive. ” 


Thanks to the pity: "This is exactly the case. Is there anyone still going 
now? After the official start, you must never quit. Before you start, it is 
okay to go first. I also hope that everyone will not say anything to the 
people who left. After all, it 1s indeed Very dangerous thing." 


These must be told to them, otherwise they will not be able to choose 
someone who has the courage to make determination. Swearing, and sure 
enough, dozens of people came out in succession, and headed down in a 
hurry, and the circle narrowed down a bit. Thankful, he said with a sigh of 
relief, "That's great." 


Teacher Qingxuan: "What is good! There are fewer people." 


Xie pity smiled: "It's much better than I thought. There are already many 
people." He was still seriously considering what to do if he had gone 
halfway, but he only walked dozens and was very happy. At this moment, 
suddenly a voice is far away: "Slow, do you know what their identity 1s? 
Don't believe it, beware of it!" 


Thanks for looking back, it is actually the eyes open and so on. Shi 
Qingxuan immediately shouted: "Who are you guys? Don't help me to 
don't mess up, I promise they will never hurt." 


Of course, the Master does not put a unkempt sly in his eyes, saying: 
"Who are you? How much money can you value?" 


Shi Qingxuan heard that other people asked him to ask him not to hit a 
place, pointing his nose: "Hey? You talk about money in front of me?? I 
see you guys do not know the heights of the sky, you may have passed this 
He coughs..." He said that he coughed twice and shrank back. The Masters 
only said that he couldn’t blow himself down, and he didn’t care. He 
advised: “You don’t even know what they want to do, beware of losing a 
few mouthfuls of rice!” 


Xie Pity is about to explain that the public is mainly to talk about loyalty, 
not for those few meals, but the flower city is leisurely: "No, they are not 
for a few meals, but to save the people." 


Thanks to the pity, how can Huacheng say so? But he listened to the 
opposite and said: "What saves the people, what do you pick up? You can 
save your own life." 


"Yeah, don't let this fun, let's go back and add less chaos." 


Huacheng is slow and authentic: "Oh? It means, you can't save the people? 
Is it not, or is it not worth it?" 


As soon as this statement came out, the public turmoiled and looked 
dissatisfied. The sky is open-eyed: "We have not said so." 


Shi Qingxuan immediately drilled out and pointed to him: "Hey, I don't 
think it's like that. You didn't mean that." Your tone 1s still very disgusting, 
yes everyone!" 


"Yeah! What do you mean? Where are we not worthy?" 


"Everyone can come and eat, do you really think that we are rushing to 
eat? Less look down on people!" 


Xie pity turned to the side, Huacheng rushed to pick him up, as if to say 
"easy", the heart: the original. Although there are many people left, they 
are not particularly firm. Just like the eyes open and others, they have 
inadvertently expressed their contempt for them. "You are so busy," I was 
magnified by the flower city, but instead It aroused the opposition of the 
public and the opposite: Do you think we can't? Then we have to prove it 
to you, we can do it too! 


In this way, morale is another wave of rise. Both sides shouted at each 
other, thanking the pity for the eyes and waiting for humanity: "You really 
don't worry, just look at it here. If we do something harmful, you can stop 
it immediately." 


Huacheng added a smile and added: "However, it is best not to get in the 
way." 


" " 


The Masters followed Chee and Huacheng all the way, and now they 
couldn’t help themselves. They finally got the courage to jump out. As a 
result, it was not long before they were scared back by the smirk of 
Huacheng’s dead man. Huacheng turned his head and said: "Brother, look 
at the sky." 


Thanks for raising his head together. The shadows before the moon are 
clearer and faint, like a little closer. 


In the time they searched for people, the night did not know how long it 
had passed, and those things were coming down! 


Thanks for the tightness: bad, too late to find more people! But he did not 
show it, immediately said: "Everyone stands up! Hand tight!" 


Shi Qingxuan had stood up straight and said: "Prince's Temple... Lao Xie, 
we are just like people, will it be broken at once?" 


After all, it is in the world, and the screaming will cause 
misunderstandings and unnecessary troubles. Thanks to the pity: "I am 
here to check at any time. When somewhere is about to break, I will take 
the lead in the past. This will last longer. "It is constantly patching new 
vulnerabilities." Teacher Qingxuan: "Oh, this one, then our life can be 
handed over to you, including my own, Prince Hall... | thank you for your 
hard work, and work hard! I am now!" ” 


"Good old wind, I must work hard." 


Everyone's palms are sweating, and everyone is tight. In the next moment 
when everyone has a tight grip, the sky above the night, suddenly burst 
into a screaming cry, and getting closer and faster! 


It’s down! 
Look at the timing, thank you: "Everybody, blow on the front!" 


Everyone is not sure, but they have done it, and they have spurred the gang 
to blow their breath toward the front. In the winter night, a large group of 
people took out a circle of hot white air, although it could not be 
transmitted far, but the heat mixed with yang, has been very confusing. 
Coupled with the blind eye method that Huacheng secretly made, they 
couldn’t see what was going on underneath. The grievances that had to be 
scattered all over the place felt that the enthusiasm and popularity of one 
place was extremely heavy, and they were constantly fluctuating and very 


active. Of course, I think that 1s the scope of the attack, excitedly rushed 
over, gathered into a dark column! 


In an instant, Xie pity was almost covered with black in front of him. He 
said: "Be careful not to let go and enter the cage!" 


At the same time, behind the flower city, there are thousands of silver 
butterflies! 


The faint silver light emerged, and the black fog in front of Xie was 
immediately dispelled. When he saw Huacheng, he extended his hand and 
said: "Brother, come to me." 


Thanks for a moment, he immediately took his hand. Huacheng Wei used 
to force him to pull him over, grab his waist and spray it around. Even if 
those grievances have been shut down for two thousand years in the copper 
furnace, they have been stunned, but they dare not approach, and there is 
no blackness within them. The grievances who have rushed into the circle 
of people have discovered that something is wrong. They bite for a long 
time. How can a living person not bite, but bite into the same kind? 
Moreover, there are two people who are not allowed to wear, and those 
silver butterflies are, in their case, more bladed and rainy, fluttering and 
fluttering, killing their screams and rushing into the sky! 


The grievances finally realized that they were trapped. They are the evil 
beasts that are hung in the cage, and the two hundred people are not the 
playmen outside the iron cage, but the railings of the iron cage! 


The grievances who perceive this point are furious, and the screaming 
screams of the murderers who hold hands to stop them, the mouth 1s as if 
they are going to swallow the head of the person, the anger rises, and the 
face and body shape are distorted. A few people were scared to go back a 
few steps and were quickly pulled by the people next to them: "Don't 
mess!" 


Thanks and pity: "Don't move! If they don't break, they won't hurt you!" 


I heard that everyone was a little relieved. There are also monks screaming 
at the screaming screaming screaming, while spitting and saying: "Hey! 
Dirty you, dirty you! Fast roll!" Probably heard the ghosts afraid of dirty 
things, Thanks to pity and laugh, said: "This 1s no use! They are not 
afraid." 


At this time, he suddenly realized that somewhere in the human array was 
in jeopardy, and he was about to leak. He quickly looked up and saw a thin, 
squinted eye straight and short of breath, as if he was nervous to twitch! 


Many grievances also noticed that this person was weak and swarmed to 
him. Thanks to pity, it was a glimpse, and the grievances screamed and 
were beaten, and he quickly let the man quit, so that the two people who 
had been around him were connected. It’s too late to breathe a sigh of 
relief. In the southwestern part of Liuzhang, a new loophole has appeared. 
Xie’s pity is about to pass, but it is found that there is a third loophole in 
the far distance, just next to Shi Qing’s body! 


After all, the number of grievances is still too large. This is only the first 
wave, there will be more behind, and the source is endless! 


It’s too late to rush, thank you: “Sanlang!” 
Huacheng did not move, said: "Brother, don't worry." 


Xie pity does not believe that he is not aware of it, and does not believe 
that he will ignore it, but the empty space, it will be drilled out by the 
grievances! 


On the occasion of this millennium, a piece of Huang Fufei came and 
exploded next to Shi Qingxuan! 


Although this symbol did not kill the pile of grievances, it also scared 
them to shrink and retracted their heads. However, the group of smugglers 
who had been watching for a long time rushed over and said: "I have told 
you not to join in the fun. If you have already joined together, then you 
will be able to top it out. You can't stand it in the middle. This is not a 
trouble!!!" 


Huacheng thanked him: "Look, I said, don't worry." 
He is always calm, thank you: "Well!" 


The eye-opener and other mages are still unable to hold back, and they 
rushed up. This group of people is not a trainer, they are very good at all, 
and they have seized the hands of the two people and separated 
themselves. The new dozens of people have suddenly merged into the 
circle and expanded the array of people. Heavenly eyes open: "You 
friends! Fast and fast, there are sects in the Imperial City, let them come!" 


"Go and go!" 
"I called my apprentice too!" 
In a short while, the streets have come to more than 100 people. 


These more than one hundred people are incredible, all of them are monks, 
Taoists, warlocks! All of them are fully armed, two steps as a step, the 
heroic and refreshing, seeing gratitude and screaming in the heart, the 
crowd stunned. A new wave of people saw this spectacular scene on the 
street showing a glimpse of it, and then quickly joined. After they were 
integrated, the circle expanded a lot, and the Imperial City Street was 
almost impossible to stop. And these new courage does not say, each 
person has brought a few messy magic weapons, no doubt and greatly 
lengthened the duration of the formation! 


At this point, Xie pity has a nine-point grasp, calm and authentic: "Don't 
be afraid, now the situation is reversed, we are more and more people, as 
long as they hold their positions firmly, it is only a matter of time!" 


Everyone also saw that the situation has become favorable. If you have 
hope, you can say that you are confident in your time and you are loudly 
saying: "Destroy them!" 


Over there, Tiantian said: "We have one hundred and sixty-eight people 
here! How many people do you have? How long can you persist?" 


The scorpion teacher Qing Xuan here also counted the heads several times. 
The loud voice: "We still have one hundred and forty-eight people left in 
the array!" 


Thanks for the pity: "There are 316 people added up, just look for it..." 
Huacheng said: "No." 


Thanks for turning back: "What is wrong?" 


Huacheng regained his gaze and stared at him: "The number is wrong. 
Now, there are 317 people here." 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 207: Seeking 
love, ghost king, fake 


" " 


Although Huacheng only glanced at it, but thanks to him, he would not be 
wrong. 


He whispered, no one heard except praying, and thanked him for a quick 
glimpse. 


Everyone here is holding hands. When is there more people? 


Will it be Shi Qingxuan, are they wrong? Thanks to pity: "Are you sure 
that there are so many people? Nothing leaks?" 


Shi Qingxuan promised: "No! You are not saying that the number is very 
important, so I have been counting it all the time. I have lost it in the 
middle of the journey. It is one hundred and forty-eight. What happened? 
What is wrong?" 


For the time being, it is inconvenient to say that the rash exposure will 
only cause useless panic, and it will not allow the people present to 
identify each other who they don’t know. After all, there are too many 
people, and they don’t all know each other. So, thank you: "No, confirm 
it." 


It is even more impossible for the warlocks to count the mistakes. It is the 
number of people who have pulled themselves out and counted up. Can 
everyone still know how many people are sent under their own door? 


Thanks and whispered: "When did the extra one come in? What did he 
want?" 


Huacheng Road: "Either it was mixed in from the beginning, or it was 
mixed with the warlocks. And it must be human." 


At least it must not be a ghost. All the people who make up this circle 
must be living, otherwise they will not be able to surround these 
grievances. 


Moreover, this person seems to not want to be exposed for the time being. 
Because if he has already gotten into this circle, as long as he suddenly 
drops his hand, there is a loophole, and the human ranks will be wiped out. 
But now the circle is still stable, indicating that he has been playing the 
"iron bar". 


Then it is even more difficult to act rashly. If the person realizes that his 
existence has been discovered, no one knows if he will turn around and 
run. That is to say, now, they have to find this person without being aware 
of it, and they will come out without destroying the circle. This is really 
difficult. 


However, thank you for a moment there is a way. He said: "Sanlang, your 
dead butterfly, can you only evict the chase without killing these 
grievances? I mean, drive them away in the direction you specify?" 


Huacheng immediately understood what he wanted to do, saying: "Yes." 


Since this person is taking the initiative to join himself, then presumably, 
he must not be a simple person, and he is completely afraid of these 
grievances. 


Then, conversely, if the flower city manipulates the dead spirits to push 
the grievances out of the circle, they will certainly be chased and chased, 
and they want to escape. Almost every mortal can become a loophole, and 
only one person will not. 


It is the one who joined the initiative! 


Thanks to pity: "However, this method is very dangerous. Maybe you will 
accidentally scare other people, then you will pick up your own feet." 


Huacheng said: "Reassured, before that, I will kill the grievance first." 


When the two of them are together, Xie Pity suddenly said: "Everyone is 
careful! The grievances suddenly become stronger! Don't be afraid!" 


Heavenly eyes open: "What! How can it suddenly become stronger?!" 


Huacheng did not move in the same place, and the deadly butterflies 
chased the smog spirits of the smog in the circle, and others could not see 
clearly. Those wizard warlocks could see the clues. The sky is open and 
angry: "Flower City... Lord! What do you want to do?!" 


The two people in the circle did not care about them at all, just watching. 
Sure enough, in the black air of the sky, there was a man, and the group of 
grievances did not come close at all, so his front suddenly vacated. 


it's him! 


Thanks for the stepping forward, grabbed the man's hands and held the 
hands of the two men together and took the man out of the ring! 


The horror of the eye is not the same: "What is going on?!" 


Huacheng is unceremonious: "Nothing for you." The voice has not fallen, 
and he has already come to Xie Pity, beware of the sudden sudden attack. 
Xie Li firmly held the man and turned him over. At the moment of the two 
sides, the praying father swallowed the "who" who had already rolled to 
the tip of his tongue and widened his eyes. 


Looking at the face, he murmured: "National teacher, really you..." 


The man was also stuck, and for a long while, he muttered: "His Royal 
Highness..." 


This face should be very familiar, but it is very strange. The national 
teacher in his impression should be in his early thirties, still calm, and his 
robes are sloppy. But now the person in front of him seems to be only 
twenty-five and six years old, and he is not older than him. 


Even when I heard this sound in the Tonglushan Mountain Monster, Xie Li 
continued to wonder if it would be wrong. Even Junwu told him that your 


Master is not simple. When you are careful, he is thinking, will the 
Emperor make a mistake. However, there is absolutely no mistake in this 
person. It is his master, Mei Nianqing, the last national teacher of 
Xianleguo! 


The three men confronted each other in a circle of more than 300 people, 
and the air seemed to be stagnant. When Mei Nianging reacted, the next 
moment he made an unexpected event. 


Thank you for your pity, he suddenly counterattacked, rushed up, his hands 
licking his throat! 


However, Huacheng is standing next to him. How can he let him succeed? 
He didn't have to shoot at all, and Mei Nianqing's body flew backwards 

and fell outside a few feet. Everything changed suddenly, and everyone in 
a circle was shocked: "How do you fight?!" "What is this?!" "Who is it?!" 


Huacheng Road: "Brother! Are you okay?" 


Thanks to pity: "Nothing!" In fact, it seems that the national division is 
more involved. Mei Nianging vomited and vomited, and climbed up and 
stumbled and rushed outside the crowd. Shi Qingxuan saw him rushing to 
the side and nervously said: "What do you want to do! Feed me to warn 
you not to come over? His Royal Highness, he wants to break through this 
circle!" 


Thanks and pity: "Come back!" 


If the evil spirits fly out! But before 1t was wrapped around Mei Nianqing, 
a sword fell from the sky, and inserted | in front of the national teacher, 
stopped his way; followed by the white light in the sky, several light 
curtains poured down. With the light curtain, a white armored man 
descended from the sky and sealed his back! 


Both before and after were intercepted, Mei Nianging had nowhere to 
escape, and turned around, just in time to meet the ecstasy of the ecstasy, 
brushing a few times, he tied his five flowers and tied them to the ground. 


Thanks for taking a step forward, said: "Emperor? How come you 
personally?" 


Jun Wu stood up and looked awkwardly: "The copper furnace mountain is 
temporarily stabilized. Come to your side to see how it 1s." 


Thank you, "How do you stabilize?" 


Jun Wudao: "There is a new world, which temporarily trapped the three 
mountain monsters and other non-human things." 


Xie Li is most concerned about not the mountain monsters and other 
insignificant little demons, saying: "That... no white?" 


Jun Wu slowly shook his head and said: "I have not found him in the 
Tonglushan. I am afraid, I have already fled elsewhere." 


Thank you for looking around, a flash of light-eyed light curtains 
surrounded them and separated them from the more than 300 people 
holding the outside hands. At the moment, people outside the light curtain 
could not see what was inside the light curtain. situation. He looked at the 
ground again, and the national teacher turned over. When he saw Jun Wu, 
he probably remembered the previous fierce battle. He looked shocked and 
angry, but he knew how to dare to speak. Jun Wu also bowed slightly and 
looked at him in a condescending manner, slowly saying: "Xianle Guoshi, 
long time no see." 


Huacheng walked up and glanced at it. He said: "This national teacher 
seems to have no strength in his hands. How did he escape?" 


Jun Wudao: "He didn't escape by himself. At that time, he had three 
helpers around him. It was the other three national teachers of Xianle." 


When I heard this, thank you for your pity, and asked: "National Master... 
Who are you?" 


Mei Nianging looked gloomyly at Junwu, clenched her hands, and raised 
her hands on her back. I wondered if I hated him to disturb my plan, or 


hated him for revealing her bottom in front of Xie. For a long while, he 
whispered: "You haven't already guessed it, Your Royal Highness." 


One of the four guardian gods of Prince Wu Yong! 
Thanks to the pity: "What about Prince Wu Wu? Is he white?" 
Wen Yan, Jun Wu, said: "Xianle, Wu Yong is the Prince?" 


Thanks to this, I remembered that he had not had time to tell Jun Wu’s 
affairs. I finally seized the national teacher. There are many things to 
explain to Xie Pity. There are also many questions to ask. It is not 
convenient to deal with here. "Emperor, go back to heaven and say it." 


Junwu said: "Alright." Shen Yan for a moment, and again, "But, most of 
the grievances of the copper furnace have been passed to the imperial city, 
not for a while, even if it is me, It takes seven days and seven nights to 
completely purify them." 


Is it necessary to ask the national teacher seven days later? It’s too late, 
and it’s not clear what is missing! Thanks for thinking about how to be 
good, but listening to Huacheng Road: "Give it to me here. You go up." 


Xie pity turned to look at him, Huacheng had expected what he was 
thinking, saying: "I don't have to say anything else. I am here waiting for 
you. If my brother really wants to thank me, come down and find me 
soon." 


Jun Wudao: "Is this feasible?" 
Thank you for showing a smile, said: "Well, it works." 


At this moment, the light curtain suddenly flashed, and a person rushed in 
from the outside, one turn and one hop, and jumped and shouted: "His 
Royal Highness Prince! Your Majesty the Prince is doing it inside? Is it 
alright?" 


It is Shi Qingxuan. When Junwu came down, he took a light curtain and 
didn't let people see it. He didn't know what happened outside, and he was 


scared to death. Shi Qingxuan volunteered to see what was going on. If 
other people might be stopped, but he used to be a priest, then the light 
curtain knew him and actually let him in. When he came in, he stayed: 
"Emperor Emperor, Emperor? How are you... personally coming down?!" 


When Jun Wu saw him, he smiled and said: "The wind master, don't come 
innocent." 


Shi Qingxuan’s, some strange and embarrassing. After all, he couldn't have 
known that the teacher would have to turn to the younger brother to change 
his life and send him to heaven. At this time, I saw the past boss again. I 
really didn't dare to think of anything other than my heart. Jun Wu did not 
say anything to him, but he was very polite and gave him a face. Thanks 
for accepting the evil, Mei Nianqing slowly stood up. After Shi Qingxuan 
was finished, he wondered: "Which is this? What is the situation now?" 


Mei Niangqing glanced at him and suddenly said, "Are you a teacher 
Qingxuan?" 


Shi Qingxuan sighed and said: "Who are you? How do you know my 
name?" The most important thing 1s, how can he recognize this virtue? ? ? 


Mei Nianging said: "Your name is not good." 

Shi Qingxuan 1s inexplicable: "Ha?" 

Mei Nianging did not say anything else. She consciously kept up with 
Junwu. It was quite honest. She probably knew that there was no helper 
around him. Even if he was not tied, he could not escape from Junwu. 
Jun Wudao: "Xianle, I will take him up first. Will you come back later?" 


Thanks: "Yes." 


Jun Wu nodded to him. When the two went first, thanked Shi to turn to 
Huacheng, and did not speak, Huacheng said: "Brothers don't have to 


worry, Just keep this circle and let them not go out of trouble, no matter 
what." 


Shi Qingxuan also said: "Would you like to go up with your Royal 
Highness? Go and go, I will also look at it, rest assured!" 


Thanks for your nod and said, "You have worked hard." 


If in the past, Huacheng will answer "nothing" and so on, who knows this 
time, he picked up his arm and sighed: "Hey, it is very hard." 


" " 


Xie pity always thinks what he is suggesting. Shi Qingxuan was unaware 
of it and said with exultation: "Yeah, look back and remember that we 
should treat it. I suggest how to open a banquet in the best restaurants in 
the Imperial City? Hahaha..." 


He still remembers to open a feast in the best restaurants in the Imperial 
City. Thanks to the heart: "...the wind master does not say anything, he is 
not what you think..." 


Huacheng shook his head and immediately played with the red coral beads 
that fell from the thin little scorpion. He raised his eyebrows and looked 
like an understatement: "If the brother is around, it will be fine. I want to 
go to heaven with my brother." Leave me alone, um, I feel even harder." 


Shi Qingxuan finally felt a bit strange, but still did not figure it out, smiled 
and said: "Blood rain and flowers, how do you talk so interesting, I heard 
that you are saying that your Royal Highness is going back to heaven, you 
are lonely, how to follow Newly married hahaha..." 


Thank you for your pity: "You didn't think wrong, didn't he mean this??" 
Shi Qing Xuanzang smiled for a long time, thank you for your pity, and 


coughed aloud, said: "The wind master, you, you go out first, go out, 
okay?" 


Shi Qingxuan: "?? Why?" 
Xie pity can't explain, said: "You... you go out first. We are the only ones." 


Shi Qingxuan was just wondering about it. There were only two of them in 
the light curtain, and no third person, and thanked and turned around. 
Huacheng also looked at him with a brow and seemed to be waiting for 
what he said or what he was doing. 


So, praying **** the scalp, put the two hands stiffly on the shoulders of 
the flower city, set a moment, slammed up, kissed his cheek. 


After the kiss, he looked back at the guilty conscience, no one, this is 
reassuring. Who knows, the next moment, the waist is tight, but the flower 
city stunned him, blinked and said: "Brother, are you too perfunctory?" 


In his tone, he was half-truthful and dissatisfied. He was slightly 
dangerous. He was shocked and said: "No!" 


Huacheng Road: "Is it? This is not the case when you look for me to 
borrow mana. Isn't it possible to get such a farewell without borrowing 
mana?" 


Thinking about it, thank you, it seems that it is quite sincere. Speaking, 
whispered: "...sorry. | don't mean that." 


However, the road apologizes, he actually thinks more and more like it 
seems to mean that, the heart of the alarm bell, for fear that the flower city 
really misunderstood, did not wait for him to respond, do not say anything, 
practice, jump up and hold the flower city The neck slammed up again. 
This time, I personally came to the place that Huacheng wanted. 


Who knows, good death does not die, Shi Qingxuan’s voice suddenly 
came: "My Royal Highness, I think it’s strange to think about it. You don’t 
have to let me go alone? I am... Your Royal Highness Prince? Go so soon? 


99 


Thanks for the rolling and fleeing. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 208: The 
demon is in the mirror 


Rolled onto the streets of Xianjing, Xie Li still squatted on the lower half 
of the face, all the way. Although the little priests who rushed to and fro on 
the street didn't dare to ask him, they couldn't help but look at him 
strangely. Xie pity quickly put down his hand and straightened his waist. 
He licked his mouth in a false manner and said: "The mouth is a little 
painful. I don't know what's going on, huh, huh..." 


The little gods look at his eyes more strange. 
What kind of mouth 1s it that hurts? 


It hurts a little bit. Just jumped up and hit the pro too hard, it is estimated 
that Huacheng was also hit by him, but Xie pity posted it obviously can 
feel it, he seems to laugh. I didn't dare to think about it. I walked down and 
went down. The other priests didn't delay, and they were in a hurry. 


I don't know if the copper furnace is too big, and the entire Jingjing 
atmosphere is uneasy. In the Temple of the Gods, many priests have 
gathered. Although the grievances in the copper furnace reached seven or 
eight places in the north, they were sent to the most densely populated 
imperial city. Xie Li and Huacheng picked the girders and chose the most 
embarrassing ones to toss it up now. Others have dealt with hundreds of 
them, and they have already solved them. Hey, Fengxin, etc. have come up, 
returning to Xianjing, washing Tired. And when she prayed into the 
temple, she raised a face and made a face-to-face with one person. It was 
actually Lang Qianqiu who had not seen for a long time. 


Lang Qianqiu looked heavy and saw him as a glimpse, then turned his 
head. 


Everyone was buried without saying anything. Junu sat on the top and saw 
Xie Pity. He got up slightly and was about to talk. Lang Qianqiu stood up 
and said: "Emperor, I heard that you have caught the green ghost." ” 


Jun Wu looked at him and said: "Yes. However, the green ghosts, the 
female ghost Xuan Ji, etc., are not my own hands, they are all delivered by 
the ghost city." 


Thanks to this, I found out that the original jade was also there. No way, 
really there is no sense of existence. In other words, this is the first time 
that the jade has entered the Temple of God. In addition to the superior 
priests in this hall, only the objects allowed by Junwu can set foot. When I 
used to introduce jade as a priest, I was not qualified to come in because of 
the low grade. Now I am "since" and go to the ghost city, but I finally enter 
the room and laugh. 


Lang Qianqiu straightforwardly said: "The grace is my enemy, please ask 
the emperor to hand over this to me." 


Junwu glanced at her, and for a moment, said: "It 1s not impossible to give 
it to you. But, I want to ask a question. After you dispose of the green 
ghosts? How about?" 


At the beginning, Lang Qianqiu screamed and found the sadness to find 
the patience. This is what I know. Lang Qianqiu said in a hard and succinct 
manner: "Then it is not the matter of the emperor. It is not that I will not 
answer this question. The emperor intends to cover up the grace and 
prevent me from taking revenge for my relatives?" 


He used to speak little at the Shenwu Temple. Even if he spoke, he was 
stupid. Now he is open and his voice is utterly suffocating. This state is 
not very good. He said: "His Royal Highness Taihua is a bit too angry 
today. Of course, the Emperor will not be covered..." 


Just playing the round field, but listening to a riot outside the temple, one 
person came in and said: "Imperial, I can't wait any longer!" 


Actually it is a feeling of love. He was black in his black face, and several 
of the martial arts officers behind him were originally betting him, but 
where he was able to live, he followed him and said: "Emperor, we are 
going to send General Xuanzhen to go..." 


Jun Wu sighed and helped the support. He waved: "Know, let's go down." 
Shou, look up and turn to the feelings: "So?" 


Mu Qing loves the nails: "So I can't continue to endure this kind of 
whiteness on my head. Have you already caught the woman in the copper 
stove? I want to face her with her!" 


Lang Qianqiu also said: "Emperor, please also give me the grace of the 
green ghost!" 


The two men spoke together loudly, and the bottom seemed to be chaotic. 
Junwu looked like a headache. "Silence! You can't wait, let me handle the 
copper furnace here?" 


Mu Qing said: "You have to deal with the grievances leaked from the 
copper furnace, you need people, what good is it to shut me down? It is 
better to let me wash the grievances as soon as possible, for the heavens. 
As long as the emperor brought her up I am right, things can come to the 
fore!" 


This is justified. If he is not willing to let him fear that he will not be 
reluctant, Jun Wu only has to say: "With the female ghost gladiolt." 


Not long after, the gladioli was brought up. She held a sly bag in her hand, 
and the blackness of the shackles in her bag. A white thing like a hand and 
bones was exposed from the inside, and her teeth and claws were smashed 
and wrapped around her. Probably for the face of the letter, the **** 
officer did not twist her. Fengxin's throat was fretting, and her eyes were 
handed over for a moment. The gladioli was staggered first, and then the 


eyes of the wind letter fell on her " "in her arms, which was even 
more complicated. The admiration seems to have lost patience. When I 
came up, I said, "I don't know why your son is filthy, but it is absolutely 
clear that I am not a murderer. It must be instructed." 


He is somewhat rude, but Xie Pity can understand. After all, the affair is a 
very face-to-face person. A sip of the scorpion has been stuck on his head 
for so long, and it has affected his position in the heavenly court. It is 


naturally full of fire. Jun Wudao: "As far as you can see, who is it 
instructed?" 


He did not speak, but his eyes moved to the side, and everyone could see 
that he was watching the gladioli. 


The wind and the amount of money immediately burst into the blue: 
"What do you mean? Do you think she deliberately let her son filthy you?" 


Mu Qing regained his gaze and said: "I didn't say that." 


Wind channel: "What do you think she does? She has no resentment with 
you, why should she be so instigated?" 


Miao Jing stared at him and said: "She has no hatred with me, but you are 
not necessarily." 


Wind channel: "What do you mean? Make it clear at a time." 


Mourning looked at the pity and said: "You are Miss Marshal, who was 
met by the time of the Prince Edward?" 


The gods also followed him, and they looked forward to thanking them. 
Thankfulness: '"???" 


How did you pull him again? 


Feng Xin also glanced at him and whispered: "What does this have to do 
with that?" 


I was so mad that I went out and said, "Of course, there is a relationship. 
At that time, because of your sorrow and sorrow with the Prince Edward, I 
hate the bones of the heavenly court, and I like to take my knife and turn 
my old account. I am not, she is both your pillow, and how can you not 
hide and confuse me and even hate me? Maybe you will hate the Prince, 
because you did not take her away, but chose to go back and continue to 
loyalty, fundamentally Is toss..." 


The wind letter couldn’t help anymore, and roared: "You put less shit!!" 


He punched and punched his back, and the swordsman returned to fight. 
The swordsman went forward and stopped, but the baby spirit laughed and 


laughed like a crow, and the horror was extremely extreme. and : 
respectively, hold the wind and the feelings, and the right to stare at the 
right seems to be thinking about who they will win. In short, the temple 
was so smoky, thanked for quietly standing for a while, bowed his head, 
half a sigh, sighed and reminded: "The emperor, the most urgent task is to 
find the white no-phase, deal with the human face epidemic, only the 
talent we found. Is the most important clue." 


Jun Wu also couldn't stand it anymore, waved his hand and said: "...with 
the female ghost gladioli and the fetal spirit going down. Bring the fairy 
music master up." 


Admired and said: "No! I want to... What??" 
The wind letter also stunned: "Who is it??" 


Both looked at the entrance to the main hall. Was it brought by a group of 
martial arts officers, isn’t it the Xianle Guoshi, Mei Nianging, whom both 
of them are very familiar with? 


The wind is full of feelings. Wind channel: "National teacher? Is it really a 
national teacher?" Muqing did not call, but also was amazed. No wonder, 
really, even now, thankfulness is somewhat unrealistic, and it is impossible 
to connect this person with the national teacher who asked him "the cup of 
water". 


Mei Nianqing slowly stepped forward and passed by with pity. Jun Wu sat 
above the main hall and said: "Xianle, when you are below, you seem to 
have something to say." 


Thanks to the slightest owe, said: "Yes." 


Therefore, he will enter the Tonglushan and explore Wuyongguo and other 
important experiences. Everyone is listening to the bigger the eyes, not to 
mention the feelings of love. After listening to it, Jun Wu slowly said: "I 
have never heard of the name Wu Yongguo." 


The priests also echoed: "I have never heard of..." 
"After all, two thousand years ago." 
"It must be deliberately erased." 


Mei Nianqing has never spoken. Thanks to pity: "National division, Prince 
Wu Yong, is nothing to be white." 


Mei Nianging said: "Yes." 
really! 


I thought side by side: "Who are those murals left behind? Who was the 
last one destroyed?" 


Thanks to the pity: "I don't know who left it, but I think it should be 
nothing to do with whiteness or his subordinates. After all, he is not 
willing to let others know his identity." 


He turned to Mei Nianqing and said: "And you are a subordinate of Wu 
Yong's prince." 


Mei Nianqing did not speak. Xie pity has an impulse, I want to ask him, 
when the Xianle destroyed the country, the national teacher did not know 


that the thing is nothing. Or, they are simply colluding, national teachers 
or even helpers? 


But in the end, he still asked another question: "Where is the white 
phase?" 


Thanks to the pity: "Why is there nothing to kill the fairy music?" 


Thank you, "Why do you want to kill me?" 


Mei Nianqing finally spoke. He said: "His Royal Highness, I didn't want to 
kill you." 


Thank you, "Why are you taking my throat below?" 


Mei Niangqing asked: "I will lick your neck, will you die? Will the one next 
to you make me succeed?" 


It does not. But that doesn't mean that Mei Nianging didn't kill, because 
his reaction was completely subconscious at the time. Mei Nianqing 
probably also knows that he can't convince him, no longer defend. 


After a moment of silence, Xie Li finally asked the question he most 
wanted to ask. 


He said: "National division, what do you want to wake up from me?" 


Junwu told him that the national teacher seemed to want to wake up 
something from him. What would it be? 


Mei Nianqing stared at him in a weird look. Thanks to the hand under the 
sleeves, he clenched his fist and said: "National division, let's talk." 


Xie pity has always been faint. The trajectory of the fate of Prince Wu 
Yong is so similar to him. Is there really a secret connection between him 
and the white? 


He must figure this out. Because he can't tolerate anything that has nothing 
to do with himself. But he is very scared, and nothing is really related to 
himself. 


Mei Nianging looked at him, half awkward, said: "His Royal Highness, 
you asked these, now I am not good at answering this opportunity. And 
even if you answer, you may not believe." 


After a pause, he said: "But, one thing, I can answer you right away." 


Mei Nianging said in one word: "White is no phase, now, in this temple of 
the gods. He is in front of me!" 


Who is in front of him? 
Thank you! 


Xie pity immediately stepped back a few steps and seemed to want to 
avoid this position. The recent letter of the wind said: "National teacher 
you ... you look at your eyes wide, who is in front of you, your Royal 
Highness! Your disciple!" 


However, there are other voices. In the distance, there is a sacred official 
who slams his mouth. He whispered: "Is it... Isn’t the prince and the white 
no one is... one soul two points?!" 


"What is a soul two points?!" 


"It is the soul of the same person, divided into two halves, or split into two 
sides. Half and the other half have different memories, and the temper and 
the skill are different, maybe the appearance is different..." 


cae possible." 
"I have heard this example!" 


"If that's the case, what should I do? His Royal Highness is the white 
blame?" 


It’s such a voice in all directions, and Xie Pity also begins to doubt: Is he 
white? ? ? is it really like this? ? ? 


Is it his own, destroying the music; is himself, tortured himself for eight 
hundred years? To this day, all things must blame himself? ? ? 


The priests in the temple are stunned and look different. The wind letter 
does not know what to say or what to believe. And Jun Wu stood up and 
said: "Xianle, calm!" 


Thanks for the chaos, there is some chaos, saying: "I...I..." 
Is it really all his fault? ? ? 

If it is him, what should I do? totally no idea! 

It was a sudden, suddenly, a voice sounded in his heart: 


"No! I can guarantee that you are you, not anyone else. Believe me!" 


" " 


Saburo. Saburo! 
Huacheng said that it will not be him, it will never be his fault! 


Thinking of this, thank you for being clear and clear, and standing firm. 
And Jun Wu has come down to the throne and comes to him, saying: 
"Xianle! You are calm first..." 


Xie pity is about to look up and answer calmly, who knows, at this time, 
Mei Nianqing suddenly reached out and pulled out the wind letter waist 
sabre, stabbed to Junwu! 


The gods were exclaimed. However, Junwu and Xie Li are both martial 
arts, and are one of the best martial arts. How can this kind of sneak attack 
be put in the eye? The tip of the sword has not yet been stained with 
Junwu's body. Xie Pity has already found **** like lightning, and the 
snowy sword is caught in front of you! 


The wind letter once passed back to God and immediately came up to the 
national division. Shenwu Temple also dared to commit crimes, and in the 
face of so many martial arts, simply looking for death. Wind channel: 
"National division, it is useless to do this!" 


Mei Nianging was struggling in vain, and thanked him with respect: 
"Look!!!! Look!" 


Leading jade rushed up and said: "His Royal Highness! Are you okay? 
What happened?" 


The feelings are far from vigilant: "What do you see? What does he mean? 
What do you want to do?" 


In the midst of chaos, for a long time, thanking me for not moving. 


Not because of anything else, but because he saw something in the white 
sword. 


a face. 
A young, calm and handsome face. 
And on this face, there are still three other faces! 


The three slightly smaller faces were crowded on the man's face, ruining 
his original beauty and being horrible, and even the five senses were 
slightly distorted. Half of the face seemed to be crying, and half of the 
face seemed to be laughing. 


This face should be familiar. But at the moment, in the sword-like front of 
the mirror, it is so strange and strange, and thanked the pity for a cold 
sweat. This suddenly remembers that the sword that the wind letter carries 
on the body is a red mirror. Mirror. The demon is in the mirror and has no 
shape. 


From this corner, the red mirror is not his face, but the face of the person 
standing behind him. Also, there was a pair of gloomy eyes on his face, 
and he was watching him closely. 


The pity of the pity slowly contracted. His movements seemed to be 
slower, and he opened his mouth slightly, but he still had no sound, and 
suddenly his wrist was stiff. 


A forceful hand grabbed his wrist, and Jun Wu smiled behind him: 
"Xianle, what are you looking at?" 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 209: Chao 
Xian Jing Yu Bo Hao Tian Ting 


Xie Pian has not produced such a creepy feeling for hundreds of years. 


Mei Nianging said that nothing was in front of him. His first reaction was 
himself, but he forgot, standing in front of Mei Nianqing, in addition to 
himself, and the monarch behind him! 


just. He never thought about this person, so he suddenly felt amazed at the 
moment. Thanks for earning a bit, but the strength of the hand is great, and 
he firmly grasps him and does not move. He can't help but say: "You... 
your face..." 


Junwu’s voice didn’t sound too good, as if he noticed a big mistake, 
saying: “Ah, for a moment, I let them run out.” 


Thanks to the wrist, it was a sharp pain. Finally, I couldn’t hold the hilt 
and loosen it. 


The long sword fell to the ground, and a "jingle" sound was heard in the 
hall. However, it is already late. 


There are already many priests nearby, and like him, I saw the horrible 
face reflected in the red mirror! 


Above the main hall, there is a dead silence. Almost all the priests were 
shocked. Including the recent and well-informed wind letter, Mei 
Nianqing took the opportunity to earn from his hand, grabbed the red 
mirror on the ground, raised his hands in front of Jun, and said: "Let's see 
clearly!! The person standing here now, look at his face!!!" 


Several martial arts were the first to react. They took the sword and said, 
"Who are you?!" 


The priests who stood in the distance were still unclear, and they all said: 
"What is it?" "Who is the general?" "How do you take the sword to the 
emperor?" 


Mei Nianging stared at Jun Wu, saying, "He is nothing but white!" 


The feelings of sorrow and sorrow: "How can he be white and nothing? 
White is nothing to pretend to be an emperor?! Where is the real 
emperor?" 


Xie Pity is also thinking about whether it has been dropped, but when did 
it start to drop the package? Why didn't he find out? Emperor Shenwu 1s 
not a low-key **** who has never seen the end of the dragon. In any case, 
it cannot be impersonated, but no one is aware of the whole heaven! 


Mei Nianging was waiting for the opening, but Jun Wu raised another 
hand and sighed: "You let me down again." 


Mei Nianging’s face changed a lot, as if she was suddenly caught in the 
throat. Lang Qianqiu lifted the epee, and "hw" the sword wind, and Jun Wu 
glanced back and Lang Qiangqiu flew out. 


The next moment, , Lang Qianqiu, Fengxin, admiration, right and 
true, almost the entire Wushen in the Shenwu Temple, all rounded up. 


However, after a fragrant incense, Junwu’s hand was still holding the wrist 
of the pity, but all the gods who had been encircled, all fell. 


On the top of the main hall, there was a martial art in the middle of the 
road. All of them lost their fighting power. Only Jun Wu and Xie Li stood. 
Mu Jing spit out a blood, sighing and swearing, saying: "You move! What 
are you doing?! Waiting to die?!" 


He didn't know, thank you for not wanting to move, he couldn't move at 
all! 


Junwu just grabbed him with one hand and let him feel that even if he bent 
his finger slightly, he would be noticed by the other party and immediately 


cut off, let alone counterattack! No matter where you judge, don't act 
rashly, it is the best choice! 


This is the first martial art of the Three Realms! 


The outermost priests scattered a circle, and finally they thought about it, 
and they rushed to the outside of the martial arts hall, but they rushed to 
the door, and the gorgeous twelve-door door suddenly closed 
automatically. In vain, the nearly 100 priests in the temple, either can not 
go out, or can not stand, it is really a mess. While Mei Nianging’s body 
was pulled forward by an invisible force, Jun Wu grabbed his collar and 
smiled. “You think that if you temporarily change your mind and say it in 
front of so many people, I will have no choice. You think, they know, can 
they threaten me when they are united? I can let them all go out with one 
hand." 


It seems that Jun Wu first brought Mei Nianqing up, not just to let Xie pity 
and Huacheng say goodbye. He confessed or threatened some things about 
Mei Nianqing in the middle, so he was relieved to interrogate him at the 
Shenwu Temple. But who knows the last moment, Mei Nianqing has 
repented. He grabbed Junwu's sleeves with both hands and shouted to him: 
"His Royal Highness is going! He is crazy!" 


Thanks for your pity: "National teacher!" 


The next moment, Mei Nianqing could not speak, as if she had caught her 
neck. But he always wears his face to cover his neck. Xie pity can't see 
what's going on in his throat. Jun Wu sighed: "A fool, you are pushing 
them into the fire pit. They didn't care about their affairs, but now, 
everyone here doesn't want to live out of this fairy." 


Hundreds of thousands of fires, thank you for your psychic immediately: 
"Sanlang!" 


He never took the initiative to read the psychic password of Huacheng. At 
this critical juncture, he was not ashamed of it. His mind was silently 
silent. However, there was a dead silence and no response. 


This psychic is completely blocked and feels exactly the same when it 
comes to Copper Mountain! 


Jun Wu saw what he was thinking in his eyes and said: "Don't try it. I don't 
allow it, you can't pass it." 


Xianjing was originally based on the mana of Junwu. Here is his territory. 
He is the biggest. Of course, he wants to know what to do. That 1s to say, 
now, the entire heavenly court, the entire Xianjing, has been completely 
isolated from other places. It’s true that “the sky is not called, the land is 
not working”! 


Suddenly, the door of the temple of the gods and martial arts was wide 
open, and the spirits of the gods were violent, and they were ecstatic, but 
they looked at the door of the temple. I saw a tall, black man standing 
outside the main hall. The momentum was strong, and the people who 
came were not good, stopping everyone from going. It is the spirit of Jin 
Yixian in the body! 


The gods are at a loss, but they see the spirits entering the temple. They 
are kneeling down on the knees, and they respectfully respect the emperor. 


Junwu said: "Get up and do things. You know what to do." 
The spirit of the dagger, smiled: "Of course understand." 


Admiring the wall and trying to stand up, I was surprised to see: "Isn't the 
spirit still absconding in the Copper Mountain?" 


Junwu said: "Yes. However, I feel that the spirit is very useful. It is more 
useful than most of the priests. It is a rare talent. After all, I only made a 
small mistake, so I recruited him again. ” 


To tell the truth, compared to the catastrophe of white clothes, the spirit 
has made a piece of cloak, it is really a "significant little mistake." The 
current Lingwen and Jinyixian are the subordinates of this "Junwu". At 
this moment, a group of white shadows flashed, and another thing came in, 
kneeling at the feet of Jun Wu, and licking his boots with relatives. 


Looking at the wind, he said: "What are you doing? Not coming back 
soon!" 


That thing is the fetus. Instead of listening to his father's words, he 
vomited his bright letter to him fiercely. Feng Xin had just been beaten by 
Jun Wu and couldn’t climb up. Now his son is holding the thigh of his 
enemy. It’s hard to know who is jealous, and he can’t wait to vomit blood. 
Then, another line of expressionless Wu Shenguan came in. 


These martial arts officers are all coming from Junwu, and they only listen 
to his own orders. Lingwen got the appointment of Junwu, saying: "Put the 
various priests back to their respective temples, and take care of them." 


He sat nearby and looked complicated. He said: "Learning, you really have 
no conscience." 


Lingwen patted him on the shoulder and said: "I don't have a conscience. 
Do you know the first day you know me? How do you want to be together? 
Welcome at any time." 


Hey, he laughed a few times and didn’t speak. 


Xie Li was once again given special treatment, and Jun Wu personally sent 
him to Xianle Palace. Jun Wudao: "Go." 


Thanks for looking back at Mei Nianging. what happened? who are you? 
What do you want to do? Who is this guy? In the end, is it that Jun Wu is 
still white? What does he want to do? 


He has too many questions to ask, and he must ask separately and ask 
carefully. These questions can only be answered by Mei Nianqing. But Jun 
Wu will not give him this opportunity. 


As soon as I stepped out of the Temple of the Gods, I would like to pity a 
little. On the streets of Xianjing, the sky is gloomy, the waves are 
turbulent, and the times are changing rapidly. It is completely different 
from the bright and bright in the past. Only the martial arts officers under 
the Shenwu Dian Junwu acted as usual, and escorted the various priests 


back to their respective temples, which seemed to be uneasy. The little 
priests who were in a hurry were all stunned and lying on the ground. 


Needless to say, it must be the hands and feet of Jun Wu, and from the 
distance, there is also a bell of "When - when --". It seems that there is a 
problem with the bell. 


The two walked along Xianjing Street and slowly went to Xianle Palace. 
On the way, Xie Pity quickly thought about the strategy of getting out of 
the way, but when he tried to drop the 10th meeting, all the clever 
strategies he could think of were useless in the face of Jun Wu’s absolute 
force. What's more, Junwu is not only armed, he can always see what he is 
thinking in his heart. 


Into the Xianle Palace, Xie Pui still did not figure out what method, the 
heart of the road, and can not think of the method is also okay, as long as 
he does not spend time with the flower city, the flower city will be aware 
of the clue. As long as things don't get back before that, it's good. Who 
knows, after closing the door, Jun Wu suddenly said: "Are you thinking 
about blood and rain?" 


The sentence of Jun Wu made him suddenly feel a guilty heart, and his 
heart beat wildly. 


Thank you for your answer, "Yes"? Will that Junwu be unfavorable to 
Huacheng? "No"? Junwu may not believe it. 


Seeing that he did not answer, Junwu smiled: "Don't worry, I know, you 
must think about him. You want to psychic with him." 


His tone of speech and thankfulness is as good as ever, gentle, inclusive, 
steady, reliable, without any change. But the more it is, the more confused 
and awkward it is. 


Listen to Jun Wu: "If you really want to, then you will have a spirit with 
him and talk." 


He guessed what Xie Pity had to think about when he entered the door. He 
knows everything! 


Junwu smiles unchanged, said: "Xianle, you know what to say, let him not 
worry too much. Your **** rain flower must be very happy that you go to 
find him psychic." 


Said, he put his hand on the shoulders of thank you. Xie pity felt a subtle 
volatility, knowing what magic tricks Jun Jun used, and can hear his 
psychic content. Even if you don't say it, you can hear it. And thank you 
naturally understand that Jun Wu wants to hear what he said. 


After a pause, he smacked his head and read the psychic password of 
Huacheng. 


When I heard the password, Junwu seemed to feel very interesting and 
smiled. Cherished but not in a mood of embarrassment or shame. Almost 
instantaneously, the voice of Huacheng rang in the ear. He sighed: 
"Brother, brother, after so long, you finally remembered Saburo, I am 
coming." 


Xie pity and Jun Wu eyes. He said: "Sanlang, I have only left less than an 
hour." 


Huacheng said: "In my opinion, the only point is ‘away’, not ‘one hour’. 
It’s a moment and it’s leaving.” 


Jun Wu can just listen to him! 


At the moment, the situation is so dangerous, but the pity is still a bit 
embarrassing. Jun Wudao: "It's a pity that he has to wait for more than one 
hour. Continue. Tell him that he won't see you until the Wraith is disposed 
of. Don't bend around and hint at him, I can hear it." 


After the resentment is finished, it is seven days and seven nights. After a 
pause, thank you: "You can't wait for an hour. If I have to spend a lot of 


time this time, what should I do?" 

Huacheng Road: "Junwu has given you a lot of tasks?" 
Thank you, "Yes." 

Huacheng Road: "I will help you." 


Jun Wudao: "Tell him to finish this task, I will promise you three years of 
leisure." 


Thanks to pity: "No, Saburo, you help me to keep that line, it 1s already a 
big help, let me come. The emperor has already said, after finishing this 
bunch of tasks, I can have three years. Leisure, nothing to do." 

Huacheng Road: "Just three years?" 

Thanks to pity: "Isn't it three years long? It's already a sweet little." 


"Okay. But-" 


He said leisurely: "Brother, this is your sweetness, then what about me?" 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 210: ALUM if 
BUSA BE2 


Thanks for your pity: "What... sweet?" 
Huacheng asked: "What do you say?" 


Xie pity can be imagined. When he asked this question, he raised his 
eyebrows, how to hold his mouth, and what he said. 


Huacheng said again: "Speaking of it, my brother still owes me a lot of 
mana. I remember it?" 


Thankful and prudent: "No." 


Huacheng Road: "So my brother thought about how to return it?" 


'..." thank you, "no..." 


Huacheng seemed to smile a little and said: "Since you didn't think of it, it 
would be better for me to decide? After this event was over, I got a 
vacation, and my brother slowly returned it to me. How?" 


Thanks to the side of picking up his tricks, while doing thieves guilty and 
constantly swearing Jun Wu, confusing: "Well, er..." 


Step by step to induce this point, got the desired answer, Huacheng finally 
satisfied, temporarily let him go, said: "So? Rare brother to find me 
psychic, what is it for?" 


Jun Wu stared at the pity. 


He let Xie pity and Huacheng psychic, in order to stabilize the flower city, 
so that he did not feel the abnormality so quickly, and stayed in the lower 
bounds honestly, thank you naturally know what he wants to hear, slowly 
said: "In fact, also Nothing, just afraid that you will be worried for a long 
time." 


Huacheng Road: "Hey, isn't it what your brother said? You haven't left for 
an hour, how can you be afraid of me?" 


Thanks for giving him a faint stun, nervous and a little funny. Suddenly, 
Huacheng said: "I understand." 


Thanks for breathing and stagnation, said: "What do you know?" 


There seemed to be a few laughs over there. Shun, Huacheng is slow and 
reasonable: "Brother, are you leaving soon, I think I think tight?" 


" " 


If you can still vaguely conceal it, this sentence is too red | naked, no 
matter how you pretend to be normal. Under Junwu’s examination, Xie’s 
face was still slightly hot, half awkward and whispered: “... um.” 


Huacheng also said: "I am the same. I really want to go with you now." 


While the heart of thankfulness is slightly hot, it is also hung high, and the 
eyes are on the king. 


If Huacheng really wants to come to Xianjing, how do you end it? How 
will Junwu deal with him? 


Thank you for suppressing your emotions and trying to be as natural as 
possible: "That's still not necessary. The heavens can be messed up now. If 
you come, they are afraid to be scared. Wait a second." 


Huacheng lazily said: "I know my brother, I won't go up and scare them. I 
hate the light that you are shining in Xianjing, and this circle still has me 
to be in town. I am here waiting for my brother to come back." 


Cheering does not know whether it is a sigh of relief or a sweat, saying: 
"Okay. Hey." 


Huacheng Road: "However, if I am jealous, my brother can't come back 
empty-handed. I have to pay for it." 


Thanks for your pity: "Sure, definitely." 


The two of them casually and unclely said a few words, and they broke the 
wire and repeated the other way, which ended the psychic. 


Xie pity gently spit out a breath, Jun Wu said: "It seems that Xianle has a 
wonderful time below." 


I don’t know what to answer. He patted the shoulders of the pity, turned 
and was about to leave the Xianle Palace, and Xie pity called behind him: 
"Emperor!" 


Jun Wu’s figure was stopped. Thanks to the pity: "Who are you? Is it an 
emperor? Or something else." 


Before he suspected that the national teacher might have nothing to do 
with white, he was somewhat unacceptable. And if Jun Wu and Bai Wu are 
not connected, he feels that the whole person has to be subverted. 


Jun Wu, but he is the most admired and longing for the first world of the 
Three Kingdoms! 


Jun Wu did not answer him and went out. Remaining thanks to being 
alone, while thinking about the countermeasures, while dragging the tired 
body, he came to the back hall of Xianle Palace. 


Although the Xianle Palace has become a prison cage, it is also a 
magnificent cage. There is also a white jade bath behind the temple. For so 
many days, thanks to the white ghosts, into the copper furnace, and to 
climb and beat, at this point, they have been exhausted physically and 
mentally. Anyway, they will not be able to walk the next step for a while. It 
is better to bathe yourself to wake up. 


I removed the clothes and immersed them in the warm water. I prayed at 
the Baiyu pool and absently folded my clothes. Suddenly, the clothes 
rolled out two small things in their arms and made a crisp sound. Thanks 
for looking at it, it is two exquisite and lovely nephews. 


He took the two donkeys and grabbed them in the palm of his hand, 
remembering what Huacheng said to him: "If you want to see me, no 
matter what time you throw, you can see me." 


In fact, he went to Hualing with the spirit of the city, there is already a 
very unnatural place, and perhaps the city will be aware. However, even if 
Huacheng found something wrong, he could not come up. Because 
Xianjing has been isolated from the world, it is under the control of 
Junwu. 


Although knowing the current situation, even if you miss two estimates of 
S1x points, you can't see Huacheng, but thank you for trying. The bones are 
full, the scorpion rolls on the jade on the edge of the bath, and the luck is 
still bad. Two points, there is no movement. 


Thanks, I sighed and turned back. I was about to bury my face and body in 
the water. Suddenly, I heard a voice: "Brother." 


He suddenly got up and screamed and brought out a splash: "Sanlang?" 
It’s hard to do, is it really calling Huacheng? ? ? 

However, looking around, he did not see any figures. However, it is 
definitely not the illusion that he gave birth to too much hope. Thanks to 


the heart, the heart is mad, and I heard another voice: "His Royal 
Highness!" 


Thank you for discovering that the voice actually came out of his mouth! 


That is his own voice, but in the hot airy white jade pool and the sound of 
the water, it is not really heard. Thank you for your pity for a while, and 
immediately became clear - move the soul! 


Thanks for the pity and joy, said: "The wind master?!" 


From his mouth, he spit out another person’s excited words: "Yes, it’s me! 
Hahahaha, I can’t think of it! This wind teacher, no, I have mana again!!!" 


As I said before, the movement of the soul is not commonly used, and the 
extreme burning power is stronger and more sinister than the psychic, so 
the conventional shielding field will not think of blocking this spell. When 
dealing with the vernacular true fairy, Shi Qingxuan and Xie Li used each 
other to move the soul. Later, Shi Qingxuan's mana was completely lost. 
His doorway to Xie's pity was unilaterally blocked. I did not expect it to 
come in handy. Thanks to pity: "Qing Xuan, the soul of the move is very 
burning mana, where did you come from?" When the voice just fell, he 
reacted, and where is the mana coming from? 


Sure enough, Shi Qingxuan said: "It’s a long story! It’s not too long. Your 
**** rain flower gave me a few black sugar **** to eat. It’s amazing! 
After I ate, I suddenly went up! It’s only temporary, but it’s also a bit of 
time. It’s not a problem to pass a word. It’s really strange, hey!” 


Xie pity couldn't help but think of the ghost candy ball that I had eaten. I 


want to come to the city where the hand should be a high-end mana sugar 
ball. He said: "Who was the brother who called that?" 


Teacher Qingxuan: "I am!" 
Thanks to pity and laugh, said: "What are you doing? I thought..." 
Shi Qingxuan: "Know, you thought it was a **** rain to find you, right?" 


Xie pity and a cough, Shi Qingxuan said: "I just told him to call you so. He 
said that you will know that he is coming, let you feel at ease." 


It was true that when he heard the "brother", he was shocked but more at 
ease. Thanks to pity: "Is he right beside you? Are you still in the Imperial 
City? Aren't those grievances suddenly?" 


Teacher Qingxuan: "The imperial city is doing well, and the grievances are 
still dying. Just now you and the **** rains and flowers are complete, and 
he smiled a while ago and didn't seem to know what to say to you. A 
broken face suddenly sinks to death, and then asks me to try to move to 


your side. Oh, right next to His Royal Highness, he told me to say: 'His 
Highness, put the clothes first.’ I have been doing it several times. What 
are you doing so? I won’t catch cold in the heavens." 


Xie pity almost didn't faint, and he grabbed the clothes and draped the 
upper body with the speed of the thunder, saying: "He, he, he, he, Sanlang, 
he can see?" 


Shi Qingxuan: "Yes. I always talk about it is very troublesome, so I 
immediately passed the sound that I heard here to him. I know what you 
do and what you say. It’s just him. I can't tell you directly or manipulate 
your body." 


Master Feng Shi, you are too hearty! ! ! 


I knew that I wouldn’t bathe. He thought that I had to think about it before 
I could turn around! 


Teacher Qingxuan: "There is nothing wrong with His Royal Highness. I 
didn't expect you to care about this kind of problem. Anyway, everyone is 
a man. Have you seen the flower city master before? And I haven't seen 
much..." 


He is really too hearty. Thanks for a slap in the palm of his forehead, 
quickly dressed the clothes, grabbed the scorpion out of the apse, and 
quickly transferred the topic: "Sanlang, how do you find it wrong?" 


Suddenly, Shi Qingxuan said: "Blood rain and flowers say that when you 
look for him, he will find out. Hey, this is the main flower city I told you: 
"Brother is so bad, is not a big event, how can I call me? Password?" 


Sure enough, this is the reason. Shi Qingxuan seems to be talking to 
Huacheng: "Well, I don't talk nonsense, I said something right." Again, 


"His Royal Highness, what is the situation on your side now? Is the 
emperor not there?" 


Xie Li did not know where to start, saying: "Because he is there, it will 
become like this!" 


The key point has been that Shi Qingxuan has been shocked: "My mother, 
my mother, my mother! Your Highness, Prince, are you really talking 
about your dreams?! Emperor, is that the emperor?!" 


Thanks to pity: "Is it impossible for him to determine it. Saburo, what do 
you think?" 


Speaking, Shi Qingxuan said: "The **** rain is not surprising, just saying, 
‘not strange. Seeing him early is not pleasing to the eye.’” 


Xie pity laughed and said: "Are you looking at who is not pleasing to the 
eye?" 


This sentence is said to Huacheng. Shi Qingxuan: "He said, 'Besides you, 
yes.' I said that the flower city owner, you are not right, I am still here! I 
am not pleasing to the eye? I really have where Wrong ???" 


Thanks to pity: "Well, it’s all joking. In short, the Valkyrie has been beaten 
by him. All the priests are locked up in their respective temples. The entire 
Xianjing is isolated from the world." 


Shi Qingxuan: "Blood rain and flowers say that it is not impossible to go 
to heaven, but you have to help alone." 


Thanks to the pity: "Who?" Then he shouted: "Who?!" 


The latter "Who" was not said to Huacheng and Shi Qingxuan, but because 
of the change from behind him. 


someone is coming! 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 211: Dividing 
the road to the soul 


If the evil has been taken off his wrist, he is ready to go, but he 1s dying 
after seeing the other side. Thanks to pity: "You... lead jade?" 


I don’t know when there was a big pit in which the two men entered and 
exited. The jade was half-body out of the pit, holding a sharp shovel in 
both hands, sighing and wiping the sweat, saying: "His Royal Highness, 
It’s me. Fortunately, I didn’t dig the wrong place, let’s go!” 


He actually forgot, there is an artifact in the hands of the jade - the 
geologist treasure shovel! This thing has not been searched, it is God to 
help him. It seems that sometimes it is a good thing to have too little sense 
of existence. For example, in a melee, the enemy will definitely not play 
this person specifically, but in contrast, our people may accidentally injure 
this person. Xie pity is going to pull him out, but the body is involuntarily 
stepping back. Leading jade strangely said: "His Royal Highness? What 
happened?" 


Xie pity is also strange, why is he going backwards? Immediately, he 
remembered, not the man who regressed, but the teacher who moved to his 
body. 


That is the geologist's shovel can be said to be very familiar, it is difficult 
to not think of the people who used it in the past, thank you for a moment 
of heartlessness, and think of Shi Qingxuan's subconscious reaction. 
Fortunately, the teacher Qing Xuan’s reaction was not too strong, and he 
quickly returned the initiative to Xie. Xie pity also forgot to ask who the 
person who can help the sky in Huacheng, and quickly jumped out of the 
pit, and fell into the ground of Xianjing together with the jade. 


The pothole above it will close in a moment. In the tunnel of the black 
hole, I climbed a short section of the road. Thanks to pity, I suddenly 
remembered something. "Is it a jade, 1s this shovel shovel, and you can dig 
into the realm of Xianjing?" 


Yin Yudao: "Don't wear it... right?" 
"what?" 


Shi Qingxuan: "That is to say that although this treasure shovel is an 
artifact, but it is still in Xianjing to dig it. Isn't that useless?" 


Yin Yu scratched his head and said: "There is no use of nothing... Now all 
the priests of the martial arts are set up outside the temple, which will 
weaken their mana and delay the recovery of their injuries. I thought, if I 
continue Staying in their temple, I am afraid that I will not be able to 
recover my strength in a few years. It is better to use a geologist to dig a 
secret room somewhere underneath, send all the gods to there, wait until 
the recovery is almost complete, and then try to get out. "" 


Shi Qingxuan: "Wait! The flower city owner said, you call that group of 
waste... that group of martial arts hide their own wounds, don't try to get 
out from the hands of Jun Wu, find death." 


Yin Yu was surprised to say: "His Royal Highness, you... can psychic with 
the city owner? Is it not impossible?" 


Thanks to the pity: "No, no, it’s not me who just spoke to you." 
Shi Qingxuan: "It's me, it's me, my lieutenant!" 


But it is also a mouth, and it’s a joke: "Is it you, or you, isn’t you, Your 
Royal Highness?" 


Teacher Qingxuan: "Oh, it is me, my wind teacher! No, now I should call 
me a former wind division. I used the soul-moving **. Hey, the message is 
really exhausted." 


He went here and listened to it, and then returned to the other side of his 
body to pass the heard to the flower city, into the | into | out and repeated, 
think about exhausted. Leading jade is busy: "Oh, oh, it’s hard work. It 
turns out!" More effort to dig the ground. After the two men marched 


forward for a while, Yin Yu said: "Here... it should be almost! Your 
Highness Prince is hiding here, I will pick up a priest." 


When the time came, the hole gradually closed, thanking the pity: "Ah? 
Are you going alone? I will go with you." 


Yin Yudao: "Still forever, it does not contradict the Prince of the Prince, 
the bigger the hole that the division shoveled, the more power it consumes. 
I may be able to hurry up. The nearest Wu Shen Temple 1s... ... " He seemed 
to think for a while, said, "In short, I will go back when I go." 


Shi Qingxuan repeatedly used the soul-moving **, and the tiredness of 
frequently consuming a lot of mana also infected with pity. He sat on the 
ground and nodded reluctantly. He felt a heavy head and body, with a hand, 
saying: "... ...it 1s good." 


So, the jade opened a new hole and continued to dig forward. Xie pity lay 
in the same place and squinted. 


I don't know how long it took, he suddenly woke up and said: 
"Introduction of jade?" 


Around the black hole, a dead silence. Obviously, the jade has not returned 
yet. Shi Qingxuan’s opening also confirmed this: “You are awakened by 
Your Royal Highness, is it tired? The jade has not come back yet.” 


Resting for a while, thanked the pity and regained his spirit, saying: "How 
long has he left, why haven't he returned yet?" 


Shi Qingxuan: "Quickly two incense, it won't get lost?" 
Xie Pity feels wrong, said: "I am going to find him." 


As he said, he rolled over and climbed to the hole that led the jade to 
leave. Because the jade is still coming back from this tunnel, the geologist 
shoveled it, the tunnel did not automatically close, and the pity crawled 
cautiously inside. Speaking, Shi Qingxuan said: "Blood rain flower said: 
‘Brother, you better not go.’” 


Thanks for stopping and crawling, said: "Is it a little bad?" 


Teacher Qingxuan: "Yes, I am very serious about listening to the flower 
city." 


Thanks to pity: "Because it is not good, you have to find it. Otherwise, if 
you encounter jade, what happens?" 


At this time, his back suddenly slammed a chill, thanked him for a 
moment, and suddenly turned back. 


Shi Qingxuan also felt the chill of his body and said: "My mother, what 
happened just now? There was a sudden sigh on the back!" 


Behind it is a black hole, an empty tunnel, and nothing. Xie Pity has been 
staring for a long time, only to say: "Nothing." 


Shi Qingxuan immediately shut up and held his breath. Because, after 
thanking the sentence after saying "nothing", he said five words silently 
and silently: "Don't say anything, someone!" 


There are other people in this tunnel. Just now, I was praying, but when he 
turned back, he disappeared. 


Xie's instinct for danger is never wrong, so you can't let the other person 
discover that he is aware of it and pretend to be fine. Shi Qingxuan hates 
this situation most, and he has a goose bump in his arm. He said, "Isn't it 
the next name?" 


Thanks to pity: "It is not necessary for him to be so sneaky." 
Silence for a moment, thankful and silent: "What does Sabura say?" 


Shi Qingxuan: "Hey, your Saburo looks so scared... He said, ‘Brother, if 
you have no choice but to move into the windshield with the soul of the 


999 


move. 


However, it does not say that his mana is not enough to display the soul- 
moving **, even if it is enough, thank you can not pat the **** and throw 


down the mess of Xianjing alone. Thanks for your pity: "Sanlang is 
relieved." 


Still did not say that he was relieved, he looked up again. In front! 


The dangerous feeling is still from the rear, but now it is from the front. I 
can see the past, but I can’t see anything black. Shi Qingxuan said in a 
mouthful manner: "What do you think of your Royal Highness? What 
should I do? Does this mean going forward or backward?" 


Looking at the scene for a moment, thanked the pity: "This shows that it is 
the same after going to the place, just casual." Then he climbed forward. 
Climbing and crawling, he stopped again, slightly stunned. 


Shi Qing Xuan love can not help but say: "How can this be?" 


Presented in front of his "peoples" is actually a fork in the road. There are 
two holes! 


Shi Qingxuan: "This... Is it possible to lead a jade to dig a road and find 
that it has been dug up and dug another one?" 


Thanks for your pity: "The jade is definitely familiar with the route of 
Xianjing. How can I dig it wrong? I am afraid it is even more terrible." But 
he did not say it, only said: "Qing Xuan, help me ask Saburo, which one to 
choose? Left or right?" 


Speaking, Shi Qingxuan said: "Blood rain and flowers say... This 
suggestion can't be given, 'No one should choose."" 


Thank you for your regret. Although he also feels that there are bad things 
waiting for the two roads to wait, but he can't always stay in the same 
place, thinking for a moment, saying: "That Qing Xuan, choose one." 


Shi Qingxuan: "Ah? Me?" 


Thanks for your pity: "Well. If you choose, there are still 50% who may 
choose the better one; if you let me choose..." Shi Qingxuan immediately 
said: "Okay, I understand." For a moment, turn your head to the left. 


Cheer nodded and climbed in. 


The deeper the hole, the narrower the tunnel is, and it is hard to breathe, 
but it can still pass. After climbing for a while, it became clear that I came 
to a larger space. 


Fortunately, although I was afraid of the road, I did not encounter any real 
danger. Xie pity looked around for a moment and said: "Where 1s this?" 


Shi Qingxuan wondered: "I don't know, I can't see clearly. But how do you 
feel, it seems a bit familiar... Ah?!" 


Not only did he find out, but also thanked him. 


Sure enough! Isn't it just a matter of thanking and lying down for a while, 
waiting for the underground secret room to lead the jade back? ! 


It’s true. On the other side, there is a hole in the ground, which 1s the one 
that was opened by the shovel when the jade leaves. Xie Pity also climbed 
out of this hole to find him! 


Shi Qing Xuan Mao said: "How come we are back again? Just here...Is 
there a tunnel that we climbed back?!" 


of course not! When they left, there was only one tunnel in the bottom of 
the chamber. The tunnel that they climbed back was not known when it 
was out of thin air. The fork where they met, the road on the left circled a 
big circle and came back! 


This is certainly not to open the jade, he will not spend so much effort to 
quietly do this meaningless thing. Businessros, I also encountered very 
strange things. Thanks for your pity, I just had to go with them. I didn’t 
say anything. I climbed out of the tunnel where they went out and quickly 
climbed to the fork. This time, I chose the hole on the right. Climbing and 
crawling, Shi Qingxuan said: "It seems that this time, my luck is not good 
enough to go, choose the wrong way. You should choose the right side at 
the beginning!" 


Thanks for the pity: "No, I think your luck is still very good." 
Teacher Qingxuan: "Ah? How?" 


Thank you for your euphemism: "How do you say... formation, the road on 
the right may be more horrible than the one on the left..." 


Both of them heard, from behind them, there was something that " and 


" quickly crawled and approached. 


Xie pity to solve the evil, then go back, said: "If the evil first help stop!" 
Then struggling to climb forward, almost a slap, Shi Qingxuan nervously 
lost wisdom, said: "Ha Hahahaha stimulates stimulation! Stimulates 
stimulation!" 


Thanks to the pity: "More exciting has not come yet! Come! Please see -!" 
Shi Qingxuan: "What is it?" 


Xie pity stopped mad crawling, spit out a long breath, only in front of the 
two, there was another fork in the road! 


Shi Qingxuan Hu chaos: "Right!" 


Xie pity decisively turned to the right, and then along the way, there is a 
constant crossroads, Shi Qingxuan: "Left! Right! Left! Right!" I don't 
know what I am shouting, in this critically fast and ever-changing 
situation. Next, it is simply too late to withdraw the body of thankfulness 
and go back to ask the flower city what to do, because it is very likely that 
the next fork will be turned around and the situation will be completely 
different. The thing behind him was blocked by Ruo, but it was still 
approaching. The tunnels on both sides are getting narrower and more 
sturdy, and eventually, they have reached the point where they can't move 
their arms! 


The shoulders of thank you have been stuck, saying: "I can't climb!" 


Shi Qingxuan: "What should I do?! Is it still going backwards?!" The thing 
that is chasing the back is already catching up! 


Thanks to pity: "Don't be afraid! The husband can bend and stretch, if he 
doesn't advance, he will retreat, and he will retreat! Come!" He said that 
he took two steps and made a hand, and was about to hold the heart of the 
hilt and chase behind him. The thing in front of the battle was so happy 
that the scalp suddenly cooled. 


The heart of thankfulness also followed the cold half. Looking up, I didn’t 
see what it was, but it seemed that someone was laughing in the darkness 
and put a hand on Xie’s head. He widened his eyes and lost consciousness 
in the next moment. 


I don't know how long it took, he just woke up. 


After waking up, thank you for discovering that he was sitting on a chair 
and the whole body was tied tightly. After earning two, he discovered that 
it was evil if he was tied to him. 


Xie pity inexplicably said: "If evil, what are you doing?" 


If the evil is also aggrieved, he will smash him. Thank you for a closer 
look, if the evil was actually hit a tight knot. 


It is no wonder that if evil can't resist, it is most afraid of being beaten to 
death. When I was not sensible, I liked to play around with myself. When I 
played and played, I played myself with a bunch of messy knots. Every 
time I thanked him for help, and then I learned it, and I was smart. I never 
made myself dead again. Thanks for helplessness, and tried to be able to 
directly break the chair, but unfortunately, the chair does not move, it 
seems that it was infused with mana. 


Since it can't move, let's observe the surrounding environment first. 
Thanks for looking around, here should be the interior of the temple, quite 
new and gorgeous, just do not know which one is, anyway, not the temple 
of the gods. 


Just thinking about it, one hand was placed on his shoulder, and one person 
on the top of his head sighed: "Xinle, Xianle, you are so naughty." 


Hearing this voice, thanked the scalp for a while. The man behind him 
turned his hand and turned out to be Jun Wu. 


His hand is still on the shoulders of Xie, one step at a time, saying: "You 
have come up for half a year, Xianjing is here is broken, there is bad, here 
you are here, you said, you are naughty, not naughty? Not a little mouse. Is 
it fun to drill holes in the underground?" 


This kind of gentleness, kindness, as 1f the elders looked at the 
affectionate younger generations, the hustle and bustle of the voice made 
the pity creepy, very uncomfortable, I really don't know how to talk to 
him. Then, suddenly I felt cold in my feet and looked down. I saw a bunch 
of white things clinging to his boots and staring at him with an extremely 
evil look. 


It is the fetal spirit. 


Thanks for raising his head, probably guessed it. The jade was used by the 
geologist to dig the pit, but it was caught by Junwu. When Junwu sent 
something to the underground, he encountered a terrible experience. 


Xie Li finally knows what to say, silent for a while, saying: "...you are 
really bad and extremely interesting." 


The chase of the hole in the field reminded him of the days when he was 
chased by the white phase and gasped. If you want to catch him, you can 
catch it directly. Why do you have to make that horrible and scary? 


Jun Wu looks very happy and smiles: "Xianle is much more brave than it 
was at the beginning." 


I can't answer this, thank you: "What about jade?" 


Jun Wu’s hand was placed on the back of the chair, helping him turn the 
whole direction. “No, you will see it. And, not only have him.” 


Thanks for turning a circle, facing a mirror, but the mirror reflected not 
him, but pale pale jade. 


At his feet, there is still a person lying down, his head broken blood, his 
nose and face swollen, and he was unconscious. He could only recognize it 
from the full curl, and it was a true right. 


Xie pity immediately vigilantly said: "What do you want to do?" 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 212: Can't 
make a good decision 


In the mirror, the other side of the wall is reflected. Over there, the 
introduction of jade madness pushes the truth, said: "Wake up, wake up?" 


It’s so easy to wake up, and I’m confused: “Oh, brother, just beat me? Li?” 


... Poor Qiying, who has been beaten up, can't help but feel pity. Yin 
Yudao: "I have played you..." 


Right one really caught the hair, and this only came to mind: "Oh, the four 
emperors hit me." Like suddenly thinking of something, and excited, "He 
took Li's shovel. I want to help Lee get back? ?" 


Leading jade: "Have you played him..." 


Thanks for the last time, here is the Qiying Hall. It seems that the 
introduction of jade was caught by Jun Wu when he came to find the right. 


Yan Junwu went around him again, thanking him for bowing his head and 
silently saying: "I am still a master of the wind, are you still?" 


Who knows, did not wait for Shi Qingxuan, but waited for Jun Wu. Jun 
Wu said behind him: "Of course not." 


Jun Wudao: "I suddenly remembered that there seems to be a loophole in 
Xianjing's locks. So, I just banned the move." 
Jun Wu patted the shoulders of the pity, and said kindly: "I thought that 


this time, this soul is still taught to you, and I am really happy to learn 
how to use it." 


When he finished, he went out. After a while, the figure of Jun Wu 
appeared in the mirror. Quan Yizhen took the lead to notice: "!" 


The jade also turned sharply and warned: "Imperial?!" 


When Quan Yi jumped up, he was eager to try. Jun Wu took him to the 
couch with his hand, and the whole bed was shot down. Quan Yizhen was 
lying directly on the ground, and the first one was unconscious. Leading 
the jade to guard, Jun Wu said: "You don't have to be so alert. You have to 
think so, even if you are alert, there is no use, why not relax?" 


This is the truth. I don’t know what to say, but I have to habitually laugh 
and take it. Junwu is very leisurely and natural, said: "Introducing jade, I 
used to think that I have never talked with you before, is it?" 


Yin Yu is very cautious: "...1t seems like this." 


Although he used to guard the Western Valkyrie in the past, his grade is 
not high, the incense is not strong, and his status is not high. Although it is 
not at the bottom of the gods in the heavens, it 1s probably also in the 
middle and lower, and there is almost no chance to be so close to the 
highest **** of Emperor Wu. Probably the former Junwu passed through 
the door of his temple. He was nervous. Now he is more nervous. He said: 
"But many of the gods in the heavens have never talked to me and don't 
know me." 


Jun Wu said: "That may not be. Many people know you. Even if you have 
not seen you, you know you." 


Leading the jade, he said, "Yes." 


Jun Wudao: "Because, many people know your younger brother. And when 
you mention your younger brother, you will often be brought up with him. 
As the foil." 


This can be very stinging. Although it is just a statement without feeling 
guilty, it is because the narrator himself is not prejudiced, but only 
describes the facts, so it is even more stinging. Quan Yizhen still fainted 


and never returned to God. He led the jade and lowered his head and shook 
his fist. 


Xie pity faintly guessed what Junwu wanted to do. 


For a long time, Yin Yu has a courage, said: "Emperor, what do you want 
to do? You are already the Emperor of God, the heavens, the first **** of 
the Three Realms, no one can compare your position, why do you want to 
do this? You What the hell...what do you want?" 


Of course, Jun Wu did not answer him. Suddenly said: "Introduction of 
jade, do you want to go back to heaven?" 


"what?!" 


Thanks also gave this question a surprise. What do you want to do? What 
is the point of persuading jade at this juncture? ? ? 


Jun Wudao: "You don't like to be a ghost in the lower bounds." 


The jade finally reacted, saying: "You think more, there is nothing you like 
or dislike." 


Thank you for your poor feelings: "You can't answer this. I am afraid I will 
get a flaw in this!" 


Sure enough, Jun Wu smiled and said: "Do you know, if you answer this, 
the meaning is equal to saying: “Yes, I don’t like it, avoid talking.’ 


Not bad. If Yin Yu’s heart is really very emboldened, I really like the 


position in the ghost world now, and I will directly answer “T like it very 
much”. And to avoid its edge, the answer is very obvious. 


Junwu said: "You are born in a famous door, the sect is orthodox, never 
walks outside the evil demon, and is the leader of the faction. From 


childhood, you can see it as a lifelong desire. This kind of pursuit is hard 
to change. It can only be said that it is a last resort, helpless. You certainly 
can't say that you are very satisfied with the position in the ghost world. 
Because this is not what you want." 


The introduction of the jade is really insufficient, weak and weak: "The 
city owner has grace in me, saved me..." 


Jun Wudao: "I know. I also helped you to surpass the grievances of Jianyu 
on the way to the beggar, is it?" 


Yin Yudao: "...not bad, so no matter if I am not satisfied with the current 
position, all..." 


Jun Wudao: "That is not satisfied. However, you are bound to grace, and 
you have no way to go, so you are stubborn." 


Leading jade bowed his head. Thanks for the sweat in his heart. 


He has been able to guess how Jun Wu intends to attack, and every look, 
every movement, from head to toe, is a flaw! 


Jun Wudao: "So, in turn, I will ask you another question: Are you really 
right in the right?" 


Junwu said: "Why do you have someone to be kind to you, you have to put 
yourself in an undesirable position and loyalty, and you have a right in the 
right, but he let you fall to this point? 


"Introducing jade, always getting used to grievances and fulfilling others 
is not a good habit. You know, no one will thank you." 


He is pressing harder and step by step, stepping on the most painful point 
of attracting jade every step! 


Jun Wu continued: "You have been eager to fly up the road in your life. 
You are eager to be in a good position in the heavenly court, and you will 
be in the Temple of the Gods. Even if the power is really embarrassing to 
you, it will be his foil, the gods." The laughing stock, you are still 
struggling in Xianjing, isn’t it just to stay here? 


"You belong here. But Quan Yi really messed up everything, and then 
easily took everything that should belong to you. 


"Why? 


"You don't have much to pay for him? No, you pay more than he does. 
And. If you really want to talk about the overall talent, he may not be 
comparable to you. Why is Qi Ying alone in heaven? Because his mind is 
simple, I don’t know, I’m rampant, I can’t convince the public. And you 
are more mature than his mind. He knows more than humanity. He can 
work harder than him. If he has his talent, his mana, your success will be 
bigger than him. Many times, it is more convincing." 


The jade is somewhat unsettled, saying: "What do you mean by these 
things? I don't understand. 'If' is meaningless, his mana is his..." Suddenly, 
he shouted and raised himself. The hand, panic: "What?! What is this?!" 


He suddenly burst into a dazzling white light on one hand, glaring to the 
point of view. Jun Wu was indifferent and said: "Don't be afraid, just a 
mana." 


This is a little calm and unbelievable: "Who's mana?...my? I don't have 
that..." He didn't have such a strong mana. 


Junwu said: "It is not yours now. Will it become yours, it depends on how 
you choose." 


Yin Yudao: "Who isn't that who is mine?! Is it..." 


He suddenly remembered one person and looked to the side. At this time, 
the vitality of the incompetent power was once again awake, and his face 


looked blank and seemed confused. Jun Wudao: "Yes, this is the right 
manpower." 


Right one true: "Ah?" 


Yin Yudao: "Why is his mana here? How can mana graft? How can this be 
done?!" 


Junwu said: "Even life can be grafted, what is the power of mana? A lot of 
things are not as difficult as you think. The superior officer has a few 
words and a few pens." 


Yin Yu said: "This... this...!!" 


He licked his hand, as if he wanted to get rid of what hot potato, and the 
powerful mana jumped cheerfully on his hand, pointing to where to fight, 
when he was, the row of walls of the Qiying Hall was blown up by him, 
and the statue fell. When planted, the roof will almost collapse. The jade 
was even more shocked, and I dared not to sneak again. Junwu smiled and 
said: "Don't be nervous, take your time, and collect it." 


Yin Yu held the hand with the other hand, and his face was still unsettled, 
and both arms were shaking. Junwu said: "Introducing jade, I will ask you 
again, do you want to come back?" 


Yin Yu breathed a few breaths, his eyes covered with bloodshot eyes, 
looking at him. Jun Wudao: "If you want to come back, I can not only help 
you get rid of the curse, but also get the right manpower to you." 


Quan Yizhen seems to have never thought of this evil law, and the whole 
person has been shocked. Thanks for the pity: "??? mad?!?!" 


Jun Wu slowly said: "From now on, only those who know that Qi Ying 
does not know the jade will never appear. Who will dare not remember 
your name? Never." 


" 


Leading jade back a few steps, chaos: "I... I... I... 


The spirit of thankfulness is so stretched that even if I am tied to a chair, I 
don’t remember it. I hold my breath, grab the chair with both hands, and 
lean forward. 


At least one point, Junwu said yes. He also can see that the bottom of the 
jade is indeed more yearning for heaven. He was originally in heaven, and 
this is deeply ingrained from the urine and difficult to change. 


Moreover, does the introduction of jade really have no resentment for 
Quan Yizhen? 


Not necessarily. 


Between the people who have had such a lot of things, the phrase "I don't 
hate you at all" is no way to say so easily. This kind of "hate" can be big or 
small, and the jade itself is not a person with a firm character. How he 
wants to do it, the influence of others is not small. Because there is not 
much overlap, thank you can not be sure, what will be done in the 
introduction of jade, can only silently pray in the bottom of my heart. 


Introducing His Royal Highness... Be careful! 


Leading jade is a good soul, sitting down and rubbing his face. For a long 
while, I finally lifted my face and my eyes gradually cooled down. 


He stared at the right to be smashed into a pile of junk. For a long time, he 
whispered: "...[mperial, you, really... can you give me all his mana?" 


The heart of thankfulness sank, and Quan Yizheng opened his mouth and 
said: "... Brother?" 


Junwu said: "It is better to change it to you now. If you try it yourself, you 
can tell me if I can." 


The jade seems to be not at ease, and asks: "So... can he still take it back? 
After all, it is his own mana, if he wants to take it back..." 


Jun Wu said: "Unless you are willing to give it back to you, or if you die, 
it is impossible to recapture." 


The jade jailed: "If you graft the mana to me, the power is true... will it 
die? What will happen..." 


In any case, he probably still doesn't want to let the power die in his hands. 
Jun Wudao: "It won't be like, but the process will be more painful, but who 
hasn't suffered in this world? How do you deal with him, want to die, and 
see you." 


The jade again said: "What about other priests? There is a priest in the 
heavens who saw the scene before the temple of Shenwu, if it was passed 
out..." 


Jun Wu smiled and said: "How do you know? It is all the ants that can be 
crushed by one hand. All of them are gone. For a new group of priests, you 
will change your face and change your name to make a birth. Who knows? 
what." 


When he said this sentence, he looked down on it, as if he said that the tea 
was cold, he poured a new one, and made a light stroke. 


Finally, Yin Yu said: "In the new heaven, I, what is my identity?" 


Jun Wudao: "Linwen is my left hand, you are the right hand. You are 
above, except me no one else." 


Leading jade a bite, finally, said: "...good!" 


He said: "Please ask the emperor to remember today's commitment to me. 
So, now..." 


He did not say anything, but his eyes turned to the right, and Wu Wu said: 
"As you wish." 


When the voice just fell, Quan Yizhen suddenly turned his face and shook 
it. He screamed and screamed, and his head rolled and rolled. It seemed to 
be very painful, and the body that attracted jade gave a sudden aura. 


His entire face was reflected, and he raised his hand and hit it upwards. 
The Qiying Hall collapsed! 


A large hole was opened in the Golden Temple, standing in the ruins, and 
the jade looked down at his hands and slowly clenched his fists. Junwu’s 
look is like watching a young child try his newly bought doll, saying: 
“How do you feel?” 


For a long while, the jade said: "... I have never had such a powerful 
force." 


He looked at the right to scream on the ground and looked complicated. He 
said: "My master said a word before. He said that the right 1s a person who 
is born to be soaring. It is the skill given by Heaven. This is what Heaven 
gives. Divine power?" 


Jun Wudao: "Since then, it is yours." 
The jade slowly nodded. 
The next moment, lift a palm and smash the past! 


This palm uses the power of a true ten-tenth, power, and a burst of white 
light in the mirror. Immediately, Yin Yu quickly drew a large aperture in 
the air, and then grabbed the circle from the air and put it in the middle. 
Jun Wu saw the aperture under his feet, slightly frowning, seemingly a 
little jealous, cautiously not touching, and saw the right to lead the jade to 
pull the ground, not moving, said: "Introducing jade, retreating, you have 
no Anything to explain to me?" 


" " 


Yin Yu back to him to take up the right, do not answer. Junwu said: "Of 
course, it can be sorrowful and sentimental. But is this really your heart? 
You have been reluctant for hundreds of years, and will continue to 
reluctantly continue to do so now?" 


" " 


"Do you really hate the person you are saving now? If you don't hate, don't 
you hate it?" 


The jade can't help it anymore. 


He clenched his fists, creaked, and turned sharply. He said, "I hate! I 
hate!!! But what about it?!" 


Right 1s really excited, while talking and squirting blood from the nose 
and mouth, said: "Sister..." 


Yin Yu said: "Shut up!!!" 


He turned to Junwu again and said: "You...you...you! Why do you remind 
me of this?! It’s as if you all know me! Yes, I hate him! But, then How?! 
He has added so much trouble to me, I hate him, can't he??" 


Thanks to a heart sinking to the bottom of the valley and throwing high, 
crying and laughing, almost fell. What 1s this reason? ! 


Next, the jade again said: "...but...but I also...I just want to hate hate, it 
doesn't mean I must hurt him. What is 'something that belongs to me'? 
Nothing is beyond talent. Things are born to be who they belong to. Other 
things, I don't want!!" 


Thanks to the light, he shouted out: "Say well!" 

Yin Yu said again: "I want to go back to heaven, I want to be in the top ten! 
But! If it wasn't for me, it would have no meaning at all! I am unlucky, I 
recognize it! If I don't have him, Then I can at least admit that I really 
didn't have him! 


"Admit that I am not as good as him, not so difficult!" 


arrogant! 


At this moment, Xie Li finally looked at the jade and saw the brilliance 
and arrogance of his youth! 


"Wow", Quan Yi really cried on his back, blood mixed with tears and nose 
blowing together, and the jade sprayed him with blood on his face, 
collapsed: "Don't spray!!!" 


The right is really authentic: "Senior, sorry!" 


Yin Yu couldn’t bear to say: "You don't have to say sorry to me! Anyway, 
you still don't understand how to apologize. I really have enough of you..." 


Jun Wu sighed and licked his temple. Leading jade again: "But the 
situation... and I am not nothing. You said, on the overall talent, he may 
not be comparable to me. I have my own..." 


Hey. 


Jun Wu turned around and waved, saying: "Wonderful. I think, you and 
Xianle must have talked very much." 


what happened? 
what happened? ! 


Xie Li was tied to the chair, and the heart jumped out of the chest. What 
happened to the jade? ! 


He just didn't talk, and his face became very strange. And Jun Wu took the 
hand and took the seemingly powerful aperture without hesitation. He did 
not receive any slight resistance. He said: "How much I guess you will 
answer this. So, I did not give you a curse first. ” 


Curse? ! 


In the hands of the jade, there is indeed a curse! Xie pity quickly looked at 
the past, and the jade also raised his wrist. 


I saw that the original curse of the original circle tightened a lot, as if to 
break the hand of the jade, and the whole arm of the jade has become 
paper-like white, and the white is still Continue to spread upwards. 


This curse is actually sucking his blood! 


Thanks and pity, he rushed forward, and even the man fell to the ground 
with his chair. This way, even the mirror could not be seen. He struggled 
wildly on the ground, but it was useless. He could only hear the sound of 
screaming in the mirror. 


After a while, a pair of white boots appeared in front of him, but Junu 
came back. 


He had a "curse" that was full of blood and turned into a deep red color. He 
should have taken it from the jade. He knelt down and touched the head of 
thankfulness and said: "And your children. Go to the individual." 


If the evil knot is finally released. Xie pity got up and punched a punch on 
his face. Of course, he didn't hit it. He almost fell again, but he didn't 
expect to hit Zhongjun, but he vented his anger and ran to the next door. 


I saw that the jade was lying on the ground, white and thin, like a piece of 
paper, the cheeks dried up a lot, the aura of the body disappeared, and the 
face turned back and the face was swollen several times, and it was 
completely unrecognizable. The right to face is true. It seems that those 
mana have returned to the original owner. 


Thanks for the past: "Introduction to His Royal Highness!!!" 


Leading jade with a pair of eyes that are more abrupt than usual, seeing 
him, dumb voice: "His Royal Highness..." 


Quan Yizhen screamed on the ground and cried, Yang Tian said: "I am 
sorry brother, I will only fight, but I can't beat him!" 


The blood of his mouth and nose was sprayed on the face and eyes of the 
jade, and it was very uncomfortable to look at it. The amount of jade on 


the forehead suddenly burst into the blue veins, and returned to the light 
and shouted: "Let you not spray!! Hey! It’s ...... I’m mad at me, forget it...” 


He was too weak to go on. In this case, thank you for not knowing, he 
wants to sigh more, or wants to shed tears, or actually wants to endure. 


Suddenly, the eyes of the jade are filled with tears. 
He whispered: "I know." 


He said: "I am a strange person, I am a mediocrity. The highest can only 
go that step. I know." 


Thanks for the pain, the pain of spreading powerless. 


Yin Yudao said: "Although I know, I am still not reconciled. In fact, I think 
the same with Jian Yu. Iam more reconciled than him. I am not without 
resentment, no resentment 1s impossible. I will not later I dare to think, at 
that time, why did I know that I was wearing a cloak, and said that he was 
going to die. Is it because he was so angry that he lost his reason, or did he 
really want him to die?" 


Thank you for holding me. "It's okay. It's all trivial. Really. Let's take your 
life in this world for a few hundred years. You know that these are really 
nothing." I have to lose my mind, I really want to let people die, just 
casually. Who hasn’t thought about it? I thought about killing the world, 
it’s true, I don’t want you to say, I'll almost do it. Now, you see that I am 
not very cheeky to live now. You finally did nothing, this is the most 
important thing." 


Leading Yu Road: "But... Finally I... I still feel that... I am not willing." 


He choked: "Since I have already made up for me to be a stunning person, 
at least, I... want to be a good and innocent person. But... I still can't do it. 
Really... too unwilling. To tell the truth, even at this moment, I thought 
that I was because this silly boy died, I still can't swallow this breath. I 
can't do it without regrets and regrets. What is this?" 


Thank you very much: "Your Highness, you have worked very hard. And, 
you have done a good job. It is much better than most people." 


The jade finally smiled and said: "Is it better than most people?" 


After laughing, he sighed, and finally the voice of regret passed away with 
the soul, muttering: "But, what I want to do is God..." 


Xie pity deeply bowed his head and said: "But, under the imperial jade, 
there is no **** in this world..." 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 213: Break the 
deadlock and send gifts in time 


Suddenly, the flash of his mind flashed, and he politely let go of the jade 
and stood up. He said, "... curse. He took the curse!" 


If that thing doesn't matter, Junwu certainly won't take it specially, but he 
specially took the curse that was full of blood and took it away. Maybe, 
that thing not only sucked the blood of the jade, but also Imprisoned his 
soul! 


Thinking of this, Xie Pity left the nose and face swollen right to go back to 
the Chiying Temple. However, Jun Wu was no longer there, and he turned 
and rushed out. 


Xianjing Street, empty, is desolate. Only the guards of the great temples 
that have been raging in the past have been guarded by many 
expressionless guards, as if they did not put him in the eye. Xie pity did 
not put them in the eyes, went straight to the Temple of God. 


Sure enough, Jun Wu returned here, sitting on the treasure hall, still 
watching the curse. When Xie pity rushed in, he heard a strange noise 
coming from the top. He looked up and saw that the four feet of the fetus 
were caught on the gorgeous ceiling. They were crawling upside down, as 
if they were some kind of cold-blooded creature. cold. 


Even this kind of evil can enter the Temple of God, I really don't know 
what the priests who are struggling to enter here for hundreds of years will 
feel what they think. Thanks for the pity to go over and rush to him, Junwu 
said: "What do you want?" 


Xie pity does not say anything, and the hand will go to win the curse, and 
Jun will certainly not let him get what he wants. Thank you for not being 
able to grab it for a long time, and angered: "What do you want to use this 
thing? The jade will not pose a threat to you at all. He is not important to 
you. What do you want to tell him?" What else is left with this thing?!" 


Jun Wu said: "Who said it is useless? Seeing that you are so angry for this 
thing, does it mean that it is very useful?" 


He is like an adult who puts the fruit on a table that his son can't reach. He 
smiles at the child and wants to eat it. He can't get it, but he can't get it. He 
is angry and anxious, and he cries, then he I am happy. Thank you for 
being mad: "Are you sick?!" 


Jun Wudao: "Xianle, you talk to me like this, but you are disrespectful." 
Thanks for a long time, I couldn’t help myself. I said, "I respect you..." 


It is estimated that all the swearing words in his life are directed at this 
person. Who knows, this sentence has not finished, his throat suddenly 
tightened, a suffocation! 


Thanks to the black eyes, his hands clenched his neck, his knees soft, and 
he squatted down. Jun Wu sat in front of him and calmly touched the 
sparse, smooth and rounded head of the baby's hair. The palm of his hand 
gave off black air. The fetal spirit seemed to be very pleasant and 
eccentric. 


Listening to Xie Pity, a series of violent coughing sounds, his face rose 
red, Jun Wu said: "Xianle, I suggest that you still be as obedient, 
respectful, so that you will not make me angry. Don't forget, You also wear 
this thing on your body. And, you wear two." 


"Cough, cough, cough... you...!" 


Thanks and pity, he straightened his waist and his eyes filled with blood. 
Jun Wudao: "What do I? 1am mean? Xianle, don't forget, it is your own 
request." 


Just kidding, how did he know what it was! 


It’s hard to be done. At that time, when the National Teacher saw him, his 
face changed his neck. He didn’t want to kill him. He wanted to take this 
thing down. 


After a long while, the curse on the neck was gradually released, and 
finally I could breathe smoothly. He gasped his back against Jun, and 
subconsciously licked his neck and touched the curse. This touch, in 

addition to cursing, touched another thing. 


It is a thin silver chain. It was originally cold, because it had been worn for 
too long, and it had already been warmed by his body temperature. Under 
the silver chain, a crystal-clear ring is falling. 


After touching it, the pitiful shoulders froze and clenched the ring. 
Somehow, the heartbeat swelled up as if 1t had caught a secret. At this 
time, behind the monarch: "I am, what?" 


It's him? What? What do you mean? 


Thanks for putting the silver chain back, and frowning. Turning around 
and discovering that the sentence of Jun Cai, I did not say to him. 


Jun Wu is lifting his **** and reaching the temple. In this position, he is 
psychic with people! 


Although he does not allow other gods in Xianjing to psychic, he wants to 
be unrestricted. After a pause, Jun Wu said: "Nothing. Because the 
previous day I found out that the teacher is an impostor, and I have also 
found many eyeliners and false identities that he buried in Xianjing. 
Recently, it is an eventful autumn. Nothing can be leaked out, so the whole 
priest is being checked one by one. The entire sacred Kyoto is martial, not 
open to the outside world, nor psychic with the outside world. Of course 
you can't find other people." 


Thanks for a few breaths, holding his breath. 


It sounds like the one who 1s at the moment with Jun Wu, who doesn't 
know what the situation is now, so Jun Wu is deceiving each other if 
nothing happens. Moreover, the excuse he sought was very subtle and 
appropriate. Blackwater impersonated everything, and the impact was bad. 
It is worthy of attention. The martial law in the court is also reasonable. 


Even if he shouted and shouted, the people there could not hear his voice, 
so he decided to wait and see. For a long time, Jun Wu’s face suddenly 
flashed a slight faint color. 


He sighed: "Oh? Are you coming to Xianjing? Of course, this incident is 
indeed a small event. You have the heart to help, and naturally welcome." 


The other party actually offered to come to Xianjing to help! 


If it is a few hours earlier, it is natural to ask for it, and there is a shortage 
of people at the moment. But at this time? The entire Xianjing has been 
turned into a magic cave, this is not to jump into the fire pit! 


There was a few simple sentences over there, ending the psychic, and 
prayed immediately: "Who is coming?" 


The fetus seemed to know that it was something that could not be seen, 
and creeped into the darkness and hid it. Jun Wu smiled and said: "What 
are you worried about? You will know later." 


This is beyond his expectation. Thanks to pity: "Do you let me see? You 
are not talking to the other party, the whole sacred Kyoto is martial law, 
are you checking the major priests one by one?" 


Jun Wudao: "Of course. I have to have a trustworthy left and right hand." 


Lingwen is at large in the outside world, and naturally can't play the right 
hand of Junwu, so this errand falls on Xie's head. He was thinking about it, 
and Jun Wu looked at him for a moment, and he sighed: "Xianle, you can 
cooperate with it, don't move anything else, I know you too well, I can 
know what you think." 


Junwu intentionally or unintentionally played with the curse that was full 
of blood, and said: "You also said, for me, the introduction of jade is of no 


importance. It should be said that all the gods and gods of this fairy capital 
are here. It doesn't matter. If you show up, you know what will happen." 


"So, don't show up. Fill yourself up and come right away." 


Xie Pity did not speak, but climbed up from the ground and patted the ash 
on his body. It really sank himself and stood at the position of Jun Wu who 
always stood. 


Jun Wu applauded: "That's it." 


Although Junwu’s threat was effective, Xie pity also discovered one thing 
—he did not seem to want to let people know the facts of the fall of 
Jingjing. This makes him want to know more about who 1s coming! 


After the two musk, in front of the Shenwu Temple, finally appeared 
several figures. I saw a Tsing Yi female crown riding a tall black cow, 
hanging a sword at the waist, walking around, followed by a few farmers, 
tall and thin and thin. 


It turned out to be a rain teacher! 


Thanks for the slightest surprise. According to Junwu's acting style - after 
the exposure of the style of work, God blocked the killing of the Buddha to 
stop the Buddha, it should be one to close one, why would you avoid the 
rain? 


It is naturally unknown now. Upon entering the Temple of the Gods, the 
Rainman decapitated to the two: "His Royal Highness, Emperor, don't 
come innocent." 


Thanks for your pity, nothing to do, but also to return to the ceremony: 
"The Rain Master." 


He was polite on the face, but he was not shocked, but he was thinking 
about it. How can he tell the rain teacher what the real situation of 
Xianjing 1s? 


Jun Wudao: "The rain teacher has not come to Xianjing for a long time." 


The rain teacher answered the question and said: "Xinjing has a strict 
martial law." 


This sentence seems to be strange, Jun Wu said: "It is also helpless. Since 
the black water incident, Zhongtianting has already set off more than 50 
false priests, which makes people have to worry whether there is any chess 
piece he has buried in heaven. "" 


Rainy said: "It turns out." 


A few people simply said for a while. Thanks to this, I found out that 
Junwu’s words, no matter whether it’s true or not, are all leaking, no flaws, 
and extremely powerful. He has a heartfelt reminder, but once he is afraid 
of being arrested by Junwu, he will take other priests to open the knife. 
Secondly, he is afraid of implicating the uninformed sorcerer. The rain 
teacher also seems to have no abnormalities at all, just asking if there is 
anything she needs to help. Junwu said: "There is no time. However, after 
the investigation is completed, I am afraid there will be a lot." 


Yu Shi said: "So, I will stay in Xianjing first, waiting for the summon." 


Jun Wu kept smiling and couldn't see what he was thinking, but at this 
point, he still didn't tear his face and said: "Okay. You have been away 
from Beiing for many years. It is good to be familiar with this 
opportunity. Your rain. The teacher can be vacant for many years." 


The rainer nodded and slowly retreated. Thanks for knowing that her 
retreat is about to be monitored, and the heart is slightly burnt. Suddenly, 
the rainman has folded back and said: "His Royal Highness." 


Thanks for the suddenness in his heart, said: "What advice does the Rain 
Master have?" Did she finally find it wrong? 


The rain teacher said: "There is no advice. After many years of leaving 
Beijing, I brought some gifts and gave you a few pieces. Can I accept it?" 


Xie Li did not expect that this is actually the case, crying and laughing, 
said: "Ah? Ah... Thank you." 


Junwu naturally never accepts gifts. He smiles and puts the rainman’s 
entourage into the Shenwu Hall. He said: “Xianle, the rainmaster is going 
to give you a present, why not pick it up?” 


He said that it seems that she is a childish child who needs to be 
disciplined. Others come to the door and bring gifts to the children. The 
elders will let the children come out and thank them. Thanks for 
helplessness, a farmer came over and handed a bag to the rigorous and did 
not know what to give him. Thanks and pity, he could say a few words of 
thanks, and he was absent-minded. Suddenly his face changed, as if he was 
aware. What is different. 


He turned his back to Jun Wu, and Jun Wu should not see his expression, 
but he also said: "What gift?" 


When the rainman saw that he had received the gift, he smiled and said: 
"It is not a valuable thing, some indigenous products are planted. If 
nothing else, I will retire first." 


Jun Wudao: "Go." 


So, the rain guard took the black cow, took the entourage, and slowly 
walked to the rain guard house where Xianjing had been vacant for many 
years. Xie pity put the gift in his arms and was about to leave. Jun Wu 
said: "Stop." 


Thanks for the pity, I stood still, and the foot seemed to be pinned. Junwu 
said again: "Come back." 


Thanks back to the temple of Shenwu and turned to look at him. Jun Wu 
stepped down to the throne and took down the things he had in his hands. 
This is the way: "Go back." 


He was really suspicious and took the gift from the rainman directly. 
Thanks to see him, he did not say a word, and returned to Xianle Palace. 


After returning to Xianle Palace, Xie Pity sat in a difficult time and 
walked around the palace. I don’t know how long it took, suddenly, I heard 
a clear voice: "His Royal Highness?" 


Xie pity turned and saw that a teenager with a ragged shirt and a turban 
was not sure when he turned over the window, sitting on it and smiling at 
him with a cheeky look! 


Thanks for the great joy, rushed up two steps, but suddenly remembered 
that this young man was called "His Royal Highness", and settled, not 
sure: "You are ... Saburo?" 


The boy laughed, jumped out of the window, and pulled a headscarf. The 
black hair was scattered, and he was taken up by him, revealing a 
handsome, pale, and completely different face under the black hair. It was 
the face that was very familiar with Xie. 


Huacheng squatted on the headscarf and sighed: "Brother, brother, this 
time, I want to see you, it is really difficult to go to heaven." 


Fang Cai, at the moment of Shenwu Temple, the moment when Xie pity 
caught the gift of the rainer, it was indeed aware of what was wrong. 
However, it does not come from gifts, but from people who give gifts. 


As soon as he took it, he felt that the other person had held his hand and 
pinched it. 


I have to say that this action is a bit contemptuous. If it 1s done for the girl, 
it is intentional and thin. At that time, Xie pity blinked, did not show 
anything, looked up and looked at him, standing opposite him, is a tall boy. 


Although the boy was dressed as a farmer, patched, muddled, and covered 
with a headscarf, his face was handsome and his eyes flashed. 


However, this dawn only flashed the moment when the two of them looked 
at each other. Waiting for the pity and seeing again, the boy regained his 
shyness and looked down and bowed his head. Now that the flower city has 
found the Xianle Palace, it is natural to solve the eyes around the 
surveillance. When I saw him, I felt very reliable when I thanked you, and 
I didn’t have to worry about anything! 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 214: Break the 
deadlock and send the gift in time 2 


Huacheng has not yet approached, and Xie Pity has rushed up. 


This can be awesome. Huacheng didn’t give him three steps backwards. 
He didn’t even have a figure, just put his hands on his back and laughed. 
Xie Pity is rejoicing, suddenly remembering something, busy saying: 
"Wait for Saburo! Emperor... Junwu is quite jealous of you, you should be 
guarding the people in the imperial city, he must send someone to go 
below Staring, you just disappeared, I am afraid that he will be aware of 
it? And, only the wind master will guard the line alone, will there be a 
problem?" 


Huacheng said: "Reassured brother, this has been handled. It will not 
reveal flaws for the time being." 


Xie pity guessed that he probably blocked the eyes that Junwu sent, or left 
a fake skin underneath, and did not ask how it was handled. At this time, 
Huacheng said leisurely: "It seems that my brother really wants me to 
think tight." 


" " 


Thankfulness, I remembered the messy words that I had said in front of 
Junwu’s face and his psychic. I also noticed that I was holding on to my 
position. I quickly stood up and said, “...well, um. You said I need 
someone to help, it turns out to be a rainmaster." 


Huacheng smiled and said: "Exactly, the rain teacher is in the lower bound 
all the year round, just as the Tonglushan Mountain is opened, it is 
alarmed. It is very common sense to go back to heaven to see this. If 
Junwu does not let her come up, or take Without a strong reason, the 
rainmaster will certainly be aware of the anomaly. So of course he can 
only go to the rain guard. Brother, it doesn't matter, you can continue to 
rush like you just did, I don't mind." 


Xie pity and cough, said: "Thank you, no... but why doesn't he move the 
rain?" 


Huacheng Road: "My brother does not know. The rain teacher is the priest 
of the farmer. This priest, although the position seems to be gray-faced, no 
huge profits, so no one is interested, but it is very special. At present, only 
the rain teacher Such a priest of the farmer." 


Thanks to the thoughtfulness, I have figured out the joints. Huacheng 
continued: "If you kill the rain guard directly, if you can't find a better 
replacement for the gods to take care of the farming, the people will eat 
for the sky, if the farming is not smooth, then the world will be chaotic. If 
you don't give people a meal, people will not I will give you food. In 
addition to being dissatisfied with the rain teacher, the world may also be 
dissatisfied with the great **** above the rain guard. That is to say, no fire 
will burn him. If it is not properly controlled, it may cause it to fall. God 
moves | chaos." 


That is to push his temple, and pour his statue, just like the people of 
Xianle. 


Huacheng again said: "In addition, the rain teacher does not set up a 
temple, does not always station in Xianjing, there is no desire to climb, 
and there is no handle. Externally, it is difficult for him to find a suitable 
reason for the rain, not easy to start; The rain guard continued to take over 
the farm, and his position was safe. Therefore, if he could not tear his face, 
he would not tear his face. First, he couldn’t help but say it." 


Thanks for a sweat, said: "It turns out that it is so dangerous and 
dangerous. Rain Master is willing to help. It is a charcoal in the snow. I 
hope her acting is superb. Right, we have to go to the National Division! 
Many things must be Ask him to be clear." 


The two no longer delayed, and the fire broke out of Xianle Palace. As 
soon as he stepped out of the threshold, Xie Pity was shocked by a row of 
guards at the door. He wanted to let Ruo evil stun them, but found that 
these guards were like wooden people, not only postures, but even their 
expressions. Set the flower city. 


Walking along the road, along the road, the silver light flashed from the 
wrist of the flower city, turned into a silver butterfly, gradually lost color, 
and broke into the air. I am afraid that at this moment, he has spread 
hundreds of dead butterflies in Xianjing. Along the way, they suddenly 
went up and down, flickering, and perfectly avoided all the patrolling 
guards. 


Hidden in an alley, watching a row of patrol guards walking down the 
street, Huacheng said with respect to pity: "This is over, the next 
paragraph goes above." 


Cheering nodded and leaped to the roof with him. After the two were in 
tandem, the flying dragonfly went to the wall and came and went without a 
trace. After a short while, thank you for falling on a corner, suddenly 
settled, looking back at the flower city, thoughtful. 


Seeing that he was parked, Huacheng also stopped and said, "Why, what 
did you notice?" 


Thanks for the slightest brow, shook his head and thought, "No. Just think, 
this situation seems to be where..." 


The voice did not fall, Huacheng suddenly took him to the waist. The next 
moment, both of them "fall off" from the eaves. 


Xie pity only suddenly turned to the sky, upside down, the brawl fell from 
the back, is about to land, and quickly rushed to the bottom of the sea, 
fluttering back. It was Huacheng who stared at him and the two of them 
hung upside down under the corner of an eave. On the eaves, there is 
something that crawls quickly. 


The voice is not strange to pity, it is the crawling sound of the fetal spirit! 


I don't know if it is patrolling in Xianjing or doing something. At this 
time, another voice came from below: "Wrong, wrong?" 


gladiolus! 


Thank you for your pity. The fetus is still on the eaves, but the gladioli is 
coming from below, so how can it be discovered? Xie pity can not say how 
the gladioli will react in the end, will mourn the life-saving grace of the 
flower city, or will yell at people! 


The frivolous and messy footsteps were getting closer and closer, and I 
was about to turn around. Thankfully, at this moment, the fetus finally 
jumped from the other side of the eaves. 


The two immediately turned over the house. Thank you for your relief. 


After the swordlan poked out a small half from behind a corner, and saw 
the son who jumped to the ground, he also sighed and said: "Wrong! You 
don't run around, this place is unfamiliar, strange and terrible. You can't 
run, I don't know where to find it... How come you come here?!" 


She swept away and swept the plaque of the hall, stepping back two steps. 
Seeing her reaction, thanking her for thinking about it, the golden temple 
under their feet seems to be the Nanyang Temple. 


In other words, Fengxin is now locked in! 


Gladiolus must also be aware of this, the face is slightly pumped, half 
awkward, bow down to teach the fetus, and replied: "What are you doing 
here!" 


The fetus was holding a thick, fat, white thing, and was still rubbing it, 
seemingly licking it. The sword orchid said again: "What is that? What are 
you eating? Please spit it out!" 


Thanks for looking at it, I found that it was a big white radish, and I 
couldn’t laugh. Needless to say, the fetus clearly felt that the taste was not 
good, and the radish spit out the radish, screaming, as if temper. The 
gladioli quickly went up and picked it up and said: "Well, wrong, don't eat 
if you don't eat. These are the things that poor boys and fools love to eat, 
we don't eat." 


Only the biological mother can hold such a terrible and horrible thing in 
her arms and comfortably. The baby spirit twisted her fat white body in her 
arms and made a pleasant snoring. Xie pity looked at this scene, can not 
help but feel inexplicably pity, but also strange: "How can there be such a 
big radish in Xianjing?" 


Huacheng raised an eyebrow and said: "Is my brother forgotten? The 
rainman brought you some local products in the field." 


It turned out that this is the gift that the rain teacher sent him! 


Thank you for trying to imagine that Junwu opened the wooden box and 
saw what it would be like to have a big white radish. I couldn’t imagine it 
and tried to fail. It seems that after Jun Wu checked and found that it was 
not suspicious, he gave the big white radish to the fetus. 


It’s like feeding a dog. 


Originally, the baby was spit out and used the legs to disappoint the big 
white radish. When I heard the gladioli, it seemed to be thoughtful, and 
jumped from the mother’s arms, jumping and jumping over the big white 
radish. Jumped into the hall. If you don't look carefully, it's like a bare- 
haired white-skinned dog. Gladiolus said: "Don't go in! There is..." 


The guards who were in front of the Nanyang Temple were probably told 
by Jun Wu that this fetus was his pet or hound dog, and he did not stop. As 
a last resort, Jianlan had to follow in. That fetus seems to be hostile to 
Fengxin, and he is worried that it will not be good for Fengxin. Turn his 
head and say: "Sanlang?" 


Huacheng fingertips perched a transparent butterfly, saying: "The dead 
butterfly has been attached to her." 


Xie pity nodded, and the two together monitored the situation in Nanyang 
Hall. I saw the gladioli cat waisting, slamming into the temple, and 
seemed to not want to be discovered, whispered: "Wrong--" 


However, it is impossible to find it. The baby spirit squatted into the main 
hall, and one of the main hall was meditating, opened his eyes, and took a 
face with her, and both of them stopped. 


After the wind letter first sighed, he got up and said: "Jian Lan! How come 
you? Are you okay? Come well, help me..." 


At this time, the fetal spirit suddenly screamed, jumped between the two, 
spit the radish to the ground, and slammed the hind legs. The big white 
radish that had been smashed by it flew up to the face of Fengxin, and 
made a loud noise! 


After it was smashed, it was still arrogant, wowing and screaming, 
sinisterly laughing, as if waiting for the mother to praise himself. The 
wind letter simply did not stun the thing, a nosebleed on the spot, and 
wiped the anger: "What are you doing?! Give me something honest!" 


He is fierce, and the fetus is even more fierce. He screams and screams at 
him. Fengxin took a step and went up to take it, but he opened it with a big 
mouth and bite his arm. This familiar scene is horrible and funny, and the 
wind madness can’t be mad, and it’s even more angry: “I’m fucking!!! I’m 
really fucking!!! Are you looking for a fight?! What a ghost!” 


Gladiolus also came back to God, saying: "Stop! What qualification do 
you have to beat him?" 


Fengxin was stunned by her, but it was awkward, and the momentum went 
down halfway. He argued: "He...he recognizes the thief as the father?! How 
can he be with Junwu... How could he become like this?!" 


Gladiolus said: "How can this be? It is not because of you! If you are not a 
godfather, if you are not incompetent, your son will be dug out of his 
mother's stomach to make this kind of thing?" What the hell, the ghost you 
gave birth!" 


She sighed, the wind letter stepped back, and the voice was smaller and 
more than half, saying: "But...but I don't know at all. And at that time, you 
let me roll first..." 


Gladiolus said: "Ha! I let you roll, I am fulfilling you! You have a dejected 
face every day to the old lady here, the old lady is sleeping next to you, do 
not know what you think?! You have to serve you again. That Prince, I 
have to make a redemption for me, I am tired, tired and annoying! You are 
embarrassed to leave your own hands, then I will give you a ride!" 


Wind channel: "I was very tired at the time! But I didn't bother you! I want 
to give you a redemption!" 


Gladiolus poked his chest and said: "Get it! Redemption, redemption, you 
know in your own heart, with your ability at the time, can you redeem the 
price of the old lady?! You can't wait for a dollar to be spent in two, 
Everyday, the street is still honouring your prince, Emperor, and I will not 
be good. I hope you will give me a redemption. Monkey Year!" 


Wind channel: "You didn't say that at the beginning, we all made an 
appointment! I will definitely honor it if I said it..." Jianlan interrupted 
him: "The verbal swearing has gone, but you want to Think, what did you 
give me? What can you give me? In addition to the gold belt, I can still get 
a hand, oh, that gold belt, you still say that you can’t sell it!” 


Feng Xin poked her back one step after another, his face was stiff and 
awkward. The more the swordsman said, the more angry: "Is that broken 
amulet? My lard is blinded to believe that your **** amulet can bless 
people, good luck is not a little bit, bad luck is even again! You, money is 
less and less, temper is It's getting bigger and bigger, I can't let you go, 
how can I still? Just dying you?! When you start complaining that I hate 
me, I don't want to see me again?!" 


" " 


Not only the wind and the wind, even the pity in the Nanyang Temple at 
this moment does not know what to say. 


Oh I see. 


Thanks for thinking a lot of things. At that time, the early news of the late 
return, tired face, inexplicable happiness, inexplicable sorrowful wind, and 


a hard letter to thank for the borrowing of money. 
The original minor anomaly suddenly explained. 


The wind is a thank-you, a good friend, but not his vassal. He could have 
had his own home, had his own relatives, and had already met these 
people, but it was because of the first time he was prayed for the most 
difficult time. 


At that time, thanking myself is still difficult to protect, and how can I pay 
attention to it. 


He is suffering, and the wind is also suffering. Everyone 1s suffering. At 
the end of the day, the two finally couldn’t go any further. Perhaps, Jianlan 
has foreseen this consequence. 


However, even at that time, Fengxin was still trying his best to support 
him. Even the amulet that he did not want to give to the gladioli, told her 
that this thing can bless good luck, so the gladioli will carefully put it 
away, placed in the small clothes of the children who have not yet been 
born. 


Of course, it turned out that the amulet did not bring them any good luck. 


As the sword orchid found out that he had said something that should not 
be said, the fetal spirit on the ground would leave. Wind channel: 
"Gladiolus!!!!" 


He grabbed his hair and was actually a rare sigh. 


Wind channel: "You... you come back. I am still... Hey, I think I, I... I want 
to take care of you. I should take care of you. I have a responsibility, I 
promised you." 


The swordsman turned and decided to look at him for a long while, 
clenching his baby in his arms and shouting: "I am free. I know, you 
dislike your son, it is a ghost in your eyes. Nothing, I don't disappoint." ” 


The wind letter finally came back and retorted: "I didn't dislike it!" 


Gladiolus said: "So why are you so fierce to him every time? Can you 
really see it as your son?" 


Wind channel: "As long as it can be changed, what can I do?" 


Jianlan sneered: "Then I will ask you again, you are a priest, do you dare 
to recognize it?" 


A glimpse of the wind. 


This is a matter of course. The fetus was in the mother's arms, licking his 
teeth and licking his mouth, as if it were a ugly poisonous insect that was 
not long, and like a broken beast, not like an individual. 


Which priest dares to accept this kind of thing? Do you recognize such a 
ghost thing as your own biological son? This is definitely a big stain, and 
believers, incense, prestige, all will be damaged! 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 215: The road 
can not be equated 


However, the letter has not been answered for a long time. He was about to 
answer, and Jianlan sneered: "But you don't need to answer. You are now a 
prisoner of people's ranks. I dare not admit that they are all empty words. I 
don't believe a word. Don't say it. You are willing to recognize I still don't 

recognize it for you!" 


The fetus in her arms, rushing to the wind and venting the letter, giving the 
adults a sneer. Gladiolus slaps a slap on its **** and swears: "What else is 
it, let you not run around, kill me!" 


The ugly little face of the baby was stunned and finally got honest. The 
mother and son hurried out of the Nanyang Hall, and the wind letter 
shouted at the back: "Jianlan! Gladiolus!" In the end, Nanyang Temple was 
left alone. The wind letter fell down and sat back, taking advantage of the 
big white radish that left a few rows of deformed tooth prints in front, and 
squatted for a while, holding his forehead with his right hand and lying flat 
on the ground. Even the monks have no strength. 


On the Nanyang Temple, Xie Pity also sighed. 


At this time, Huacheng suddenly said: "Brother, you still can't remember, 
and Junshan that night, the fetal spirit also appeared." 


Xie Li understands that he intends to open the topic, and it 1s also very 
cooperative, and that the fetus appears in the matter with Junshan, and it is 
strong, and said: "Remember. At that time, I sat on the sedan chair, it 
sounded like a nursery rhyme. Prompt me how to find the ghost bride, that 
is, Xuan Ji. And at the time it did not let other people hear it, it was 
specifically told to me alone, I don’t know why." 


Huacheng Road: "Junwu's inspiration." 


Thanks to pity: "The puzzle has become the purpose of Junwu. And why it 
will become the evil spirit of Junwu, I am afraid I have to ask the national 
teacher." 


Huacheng Road: "Then I will ask. Tell my brother a good news, the dead 
butterfly, has found the place where the National Division is detained." 


Thanks for the spirit of resentment, said: "Where?" 
The Temple of Spirits. 


Outside the temple, there were fewer gods and gods who came in and out 
with the piles of mountains in the past, and many Shenwu guards who 
were expressionless and patrolling the martial law. Silently fell to the 
corner of the cornice, thanked the pity: "The national division is locked 
here? Is the spirit guarding him?" 


Huacheng Road: "Yes. Jin Yixian is in the body, and the spirit is now a 
*eE* Of the gods. It is also a **** of war." 


Watching for a moment, thank you for your pity: "That is troublesome." 


Although Jin Yixian is not their opponent, but after all, it is also necessary 
to repair it, certainly more sensitive than the patrolling guards on Xianjing 
Street. 


If Xie Pity and Huacheng sneak into the Temple of the Spirit, Jin Yixian 
can't beat them, but they may not find them. Once Jin Yixian is discovered, 
the spirit 1s bound to be discovered. 


Thanks to pity: "Lingwen and Junwu must be psychic at any time. As long 
as the spirit finds it, Junwu will find it. Unless Jinyixian is not on him, he 
is a god, certainly can't detect us; The next Jin Yixian 1s just a piece of 
clothing, and I can't tell Jun Wu. I have to find a way to separate them." 


Huacheng said: "No need to find a way, he will take off the clothes sooner 
or later." 


No need to explain, thank you for your understanding. 


After all, Jin Yixian is not a good thing. The evil spirit is cautious. The 
spirit is not officially shackled. It 1s still a priest. He has been wearing it 
on his body. He is definitely not good for his health. He has to maintain his 
male body and consume mana. I am afraid there are few. Individuals can 
support this consumption method. Within a day, he had to take it off for a 
while. 


The two were whispering, at this time, a black man took the hand from the 
Lingwen Temple slowly, and explained what happened to a guard outside, 
and stepped into the temple. After a while, another person walked out of 
the hall and re-entered the main hall. 


This person is the spirit. When he went in, it was a male phase. When he 
came out, it was the truth. Moreover, the original black coat on the body 
was gone, and the pace of the body was not as light and powerful as 
before. 


She really took off her clothes. Right now, that Jin Yixian is in the temple! 


The two looked at each other. Huacheng Road: "Now, they are separated. 
Brother, luck is good." 


Xie pity also vomited and looked at him and said: "It is good for Saburo." 
Huacheng Waner, said: "The main hall? Partial temple?" 

After thinking about it, thank you for your pity: "Let's go to the temple! I 
don't know what the main hall of the Lingwen Temple is. If the spirit is 
kept next to the national teacher, then she can't get around. But if we can 
get it first, Jin Yixian, maybe there is room for talk." 

So, the two waited for a little time, and the defending soldiers handed over 
for a moment, both turned down the eaves and sneaked into the partial 


hall. 


As soon as I turned into the house, Xie pity wiped a sweat. 


In any case, it is not a bright thing to sneak into the private hall of the 
goddess. But when he saw this partial hall, the feeling of shame 
disappeared a little. 


Thanks to the former house, it is more gorgeous than here. The style of the 
wind is more messy than here, and the house of love is more elaborate 
than here. In short, it seems that it is not like the private hall of a goddess 
official, the pressure is not so great. 


There weren't many things in the temple. I couldn't hide anything. It didn't 
take long for me to turn to a box. However, when he opened his face, it 
was dark. Not only because of the opening, but also a demon wind and evil 
spirits, but also because the whole box is all the same black and black 
dress. 


Again! 


The same was true last time. It’s a nightmare to find the authenticity of a 
piece of jewellery in nearly a hundred different kinds of clothes. This 
time, there are not so many, only a dozen pieces, but each one is black and 
there is no difference. I really can’t say which one is more crashing. Is Jin 
Yixian really inside? 


Xie pity is very headache: "Sanlang... What is Junwu doing now? Are we 
enough time?" 


Huacheng has been closely monitoring the movements of all parties. He 
listened to his questions and slowly said: "My brother 1s relieved, we have 
time. Junu has not found that you have left, he is in the Shenwu Hall, and 
he is admiring the situation, it looks like It will take a long time to judge." 


Hearing words, thanking me for a sigh, said: "Muscle? He is admiring? 
What is it??" 


Huacheng Road: "The dead butterfly can't enter the temple of the gods, I 
can't hear it. But you know." He stared at the pity and said, "It will 
definitely not be a good word." 


Thank you for thinking about how Junwu treated the jade, and his heart 
was faint. But now that worry is useless, he decisively said: "First hurry, I 
will try it one by one. Saburo, you come to me to order." 


If Jin Yixian does not want to be discovered, or does not want to take the 
life of the upper body, it can be worn at will. But if someone asks another 
person to put on and make an order, that person must obey. With this 
method, you can definitely try out the real thing, just a little dangerous. 
Huacheng Road: "I am coming." 


Xie pity shook his head and said: "Sanlang, you pass through the brocade, 
do not know why, it seems to be not good for you, may be ineffective 
against the ghost king? Only by me." He said, he took off his coat, white 
robe fell At the feet. Huacheng picked up his eyebrows and picked a black 
dress and handed it to him. "That is, it is better to be respectful than to be 
respectful." 


Xie pity quickly put the clothes on the body. so far so good. The black robe 
of the spirit is not a breast-high breast, nor a sturdy, very flat, and it is not 
difficult to wear. Thanks to pity, he said, "Okay, you can ask me for your 
request." 


Huacheng held his left elbow in his right hand and supported his chin in 


his left hand. He seemed to think seriously for a moment and said, "So, 
brother, my order is-" 


Swearing, thank you for waiting for his second sentence. Huacheng smiled 
and said: "--Let's borrow a mana." 


Xie pity, of course, understands what he meant by ‘borrowing mana.’ It’s 
almost a head of smoke, and quickly took off his clothes and said: “This, 
this one is not!” 


Huacheng Road: "Ah, it's a pity. This one is not." 


Thanks to the righteousness: "Sanlang, you... this is not right. You must be 
serious, don't mention this request." 


Huacheng humbly said: "I am not serious enough? Which kind of request? 
Brother can not say a little more." 


"..."" Xie pity and cough twice, solemnly, "In short, I can't let me borrow 
mana from you. Other random, such as turning a circle, jumping twice, 
and so on, are casual." 


Huacheng raised a brow and said: "The rest are just right? Ok, 
understand." 


Said, he handed another one to thank. Xie pity quickly set it up and looked 
up at Huacheng again. 


And Huacheng looked at him for a moment: "Brother..." 
After a short while, he smiled and said: "Don't borrow mana from me." 
Great! Actually it can be like this! 


Xie pity quickly took the clothes off: "Okay! This is not the case..." 
Huacheng stopped him: "Wait, brother, who said it is not this? You have 
not proved that it is not." 


"Don't borrow mana from me." This is the order of Huacheng. And if you 
want to prove that this dress is not a jewel, you must not execute the order 
of the flower city. In other words, do the opposite thing - "borrowing mana 
to Huacheng." 


Go around and go back to the origin! 


Looking at the more realistic look of Huacheng, thank you for being 
shocked: "...you are too embarrassed. You can't do this." 


Huacheng picked up his arm and rubbed his head. He sighed and said: 
"Why not? Brother, isn't that what you said, except that you let me borrow 
mana from me, are all other requirements arbitrary? Since you don't like 
this request, then I Just mentioning the opposite, how can this be said? Is 
this really true?" 


Thanks for being so speechless, he raised his finger for a while and said: 
"You...you, hey, I said but you, don't make trouble!" I didn't dare to delay, 
and rushed to "snap". I know that no one is nearby, but I still look left and 
right, as if I am vigilant. 


Huacheng’s expression is not moving, calm and authentic: “Very good. I’m 
sure, this one is not.” 


Xie pity took off the black robe and said: "...this request should not be 
mentioned anymore." 


Huacheng handed him the third piece and smiled. "Okay, good. It must be 
like the wishes of my brother." 


Thanks and pity, I took it, my heart said: "I always feel that it is more and 
more difficult for Saburo to deal with... Is it an illusion?" 


He was still worried that Huacheng would ask for any mischief, but after 
two jokes, Huacheng did not tease him. He was upright, but he felt sorry 
for it. 


However, after all the dozens of cases in the suitcase were tried, Xie Pity 
did not comply with an order. 


Is the authenticity of Jin Yixian not here? 


Will not. Lingwen must have taken it off. And a whole box of clothes all 
stained with evil, it must be here! 


Huacheng leaned against the gate and said: "Brother, it seems that this 
jewel is not only invalid for me, but also for you." 


Where is the problem? 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 216: It’s harder 
to get on the upper body. 


Xie pity turned all the black clothes out again, looking for an angry, 
fruitless, had to put a white robe on his side and put it on, and said to 
Huacheng: "It is not good... It seems that only this box of clothes can be 
put on Have brought it..." 


Wen Yan, Hua Cheng's smile, thanked and helpless, I also felt that holding 
a dozen pieces of clothes threatening people is simply funny, stupid. But 
this is the end of the matter, and there is no better way. 


Who knows, just as he stuffed the black clothes that had been thrown into 
the box into the box and prepared to pick it up, the door of the temple 
opened, and the face of the spirit was weak, and the hand came in. 


Lingwen is probably enough to rest, ready to come back to wear Jinyixian, 
who knows that I just bumped into the two uninvited guests who entered 
the room, and one face is innocent, one face is meaningless, speechless, 
immediately close the two fingers, arrived at On the temple. 


She wants to inform Junwu! 


The flower city movement was faster than her, and her eyes swept away. 
The two temples behind her were quickly closed, and the look of the spirit 
was suddenly different. She put down her hand and said: "...the flower city 
owner is really powerful." 


Thanks to the pity: "Sanlang, are you bound?" 


Huacheng Road: "There is a small size. The scope is only in this partial 
temple." 


Junwu can set up a boundary in Xianjing to isolate the people in the circle 
from the outside world. Huacheng can also create a smaller circle in 
Xianjing and close the psychic field of people in the circle. In the big 
world, there is a small world. At this moment, this partial temple has 
become a shackle. 


However, after all, it is the sphere of influence of Junwu, so it is 
impossible to open the boundary too much, otherwise it will be noticed by 
Junwu. Xie polite nodded, said: "Lingwen, I believe you should see, Jin 
Yixian is in our hands. If you do not want it to be burned by a wildfire, 
please do not act rashly." 


Who knows, the spirit hears but smiles. 


She said: "But, Your Royal Highness, in fact, Jin Yixian is not in your 
hands." 


To be honest, thank you for doubting this. But he still said the most 
reasonable speculation at the moment: "Lingwen, if you come out and go 
out, you will not wear it. I don't think Jinyixian will be outside this hall." 


Lingwen said: "His Royal Highness, did you misunderstand anything. I 
just said that it is not in the box in your hand, not that it is not in this 
temple." 


Wen Yan, thankful pity suddenly thought of a possibility, slightly side 
head. 


Huacheng must have gone with him, and the eyes of the two turned to the 
white dress of Xie Li. 


Lingwen said: "Well, I didn't guess wrong. It is now worn on the body of 
the Prince." 


Fang Cai, when she tried to wear other black clothes, she threw the white 
clothes she had worn on her side, and then re-examined, and all kinds of 
clothes were mixed together. I don't know when, the Jinyixian actually 


turned into the appearance of his white robe, and he was picked up and put 
on! 


Xie pity looked down at himself and said, "What about my original coat?" 


Huacheng lifted it, the suitcase fell over, and the black clothes fell off the 
ground. And in the deepest part of a dozen black clothes, there was a white 
coat that was crushed at the bottom and hidden. 


This is the coat that Shimi really wears! 


Needless to say, it must be the evil method of the Jinyi Xianshi. The two 
men randomly tried on the clothes and dragged the princess's outer 
garment into the suitcase. They slipped out and turned it into a 
replacement. They were picked up by the pity. , worn on the body. 


Thanks for being pitiful, just wondering: "...this is too embarrassing?" 


It's just a piece of clothing! Moreover, isn’t it true that Jin Yixian is not 
very smart? 


However, it is not difficult to think that most of it is the way that the spirit 
teaches it. Sure enough, Lingwen said: "This method is what I told it. I 
didn't expect it to come in handy. So, now, it is equivalent to me, let the 
Prince of the Prince put on the brocade." 


If the dress is handed over to Huacheng, thank you for wearing it, then the 
instigator is Huacheng. And if Jin Yixian is cheating on it according to the 
method of spiritual culture, then the instigator is the spirit. In other words, 
the present pity, will listen to the spirit of language, obey every instruction 
she issued! 


Thanks to the pity: "Linwen, you have never thought about it, may Jin 
Yixian be ineffective against me?" 


Lingwen smiled and said: "Don't try it, don't know - Your Royal Highness, 
you can't attack me from now on. If you hear it, nod." 


I don’t want to nod. Who knows, after the spirit said the sentence, when he 
reacted, he no longer nodded! 


Why is it effective again? ! It’s ineffective to order the city’s order! 
Is it only invalid when the orderer is a flower city? 


So, suddenly, the situation reversed. Thanks for the pity, the flower city 
does not move, the two just exchange their eyes, they are very calm. 


The spirit is also very calm, said: "So, now, please the city owner to open 
the boundaries of this temple." 


Xie pity immediately said: "Sanlang does not open." 


Ling Wendao: "His Royal Highness, are you sure? I will order what will 
happen." 


Huacheng is still quiet, thankful and polite: "I can't move the text, no 
matter what. No one else is restricted. As long as Saburo does not want to 
hold her, and then let her not issue instructions, the problem will be 
solved." 


Lingwen is very keen, guessing their intentions, and said: "Flower City 
Lord, advise you not to bother to think about how to stop me." Your Royal 
Highness, you listened: If, the flower city owner attacked me, or did If it is 
not good for me, then you attack him." 


In this way, she is the first to block the measures that the other party may 
take! 


Lingwen said: "Well, spend the city master, open the world. I have official 
business in the body, the spirit of the temple still has a backlog of 
documents to be processed, all have not been approved, we will solve this 
small problem soon? "" 


Huacheng is also a smile. 


In the next moment, the spirits and eyes were slightly stunned, and they 
seemed to want to speak, but they could not make a sound. 


If at this time, who is standing behind her, she will find that behind her 
neck, I do not know when to inhabit a silver wing whirl of the dead 
butterfly. It was this little thing that made her unable to move and could 
not speak. 


Huacheng held his arm and revealed a smirk that was very insincere. He 
said slowly and calmly: "I want to make someone who wants to make a 
surprise?" 


Lingwen can't speak, but the meaning in his eyes is clear: Flower City 


Lord, have you forgotten? I have already given instructions to His Royal 
Highness Prince! 


At this time, Jin Yixian was launched. Thank you, Huoran turned and 
raised a palm to hit Huacheng! 


I don't know how long it took, and the glance of the politeness was clear 
and clear, and suddenly returned to God, saying: "...San Lang!" 


Flower City stood in front of him, above the red heart of his heart, still 
holding a hand. It is the hand of thankfulness. 


Huacheng did not evade this palm, so he stood still, and let him slap his 
heart! 


Xie Li had not had time to react, Huacheng had already firmly grasped his 
wrist and said: "Okay. The attack is over and the order 1s lifted." 


Sure enough, after thanking him for his hand, he felt that his body was 
loose and his body was free. 


Huacheng was actually trying to dispel the instructions issued by the spirit 
of the pity, so he stood and did not sneak up on him. After the order was 
lifted, thank you for accepting his hand and his face changed. He said: 
".,.Sanro, have you been injured?" 


He took a closer look at the face of Huacheng. However, because it is not a 
living person, the color of Huacheng 1s originally the whiteness of the sun 
all the year round, and there is no change at all. However, his tone did not 
change much. He smiled and said: "My brother is really very powerful, 
this palm is beautiful." 


Xie pity is very bad, just like being scared by him, very serious: "I am not 
joking with you. Just now I used 70% of the force, you really have 
nothing?" 


When the spirit sends an instruction, the word used 1s "attack." And Xie 
pity and people fight, never shot for the purpose of "attack". He is usually 
just to protect himself or to suppress the other. And once he shot for the 
purpose of "attacking", he was hitting the other side, he was very low. 


Huacheng slowly said: "I am not kidding. My brother is really powerful. If 
you don't wear these two things on your body, maybe Junwu may not be 
your opponent." 


Thanks to the subconscious hand, he stroked his neck, touched the curse, 
and immediately put it down. At this time, Huacheng said: "Brother, I ask 
you a question." 


Thanks: "What?" 


Huacheng Road: "You have a chance to take down the curse. Why do you 
want to keep this thing tied to you?" 


Xie Pity did not expect that he would ask this, and he stumbled, saying: 
"Maybe... to remind yourself of something." Then he said, "Sanlang, 
you...you don't want to transfer the topic. What is wrong with you? In that 
case, you just have to control me in reverse, why do you have to take your 
own hands." 


Huacheng said: "Brother, do you know that this is a bad problem? If you 
like to be beaten, you are not qualified to say me." 


Thanks for your pity: "Is there?" 


When he asked him, he was guilty. You must know that the underwater 
fighting spirit, the one step worse, swallowed the sword and was caught by 
the flower city. Huacheng Road: "Is there? There is no other way to solve 
the problem of being beaten by yourself." But you have broken me." 


"..."" Xie pity waved, "I have counted Saburo, don't say this. Let's look at 
this dress first." 


He pulled the white dress on his body and was very helpless. This is good, 
Jin Yixian find it, but now I have to find a way to take it off. 2k novel 
reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 217: Hundred 
Years of Water Deep Thousand Years Hot 


The clothes are all on the body, and it is definitely impossible to burn 
them. It is possible to burn them together. Xie pity proposed: "Whenever 
you wear it, don't care. Anyway, it can't **** my blood, and the spirit 
should not be able to issue instructions." 


A blue smog drifted over, and the place where the spirit was originally 
standing was left with a blue tumbler. The expression was very serious and 
seemed to hold a file. Xie pity took it up and stuffed it into his arms. The 
two left the temple and sneaked into the main hall. 


It is not an illusion that the main hall of the Temple of the Spirits seems to 
be much more gloomy than before. From the piles on the ground to the top 
of the book, the sea of mountains seems to be in jeopardy, or it will fall 
down at any time and kill people. The two did not meet the guards and 
went straight to a Zhumen in the depths. 


Still not close, thanked the pity and heard a shocking trembling voice 
behind the door: "...how is it possible? How could this be?" 


It is the national teacher! Did someone get ahead of the game? Xie pity 
immediately opened the door and shouted: "Let go!" 


In the house, there was more than one national teacher. After the door was 
opened, he looked back at him. The shock on the face of the national 
teacher has not faded: "...His Royal Highness?" 


The head of the national division did not lift for a while, and immediately 
went down again. "You wait first - how can this be, what is the luck!" 


Both Xie and Huacheng are speechless. 


I saw the house, the national division and the other three together put 
together a table, is playing in the heat, playing cards. It is said that there 
are three other "people". In fact, they are not living people. They are all 
casually made papermakers. I don't know what kind of tricks can be used 
to move, but they can also play cards. The national teacher’s only sentence 
is the sigh that he can’t help but after he gets the card. 


Thanks to the pity, the national teacher may be subject to torture, look, and 
the like. I didn’t expect him to play cards at this time, and when he was 
crying and laughing, he was inevitably intimate. 


Can't you be kind? When he and Feng Xin lived in the Emperor and went 
to the National Division, he was playing cards, playing cards and playing 
cards in the 16th and 7th. After eight hundred years, I saw playing cards 
again, just like yesterday. Even the fanaticism on the face of the national 
teacher is no different. He stared at the cards in his hand and did not return 
to the ground: "Your Highness is finally here, but let me finish this game 
and say..." 


Thanks to pity, he knew that when he was on the table, he was guilty of the 
old problems that the six parents did not recognize. This way and his 
previous appearance in the Temple of the Gods are really two people, can 
not look directly, go up and drag him off the table: "Master, when are you, 
don't fight!" 


The national teacher’s eyes were red and shouted: “Don’t, let me finish!!! 
Immediately! Just this game! Wait for me to finish this circle! [Il be fine 
soon, I might win soon. !!!" 


Thanks: "I won't win, I won't win!" 


Fortunately, this game is really finished soon. Although the National 
Teacher vowed to say that he would win, but in fact he still did not win. 


After waved and collected the three paper people, the national division 
finally recovered calm and normal. 


He is sitting in danger, sinking his eyebrows: "His Highness, I know that 
you will come, I have been waiting for you." 


Thanks for your pity: "I really didn't see that you have been waiting for 
Mes. 


However, of course he did not say it, and he still has to respect the elders. 
Guo Shi said: "I know that you must have a lot of questions in your heart." 


Huacheng stood aside, leaning against the door, seemingly casual, 
probably in the wind. Xie Li is also sitting in front of the national division, 
saying: "Yes." 


After a pause, he said: "First of all, I want to confirm that Junwu... is 
really nothing, is it the Prince Wuyong?" 


Guoshi said: "Don't doubt. He is." 


Thanks to pity: "I don't have a relationship with Prince Wu Yong, is it? We 
are two completely different people." 


Guo Shidao: "The only relationship between you and Prince Wu Yong is 
that he has destroyed your country, Xianle." 


Thanks and whispered: "But, Guoshi, you said to me, you don't know what 
white is nothing, but you are sure that he was born of me." 


Guoshi said: "His Royal Highness, at the time, I really didn't know what it 
was. When I knew it, it was already late. And, he said that he was born 
because of you. This sentence is not wrong." 


Thanks to pity: "What does that mean? And, that question - why did he 
destroy the country?" 


Guoshi stared at him and said: "Because of your words." 
Thank you for your kindness: "What is my word? What?" 


Guo Shidao: "The body is in the middle of nowhere, the heart is in 
Taoyuan." 


Awkward, speechless. Xie pity 1s incredible: "...no?" 
Guoshidao: "Nothing." 


Thanks to pity: "...just this sentence? Is there any problem with this 
sentence?" 


Guo Shi Shen said: "The problem is too big. Everything, it all starts with 
your sentence!" 


Xie pity vaguely felt that what the National Teacher had to say would 
make him very unacceptable, and he wanted to call Huacheng, but he did 
not shout, Huacheng had already come, and he sat next to him. 


Guoshi said: "You see the murals of Tongluoshan." 
Thanks: "See. Those murals are you left?" 


Guoshi said: "It's me. Every time I open a mountain, I will mix in. On the 
one hand, I want to stop the ghost king from being born. On the other 
hand, I want to find a way to leave some clues in various ways and tell 
others about Wuyong. The matter of Prince Wu Yong." 


Thank you for your pity: "Why don't you tell others directly, do you have 
to use such a hidden way?" 


Guo Shidao: "His Royal Highness, do you think that almost no one in the 
world knows Wu Yongguo?" 


Xie Li has not answered yet, Huacheng said: "All that was known was 
cleared by him, is it?" 


Guoshi said: "Yes. If the clues remain too obvious, or spread directly, not 
only do I have the danger of being exposed, but all the people I see will 
disappear from this world. How many people are the same. Even if it is In 
a city, he can also make the city razed to the ground within three days. You 
should know that I am not kidding." 


Thank you for knowing. Ironically, he used to feel that he was grateful. 
Fortunately, it is not a ghost to be a god, otherwise it will be a mess. 
Guoshi said: "So I can't let him know that there are people who know these 
things in the world. But I am not willing to know no one except me. I think 
if it is enough careful and courageous people Naturally, it can be found. 
Since it is not capable of resisting, it will be better. 


"I have been hiding in Tibet for so many years, and I have been hiding 
very well. Except that I almost couldn’t get away from it eight hundred 
years ago, he never caught me. This time I can catch it because he is in the 
copper furnace. The mural I left was found in the temple, and when you 
guessed his identity in the copper furnace, he discovered that I might not 
have died yet, and left a lot of things that he didn't want to know." 


Thanks for the pity, they passed the last temple in the red forest of the 
Bronze Furnace. The murals inside have been destroyed by the last few 
pieces, which can be said to be the most critical ones. At that time, he and 
Huacheng all suspected that someone was hiding there, but did not find it. 
Now think about it, I am afraid it is very possible. At that time, the white 
phase was really hidden in a corner of the temple. 


Thanks to the pity: "But, Guoshi, why do you want to hide in Tibet?" 
Guoshi said: "Of course it is because..." 


Huacheng Road: "Betrayal." 


The word was a bit stinging, and the national teacher gave him a look. 
Huacheng’s look has not changed, saying: “You betray him.” 


Guoshi said: "Almost. That's it." 
He turned to thank and said: "How do you say, Your Highness... 


"The things described on the murals are all true. The Royal Highness of 
Uyghur is like the unparalleled sun of Uyghur. In the past, when you were 
the Prince of Music, he was many times more beautiful than you." 


"My three brothers and I have a total of four people. They used to be his 
servants. After the princes flew up, they ordered us together. I have seen 
many people of all kinds, and it is no exaggeration to say that even in the 
public. The heavens that God gathers, he is like the sun, dazzling and 
eclipsing others." 


The national teacher said and said, inadvertently revealed a fleeting smile. 
Xie Pui always felt that when he called the other party with "His Royal 
Highness", he said that neither "Junwu" nor "White Nothing" was just the 
young Prince who was two thousand years ago. 

He said: "In the past, you seem to have said something similar to me." 

"Is there? People can't remember things when they are old." 

"Yes. However, you said that he did not fly. He died." 

Guoshi said: "That is probably because I prefer that he does not fly." 


Thanks: "Because the copper volcano erupted?" 


The National Teacher did not respond positively, but said: "The power of 
His Royal Highness is too strong. 


"He predicted in his dream that the future of Wu Yong was a sea of fire, 
and he began to think of ways to save his people. If it is me, I will not let 
him do that. But at the time, we all did not think of it. What became it? We 


all feel that someone is going to die now, what is wrong with saving 
people? 


"But things are not that simple at all. 


"The volcanic eruption can't stop it. If no one is killed or injured, it can 
only be moved. But the scope of the volcano attack is too big, it is not a 
matter of one or two cities. For the royal family and the common people, 
the best The solution is to conquer other countries and occupy new 
territories. Otherwise, other countries will not be so simple to let so many 
Wuyong people move in. 


"But for the Highness of Prince Edward, this is not a solution at all. If you 
fight, you will definitely bleed. If you bleed, you will become jealous, and 
you will become cruel and no longer human." 


"Wu Yongguo still pre-empted the army to go out. The soldiers arrived, 
the film did not stay, the grass was not born, and, because the "Tengdi" was 
given to the Wuyong people who would move in the future, the generals 
ordered the massacre of other people. The more you kill, the better, killing 
blood into a river, and corpses like a mountain. 


"After knowing the name of His Royal Highness, he was very angry. As 
you can see, he descended on the battlefield and punished these Wuyong 
soldiers." 


Thanks to pity, this can be said to be a juvenile when I was a teenager. It 
can also be said that it is a white phase when I was a teenager, and my 
heart feels subtle. The National Teacher continued: "However, it is not 
only him who is angry. This incident makes the nobles and some nationals 
of Wuyong State very angry. Many people go to the temple to question the 
Highness of the Prince: We just want to live, need more Is there anything 
wrong with the land that forced us to invade others?" 


"The impact of this incident is beyond the expectations of all of us. It has 
become more and more fierce. Some people have begun to smash his 
image and burn his temple, but the Prince's Highness has withstood. 


"He said that if Wuyong is a party to aggression, he must swear to defend 
and not let the enemy step further, but they themselves must not invade 
others. He urges everyone to give up the battle and wait for him to build 
something - he The bridge of the sky." 


Guoshi slowly said: "There is no more land in the world, then send people 
to the sky to avoid it. Although this method is incredible, but all of us are 
convinced of His Royal Highness, I firmly believe that he can do It should 
be said that no matter what he wants to do, we will all support it. Of 
course, other priests do not think so, the whole heavens are opposed, but 
His Royal Highness is still withstood. 


"He also withstood three things: the incomprehension and blame of the 
Wuyong nationals and the aristocrats, the anger of the gods of the heavens, 
and the giant bridge." 


Huacheng laughed and said: "Is it against? I am afraid not only against it." 


The national teacher slowly nodded and said: "If it is just opposition, it 
will be nothing more. But..." 


Xie pity vaguely guessed what happened, but still asked: "But?" 


Guoshi said: "The bridge needs a lot of time and a terrible mana to be 
completely built. The Prince Edward can't be separated. He almost never 
went anywhere else, did anything else, and never heard of it. The prayers 
of other believers. He can only do this." 


"But the **** who can only do one thing will not be able to retain the 
believer. When he is on the first day of the bridge, people thank him and 
remember him; the second, third, fourth The same is true of the day. One 
month, two months, thank you and remember him. But after a long time, it 
will not work. 


"The volcano has not yet erupted. His Royal Highness has not done 
anything else. He has been silently saving mana. People will inevitably 
feel that he is not as powerful as before. He even said that he was not as 
diligent as before. At this time, inevitably, Need to offer a new god. 


"The Wuyong country has a large population, strong financial resources, 
and the believers' power of faith is also very strong. It 1s known that the 
princes of the Prince have been in the first place. Many priests have long 
been coveted by this site and believers, so..." 


Thank you for your understanding. 


He said: "So... the priests, they have seized this opportunity. They were 
dissatisfied with the grievances of the princes in the battlefield of the 

princes, and they lured them and divided his followers and mana sources... 
... 18 1t?" 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 218: Hundred 
Years of Water Deep Millennium Fire 2 


Guo Shidao said: "His Royal Highness does not know this, but he does not 
know what to do." 


Thanks to pity, he bowed his head and said: "He is God. Naturally, it is 
impossible to say to believers. I don't allow you to offer gods other than 
me. I am afraid that he does not bother to do such a request." 


Guo Shidao said: "You naturally understand him." 


Thanks again, "But the partiality is on such a joint. He can't lose believers 
and mana, otherwise it will affect the construction of the bridge." 


Guoshidao said: "This is the case, so we have to communicate the interests 
of the four people to the people of the country." 


Thanks, "How is the result?" 
Huacheng Road: "Not how." 


Guoshi said: "Not how. At least not as we expected. Some people are 
worried that the bridge can not be built, and they are a little bit back, but 
there are also a large number of people in the country. Instead, they think 
that His Royal Highness is too overbearing. Pray If you are not satisfied, 
you will go to other gods that can satisfy your wishes. This is indeed 
nothing wrong. They are free believers, and they believe in what they 
believe, and they are justified." 


"He doesn't want to satisfy everyone, but he is really..." 
Thanks a little sigh, whispered: "...have powerlessness." 


The National Teacher continued: "After knowing this incident, His Royal 
Highness stopped us. If you want to leave, you will leave. If you stay 


strong, you will not believe in him. Indeed, although we warn again and 
again, the hearts of believers Already scattered, even if you barely come 
back, not sincere, the power of faith is not as strong as before, just 
perfunctory." 


Thanks: "He can't be angry with believers, and he doesn't want to ask other 
ee Officials for help." 


Guo Shidao said: "Even if you ask for it, other priests will not help him at 
all. If they are willing to help, they will not oppose it at first, and then they 
will not take the opportunity to lure his followers." 


"His Royal Highness is becoming more and more silent. With one person, 
the bridge was built and the bridge was propped up. I looked at him every 
day, although he said nothing, but I can see him. How painful is in my 
heart. And this pain can only be sustained by one person. Even if we want 
to help again, we can't share much for him. 


"Finally, after three years of hard work, the volcano is about to erupt. 


"As soon as the news came out, people rushed to the bridge, and we guided 
the mighty crowd on four sides, while we were worried about the Prince 
Edward, who was alone." 


Guo Shi sighed: "We used to never worry that he could not do anything, 
but at that time, we actually began to worry about him." 


"In the beginning, the bridge was still stable. But as more and more people 
rushed up, the support time was getting longer and longer, and the hand of 
His Highness began to tremble and his face began to turn white. 


"Others can't see it, only we can see it. I don't think it's good. Say people 
to wait, wait a minute, give him a little time, don't flock to him all at once, 
just let him take a breath, he will definitely take you all. Saved. But the 
volcano is about to erupt, life is at stake, no one is willing to wait, all 
madly rushing to the bridge, even alive to trample people, we can not stop! 


"Finally, what happened to us was the most fearful thing. 


"In the past three years, due to the continuous loss of believers, the power 
of His Royal Highness has not been as strong as it used to be. When tens 
of thousands of people have poured into the bridge to celebrate the 
salvation, when the joy is happy to go to heaven, the bridge is broken. ” 


Thanks for the breath. 


Guoshidao: "Tianhong tears, thousands of people, a large piece of dense, 
suddenly, falling from the high air, pulling the heartbreaking screams into 
the sea of fire, just under the Prince Edward In front of my eyes, I was 
burned to ashes! 


"I was almost scared at the time. I didn't dare to look at the face of His 
Royal Highness. I couldn't even get up. I couldn't get it. I couldn't get out 
of the fire. There was no way! More people who haven't had time to come 
up are buried in magma. The fly ash is closed. Screaming, crying, yelling. 
The scene is really terrible... I have never seen anything more horrible 
than that." 


I forgot to imagine, and my heart was slightly cold. The national teacher 
continued to speak. 


"The bridge is broken. Wuyong people are also crazy." 


"They set fire to the palace temple of His Royal Highness, toppling his 
god, smashing his heart with a knife, and swearing that he is a useless 
thing, the **** of shit. He is God, God is so powerful, God can't fail. 


"But he just failed. So he can't sit on it anymore. 


"The celestial gods have long waited for this moment. They said, “we have 
told you that it will not work. Your misfortune is too great, we have to ask 
you to go down.’ 


"And the Highness the Prince asked a very stupid question. He asked: 
"Why don't you help me?' 


"Why is there anyone else who wants to help you? And, if he succeeds in 
helping Wu Yongguo to survive this great disaster, he will no longer have 
an opponent in the heavens." 


"So, this is really a stupid question. I think he knows this, but he still 
asked. 


"Of course no one answered him, and His Royal Highness was desecrated. 


"He fell back to the world, not God, nor a prince. We followed him and 
said, "You must be able to fly again, so he will start practicing again. But 
it is too difficult. You should understand." 


Of course, thank you. 


The higher you stand, the more you fall. After falling from the sky, the 
people who greet him will be endless cold and malicious. 


Guo Shidao said: "The volcano 1s still erupting continuously, and the 
Wuyong country is in an unprecedented bleak. Refugees, rebellions, and 
invasions are constantly going on. Everyone is overwhelmed, and the 
attitude of the Prince is not as good as before. 


"Even so, His Royal Highness Prince wants to help people. But this time, 
another thing happened. 


"Many other priests began to be merciful. 


"Although they are not willing to stop the volcanic eruption, they are 
willing to apply some small favors, send some herbs, food or something. 
Because this time the Highness of the Prince has been defamed, he can do, 
of course, far less than these priests. 


"Wu Yong people seem to have seized the straw and the reborn parents. 
The believers have lost more quickly. In fact, there is not much left. All 
the praises and loves of the original Prince Edward were all transferred to 
others. The priest, the one left for him, only hates and rejects." 


The national teacher closed his eyes and said: "We were really unwilling at 
that time. 


"It is obvious that these priests did not do much for them at all, but they 
only came out after the end of the disaster. His Royal Highness was the 
one who did the most, he did his best, and it was a success, but it was a 
step! But why? In the end, only he was ruined? Why did the most paid 
people turn a blind eye and gave a little thanks to Dade? 


"That is, from that time on, I began to change my mind. 


"I can't help thinking, if, from the very beginning, His Royal Highness 
Prince chose to pretend that he didn't know the future that he had foreseen 
in his dreams. He was standing by and watching the volcanic eruption. It’s 
hard to reward him, and people will be grateful to him.” 


Huacheng whispered: "Did you think of it at that time? You should have 
thought of it at the beginning. People will be grateful for cutting a piece of 
meat to save a person. But the more you cut, the more people will want. In 
the end, Even if the person is cut late and only one bone 1s left, people will 
not be satisfied." 


Guo Shidao said: "I don't dare to talk to him about these ideas, but His 
Royal Highness is more and more silent. I don't know what he thinks in his 
heart. Have you ever thought about something like me? 


"Daily day, the volcano is still erupting intermittently. The entire Wuyong 
country has been immersed in fear for a long time. No one knows how to 
stop it and end the nightmare. 


"One day, His Royal Highness suddenly told us that he had found a way to 
stop the volcano. But when he said that, a few of us had a big fight." 


Huacheng Road: "I guess, the way is, the sacrifice of the living." 


Guo Shidao: "Yes. His Royal Highness Prince said that he has selected a 
group of evil people. They can use these evil people to sacrifice and throw 
them into the copper furnace to calm the anger of the copper furnace. 


"The four specific ideas are different, but in general, it is against. It is 
absolutely impossible to do such a thing. When the Highness did not want 
Wu Yong to send troops to attack other countries, he did not want to live 
with his life. If he chooses to use his living now What ts the difference 
between the copper furnace and the one? Even worse. Some of them are 
particularly fierce and directly quarrel with His Royal Highness. 


That one was too loud and they got up. I was also opposed, but compared 
to outside attacks, it is even more unbearable for us to quarrel. We must 
know that the four of us have always supported His Royal Highness. Now 
we are his only pillar, but that time, not only did it start with excitement, 
but also someone told him that he changed, and he forgot his heart. He is 
not the original Prince Edward. 


"These words are really too heart-wrenching. I really can't stand it. If even 
we stand on the opposite side of my Highness and blame him, there is 
really no one in the world who stands with him. So in the end, I didn't. I 
also oppose it, just say it, don’t worry about it anymore, the heavens are 
good or the refugees are good, all of them are left alone. It’s really too 
tired. 


"But nobody listens to me. After a big fight, the other three except me 
lett’ 


Xie pity shook his head and didn't know what to say. However, leaving at 
this time is undoubtedly worse. 


Guoshi said: "Only I have stayed. His Royal Highness did not say 
anything, just asked me, “You can’t leave?’ 


"I saw the look of my former Highness when I asked this sentence. At that 
moment, I really felt that even if he really put people into the copper 
furnace sacrifice, I can understand. I said, 'His Highness, I will not go. .' 


"His Royal Highness still did not say anything. He did not mention the 
sacrifice of the living, changed his mind, set up an altar near the copper 
furnace, and I also joined him, daily with the insults and stones of many 
people, practice Practice, trying to suppress the anger of the volcano. 


"I thought this was the case. Who knows, one day, I found something that 
made me creepy. 


Speaking of this, the face of the National Teacher became extremely 
terrible, as if he saw the picture that made him creepy. The heart of 
thankfulness seems to be pinched by an invisible hand, saying: "What?" 


Guo Shidao said: "He... he suddenly closed his face." 


Guo Shidao: "His Royal Highness looks beautiful, never covers his face, 
and nothing can hurt his face. I have never seen him like this for so many 
years, so I am very puzzled. I asked him, Your Highness, your What 
happened to the face? He said that he was accidentally burned by the fire. 


"I don't know where he was injured. He won't let me see the wound, I 
applied the herbs myself, and the whereabouts suddenly became erratic. 
These were unusual, but at this time, a big good happened. , temporarily 
transferred my attention - the volcano suddenly stopped the outbreak. 


"The copper furnace has recovered its silence, and it has gradually settled 
down. It has not erupted for a long time. Because only the next person in 
the Prince’s Palace has worked **** this, many Wuyong people thought 
that he had pressed down the volcano, and some people began to worship 
him again. The path of His Royal Highness of the Prince also became 
smooth. At least, no one insulted and stoned him, and people gradually 
laughed at him again. 


"But I always feel that something is wrong. 


"A lot of places are not right. Although my three friends have different 
personalities, but I know them a lot, they shouldn’t have to leave their 
hands and ignore them. Even if they are really angry with the Prince, they 
will not even be mine. The gas is also born, and there is no news at all. 


"The most uncomfortable thing is the face of His Royal Highness. He has 
always covered his face with something. He started with rags and cloaks. 


Later, he wore a mask and did not take it all day. 


"Sometimes I suspect that this person will not be His Royal Highness, but 
another person is posing, because he is talking and doing things, even his 
personality, all changed. Sometimes he is amiable, sometimes suddenly 
thundering. Once he was alone in the house. I have smashed all the 
mirrors, I don’t know where the blood is bleeding, and I’m bloody. What’s 
more, I often hear strange noises.” 


Thanks: "What sound?" 


Guoshi said: "Sometimes, in the middle of the night, there will be voices 
in the room of Prince Edward. It seems that several people whispered and 
quarreled. But I went in and saw that there was only one person in the 
room. After a few times, my Royal Highness did not let me enter. His 
room is gone. 


"One night, I heard that strange voice again, and this time, I found out that 
it seems to be the voice of my three friends! 


"I can't help myself. I wonder if they are secretly coming back? What are 
you doing with me? So I climbed up and ran to the room of His Royal 
Highness." 


"The strange thing is that there is really no one else in the room. Only the 
Prince's Highness 1s lying on the bed, and the mask has not been taken off. 
I stood still listening for a while, and found that the voices seemed to 
come from the Prince's Highness." 


"Accurately, it came from under his mask. 


"I slowly walked over to the bed of Prince Edward. The closer I walked, 
the more I was sure that it was really coming from under the mask. Was it 
the words of the Prince Edward, because I missed my friends, and learned 
their voices in my dreams?" 


"I hesitated for a long time. During the period, my Royal Highness did not 
move. I thought he was asleep, so I took the mask on his face and then saw 


something." 


In the eyes of the national teacher, there is a color of fear that cannot be 
concealed. 


He said: "I saw my three friends. 


"It’s not the Prince’s Highness, it’s them. The face of His Royal Highness 
is a scratch on the face of the sharp weapon. The flesh is turned up, the 
blood is half-condensed, and, when I have three faces, my mouth is 
moving. One by one. It’s their face!!!” 


Xie pity shuddered, said: "He ... put the three attendants who left him, also 
into the copper furnace??" 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 219: Hundred 
Years of Water Deep Millennium Fire 3 


The national teacher did not answer him, and he was completely immersed 
in the gloom that has not been scattered in the scene. 


He said: "The people haven't seen the light for a long time. Even if it's just 
the moonlight in the night, they can't stand it. I suddenly took the mask 
away. They seemed to be surprised. They narrowed their eyes and didn't 
talk. But it passed. After a while, seeing me 1s, they start... call my name. 


"I was shocked. As I said before, I have never seen a picture more horrible 
than tens of thousands of people falling from the air and burning in the sea 
of fire, but at the time, this picture was horrible ten times more than that 
time! 


"My hand holding the mask is shaking. If the whole person is already stiff, 
the mask may fall and wake up the prince of the Prince. And the three 
faces seem to be eager to say something to me, mouth. One combination is 
even more powerful, but it lowers the voice, like awakening the prince of 
the Prince. 


"I saw them look disgusting and scared, but couldn't help but wonder what 
they wanted to tell me, so I bent down, held my breath, and went close to 
the face of His Royal Highness. 


"It's too close, I smell the **** smell and the rotten smell that the strong 
herb taste can't cover. I heard them say, let me run, Prince Edward is 
crazy!" 


"It turned out that after the other three left, they still didn't feel at ease, 
and secretly returned to find the Prince." Who knows, just happened to 
meet with the Prince Edward and brought many people to the copper 
furnace. 


"They only know that His Royal Highness did not give up the method of 
sacrifice with the living, but he was shocked and angry, and came out to 
stop it, and he was beaten with His Royal Highness. Who knows that His 
Royal Highness has killed the killer and directly put them three, together 
with that. Hundreds of people, together into the copper furnace! 


"The rest of the people were of course thrown in and they died. But the 
three of them were repaired and killed by the Highness of the Prince. The 
resentment was extremely deep, and the soul was parasitic on him in this 
way. I chattered with him angrily every day and wanted to stop what he 
did. 


"I listened and listened. I felt terrible and horrified. I didn't know what to 
do. What horror? I didn't know clearly. It was this prince who was more 
terrible, or the three things on his face were even more terrifying! 


"At this time, I felt that a hand was placed on my head. 


"My scalp was numb, slowly looking up and seeing His Royal Highness 
Prince. 


"He didn't know when he was awake. He and the three faces on his face, a 
total of four pairs of eyes, all looking at me! 


"The facial expressions of those people changed even more, twisting and 
tearing the wound on his face, and a lot of blood flowed down. 


"He stared at me for a long time, then he sighed: 'I don't say yes, let you 
not come in.' 


"I suddenly understood all the anomalies of these days. 


"His Royal Highness found that there were three things on his face that 
were unacceptable, and he could not tolerate seeing himself in the mirror 
as a person who was not a ghost or a ghost, so he smashed all the mirrors. 
It is because he wants to cut them with a knife. The smell of decay is 
because the wounds are not good, but no matter how many times they are 
cut, they will grow again!" 


The national teacher slammed half of his face and his pupils contracted 
violently. 


He said: "I... I was lying on his bed. 


"His Royal Highness slowly sat up from the bed and said, 'Don't be afraid. 
They become like this because they betrayed me. As long as you don't do 
this, I will still be like you before. You are still me." A loyal attendant, 
nothing will change.' 


"How can I not be afraid?! How could it change? It has changed all the 
time!" 


"His Royal Highness is very clever. He used to never look at people's 
faces, but since he was detained, he learned to observe and see. He saw 
what I was thinking and slowly asked: 'You have to leave, is it.' 


"Really, I don't know. If he just puts the "bad people" in his mouth into the 
copper furnace, I can pretend that nothing has happened. I said I really 
understand. 


"But he has thrown in our best friends for so many years, and we are living 
together! This is really... 1am so mad. I can't accept it. 


"Prince of the Prince said to himself, it doesn't matter, I have already 
expected it. I will become like this. No one will stay. I can be alone. I 
understand, I am always a person!!! I don't need other people!!! 


"The expression on his face suddenly became very violent. One hand 
grabbed my neck, my eyes stared at me straight, and the mouth kept 
repeating: I can be alone, I can be alone, I am alone. I am alone, I am 
alone, I don't need others, I don't need others, I don't need others, I don't 
need others... 


"His power is very strong. If he really wants to kill me, I should have been 
cut off by his neck at once, and the voice will not come out, but I didn't die 
right away. And when he had an attack, all three of our friends were 
Shouting on his face, it seems like he did something to him, and he also 


yelled at him, and I was also calling. All five of us were yelling and mad, 
and the princes held their heads in the next hand. The other hand was even 
harder. I was black in front of me, I felt so fast, it was at this time... I saw 
something under his pillow. 


"He has a sword under his pillow, and he sleeps when he sleeps. This is 
also the habit he had when he was shackled. I grabbed the hilt and pulled 
the sword out. The cold light, the highness of the temple laughed, the eyes 
were red, said Do you want to kill me too? Come! Spur me! Look at me! 
Not one of you! I want to see, who is the last to die! Are you dead or I die! 


"Of course I didn't marry him. I put the sword in front of him and shouted 
screamingly: ‘His Highness! Your Highness! Come back, look at yourself! 


Look at what you are like now?!’ 


"He broke all the mirrors. He hadn't seen the mirror for a long time. The 
sword's sword was sharp, and it suddenly reflected his appearance at the 
moment. He also saw his face. 


"He saw himself in the mirror and suddenly stopped. 


"The power of my high hand on my hand has not been alleviated, but after 
a long time, he looked at it, and suddenly a tear fell in his eyes. 


"Seeing his tears, I can't help but burst into tears. The reflection on the 
sword, how ugly! I look disgusting at all, why should I let him see himself, 
remind him that he is such an ugly now? monster? 


"I still can't bear it, the sword broke off and fell to the ground. 
"In the end, His Royal Highness threw me out of force and said, let's go. 
"I even fled and fled." 


I heard it in one breath, and the tone that was hung in my heart was only a 
little loose. 


The national teacher also put down his hand and said: "I fled far away and 
escaped from Wuyong. Not long after, the copper furnace volcano broke 


out again. 


"This time, the entire Wuyong country was buried, and almost no one was 
spared. A country has disappeared. 


"I escaped, and I have never heard the news of His Royal Highness. He 
seems to have been buried with Wu Yongguo. 


"I went to heaven, I practiced myself, I was a little small, I kept my body, 
and I wandered aimlessly in the world. I served as the Prince of the Prince 
when I was a teenager. Now I don't have to serve him, I don't know what to 
do." 


"His temple is gone, my three friends are also dead. I made three empty 
shell dummies, let the dummies talk to me in their tone, and occasionally 
play cards." 


Hearing the "empty shell dummy", thank you for the darkness. Guo 
Shidao: "Then I got the spells, and I instilled the skills of my three 
friends." 


Thanks and whispered: "Is it another three national divisions?" 


It is no wonder that he always felt that the other three national divisions 
were a bit strange. They never acted alone or communicated with him 
alone. They were originally dummies, and they would be exposed when 
they left the national division. Guoshi said: "It is them. So, speaking, you 
can be regarded as the apprentice of my three friends. Unfortunately, I am 
not their own, after all, the ability to instill in the dummies is not only 
their twenty-three, they can not teach How many are you. The three 
dummy who have been with me for a long time have long been ruined by 
him." 


"After another hundred or two hundred years, the heavens became more 
generations, the original priests were all degraded, and gradually replaced 
with a new group of priests. But these are not my business, I will eat and 
die. 


"Until one day, in a certain country, there is a Prince Edward, born on the 
day of confession. 


"It is you, His Royal Highness Prince of the Kingdom." 
finally come. The hand that pity on the lap is slightly tightened. 


The national teacher sat cross-legged and hugged his arms and said: "I 
think it is very clever and very good. But in fact, Wuyong had been 
destroyed for many, many years at that time. I will meet once or twice in a 
few hundred years. It’s not a coincidence. But I don’t have any feelings 
that I don’t understand, I just made a name and went to be a teacher of 
Xianle.” 


Thanks to the heart: "I know that the name is casually edited..." 


Guoshi said: "I don't despise your fairy music, but it is too simple for me 
to mix a national teacher there. There is only one problem, that is, people 
always feel that their mouths are not working, and they are young. If you 
have no qualifications, you will be looked down. If I go to the exam with 
this face, I might not give it to me, so I changed my face and I was a dozen 
or twenty years old. Mixed up. As a national teacher, I have to talk directly 
with the gods of the heavens. 


"So, Iam on Jun. 


"Junwu's appearance is totally different from that of the Prince I am 
familiar with. But, after all, I am too familiar with him. After a few 
conversations, I am a bit skeptical. But it is only doubt. 


"And even if I doubt again, I don't want to say anything. 


"He has completely become another person, and the face on his face has 
disappeared. I thought it was my three friends who dissatisfied. If that is 
the case, there is no need to revisit this quiet thing. Pretending not to 
recognize each other, not very good." 


Thanks to the pity: "If it is me, I will probably do the same." 


Guoshi said: "But we still can't get it to the end. Because we all saw you. 


"His Highness, you should have guessed why I have high hopes for you. 
You are like him. So, I hope that you can be a person he wants to be, or 
God, you can do what he can't do, you can Use your perfection to make up 
for me and his regrets." 


Huacheng is faintly said: "You have been wrong since the beginning. It is 
not at all." 


The national teacher looked at him and said: "Now you can certainly say 
nothing. But it used to be very similar. And the bad is bad, it is too much 
like it." 


He turned to thank you again and said: "That time, Prince Edward, you 
saved the child who fell from the tower. I am not very happy. Not only 
because it stopped the festival, but because of that, You are too eye- 
catching. You caught the attention of Junwu. 


"Jun Wu started to mention you with me. He likes you very much. Every 
time we talk about you, I feel that it 1s not suitable. But I can see that he 
really likes you. He found a very good seed. The joy, and I want to point 
you up, but every time I was persuaded to use all kinds of reasons to 
persuade." 


Xie Pity is also not willing to believe that Jun Wu’s attitude towards him 
is all false, but listening to the national teacher is so complicated and 
inexplicable. 


Guoshidao: "The turning point lies in a bridge." 


Hearing these three words, thank you for your return. Guo Shidao: "The 
ghost of a bridge, do you remember?" 


Thanks for the silence: "That is the opportunity for me to fly, naturally 
remember." 


Guoshi said: "When you meet that ghost, I feel that something is wrong. 
This ghost, squatting on the broken bridge in the wilderness, wearing a 
broken armor, a foot in the fire, all over the blood and a sword and sword, 
every step Just leaving behind the trail of blood and fire behind him, and 
the three questions he asked you - all made me care, I was upset, but I also 
said that it was not right. And after defeating the bridgehead, you are very 
It’s flying fast, I just can’t understand it. 


"Fortunately, after you fly up, Jun Wu's attitude towards you is as good as 
ever, very popular, very valued, as if nothing has changed, I also told 
myself not to think too much. 


"Then, it is the drought of Xianle, the chaos of Yong'an. And the 
appearance of that thing, nothing." 


Thanks for the pity, the national teacher said: "I said, at first I didn't know 
what it was. Even if I came out with a human epidemic, I was only 
skeptical. But because of the grievances, it is not so rare. It’s just that it’s 
never been spread so much. Plus, I’m a bit sorrowful about the so-called 
Heavenly Way. At first I thought that nothing can be born naturally, it’s the 
day to punish you. 


"But as you get in touch with that thing, the human face is getting more 
and more raging, and many things have to make me think about the worst 
possible." 


Thanks to the pity: "A lot of things, specifically?? For example?" 
Guo Shidao: "The family of three who died at the gate of Xianle City." 
Thanks to pity, said: "That... 1s...?" 


Guo Shidao: "Later, I checked the bodies of the three people and found 
that it was not three people at all, but three empty shells." 


Thanks to the pity: "But the empty shell is hollow, there is no internal 
organs, it will not bleed?!" 


Guoshi said: "There is no need for internal organs. From such a high place, 
the internal organs have already fallen, as long as a group of rotten meat is 
filled in the empty shell and filled with plasma. It is in my three friends. 
There is one that is best at doing this kind of wonderful things. The empty 
shell dummy was originally made by him. He only taught us, and the way 
to make empty shell dummies at that time is not yet circulated. So wide, 
they are dead, can make empty shell dummies, can still be so realistic, 
except me, who do you say 1s left?" 


Thanks for the low head, the pupil shrinks. 


The family of three fell to the door of the Xianle Emperor City and 
directly detonated the war. However, those few lives are simply fake, a 
trap! 


Thank you, "Why are you... didn't you tell me at the time?" 


Guoshi said: "I don't dare at all. If it is really him, I told you, with your 
temper at the time, will you rush directly to find him? That will not save 
you and Xianle, can only accelerate Your demise. And, even without the 
three empty shells, sooner or later..." 


Sooner or later, there is something else to ignite the war. It 1s like the 
missing dog in the city of Xianle. 


"Later, you lost, and Xianle also lost. 


"I really couldn't help it. So, I first dismissed all the emperors, and asked 
him to drop his **** in the Shenwu Temple. Then he directly tore his 
identity." 

That is what Junwu said, the side they had seen eight hundred years ago. 
Guo Shidao said: "I questioned him a lot of things. He did not admit it or 
deny it. Finally, I asked him: ‘His Royal Highness, what do you want?’ 


"He finally answered. He said that he wants you to be his perfect passer. 


"If there is a person in the world who can fully understand him, that is you. 
As long as you succeed, you will never betray him!" 


"T understand what he meant. When we were excited, we started to move 
again. I couldn't play at all. I couldn't do it. He could kill me without a 
finger, but at this time, he suddenly changed his face. , stunned his face. 


"I was shocked, only to find out that his face, and the three faces appeared! 


"It turned out that they didn't disappear at all. He just kept trying to 
suppress them! Now, I don't know because they are emotional or because 
of me, they are running out again!" 


"In this way, my three friends came out to make trouble, and it made him a 
headache, his expression was terrible, and I took the opportunity to escape. 


"Starting to wander again in the world, this time I have to hide in Tibet. I 
thought, what happened to the original Wuyong country? So, I went back 
and looked at it. 


"I didn't expect that, when I went back, I made a big discovery. 


"I don't know why. In the past, Wuyong's land was completely closed and 
isolated from the outside world. I went there for a long time and met my 
three friends. 


Thanks to the pity: "Is that three mountain monsters, old, sick, dead?" 
Guoshi said: "Exactly. 


"The copper furnace swallowed their bodies, and they were almost burned 
to the disappearing ashes and volcanic ash. They spewed out and 
accumulated over time. After thousands of years, they finally turned into 
three mountains and boarded them. soul." 


"It took me a long time to find and communicate with them as a mountain 
monster, but after success, I learned a lot. 


"It turned out that the last generation of the priests was not a natural 
replacement, but was one by one, slowly killing him. He ... slaughtered the 
whole heaven, one did not stay! 


"After blood washing the heavens, he returned to the world, patiently 
waited for a while, compiled a new name, fabricated a new identity, as a 
‘person’, and again 'flying up’. The entire heavenly priests died No one 
knows who he really is, and no one knows what he used to be. Now the 
origins, allusions, anecdotes, looks, and temperament of the 'Shenwu 
Emperor' that 1s widely circulated in the world are all fake. It is the precise 
lie he woven! 


"This Xianjing is the new heaven that he built with his own hands under 
his control. The bodies and ashes of the first-generation priests are all 
mixed in the soil of the Xianjing foundation, and he is stepped on his feet 
every day. Trample. At this moment, your ashes may be stepping on your 
feet." 


" " 


The National Teacher continued: "The present is the first **** of heaven 
in the heavens, and the surface is brilliant. But in his heart, it suppresses 
the boundless darkness. Resentment, pain, anger, hate... these things need 
to be released. Only In this way, he can maintain balance and continue to 
be the first martial artist to sit in the Three Realms, instead of killing. 


"The once Wuyong country has become a hell. The copper furnace has 
been fed by countless living people and three quasi-sacred officials. He 
has already recognized him as the main. He regularly releases these dark 
emotions into the copper furnace. The millions of undead people are the 
ones who ignite the fire and refine many evil things. 


Thanks to pity: "The method of refining these things is different from 
‘dead’?” 


Guo Shidao: "It is indeed different. ‘Absolutely’ is only later, because he... 
changed the way of refining.” 


Thanks to the pity: "What is the way of refining?" 
Guo Shidao: “‘Quality’ and 'Quantity’.” 


He took another look at the flower city and said: "You must know that it 
was born only once in a hundred or even hundreds of years. There can only 
be one at a time, so it is extremely rare and extremely difficult. Moreover, 
the predecessor is independent. The existence of the copper furnace is just 
to provide an environment that accelerates the process of their outbreak. It 
can become a perfect person, wherever it can become a success, sooner or 
later must become a must. 


"In fact, the term 'absolute' is taken from the meaning of 'peerlessness' and 
‘top’. It does not have much to do with whether it has been practiced in a 
copper furnace. However, it can indeed be crowned by the quenching of 
copper furnaces. Because there are not a few that can be beaten. So far, not 
three?" 


Xie pity looked at the flower city next to him, just as Huacheng was 
watching him. Although I don't know why he seems, he still smiles. 


The national teacher went on to say: "But the early output of the copper 
furnace is not like this. Once in the early years, once in a few hundred and 
a few dozens, a batch of emerged may be related to his emotional 
instability at that time. What comes out is a monster whose hate and 
resentment are condensed. I am afraid there are some things that you are 
familiar with. For example, the vernacular is really fairy." 


Thanks to pity: "The vernacular is also a thing born in the copper 
furnace?!" 


Guo Shidao: "Exactly. Some of these things have their own consciousness, 
and they are separated from him. Some are not. They can be counted as his 
points. The vernacular has its own consciousness. A lot of smaller points. 
My three friends stayed in the territory of Wuyong and prevented these 
monsters from leaving the country. I searched for these things all the year 
round and tried to remedy them." 


Xie Pity suddenly remembered that before the monarch came to see the 
strange attitude of Shi Qingxuan, he said: "Master! Fengshi adults... The 
high-ranking man who gave Qing Xuan a fortune and let their family not 
to make a big surprise, is it not? Is that you?" 


Guoshidao: "nonsense. Except for your master, which high-ranking person 
can still be so accurate? Which high-ranking person is still so idle? If a 
bowl of porridge is sent, then give it?" 


Guo Shidao: "The vernacular true fairy originally wanted to try to swallow 
the younger teacher who was still younger, but the teacher did not cross 
this kid too embarrassed, and he was not good at a young age, and he was 
not afraid of being invulnerable. I couldn't get out of the mouth, but I was 
afraid that I would have a broken mouth full of blood. It had to turn to his 
mediocre and wealthy younger brother. Although he still didn't lie, 1t made 
the two brothers and dogs feel restless, and they also bite a bit of life. I 
didn’t lose money when I got into the water. I really didn’t want to kill this 
thing.” 


Huacheng Road: "It has been killed." 


Guo Shidao: "Is it swallowed by He Xuan? I also heard about it. I was 
supposed to stare at the teacher's brother until it was confirmed that it was 
not harmful. But at that time, the copper furnace was open again, and I 
couldn't keep up, I will first I went to the copper furnace. When I went 
back, things became messy. The teacher didn't have a hard time, and made 
a big one, and I couldn't finish it! I had a terrible headache and I couldn't 
manage it. "" 


That is really what I want to manage and | can't manage it. The national 
teacher said again: "But really, the vernacular true immortal is not really 
powerful inside, and it just loves to go out and make trouble. This thing 
can only be regarded as a defective product strictly, and it is not ranked. 
Also, for example. ...... i 


Thanks and whispered: "For example, ... a bridgehead, the death of the 
soul?" 


The national teacher took a breath and said: "...1s him. 


"Otherwise, do you think that I said, everything is because of your words? 
Because the bridgehead ghost is a black point that he made in the copper 
furnace. Every few years, it will come out for murder and hate. But, just 
because of you, defeated the monster! 


"He felt that the bridgehead ghost was killed. He went down to see it and 
saw you. And you, in front of him, said the sentence - 'Being in the air, the 
heart is Taoyuan’. This is a crazy mockery of him, touching his reverse 
scale... 


"This is the turning point of everything." 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 220: Bai Dijun 
secretly set the proposition 


Thanks for the clenched fist, breathing slightly disordered. 
In a word. It sounds so incredible, even ridiculous, but he can't smile at all. 


Guoshi said: "In addition to these monsters, there is also. Your Royal 
Highness Prince, you remember that when you brought the little girl you 
saved under the castle floor to the Royal View, I was shocked?" 


Thanks for the moment, I quickly took a look at the flower city and said, 
"Remember. What happened to the child? You said that he is..." 


Guoshidao: "Scorpio Lone Star!" 


He sighed: "I only thought that the child was too heavy and too unusual. 
Later, in the copper furnace and the other three were right, I knew that the 
copper furnace would not only produce monsters, but also curse. Just like 
You can dissipate your gas, and the copper furnace can also dissipate the 
bad luck it stores. After it is scattered, they will flow around. 


"The child's birthday syllabus is extremely sinister, Ji Zeji breaks through 
the sky, and the fierce murders the ground. I am afraid that on the day he 
was born, he absorbed all the bad habits that had become so terrible. He 
went up, the whole Tai Cangshan Almost burn him!" 


Thanks to the more shocked, he turned his head and looked at Huacheng. It 
is clear that he is talking about his own affairs, but the look of Huacheng is 
unchanged, but he smiles at him. 


The National Teacher continued: "According to normal circumstances, the 
child must have lost his father and his mother in the early years. If you 
don't lose it, then the father must be abandoned, and he will be abused. It 


is not as good as his parents. And he can't live 18 years old. It will kill the 
dead, scattered, unlucky, like the catastrophe, and the star will come home. 
So I asked you to hurry him and stop coming close..." 


Thank you for listening, and said: "National teacher!... Don't say it." 


The national teacher nodded and said: "Don't say it. I will just give you an 
example to tell you how terrible the copper furnace 1s." 


Xie pity did not know what to say, Huacheng smiled: "The horrible is not 
terrible, but the national division is quite accurate." 


" " 


Thanks to the pity, I am afraid that Huacheng really could not live 18 years 
old, and my hand trembled slightly. At this moment, one hand stretched 
out underneath and gently covered his cold hand back. 


Both hands are the same cold, but when they are stacked, there is 
temperature. 


Guo Shidao: "He has been setting a test for you. The human face epidemic 
in Xianleguo is the first question. According to his answer, as long as you 
choose to launch a human face epidemic against Yongan, you will pass, he 
Not only will you not let you go down, but it will also help you cover up, 
let you truly become his heart-to-heart, step into the sky, two steps against 
the sky. But you made a mistake. 


"When you were first shackled, he should have set a question for you 
again, and you still didn't give him a satisfactory answer, so you flew up 
and immediately hit him." 


Thanks to a pale smile in his mind, he paused and whispered: "It is 
actually my own request." 


Huacheng Road: "Brother, believe me. Even if you don't ask for it, he has 
thousands of ways to let you go." 


Thanks to pity: "However, nothing is defeated by him." 


Huacheng Road: "But it didn't kill." 
Thanks, "How is this?" 


Guo Shidao: "White No Phase' can of course kill you, but what he wants is 
not to kill you. In fact, I said, he likes you very much, he doesn't want you 
to die at all, he just wants you. It becomes what he wants." 


Huacheng also said: "Killing you can't achieve this goal. You die in that 
state and never change again. He can't stand it any more. But there is no 
reason for it, so there is no reason to let you go." What is better than the 
Emperor Wu of the Emperor, the retreating of the demon, and saving you 
in times of danger? In this way, you will be more grateful to him. He has 
not succeeded twice, and his heart is definitely not very happy." 


Guoshi said: "The second time you were desecrated, you have a lot of 
opportunities to slowly "teach" you, and slowly wait for you to change 
your mind. According to my observation, he has calmed down. But this 
calm, It has also been broken recently. 


"The opportunity is your third soar. 


"If you have a muddy mud, it will be the same. You can't just do it. You 
can't arrange it for you at all. You can fly again, and it's still the same. It 
didn't change at all... I don't. Know that he will see what you think, but I 
think he will definitely test you again." 


Huacheng Road: "I know what I have done after watching him. Brother, 
you think about it, since your third ascent, what happened." 


Cheering soon entered the state, meditation for a moment, said: "The first 
thing, with Junshan. I won the female ghost Xuan Ji. At first I did not find 
the ghost groom, the middle of the tires with the guidance of the nursery 
rhymes, want to come from his inspiration But I thought that in that 
matter, this is helping me." 


Huacheng Road: "Help you complete the task. The direct consequence is to 
win the female ghost Xuan Ji, indirect consequences?" 


Xie pity tempted: "...had the horse's nest of the old lover's old lover, 
brought him a little trouble?" 


Guo Shidao: "This can be considered a small problem. If you know that 
you will offend you, will you handle the task of ghosts and grooms in 
another way? For example, if you let the downcast notice, let Xuan Ji 
continue In this small piece of trouble, not big and big." 


Thanks to the shame, said: "This... To be honest, I later learned that it was 
related to the general. At that time, the female ghost was killed, so many 

people were present, the arrow had to be sent on the string, and there was 

no time to think about whether or not to offend people. It is." 


Huacheng smiled a little and said: "Brother, you have already made a 
choice." 


He continued to sort out and said: "The second thing, Bodhisattva came to 
an empty shell, and led you to the half-month. Who did the shell come 
from, let's talk about it, what is the consequence of this incident? "" 


Thanks to the pity: "Kicked off the general of Xiaoyan and folded the 
general." 


Huacheng Road: "Brother, you see, these two things come down, you help 
him greatly weaken the strength of the shackles, and completely offended 
the blasphemy. He did not come out at all, the enemy is yours, and you are 
grateful to him." 


Huacheng said again: "If you haven't guessed it wrong, he hasn't stared at 
you for the past 800 years. Brother, you have been a national teacher in 
Yongan, and he has taught Lang Qianqiu, he probably knows. But he still 
sent Lang Qianqiu. Traveling with you. In my opinion, this is purely 
unintentional." 


The national teacher was shocked: "Wait? Your Highness, have you been to 
Yongan as a national teacher? Have you taught Lang Qianqiu?" 


Thanks: "Well..." 
Guoshidao: "You are the heart of the country?" 


Thanks for the pity: "Well... what happened?" A few words are briefly 
described at the moment. Guo Shidao said: "If he knows about this, he 
must be very angry with you." 


Huacheng continued: "The vernacular is really a thing, brother, you 
originally planned not to intervene, but in the end it was involved, but it is 
not deep. The hundreds of fishermen who were caught in the robbery in the 
South China Sea are not black water. It’s not that the teacher is not 
tempted. Who is the best who can do it besides them?” 


One piece down, thank you for discovering that every step he took after he 
came back may be under the gaze and promotion of Junwu. 


Huacheng picked up his arm and said: "I guess, he did this, on the one 
hand, out of that strange mentality, constantly throwing questions to you, 
testing how you choose to go, expecting you to press him. On the other 
hand, I am afraid that he also wants to use you as a sword to weaken the 
power of these priests. 


"The priests of the previous generations must have left him with a deep 
shadow. He is very alert and requires absolute control over anything. He 
does not allow anyone to threaten his power and status. He cannot let other 
priests Catching up with him. And, I think..." 


Xie pity is just thinking about it, saying: "What?" 


Huacheng Road: "The teacher did not give the teacher Qing Xuan's life, 
and Blackwater sneaked into the heavenly investigation. Does he really 
know nothing?" 


This is also what I think in my heart. 


Is it true that Junwu, who is sitting at the highest point, really doesn’t 
know anything about it? Not too possible. 


All the files of the Lingwen Temple can be directly viewed. If there is 
fraud, he will really not be aware of it. 


The Navy had committed such a big thing, but he almost passed through 
the sea and was safe for many years. It was only after he started walking 
horizontally in the heavens that he was exposed. Huacheng Road: "Maybe, 
he was aware of it at the beginning, but the position of the Navy did not 
threaten him at the time, and the matter was not revealed. If it was 
revealed early, it would not be good. When you come up with a new navy, 
the new navy can not necessarily have such a big handle and the scourge 
can be caught by him." 


He continued: "If I am Jun Wu, I will be very unhappy when I see a 
teacher. But if I want to get rid of the Navy, I don't need to do it myself. I 
just need to watch him quietly and become more and more unscrupulous. 
When I don't want to tolerate him anymore, I will directly disclose the 
information about the change of life to Blackwater." 


Blackwater will naturally avenge himself and his dead relatives. 


Huacheng Road: "As for his gathering in the copper furnace, if you want to 
refine it, it may be because..." 


Thanks for your pity: "Check and balance." 


Huacheng Road: "Well. On the one hand, he probably would be happy to 
see that evil is born to be a disaster; on the other hand, as long as 
something is in jeopardy, someone will pray." 


And as long as the believer prays, the power of God will be stronger! 


Guoshi sighed and said: "Every time we open the mountain, we will all 
stop, but it will not be successful again. This time it 1s... 1t is too big. 


"Those who spurted out from the copper furnace, he killed a small part, 
sent away most of it with a thousand miles, and then sent away everyone 
else. He left behind to check and destroy some things. He guessed I will go 


to you, and I will rush over when I have finished the Bronze Mountain. I 
really took it. 


"I think I can't go on like this anymore. Wu Yongguo has already surfaced. 
With his vigilance, most of them have to change the heavens again. You 
will continue to have no doubt that you will not be aware of it. Sooner or 
later, you will be buried. Xianjing is below the local base. Just as the wind 
believes that the boy brought a red mirror, he tried to die. Originally his 
mana became stronger and stronger, the red mirror could not reveal the 
things on his face, but because he only recently The three mountains have 
been smashed and the human face has been activated. 


"Almost I have finished, what else do you want to ask, Your Highness." 


Thanks for the meditation, Huacheng said: "I have. Guoshi, your Wuyong 
language, still remember." 


Guo Shidao: "The Wuyong country has disappeared. No one uses its words 
and language any more, so we have learned a new one. But the original 
ones still remember, but it is rarely used." He admitted, "also I don't want 
to use it." 


Thanks to pity, it turned out that at that time, the National Teacher said to 
the mountain monster, "His Royal Highness did not save," and "wake up 
quickly", it really does not mean him, but refers to the attachment to Lang 
Ying, walking along the way, killing, The whiteness of strength recovery. 


There are also ghouls who speak out loud. At that time, because Xie Pui 
understood the Uyghur language they said, Huacheng believed that 
someone had instilled relevant memories into him. Among the list of 
possible candidates, it is really good, and there are two: Jun Wu and Bai 
Wuxiang. 


It is not difficult to make false skins of good faith and admiration in the 
Wanshen Cave in the white. Because, Jun, of course, knows them well! 


Thanks to pity: "He... seems to always want to lead me to think that I am 
the Prince of Wuyong himself, or part of his soul." 


Guo Shidao: "He certainly thinks. Since the existence of Wu Yongguo can 
no longer hold back, whoever sees Prince Xian and Prince Wu Yong will 
feel that the two are very similar. It is better to introduce to you. And, as 
long as You begin to doubt yourself, doubt your own heart, behavior, and 
purpose. With the idea that I am the Prince of Wuyong, you are more 
likely to repeat his fate. 


"It is his initiative to guide you, I want you to take the path he has 
traveled, not your road is similar. He can't tolerate you being so similar, 
but the path is different." 


For a long time, Huacheng Road: "All said, not at all." 


The national teacher seemed to be unable to endure, and turned to him: 
"You young man, what are you doing?" 


Flower City: "?" 
Thanks for your pity, my heart said: "What is this?" 


The national teacher picked up his sleeves and said to Huacheng language: 
"I have been talking about it for a long time since I just started. Why are 
you young people, smiles are not sincere? Do not think that you are a 
ghost king, you can be rude to me. Desperate ghost king is Very rare, but 
how many years do I know? Of course, my elders of this age are more 
rare!" 


Huacheng picked up his eyebrows. 


Thank you for your pity, saying: "Master, Saburo is not rude, he is just..." 
He just used to laugh at others. The national teacher gave a gesture to 
Huacheng, let him not come over, and pulled Xie Pian to the side, 
solemnly said: "His Royal Highness, I saw it." 


Thank you, "Ah? What did you see?" 


Guo Shidao: "The giant statue is above." 


That giant statue? What happened above? Thanks for a moment, suddenly, 
a sigh in my head. 


Borrow the mana! 


Xie pity coughs and keeps saying: "No... that is just borrowing mana... No, 
in fact, it is not just borrowing mana. In short, it is..." 


The national teacher is more vocal: "His Royal Highness, how are you 
going? Is it because I am too strict, you have been practicing for too long, 
not close to the female color, you will change..." 


" " 


Thank you for your madness: "It's not the reason!" 


Guo Shihu suspected: "That... is it... born? This... I never saw it. Um... 
well, then you really don't look like him..." 


Thank you, "Yes, etc.? Not!" 


Guo Shi sighed and sighed: "Don't be afraid, Your Highness, I am not 
going to say anything about you. I will not teach you anything I am not 
good at. Besides, have you come over, do you still care about this? Men 
and women It doesn't matter, as long as you are happy." 


Thanks to pity, my eyebrows are red and red, and whispered: "Well... I am 
very happy." 


The national teacher was depressed and said: "...you have been looking for 
eight hundred years, how to find a desperate ghost king?" 


Thank you for your pity. Guoshi said: "I don't mean that your eyes are not 
good, it's good. The little girl girl definitely likes this, but the ghost kings 
are very fierce. You can think clearly under the highness. This kind of 
person is wrapped around. You will never want to get rid of the upper 
body." 


"Hey Master, you have to wait..." 


"Absolutely right. I tell you, when I look at this **** rain, I know that his 
life must be fierce and eighteen bends. One mountain is still taller than a 
mountain. The evil spirits are suffocating, it 1s simply... ..." 


Huacheng is behind them, slowly and fluently: "It’s just that the stars are 
lonely, right." 


Xie Li has just tried to prevent the national teacher from continuing to 
talk, but still failed to succeed, holding his face and silently returning 
behind the flower city. 


Huacheng took a smile with him and raised his eyebrows. He said: "My 
smile is indeed very insincere. However, in my own face, he said that he is 
a lonely star, the disaster star is coming, the broom star is home, and his 
parents are dead. I can't live 18 years old - it's not suitable, 1s 1t?" 


Won 


National teacher's eyes are gradually growing: "...you, yes?" 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 221: Ghost 
King Prince Hall 


The author has something to say: Notice: January 31st and February Ist 
have to take the car for a long time, the time is very tight. 


Therefore, Chapter 222 will be updated on [February Ist, 23:00-24:00]. 


This time, the smile of Huacheng is not fake, but it is even more splendid. 
The national teacher was shocked, raised his hand and pointed at him: 
"you, you, you? That? You are the one?" 


His fingers and voice are almost trembled. Huacheng is not happy, but his 
face is clearly filled: Yes, I am the one who almost burned the entire 
Tianshan Cangshan star! 


The national teacher turned to the question and said: "His Royal Highness, 
how is this going? Explain?" 


Thanks for giving up his hand, he smiled and said: "...just...this is the 
case." 


The national division was shocked. He threw his right hand back into the 
left hand palm for dozens of times. After a long while, he finally said 
something: "Look, you see, look at you, I will say it! I said that the ghost 
king is not easy to provoke! He Then, when you are a little bit, you will 
fall on you, and the ghost will not scatter! Eight hundred years, eight 
hundred years! Eight hundred years have been stunned by you, terrible, 
terrible! I am really accurate!" 


Thanks for your pity: "Forget it, Master, don't say this..." 


He thought to himself: "You haven't seen the overwhelming image of the 
gods in the cave." If you see it, it is estimated that the flower city will be 


regarded as a savage beast, and the sorrow will be slammed under the 
elbow. The national teacher has not slowed down from the shock and said: 
"No, he is so horrible, it is so simple, obsessive and temperament is so 
deep! Your Highness, you must be careful, you are so easy to suffer, 
beware of him cheating you!" 


Thanks to the pity: "Sanlang will not." 


Huacheng also said faintly: "You think too much. I will not lie to my 
lieutenant if I le." 


The national teacher squatted and said in his theory: "You are a young 
man, don't think that I can't see it. You don't know how much you know 
about your prince. You are now talking about me." How do you borrow 
borrowed mana? How many borrowing methods are there? How do you 
borrow it? How do you tell your high school?" 


Flower City: "..." 


Xie pity screamed: "Ha ha ha ha, well! Destroy it, no matter what, 
borrowed it! Hahaha, it's the same, the same!" 


Going on, he will be like a drowning and boiled duck. Thanks for being 
serious and serious, said: "So, let's talk about business. Now he has shut us 
all here, but I still haven't done it. What do you want?" 

Huacheng Road: "I want to give you a question." 


Thanks to the pity: "How can I set it up?" 


Guoshi said: "It is difficult to say, really, how is it possible. Your 
Highness, you should not transfer the topic! I will give you a piece of 
advice, you don't want to be stunned or deceived by words, I see him... ” 


At this time, Huacheng suddenly sighed: "Brother, someone is coming." 
Guoshi said: "You don't want to lie to me, I don't have to be deceived by 


my Royal Highness..." Xie pity said: "Master, he is not lying to you, it 1s 
really someone coming, let's hide first!" When I finished, I went with the 


flower city, and the soles of the feet were on the ground. The two men 
fluttered on the roof beams and hid them. 


Not long after, there was a mess of footsteps outside the house. One person 
opened the door and smirked: "Wow, hahahahahahaha, heaven, what? It is 
not the same as being trampled under the feet!" 


As soon as I heard this voice, all three were speechless. 


I saw a big swing outside the house and walked into a Tsing Yi man. It’s 
not the sadness that I haven’t seen for many days! 


It seems that Jun Wu not only locked up the priests, but also released the 
demons and ghosts. These things are so turbulent in the middle of the 
streets of Xianjing, it is so upside down, very strange! 


The national teacher did not expect it to be sad and stiff. Grace said that he 
said: "Dead country teacher, old man, old man is not dead! Hey! When you 
fucking, I look down on me, refuse to accept me as a disciple, how is it 
now? Face it, retribution, no good end Let's take it!" 


From behind him, he found a small head, which is the millet. For the first 
time, Millet entered such a rich building, widened his eyes and looked 
around. He seemed to want to sneak out the jade tiles and dare not touch. 
Graceful and proud, said: "Is my son seeing it? Here is the heavens. Now, 
it is your old man and my place!" 


Guzi was shocked: "Really? This place is so big..." 


Graceful said: "Of course! Do not believe you see, I am! I am here to spit, 
who dares to say me?" 


National Division:"...... 


The millet hesitated for a moment, or a small voice: "Hey, spitting is not 
good. It's so beautiful and clean, it will be dirty." 


Grace card. 


The national teacher couldn't help himself. He said, "Look at you, how do 
you teach children? I don't know how to be a good example when I am old, 
and children are more sensible than you!" 


At the same time, he was said to be angered by both sides. He jumped up 
and said: "Dead old man, you know a fart! What elders are there, you are 
not allowed to teach me! And you! Dare to talk to your old man, you are 
not filial!" 


The millet was smashed by him, and he was so wronged that he did not 
dare to speak. After sighing and guilty, I wiped off the feet of my freshly 
vomited mouth, pretending that nothing happened, walking around with 
the millet, and writing on the most conspicuous wall of the Lingwen 
Temple before leaving. The words of the big line of the big ones - "The 
first ghost of the Three Kingdoms, the ghost of the green ghosts, come 
here." 


After waiting for the Lingwen Temple, the blue tumbler in the sleeves fell 
down, and fell on the wall where the big characters were written, and the 
watermarks that were wiped out by the graceful mouth. , like being mad. 
Xie Li and Huacheng also fell down. Thanks to the pity, the tumbler re- 
raised, and the national teacher shook his head. He said: "The little mirror 
king is really... the taste of a few hundred years, and there is no growth." 


Huacheng glanced at the wall, and even a disdainful look was too lazy to 
give, only one word was evaluated: "Ugly." 


The national teacher finally agreed with him, and his hands were sleeved. 
He said: "It’s ugly. Over the years, I have seen a messy couplet in front of 
the ghost gambling gambling in the ghost city. That word is even more 
ugly than this. A few dozen times more, I have never seen a more ugly 
word!" 


Flower City: "...........0: 


Xie pity smiled hard and said: "Ha ha ha ha, Master, you have seen the 
pair of couples I have seen, I think the writing is not bad? Very own style, 
I quite like it." 


Guo Shi strangely said: "His Royal Highness, how can you say this? Your 
calligraphy is a famous tutor. Do you still know what ugly beauty is? The 
word is ugly in the three realms, and even the best teachers can't save it. 
Where do you like it? Your taste is not broken?" 


Thank you: "Ha ha ha ha ha ha master, you still don't say it!!!" 


Suddenly, Huacheng Road: "Brother, Junwu has action. He may have to go 
to you and is heading to Xianle Palace." 


The national teacher was shocked and said: "What! Your Highness must go 
back quickly! Blood and rain, you are hiding, don't be found by him, you 
have already caught up. The mountain monsters of my three friends are 
reflected in him. Suppressed in the copper furnace mountain, 1s breaking 
free. No matter what action to take, they are more confident when they 
break free, remember, must not act rashly!" 


Thank you for your understanding. Saying goodbye to the National 
Teacher, the two went out of the Lingwen Hall, sneaked quickly, avoided 
countless guards and demons, and went to Xianle Palace after four streets. 
At this time, Huacheng said: "Brother, he 1s still a street. Just went to 
Xianle Palace." 

Thank you: "!" 

He touched the silver butterfly that was being investigated. He flashed a 
picture in front of him. Sure enough, Junwu took the hand and walked 
alone. About a hundred steps away, he would see the gate of Xianle Palace. 


How can this be good! Isn't this just going back after Jun Wu or hitting it? 
You must know that the guards at the gate of Xianle Palace can still be set 
by the flower city! 


Suddenly, the door of the temple behind Jun Wu opened, and one stood 
behind the door and said: "Emperor." 


Jun Wudun stayed in the footsteps and turned back, saying: "The rain 
teacher? What?" 


It was the rain guard who stopped him. Probably because of the confession 
of Junwu, the idlers are not allowed to approach the Yushi House, so in 
addition to the guards, they did not see other demons. She is polite and 
authentic: "The emperor, there is one thing, I forgot to give you. Can you 
please stop?" 


Jun Wu said first: "Good." Sure enough to turn around. Thank you for your 
relief, said: "Thank you for the rainman!" I decided to go back to the rain 
teacher to burn the eighteen pillars of incense! ! ! 


Taking advantage of this opportunity, the two flew over four streets and 
grabbed the Xianle Palace before Junwu. When they entered the door, 
Huacheng waved and removed the spells of the guards at the door. They 
only confused for a moment and found nothing wrong. Thanks for the pity 
to go back to the inner hall, but I haven't had time to breathe a sigh of 
relief and my face changed. Because the guard at the door was notified 
again. 


Junwu is coming so soon! 


It seems that the rainman did not stop him for how long. The two 
exchanged their eyes, and the heart was unclear. After the flower city 
turned into the curtain, the figure was hidden, and Xie Pity jumped onto 
the bed and slept, back to the outside. Just pulled on the quilt, Jun Wu 
came in. 


He slowly walked over to the table and quieted for a while, saying: "Xinle, 
have you rested?" 


Xie pity did not answer. Jun Wu seemed to sit at the table, put something 
in his hand on the table and gave himself a cup of tea. 


He warmly said: "Xianle, I want you to stay here, it is for you. Many 
things you just listen to me, the end result will be much better." 


Xie pity did not turn over, still facing him. Otherwise, he remembered 
what the national teacher told him, and he thought that he would use the 
expression of the face to be gentle and still gentle. 


The next moment, Jun Wu is behind him, slowly and fluently: "However, 
you not only sneak out to play, but also bring back people hiding in the 
house, it seems that I really do not listen to me." 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 222: Ghost 
King Prince Hall 2 


Hearing this sentence, thank you for your pity, and the cold hair on one 
side stood upside down. 


He seemed to realize that when the National Teacher quietly sneaked into 
his room late at night and took off his mask, he heard Jun Wu get up from 
the table and slowly walked over here. 


Huacheng is standing behind the curtain at the bed! 


When he went to bed, he hid his heart under the pillow. At this moment, he 
put his hand on the hilt and looked for the opportunity, but he suspected 
that there was no opportunity. Who knows, Jun Wu did not go to the 
curtain, but went to the bed and straightened his quilt. Cheering feeling a 
cold body, slammed up and stared at him. And Jun Wu looked at his body 
and whispered: "This dress is not for you." 


" " 


Thank you for thinking about it, the original Jin Yixian is still on him! 


Although Jin Yixian has become a white robe, but Jun Wu will not miss it, 
look at him for a moment, sighed and said: "You just refuse to listen to 
me. Go out and make trouble." 


Xie pity looked at him in amazement, suddenly, his eyes swept to the 
table, there was a gift box, the gift box had been taken apart, there were a 
few cabbages, a few potatoes and a few radishes. 


It turned out that the rain teacher just called Junwu, saying that he forgot 


the things that were given to him was the native products of Yushi 
Township... 


Behind Junwu, Huacheng quietly opened a curtain with his hand, revealing 
the truth behind the curtain, crossing the Junwu and thanking him. 


His hand slowly placed on the silver handle of the waist, seems to be 
thinking about whether to start immediately. Cheering does not think that 
this is a good time, pretending not to talk to Jun Wu, shaking his head. 


Jun Wudao: "Where did you hide the spirits?" 


Of course, you can't hand over the spirit. As soon as I saw the spirit, I 
didn't need to ask her what happened. As long as she saw that she was 
turned into a tumbler, she could guess that Huacheng must have been 
mixed into Xianjing. 


However, thank you and can't help but doubt - Jun Wu really does not 
doubt that Huacheng has been mixed in? 


At this time, Jun Wu said: "Xianle, your expression seems to be saying, is 
not right. Where is it wrong? Is it in addition to Jin Yixian, you still hide 
other people?" 


Thanks to the pity, the expression has not changed at all. Jun Wu is really, 
and he knows him well. 


And the flower city behind Jun Wu exchanged a look in a quiet voice, 
thanking the mind and setting the god, cold and authentic: "How do you 
think about how you love, anyway, no one can go out now, I can't do 
anything. You are happy." Ok." Then he lay down and pulled the quilt over 
his head. And Jun Wu turned around and began to slowly pace in the 
Xianle Palace to search. 


I searched for a while and found nothing. He thought for a moment, and 
sure enough, he turned to the curtain and reached for it. 


The curtain was uncovered and empty. 


For a moment, Jun Wu put down the curtain and returned to the table. And 
the heart of the bed, the heart that has been hung up, has not been put 


down. 


In the quilt, Huacheng lies next to him, and their faces are very close. The 
heart of thankfulness jumped so badly that the whole person was tight, and 
the flower city smiled slightly, silently: Your Highness, don't be afraid. 


Fang Cai, Jun Wu turned around, Huacheng calmly put down the curtain. 
When he walked over, he walked out from behind the curtain calmly, and 
flashed silently to the bed. Thank you for pulling him into bed and stuffing 
it inside. When Huacheng just went to bed, Junwu turned around again. 


The timing was seamless, and the location was subtly, except for a mess of 
quilts, Junwu did not see anything. 


Finally, Jun Wu said: "Sin Le will not sleep, you can't sleep anyway. Get 
up, come with me." 


Xie Pity actually wants to stay in bed, but he is afraid that Jun Wu will 
come over and quilt, and he has to grind down the bed and leave the blue 
tumbler hidden in his sleeve on the pillow. 


Jun Wu has already left the dormitory, thanking the pity and looking back, 
Huacheng also got out of bed, his eyes will come. Xie pity quickly waved 
his hand, indicating that he would never be exposed, nothing. Jun Wu, who 
has already gone out, said: "What's wrong, don't go. There is something in 
the bed that makes you want to leave." 


Xie pity immediately went back to the house, took the box of local 
products on the table, closed the door with his backhand, took a radish 
with the gift box and took a sip, faintly said: "Nothing, I am hungry." 


Junwu glanced at the things in his hand and said warmly: "You like this, I 
still have it there, and I will send it to you next day." 


Thanks: "..." 


After walking a few streets, I heard a voice yelling at a distance: "Ha ha ha 
ha ha ha ha! Feng Xin! You this dog! This ghost king is now stepping on 


your temple, how! How! Come hit me! Hahahahahahaha!" 
It’s sad! 


Going to the nearest place, I saw that all the golden temples were 
devastated by his poisonous hands, and there were big and ugly "going 
here". Grace also went to the house to expose the tile, and yelled at the 
sergeant who was locked inside, and screamed at him, and Guzi was beside 
him, grievous, and stopped. 


Right now, he is screaming at the Nanyang Temple, which is being 
convinced. Fengxin is annoying, and he ignores him at all; he has been 
stunned for a long time, and he went to the temple to call for it. The 
feelings seemed to have turned a few white eyes to him, and he was so 
angry that he jumped, jumped and jumped, and jumped to the right hall. 
Who knows that he hasn't called yet, suddenly a statue of curly hair burst 
through the roof, flew out, and knocked him down his head and fell off the 
roof. Actually, the right in anger really used his **** as a weapon and 
threw it directly at him. Millet was shocked and squatted on the edge of 
the eaves: "Hey! You are fine!" 


Grace and anger: "The right ignorance of this shameless idiot! Actually 
use the mean means to attack me!" 


Guzi hesitated for a moment, and did not explain: "Hey, what kind of mean 
means did he use?" Is it true that the right is really shining the image of 
the gods? 


Grace said: "You stupid son! As long as he wins me, no matter what 
means, all means are mean! Or how can he win you Laozi?!" 


Millet: "Oh..." 


'..."" What the grace said was his cousin, thanking the pity and couldn't 
help but hold his face. Jun Wu got a footstep and said: "Green ghost." 


When I heard this voice, I looked at it and climbed up. I looked at it with 
vigilance. It seems that I am very jealous of Jun. This hope, "father and 


son" naturally both look forward to thank you, Gu Z1xi said: "Broken road 
long brother!" 


Grace is evil and laughs: "Hey! Who is this, this is not a cousin!" 


Xie pity did not want to care about him. He was still in trouble. He came 
over and turned around and thanked him. He ridiculed: "Are you not very 
arrogant before? Back to the two backs, don't put me in the eye, how is it 
now? Was the funeral dog stunned?" 


Xie pity, strange, "two backing"? Only after the reaction was made, one 
was Huacheng and the other was Junwu. Looking at the monarch in front 
of me, I couldn't help but feel mixed. Suddenly I remembered that he 
asked Huacheng and thought of Junwu. At that time, Huacheng’s answer 
was that Junwu must hate him. 


Grace again said: "Hehehe, before I took the dog flower city to support 
you, I secretly attacked me, I have not settled with you, you have been 
settled first, it is a good reincarnation!" 


Jun Wu whispered: "Green ghosts, don't talk nonsense to Xianle. You can 
put your subordinates out." 


Although she was arrogant in the back, she was in front of Jun Wu, but she 
slid her tail. Although I didn't feel convinced, I didn't say anything. I went 
to the house and hugged the fox and went to the errand. Jun Wu said to 
him again: "Let's go." 


Xie pity looked at the road that Junwu took him to take, thinking in his 
heart: "This direction is the subordinate to the ... graceful? Is it..." 


After a while, the corner of the street turned, and sure enough, a gorgeous 
martial temple was presented in front of the two. 


Mingguang Hall! 


In the temple, there was already a screaming roar of chaos. Thanks to the 
pity, he refused to follow him and grabbed it. I saw that the temple was 


really a mess! His face was blue and green, and Xuan Ji seemed to be a 
dead snake. He was wrapped around him. The neck of her neck, but her 
own neck was pulled out for half a month; on the other side, a broken 
sword pointed at the throat of the donkey, it seemed to be stabbed in, and 
was tightly held by the hands, the blade This is not going forward; but 
after half a month and behind the hustle and bustle, the fists are slashing 
and waving, if it is not the face of the blue-green scorpion holding a breath 
to drag him, I am afraid to engrave the two bigger than the hammer Only 
the fists have long smashed the shackles and the half moons; Xuan Ji and 
Rong Guang rushed together to succumb to death and screaming, while 
still tearing each other. Xuan Ji screamed: "Go away! Your dog's life is 
mine, mine, it's all mine!!!" 


Rong Guang, who is attached to the Mingguang sword, said: "You are 
rolling out! There is no self-knowledge! You don't have a thousand women 
and there are eight hundred, you are the number one! The person who 
wants to take the dog is I!!!" 


On the plaque, the blue veins violently began, saying: "...you...the two...all 
are sick! All are rolling for me!!!" 


" " 


Thank you for your sympathy. In a way, this is too popular to be 
unfortunate. He said: "General general, hold on!" Then he went up to save 
the field. Who knows that he hasn't gone up yet, he has a hand on his 
shoulder. 


Jun Wu said behind him: "Xianle, you should not think that I am calling 
you, let you help you do good things." 


Xie Li was crushed by his hand, and he couldn’t move. He said, "What are 
you calling me to do?" 


Jun Wu kept his hand on his shoulder and pushed him into the temple. As 
soon as he entered, a large group of people huddled together seemed to 
have been pumped away, and all of them fell to the ground, only a few of 
them had energy. 


Junwu Road: "Mingguang." 


Xuan Ji no longer glared at his neck, and his face finally returned to 
normal, relieved, saying: "Emperor, this is really... thank you." 


Although his tone is not ridiculous, the words themselves are quite 
ridiculous. Junwu didn't take it for granted. He smiled and said, "You don't 
have to thank you so early. Mingguang, I am coming, I want you to do 
something for me." 


Hey: "What?" 
Jun Wudao: "The imperial city of the lower bound, there is a person array." 
really! 


Jun Wu whispered: "Broken the people and restore your identity as a 
northern god." 


He glanced at the pity and said with a smile: "Now that battle, not the **** 
rain is watching. I am afraid that Zou can't force a breakthrough." 


Junwu said: "Of course you can't force a breakthrough. I didn't say that 
you must force a breakthrough." 


If it is, it is very simple to break this battle. As long as he pretends to help 
in the past, Shi Qingxuan will definitely let him in. Entering the battle, and 
then you can't get rid of the evacuation, the battle is finished! 


What's more, Huacheng is not at all in the Imperial City, and there is no 
way to remedy it! 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 223: Silver 
butterfly lingering around the lamp 


Thanks to the pity: "The generals...the array is guarding the grievances 
that come out of the copper furnace. Once broken, the third human 
epidemic will break out, I am afraid..." 


I am afraid that it is necessary to make a big mess in the world. 


I touched my nose and said, "I confirm, you... didn't give me another 
choice." 


Jun Wudao: "Of course. If you go down, I will let you go; if you don't go 
down, I will let them go." 


Who are they? 
Xuan Ji, Rong Guang and engraved! 


The three ghosts were on the side, and they all had green light like hunger. 
It is conceivable that they would do what they let go. Sudden death, nail 
scratching, sharp sword death, fist death, choose one, or all. 


Jun Wu said: "Xiao Xiao is here too. I think, you value your descendants. 
After all, in order to keep him, you can cover up for the half-monthly 
enthusiasm, and even want to push others." 


Rong Guang listened, and the injustice turned up again. He was arrogant 
and did not speak loyalty. He had never had a brother to have a grandson. 
Xuan Ji also said nothing at the side. I endured this magic sound, thinking 
for a long time, sighed, said: "Can you let me think about it again." 


Jun Wudao: "I have limited patience and don't want to give you too much 
time." 


The voice just fell, the three ghosts on the face of a hi, actually can move, 
and instantly rushed over! 


The door of Mingguang Temple was closed, and Xie Pity heard the 
screams of unknown people and the biting sounds of unknown people. 
They changed their minds and said: "General General! Half a month!!!" 


He wanted to go in and see, Jun's hand was still on his shoulder, pushing 
him hard and walking towards the other side of the street. Thanks for the 
frequent return, but involuntarily, angered: "What do you want?!" 


Jun Wudao: "Next." 


next? What's next? After a long walk, stop again, and the breath of 
thankfulness will be stagnant. 


Lang Qianqiu's Taihua Hall! 


Grace also came across the street. He was holding a millet under his arm, 
and he was refreshed. It seemed that he had stepped on the temples and 
satisfied himself. He said: "What is it that calls me?" 


Jun Wu actually called the grace to the Taihua Temple. Thanks to the more 
foreboding, he said: "Nothing, let's go!" 


Graceful face squatted down and looked at it with a glance. Junwu said: 
"Go in." 


Grace and smug smiled: "Hey, you can't talk here!" He went in high spirits. 


In the Taithua Hall, Lang Qianqiu was gloomy and his hands were walking 
around. When I saw Xie Li and Jun Wu came, I was suspicious: "What are 
you doing?" 


Then, he saw the sadness behind the two, and he changed his face and 
angered: "You!" 


The millet was stunned by him. He was not afraid of him now. He sat 
outside the hall and shook his legs. He was forgotten and said: "My son is 


not afraid! Yes, it is me. Lang Qianqiu, are you not killing me for so long? 
Now Still not in my hands?" 


Lang Qianqiu was furious, and the blue veins on his back were on his back. 
He was locked in the temple and could not take a step. He turned to 
thankfulness and angered: "What kind of ghost are you doing? Take him to 
demonstrate with me?!" 


Thanks: "No! You are calm!" 


Lang Qianqiu said: "I have been calm for a long time, I have not figured 
out what this is!" 


Jun Wudao: "Taihua, I have broken the people's array of the Imperial City. 
I will hand over your enemy's ghosts to you." 


Grace laughed and said: "Ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha lang you this Yongan 
idiot ... oh? What do you say?! hand me over to him?! What does this 
mean?!" 


He smiled for a while before he understood Jun Wu’s words and slammed 
it directly from his chair. Just kidding, let Lang Qianqiu deal with him? He 
killed the family of Lang Qianqiu, Lang Qianqiu still can't take him a 
thousand! 


Junwu did not care about him, and continued to calmly say: "Otherwise, I 
will hand you over to the green ghosts to dispose of it. You can have more 
lives in the hands of your Yongan royal family." 


Lang Qianqiu’s face became more and more terrible. Grace: “Wait?!” 
Xie pity is really unbearable. 


He said: "Are you crazy?! Why do you want them to make this choice? 
What do you want to show me?!" 


Lang Qianqiu has been chasing the sadness, with the temperament of 
grace, as long as there is a chance to deal with Lang Qianqiu, of course he 


must first be strong! But if Lang Qianqiu really goes to break the lineup, 
he definitely doesn't want to see it! 


Junwu said: "If you don't want to see them making choices, then you can 
replace them." 


Thanks: "What?" 


Jun Wudao: "Xianle, this is the consequence of your waywardness. If you 
follow me in the first place, they don't have to face such a choice." 


Thank you for your pity: "You mean this is still my fault? Why do you 
have to force me like this?" 


Jun Wudao: "Hate me? It is useless to hate! If you have the ability, you 
will defeat me. Do you have it?" 


Thanks for the clenched fist, the bones creaked. Jun Wudao: "Now you, of 
course not. But as long as you break the people, maybe there is. Because, I 
will help you open the two locks on you." 


" " 


These two curses sealed him for more than eight hundred years. After the 
unraveling, what will happen? 


Graceful and alert, staring at the squares in the Taihua Hall, I was afraid 
that the next time Lang Qianqiu chose to break the line, Junwu really 
threw him to Lang Qianqiu. Lang Qianqiu's gaze was also moved between 
the pity and the grace. 


Suddenly, Jun Wu put his hand on his shoulder and let it go. 


Thank you for your pity, and turned his head. I saw Jun Wu's look cold, 
slightly bowed, staring at the silver blade on his neck. 


That is the blade of anger. 


Behind him, Huacheng looked bad and coldly said: "Take your hand." 


Thanks for your compliments: "Sanlang!" 
Huacheng is still out. 


Jun Wu took a breath and smiled and thanked him: "Xianle, privately 
under the nose of my eyes, you are so bold." 


Huacheng said: "You don't look in the mirror. Are you qualified to say 
this?" 


Grace has not been seated in the chair, and it has stunned and stunned: 
"Dog dogs... Flower City?! How come you come?!" 


Thanks for pulling out the heart of the waist, a sword smashed, smashed 
the blockade of Locking Lang Qianqiu, said: "Qianqiu Run!" 


Lang Qianqiu was angry and burned. He rushed to the graceful one, 
grabbed it, and pulled the epee on the other hand. It seemed that he had to 
cut him into seven or eight paragraphs, but the millet jumped down and 
opened his arms in front of the sadness. Lang Qianqiu said: "Don't... don't 
kill me!" 


Lang Qianqiu said: "Let's go! You are a ghost, you are not you!" 
Grace suddenly jumped up and leaped, grabbing the millet road: "Don't 
come over! I warn you not to come over! When you come over, I will kill 


this child! Open it and eat it for you!" 


Lang Qianqiu stopped and angered: "Isn't that your son? He is holding you, 
you still use him as a shield, you are the mean of the next three ghosts!" 


Millet squinted in his hand and said: "A cheap son, regenerate one!" 
Jun Wu whispered: "If this is the case..." 


Hearing his tone, thankful instinctively felt dangerous. Sure enough, not 
long after, there were a lot of exclamations outside: "Fire! Fire!" 


"It's burning!" 


Xie pity grabbed the Taihua Hall and saw it. The night falls, but the top of 
Xianjing is red. Many of the temples below have fallen into a sea of fire! 


Thanks for turning back: "What are you doing to set fire to Xianjing?! All 
the priests are still shut down by you!" 


And they are all in a state of limited mana. If you go on like this, you can't 
all be burned to death in your own temple. 


Huacheng Road: "He doesn't care if those priests are dead or alive." 


Lang Qianqiu was also shocked. With this opportunity, the gracefulness of 
the millet climbed with the millet. Lang Qianqiu said: "Stand up!" Where 
will the grace stand? Thanks to pity: "Against the first time, let's put out 
other gods!" 


Lang Qianqiu subconsciously said: "Yes, Master!" After the answer, both 
of them were a glimpse. He looked at the gratitude and rushed out. Here, 
Huacheng has a slashing edge, and thousands of silver butterflies have 
swept up and wrapped in Junwu. He took the pity and said: "Go!" 


Those silver butterflies couldn't drag on for a long time, and the two ran to 
the street. Lang Qianqiu moved very quickly and knocked down a large 
guard. Many of the priests were released from the temple and rushed to the 
streets of Xianjing. They all said, "How did you get angry? Who put the 
fire?!" 


"It's not an ordinary fire, it can't be extinguished!" 

Far away, I heard the screaming and screaming: "Fucking, grass, **** 
Junwu, he is crazy, Laozi is still there, set fire to his own territory! Fuck is 
really sick! ” 

Fengxin also came out from Nanyang Temple, and he seemed to be 
looking for someone standing on the street. Beside the feelings: "How 


come?" 


Can't leave! 


"Can you fly?" 
"You are now injured, the mana is still restricted, you can't fly..." 


That is to say, even if it is released from the temple, it is still trapped in 
the Jinghai by the sea of fire! 


At this time, everyone suddenly felt a shudder on the ground, and even 
more shocked: "What happened? Earthquake?" 


Lang Qianqiu said: "How is it possible! Here is Jingjing, it is floating in 
the sky, where is the earthquake?" 


"That is..." 


When it comes to this, everyone will stop. After a while, they raised their 
hands and pointed to the front. 


Someone murmured: "What is that..." 


I saw the sky in the sky, at the end of Xianjing Long Street, there was a 
huge head, staring at the hundreds of priests on the street. 


The head is too big, several times bigger than a golden temple, and still 
smiling. Originally a very peaceful and kind smile, but in the boundless 
night and blood red fire, it seems a bit strange. 


Someone hugged: "...Is there an illusion?" 
"Great Prince, Prince Edward!" 

It is the statue of the giant god! 

It flew up! 


Xie pity is also a loss. Is the statue not lying in the copper hearth? And 
without him manipulating, the statue can't fly, he didn't give orders, and he 


didn't have enough mana. Why did it fly up? 


Look again, in the darkness, the megalithic statue is full of sky and stars. 
Look closely, it is not the light that the gods emit themselves, but the 
millions of silver butterflies, and the bright lights that surround them. 


It’s those silver butterflies and bright lights that **** it and fly to heaven! 
2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 224: Over the 
sky 


The statue of the megalith in the gaze of countless eyes, the smile is rising 
higher and higher. Thanks for seeing it intact, the leg that had been 
interrupted by the white phase could not see the trace, and said: "Sanlang, 
have you fixed it?" 


Huacheng smiled and said: "To pick up your brother in the sky, of course 
you can't come empty-handed. Let's go!" 


Thanks and nodded, said: "Everyone is going up!" 


However, the priests only saw that the person around him was a flower 
city, and almost stunned: "His Royal Highness, next to you?" 


Fengxin's eyebrows were more intense, and finally he cried: "Jianlan! 
Gladiolus!" No one answered. Lang Qianqiu sees the sinister ghosts hiding 
in the corner of the street, is about to catch, who knows, he just passed the 
Taihua Hall, the whole temple collapsed, as if something exploded inside. 
The priests were shocked and looked back. They saw only the fire and the 
wreckage, and a figure stood upright. 


Junwu came out. 
Silver Butterfly really can't stop him! 


Grace rushed to the back of Junwu, rushing to the crowd and shouting: 
"Crush! You are all chopped! Have the ability to come!" 


Only he did not know how to live and die, but he dared to speak! 


In the white martial arts, the black air 1s rushing, while the white light is 
glaring, the two colors are unpredictable. The gods were unfamiliar with 
this "Junwu", and the atmosphere did not dare to go out, just staring at 
him. He stared at the patience and slowly came in the direction of the 


crowd. Every step of the way, there will be a burning flame at the foot. 
First, the flames of the jump, then madly spread around, growing into a 
raging flame. 


Like the bridgehead ghost. 


The grace was smashed by the flame, and the ghost screamed, holding the 
millet and escaping. Quan Yizhen carried the body of the jade, and stood 
on the street with his face gray. When he saw Jun Wu, his eyes burst into 
anger, and the body did not let go, he walked toward him, and he was 
prayed. Now close to Junwu, no doubt it is to die! 


Another wave of silver butterflies hit, take this opportunity, thank you: 
"Fast! Don't he!" 


The gods were hesitating for a moment, and finally they continued to call 
for a response. Hundreds of priests jumped up to the megalithic statue, as 
if a group of black lacquered ants climbed up and squeezed into the chest 
of their shoulders. If you want it to fly, you can't rely on those lights and 
silver butterflies. But there are too many people at the moment. Thanks to 
pity, I can't take a shot on Huacheng. I am in a hurry and have a wise man. 
I took a priest and took the face of Huacheng behind him and kissed him 
deeply. 


Immediately, thanking the whole body for being full of spiritual power, the 
official who was regarded as a live screen was stiff and shocked: "What 
are you doing behind me?" 


Countless pairs of eyes also stunned. Thanks to this, he found that he was 
pulling over the scenery and it was Lang Qianqiu. He said that the sin must 
not let the child see it. He said: "Nothing is done. It 1s not what you should 
see!" 


As soon as he turned around, he rushed to the **** statue: "Fly!" 


The statue heard his call, as if it was activated, and the tiny eyes suddenly 
opened, and the smile on the face was deeper. 


The silver butterfly and the bright light are scattered, and it is still floating 
in the air. The long hair and the sleeves seem to be flying in the wind. 


Fly up! 


Xie Pity and Huacheng jumped up and stood on the jade crown on the top 
of the statue. Thanks to the pity: "Everyone stood firm!" 


The voice just fell, the statue of the body slightly sinking, booming, with 
the gust of wind whizzing around, violently forward! 


Xie Li and Hua Cheng stood at the highest point, carrying statues, carrying 
many gods away from Xianjing. However, many of the priests’ savings 
have been placed in Xianjing, and they are often turned back. They are 
bitter and have a hard time. Slightly calm down, thank you for suddenly 
thinking of being in a hurry, innocent to count the head, I do not know if 
you will be more fierce, thank you for worrying, looking for a few familiar 
people in the crowd below, said: "Master! General Sui! Are you here?" 


Far from hearing the voice of the national teacher, "I am coming!" 


Thank you for your kindness. At this time, suddenly someone shouted: 
"Catch up, catch up!" 


Looking back, it is true that behind this megalithic statue, a red dragonfly 
chased it, as if it was a red light. 


It is Xianjing! 
The original Xianjing, Ruiqi Xiangyun lingering. At the moment, it was 
filled with war, and it has become a flame city. Someone said in horror: "It 


is the emperor... It is the emperor who moved the fairy capital. He wants to 
kill us..." 


"He is catching up!" 


Thanks for the pity: "It's not that easy." 


The fingerprints suddenly changed, and the megalithic statue suddenly 
shook his eyes. The voices of the gods in the ears of the gods were even 
more violent, and the whistling whistling, the red light chasing behind him 
was pulled a distance. 


The gods fly faster! 


But when the side speeds up, the red light does not show weakness, the 
speed suddenly rises, and the boom is booming. On the contrary, it is 
closer than the original. Many of the priests are screaming out loud. At 
this distance, you can almost see the figure standing in Xianjing! 


However, the world did not know what happened. The children laughed 
and laughed. They saw the white shadows running in the sky, the red light 
flying, the big mouth, and the fingers of the sky: "There is light! So 
beautiful!" 


Xie pity knows that this can't go on like this, and it must be accelerated, 
but it is slightly dizzy. After all, he flies for so long, all by one breath. 
Huacheng helped him, and the two did not speak. They only listened to the 
lower national teacher and said: "What are you doing? A group of priests, 
but also the ghost king to borrow the mana to help escape, shame not 
shame?" 


Some gods are not convinced: "Who are you? What qualifications are 
there to teach us?" 


Guoshi said: "Who I am not important, although I don't know where to 
play mud when I go to heaven, I am definitely qualified to teach you. The 
important thing 1s to quickly put your golden hand on this statue. How 
much mana is given! So this statue can fly faster, or wait for him to catch 
up with him later? Are you not accustomed to standing by, do you forget 
your own life? Am I reminded?" 


After he reminded, the priests returned to God and shouted, and they 
forgot to support in this way, so they made their efforts to put the palm of 
their hands on the statue and shouted: "His Royal Highness, under, help, 
help you One's strength!" 


"Oh, I am coming too..." 
"Not much... make use of it." 


In this way, the seven hundred hands and eight hundred feet, the statue is 
filled with mana, thank you for feeling the spirit, the statue is once again 
forceful, this time, a loud bang, far away the red light for dozens of miles ! 


The priests were greatly relieved and wiped their sweat. Thanks to pity, 
suddenly, Huacheng Road: "Brother, down." 


Since he spoke, he did not ask why, and manipulated the gods, breaking 
through the rolling dark clouds and sinking straight down. The bottom 1s 
actually dark, and even a little light can't be seen. The gods are surprised: 
"Where is this place? How is it black? It's weird." 


"His Royal Highness, what are you doing?" 
"I don't think it's a long time to stay here..." 
Huacheng said: "Leave here, don't move. We wait." 


The megalithic statue floated in the air, thanking the pity: "Well. What are 
you waiting for?" 


Huacheng whispered: "When he chases, fight first." 


As soon as the voice fell, a red light broke out in the clouds above the 
night, and the burning fairy Jing Shen also sank. The priests watched as 
the red light gradually approached, and the creeps suddenly said: "Your 
Highness, what are you doing?" 


"You shouldn't want to hit him hard? There is no chance of winning!" 


"He is stupid again! I should know that this person is a fool of love! It has 
been this for hundreds of years... Who kicks me!" 


Guoshi said: "I. You can say one more word, I will push you directly." 


"who the **** are you!" 


Although the megalithic statue is a giant, Xianjing is even more 
magnificent. If it 1s really hard, the physique of this megalithic statue will 
definitely be crushed. But thank you for believing in the judgment of 
Huacheng. 


One person and one city, they are cold and cold in this night sky. Just as 
the red light approached less than half a mile, thankful pity suddenly felt 
that there seemed to be something underneath. 


He looked down and found that the darkness in the distance was moving, 
screaming, screaming, undulating, just like... 


Waves. 
Thanks for the sudden understanding of where this is. 


Some priests also found it, and said in horror: "Oh my God, it seems to 
be... Blackwater ghosts! We are brought into the ghost nest!" 


The voice just fell, and suddenly there were a few sharp white things that 
broke through the darkness and skyrocketed! 


Four pairs of eyes, eight ghosts and lanterns, the huge eyeballs are green 
and faint, staring at the flame city, making a whistling, as if the intruders 
who are not polite enough are very dissatisfied, their huge bones come to 
you. Go, pat the sea, and stir up thousands of waves. 


It’s the four bone dragons! 


They rushed to the magic city, spewing a sharp stream of water in the 
mouth, and the attack power was extremely strong. I was afraid that the 
wall of the copper wall would also be worn by this huge water gun. 
Thankful, I couldn’t help but look at each other and said: "The last time I 
saw them, it seemed a bit... haha, I didn’t expect it to be quite fierce." 


Under the dark sea, there are new bones and monsters breaking out of the 
water, flying fish, such as the city flying stones. The gods looked at it and 


they were completely confused. Junwu is chasing them, but Huacheng and 
Heishui seem to be helping. The feelings of the scenery, it is Xuanqji. 


The four bone dragons screamed around the magic city. However, the 
anger of the war could not be extinguished with water, and it became more 
and more angry and even burned into the water. On the surface of the black 
water sneaky, the flames are full of fire, the fire and the water dance, and 
the sound of ghosts and wows is heard under the water. Thanks for the 
sudden shame: "We brought these messy things to the site of Blackwater, 
and it was okay to do it here. It doesn't matter..." 


Huacheng Road: "Don't care, he owes me money, just hit it." 
Thankfulness: "???" 
Suddenly, someone said to the front: "It... What is it doing?" 


Hearing words, thanking the pity is also busy looking up, this look, the 
heart is also a slight surprise. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 225: Over the 
sky, fighting fire city 2 


The flame city that was originally Xianjing trembled in the air and 
creaked. Countless burning stones rolled down and fell into the water, 
while the city body slowly flipped over. 


It was originally a flat piece, but now it is completely erected and begins 
to break down. Many temples located on the ground of Xianjing moved on 
the top. Originally a complete giant city, it was slowly split into seven or 
eight blocks! 


There is a sacred official saying: "Is it being collapsed? Is it going to fall 
apart?" 


Thanks: "How could it be so easy? This is probably..." 


He hasn't finished yet, and the seven or eight pieces of the "cracked" city 
began to regroup quickly. The sound of the boulder rolling continues, the 
priests here look at it, the eyes are getting bigger and bigger, and some of 
the mouths are also open. 


The Flame City is not a fall apart, but a disintegration. 
After the reorganization... it became a flame giant! 


The giant was awakened from sleep and stood upright in the air. The 
golden temples covered almost all of them, as if they were covered with 
armor and were invincible. It replaced Xianjing and confronted the statue 
of the stone statue of Chery in the air. 


On both sides of the contrast, thank you here 1s actually called petite, a 
little pitiful, like a child standing opposite the adult. This statue of 
megalith can be called a giant, but the flame giant can be a "top of the 
earth", at least five or six times, shocking to the cold hair, as if walking 
down a foot, a city To be destroyed under its feet! 


After the reorganization was completely completed, the magic giant 
turned his head slightly, spewing a flame in his mouth and sweeping 
toward the four bone dragons. The flame wall broke the four water guns, 
and the four bone dragons saw the bad momentum. They plunged into the 
sea, and they fell on the sea, like a flat land, and steadily walked toward 
the statue of the giant stone. 


On the top of the giant's head is the Temple of the Gods, and Jun Wu sat in 
the temple, giving off a terrible sense of oppression. The priests of the 
gods are suffocating: "Don't stand down, please, I am dying!" 


"It’s absolutely impossible to beat it! Wake up, Prince Edward, it’s several 
times bigger than you!” 


Thanks for the pity: "You can't always run away. You can't go anywhere 
else." 


The gods were first glimpsed, and this was reflected. They really can't 
escape all the time. If the flower city doesn't provide mana, they will 
always use this mana to fly. Always play in one place. 


And instead of bringing the flame giant to many people, it is better to 
solve it here. At least the sea level of this black water sneaky, no one, no 
ordinary people! 


Although as a **** official should be considered this way, but in the face 
of such a powerful magical fire giant, I thought of using this thing as a 
rival to fight against the water, the back is still black water, how can I not 
guilty in my heart. But even so, I am embarrassed that the first one 
shouted and thanked them for taking them to a place where there were 
many people. So, thank you: "You have stabilized, be careful not to fall 
down! Black water ghosts sink into the water and sink!" 


The flame giant rushed several times more than the stone statue of his 
hand to reach out, seemingly to seize it, thankful and flexible, flashing, 
leaping and jumping, the **** of the gods, when they fell over, turned 
sharply, and sometimes fell and fell. Thrilling and exciting, the sound of 
screams come and go. Not to mention that most of the martial arts here are 


sitting in the temple all day long, even Wu Shen also has such a battle 
experience. Xie Li heard the right and shouted: "You have no weapons! 
You want a weapon!" 


The priests couldn’t help themselves, saying: "Yes, Your Royal Highness! 
You can’t win without weapons!" 


Thanks to pity: "I am thinking about what can be a weapon!" If the evil 
excitedly twisted the body several turns, and joined him in front of him, 
thank you for pushing it away: "Thank you, but you can't, you are too 
small!" ” 


At this time, Huacheng Road: "There is no weapon to be used. Let's use 
this to make it together." 


After that, thank you and heard a few screams. The four bone dragons that 
were sprayed into the bottom of the sea by the magic fire giant drilled out 
again, encircling the four sides of the statue of the megalith. The gods 
were shocked: "What do they want to do?" 


They are not attacking around nature, thanking them for watching, one 
biting the other tail, four long bone dragons, and finally become a long 
bone dragon! 


The biting tailbone jumped up and flew over here. Thanks for thinking and 
raising his hand, the megalithic statue grabbed it. Xie pity said: "This 1s..." 


Bone dragon whip! 
It would be fine to manipulate it like he used to drive it! 


Thanks for raising his hand, a bone dragon took it and took the head of the 
magic giant. The Magic Fire Giant also raised his hand and grabbed the 
whip. However, the bone dragon whip suddenly broke from the middle, 
and the giant stone statue stepped forward and held his whip in his head. 
The flame giant seemed to suffer from pain and let go, and the osteotomy 
dragon that he had seized swam back and took back the thank-you hand 
again. 


This bone dragon whip is detachable and flexible. Sometimes two points, 
sometimes four, and the statue of the giant stone is also extremely 
flexible, suddenly become extremely difficult to deal with. The priests 
have been ruined in the raging winds of the ups and downs, and they have 
a Sleek hairstyle. They said, "I didn't expect the Prince's Highness to have 
two hands!" 


"I have only seen him ruined. I didn't expect it to be a martial art." 


Guo Shidao: "I didn't think I could get rid of it before. I don't have to 
emphasize the broken!" 


Thank you: "Hey, hahaha..." 


The singularly long bite-tailed dragon whip seemed like a white chain, 
entangled in the opponent. The magic giant's body sank. Immediately, the 
gods responded: "Quickly, pull it into the sea!" 


Below the battlefield, it is the black water sneaky scorpion - sinking into 
the water! 


The megalithic statue slammed the bone dragon chain, thanking the pity 
for the force, said: "Give me down!" 


The Magic Fire Giant actually sank a little. The gods officers quickly 
passed the seven hundred hands and eight hundred feet to the statue of the 
giant stone, and said: "Shen! Shen! Quick!" 


Listening to them, they yelled at the same time and shouted "Shen". 
Thanks for the slightest cold, and looked up at the Shenwu Temple at the 
top of the megalithic statue. I don't know why, although I can't completely 
see the inside of the person at the moment, he always feels that Jun Wu is 
sneer. 


After a stalemate, the magic giant was gradually pulled into the sea. The 

flame on it is still burning, and it is not extinguished when it sinks into the 
water. Instead, it emits red light from the dark, deep sea, reflecting the sea 
water shining red. As the bone dragons pulled it deeper and deeper, the red 


light gradually disappeared. The gods and officials were relieved, but they 
were completely afraid to relax their vigilance. 


For a long time, there was no sound. Thanks and pity, I remembered that 
there was no response, and I didn’t hear their voices for half a month. 
Most of them were pulled into the seabed together. This time, I’m afraid 
it’s really fierce. 


At this time, the bottom of the sea surface turned up the bubble. 
Oh, it’s spreading, and it’s stirring up, and there are bursts of white smoke. 
The sea water is boiling! 


Thanks to the poor heart, I was about to fly up, but one hand suddenly 
broke through the water and caught the ankle of the statue of the giant 
stone! 


Thanks for feeling the body slammed down, looking down, the magic 
giant, actually climbed up again! 


Its chest has been exposed to the sea, and the flames of the body have 
extinguished more than half, but they are re-igniting. The bite tail bone 
chain 1s still wrapped around it, but it can obviously not hold him 
anymore. 


The laughter of Junwu echoed throughout the sea, everywhere, not 
laughing, not sneer, not clear about the road, but even more creepy. Under 
the pull of the magic giant, the small half of the megalithic statue was 
immersed in boiling water, and the priests who had stood down were 
desperately climbing up. Even the politeness of standing in the top of the 
megalithic statue in Yuguantai felt a suffocating steaming heat, sweating 
his forehead and sweating. 


If it is pulled into the sea, it will be cooked from start to finish! 


No, no other weapon can play the strongest. He still needs a sword! 


Suddenly, he heard the voice of the national teacher: "That... that curly 
boy? What are you doing? Don't mess with the body for me? Wait a 
minute! What are you doing?!" 


The pity was also a surprise, maintaining the fingerprints and shouting to 
the bottom: "Qiying?" 


I saw a figure flying down the legs of the megalithic statue, and then went 
straight to the top of his head along the arm of the magic giant. Thanks for 
your pity: "Qiying is back!" 


However, Quan Yizhen could not hear the words of others. He rushed to 
the arm of the magic fire giant and was discovered. The giant took another 
hand, as if taking a mosquito that perched on his arm, and he was surprised 
and screaming, and he slammed it! 


Many priests screamed, but when they looked at it, Quan Yizhen was still 
running. It turned out that just now, he was indeed photographed, but 
flashed into the gap between the giant palm and the fingers, this did not 
become meat, skip the finger and continue running. Both hands were 
shunned by his danger, but for the third time I was afraid that I was not so 
lucky. As long as you have another palm, 80% will be photographed as 
meat! 


However, before the third palm came down, Quan Yizhen had already 
reached the destination. He jumped into the head of the bone dragon 
wrapped around the magic giant. 


As soon as he jumped in, the two ghostly lanterns in the bones of the 
dragon suddenly skyrocketed, and the mana increased greatly. The body 
also emitted a faint white light, and the body shook and shook, and the 
body was tighter. Thanks for the clear sound of the squeezing of the 
boulder. The magic giant was suffocated by this, his hands loose, and 
finally let go of the ankle of the statue of the megalith. 


As soon as he got free, Xie pity immediately flew into the air and said: 
"Qiying is coming over! Don't pester him!" 


Right one really drove the tail-bone dragon, not only did not let go, but 
shouted loudly, and suffocated the strength, and wrapped the giant tighter. 
In the fierce struggle, countless stone wrecks threw down and fell into the 
sea, and instantly sank. The magic giant lost patience and completely 
escaped from the sea, rekindling the heroic fire from the Shenwu Hall and 
burning all over the body. 


The bone dragon and Quan Yizhen, who are tightly wrapped around him, 
are also buried in the sea of fire. 


Thanks for the pity: "Qiying!!!" leaned over to the giant, punching the 
tailbone dragon chain! 


The burning bones of the white flowers fell into the sea, and Xie was going 
to catch the bones of the bones where Quan Yizhen was. The giants flew 
out and flew the bones of the bones almost three or four times away. . 


At this distance and speed, the megalithic statue could not intercept it in 
midair. I was afraid that when I rushed over, Quan Yizhen had already 
fallen into the sea with the bone faucet. The current sea water is simply a 
pot of boiling water, cooked in the water! 


At the beginning of this millennium, suddenly a big white-flowered big 
bone fish flew out of the sea, caught the bone faucet, rushed like a fish, 
and stalked the tail to swim in the distance. 


There was no danger, and thankfulness finally gave a sigh of relief. Flying 
quickly to see, after the giant, the flame has been extinguished. The teeth 
of the bones of the bones are still screaming, and the mouths are one and 
the same, as if they are breathing in the mouth. Quan Yizhen was lying 
inside, the whole body was dark, a little bit of focus, I wonder if it was 
baked by fire, and the hair looks more curled. However, because the bones 
of the bones are blocked on the outside, the focus is not too strong. It 
should only be injured and need to be rested. After all, Quanyi’s vitality is 
very tenacious. The four bone dragons were more serious. They were 
burned and beaten. The bodies were falling on the sea and some were still 
burning. Thanks for the two eyes, I couldn’t help but feel a little 
embarrassed: "That, we can’t kill the Blackwater House. It’s really okay...” 


Huacheng smiled and said: "Reassured. It doesn't matter." 
Thanks: "...how much does he owe you..." 


The priests saw the right to be terrible, saying: "No, I didn't expect His 
Royal Highness to be so brave, critically ill, come forward and save 
everyone..." Xie Pity remembered that the right of the day was really 
abandoned in heaven. Shaking his head, he said that he didn't want to come 
forward and save everyone. At this time, there was a sound of rolling in 
the distance. 


Looking back, the giant body was once again surrounded by fire. But it did 
not come to chase and thank people, but it was flying into the sky, through 
the clouds, and it disappeared. 


The priests of the gods were somewhat stunned by the rest of their lives. 
"Does he give up chasing us?" 


Thanks for the pity, but I don’t feel good at all. “Zhalang, how did he 
disappear?” 


Huacheng Road: "He has shrunk thousands of miles." 
Thank you, "Where are you going?" 
Huacheng looked solemnly and looked at him: "Imperial City." 


Shi Qingxuan is still there, guarding the array of people who are trapped in 
the grievances! 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 226: Burning 
fire ghosts and gods 


Hurry to the Imperial City! 


Huacheng Road: "You can leave it alone, they will handle it by 
themselves." 


The national teacher put the body of the jade on the back of the fish bone, 
and the bone fish carried the bone faucet and Quan Yizhen, and led the 
jade to swim far away. Other bone fish go to the bone keel sections 
scattered around them, put them together and slowly repair them. It seems 
that they do handle it themselves. 


There is no time to delay, thank you for not saying anything, immediately 
driving the statue of the giant stone to the sky. The gods said: "Where are 
you going?" 


"You shouldn't want to chase him?! It's hard to escape..." 


Thanks to pity: "I can't chase, he went to a place with lots of people! No 
time, please take your time!" 


Huacheng flipped out a scorpion and said: "Brother, are you ready?" 


Thanks for your nod. Huacheng throws the scorpion and says: "Shrink a 
thousand miles, open!" 


The megalithic statues are full of mana and go all the way! 


Passing through the clouds, I saw the magic giant in front of a large black- 
pressed skyline. They also came to the Imperial City! 


Everyone on the ground saw a huge burning monster in the sky, slowly 
descending, approaching them, some were stunned, some started to 
scream, and some soon turned scared and ran, Shi Qingxuan I also took a 


few breaths of air, but I immediately responded and shouted in the crowd: 
"Nothing! Don't panic! If it doesn't come, someone will stop him! The 
gods fight and hahahaha!!!" 


"Is it really okay? Old wind! Then the big monster slaps it down is not a 
joke!" 


Shi Qingxuan laughed and said: "Really! You see, I am not here too, die, I 
will die first! Hahahahahahahahaha..." 


He was nervous again and lost his mind. Xie pity manipulated the statue of 
the giant stone to fly over, flashed through the fire wall that the magic 
giant spit out, and grabbed it and tried to pull it up, not letting it continue 
to approach the ground, and said: "You are going down!" 


The gods who had been sitting on the road for a long time were scared to 
death by the wild manipulation style of the gods, and they could not 
escape quickly. They jumped down like dumplings. As soon as I landed, I 
saw that Shi Qingxuan was a glimpse: "The Wind Master? You... How are 
you here?!" 


"How come you look like this..." 


Shi Qingxuan was overjoyed and said: "Don't ask so much, come and 
come, join us. Join the people's array, help support, go back and ask you to 
eat chicken legs, can't let the wraith inside rush out!" 


Most of the priests were hesitant, and Lang Qianqiu rushed over and said, 
"I will help you!" 


Someone took the lead, and other priests joined in and out. The array of 
people grew stronger again and became stronger. Thanks for a sigh of 
relief, he continued to drag the giant of the fire up, but he heard a loud 
bang. 


The magic giant, actually disintegrated again! 


Its one leg is out of the body and flies down. Even if there is only one leg, 
you can kill a large piece. Not only that person, I am afraid that the whole 
street can be smashed! 


Who knows, that leg flew halfway, suddenly a loud noise, split and burst 
open in the air. 


Thousands of sparks, with countless small particles dissolved in the night, 
scattered over the cover. It is like a smoke and sand falling like a rain after 
a grand fireworks. It has no lethality. Thanks for your pity, said: "How can 
it burst open? Who hit it?" 


At this time, a figure from the center of the fireworks up to the sky, a few 
ups and downs, fell to the magic giant. Thanks for looking at it, I liked it: 
"Hey general, you are fine, great!" He has already written down in his 
heart to make a few free statutes for him! 


He held the sword with one hand and erased his hair with the other hand. 
The hairstyle was not chaotic, the style was not reduced, and the style was 
reserved: "It's a bit of a thing, but nothing big." 


It’s burnt and cooked, and it’s not cooked. The vitality of the Valkyries is 
really tenacious. Thanks again, "What about half a month?" 


Huacheng Road: "Nothing. Brother, you see, they are there." 

Thanks for turning around and looking at it, sure enough, in the distance, 
half a month with a shackle on the roof of a house. It seems that the 
Mingguang Temple was sealed tightly, and the boiling black water was not 


completely poured in. Everyone had no major events. Thanks again, "What 
about Xuan Ji?" 


A voice proudly said: "Of course I was defeated!" 


This voice was sent from the hand of the donkey. Thanks to this, I found 
out that the sword on my hand was actually bright! 


He stunned: "How can you dare to hold the Mingguang sword?" 


Hehehe said: "This is more complicated." 


Rong Guang said: "Hehehehe, what is complicated, is not that you give me 
a bow down and apologize that you are wrong and ask me to forgive! 
Hahahahahaha! Happy! Happy!" 


Xie pity probably guessed it. Most of the time, the three ghosts have not 
yet murdered, but they first fought themselves because of the "uneven 
distribution." The generals won the victory and kicked Xuan Ji and 
engraved. At this time, the outside was booming and began to fly. The 
situation is in danger and cannot be rushed out. Only by joining hands can 
we break the game. He never forgets to force him to admit his mistakes. 
For example, he wishes to apologize to him, and he finally feels happy. 


The Magic Fire Giant lost a leg, but he was not arrogant, but slowly began 
to reorganize. Stones and golden temples in other parts were removed 
from the missing places. After a short period of reorganization, it is still a 
giant, just a little smaller. Holding the Mingguang sword, I rushed to the 
Shenwu Temple. Thanks to the pity: "The general is careful!" 


However, the Mingguang sword is in the hand, and the attacking power of 
the cockroach suddenly rises. Although Rong Guang has a bad personality 
and his heart is not correct, but it is not the old man who has been for 
many years, these two people know how to cooperate with each other. 
Quan Yizhen was photographed a few palms before he was close to the 
Shenwu Temple. There were many obstacles on the way forward. Hey, he 
rushed farther than him and directly entered the Shenwu Temple! 


Rong Guang replied with a splash of fire in the Mingguang sword: "I don't 
see it! I have told you that the two of us are invincible, there is nothing to 
push! If you listen to me early Come, how can it be just a hundred years 
now, just a Mingguang general?!" 


Grace hides in the side of the Shenwu Temple and screams: "Dead stallion, 
advise you not to come up to death! Go back!" 


A bright sword of the light has been drawn: "What is this green thing, 
don't block the road!" 


Grace was almost circulated by this sword for a few laps. Millet held his 
thighs, so it was easy to stabilize him without falling, worried about the 
authenticity: "Hey... are you okay?" 


Grace lost ugly in front of the millet, and was furious, but both the 
scorpion and the Mingguang sword were murderous, and they dared not go 
up hard and hard, and said: "And with despicable means..." 


Who knows, Guzi suddenly "squatted" and fell to the ground. Looking 
awkward, looking down, Guzi did not say anything, and he did not move. 
He blinked, grabbed the millet, and said that he was arrogant, saying: 
"Stupid son, what are you making?" 


Millet seems to be asleep, his eyes closed and his forehead hot. Thanks to 
the death of the magic giant, also noticed the following, said: "Surly! You 
still have to leave, there is always burning, and God 1s also into the water, 
the child is too small, he will die! ” 


Grace asked Guzi to squat, and looked up and said: "You are less likely to 
teach me! Who are you? This little sister is raised, is it so easy to die? You 
think I don't know that you just want to cheat. I, as soon as I leave here, 
you must be poisoned to me!" Even if he can't help him, Lang Qianqiu can 
wait for him! 


Over there, Yan and Junwu have already fought. When the grace was won 
by the war, he shouted from time to time, jumping around to avoid the 
fire, and thanking him with anger: "You can't stand this fire, you still 
expect a child to be able to suffer?!" 


The face of the millet, which was pinched under the armpit, was burnt red, 
but the sadness was hard: "Oh, I will not leave! I will not leave! Wow, my 
mother...!!!" A flame came, burning The wave smashed the face, and the 


graceful sprinted and ran a circle. The buttocks almost burned. I couldn’t 
help but scream and swear: "The prince is old... boss! Can you not be so 
fierce! You can burn it to me... It!" 


Xie pity always thinks that what he wants to say is "Junwu old thief, you 
burned me Laozi!", just fortunately, did not dare to say it. Where does Jun 
Wu care for him, he is fighting with him, with a strange smile. The fire 
around the grace is getting bigger and bigger, and there is no place to 
settle. Although he is a ghost, he does not die, but he is also 
uncomfortable, and there is no place to settle. Not long after, the millet 
suddenly screamed, as if it had been fired. Grace took him out of the 
armpit and saw it. Sure enough, there was a **** face on the forehead of 
the millet, and his shoulder was burned with a big hole, revealing the burnt 
shoulder. 


The millet woke up to the students, and he woke up, and he said with a sad 
voice: "Hey, it hurts! I am afraid!" 


Grace has never faced this situation before, the forehead is sweating 
coldly, and the corner of his mouth does not know what to say. Millet 
licked the wound, hurting a nose and tears, saying: "Hey, will we be burned 
here?" 


Grace said: "This... this, this..." 


Guzi pumped the tunnel: "Although your site seems to be very beautiful, it 
doesn't seem to be very good... The people here seem to be not very good 
to us. Otherwise, we still have to change places to live..." 


Grace can’t help it. 


He rushed into the temple, trying to catch up with Junwu and dare not 
approach, shouting: "A discussion of the king... Boss! You can set fire to 
it, anyway, here is your place, how do you put it casually, but, Hehehe, 
that, can you..." 


This silly criminal, thank you for giving him the gas from the jade crown 
stage, said: "Don't go up to find death, you are down! I promise not to 


move you!" 


Grace did not listen to him at all. Seeing that Junwu was indifferent, he did 
not put him in his eyes. Guzi was crying, maybe he felt that he had lost his 
face in front of his cheap son, his face was red and red, and he suddenly 
rushed to the road. "Where are you so angry, don't you burn it, don't you 
hear it?!" 


Thanks for your pity: "Speaking!!!" 


Still not close, Jun Wu raised his hand, a group of fire instantly 
surrounded his whole person! 


The grace made a sharp scream. Thanks for the pity: "Mu Zi!" 


Such a big fire, grace does not give the burning **** to be badly hurt, the 
millet must not be directly ash? 


I also saw that there was always a small child under the shackles, and I 
was willing to help, but Jun Wu gradually gained the upper hand. He 
couldn’t get away from it. Counting the time probably didn’t save, said: 
“Emperor, how old is it? Let's go to this poisonous hand!" 


But thank you and he knows that there is no child in Jun's eyes. What he 
can see, only the enemy and the people who blocked him, waved out, and a 
group of flames wrapped around and flew out. 


Many of the priests below were shocked: "The general is on fire!" 


At this time, the pouring rain poured down, although the fire on the giant's 
body was not extinguished, but the fire on the body was extinguished. In 
the crowd, a black shadow jumped into the air and caught the falling 
cockroaches. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 227: Burning 
fire ghosts and gods down the Imperial City 2 


Thanks for your pity: "The Rain Master!" 


The rainman rode on the black cow and bowed his head slightly. After 
being carried by her in the cow, she was burned by the fire, and was 
drenched in the rain. The hair was completely messed up and she was 
embarrassed. Stumbled and looked at it, 1t was the rain teacher who caught 
him. Although the other party was concentrating on riding the cows, he did 
not look at him at all, but his unsatisfactory appearance at this moment 
was still exposed to others. He was quite embarrassed and immediately got 
up and said: "Rain..." 


Who knows, an opening, a spur of black smoke in his mouth. Rong Guang 
wants to be mad: "I actually want a woman to save, or a rain teacher, you 
can't lose people!" 


Annoyed, Zhang mouth spit out a string of black smoke: "Can you shut 
up! " 


Over there, Yu Su and half a month greeted the rain sergeant who fell from 
the air and helped him; here, on the magic giant, thousands of rocks fell 
down. Above the falling rocks, there is still a burning fire, and the meteor 
showers generally fall to the ground. 


The rain is more rainy, but the fire does not go out. It seems that Jun Wu 
has strengthened the mana in the fire. Moreover, even if the rain can 
extinguish the flame, it will be useless. The boulder will still fall to the 
ground. I am afraid that the Imperial City will be thousands of large pits 
everywhere, and there will be countless deaths and injuries. Partially, this 
megalithic statue is holding the giant dead and dead, and she refuses to 
leave the body. I don’t know if there are a few gods in the presence, can I 
intercept it without fail. Anxiously, thank you for turning around: 
"Sanlang, this...?!" 


Huacheng stood behind him and put his hand on the back of his hand. He 
said, "Don't worry about your brother. You can hold on here, don't worry 
about it." 


His voice was in the ear, and his breath was warm, and he sighed slightly, 
indicating that he would go to see it. Thanks to the direction he indicated 
to him, I saw the outside of the crowd, and slowly came a red figure with a 
negative hand. Thanks for your glance, the heart is blank. 


That is... flower city? 
Another flower city? ? 


what happened? Thanks for turning and turning. Isn't Huacheng standing 
behind him? 


Huacheng chuckled and said: "Don't be scared by your brother. Here is 
Shinsaburo, and the virginity is not deceived." 


So, the following is the point left by Huacheng when he left? It’s no 
wonder that Jun Wu didn’t doubt that Huacheng had sneaked into 
Xianjing. Xie’s pity was that he didn’t have eyes to stare at it. I’m afraid 
he was not without surveillance, but in his surveillance, “Flower City” 
remained in the Imperial City, of course he Do not doubt. 


Shi Qingxuan didn't have time to look at the sky, and he couldn't see the 
above-mentioned thankfulness and flower city. When he saw a "flower 
city" next to him, he said: "Blood rain and flower! You are finally back! 
What are you doing? For a long time, did you think of the way to connect 
with His Royal Highness? Do you not help me to deal with this side first, 
do you see the fire stones in the sky? Think about it! Take a breath or let 
your flowers endless. The little butterflies fly up to drive them away, or 
they will die..." 


"Flower City" did not say a word, cold and let him burst into a sudden 
burst of a sigh of relief, and finally seemed to be impatient, directly 
interrupted him: "You solve it yourself." 


Shi Qingxuan: "I solve it myself? You shouldn't be joking at this time. I 
am not your Royal Highness Prince. I can't appreciate your smile. How can 
I solve the stone?" The voice did not fall, "Flower City" grabbed After 
living in his collar, he directly took him out of the crowd. 


Shi Qingxuan reacted very fast, and immediately pulled the two left and 
right together in a burst, and the human array did not break. Who knows, 
"Flower City" dragged him out is not counted, the backhand is a palm, 
playing him whole people flying out! 


The crowd was shocked: "Old style! ?" 
Some rushed to "Flower City" and said: "Are you doing a fight?!" 


Although Shi Qingxuan flew out, he just fell a few fights and squatted on 
the ground. He immediately climbed up: "Nothing is ok, no death! He is 
not really hitting me, just borrowing my mana!" 


Shi Qingxuan looked at his hands and looked at his body. He took the aura 
from head to toe and said: "Flower City Lord, you don't need to see the 
Prince's Highness. You have to borrow the mana and you will borrow it. I 
don't mind. If you eat a few of those strange sugar balls, you don't need to 
beat people. Do you still have to look at the sky first, there are so many 
stones in the sky..." 


At this time, "Flower City" 1s another right hand, throwing a thing to him. 
Shi Qingxuan did not think about it, raised his hand and took it, took it 
down and saw his face brushed white. 


That thing, it is a wind fan! 


Seeing here, the gratitude on the statue of the megalith can not help, said: 
"Sanlang, the windshield fan is not... the one below is...?!" 


Huacheng Road: "Don't care. Temporarily called to help." 


Shi Qingxuan holds the fan that is familiar with himself, stiffens his neck, 
and slowly turns to the "flower city." 


"Flower City" is cold again: "You solve it yourself." 


The fire meteor shower array soon fell to the ground. People in the array 
of people could almost feel the burning waves blowing in the face, cold 
sweats and sweats flowing, saying: "Old wind, what are you talking about? 
Really? Is it okay?" 


The priests also said: "His Royal Highness, trouble you can think of 
ways!" 


Shi Qingxuan clenched the fan, his hands were blue and bulging, and his 
eyes climbed slightly. 


Hey, he turned around and waved his hand! 


A gust of wind rushed into the sky. The fire meteor showers turned a 
corner and flew to the sky! 


The crowds were scared to death, and they seemed to be ready to run at 
any time. They were all blown up by the wind, and they were shocked and 
shocked. For a long while, I said: "...God, god?" 


Someone shouted: "Mother is old, you can’t be a god!" 


Shi Qingxuan flew out of the fan, his hand was shaking, and he took a few 
breaths. After a while, he slowed down. He said: "...waste, nonsense! I 
didn't tell you long ago. How, I said I don't have a cowhide!" 


"No, no, no cowhide! I believe it! Wow old wind is a god, that is, we know 
the gods, this is developed, hahahahahaha..." 


"The old wind has a discussion, when will you fly with us?" 
Upon seeing it, "Flower City" snorted and turned away. Shi Qingxuan held 


the windshield fan over there, and replied in a random way to the jokes of 
others. His face was red and white, and the cold sweat fell from his 


forehead. He looked up and asked questions, but people had already 
disappeared. 


At this time, in the darkness of the people's array, there was a new strange 
sound. 


Hey, hey. There is a sharp eye: "What is that? Black pressure... Rat?" 
"And what is behind? People? How do you have gray people..." 

“Tt’s not like living people...” 

Thanks: "What?" 


It is a corpse, and a shell man. The monsters in the Copper Furnace 
Mountain have also been sent here! 


The empty shells were twisted and their limbs stiffly came to this side. 
The carnivores that feed on human flesh are more like a black tide. It 
seems that Junwu does not care what it is, and at any cost, it will destroy 
the people's array. 


Over there, the rainman waited for half a month and waited: "You are 
optimistic about the general. I am going to guard the battle." 


He lay down and vomited for a long time, and heard the words: "I'm fine, I 
will keep it." I want to struggle to get up, but I fall back again. Even the 


> le Jae Namie ai ba i> a ict ha a> Lice aes a> ey Dm > a dm em ie Sie Jee Tay Je all> i i Jaks a Nie > Dak hae Lae Aw a Dae a Jae 


b Tae Tak ale io ane de> Day ae a> De ai 


It’s probably the first time I’m so embarrassed in front of a woman. It’s 
also the first time I’ve been saved by a woman. I don’t know if it’s mad or 
what is self-respecting, and my face is rising. The rainman ignored his 
opinion and smiled slightly. "The general does not have to be stubborn." 
He left with a black cow. Ramp: "Rain Master!" 


At this moment, another hand climbed up and circled his neck. A sound 


faintly said: " 


I am still struggling, and I am not angry when I hear this voice: "How are 
you still?" 


Xuan Ji actually went from the very beginning. In the half month, she and 
the engraved woman who had been injured by Rong Guang also fell down. 
She listened badly and changed her voice. "How am I still? I have been 
there! You Why do you look at the rain teacher? You are not in love, are 
you in love? Do you want to catch up? Is there anything she has! I am not 
allowed!" 


Finally, I couldn’t bear it anymore. I opened her up and angered: "Xuan Ji, 
it’s all the time. Why are you still thinking about this in your mind?! It’s 
nothing to empathize with, I am with the rain teacher. Did not say a few 
words!" 


This is the first time he shot Xuan Ji, Xuan Ji was taken to the ground by 
him, and the whole person was paralyzed. 


For a long time, she was incredibly authentic: "Oh, I miss you because I 
love you, what am wrong with me? You have never been so fierce to me, 
do you really hate me?" 


He stood up with his sword and said, "I can't tell you." 


Xuan Ji still does not give up, said: "You said! You really do not want me? 
I have done so much for you, become like this, you are not touched at all? 
Do not feel embarrassed?" 


Ruan said: "I told you not a few hundred years ago?!" 
Xuan Ji suddenly became helpless. 


She didn't know what to do, but her hands were still holding his back hem, 


and her broken legs were squatting on the ground. "Yang Lang... _ Lang... 
You wait, or we will talk about it... ... : 


Half a month to see her like this, although she knows that she is 
abandoning her first, this female ghost has also killed countless people, 
and has always wanted to poison their hands, but this looks a bit pitiful. 


Looking back at her, in the end, still said: "Xuan Ji, you should wake up." 
Xuan Jidao: "What are you waking up?" 


Ruan said: "You become what it is today, there are reasons for me, but 
most of it is because of your own choice. You can only touch yourself if 
you do so much, and I am a hard-hearted person. You come to love I am 
better off loving you." 


He took back Xuan Ji’s own clothes and walked away without looking 
back. 


On the other side of the array, Shi Qingxuan went up with a fan, and there 
was not much mana. In a hurry, the rain master and a few martial arts can 
only go out to resist. Who knows, at this time, there are many messy 
voices in all directions: 


"Hey, here is the imperial city, the big house!" 

"What a fuss, there is no big house in the city!" 

"That is, there is no beautiful house in the city!" 

On the streets, corners, and eaves, there are many strange-shaped heads 
coming out, and they are full of excitement. Suddenly, the ghosts and 
ghosts of the ghost city are coming out! 

In the array of people, when the eyes open, they waited and couldn’t bear 
to yell: "What are these ghosts! Go! Go back! This is the foot of the Son of 
Heaven, how dare you go to the Imperial City to scatter wild!" 


"You pig, you dare to show up in front of me!" 


"I didn't read it wrong...that's a duck...a duck hits a mouse?" 


In the rushing time, there was a sigh of graves: "Shut up the bad priest! 
Don't face your face!" 


"If it is not the order of the city, you want to come!" 
"I don't want to kneel down and thank us!" 


The black-eyed carnivores squinted in red, and the situation was different 
from what they had imagined. When they saw it, they saw a group of 
monsters and monsters that were bigger than them. They greeted them 
with a fork and claws. Poke, look at the more fierce red light: "A lot of 
mice!" 


"Come here, hey, wait for a long time, I haven’t eaten the next two 
thousand-year-old appetizers, it must be very!" 


"Do you eat so much?" 
"The city owner said, you can sell it if you can't finish it!" 


The group of corpse mice saw bad momentum and was scared back. The 
empty shells were stumped by the chaotic corpses. The crisis resolved in 
time, and thanked and breathed a sigh of relief. He turned back and said: 
"Thanks to Saburo." 


Huacheng smiled a little and said: "They want to come by themselves, it is 
not my business. Compared to this, brother, be careful." 


In the last two words, his tone was sharp and serious. Thanks to the 
movement of the eyes, I saw that the magic giant had a new movement, 
put his hand on the waist, it seems, to pull out something. 


His heart is tight. 


That is a sword. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 228: Burning 
fire ghosts and gods down the Imperial City 3 


It’s just that this form has been difficult to deal with, and there is more 
than one sword. Is it not a tiger? 


Thanks for the poor feelings, I shouted and shouted: "Come, beware!" 


The ghosts and the rats were playing in full swing, and they all looked up 
and shouted: "The big big man... Oh, thank you!" 


"The city owner seems to be playing very happy on the top!" 


Thanks to pity: "No, we are not playing..." The voice did not fall, and the 
burning sword would scream at the overwhelming murderousness. Thanks 
for letting go of his hand, it was easy to avoid, and he was deeply shocked 
by the sword and heat wave of this blow. 


The megalithic statue was originally just a strong rival with the other side. 
This is good, it is simply unable to fight back! 


In a critical situation, he couldn't help but want to call a few other gods to 
help out, but Quan Yizhen now roams and smashes the bones of the bone 
dragon in the black water. Lang Qianqiu wants one person to be used as a 
hundred people, supporting the people in the array. The grievances, the 
winds and sorrows do not know how it happened. They didn’t see the 
shadows from the downside. Only when they were free, but he was also 
playing with a mouse while throwing a cigarette ring, and he refused to be 
beaten by the rain teacher. Going down, 80% is also not expected, no one 
is available! 


At this moment, a voice on the ground said: "Wait your Highness! Your 
sword is coming soon!" 


The national teacher is shouting. Thanks to pity to the jade crown, said: 
"What? Where is my sword?" 


The national teacher put his hands together and said: "Blood rain and 
flowers, shrinking thousands of miles! Drive to the Copper Mountain! The 
sword is coming!" 


Huacheng decisively throws a scorpion and said: "Open!" 


In the dark clouds above, something is booming. Swearing, thank you for 
your slightest squint and looking up. 


Really have a sword! 


The idol jumped up and the sword was in the hand. Xie pity gripped the 
seal of his hands. The statue of the boulder also clenched the hilt in his 
hand and swung his sword at "Xingjing"! 


The other side immediately confronted the sword. However, the two 
swords collided, and something happened that everyone had never thought 
of - the sword in the hands of Xie Pity directly cut off the sword of the 
flame! 


In the sound of the earth-shattering gold stone break, the magic fire giant 
suddenly stopped. 


Suddenly, it is torn apart. Immediately, he quickly fell to the ground. 


Xie pity also never expected, this sword is so strong, actually hit a lore? 
Looking at the sword in the hands of the megalithic statue, 1t was 
completely stunned. 


Guanghua circulates and is extremely sharp. What is this sword? 


I remembered that the National Teacher had let Huacheng drove the land 
to Tonglushan, and he suddenly understood - this is probably a sword that 
the three mountain monsters have made! 


However, I don’t think much about it. If this behemoth is going down, it is 
not fun. Xie Li immediately manipulated the statue of the boulder to fly 
down, hugged the large group of stones that were about to fall apart, 
changed direction, flew aside to the side, carefully slammed a more 


remote place to fall. In the end, the statue of the megalithic sword was 
inserted into the waist, set back to the ground, one hand held the sword, 
and the other hand lifted the two palms. It was like a swaying state, 
motionless, smile again, and return to the corolla. 


A piece of falling rock did not reach the ground. Everyone in the Imperial 
City, unscathed! 


For a long while, everyone on the ground, gods and gods, face each other, 
this is the way: "Do it...do you get it?" 


Xie Li and Hua Cheng also jumped from the palm of the statue of the giant 
stone and joined the crowd. The cold sweat of Shi Qingxuan has already 
been converted into hot sweat. The fan of the fan who has broken the fan 
again has been inserted into the waist, and he has been turned around and 
slammed into the road. "His Royal Highness! Is it okay?" Solve it?" 


Other priests also made up a few past: "Im... Junwu? Your Highness, you 
defeated him? Is it dead?" 


A side teacher said: "How is it possible? His Royal Highness Prince... He 
will not be defeated so easily." 


Huacheng extended a hand to Xie, saying: "Brother, let's go find it." 


Cheering nodded, gave him his hand, and the flower city pulled it gently 
and pulled him to the ruins. The ghosts have lost interest in the corpses 
that have been beaten, and they all jumped up, eagerly eager to "copy the 
fairy gods", but the flower city said: "away from the distance, idle people, 
etc. Don't be close to non-persons." Otherwise, if you hit Junwu, you will 
die. It was said that the ghosts had to jump back and continue to stay 
below. 


However, the former Xianjingli, which was smashed into a ruin, did not 
have a trace of Junwu. Xie Li and Hua Cheng first found a round, and 
opened the golden top of the dilapidated Shenwu Temple, and did not see 
anyone. 


At this time, Lang Qianqiu suddenly yelled: "General General! I have 
something to do, trouble you to help me top." 


The beaten mouse did not have a rainy man. He was depressed and 
depressed. He was inexplicably pulled over by him, touched his nose, and 
said nothing. Lang Qianqiu jumped on the ruins and turned around. 
Finally, he opened a collapsed roof and said: "Found it!" 


Thank you for listening, in the past: "Think carefully!" 


He also thought that Lang Qianqiu had found Junwu. Who knows, what he 
found was a group of blackened things, like a huge worm shell curled up, 
and a small cough sounded inside. 


Thanks and pity, I quickly smashed the blackened shell together with Lang 
Qianqiu. It actually rolled out a child, holding his head around his body, 
and his body was red. It seemed to be hot, but he was not worried. 
Coughing. 


After he got out, a group of green and wild fires also sneaked out. Thanks: 
"This is..." 


Lang Qianqiu grabbed the group of wildfires and fired his eyes. He said: 
"There is a sky that makes you look sad and still not dead, or it falls into 
my hands!" 


This time, the grace can be regarded as a real "green light night tour". I 
want to come, when Jun Wu hits the fire, he has to protect the millet, and 
the child has not been burned. Xie pity can not help but some accidents, 
after all, with the temperament of the temperament, provoke the upper 
body, throwing the grain out of the fire to stop the fire is what he will do. 


Huacheng saw what he was thinking about at the moment. He said: "Even 
if he throws the child out of the fire, he can't stop it much. He burns it ina 
flash. The guard and the guard are not big for him. ” 


This is the truth, but that is also the protection. The grace was burned and 
only a group of green and wild fires were left. It was still not scattered. It 


was caught by Lang Qiangqiu and scared and wowed. The newly saved 
millet woke up and hugged Lang Qianqiu’s leg and said, "Brother, don't 
kill me!" 


Lang Qianqiu angered: "Let's let go! I warn you, you are not useful to me, 
I will not be merciful!" Grace is his annihilation of enemies. He refused to 
intervene in this matter, but he was afraid that he would anger and 
accidentally hurt the millet. He wanted to go up and pull the millet first. 
Who knows that the millet rushed over and hugged him: "Trash brother 
saves me. father!" 


Thanks to pity: "Muzi... That's really not you. You see how he doesn't 
know you?" 


Guzi said: "That is my sister! I used to be bad to me, but later I was very 
good to me. I often gave me meat. I also said that I would take me to a 
beautiful big house... He is very kind to me. Ok, tattered brother, can you 
help him?" 


Grace shook up: "The stupid son does not ask him! This black-hearted 
snow lotus will not save your father! He wants you to die, he does not care 
about my life and death!" 


Huacheng side said: "You are worried that Lang Qianqiu will not die, must 
you let me participate?" 


Grace is still very afraid of him. When he listens to him, the whole group 
of ghosts are shrunk. But the horizontal and vertical are to die, or to fight 
out, said: "Dog flower city, I am not afraid of you! Thank you, you do not 
think I do not know, I took you the day God, but you! What do you take 
me? You simply do not Take me seriously! You dislike me, think that I am 
a fool, crazy, I am sick, disdain to me. You never look down on me! What 
qualifications do you despise me? You can't even kill Yongan, you waste !" 


Xie Li only said one word. Although Huacheng did not move, but he felt 
something, he immediately took him and said: "Forget it, forget it." 


Huacheng didn't even bother to smirk and screamed: "What about you, 
how can you afford it from head to toe?" 


Graceful and indignant, angry and ruined: "I am, I am, I am! You, how can 
you look down on me? Laozi... Laozi... Laozi has a son!" 


Grace laughed wildly: "Hey! Although it's cheap, but it's better than yours, 
you don't want to do it! You don't want to have it for another eight hundred 
years! Hahaha..." 


Xie Pity and Huacheng have no words. Huacheng also didn't want to waste 
his words with the sadness. He only raised his eyebrows for Xie, and said 
with a mouthful: "That's not necessarily." 


Thanks for knowing that he was joking, but he smiled. Who knows, 
laughing and laughing, the sad laughter is getting smaller and smaller. The 
ghosts of the group jumping up and down, green and oily, were 
extinguished. 


Lang Qianqiu does not know whether the ghost of the grace is 
extinguished by himself or by his annihilation. The millet was also 
awkward. He went up one by one and opened his fingers. He didn’t see 
anything, and he smashed in the black residue on the ground. He was full 
of black and gray, and he didn’t see the green light. I lived in the corner of 
Lang Qianqiu and said, "I am jealous..." 


He asked Lang Qianqiu, Lang Qianqiu did not know what to say, looking to 
pity. Xie pity did not know what to say, sighed and turned and left. Behind 
him, there was a constant question from the millet: "Brother, what am I? Is 
he still there? He said that he has cultivated what... The most powerful 
king in the three worlds will not die. Is he still there?" 


The annoying sadness finally disappeared. 


However, thanking her, she didn’t know what to say, and she couldn’t 
understand what she was feeling at the moment. 


In fact, if you think about it carefully, he seems to be unable to refute it. 
From small to big, for this cousin, he seems to really not be able to talk 
about how much he can afford. 


At first he was merciful to grace, and later he was helpless, headache, and 
tried his best to ignore it. It must be said that he "dislikes" the sad words, 
it seems that ... is indeed quite abandon. 


Not only is it abandoning. I once hated Grace and hated to crush his ashes 
and throw them in the north and south of the river. But after so long, after 
going through so many things, and looking back at the grace, it 1s really 
tired except for the annoyance. It may even be that it doesn't matter if you 
add it. 


No joy or no sorrow. 


Some search, nothing. Under the ruins, Shi Qingxuan waited for a long 
time on the ground, saying: "His Royal Highness, how?" 


Xie pity shook his head and said: "I didn't find him." 

"How could you not find it?!" 

The priests discussed it: "Will it really die? Gray smoke is gone." 
"If you hide it, it will be terrible!" 

"Where can that be hidden? So many people are watching?" 


Shi Qingxuan looked around in a circle and said: "His Royal Highness, 
there is a problem. I have been asking since I just started. Nanyang and 
Xuanzhen?" 


Really, everyone did not see the wind and the feelings for a while. The 
priests were screaming again: "The two generals should not be like the 
generals, and they are kept in the temple of Xianjing." 


"No... I saw the general of Nanyang came out! And, he seemed to be 
looking for someone at the time..." 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 229: Exquisite 


Thanks and whispered to Huacheng Road: "I don't know what happened, 
Fengxin is looking for gladioli and fetal spirit. It won't..." 


It will not go with other priests, stay in Xianjing to find someone, and then 
you will encounter this series of heaven and earth, flooded with fire? 


Or worse, maybe, both of them are now in the hands of Junwu! 


At this time, a national teacher came over and said: "His Royal Highness, 
you don't have to find it. If he is here, he does not need to hide. There are 
many people here, but there are still few people he can put in his eyes. 
Since He is not here, then he can only go to one place. And he wants you to 
follow him." 


Thanks for your pity, said: "Bronze Furnace?" 


The national teacher nodded and said: "I am afraid that he has directly 
shrunk a thousand miles. In addition to Xianjing, there is his strongest 
territory." 


Teacher Qingxuan: "Ah? Are you going to Tongluoshan? Go to that terrible 
place?" 


Thanks to the pity: "I have been there once, but fortunately, it is not very 
terrible. Maybe they believe that they are there too." 


The national teacher said: "Don't take it lightly. You go back this time, 
waiting for your affirmation is not the same thing." Suddenly, said, "I will 
go with you. It is best to find a few reliable ones." Wu Shen is a helper. 
Don't be hurt, and the injured are also dragging your legs." 


This time, thanking the pity can be a headache. "Reliable Valkyrie"? 
Maybe there are still a few Valkyries before, but there are not many at the 
moment. The downside, the focus of the coke, some disappeared, and 
some were held by the children in the thighs and kept crying. Huacheng 


Road: "You don't have to find any other helpers. It's useless. My brother 
and I are enough." 


Guoshi said: "It is definitely not enough." 


Protested far and wide: "Blood rain, please don't use such a 
convincing tone to say ‘all useless'!" 


Shi Qing Xuan Haha said: "General General, you are so powerful, the mice 
are not as good as the rain teacher, there is nothing to protest!" 


He hasn't seen him for a long time, and he still laughs at him when he 
meets. He was poked at him and he couldn’t help him, and he was more 
depressed. At this moment, suddenly a voice said: "Wait, there is me, I 
will go." 


When everyone looked at it separately, it was discovered that it was a 
feeling of affection. I don't know when, he stood at the end of the crowd. 
Thanks to him, he breathed a sigh of relief and said: "Muscle? When did 
you come? Where did you go? I thought you were missing." 


The feelings are: "I have been there all the time." 


Huacheng held his arm and squinted at him. He said, "I’ve been there all 
the time, but I haven’t spoken, and I’m not working?” 


The feelings are faint: "I said that I have been there all the time. Just didn't 
say anything, you didn't see me." 


However, it was only after several times that the lack of people could not 
find him. He did not even see him out. Everyone thought that Xuan Zhen’s 
general was missing. Xie pity still hopes that the wind will not be in the 
crowd, but they did not find it, searched a circle, the wind letter is really 
not, just say: "Okay. Do you want to help us with us? Too Ok, finally 
someone ts available." 


So, the feelings went up. Seeing that he followed, the face of Guoshi and 
Huacheng was as rare as it was at this time. Both of them have not favored 


the feelings since a long time ago. Huacheng does not mention that the 
national teacher did not want to accept the feelings from the beginning. It 
seems that they can guess that it is better to have such a helper. No helper. 
They will not be unclear about their attitudes, but they have given a gift to 
the national teacher in the past, whispering: "Master." 


The national teacher nodded and said nothing. After all, the love has not 
done anything that is really difficult, since he is coming to help, there is 
no reason to let him go back. He told Shi Qingxuan: "The statue of the 
Prince of God is here, and the grievances will have to clean up for a few 
days. There will be several people here, so watch it." 


Shi Qingxuan also nodded: "That is of course! But wait for this 
predecessor, I asked you several times. Can you answer me, which of you 
is the best?" 


The national teacher did not answer. A few people walked along the flower 
city to a large house. Huacheng has thrown a scorpion and 1s about to open 
the door. Who knows, I glanced at it casually, and suddenly my look 
changed slightly. 


Xie pity was keenly aware of it, saying: "What happened to Saburo, can't 
you shrink a thousand miles?" 


Huacheng received the **** and smiled a little. "No. Just, I rarely throw 
such a result." 


He spread his heart to Xie. Thanks for giving up and looking at it, I also 
stunned. 


Above the pale palm, there is only one solitary scorpion, which is a point. 
When Huacheng shot, it was always six red, and the number was really 
rare. Thanks for the faint trepidation, said: "...What does this point mean? 


Did you accidentally miss it?" 


Huacheng Road: "According to past experience, it is probably that there is 
an extremely dangerous thing waiting for me." 


The heart of thankfulness was a little ups and downs. The national teacher 
said in the back: "Hey, how many times have I told you young people, 
gambling is not good, quit early! Your next look at your temple, he is 
contaminated with bad habits!" 


The sign is not good, but the flower city looks as usual, and accepts the 
scorpion. He smiles and said: "This is a look at it. It doesn't matter at all. 
It's dangerous, I have the final say." He opened the door and said, "Go, 
brother." "" 


He turned and walked into the door, thanking him but subconsciously 
raising his hand and grabbing him. On the spot, he wanted to blurt out 
"You don't go", but you don't have to think about it. Finally, whisper: "Go. 
But don't leave me. If anything, I will protect you." 


Wen Yan, Huacheng lived. 


For a while, he curled up the corners of his mouth and smiled. He said, 
"Okay. My brother remembers to protect me." 


'..."" Mujing looked at the side, and did not know whether it was awkward 
or cold. When Huacheng opened the door, a wave of burning waves came 
out and put out the color on his face. 


The volcanic eruption was sent once before, and now the heavy fly ash has 
not dissipated. The place where the soil and stone were originally scattered 
all over the place, the flames are everywhere, like a furnace hell, a red. 
The copper furnace mountain has been completely unrecognizable. 


Xie Li and others came out from a cave on a higher hillside. When they 
came out, they were almost suffocated by the mountain ash, saying: "Is he 
really here?" 


Admire: "Beside the copper furnace." 


Thanks to the pity: "The volcano erupted, I am afraid there is no place to 
be near." 


The national teacher said: "I know where he 1s. If the place is not 
destroyed, come with me, go and you will know." 


A few people followed him and went down the high slope. Huacheng 
walked in front of Xie Pity. When the stone was difficult to get down, he 
went down the road first, then turned to thank him and helped him down. 
Otherwise, it is estimated that the downhill has already gone downhill - 
from the highest point of the hillside, the foot is slipping straight, and the 
bones are rolling to the lowest point. 


Who knows, he didn't step on the air, but the other person stepped on the 
air - the feelings followed in the end, one foot did not step on, the figure 
was slightly shaking. Thanks to him, he was close to him, and he quickly 
grabbed his eye and said, "Be careful!" 


There is a slight excitement in the feelings. It seems that this has returned 
to God and said: "Know it." 


Thanks for letting go, my heart and soul are really abnormal. I turned back 
and suddenly remembered something. I took two quick steps and came to 
Huacheng. I whispered, "Yes, Saburo, at the top of the snow, I love them." 
Fight, do you hear what they said? Why are you suddenly angry?" 


When it comes to this, the flower city looks slightly cold, and it must be 
hidden. "Oh, that. The two people are not talking about it, and they say 
something disrespectful to their brother." 


"Ah?" Thanks, "What?" 


Huacheng Road: "My brother doesn't have to listen, it doesn't stain your 
ears. It's down." 


A group of four people has already descended from the high slope. After a 
while, they were stopped by a river. The river is not clear water, but it is a 
red liquid, and there are still bubbles in it - it is hot magma! 


This heat, the average person does not have to fall in, as long as they are 
close to be burned to death, the loss of the four of them are not mortal to 
persist here, not even people with bones melted. The national teacher 
constantly wiped the sweat on his forehead and said: "It should be 
opposite, but this place is the original moat. Now it becomes like this, it 
can't pass." 


Thanks for the pity: "We are afraid that we need something to cross the 
river." 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 230: Exquisite 
and a little scared 2 


If the statue of the megalith is here, a few big steps are quickly passed. But 
it is now being prayed to stay in the imperial town to suppress evil spirits, 
and the three mountain monsters have also turned the sword, or it is not 
good. 


Thanks to the pity: "Samuro, can Silver Butterfly take us over?" 


Huacheng Road: "The magma is burning, I am afraid that the silver 
butterfly will be melted when it crosses the river." 


Crossing the river to half, falling from the air, and planting into the center 
of the magma flow, it is not very good-looking. Huacheng said again: 
"However, there are ready-made channels." 


Everyone looked down at him. After a while, thank you: "How is there in 
the magma?" 


It’s true that he is absolutely not mistaken. Just a moment ago, he saw a 
pale hand in the magma and extended to the sky. Look carefully, admire: 
"Really! And more than one?" 


At least hundreds of people, many bodies and heads are floating on the 
river, some are rushed by the flow of inflammation, and some even go 
upstream. Their bodies are all strange white, blurred, not alive. 


Thanks to pity: "The hollow people in the city of Wuyong...the magma 
rushed here." 


With their skills, it is not difficult to use these hollow geeks as stepping 
stones and fly over them. It’s just that these undead souls are struggling in 
the heat and stagnation, and they have to be stepped on by them. It’s quite 
miserable, but they can’t take care of it now. 


The feelings first passed, and the position was right, several ups and 
downs, and soon passed through the moat, standing on the other side of the 
river, looking back at this side. Thanks to the country teacher: "I will send 
you first." 


After all, the national teacher is not a **** of martial arts, not even a 
family member. If you want someone to take it, he nods and goes to the 
front. Huacheng said: "Brother, let me come." 


Go with the flow, thank you: "Okay." 


Huacheng went up, and the old man, who was supporting the elderly, 
generally embraced the arm of the national teacher. He said: "National 
teacher, please let the elderly please. Pay attention to your feet." 


The national teacher looked back and saw that he was not thankful and 
pity, and he said: "Ah? How are you?" 


Thanks to pity, Junjun can't help but cough, saying: "Sanlang is sincerely 
saying that he wants to help you, and I will let him do it for you." 


Guo Shidao: "What is there to do nothing?" 


Huacheng smiled and said: "I am no different from my brother. Besides, I 
respect you very much. Of course, I don't mind doing this." 


The national teacher was speechless for a moment, saying: "If you really 
respect me, I will accept the fake smile on your face. This is too much." 


Huacheng immediately did not smile: "Oh." Without saying anything, with 
the national teacher, brushing the body shape moved to the other side. 


His body was so fast, and the national teacher did not react and stood by 
the side of the feelings, the whole person was stunned. The empty shells 
that were stepped on by the Huacheng boots didn't even find themselves 
being trampled. Looking up, there was nothing, and the head was 

inexplicable and continued to swim in the magma. The national teacher 


finally came back to God and took a look at the flower city. He 
commented: "It’s okay." 


Here, thank you: "It's too strict. How can this skill be called ‘OK?'” Shake 
his head and say, “I have passed!” 


Huacheng turned and said: "Brother, you stay there first, I used to pick you 
up." 


But thankfulness is faster than his words. He has already left, jumped out 
and jumped on a belly of a hollow geek on his back. He felt the hard body 
under his feet sinking slightly, and he jumped out again, in front of another 
hollow geek. a little. 


So, after five or six steps, I came to the center of the stream. Who knows, 
when the pity is to be vacated again, the body is too late to prevent a 
sinking, almost lost balance! 


He stood firm with a quick response and looked down - the strange man at 
his feet, actually reached out and grabbed his boots! 


Thanks for your pity: "It's bad, come again!" 


The bad luck is coming again. The first few people were safe when 
crossing the river. However, when he passed, he encountered a bad 
monster. He grabbed his right ankle and prevented him from getting up! 


The empty shell geek can float on the surface of the magma because it is 
hollow, but it can't bear much weight. It is soaring, steaming and praying, 
and the corner of the sleeve is actually on fire. 


Staying again, I am afraid that even people will carry the pedal stone into 
the magma, or the whole person will burn! 


Thousands of times, thank you for your enthusiasm, if the evil flies out, 
pull another hollow geek in the distance of Sanzhang, and the left foot is 
on the back of the strange person. In this way, the two stone shells share 
the weight of one person, the buoyancy increases, and it will not sink for a 


while. I should be anxious, thank you for pulling out the heart and 
breaking the arm that grabbed his boots. Just wanting to jump again, a red 
shadow has flashed to him, thank you: "Sanlang? I am fine, you don't have 
to come over." 


Huacheng smashed the hollow monster that grabbed the pity and said: "Go 
on the shore." 


The two came to the shore together, thanking the pity and extinguishing 
the fire on the sleeves. "Sorry, I am worried." 


Huacheng Road: "My fault. I should tell you before I go back to pick you 
up." 


Guo Shidao: "I have done it. Stop it, my Highness is not so delicate. If you 
don't pass, he can still cope with it. What do you pick up? Let's go! Here." 


Several people went to the shore and walked for a while before coming to 
the Uyong Palace. 


Half of the palace was buried in the ground. After several people entered, 
the road was sloping and all the way to the depths of the ground. 


Leaving the ground, the hot air gradually sank. The entire underground 
palace is empty, and the most subtle sounds will make a loud echo. 


Several people ignited the palm of their heart and illuminate the 
surroundings. Although the palace has been dusty for a long time, it can 
still be called magnificent, and the fire reflects many golden patterns and 
carved beams. It’s just that there’s nothing left, it’s dead, like a huge tomb. 


Guo Shidao: "This is where the Prince Edward grew up." 
Admire: "Is he really here?" 


Guo Shidao: "What do you say? This is the place with the strongest mana. 
Be careful." 


At this time, thank you suddenly found one thing. 


At the waist of Huacheng, the silvery eyeballs on the knives of the 
ancestors swayed, and they were very anxious. 


The flower city is condensed and completely ignored. Thanks for the pity, 
I couldn’t help but reach out and touch it. Huacheng bowed his head 
slightly, and saw his hand still on the handle. He smiled and was about to 
open his mouth. At this moment, there was a burst of laughter from the 
corner of the hall. 


That is the voice of a middle-aged man. It’s a sinister act, as if it’s not 
good, and I’m sorry to say that when I’m on the back, it’s cold. Moreover, 
this voice, he has heard. 


It is the voice of the fetus! 


Enthusiastically said: "Where!" A flame hit out and illumined the top. I 
saw the top corner of the palace, the gecko is generally attached to a white 
flower, that is the fetus! 


Its bright red tongue licks his back as if to tickle himself. Seeing the fire 
flies, smiles, vomits and vomits a vomit-like thing, and the feelings are 
shunned, and the expression is disgusting. The national teacher looked at 
the slimy things on the ground, and then looked at the fetal spirit above. It 
was difficult to accept the authenticity: "Is this really the son of the boy?" 


Thanks for your help: "Wait! Wrong! Are you wrong?" 
The baby heard his name, paused and looked back at him. Thanks: 
"Wrong, we are looking for... looking for... looking for you. Do you know 


where he is?" 


The baby spirit heard "you swear", sneered, and used four feet, and he 
disappeared. Thanks for your pity: "Wrong? Look for it!" 


Everyone burned the flame higher and searched four times. Suddenly, I 
admire: "This side!" 


Thanks for your pity: "Which side?" 


Mu Qing pointed to a road: "I just saw it coming in here." 


The road he pointed to was on the side of a palace. It was a corridor with a 
corridor, and it was sinister. Even if you didn't know where it was, you 
knew that it would never lead to a good place. 


Huacheng suddenly said: "Do you really see it coming in here?" 


I feel that I am being targeted, and I am a bit disgusted: "What good 1s it 
for me to lie to you?" 


Huacheng snorted, although he did not bring any emotions, but he was not 
very friendly. Guo Shidao: "This time, noisy noisy? Don't let go of 
suspicious places, go in and see." 


The corridor was very narrow, and it was definitely wider, but it seemed to 
have been squeezed. Now it can only be used by one person. Probably not 
skeptical in the words of Huacheng, the first one to go in. Huacheng 
naturally had to walk in front of Xie Pity to open the way, but Xie pity 
found that his eyeballs began to turn wildly, his heart moved, and he pulled 
him back. Huacheng Road: "What's wrong?" 


Xie pity and cough, said: "I said to protect you... standing behind." 
Sorry, Huacheng laughed softly. 


A group of four people entered the corridor. The more you go, the more 
you feel uncomfortable. 


His intuition is extremely accurate for dangerous things. The thing that 
made him uncomfortable was from the front. Thanks to the pity: "National 
division, do you remember where this road leads? How do I feel more and 
more, the front is very heavy..." 


murderous look. 


And it is not a living murderous, but a cold murderous murderous. The 
deeper he is, the more tight his spirit is. 


However, the National Teacher did not answer him. He thanked him with a 
sigh of relief and asked: "National Teacher?" 


Still no answer. Thanks for the pity and looked back, I don’t know when, 
behind him, it’s already empty! 


The reason why he did not notice it was because the lights released by 
Huacheng and Guoshi were still floating in the air, followed him faintly, 
illuminating the road ahead for the disappearing masters. 


The feelings of love also turned back, and I was amazed at the beginning: 
"Blood rain and flowers?!" 


If you don't say anything, you will go back. He admired him and said, 
"What are you doing? We are coming soon! And do you really think he 
will go back?" 


"..." thank you, "No." 


It is because Huacheng will never go back alone without a single voice, so 
it is terrible! 


Xie pity suddenly remembered that Huacheng left a thing on him and 
quickly raised his hand to see. I saw that the red line on the third finger is 
still there, still bright, indicating that Huacheng is fine, thank you for this. 
But the thought of the one that was thrown out before the flower city came 
over, the brow jumped even more. 


Mourning again: "You can't find more of it now. It's better to go ahead and 
see what's inside. If you go back and find nothing, don't you want to 
return, isn't it a waste of time?" 


Xie pity is about to talk, suddenly hold his breath, said: "Hey. Hear, what 
sound?" 


The feelings of love are also fascinating. 


It was a man’s low breathing. 


It came from the front! 


The two were wary of each other, and each of them held the blade darkly 
and walked forward. 


They finally walked out of the corridor and came to a hall. Mourningly 
cautiously groping in the temple, thanking a pity for a finger, a little light 


flame faint forward, suddenly illuminating a figure that fell to the ground. 


As soon as I saw the man’s back, Xie pity recognized it and went up: 
“Fengxin?!” 


Turning it over, it turned out to be a wind letter. He was full of burns and 
sword wounds, but there should be no life. Thanks for taking a good look, 
he only woke up for a while, and when he woke up, he sipped a few words 
and saw that he was thankful in front of him. He immediately screamed: 
"His Royal Highness?? How are you here?" 


Thanks for the pity, said: "You should tell me first, where is this?" 
Fengxin sat up and looked around and said, "Where is this?" 


Sure enough, the wind letter did not know, white asked. Xie pity shook his 
head and reached out and said: "Get up first. Find you, and find Saburo." 


Wind channel: "Do you say **** flowers? What happened to him? Not 
next to you?" 


Thanks: "It is like this, we are together..." 


The voice did not fall, the wind letter suddenly raised his hand and said: 
"Wait! Who is the person behind you?!" 


Thanks for turning back, I saw a black shadow immersed in the shadows, 
motionless, said: "That is a feeling of love. What happened?" 


Fengxin's pair of pupils contracted instantly, saying: "Catch him!" 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 231: Exquisite 
and a little scared 3 


In the darkness, the figure took a step forward and was finally exposed to 
the fire. 


Mourning face was gloomy, no words, and Fengxin seized the pity and 
said: "I was looking for someone in Xianjing before I found someone. I 
suddenly hit someone from behind me, or how would I fall?" 


Xie pity thoughts turned sharply, blinked and said: "Is he playing you?" 
The wind and the letter are arrogant: "I can't go wrong, it's him!" 
Thanks: "After he hit you, you immediately fainted?" 


Fengxin: "It's almost like this! In the end, you should be careful, either 
don't approach him or grab him!" 


I can’t help but say: "Let you..." 


Thanks for your help: "Wait! Fengxin, this has a problem. Since he is 
attacking you from behind, you immediately fainted - then how did you 
know that the person behind you? Is it the love?" 


Feng Xin did not expect that he would ask this question and stunned. Mu 
Qing immediately seized this moment and shouted: "At that time, 
Xianjing was in a fire, and it was not unusual for anyone to accidentally 
stun you. You just put things on me. Can't you admit that you are wrong?" 


99 


The wind letter grabbed Xie’s pity and stood up. Shen said: "No, it must be 
you!" 


Admire: "Why do you say this?" 


Fengxin said one word: "Because Xianjing was on fire at the time, there 
was a fire everywhere, and the shadow of the person behind me was 
reflected on the ground. Although I didn't have time to look back, I saw 
the shadow shape when I fell down. And moves. That is your shadow!" 


Thank you for listening to the words of the two men. The feelings of love 
still do not show weakness, said: "I said that you still have not seen it with 
your own eyes. It is normal for the shadow to be distorted. Can you judge 
me with a shadow? Are you fainting to see what?" 


Wind channel: "You know very well whether I can conclude. Your 
Highness is also." 


Thanks for being clear. Then again, the three of them are all growing up 
together and practicing together. They can’t be familiar with each other’s 
figure and moves. Even if they don’t see the face, they have eight points! 


The wind and the letter said again: "Your Highness, are you coming 
together? Is there anything suspicious on his way?" 


Thanks: "This..." 


To tell the truth, the road of admiration is too suspicious, and the mind is 
restless. But at this moment, thanking me is not good enough to say in 
front of the feelings. Feng Xin said again: "No! Think about it carefully. 
From the moment he came, he was very suspicious. With his character, 
how can he save money with you? Is this still a love?" 


The face of the face is even more heavy: "Speak not to be so absolute. The 
son is not like what you will do, you are not born?" 


" " 


Thanks for the hunch, this direction is not good, busy: "Well, don't make a 
noise, then quarrel to pick up a dragon and calm down!" 


The feelings are again: "Again, if you are stunned, why bother to bring 
them to you?" 


Fengxin also said: "Because you didn't think that you played me from 
behind, but I still recognized it! And I don't know what a ghost place here. 
You may not be looking for me if you bring them down. Blood and blood. 
Are you gone with you in the middle of the road?" 


Mu Qing said: "You want to say that I am a fake, deliberately led the 
Highness to them and fell into the trap of crisis? Sorry, Your Royal 
Highness and Blood Rain are walking with me. If I am fake, they can't find 
it. we 


Thanks to the pity: "The words are like this..." 


However, that is also the feelings of the road. However, after entering the 
underground Wuyong Palace, did you feel that you were not paying 
attention to being dropped? This is not guaranteed. 


Mu Qing looked at the wind and said: "Your Highness, I think you are still 
a little farther away from him. After all, when we come over, he will be 
here, blood and rain will disappear, and he suddenly wakes up and 
provokes. Fake?" 


The white phase has once turned into the appearance of these two people, 
and it is not unusual to re-enact once. Thank you for your pity, and said: 
"It's better than this. You say something that only us three know, verify it?" 


Admiration: "What is it?" 


Thanks for thinking, he said casually: "On the top of the snow, what did 
you two call?" 


When he finished, the faces of both of them condensed. Xie pity hands and 
sleeves, said: "If you two can not be right, it means that one of you is not 
the deity. We first identify the identity, then talk about other." 


The two men were opposite each other, that is, they didn’t talk, and they 
were not very curious about what they said behind them, and they couldn’t 
help but wonder. For a long while, the wind letter did not answer 


positively, but said: "You have made a mistake, and I have no doubt that he 
is a fake." 


Mu Qingqing blinked: "So what do you mean?" 


Feng Xin bluntly said: "I felt that he was really sincere at first. He looked 
at you and I was not happy, and it was not surprising." 


The hand of admiration clenches into a fist, the knot is creaking, and the 
backhand is a palm! 


Fengxin was injured and barely avoided. The two started this fight. 
Although Xie Pian had expected it, but still had a headache, said: "Calm 
down... or we still pick up a dragon?" 


This is a hands-on, thankful and pity, and the murderousness is even 
heavier. Several groups of fires flew, illuminating the whole house, 
thanking the pity for this to see clearly, the walls and shelves in all 
directions, densely packed with various kinds of swords and swords and 
other weapons, cold and fragrant. 


It turned out that this 1s a weapons library. No wonder all the cold and 
murderous in all directions! 


Thanks to myself, there was such a weapons library in the past. I loved it 
very much and often lingered in it, but this weapon library made him feel 
very uncomfortable and didn't want to stay. But for the two people, he 
didn’t know which one to believe for a while, and he didn’t know which 
one to help — to be honest, both were very suspicious! 


Finally, thank you for saying: "If evil!" 
Let's tie the first two together! 
If the evil waiting for a long time finally has a chance to show up, it will 


fly. Who knows, the white cockroaches have not come out, but the pity has 
suddenly realized that another chill has spread from behind. 


He took the position and made a change, grabbed the evil, and waved back. 
I felt something in the white scorpion, and thanked me for the violent 
force. 


His heart sank, and the next moment, instead, was pulled over by the other 
side of Ruo, the back slammed into a bosom, and a cold, hard thing licked 
his waist. Thankfulness: "???" 


Although his body does not look solid, the power is still amazing. Unless 
the other party is a giant, how can it be so easy to smash him? 


Xie Li is preparing for a backhand punch, but feels a hand looping over his 
waist, a voice above it: "Brother, it is me." 


Thank you, "Sanlang?" 


Sure enough, looking down, holding his own hand, wearing a silver 
wristband carved with maple leaves, butterflies, beasts; then turning 
around and looking at him, is a long-haired red Dressing people, calm and 
leisure, hanging a silver machete. The only thing that had smashed his 
waist, the eight achievements were the handle of the scimitar. 


Flower City! 


Thank you for understanding. It turned out that it was just that if the evil 
took the initiative to drag him to the side of Huacheng, he was equivalent 
to a pair of two, of course, it was suddenly smashed! 


He stood firm and picked up Ruoqiang without words and said to him: 
"You are too gluttonous..." 


If evil then knows that it is dead, it doesn't move. Xie Pity does not want 
to say it, and throws it away: "Sanlang, what happened in the end? You are 
not always behind me? Master?" 


Huacheng Road: "This place is very different. When I walked halfway 
through, I was blocked. I encountered something a bit tricky and it took a 
while to solve it." 


Even the flower city said it was a bit tricky, it seems to be really tricky, 
thank you for your uneasiness, saying: "Is it okay?" 


Huacheng Road: "Of course it's okay. But the National Teacher is unclear, 
and may have to go deeper. By the way, what are they playing? It's so 
noisy." 


Thanks: "Oh, they..." 


Aside the wind and the feelings of love, I finally noticed this, and 
immediately shouted: "Hey! Be careful! Don't just come close to someone 
who suddenly pops up!" 


The two temporarily suspended the war, and the wind confession also said: 
"Your Highness, you don't see him and rush to it!" 


Xie pity immediately argued: "What! What is it that when he sees him, he 
rushes up? It is not the problem that I rushed to, it is a problem of sin..." 
When I got here, I suddenly reacted why they were so nervous. 


Since the wind and the feelings have been suspected of being out of the 
package, then... Huacheng, isn’t there also? 


Is this standing in front of me really a "flower city" myself? 


Huacheng raised an eyebrow and said: "So you are doubting my true and 
false now?" 


Thanks for the elbow, one hand, and began to observe him seriously. 


Huacheng noticed his gaze and, in turn, stared at him. 


'..."" Xie pity gave him the anti-eye to observe, and thought for a while, 
came to the conclusion, to the two people: "I think this is true." 


The feelings are not good-hearted: "You think it's not right. Don't forget 
where it is, the white nestless, it's not surprising. You want to try it 
yourself." 


Huacheng smiled and said: "This is too simple. Brother, come over, I will 
tell you a good way, you can judge it right away." 


Xie Lian listened to his past, and humbly asked: "What is a good way?" 


Admiration: "You don't want him to say what you do, okay? But now he is 
really doubtful, but he!" 


Huacheng said: "You read the first half of my psychic password to me. I 
will read it to you in the next half of the sentence. You know if I am real." 


" " 


The two whispered a few words, thanked the pity and turned around, and 
coughed, and said to the two people: "This... this is true." 


The wind letter seems to be a little less tight, and he is suspicious: "Are 
you sure? You don't have to look at your face." 


Thanks to pity: "I have said this for a long time. It is definitely true. 
Whatever you say, I seem to be so awkward..." 


Huacheng Road: "Okay, solved. Talk back - brother, what are they playing 
in the end?" 


Xie pity explained a few words to him, with the help of the amount, said: 
"That's it... really, I don't know who is more suspicious." 


Huacheng said: "Do you still ask? Of course, he is more suspicious." 
The direction he gestured was a feeling of affection. 


Unexpectedly, he said: "You must have a bottom line with blood sprayers? 
Don't push anything on my head." 


Huacheng Road: "Good. Then, I ask you a question - what is the one on 
your wrist?" 


Hearing his words, his face changed greatly when he was in love. 


He was eager to retreat, but his voice was quick and he grabbed him: "On 
the wrist?" 


On his wrist, it was a curse! 


The feelings of a man who had set a letter of fortune, the blue forehead of 
the forehead, glared at him. Thanks for seeing that thing, holding the arm 
down, stunned: "Muscle, your hand?" 


Mu Qing is dull and speechless. Huacheng Road: "I suggest you honestly 
answer all the following questions: Why did Jun Wu summon you at the 
Shenwu Temple? What did he say to you? Why are you better than other 
priests, can you go back unscathed? Why is it uncharacteristically taking 
the initiative to come to Chongqing? Furnace Mountain is going to save 
people? What happened to this thing in your hand? Why did you bring us 
here?" 


If you are in a bad mood, take a step back and immediately say: "Wait! 
Don't attack first! Listen to me first!" 


Flower City Qatar: "Please. Say it." 
Wind channel: "Is it first to say that you are playing me?" 
After a pause, my feelings were bitten: "...1 am. But not what you think!" 


The wind was angry and thanked him: "Let him continue to say." 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 232: Exquisite 
and a little scared 4 


Mu Qing took a deep breath and admitted: "... indeed, the wind letter is 
that I am wounded. 


The wind is broken: "I know it is definitely you!" 


The feelings are grateful to him: "But that is because Xianjing is finished! 
At that time, all the priests were trying to escape, but he still stayed there 
and refused to let him go. He didn't listen, and stayed sooner or later. The 
fire was burning, I was going to stun him and throw it to you!" 


Thanks to the pity: "But you didn't hand him over to me, and the wind 
letter disappeared, but it appeared here." 


Admired: "Because there was a little accident in the middle." 
"What an accident?" 


Admire the feelings: "That is the fetus. It suddenly attacked from behind, 
biting the bite, not letting me bring him. I didn't have time to pull him up, 
Xianjing began to disintegrate, so..." 


Therefore, the wind letter followed the piece of land, and did not know 
where it was moved. 


If what is said to be true, that is to say, the feelings of love are originally 
intended to be a good thing, but accidentally smashed the scorpion, pitted 
a wind letter, very embarrassing. 


Thanks to pity: "Why didn't you say that at the time..." Feng Xin also said: 
"Do you really want me to be burned to death in Xianjing? Just throw me 
down and throw it there?" 


Mourning face is a stiff, thankful to say: "The fetal spirit has been lying on 
his chest, and then the female ghost gladioli has come, I expected she will 
wake up or remove the wind letter, not to watch him burned. dead." 


Thank you for your understanding. He took the initiative to save people, 
probably because of guilty conscience. After all, he lost his reputation. 
Because of his responsibility, he naturally has to work hard. No wonder he 
is uneasy on the way, I am afraid that the wind will not die... 


However, this set of rhetoric is hard to win. Fengxin madly grabbed the 
hair: "You have done this thing simply! I don't know if you are looking for 
someone?! You don't stun me, I might find it!" 


The feelings are calm and calm: "The fetus is white and has no phase, no 
white will not be against them. And they don't want to go with you. It is a 
waste of time to stay there. It is useless to shout a thousand times. It is 
better. After leaving Xianjing to save his life, I have the opportunity to 
find it again. Do you have to catch up with the dangerous moments to get a 
parent-child recognition? I just made the most favorable judgment in the 
circumstances." 


The wind letter is not as calm as he 1s: "It's a good fart! You can't say this 
in your family! Wait, so you mean, you wanted to save me and let me go?" 


Huacheng said: "No need to talk nonsense, answer my question: What did 
Junwu say to you?" 


I closed my mouth and hesitated a little. 

Huacheng stared at him again: "Are you taking orders from him now?" 
Immediately said: "There is no such thing!" 

Huacheng Road: "Please explain this curse." 


Mu has been arguing for so long, a bit dry, stubborn, dumb: "I said... you 
may not believe." 


Wind channel: "I just asked you that you refused to admit it to death, and 
now you admit it, of course you can't believe it." 


Mu Qing said: "Why don't I admit it? If I told you what happened just now, 
you will definitely not believe it! It will still be this attitude. Who will 
admit it? If you admit it, you can't admit it!" Moreover, the wind letter is 
nothing but fortunate, but it is quite shameful to say it back. With his 
temper, it is normal to not want to recognize it. Xie pity has listened 
patiently and said: "Let him finish it first." 


Mu Qing looked at the pity, half a sigh, only tough said: "This is... because 
he let me, against the highness of my temple, I, refuse, so..." 


When he got here, he was awkward and couldn’t say anything. Huacheng 
Road: "So, when he is angry, he will give you a curse?" 


Do not admire. 
Wind channel: "Nothing else?" 


There is no special expression on the face of Huacheng. He said: "By the 
heart, do you believe what you said?" 


The feelings seem to have been greatly humiliated and coldly said: "You 
love or believe it. I have misunderstood this matter, but I have not taken 
orders from anyone." 


Wind channel: "Make your heart... or tell the truth." 


Mu Qing saw his expression, and the finger bones creaked. "I am telling 
the truth! What do you want to hear? I surrendered to Jun Wu and turned 
against you? Is it true that you are such a person in your heart?" Is Your 
Royal Highness?!" 


He looked at the pity and his eyes widened. Xie pity stared at him for a 
long time, has been thinking about it, is about to open, Huacheng but 
holding his arm, stopped in front of him, greeted the gaze of the feelings, 


whispered: "You don't need to look at your temple, after all, you have 
precedent." 


Admired: "I didn't ask you! What precedent?" 


Huacheng smiled and said: "What precedent? The blessed land grabbed 
from His Royal Highness, can it be cultivated smoothly?" 


He smiled through the coldness, and his tone was even worse. When I was 
in love, my face was white and I couldn’t help but go back two steps. 
“You!...” 


He did not know how to do it, but he was most afraid of being poked out. 
Although the tone of Huacheng is laughter, it is invisible in the invisible. 


Mourning surprise, but also pity but also shocked. He was shocked, how 
did Huacheng know about this? 


Xie pity and good faith are not broken people, never love to talk about 
people right or wrong, or spread what. Although they had a big blow to 
them at the time, they never said it and complained to others. As for the 
blessing, Xie Li later did not want to mention this matter again, did not 
talk to people, I believe that the wind letter is the same. 


Those more than 30 priests will naturally not take the initiative to tell 

others who they have robbed of their spirituality. They are either tight- 
lipped or staggered. Therefore, thanking the pity, I did not listen to the 
outsiders passing this matter. 


In this case, how did Huacheng know it? 


Although he buried a lot of eyeliners in the heavens, it was really too early, 
more than 800 years ago, and most of the parties did not mention it. Can 
such old debts be found? 


Admiration: "How do you know? Who told you?" He looked at the wind 
and looked forward to thanking him. Huacheng sneered: "You don't have to 


look at your Highness, and your Highness never tells me these things. This 
is what you called on the top of the snow, forget it." 


Mourning face is whiter. Thanks for the slightest doubts, I can't help but 
feel a little shame. 


When the wind and the love are together, they will madly turn over the 
black accounts and madly reveal the old ones. They will inevitably put a 
pile of old debts tied with gunpowder and throw them to the other side. No 
wonder Huacheng was so angry at the time. However, he still faintly felt 
that there is still no place. 


Because of the pity and think of one thing - the red wolf fire burns Wenwu 
Temple. Huacheng became famous in the first battle, fighting for thirty- 
three priests, and burning all the temples in the world. 


Xie Pity has long since remembered how many priests he had fought for in 
his blessings. Even their names, appearances, and words have not been 
remembered. They only remember about thirty. 


So, in the end, is it more than thirty? 
Will it be the first 30 priests? 
If so, then, isn’t it true that Huacheng already knew about it? 


Half a sigh, the feelings are strong and strong: "That time 1s that time, this 
time is this! In short, I never thought about..." 


A few people are arguing, suddenly, thank you for flying out and shouting: 
"Be careful!" 


The love was too late to be stumbled by his foot, and he slammed two 
times. Two cold light smudged against him and nailed to the wall. The 
enthusiasm jumped up, and several shots of the chest were taken off, 
saying: "Are you deliberate?! First hand?" 


Thanks for your busyness: "Sorry, sorry, it is not intentional!" If it is 
intentional, most of the feelings have already drawn a humanoid pit on the 


wall. Everyone turned their heads and saw two swords on the wall. The 
blade was still shaking, and the wind shouted: "Who?!" 


Thanks to the pity: "No one. It is their own movement!" 


Dangdang, hehe. In all directions, the murderousness rose. The weapons 
hanging on the wall swayed, trembled madly, and the whole house was 
shaking in the sky! 


Thanks for your pity: "Go out!" 


Who knows, he rushed to the place where he was originally exporting, but 
the wind letter said: "What are you doing there? No way! Where is the 
door? This house should not have no door?! How do you get out?" 


Thanks to pity: "There was a door! But it is gone! What happened to these 
soldiers? Why did it suddenly kill the sky?" 


Huacheng's **** caught a long sword that flew to him. He didn't use any 
force. The sword was broken and broken. He said: "It’s too long for no one 


to use, lonely| , I feel that someone is coming in and wants to kill." 


The rest of the people subconsciously brushed their heads to see the 
feelings. Immediately said: "Not my business!" 


Huacheng Road: "But, you brought us in." 
Admiration: "I saw the fetal spirit only to guide the way!" 
Huacheng said: "Only you see it." 


The feelings were silent and clenched. Wind channel: "What should I do 
now? Can these weapons not be quiet?" 


Huacheng has not answered yet, and Xie Pity suddenly remembered that 
he had dealt with similar demons and ghosts before, and muttered: "Yes! 
But... let them kill." 


Wind channel: "But now this place can't go out, only the four of us are 
locked here, how to kill? Can you kill?" 


Xie pity is about to open, Huacheng suddenly said: "Three." 
Fengxin: "What three?" 
Huacheng Road: "Remedy. There are only three who are locked here." 


Thanks for turning his head. Sure enough, the weapon in the library, the 
original fourth person, admiration, he suddenly disappeared! 


It’s true! The place where the original admiration stood was already empty. 
The wind is stunned: "How come?! He just stood here!" 


Huacheng is not surprised. After all, he has already encountered this kind 
of thing. He said: "This is a white place. Everything obeys his order, 
unscrupulous, and whoever wants to get rid of whoever gets away." 


If the original letter is an eight-point letter, it is only a matter of suspicion, 
and now it is only a matter of words. Now, I don’t know what to say. For a 
long while, he said: "His Royal Highness, love, he, it will not really...?" 


Cheering immediately said: "Don't say this first. These weapons are going 
to be rioted. Let's find ways to make them quiet, or they will be smashed 
into meat sauce!" He said, he took out the heart on his back. Huacheng 
held down his hand. 


Thanks for a pity, looked up and saw that Huacheng stared at him, and 
there was a faint **** spread in one of his eyes. 


He sighed: "Brother, what do you want to do with the sword?" 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 233: Baizhang 
Gaoya Qianyan Waterfall 


Thank you for your pity, "I didn't want to do anything?" 
Huacheng Road: "What do you do with the sword?" 
Thank you, "I am... self-defense?" 


Huacheng’s face was gloomy and terrible, and he grabbed it even tighter. 
“How do you want to defend yourself? Put the sword down!” 


This is the first time Huacheng has used this kind of expression and tone 
to speak to pity, and the whole person has been stunned. Fengxin police 
shouted: "Why do you let him put the sword down? You put him down 
first!" 


A tomahawk flew in the face, thanking the eye and stalking the sword and 
flying it, saying: "How to defend yourself... just guard it!" 


The look and tone of Huacheng was slightly relieved, but he still did not 
let him go. "You don't have to defend yourself, just stand behind me. Put 
the sword down." 


Fengxin kicked his bow from the ground, picked up his hands and held it, 
raised his bow as a sword, and flew a meteor hammer. He even more 
doubted: "What do you want to do with him? You really are yourself? Your 
Highness, Blood Does the psychic password of Yu Yanhua know that you 
have anyone else knowing it? Isn’t there only one person who knows his 
password?” 


Upon his reminder, thankfulness suddenly remembered that the psychic 
password of Huacheng was not only known to them. There is also a third 
person heard. 


Junwu! 


In Xianle Palace, he let Xie pity in front of his face and the flower city, it 
is clear and heard! 


However, thank you still feel that this must be Huacheng himself is right, 
just... he seems to suddenly think of a very bad thing, this attitude. 


Thinking for a moment, thanking the pity: "Good." Put away the heart. 
The next moment, the silver light flashed, the scimitar came out! 


When the embarrassment came out, the entire arsenal of the weapons was 
filled with silver and sparks, and the sound of the broken stone was 
endless. Xie pity and Feng Xin were surrounded by the smoldering cold 
light and murderous in the middle, motionless. After ten sounds, 
Huacheng turned and the scimitar returned to the sheath. The praying eyes 
were moved from him to the ground. 


I saw the original hundreds of weapons, all of which were smashed into 
glutinous rice by the errands... 


Thanks to pity on the ground, picking up the pieces of two swords, a little 
pity in my heart: "These are rare swords..." 


At this time, the wind channel: "His Royal Highness, the door, seems to 
have a door!" 


Thanks for letting go of the debris, stood up and said: "It turns out that it is 
necessary to solve these weapons before going out." 


Originally, it was the blood to kill the students to open the door, but the 
flower city was directly opened with violence. Just thinking of it, 
Huacheng pulled him out. Look at his murderous, wind channel: "What are 
you going to do next?" 


Thanks to the pity: "Of course, I am going to find a national teacher and a 
love." 


Huacheng calmly said: "If you really trust in Junwu, you must first ask for 
his dog life." 


The three men went out of the arsenal, and after a while, thanked and 
hesitated for a moment, still asked: "Sanlang, did you think that I would 
stab myself with a sword?" 


Huacheng did not answer, his face was still very bad. Thanks, "I won't." 
Huacheng looked at him and said, "Is it?" 
Xie Li was seen by him in his heart. 


To be honest, if it is in the past, it will be solved in a crisis. But now, it will 
never happen again. 


Thanks for your pity: "Yes! I promised you. Besides, so many swords and 
swords, every one of me, I am not going to be mashed up? Hahahaha..." He 
laughed here, he could not laugh. It is. 


Because, after he said the word" ", Huacheng stared at him. That kind of 
gratitude can't be described, and he can't say a word. 


After a short while, Huacheng suddenly reached out and forced him into 
his arms. 


Fengxin walked in the end and was shocked: "I am fucking? I am still 
there?" 


Thanks for your pity, patted the back of Huacheng and said, "What is it?" 
Huacheng whispered: "Your Highness, don't laugh like this." 
He held his thanks and said: "Not funny, really... not funny at all." 


I remembered that before I smashed my body on the ground, the face of 
Huacheng was so bad. I regretted my heart and said, "I am sorry, I will 


never make such a joke with you. I just wanted you not to worry. I didn't 
expect it." The opposite effect." 


The wind letter seems to be scared by this atmosphere, and for a while, 
said: "I... don't think so? Since he 1s so serious..." 


Huacheng finally let go of the pity, Shen Sheng said: "Go." 


Without the national teacher who led the way, the three had no choice but 
to continue into the palace. 


But not long after, the pity will be aware of the strangeness in the air. 
He said: "Do you think... it seems to be getting hotter?" 


When their group just entered the underground palace, it was cool and 
cool. But after a while, the air around it seemed to suddenly expand and it 
was a lot hot. The wind letter seems to have the same feeling, but he 
turned his head and squinted, raising his finger: "His Royal Highness, look 
behind! It seems to have light." 


As he said, there is light in the rear and it 1s slowly approaching. 


There is an unknown source of light in the dark underground. This 
situation is quite strange. Is there anyone coming? 


When the light came out, the pity finally found that the air in the 
underground had become hot, not his illusion. The suffocating sweltering 
heat is brought about by this light. 


The **** flow of the red gold, the tumbling air bubbles, climbed down to 
the three people on the slope. 


The magma outside, flowing down the river into the underground palace! 


Thanks for being upright, and suddenly there was someone flying fast 
behind. His backhand was a glimpse of it and said: "Wait a minute! Ask a 
way!" 


The man shunned the danger, his body shape, and everyone turned around 
and saw his face through the fire brought by the fire from not far away. 
Fengxin said: "Muscle! Your kid, stop!" 


Where will the feelings stand, do not say anything, run the legs. The three 
were about to chase, and the ground trembled fiercely. 


The red gold magma suddenly came to the forefront, and it passed the 
river channel in the imperial city. The climb speed rose and rushed to face 
a few people! 


The three people are about to be forced to nowhere, but Xie pity has 
encountered this problem before coming in, but now it is only slightly 
more difficult. He said: "The wind letter, there are many hollow monsters 
in the magma, they can float up, step on them and don't sink!" 


After that, I ordered a hollow person who struggled to swipe his arm in the 
swell of the fire and jumped up! 


As soon as you have settled down, thank you for your happiness. These 
hollow people seem to be extraordinarily larger. When he stepped on it, he 
was only slightly sinking, but he could still float on the surface of the fire. 
As long as they are not blaming, it can be a canoe! 


Fengxin also saw a leaping, Yang bow to the hollow humanity: "Have a 
good swim, don't sink!" The hollow man was threatened by his weapon, 
and he did not dare to neglect and work harder. Huacheng just held his arm 
and looked down at his foot. The hollow man wouldn’t dare to be a demon, 
and the horsepower was fully open and the fastest. Thanks for the pity, the 
hands are in ten, and sincerely discuss with the hollow person: "Take me a 
ride, trouble me for a ride! Go back and burn you incense! You don't want 
to be fragrant? What do you want to say casually!" Extremely dissatisfied, 
from time to time waving his arm and trying to drive him down, the 
partiality of thanks to the cowhide sugar, even if it rolls, can not afford to 
lose. Needless to say, the one that is the most difficult to deal with is 
picked up by Xie Pity! 


The three monsters flow down the river, as if surfing in the wind, the more 
down | the greater the slope, the faster the speed, but also avoid the 
obstacles protruding from the current flow, all the way is thrilling. After a 
while, I finally caught up with the love in front, the wind channel: "Music! 
What are you running!" 


At the foot of the admiration, he also stepped on a hollow man as a 
floating board. He turned back and said, "Don't you wait for you to besiege 
me?" 


There is no arrow in the wind in his hand. He can only scream in the air. 
He said: "Do not besiege! Let me first explain how you suddenly 
disappeared from the weapons library!" 


Looking back, sneer: "You guys..." 


The voice did not fall, thank you for seeing the scene in front, the 
binocular pupil shrinks sharply and shouted: "You are ahead!!" 


When the feelings turned back, it was discovered that the road ahead was 
abruptly stopped. 


There should have been a subterranean fault here, and the gap was 
extremely large, at least a hundred feet high, like a huge cliff. 


He didn't expect that this kind of terrain would appear suddenly and 
suddenly, and the faster the magma flowed down the next time, when he 
reacted, he couldn't catch it and flew out! 


The figure of admiration and the hollow man under his feet disappeared 
instantly, and the three people on this side will soon rush to the edge of the 
cliff with an unstoppable speed! 


At the beginning of the millennium, if the evil flies backwards, a few 
words are wrapped around the corner of a palace in the distance, and a 
knot is made. Xie pity grabs the evil, grabs the flower city in the other 
hand, and throws the other end of the evil spirit into the wind, saying: 
"Catch!" 


With the shackles as a system, the three are only able to settle. At this 
time, they are only two feet away from the "cliff", and they have to fall 
back later. It can be described as a cliff. Just above, there is still a rolling 
magma rushing down, thank you again: "Receive!" 


If the evil quickly shortened, take the three to the palace. After a short 
time, the three jumped to the top of the palace. The palace 1s large, so the 
roof is fairly spacious, stone-based, not afraid of magma scouring, and 
here, you can breathe a sigh of relief. 


The horror was a little bit fixed, and Feng Xin looked at the empty "cliff" 
and stunned for a while, incredulously saying: "Make love... fell off?" 


Xie pity firmly settled the heart of the mad mad, panted, wiped the sweat 
on his forehead, said: "No!" 


Standing on the far side of the roof of the palace, you can see that there is 
a long knife in the rock on the edge of the cliff. 


And a pair of hands 1s firmly grasping the long handle of the long knife. 
Under the hands, it was a face that tried to bite his teeth and bloody. 


At this moment, the feelings are in such a terrible position parallel to the 
magma falling down the waterfall. 


The fireball splashed in front of him, and it was really "burning the 
eyebrows". If he had covered a layer of protective body light, he would 
block most of the burning gas, and he would have been burnt beyond 
recognition and full of fire. 


But this body of spirit can not last for a long time, if his whole person falls 
into the magma pool, it is still qi! 


This scene seems to be shocking, the wind channel: "What should I do?! 
Your Highness, can your whiteness be enough for him?" 


Xie Li has already tried it, took back the evil, took the flame on it, and 
said: "No! This distance is too far! If the evil is in the air, it will catch 


fire!" 


The clothing of the adoration also ignited a lot of small flames, and the 
handle was burnt hot, but he still clung to death, did not dare to let go, did 
not dare to look down. 


One hand, the following is the flames of the pool waiting for him, there 
are countless undead hunger | thirsty screams quietly echoing, as if calling 
for people hanging above, dying, and rushing to accompany them. 


Muss loves to seize the handle, the pale forehead is sweating, seeing the 
three people in the distance, moving their lips, seems to want to call for 
help. However, his character is hard to shout out the words of "saving 
lives" and "save me." 


Come again, no matter whether Huacheng is at ease or not, I am afraid that 
it will not save him. It is hard to say that the wind letter is difficult. The 
only thing left that hopes to save him, has the ability to save him, and can 
influence the other two people is to pity. 


In the end, he struggled to earn a fortune, and his forehead was slightly 
daring. He shouted and thanked him: "His Royal Highness!" 


Xie Li is rapidly observing the surroundings and smelling him. I felt 
awkward for a while, and I sighed with a sigh of relief, shouting in a red 
face: "...believe me! Your Highness, do you know that I am not lying? Do 
you know that I will not really harm you?!" 


He asked for politeness with hope, as if he had hugged the last life-saving 
straw, but he reminded him of another picture. 


Ina | |time, many years ago, he also asked questions with hope. 
"Do you know that I am not lying?" 


How did the truth affect him at that time? 


These things have not been thought of for hundreds of years, but the 
question of admiration has suddenly turned them out from the corners that 
have been sealed for a long time. 


Uncontrollable, countless pictures and sounds flashed, thank you for 
discovering that these memories are so clear, he never forgot! 


Mu Qing did not wait for his answer. In the silence of Xie Pity, it seems 
that he slowly remembered the same scene, and his face gradually 
changed. It seems that he also understands that the sentence was wrong, 
and inadvertently reminded that it should not be reminded of pity at this 
moment. 


At this time, Huacheng whispered after thanking him: "Brother, I want to 
remind you a few things before you make a decision." 


Thank you for your return, and said: "What?" 


Huacheng Road: "First, unless the magma stops, you will risk your life if 
you save him." 


However, who knows when these magma will stop flowing? The handle 
has been burned red, and the hands of the lover can't hold for a long time. 
How could it be that time? 


Thank you for your silence. Huacheng said again: "Second, if the feelings 
have already been taken over by Junwu, Junwu must have a way to remove 
him from here. But you will be in danger. And this possibility is very big. 
You think about him. The move along the way." 


They stunned the wind, led them into the arsenal, refused to admit that 
they were stunned, and they took a bite. They suddenly disappeared after 
the turmoil in the arsenal, and the time was just right, and they were led 
here. 


Now, is he deliberately guiding the pity and walking towards the road? 2k 
novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 234: Baizhang 
Gaoya Qianyan Waterfall 2 


Xie Lian’s silence was a little longer. The long handle was burnt red, and 
the scream was screaming. One hand was released, and the other hand was 
hung for a while. I dared not support it and grabbed it. But his hands and 
palms are already smoking white smoke, although the distance is far apart, 
several people here seem to smell the smell of burnt meat. 


Huacheng released a silver butterfly, and the silver butterfly fluttered its 
wings and flew a few feet. Before it reached one-third of the distance from 
the empathy, it turned into a silver vapor and disappeared into the air. 


Thanks for knowing that he is showing himself that the dead butterfly is 
also helpless, and that it is not worth fighting for. 


Mu Qing also saw the process of the disappearance of the silver butterfly, 
and the expression gradually became desperate. 


He understood. Now, one is that no one has the ability to save him. Second, 
no one believes him. Under the premise of his thunderous thunder, he will 
not risk his life to pull him. 


However, although desperate, but still not reconciled, still reluctant to give 
up, admire the bite, and said: "You don't believe me, I will never fall like 
this!" 


Said, the hand is more forceful, it seems to want to spin a turn, based on 
the handle. Who knows, his body has just risen a few inches, and suddenly 
sinks! 


Looking down, the eyes reflected countless grievances that were melted 
into blood red. The twisted face and limbs were attached to his legs and he 
was pulling him down! 


These grievances were originally dissolved in the flowing magma, and 
suddenly emerged, one by one hanging under his lower body, heavy and 
extremely hot, such as pouring oil on the fire, adding to the snow, the 
feelings to be crazy: "Roll!!! ” 


In the past few hundred years, he has not been on the verge of death. But it 
was because of the serious injury, the death of the magma, the death of the 
law is a hundred times more horrible than the death of a wounded, 
thinking of him like a lifeless butterfly, the generalization of a smoke, no 
trace, Not acceptable at all. 


Finally, the hand of admiration reached the limit, and the ten fingers were 
slightly loose, and they could no longer catch it. 


The knife is empty - he fell! 


A figure crashed toward the flaming pool underneath the raging fire: "Ah, 
ah, ah!" 


However, although he was so fierce, after his body fell for a while, he 
suddenly slammed in the air and hung in the air! 


The grief was undecided, and the scalp was numb, but the instinctive 
reaction was still there, and it quickly touched the body. It turned out that a 
white scorpion entangled his waist. 


Nature is evil. However, the palace where Xie pity lived was not close to 
the cliff where he fell. If the evil had not been explored before, how could 
he pull him after he fell for a while? 


Looking up and looking up, I was surprised to find that Xie Pity was not 
on the roof of the palace - he was above his head. 


Before the emperor, the long knife was nailed into the rock, and the handle 
was held for a while. And thank you, now half a squat on the handle! 


Thanks to pity, he quickly sneaked away, and while looking at the 
following, watching him safe and sound, he breathed a sigh of relief and 


said: "Fortunately, okay, come." 
Mourningly muttered: "... too, Prince Edward?" 


The moment was too irritating, and it was a bit confusing to stimulate his 
mind. Such a long distance, the middle of the road is rolling magma, there 
is no other foothold, thank you can only jump to half, how did he come 
over? 


In the distance, the voice of the wind letter came: "His Royal Highness! 
You are all right!" 


Admiring the sound of the sound, on the roof of the palace, now only 
stands the flower city and the wind letter two people. Huacheng picked up 
his arms and stared at it. It seemed to confirm the safety of thanking him. 
He didn't care about anything else. And the palace and the center of his 
two points and one line at the point of the cliff, a dark sword, standing in 
the rushing red magma. 


Heart! 
That's it! My feelings finally understood how thank you for coming. 


Thanks to the bounce ability of blessing, it is indeed only possible to jump 
up to half of the distance. It is impossible to jump directly from the safe 
palace roof to the cliff to save him. Therefore, Xie pity first throws the 
heart out, puts the sword in the stream of inflammation, as a foothold, and 
then takes the heart as the starting point, jumps to his knife, throws out the 
evil spirits when the millennial Pull him. 


Thanks to the pity: "I have been thinking about ways. There is really 
nothing to use here, so it took some time. You are too anxious, don't mess 
around, it's faster to get out of the chaos." 


Mu Qing thought that the silence of thankfulness was hesitant to save him, 
but he was thinking about how to save in the end, and he was as critical as 
the situation, and he could calmly think. 


The sweat on his forehead is more detailed. 


As soon as he looked up, thanked him for giving him a hand and smiled 
and said: "In short, although it is a little late, isn't it too late?" 


I don’t know if I’ve been holding the handle for too long, and I feel that 
my arm is so heavy that I can’t lift it. Thanks and pity, he stretched his 
hand and said: "Get up." 


The feelings finally caught his hand. 


His whole arm was trembling slightly, thanking him for his strength and 
pulling him up, and they stood together on the handle of the long knife. 
Thanks for turning around, waving to the roof, said: "Sanlang, success!" 


Huacheng Road: "Okay, brother, come back now, immediately!" 


Thanks for your pity: "Okay, come back soon!" Turned around and asked 
for affection. "Can you still jump? If you can't, I will take you?" 


Mourning lips moved, said: "I..." 


Thanks for observing his look, decisively said: "I will take you." Then he 
grabbed his back. In the past, the feelings of the situation will secretly turn 
a blind eye to let him not do so, do not respect people, but now, he can not 
say anything. 


Xie pity is about to jump, who knows, at this time, the two suddenly felt at 
the same time, the foot is awkward. 


It’s not dead, the long knife that is nailed into the rock, it’s not loose, it’s 
not loose at night, but it’s loose at this time! 


The flower city has changed dramatically, saying: "Brother!" 


This time, it was two figures, and they all fell to the red pool. When this 
kind of fire burns the fart | shares, Xie pity can still think quickly, said: 


"Nothing!" Flip a few turns in the air, grab the long knife in the air, use 
both hands, and once again into the rock! 


The sound of" ", the fireball splashed and smashed to the extreme. In 
addition to the psychic aura of the body, these fire particles seem to be 
broken gold sand, but if this layer of body care disappears, a grain can 
burn people through a hole! 


If the evil will bring up the feelings, thank you very seriously to him: 
"This knife can't bear the weight of the two big men for too long, so it 
won't work. We can only stay one person in the two." 

The feelings turned back slightly and said: "You mean..." 

Thanks for your pity: "You don't want to stay." 


" 999" 


The feelings of the two sisters shriveled slightly, but they did not speak. 
Thanks to pity, he grabbed him and threw it up and shouted: "Look at it!" 


Mu Qing was thrown over the cliff by him, and found himself flying to the 
heart of the heart, set the mind, volley, and settled on the handle of the 
heart. 


When he got here, he realized why he had to throw him up first. 


Because of this distance, perhaps thank you can skip directly from the 
handle that has moved down a few feet. However, he can't. 


This distance is too far for him. He borrowed the power of thankfulness 
and pity to get it up! 


Feng Xin pinched a cold sweat and said: "Fortunately, your Highness, you 
are quick!" 


Huacheng is condensed and looks at the bottom: "Brother! If you don't 
come back, I will go straight to find you!" 


He said with a warning tone, thanked and said: "I am coming up! The 
situation is okay, not difficult to deal with, I can jump alone, you don't 
come down." 


The look of the flower city eased a few points, but still stared at it. 
Fengxin looked at him and couldn’t help but say: "...very unexpected." 


Huacheng did not look back, no curious to say: "What." 


Fengxin grasped the hair and said: "I thought that you have a great opinion 
on the feelings of love, and you will feel that he is not worth saving. He 
will oppose his highness to save him and not let him go." 


Huacheng took a look at him and said: "It’s half-right and half right." 
"what?" 


Huacheng Road: "The sentence in front of you is correct. I really think that 
he is not worth saving. He doesn't care about me." 


Look at him with a look of indifferent look, Feng Xin shame: "You are too 
direct!" 


And think that this person is also so attitude to himself, it is even more 
shameful! 


Huacheng laughed and paused, and said: "But how to choose your 
Highness, only he can decide, I will never object." 


Fengxin has never heard this kind of thing. Men don’t have women. Men 
don’t even have men. They just think that if they give thanks, they must be 
sure. They don’t know what to show. They just say: “... ...ah. That's it." 


Huacheng turned his head and stared at the smoldering fire to observe and 
think about the countermeasures. He smiled and said: "And, I knew he 
would do that." 


Over there, thank you: "Muscle, you are going to the roof, don't run, what 
can we Say later?" 


This is the reaction to the feelings. If he does not leave his heart, thank 
you for the next step. I forced myself to think calmly and prepare to go 
back to the roof. Unexpectedly, he just got up, and thanked him with a 
pity: "Who?!" 


Xie Li stood on the knife and was silently accumulating. Suddenly, the 
waterfall behind him was separated, and a hand was stretched out in the 
waterfall, and he was caught. 


The thing came out of the waterfall, but the hands were cold and terrible. 
Thanks for the cold, I heard the flower city on the top: "His Royal?!" 


The hands clasped with respect and pity, and took him down from the 
knife. Xie pity looked blank, and the top few people saw what was caught 
from behind. 


The man was dressed in white, wearing a mask that was half-smiling and 
half-smiling on his face. 


White no phase! 


If the evil spirits feel dangerous, they will fly indiscriminately, go up, and 
pass the feelings of love. The empathy subconsciously seized it, but the 
power from the other end of the day was too big, but instead of holding it, 
he also smashed him down. 


Thanks to the rapid fall of the flying Mars, I heard the thing in his ear and 
smiled: "Ha ha ha ha ha ha ... naive! Too naively Xianle! Do you think it is 
so easy to have the best of both worlds?" 


Below is the burning heat of the monks, but the heart is creepy. In the two 
heavens of ice and fire, Xie pity looked up, and the fire and light above the 
dome were actually hidden. If there is a red shadow, it 1s approaching. 


Huacheng also jumped! 


Below this, but the magma pool! 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 235: Through 
the sky, the three silly reunion 


The author has something to say: Happy Chinese New Year! New Year's 
Eve on the 15th, more 6k, please have a holiday, and the next one is on 
February 16th, 20:00-21! 


I don’t know if it’s the fear of extinction, or the hot magma, and the whole 
person is drowned. 


For a long time, he only woke up. 


When I woke up, I found myself lying on the hard ground, and I fell asleep 
and looked at him. 


Thanks for the faint redness in front of his eyes, he sat up and said: 
"Sanlang!" 


Who knows, when he sat up, he turned back to God and said: "Don't 
move!" 


Thanks to the subconscious, the palm of the hand wants to support the 
ground, but it is empty, and the center of gravity is biased. The whole 
person almost turns down. Slightly surprised, it was discovered that he 
was not lying on the ground at all. 


He is lying on a bridge! 


This is a huge underground cave. The dome is deep into the vast night sky. 
In the cave, there is a floating bridge. 


The bridge is incomplete, dark and sultry, like wood-like stone, as if it has 
experienced thousands of rains and winds, dust and fire. Without column 
support, self-suspending air, extending both ends forward and backward, I 
don't know where it is from, where to go, not to see the end, can't 


distinguish the direction. Some places are as wide as three feet, and some 
places are narrow enough to accommodate one person. 


Under the Baiqiao of the Remnant Bridge, it is a red-hot magma pool that 
has been tumbling, like a **** red soup. 


Through the bridge? 


These three words emerged in the first time in the mind. Two thousand 
years ago, Prince Wu Yong built a bridge through the sky to avoid the 
great disaster. Will this bridge be its remains? 


He remembers that he was dragged down by nothing, now how is it on this 
bridge? 


Thanks for getting up and saying, "Sanlang?" 
Still feeling aside, he said, "No need to shout, he is not." 


Xie pity turned to him and said: "How come we got here? Is there a 
thousand miles in the middle?" 


Admiration: "Probably. I obviously fell off the magma pool, but in midair, 
it was transmitted here." 


Poor and confident, all three people have fallen, and he stayed on top of it, 
and most of them have to catch the streets. However, the most important 
thing is to find the flower city first. I don't know where he was moved. 


Thanks to the heart and the long knife that was thrown aside, smashed up 
and walked toward the affection. Mu Qing saw him carrying his sword and 
sinking his face. I didn't know what he was going to do, and his look 
suddenly became tense. 


Xie pity handed his knife to him, and extended a hand to him, saying: "Are 
you okay? Just stand up, we have to hurry." 


He looked at the hand that he extended to himself, silent for a long time, 
shook his head and said: "I can't go. I have been injured in both hands and 


feet." 


Thank you for watching me for a moment, and sure enough, both hands 
and hands are red and a large piece, and there are burns on the legs. I am 
afraid that I can only walk slowly. Thinking for a moment, he said: "I will 
help you." 


He pulled up his affection and put his arms on his shoulders, so he walked. 
After a few steps, suddenly, admire: "Why?" 


Thanks for looking at the surrounding environment, he said: "Why?" 


Admire: "I thought you would doubt me more if I found out that I was 
fine." 


Thanks for your pity: "Oh, no." 

"why?" 

"Because I know." 

"what do you know?" 

Thanks, "I know you are not lying." 

What is the expression on the face of the feelings, it 1s really hard to say. 


Thank you for your pity: "Don't you let me believe in you? I believe in 
you. Just like this." 


"How do you say..." Thanks, "I have known you for many years. I can still 


be sure of this. You are not such a person. I have not said it before, you 
may go to someone else's cup." Spit, but 1f you poison, you won't do it." 


Listening to the previous sentence, the feelings seem to be slightly 
moving, and I heard that the half of the face is dark, and said: "This 
metaphor is even, forget it, don't mention it again. I will not do this spit, 
too. Nothing!" 


Xie pity waved his hand and said: "Don't care about this detail. And, if it's 
the case, I am unlucky enough to see you wrong, you can't beat me and 
Saburo, and you will kill you with a backhand." , can not constitute a 
threat hahaha..." 


"...""Mud muttered, "You are deliberate, you must be trying hard to mad at 
mec: 


"Cough, joking, in short." Xie pity did not smile, grabbed his arm and 
looked forward, said, "If you really refused to be evil, you will be cursed 
by Jun Wu, then I can not Let you pay a bad price for doing this." 


He calmly said: "Because you are doing right." 


He loved him for a long time, and finally, gnash his teeth and said: "Thank 
you, this person is really..." 


Thanks for the moment: "Free, how do you want to evaluate me? I don't 
know yet. You have to rely on me to help you now, don't say anything that 
makes me want to drop you into the magma pool." 


Admire the feelings: "Know that I want to say you, you still save me." 


Thanks to each other: "I have each other. I will save you, just follow your 
own principles. Besides, although you are very subtle in all aspects, I used 
to want to kill you for a while, but I didn't know it at the time. Cheng, after 
so long, I can't afford to be interested. But if you are subtle and want to hit 
you again, you will not sin, you can save and of course save." 


Mu sighed and sneered a few times, silently, and said: "His Royal 
Highness, actually I..." 


At this time, both of them were sinking at the same time, and both of them 
changed color. 


The feelings of love and the injury are not reflected in the body, but 
fortunately, the pity 1s still fast, the bottom of the foot, a glimpse of the 
front, fluttering to the front of the three feet. Looking back, the bridge that 
they used to set foot, actually broke and fell straight down! 


boom! 


A dark bridge fell into the scarlet **** pool, and the grievances who 
waited for a long time in the pool quickly extended a few hundred hands, 
rushing to sneak up, as if to borrow it from the sea of bitterness. But they 
are too many, and the bridge can't afford them, and they quickly sink. The 
two of them were frightened and looked at each other. Thanks to pity: "It 
seems that this bridge is not very strong!" 


Mu Qing opened his mouth, probably want to say back to forget, the place 
where they were lying is still wide, should not fall down, but that section 
collapsed, no way, can not go back, the two can only go Before. And the 
bridge deck in front, suddenly wide and narrow, as if all over the trap, the 
crisis, I do not know where to step on it will fall! 


Xie pity does not say anything, one will throw the feelings on the back, 
said: "Can not stay in the same place for too long, or maybe it will 
collapse, hurry, I want to pass quickly!" 


Say it quickly, thank you for the leap. The more forward, the narrower the 
bridge 1s suffocating, the widest point is only slightly better than a door, 
and the narrowest point, but one waist wide! 


But in this dangerous situation, Xie pity passed over, and the lines did not 
move. His feet were always on the bridge deck, and they were like a 
swallow, squirting water, and picking it up. If there are other martial arts 
here, I am afraid that all of them will be shocked by this kind of control to 
the horrible pace. Because, no second martial **** can do it, this is the 
exquisite skill that can only be forged by those who can't rely on mana and 
day after day to refine their strength! 


Suddenly, a pillar of fire rose up in the sky and stopped in front of the pity. 
If he didn't react very fast and was in a timely manner, he was afraid to 
rush into the fire and roast. The two looked down. I don't know when, the 
grievances of thousands and lava are gathered underneath, screaming and 
laughing, and reaching out to them, the pillar of fire is the joint effort of 
them. Both of them have a faint pain in their ears, and they admire: "What 
are they calling?" 


Thankful and muttered: "... ‘Go down, join us, rotten here!’” 


I am looking forward to him: "Do you understand? They should say 
Wuyong." 


Xie pity nodded: "Well, these are the Uighurs who fell into the magma and 
died after the bridge collapsed. Be careful not to be entangled in them, 
they will drag everything they see into the magma. That really is The 
crucifixion of the bridge!" 


Admire the feelings: "They can get rid of people by dragging them down?" 


Thanks to pity: "No. You can't get rid of others. These grievances can 
never be undone, but they like to see others like them." 


It is because of this that they will never be able to escape, and will always 
suffer in this **** pool. Mooded and wondered: "How do you know so 
much?" 


Thanks: "I don't know, but it should be... He told me." 
It's like screaming memories of implanting a corpse rat. 


Those lava grievances seem to be very dissatisfied. They haven't fallen 
yet, sneaking, gathering together to learn about Soso, holding hands and 
launching new attacks. Thanks to pity and ran, the fire column will arrive 
in an instant, and the bridge that was originally pitted is even more 
incomplete. 


Can't just beat and not fight back, thank you for trying to slam down, but 
he has no mana left, not far away. The mana is more abundant than him, 
and he is farther away than him, but he 1s still a little worse. On several 
occasions, the fire pillars almost burned to their heels. The group of 
grievances flocked in hordes, and the energy was great. Hahaha, pointing 
and excited, as if watching the escape performance, they couldn’t help but 
succumb to it. , hate his bones creaking! 


Half a sigh, the feelings of gasping on the back of the pity and a few teeth, 
as if to make a difficult determination, dumb voice: "Forget it, Your Royal 
Highness... Thank you for letting me down!" 


Thanks and pity, he flew and said: "What are you talking about? You are so 
afraid of death, you are not the one who can say such words!" 


Mu Qing’s forehead bursts into blue veins and said: “I’m so embarrassed 
that I’m afraid of death. The left and the right are dead... I haven’t changed 
my mind and regret it, let me put it down.” 


Thanks to pity: "You don't want to make trouble, don't talk, I will be 
distracted. The most important thing now is to find the end of the bridge." 


Admire the feelings: "Who is going to make trouble with you? If the 
bridge 1s really a bridge, the ghost knows how long you have to run. I will 
knock them down sooner or later. Let me down, let me kill this insidious 
shard, go on your own!" ” 


He said, he glanced at his shoulder and flew up and fell behind him. 
Thanks for turning back and taking a step toward him, he said: "Don't 
come here, the bridge is narrow here, you have to fall over two people!" 


Thank you for your patience. Mu Jing snorted and said: "You are right, we 
are each other, you see me subtle, I see you, it 1s also very subtle." 


He looked directly at the pity and said: "This time, I will just say it. I have 
a lot of ideas for you." 


Thanks to pity: "Oh... this... | actually knew it." 


The feelings are cold and cold: "Yes, then you know, I often feel that you 
are just by birth, because you are the Prince Edward, you are still lucky, 
but your ability is not much stronger than me." 


"I still think that you may like to do good things for others, and then enjoy 
the praise and tout, even if you help me for this reason, because I am a 
perfect object that can show you mercy and goodwill. To be honest, these 
Some of the ideas I haven’t changed so far. I’11 probably never change. I'll 
hold it down for a while, and it will turn up again after a while.” 


Xie Li does not know what to do with the shame: "This kind of words don't 
have to be so detailed in front of me!" 


Who knows, the next sentence, admiration: "But more often, I am still 
quite... admire you." 


Thank you for your pity. 


The feelings are **** the scalp, as if someone is holding his neck and 
forcing him to talk. He 1s bluntly: "It is normal. You... indeed... very 
powerful. People... also... better than... I am. , I... I really want to... and you 
become friends, friends, friends." 


I have never thought of it, and one day I can hear this from my mouth. 
Although it is ruthless, unwilling, and hard, it is so straightforward and 
honest, so human-like! 


His eyes could not help but grow up: "You..." 


The feelings finally squeezed out a few words from the teeth, and spit out 
a sigh of relief. "When the music is going to kill the country, whether it is 
right or wrong, no matter how difficult I am, I always owe you an apology. 


Thanks for the card, said: "...the old things are old, forget it. Compared to 
this, let's go first!" 


Mu Qing Yang said: "He told me that if I have doubts, even 1f you know 
that I have not done it, you will not push the boat to save me. Because you 
hate me, you will not believe me." 


"he"? Thank you for knowing who this is. Mu Qing said: "Although I did 
not promise to help him, but he said, I also thought about it. I always 
thought that you would hate me in my heart to despise me, so I, always... 
Anyway, you didn't really think so, very good. ” 


Another fire column rose into the sky, thanking the pity to step back and 
avoid a few steps away from the feelings. And the admiration of the anger 
rushed up, leaning over and slamming a palm on the bridge. Thank you for 
your contraction: "What are you doing?!" 


Not surprisingly, the bridge collapsed and fell down with admiration. Mu 
Qing rushed in the air and shouted: "Help you clear these chop!" 


Broken bridge into the pool, provoked high waves, the group of lava 
grievances were originally happy to prepare to drag him into the water, 
and expected a bombardment sweep, was broken up a large piece, horrified 
ghosts, admiration In the middle of the broken bridge, Zhou Lingling 
shines to the most blazing, sneer: "You are in this group of gutters, it is 
very happy to put a smoldering fire? Is it coming? I don't want to run!" 


Now, he can finally hit the lava grievances! 


Admiring the red palms, screaming the grievances, killing a happy, the 
grievances who played the original watching the screams spread out and 
swam to the Quartet. His sleeves and plackets all started to fire, thank you 
for the mercy on the top: "Music?! How high can you jump?" 


Enthusiastically said: "How do you have so much nonsense, haven't gone 
yet!" 


Xie pity argued: "This is not my problem. You have never said a few 
words in your life, and then you fall down. How does this make people 
go?" 


Enthusiasm and furious: "What is 1t easy to say a few words..." The voice 
did not fall, and the broken bridge at his feet sank a few points. Both faces 
are changed. 


This time, it is really necessary to be buried in the bottom of the magma 
pool, and become a steam! 


Mu Qing was only full of anger, but now his face is pale, lifting his palm 
and closing his eyes. He seems to want to crush his own celestial cover 
before he is burned, and he will die. Thank you for your help: "Wait, wait, 
don't be impulsive! I, I, I, I, I have a way!" 


The feelings opened again: "What is the solution?" 


If the evil can not find the bottom, but can find half, thank you for letting 
it go down, said: "You use all your strength to jump! Pick it up and grab it! 
I pull you up." 


Mourning face is whiter: "If I jump, do I still have to find a way?!" And I 
am ready to take the courage to kill myself, thank you: "Wait, wait! Really 
wait!!!! I will immediately Think of it!" 

"What way do you say that?" 

What about? What about? Think of it! 


No way! !! 


Both of them were desperate, and they raised their hands. Who knows, at 
this time, one hand opened his palm" " and caught him. 


Then, with the approaching sluggish admiration, jump forward! 


Xie Pity feels that the white end is tight, looking down, surprised and 
happy, said: "Wind letter?!" 


The broken bridge that Mu Qing had originally settled in had already sunk 
completely into the bottom of the magma river. At the end of the day, the 
wind and the letter grasped Ruo Ruo, and the hand-carried face was 
shouting: "His Royal Highness, Pull us up!" 


There are also a few hollow geeks fluttering around, it seems that the wind 
letter is riding them from above the river. Thanks for the lack of time to 
ask, hurry to find a wider and more stable bridge deck to pull them up. The 
two men steadily rose, but the bottom gradually gathered a group of new 
lava grievances, looking at the top with grievances, hustle and bustle to 
discuss, not long after, once again blasted a fire column! 


The wind and the feelings are hung in the air, dodging is not allowed, Xie 
pity mentions if the evil moves a few steps, miss this blow, but the bridge 
surface elsewhere is not as spacious and stable as this one, after avoiding 
one blow, only Go back. Fengxin was almost burnt by the fire pillar, and 
shouted loudly: "What kind of dog is this group of people? What are the 
sinister dangers of taking people? I|Fuck|The whole family!" 


Thanks to pity: "Their family is like this, are you sure you really want to 
fuck?!" 


They haven't given up yet, laughing and joking, it seems that they are 
ready to continue the sneak attack, the wind letter is arrogant, and the love 
is lifted up, saying: "Catch!" 


I just thought that I was going to die, and the stimulus was too big. I still 
have a bit of dullness in the reaction. The wind letter does not need to 
carry him, free a hand, remove the longbow from the back, and there are 
several branches that do not know where he came from. He used the 
branch as an arrow, holding a bow, his teeth biting the bowstring and the 
tail of the arrow, and the arrow was wound up, and it was pulled firmly - 
hey, four arrows were all together! 


The arrow entered the pool and blasted the flowers, scaring the lava spirits 
to turn over the sky and scatter again. The wind letter finally got so happy, 
and said: "See you? Say fucking! Fucking **** stuff! I shoot a hand | 
Explosion!" 


Finally, the three stood together on the bridge of the bridge. Thanks for a 
few sweats, my heart is still jumping wildly, saying: "Wind letter, how 
come you?" 


Speaking of this wind letter, I picked up my head: "How did I come? You 
all jumped. What can I do? My mom was almost crazy! I had to find a way 
to get around the cliff and drift all the way. Here, I heard you with the 
sound of bang and vocals. What do you do, jump into the magma pool! 
Crazy!" 


The feelings finally recovered, and said: "I was smashed!" 


I want to come to the wind and collapse and squat all the way. Thanks to 
pity: "Well, you are calm. Anyway, you are really a savior, help a lot! So, 
sometimes, people really are... must be others Pulling one can get through, 
really!" 


The three men were scared to death, and they were in a mess for a while, 
and they dared not stay too much. The wind and the letter backed their 
feelings and continued to leap forward on the bridge. Leaped for a while, 
exchanged what I saw, thank you for knowing that the wind letter did not 
see the flower city, could not help but worry. Where is Huacheng? I only 
found it along the bridge. 


At this time, the wind Mu love letter on the back and said: "Yes, those 
words before you shout, I heard a few words in front of you listen to 
people who wanted to hit well done, did not think back, you actually think 
the kid at heart. of!" 


The face of love is black. Fengxin said to politeness: "I have already told 
you about it. He is a man who is more thoughtful than the deep palace 


grievances. It is almost inexplicable!" 


"..."" Xie pity to see the face of love can not see, rushed to him. The wind 
letter is unaware of it, and turns to the feelings. He said: "You want to be 
friends with your Highness, you will say it straight! I feel that my 
Highness despise your heart and you can't be friends. It's going to be yin 
and yang, all day, disgusting people, really don't understand your brain. 
What do you think?" 


Thanks for giving up, he waved his hand and said: "Isn’t he since 
childhood? Don’t talk about him, see his face red." 


I couldn’t bear it, and roared: "I am fucking, I am really fucking?! Can you 
shut up both of you?!" 


Xie pity reminded him: "You seem to have a string of words. And, 
swearing is not very good." 


Wind channel: "You said it yourself, I want to be friends, friends, friends 
with my Highness!" 


He also deliberately learned the feelings of the gnashing teeth, the face of 
the sorrowful face, the hand has sneaked into the back to touch the knife, 
and the wind letter said: "Okay, now say open. Anyway, you remember : 
Your Royal Highness has never thought of what you think, except that 
when you did too much, he was too angry. Later, he said nothing to me in 
front of me! You, be a normal person in the future, speak normally. 
Normal expression, then I will marry you again and again." 


Mu Qing listened to the front and bowed his head and said nothing, 
listening to the back and straightening his eyes: "Did you not marry me for 
hundreds of years?" 


Xie pity reminded: "Muscle, you are a priest, you must pay attention to the 
image, you can't just turn your eyes, and the believers will see opinions." 


Admire the feelings: "Get it. This person is still swearing in the heavens 
all day." 


Feng Xin said: "That is what you should be." 


Admire the feelings: "You have to turn over the old account with me. Don't 
you drop the temple and give birth to your son?" 


The wind forehead blue ribs also got up, and the sleeves said: "You find 
it!" 


Mourning sneer: "Hey, you are yourself. If you didn't say bad things to me 
next to the Prince Edward all day long, I always think that he also looks 
down on me, is my heart subtle?" 


The topic has fallen into an infinite loop. Thanks to pity: "You don't want 
to turn history over each other at this time. What is the point of hurting 
each other..." 


Mu Qing turned his eyes again and shouted: "Let's say, look at the year 
when you made a fuss, how can you rob a catastrophe? If I go to the 
temple, I will go to that stage, and I will steal 18 big-name giants in the 
middle of the night, never blink. You are doing something, and chasing 
your Highness to ask what is going on." 


Thank you for your shame, look back: "Wait a minute, don't turn over me? 
In short, look for Saburo, first help me to find Saburo! Hahahaha..." 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 236: Blood test 
flower fight white no phase 


At this time, the three people also felt a wave of waves coming from the 
bottom, and they sang together: "Beware!" Seven or eight fire pillars 
skyrocketed, and below, they gathered more lava grievances! 


Thanks to the pity: "Wind letter, give me the love!" 


The wind and the letter do not say that he will throw his back on him, 
thank you for his pity, and admire the feelings: "Quickly kill them, worry 
about the dead!" 


Wind channel: "Use what you say!" The bow is a chain of arrows. The 
scope of his weapon attack can be far more than the blessing and the wind 
and the wind, and the blast is screaming and screaming. Thanks for your 
pity: "Make it beautiful!" 


The feelings on his back said: "Alright!" 


The grievances are full of grievances, discuss for a while, swim to the 
farther front, and force together to fire. A few bangs, thank you: "The 
bridge in front was blown by them, they want to cut off our way!" 


Feng Xin said: "I have fucked, so I am working together to hold hands and 
hold the group. What is wrong? I don't want to hurt anyone! I don't think 
you want to come up from the magma for another eight thousand years!" 


As soon as he raised his bow, the lava grievous spirits dispersed. Thanks 
for your pity: "Don't be prepared! Jump! One, two, three -!" 


At the beginning, the accumulative acceleration, the second calculation of 
the number of steps, the three feet under the mammoth jump - three 
figures vacated, crossed the bridge break gap, fell to the opposite side, 
continue to run wild. That Hashimoto is used for "Tongtian". Of course, 
the **** gradually rises, but the more you walk, the more you walk, the 


lighter you are. You said, "We have three, I haven’t been like this for a 
long time!" 


Admire the feelings: "Do you mean to fight together side by side, or do 
you run together?" 


Thanks for your pity: "Everything!" 
Fengxin: "It's always like this!" 
Thank you: "Yes!" 


However, when something is said to be open and not to be opened, the 
state of mind is completely different. Thanks to pity, haha smiled twice, 
and the eyes kept watching four times. I never saw a red shadow. I couldn’t 
help but feel a little anxious. "Zha Lang!" 


His voice echoed in the vast underground caves, no one answered. Thanks 
for the pity of the lips, dry and stunned. Behind the scenes, he looked at 
him, and for a moment, he said: "His Royal Highness, do you really like 
him?" 


Xie pity did not expect him to suddenly ask, said: "ah. Ah?...ah." 


Although his face was awkward, his ears were slowly red. Mu Qing met 
him in this appearance, speechless, hesitant for a moment, said: "I did not 
deliberately scare you, but I have to remind you, have you ever thought 
about... Maybe only two of us were transferred to the bridge, and Blood 
rain probes... No?" 


Wind channel: "Are you not nonsense? Since there are only two of you 
here, he is of course transferred to another place..." 


Having said that, he only reacted to what it means. He did not say that the 
flower city was sent elsewhere, but that...maybe, the flower city fell into 
the magma pool. 


Thanks for pity, licking his lips, said: "This, how 1s this possible?" 


Admire the feelings: "You don't think it's impossible. Blood and rain is a 
ghost. The ghost king is right, but it 1s also white. And he is the first 
generation of the ghost king, the owner of the Tonglushan, here is his 
territory, his mana is the strongest. The home." 


The wind madness and enthusiasm, resentment: "Come shut up! What's 
wrong with you, this time you can't say something nice? He is a **** 
rain!" Muqing really did not say, but still defended: "I Just think that we 
have to think about what to do if this 1s the case." 


Thanks to the eyes, the unusually bright red glare in the palm of the flower 
city, I don’t know what to say, I just want to talk, suddenly slammed. The 
rear wind slammed into the air and said: "What happened?!" 


When the words were exported, he found that he did not have to ask. 


I saw the front, the air, the sky, the stars flashing thousands of 
phosphorous and silver. Like someone in the sky who knocked over the 
treasure box filled with silver powder. 


Thank you for letting go of your love and move forward. He explored his 
hand and gently touched the sky with a slightly larger silver light. When I 
touched it, I pinched it in my hand and slowly got it. 

The other two also went to see, the wind channel: "This, this 1s..." 


The feelings are directly said: "The fragments of the dead butterfly...?" 


Probably because he said it was too direct, and the wind letter shouted at 
him. The polite hand shook a little and shook the butterfly wing that gave 
off a faint silver glow, and spit out a breath. 


Fengxin scratched his head and said: "I think in a good way, at least he 
didn't really fall into the magma pool. I must have been here, right." 


The empathy pointed to the side and said: "Then I played with him here. 
It’s a big one." 


Thanks to the direction he pointed, he slightly widened his eyes. 


I saw the rock in all directions, and there were numerous swords and 
swords in the eyes of the monks. 


That is the knife mark of the errand. 


Knife into the bone. Xie Pity has never seen a flower knife in the past, but 
his style has always been relaxed and careless. It is not so much that he is 
using weapons, but rather playing with a knife. These knife marks are full 
of killings. It is conceivable that there are more people who have played 
against him, how sinister this war is. 


He didn't say a word, he looked down and looked down. There were no 
signs of falling on the bridge, and there was no gathering of cheering 
spirits under the bridge. This was a little peace of mind, and climbed up 
and ran forward. Behind the wind, the letter is full of sympathy and 
catches up: "His Royal Highness!" 


Thank you for holding your breath. Because he didn't want to hear his 
breathing too fast and not calm. Disordered breathing, which is a big taboo 
for martial arts, not only increases the burden on the body, but also 
disturbs the rhythm of the heart. But holding his breath is useless. He is 
shaking in his hands and feet. He runs and squats. He almost slams and 
rolls down the bridge for dozens of laps. The wind and the feelings are 
called up, and he is careful. Suddenly, thank you: "What sound?" 


Xie pity stopped again and turned back: "Have you heard it? Is there any 
sound?" 


Fengxin and admiration are all saying: "Yes! Yes!" 
It is the sound of weapon slamming and mana bombardment. The bridge 
connecting the bridge is trembled. In the darkness of the road ahead, there 


is light and extinction. 


Someone is fighting ahead! 


Thanks for the rolling belt and crawling forward. The wind letter behind 
me whispered: "I | Fuck, the **** of the gods blessing can be **** 
flowers, or he is afraid to be crazy!" 


Admire the feelings: "Less nonsense, we are full of God, the Buddha can 
not bless, and quickly catch up! You see him stumbled like that, do not see 
people, first fell a dog to eat!" 


Thanks for forgetting to hold my breath, so I listened to my messy gasp 
and ran for five or six miles, turned a few big corners, and finally, after 
turning the last corner, my eyes were bright. 


At the end of the suspended sky bridge, a red man and a white man are 
fighting. 


The red man was holding a slender silver scimitar, his body was ghostly, 
and lightning was flickering. It was the flower city. He didn't smile, he was 
engrossed, his face was awkward, and there was a bright red blood mark 
on his handsome pale cheeks. The white man is naturally white, holding a 
long sword that I don’t know where to get it, and the face is still a half- 
smile and a half-smile. However, the mask and the pity that I saw before 
were not the same. 


It cracked from the middle. 


The rift is so great that it can't be ignored. It has been cracked from the 
center of the forehead to the cheeks under the eyes, as if it will collapse at 
any time! 


Both of them are fading away, and they are enchanting, and the battle is 
like a thousand miles. Swords and knives, flying wildly, the dead 
butterflies above and the lava grievouss below are also confrontational, 
whistling to each other, such as rushing to the sea. Every time I played 
against it, the magma flame pool exploded a few tens of thousands of 
waves, and others could not get close! 


The wind letter and the enthusiasm followed, and they were all nailed to 
the spot by the scene, and they could not move. 


No martial **** sees such a battle scene, can not be swayed! 


Upon seeing the innocent flower city, a heart that was hung up high and 
finally fell to the ground. On the spot, I just wanted to lie down and yell at 
the ground, but forcibly held back. Masters have a trick, the momentary 
chaos can determine the outcome, not to mention, this 1s the battle 
between the two worldly ghost kings! 


There is still a figure standing behind the end of the white phase. It is the 
national teacher. He is naturally brought here by the white phase. Seeing 
Xie Li and others came to breathe a sigh of relief, but they did not dare to 
rush. Out of voice. Who knows, Huacheng has long noticed the coming of 
people, such as frost-like focus and the cold look is slightly open, and 
finally smiled and said: "It seems that you have failed again. The temple is 
down. He brought people, one There are not few." 


Thank you for your pity, and said: "Sanlang!" 


Huacheng micro side of the first, should be said: "Brother" should be 
finished, the tone turned to war, said, "Brother, you will make yourself fall 
next time, I am angry." 


Thanks and pity: "You will jump more together next time, I will be even 
more angry!" 


"..."" Hearing, Huacheng’s expression condensed, and it seemed that he was 
jealous if he thanked him. And he did not reveal this taboo look when he 
faced the white. White has no reason to bully, playing the flower city, but 
the words are said to thank you: "Xinle, are you two springs too proud of 
too much, too do not put me in the eyes?" 


The eyeballs on the knives of the ancestors sighed with joy, and the bones 
turned wildly. The flower city turned back, and thanked and heard the 
sound of "hey!" 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 237: Blood 
Detective Fighting White No Phase 2 


That is the sound of the broken blade! 


Everyone quickly followed the sound and looked into the field. I saw that 
the machete on the hand of Huacheng was safe and sound. The long sword 
held by Bai Wuxiang was backed by a flower city, but it was a two-fold! 


The eyeballs on the knives of the stalks of the stalks of the stalks of the 
stalks of the stalks of the stalks of the stalks of the stalks of the stalks of 
the stalks of the stalks of the stalks. Huacheng laughed and said calmly: 
"Nothing. Brother doesn't have to worry." He asked the white no-phase. 
"Why should you put your eyes in your eyes?" 


White did not say anything, the national teacher could not help, afraid that 
he angered his opponent, said: "Young people, don't talk too arrogant!" 


Who knows, the next sentence of Huacheng is even more unscrupulous, 
with a hand-held knife, sharp and sharp, aiming at nothing, smiling: "After 
all, after all, you are just a full-hearted old man." 


Not only did the national teacher even blame him for his smirk, his 
strength and enthusiasm were shocked: this man is too big! 


Who dares to say this in front of any of the two people, Jun Wu or Bai 
Wuxiang! 


However, they have to admit that only Huacheng dares to say so. Because, 
maybe only after he said this, there 1s still no way for Jun Wu or Bai 
Wuxiang to take him! 


I fell in love and walked a few steps, muttering: "No wonder the past... 
When it comes to **** rain, Junwu always said that he can avoid it, don't 
be right." 


At this time, a group of white shadows flashed, and stopped before the 
embarrassing blade. Thanks for the sharp eyes, I saw such things, said: 
"Sanlang don't cut that!" 


It is the baby spirit! 


He saw it clearly, and the flower city naturally saw it. The tip of the knife 
was biased, and it was freely retracted. It was changed to pick, and the 
thing of the white flower was picked up. The wind-sinking party suddenly 
shrived and saw that the fetal spirit had not been broken. This was the time 
to return to God and said: "Come on!" 


The direction in which the fetus was picked up by the flower city was 
directed at him. The wind was eager to go forward. There wasn’t a few 
hairs on his head. He was all blown up by his shouting, and he was 
screaming in his throat. He used to bite in the past, and he would not let 
him. Fengxin couldn't help but anger: "I | Fuck! See him and stick to me 
and bite. Who is you?" 


The feelings are cold but not cold: "Have you ever regarded him as your 
son? Have you called his name well?" 


Wen Yan, the wind letter stunned, said: "I..." 


Over there, Xie Pity couldn't watch the battle, and hurriedly said: "You two 
are careful, I will go and see!" 


Mourning whispered: "Be careful! Don't forget, there are two more on 
you..." 


Thanks for the slightest glimpse, the subconscious touched the neck and 
touched the curse. But he inexplicably feels that nothing can threaten him 
with a curse. Not too much to say, rushed forward, seeing a red and white 
fight over there, watching the moment, judging it is difficult to rush to 
join the melee, if the evil wave, the national division rolled up, said: 
"Master! You are fine. Let's go!" 


The national teacher wiped the cold sweat that was full of heads and said: 
"nothing!" 


Thanks for the pity: "How come so much sweat?" 
Guo Shidao: "Isn't it scared by the unseen kid who is bloody?" 


At this time, listening to the wind and feelings and exclaimed, thanking 
the pity and looking up, I saw the white phaseless hand down. 


One of his arms has been injured. 


He turned over the palm of his hand and looked at his blood. He sighed 
and smiled. "...No one can make me suffer this degree for many years." 


Thanks for the poor feelings, said: "Master, he... is it angry?" 


The national teacher can be said to be the person who knows the most 
white in the world. He said: "No... it is worse than his anger. He... happy." 


After a pause, Bai Wuxiang turned to Huacheng and asked with interest: 
"Your machete is made with your eyes that are gone?" 


Huacheng was obviously not interested in answering, but the heart of 
thankfulness jumped. 


From the first sight of the life, he knew that the machete must be unusual, 
and there were six points to guess, perhaps the one that the flower city lost 
was made. White is so unspeakable, is this really true? 


The teacher’s brow was slightly condensed, and he was awkward. 
Suddenly he said, “I remembered.” 


Thanks for your pity: "What do you think of?" 


Guoshi said: "I think of it, I heard them say one thing. A few hundred 
years ago, there was a ghost in the Tonglushan." 


Admiration: "There are too many ghosts in the Tonglu Mountain. At least 
there are tens of thousands." 


Guoshi said: "Don't interrupt! - That ghost, the ghost time is very short, 
very young, and it is almost gone when it comes, but I don't know why I 
insisted on it." 


I don't know why, thank you for your heart and madness, and said: 
"Quickly disappeared? Why?" 


Guoshi said: "It seems to have been hit hard. The souls are all scattered, 
and the mind is not very clear. But I have been wandering and thinking that 
he will not leave, he will not leave. Maybe because of his wish. No, in 
short, that year, the copper furnace broke open and there was an accident." 


Thanks to hear "He won't leave," and his heart is inexplicably soft and a 
glimpse. Then asked: "What accident?" 


"In the Tonglu Mountain, not only the ghosts are gathered, but also a group 
of living people who have been mistakenly forbidden." 


"what?!" 


Guoshi said: "The copper stoves are all monsters and monsters. The 
ordinary people can't get out of it. They are only used as a nourishment. 
But the ghosts don't know why, they are chaotically carrying the big bunch 
of people, fleeing. For many days. In the end, it was still blocked by the 
ghosts, and it was forced to eat with the living people. 


Thank you for knowing that this lonely wandering wild ghost must be a 
flower city! 


He said: "And then?! Is there any way to get out of the way?" 
Guo Shidao: "Yes. Practice the bleeding device and kill the encirclement." 


I still couldn’t help but interject, and said: "The most safe sacrifice, isn’t 
idee 


Oh, not the living people who are in desperate circumstances! 


Fengxin and admiration look forward to the flower city that is 
concentrating on the battle with white: "Don't you...he..." 


Xie pity also held his breath. The national teacher said: "Well, he started." 


The look of the wind and the feelings of love have become inexplicable. 
Cherished but did not move, just waiting for the national teacher to go on. 
Sure enough, the National Teacher received: "He started, suddenly mad, 
and dug one of his own eyes." 


" " 


Guo Shidao said: "That ghost, I almost started to work for those who live, 
but I don't know why, but I still didn't move, but I used my own eye as a 
price to refine a blood. But that ghost is originally strong. With a sigh of 
relief, after digging his eyes, he should have been completely scattered, 
but I didn’t know what was irritated, but he was completely awake. I don’t 
know what kind of cult device he had made, and actually survived that 
battle. And, there is another Very strange thing." 


Thanks for your pity and calmness, said: "What, what?" 


Guoshi said: "It is said that after the war, the sky came down and the 
robbery came to Tonglushan. Do you understand what this means?" 


What does this mean? 


The robbery of the day, that is to say, Tian believes that in the Tonglushan, 
someone is qualified to fly. 


Xie pity seized the national teacher and said: "Who is it? Who ts flying?!" 


Guoshi said: "I have all heard about it. However, there is no priest from 
the Heavenly Court who is born in Tongluoshan, or what I heard 1s purely 
illusory, or is..." 


The man who went up, jumped down and refused the heavens! 


There is no way to accept the feelings. I suddenly said, "Is it soaring with a 
ghost? Is there such a thing? And I refused to fly, and I jumped down?! 

Not him? At that time, he just entered the Copper Mountain, and still 
Didn’t you make it to you?! Just jump on it...I don’t know if it’s life or 
death?! Why is he?!” 


Why can you do this? ! 


Suddenly, thank you for hearing the white sigh: "Xianle, you have a very 
loyal believer." 


The voice did not fall, and a sorrowful face that broke open appeared in 
front of Xie. 


Xie Li did not expect that the white phase could be approached in the blink 
of an eye, and his reflection was clearly reflected in the pupil. If the evil 
bombs are generally raised, they want to attack, but they are still 
shrinking. 


It doesn't blame it, because if evil is always very smart. When it judges 
that the attack is also invalid, it will give up. 


White no phase seems to smile a little, because the sorrow and joy 1s more 
open. 


The next moment, the embarrassing blade passed over his neck. 
But after a step, the white phase has already gone. 


He Huo Di flashed the highest point of the end of the bridge of the bridge, 
and raised his hand slightly. "No need to be nervous, just take back my 
things." 


In his hand, there was a long sword with a black body, such as cold and 
cold jade, and a silver heart running through the heart of the sword. 
Thanks for the subconscious backhand to touch the back, and sure enough, 
the heart of the back is gone. 


Fang Xin is the sword of Wu Yongtai. Bai Wuxiang took the sabre that 
belonged to him. 


One, two, three. The pale mask peeled off a little bit and eventually fell off 
completely, revealing the face behind the mask. The white coat was also 
turned into a white armor in the burning flame. 


Finally, "White No Phase" took off the mask and became "Junwu". 
Everyone is breathtaking. 


I don't have to guess, I know that this form must be stronger. 2k novel 
reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 238: Blood 
Detective Fighting White No Phase 3 


Guoshi Chonghua City said: "Young people should not underestimate the 
enemy! This appearance is more difficult to deal with than the white form! 
And you originally took advantage of the weapons, but now there is no 
more!" 


Sure enough, the wounds on Junwu were swept away, and the head to the 
feet were completely new. He glanced at the national teacher and smiled: 
"In the face of teaching me how to deal with others, I will not kill you, you 
are more and more courageous." 


The smile revealed a warning. The national teacher did not speak, but also 
looked directly at him. Thanks: "You can rest assured that Saburo has 
never been underestimated." 


He can't be more clear. Even if the smile on the flower garden is 
unscrupulous, the hand will never relax. 


Jun Wu stared at Jian Feng and whispered: "Hey, I haven't seen you for a 
long time." 


Heart--or, it’s called sorrow, and it’s making a low humming in his hands. 


Thanks to the past, I have always felt that my heart is not good enough. I 
may have folded it someday, but I did not expect it to be in the hands of 
the former masters and the momentum in my own hands! 


Every time the heart and the embarrassment confront each other, the 
whole bridge is shaking, as if it will collapse into the magma at any time. 
Compared with the only one, Jun Wu’s strength and speed are obviously 
on a big scale. Although Huacheng still does not fall into the wind, but the 
brow is slightly stunned and looks even more embarrassing. It’s also a 
shock to watch a few people far away. 


Because, every sword of Junwu is stabbing the right eye of the flower city! 


Huacheng blocked twice and was extremely thrilling. He soon discovered 
that he was using this trick repeatedly, as if he had targeted the right eye as 
the weakness of Huacheng, and he had to dig again. Every time he shot, 
Huacheng naturally defended his defense and repeatedly stopped. In this 
way, isn't it a tug-of-war, nothing can be done? 


Essence of the eye seems to sense the crisis, and it is full of anger. The 


black jade sword edge hit again. Just listen to acrisp" "- Huacheng did 
not raise the knife, Junwu received the sword. 


Thanks for being in white, stopped in front of Huacheng. 
Only then, he was able to bounce off the sturdy swordsman with a bang! 


Thanks for the pity, I can’t help it. I entered the battle. He had the ability 
to catch the front with his own hands, but this was the first time he had 
encountered such a sinister sword. With a single shot, almost half of his 
arms were numb, especially in the palm of his hand. After a few steps 
back, he recovered consciousness. Huacheng said behind him: "Brother?" 


Thanks for your pity: "Let's together!" 


The two stood back to back and the war was aligned with the other side. 
Upon seeing it, Jun Wu smiled deeper and said: "Oh?" 


Thanks and whispered: "You go to me!" 


When the voice did not fall, the two of them split up and copied to Junwu. 
Thanks to the number of ways in which Jun Wu’s tricks are counted, he 
can vaguely guess how he should go next time, and he blurted out: 
“Hook!” 


Huacheng said that the knife is back. Jun Wu is almost in the middle of the 
move, thank you again and again: "Boom!" 


Huacheng once again said that this time without a knife, it was a bare- 
handed bombardment. Junwu’s shoulders were suddenly hit, and his body 
was sinking. If he was not too fast, both of them might have hit the key. 
Fighting, thanking and pity suddenly awakened, Huacheng is the ultimate 
in the world, how can you need him to remind him? This is too offensive, 
and the old mistakes have been made, busy: "Sorry! You don't have to 
listen to me!" 


Huacheng smiled and said: "My brother said that it is the best choice, why 
not listen?" 


Suddenly, the bridge surface collapsed, the flower city was under the air, 
and it was about to fall. Xie pity stepped on the bridge and smashed it, and 
rolled him back. The next moment, he only felt his neck cold, Jun Wu 
flashed behind him, and put his hand on his shoulder, said: "Xianle, good 
skills." 


He relied too close, and thanked him for his horror. Huacheng Road: 
"Brother!" 


He throws his left hand and whirls. Xie pity reacted very fast, slightly 
lower, and the embarrassed life swept over his head and slammed to the 
prince behind him. Jun Wu then let go of the hand on his shoulder, thanked 
the mercy machine and jumped back to the flower city, and the life was 
swirling back to the flower city. The two cooperated with each other, and 
the others saw only three figures flashing like a flash of lightning. It was 
almost unimaginable and suffocating. And Junwu’s laughter echoed above 
the magma dome, as if encouraging them: “Good. Very good! Continue!” 


While admiring the situation and avoiding the collapse of the bridge, he 
said: "National teacher! He... he is fine? He is laughing?" 


Guoshi said: "I said it earlier! What is worse than his anger is that he is 
happy! This is just the beginning!" 


Over there, Jun Wu got a heartfelt heart. Thanks for seeing him constantly 
holding the sword and attacking the right eye of Huacheng, timid and 
scared, screaming out the evil spirits, entangled the heart of the sword. 


Who knows, Jun Wu backhanded, thanked the pity and the whole person 
flew to him. 


Xie Pity was shocked first, then calmed down. Anyway, he wanted to win 
the sword. He was fearless and rushed to the top. He immediately 
rehearsed more than two hundred strokes that might be played in the next, 
and unexpectedly flew into the air. Only grabbed him and pulled him back. 
Thanks for the pity, looking back, I saw the flower city in front of him, a 
black jade sword through the heart. 


Seeing this picture, thank you for suffocating, said: "Sanlang?!" 


Huacheng looked a little deep, and Junwu was waiting to thank him for 
hitting the heart of the sword. Seeing that he was stopped and pulled back, 
it seemed to be disappointed. Xie Pity simply forgot that the flower city is 
a ghost. Even if the chest is hit by a big hole, it is still alive and kicking. 
Now [| am still not at ease. I put my hands on the wound that is not 
bleeding on the chest of Huacheng. "Zha Lang, you... what are you doing 
suddenly?!... ..." 


Huacheng Road: "How can I let you be stabbed in front of me?!" 


I don't know why, his tone is a bit too much, thank you for a slight 
glimpse, but listen to Jun Wu Wensheng: "Why is Xianle so sad? Anyway, 
he will not hurt, but it is a long-dead person." 


"..." He actually reminded me of this! 

Xie pity looked at him, full of anger: "Not all your fault?!" 

Jun Wu sneered: "Is all my fault?" 

Listening to his question, thank you for a sudden card. 

Junwu’s words turned and said: “Maybe. But, Xianle, have you been in the 


world for a long time, have you forgotten what you have done? You still 
remember, what did you do after Xianle’s death? ” 


Jun Wu reveals a meaningful smile and slowly said: "Do you remember, a 
ghost called an unknown name?" 


Suddenly, thankful and pitiful white, blurted out: "Don't!!!" 


The national teacher had a premonition that it was not good. He said: "His 
Royal Highness, what did he say? What did you do after Xianle destroyed 
the country?" 


Thanks for a moment of inexplicable fear, looking at the flower city, and 

looking at Jun Wu, the expression also turned from the anger of Fang Cai 
to overwhelmed. Huacheng immediately grabbed him and said: "Nothing, 
Your Highness, don't be afraid." 


Feng Xin also said: "Yes, first stabilize!" 


The feelings are very sensitive: "What does he mean? Ghost? What 
ghost?" 


But how can Xie pity still be stable? 


It was the most embarrassing day of his life, and the last regret he had 
done. He never dared to think back. As soon as the pale smiley mask of the 
eyebrows appeared in his mind, he couldn't sleep, and he wanted to smash 
himself into a ball and never see anyone again. 


Huacheng has seen the gratitude of the infinite scenery, the blessings of 
defeated and defeated, the blessings of the clumsy, and the pity of the poor. 
That's nothing. 


However, he is afraid that he has never seen the praying in the muddy 
ground, the gratitude of the swearing, the gratitude of the full-hearted 
sorrow, the gratitude of the revenge of Yong’an, and even the blessing of 
the second human face epidemic! 


That paragraph is too unbearable to look back. If it was in the past, it 
would shake out when it was not shaken, but now, Xie Pity does not want 
to test the flower city to know what expression he will reveal after a while. 


Because he didn't think so well in Huacheng. He 1s not always spotless, 
sacred and clean. Even if Huacheng knows that he only reveals an 
incredible expression, he will probably live forever and never see the 
flower city again! 


At the thought of this, Xie Pity could not suppress the face of the blue, the 
cold sweat on his forehead, his hand shivered slightly. Seeing him reacting 
like this, Huacheng’s hand is tighter and calmer: “His Royal Highness, 
don’t be afraid. Remember? It’s you, the scenery is infinite, the dust is 
also you. The point is 'you’, not 'how'. No matter what happens, I won't 
leave. You can tell me anything." 


At the end, he softly said: "You tell me by yourself." 


Xie pity a little bit of God, Jun Wu smiled and said slowly: "No matter 
what happens, will not leave." Once, my most loyal believers, best friends 
also said this to me." 


The national teacher looked slightly changed, and Jun Wu also glanced at 
him and said: "But, finally, you saw it. No one really did." 


The national teacher did not seem to bear with him and turned his head. 
Huacheng Road: "Trust me, Your Highness. Can't you?" 


Cherish is not unbelief. 
Just, he didn't dare to try. 


In the end, Xie pity swallowed his throat, barely smiled, and felt that he 
should not laugh, bowed his head, and trembled: "...Sanlang, you first... 
sorry, I, maybe..." 


Huacheng stared at him for a moment and said: "Actually..." 
The voice did not fall, and a very strong murderous attack hit, both of 
them jumped. Thanks for the slightest pity, his face recovered from the 


white: "What happened to him? How is it more..." 


Faster and stronger? 


Compared with the white innocent form, now, the speed and strength of 
Junwu have been improved by at least half, and it is still growing, and 
each stroke can clearly feel this horrible enhancement! 


Mu Qing also noticed another wrong place, shouting: "His Royal 
Highness! Be careful of his changing strategy! He does not attack the 
blood and rain.... It turns into only attacking you!" 


Xie pity naturally found this. There is only evil in his hands. If the evil 
sees another heart, it will shrink, and it will not be able to face it. 
Fortunately, the errands have blocked every move that Junwu initiated to 
him. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 239: Broken 
white 


The heart of the sword is holding a powerful force. A few people can see 
the chills in the distance, let alone the retreat of the retreat under this 
offensive. 


Fang Cai, Huacheng one person has nothing to do with whiteness and has a 
good time. After Junwu comes out, he has to be two people to tie him. The 
main advantage of Tonglushan's mana has finally become more and more 

obvious. Thanks to the faint feeling that a pressure 1s suppressing this side. 


Moreover, Jun Wu also has a layer of white armor, which is a millennium 
magic weapon that he personally refines, and the defense is almost 
impeccable. He only needs to protect his head. Huacheng has a very good 
knife and a strange knife. He also sees the needles in the eyes. The two 
men almost have the front of the throat, heart, vest, abdomen, shoulders, 
etc., but the opponent is still moving! 


Mourning shouted: "Don't bother! Useless! That white armor is impossible 
to pierce!" 


Thanks to pity: "Take his right rib below!" 


The scimitar came out again, and what he said was really useless. 
Mourning shouted: "It's useless to say it! It's better to find a way to open 
the distance first. Let's join him and fight him! Fengxin! What about your 
arrow?" 


Fengxin 1s climbing a rock, going to catch the fetal spirit that spies on him 
and slobber, and said: "Good! Come!" 


Thanks for the pity: "Continue not to stop! Attack his right rib below!" 


Wind channel: "His Royal Highness!! His set of armor 1s very powerful, 
and cutting a few hundred knives may not be able to break through!" 


Thanks to pity: "Nothing to listen to me! I don't need so much!" 


Huacheng does not ask why, the scimitar combo. Suddenly, there was a 
crack in the place where the blade passed. 


Blood is coming out. The blade of the embarrassment broke into the 
abdomen below the right rib of Junwu! 


Huacheng was in front of Junwu, holding a knife in one hand, and staring 
at him coldly. Xie Li is standing on the side of Jun Wu. If the evil is on the 
plane, he will bind the hands of Jun Wu, so that he can not block. 


There is a feeling of sorrow over there: "How come?" 


How could the white armor of the millennium be so easily broken by the 
flower city? ? ? 


Xie pity tightened Ruoqiang, staring at Junwu, said: "...forgot it? I played 
with you more than 800 years ago." 


The wind and the feelings reacted: "The second flight?" 


At that time, Xie Li proposed to Jun Wu, please let him go down, and he 
would like to test with him. 


Although the two sides agreed not to show their mercy, but I still want to 
come to Junwu. 


However, thank you for all your efforts. 


He has produced more than 3,000 swords. Among them, there are more 
than 400 swords in the thorns of Junwu. And in these four hundred swords, 
there are more than one hundred swords that stabbed this place. 


Xie pity persistently stabbed Jun Wu's more than three thousand swords, 
and finally broke through the almost impeccable defense of the 
millennium white armor, and a sword broke into the abdomen under his 
right rib. 


It is at this moment, the knife of Huacheng, the place of corruption! 


Therefore, eight hundred years ago, thankfulness left an old scar on this 
white armor. Just three knives, Huacheng can break through! 


Moreover, the knife of Huacheng is even more fierce than the imagination. 
The scimitar is abruptly hit! 


He just took a breath and listened to the teacher: "It’s useless! He..." 


It is reasonable to say that if he is seriously injured, Junwu should be 
restricted in his actions, but he just looked down and looked the same. Xie 
Liangang was not aware of it, and Jun Wu’s hands were slightly moved. 


Immediately, Xie Li heard a slight tear in the " "and at the same time, 
the hand was loose. 


If evil... is broken! 


The white cracked into two pieces, and suddenly fell to the ground without 
any anger. The next moment, thanking the pity, I felt that my neck was 
caught by people, and the whole person was dragged up! 


He heard the flower city road: "His Royal Highness!" Just, the voice 
suddenly turned away. Junwu’s voice is close at hand. He said: “Xianle, do 
you think that my experience will be less than that of a sickle? Do you 
think I will care?” 


Guo Shi is far from the ground: "Even if you lick his hundred and eighty 
knives, it will not work! Because... he seems... he has not felt the pain at 
re 


Thanks to the long sword, you can pass the heart and you can change your 
face. Junwu is the same. 


Fengxin had already opened the bow and pointed it at Junwu. He heard the 
words and put it down. He said, "What?! Isn't that useless?" 


Admire: "By the way, tell you the bad news I have observed. I suspect that 
he is faster than he is wounded." 


"what?!" 
And the thankfulness over there has been confirmed, this is indeed true. 


His injury was so horrible that he would be cut off on the spot, but his 
wounds were no longer bleeding. Jun Wudao: "Don't be so surprised. If 
you are often scolded by the back of the people and don't let yourself 
recover immediately, wouldn't you die thousands of times? But you two 
are really pretty good." 


He smiled and said: "For more than 800 years, I have only been hurt by a 
sword and a sword. They are you. Blood and rain, standing far, you will 
not want to see how Xianle was pinched off my neck." 


Huacheng looked heavy and his eyes swelled in the eyes, but when he saw 
Junwu hanging on the top of the bridge, he threw his hand and thanked him 
for dropping the Baizhang Yanchi. He still took the knife, took his hand, 
and held it. The scimitar slowly retreated a few steps. 


It seems quite calm, but his machete has exposed something. The 
embarrassment was a big anxiety, the eyes were mad, and the eyes were 
sharp. Huacheng retreated to the edge of Tongtiangiao, and Junwu said: 
"Yes." 


He grabbed the pity and the two looked directly at each other. For a long 
while, Jun Wu suddenly shook the piti on a rock wall! 


This collision is too embarrassing, thanking the whole head is squeaking, 
the nose and mouth are faintly smeared, and there are many people 
screaming in the distance, but he can't hear who is who, just listen To Jun 
Wu in his ear whispered: "Xianle, the head hit the wall, hurt?" 


Thanks a little bit, I didn’t hear it, I didn’t answer. So, Jun Wu grabbed 
him and slammed it and asked, "Is it painful? Pain? Pain?" 


Every time he asked, he shook his thanks to the wall and yelled at him, but 
he called: "Sanlang don't come over! Nothing, I'm fine! Don't come over!" 


At least it is not the time. The time has not arrived! 


When the first hit, Huacheng has already rushed over. Just after two steps, 
I heard that thankfulness made him not to go, and he was hard to stop. 


But his face was completely paralyzed, and the blue veins on the back of 
his hand almost burst open, and the whole arm was shaking. 


Junwu’s expression is not moving, but his hands are crazy. He usually 
grabs the pity and slams into the rock and asks him repeatedly: “Is it 
painful? Is it painful?” 


Guoshidao: "His Royal Highness!!!" I don't know who I am calling. 
Thanks for the **** hands on the rugged rock wall, gnashing his teeth: 
". pain!!!" 


Jun Wu smiled with satisfaction, let go of the poor head and put him on 
the ground. 


Thanks for holding the still squeaky head and sitting on the ground, tears 
and blood are not controlled. Jun Wu was next to him, staring at his face 
for a while, suddenly raising his hand, touching his head, and then gently 
helping him wipe the blood on his face. 


" " 
The move was gentle and loving, as if a father was comforting him with a 


child who had just been beaten up by his own body. This picture shows the 
wind and the feelings of grief: "He...he...he is he crazy?" 


The hand bones of the Huacheng Knife creaked, and the pupils of the 
eyeballs contracted sharply, as if the blood was spreading. 


Thanks for the silence, let him help himself. Jun Wu said to himself: "You 
silly boy, if you hurt, why don't you look back? Do you think that the wall 
crashed when you hit it? Why don't you change your direction?" 


Thanks for your pity: "Do not look back." 


Junwu is extremely rude, raising his hand is a palm, playing his "squeaky" 
slamming to the ground! 


Xie Fu was dizzy and turned, and was raised by Jun Wu. He said with a 
patient patience that he lost: "You must make me angry, are you? Ask you 
once again, can't you change?" 


Xie pity coughed twice and coughed up a blood, saying: "Do not change." 


The gentle expression of Junwu finally showed a crack, and the twilight 
flashed. 


Guo Shi’s face was blue and he saw the situation was wrong. He quickly 
shouted: “His Royal Highness! You never want to kill this child. You like 
him very much! You said, you forgot!” 


Jun Wu sneered and said: "If this is not the case, I will not spend all of my 
patience and tolerance on him for more than 800 years. He has long since 
become the foundation of Xianjing and has been stepped on by thousands 
of people. It is." 


He turned to pity and suddenly angered: "But he is so ignorant, stubborn, 
self-willed, why don't you listen to me! You have to face me! You don't 
change it? Well, then you can try it. If your head hits the flower, will this 
wall fall down?" 


The national teacher saw him and thanked him again. He said, "His Royal 
Highness! His Royal Highness! His Royal Highness! His Highness, he is 
not sensible. You will bypass him this time, forget it! He will someday 
know how to be sensible." ...... 


Junwu looked at him and smiled colder: "Do you think I am really crazy? 
Don't want to lie to me. You really don't understand things in your heart, 
not him, but me?" 


The national teacher stunned, and Jun Wu said: "You cultivate him and 
teach him. It is nothing more than expecting him to overcome me. This 
will prove that I am wrong, you are right, you are right. A perfect phantom 
of Prince Wu Yong sighs at the current Junwu. Isn't that your purpose? Do 
you think I don't know what you think?" 


Guo Shidao: "No! Don't entangle in the right or wrong, I never thought 
about it!" 


Jun Wu couldn’t listen to it anymore, and sighed: “I’m thinking! Ill tell 
you, I’m thinking! No one can beat me! He’s even more impossible!” He 
laughed a few times and yelled at the rock. He slammed and said: "You 
can't change it? Can't change it? Can't change it?!" 


Xie Pity is also crazy, grabbing his arm and shouting: "Do not change! Do 
not change! Do not change!!!" 


Although he was hit by a star, it was extremely painful, but he was 
screaming at this tone, that is, he did not give him the answer he wanted, 
that is, he did not change, and he was so happy! 


He has been riding for too long. It seems that for many years, he has been 
waiting for such an opportunity, while bursting his blood and crying and 
yelling: "I just don't change! The pain does not change, the death does not 
change, never change!!!" 


Now, it is not that Junwu has forced him to go crazy, but he has maddened 
him! 


Junwu's eyes are red, and he is about to give him another lesson. Suddenly, 
his movements are stagnation and he looks down. I saw a long knife on his 
shoulder, and the long arrows made by the eight branches were neatly tied 
behind him. 


This is nothing, because the long knife and the arrow did not penetrate this 
layer of white armor. But his right hand is gone. 


The hand that grabbed the pity, disappeared. The whole disappeared from 
the wrist and the incisions were neat. Xie pity is gone. 


Looking back, the same thing flew toward him with a strong wind. He 
waved his left hand and grabbed the thing. He saw that it was his right 
hand. 


Opposite the bridge, Huacheng was holding the blood of the praying, 
holding a machete and carrying his hand on his back, and holding the 
wound on his head in the other hand. Sensen said: "Take your dirty hand 
back." ” 


Thanks to the death and not admit defeat, finally angered Jun Wu, let him 
leave a flaw! 


Jun Wu grabbed his right hand and reconnected it back to his wrist. He 
moved twice and pulled out the arrow on his back. Suddenly think of 
something, look back, just to see the long knife, white complexion. A pair 
of feelings on his eyes, a slight surprise, but still hard to scalp, forcibly 
calm. In a short while, he could not calm down. 


Junwu looked at his shoulder and whispered: "Sure enough, you are still 
worse than Xianle." 


Hearing his words, his face changed slightly, but his long knife suddenly 
fell, and then his face changed greatly, pulling up his sleeves and looking 
at his wrist. I saw that the black curse on his wrist suddenly tightened, and 
the meridians around him seemed to be full of blood flowing from it. 


Feng Xin saw a feeling of silence and stayed still, and said: "What are you 
doing, run!" 


Guoshi: "I believe in this kid, how can he run on his leg?" 


The wind was scared: "I am fucking!" I completely forgot about it! 


In the past, most of his feelings have been turned over by his anger, but 
now, running is useless. Cursing in your hand, it’s useless to run anywhere! 


The wind letter slammed and went up. Who knows that Jun Wu pulled the 
arrow off his back and threw it at him. Fengxin only felt a cold on his 
chest, looked down, and the eight arrows were all returned, and they were 
all in his chest! 


Jun Wu slowly walked towards Huacheng and thanked. Huacheng did not 
look at him at all, holding thanks and said: "Brother? Brother?" 


Xie Pity had just been smashed, and it took me a while to wake up, but 
also had a terrible headache. The eyes didn’t open and said: "...Sanlang? 
Are you okay?" 


Huacheng looked at him for a while and suddenly forced him into his 
arms. He said softly: "I am completely okay. Why don't you look at 
yourself?" 


Thanks for the pity in his arms, although he was held tightly, but he was 
not crushed to the wound, trying to open his eyes, and a mess of all around 
him came into view. 


The admiration stood stiffly in the same place, clutching the wrist of the 
other hand with one hand, seemed to be competing with the blood-sucking 
curse, but according to his pale face, it could not last long. 


Although the wind letter was not worn by the eight arrows, it was not hurt, 
and it fell on the bridge. The fetus is so ecstatic that he is screaming, 
jumping around him, stepping on the face of the wind letter with his hind 
legs, and the wind is furious, but it is impossible to move, otherwise the 
injury will definitely increase. 


The entire Tongtian Bridge is collapsing for a while, and they may fall 
with them at any time! 


Thanks for seeing the situation at the moment, I was surprised, I wanted to 
get up, and Huacheng helped him get up. The two looked at each other. 


The figure of Jun Wu, who slowly walked toward them, was 
extraordinarily tall in the fire on all sides, casting a large shadow. Thanks 
for the effort to wipe away the blood from the eyes and the nose and 
mouth, staring at the figure. 


Jun Wu is holding his heart. The heart of the sword condenses the 
unchanging aura. At this moment, he was calm and arrogant. The 
gentleman who slammed the praying madness on the rock seemed to be 
two people. "Xianle, you know very well, you will lose." 


Jun Wu knows too much about it. It is clear to him how to fight, and the 
mana is completely crushing him. Moreover, even if you haven't played 
against it, thank you can feel that Junwu's warfare and mana are stronger. 
Tonglushan as his site, the suppression of this side is also more obvious. 


Thank you for your pity, | am afraid that what he said is true. I can't win. 
However, even if you can't win, you must fight! 
Huacheng suddenly said: "No. Your Highness, won." 


Give me a pity and look at him. Huacheng also stared at him and said: 
"Win. You are better than him." 


His eyes lit up as if something was burning, and he said: "Trust me. He is 
wrong, you are right. You are better than him. You are much better than 
him!" 


Jun Wu gave a low laugh, perhaps because Huacheng’s words were 
innocent and ridiculous, perhaps because he was overturned by the power 
of applause. 


The power of faith of the millions of believers is in his hands! 


Huacheng grabbed his shoulder and said, "What about that? Ten fools are 
all waste! And you only need one person." 


Is one enough? 


Xie pity still did not respond, Huacheng pulled him over. 
Thank you for your pity. 
The spiritual power broke out and rushed into it. 


This time, it is more powerful than any mana exchange that has been 
tolerated by the past. Even the dead butterfly and the lava spirits seem to 
feel the horrible energy, exploding, exploding, and screaming around 
them. 


Xie pity fingers almost twitched, his legs shivered and trembled almost 
unbearably difficult to support, his heart shouted to stop, no, but Huacheng 
hands firmly clasped his head, not let him leave, let him refuse . 


I don't know how long it took, suddenly, thank you for a loose throat. At 
the same time, Huacheng finally let him go, Xie pity on the legs a soft, 
knees squatting, hands barely support the ground, this did not fall. 


Jun Wu stopped and looked at it, his face was awe. And Fengxin lies in the 
distance, incredulously said: "The temple, Your Highness, your... yours?" 


Thanks to the trembling hands and put on his throat. 
Nothing. 


Huacheng gave him too much mana. It’s really too much, completely 
beyond the scope of the curse. 


This bound his two shackles for more than 800 years and exploded! 2k 
novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 240: Smile, 
faint red dress 


Mourningly muttered: "How can there be such a thing? How could there be 
so much...???" 


I have never heard of anyone who 1s using force to smash the curse? ! 


Huacheng will pull down the ground and thank you for pulling up, said: 
"Brother, try again!" 


It happened that Jun Wu took the sword and thanked him for raising his 
hand. "Oh--", the heart was almost kicked out by him! 


This blow is completely different from the one! 


Thank you for your own hands, slightly embarrassed. He hasn't 
experienced this feeling for hundreds of years, and he almost forgot it. 
This is him. 


Strong enough to control your own strength, every step of the way to shake 
the mountain. Step by step, step into the sky! 


He clenched his fingers and punched the face of Jun Wu! 


After the war, Jun Wu’s face was always clean. This hit, finally shed some 
blood from his mouth. He wiped it off with his thumb and looked at the 
blood. 


The next moment, he slammed his hand and threw his heart to the side. 
It seems that he is going to meet with him! 


Thanks for being a punch, this punch was caught by Jun Wu and the 
backhand twisted. The pain hits, and the arm is screaming. But he 
immediately picked it up twice and then took another hand, and was 
intercepted by Jun Wu. If you are grateful, you will want to go to the party 


to be defeated by Jun Wu. Jun Wu naturally expected him to take this step 
and stop him from going. 


But he forgot, there are two morals and feelings behind him. Although 
both of them are half-dead, they are all sneaky and want to go to the heart 
of the sword. Their movements have been extremely slight. Junwu seems 
to have an eye behind him. The backhand is a palm. The bridge between 
the two feet breaks and falls to the Magma River! 


At the beginning of the millennium, one of the boots that had been 
handcuffed. And Fengxin took the boots of the love. He looked up again 
and said, "I am fucking!!! It’s really fucking! Guoshi, you don’t let the 
elderly go!" 


It is the national teacher who holds them. His forehead is violent: "You 
also know that I am an old man! Then hurry up!" 


Although the bridge was collapsed by Jun Wu, Xie Pity raised his hand 
and held it in the air. He still wants to go up again, but Jun Wu does not 
give him this free time. The three people are less than two or three feet 
away from the tumbling magma. The ear can hear the squeaking of the 
bubbles, and the feelings are hung at the bottom. Washing his head, being 
burnt red as charcoal, said: "Come on me!" 


Who knows, there are no two on the top, he called again: "Wait! Don't pull 
me up!" 


Guoshidao said: "What are you going to do?" 
Wind channel: "Are you really? Well, then I will let go!" 


Mu Qing said: "I fucked, you **** really let go, look below! Look at the 
sword!" 


Several people looked in the direction of his hand. I saw them directly 
below, a black jade sword inserted in the center of the magma, is slowly 
sinking. It’s just that they are going to steal, but they are shocked by 
Junwu! 


Mu Qing rushed to the handle and madly stretched his arms, as if he 
couldn't become a gibbons, but he couldn't reach it. He said, "Put me down 
a bit, I will almost be enough!!" 


The national faculty is even more powerful: "You two young people, I 
have an old bone, don't be too much!" 


He said that his boots were sinking in his hand, and his face was close to 
the magma river, his hair slipped and his hair was burning. Wind channel: 
"IT am fucking, your hair is on fire!!! It is going to burn out!!!" 


Fortunately, the love has finally pulled up the sword. He slaps the flame on 
his hair with one hand, and the other hand, with a splash of magma, throws 
it to thank you: "Thank you, then!" 


Thanks for raising his hand, holding the heart of the hilt! 


The national teacher also endured the limit: "I can't do it, you are coming 
up! " 


Fengxin saw that the national division had fought, and when the situation 
was not good, he slammed the admiration and said: "Tell you to ponder!" 


The feelings of love were smashed by him, and the anger was about to 
break out. In the pool under the fire, suddenly there were dozens of lava 
grievances! 


Those grievances seemed to jump out of the water and jumped up to the 
chest of the wind. If it is not a spiritual protector, I am afraid that the 
whole person will burn it. They were previously threatened by the wind 
and arrow, hateful, secretly lurking in the magma and trailing here, and the 
opportunity to pull him down. Unable to prevent it, the national division 
was also pulled forward by the sudden increase in weight. This time, it was 
the turn of the moment to grasp the boots of the National Teacher. 


The wind letter was originally wounded, and there were still a few arrows 
in the body forgot to take it. The hands and the grievances struggled, and 
the people who had been tempted to fight the top couldn’t hold him loose, 


and they were very passive. The lava grievances below are gathering more 
and more, and layers are stacked on him, as if they are in love with the 
national teacher. The strength on both sides should not be underestimated. 
If you continue this way, you may be forced to be torn in half! 


Feng Xin said: "Is it a good time to give a pain?!" 


Admiration: "Shut up!" Suddenly, he felt his hands suddenly and lightly, 
and those grievances seemed to finally let go, and quickly took the 
opportunity to pull the two men up. 


After coming up, the wind stunned and gasped a few mouthfuls of gas, and 
the screaming roar of the grievous spirits came from below. Several people 
looked down, and the sorrow and the national teacher said: "Faith, it is 
your son!" 


Sure enough, among the red lava grievances, a white flower flower 
smashed and smashed and was biting them. 


Those lava grievances are at least two thousand old ghosts, and in groups, 
how can they be afraid of a kid who is not even a baby? Grabbing and 
biting, the body of the fetus was originally white, and it was already hot 
and bloody. It was red and screaming, and it was not so bad. It only made 
people feel terrible. The wind letter broke out. 


He was furious and said: "Don't be your bad face, a group of adults bully a 
child!!! Wrong, come over!" 


That fetus does not beat so many grievances, it has already sprouted, and 
when someone hears someone to give him a head, he screams and jumps to 
the shoulders of the wind. Feng Xin took down the long bow, an arrow that 
smashed his chest, and even the arrow of the bead came out, and the blast 
of the river blew, and the fetus was screaming on his shoulders, seemingly 
applauding. Over there, thank you for seeing them out of danger, and 
finally rest assured that they are preparing to concentrate on Jun Wu, but 
suddenly they have a chest. 


Jun Wu locked his whole person from behind him and said, "I didn't say it. 
Do you think that your skills are learned from it? All your moves, I know 
everything!" 


This lock, if you can't earn it, you will be trapped. However, all the tactics 
he can think of, Junwu can certainly think of it! 


At this time, he heard Huacheng Road: "Brother, don't be afraid! You must 
have tricks that he doesn't know, only you can use it, and he can't use 
tricks!" 


Suddenly, thank you for the flash of light in your mind. 
Does he have it? 

He does have it! 

Since you can't break free, don't break free! 


He turned around in Junwu's arm, facing the enemy, and locked Liyun, 
saying one word: "This trick, you will not!" 


He grabbed Jun Wu, and with the body of two people, slammed into the 
solid rock wall! 


This collision, he used ten percent of the strength, the rumble of rock 
formations, he also heard the sound of something shattered. 


That was uploaded from Jun Wu. 
His white armor is completely broken! 


At the same time, Jun Wu let go of him and angered: "Roll! Give me a 
roll!!!" 


Thanks for raising his head, his hair is stunned. It is the face that greets 
you and makes you mad. 


The three faces ran out again! 


Xie pity once again raised the sword, a sword pierced the heart of Jun Wu, 
nailed him on the rock wall! 


Blood spilled from the mouth of Junwu. 


Thanks to this sword, the most mana he could penetrate, blasted in the 
moment after stabbing Jun. Strong self-healing ability, can not be 
repaired! 


The mountain has collapsed. 


Junwu was originally nailed to the rock wall. After the rock mountain 
collapsed, it became lying on the ground. 


But he still hasn't given up, holding the heart of the sword with his 
backhand, seems to want to write on the blade. That is naturally a spell, it 
must be stopped. Thanks to Pity, just raised his hand, the National Teacher 
rushed over and said: "His Royal Highness! Forget it, forget it!" 


Thanks for the pity, I don’t know which one he called, but who is the one. 
Jun Wu coughed up a blood and angered: "Get out of my way!" 


The national teacher was beside him and said to him: "Your Highness, 
forget it! Really forget it. It is not interesting to continue fighting." 


Jun Wudao: "What do you know?! Go away!" 


Guoshi said: "I don't understand. For so many years, your gods have also 
done it. The ghost king has also done it. The killings are all killed. I want 
to get all the hands. What is your pain? What are you? What do you want? 
What do you want to prove?" 


Wen Yan, Jun Wu’s face flashed for a moment. 


But for a long time, he violently slammed the throat of the national 
division and angered: "You are less likely to teach me! You are not 
qualified to teach me! No one is qualified to teach me!" 


At present, the strength of Junwu is not enough. This is not difficult to 
understand. Xie Pity is trying to save people. The National Teacher has 
waved his hand to let him not move. He continued: "His Royal Highness." 


Jun Wu looked at him coldly, still did not let go. 


Even if he is not strong enough now, it is very dangerous to break the neck 
of the national division. The national teacher took him to squat himself 
and said: "I teach you the Highness of the Prince, not to teach you a man 
who has not taken the wrong path, and then use him to humiliate you. He 
is him, you are you, you are not The same person, there is a different path, 
it is normal. I used to say, you don't believe, then now?" 


Jun Wu stared at him and said nothing. 


Guo Shidao said: "I just really missed His Royal Highness, I missed the 
former Wuyong country, missed us all, and those days when we did not 
fly." 


Guo Shi said: "So many years, His Royal Highness, I just looked at you, I 
feel very tired, very tired, yourself? Are you really tired?" 


As the first Wushu of the Three Realms, Junwu’s face and manners are 
always perfect and spotless. At this point, all the auras were removed, and 
the pity found that even if the three human face epidemics were removed, 
his face was too pale. 


The outline is too cold, and it is slightly black under the eyelids. It looks 
gloomy and hard, and there is no such gentleness as it appears under the 
halo. 


However, now, he seems to be alive. Although it is also embarrassing. 


Guo Shidao: "Your Highness, you have already lost. Give yourself a 
reer.’ 


Jun Wu is a little confused: "I lost?" 


Too strong mana fluctuations smashed the dome of the cave, and the faint 
sunshine sprinkled from above. 


There seems to be rain falling in the air. Jun Wu was lying on the ground, 
thanking him for standing, looking down at him from the height of his 
downs, and actually saw a relief from his expression. 


He couldn't help but wonder, perhaps, who was defeated, the end of this 
split and the madness of day after day, and the desire of Junwu has always 
been deep inside. 


For a long while, Jun Wu suddenly asked: "That, what is called." 


Thanks to the sleeves, rubbing the blood on the face, said: "The chest is 
broken with big stones." 


Jun Wuyi, seems to think of something, smiled, sighed, closed his eyes, 
said: "Beautiful." 


He didn't say a word more, but everyone could see that his face could no 
longer cover the exhaustion. 


The hand of thankfulness finally moved down from the handle of the heart. 
In the next step, I couldn’t think of what to do, and I couldn’t help but look 
at the flower city. Huacheng is still standing in the same place. The only 
section of the bridge that has not collapsed has been quietly waiting for 
him for a long time. See him turning back, greet him and smile. 


The national teacher sat next to the unmoving Jun Wu and said, "Your 
Highness, let's go." 


He didn't mean to rise up, thanked him: "Master, don't you leave?" 


Guo Shi shook his head and said: "I will accompany my Royal Highness. 
After all, I did not accompany him." 


The rain is getting bigger and bigger, washing the face of Junwu and the 
blood and vitality flowing from the wound. 


Looking at it, thank you for feeling that the three faces on his face seemed 
to fade away. I don't know if it is an illusion. 


After a moment of silence, Xie pity took off the back of the bucket and 
dropped it, covering it on Jun's face. 


The curse on the wrist of the love has already fallen off automatically. He 
flew up and kicked it into the magma, and the cool calmness was barely 
found. The feudal spirit of the wind and shoulders jumped down, and the 
four feet used to climb to the face of Junwu, carefully touching him, and 
his attitude was very different when he stepped on Jun's face, and the wind 
was convinced. 


Thanks for the rest, no matter what else, the nose and the face swollen to 
the flower city, like a rebirth - in fact, it is indeed the rest of the robbery, 
tied to him, said: "Sanlang!" 


Huacheng extended his hand to Xie, and then he was stepped back. He 
wrapped his arms around him and smiled and said: "Brother, you see, I 
will say, will you win?" The face was lifted up, looked carefully, and 
sighed. "You made yourself look like this." 


He pointed his fingertips, and the little silver butterfly fluttered over and 
the scars faded. Xie pity also smiled and said: "The next time will not!" 


Huacheng picked up his eyebrows and made a cold gesture: "There is no 
next time." 


After a pause, thanked the pity and smiled, and earnestly said: "Sanlang, 
before in the Tonglushan, I said, after going out, there is something to tell 
you, do you remember?" 


Huacheng smiled and said: "Remember naturally. I remember every word 
that my brother said." 


Xie pity lowered his head, he was embarrassed, so it was easy to get 
courage, and frankly said: "Jun Jun has revealed a few words, and it is also 
related to this matter. To be honest, I should have told you long ago, but I 
have been unable to make up my mind. I am afraid you know..." 


Huacheng Road: "I am afraid that I know that His Royal Highness has 
become a catastrophe in white, right?" 


Thank you for your kindness: "You...?" 

Huacheng did not answer the question positively. Instead, he kneeled down 
in front of him and looked up at him. He smiled and said: "How? Brother, 
so, remember?" 

How can you not remember? 


At that time, the nameless ghost often squatted on his knees! 


The pale smile and the smiling face of Huacheng at the moment overlap. 
Thanks for the trepidation and softness of his feet, he sat directly in front 
of him, muttering: "...Sanlang... Yes, it is you!" 


Huacheng laughed and kept his knees on one knee. The only remaining eye 
stared at him and said, "Your Highness, I have been watching you." 


Xie pity can only say one word: "You...you..." 


He finally understood what it meant to be a lot of words that he had never 
meant to say to him in the past. 


It turned out to be the case. He never thought about it, it turned out to be 
no name, it is Huacheng! 


He knows all about it. He saw it all. He has been there all the time! 


Suddenly, a thousand tastes and all kinds of words rushed into my heart. 
Grateful, sorrowful, painful, ecstasy, deeper, and incurable love. 


The chest of pity was hurried to explode, and the expression of a word 
could not be squeezed out. He could only rush to the ground and shouted: 
"Sanlang!" 


He seems to only say the word, and shouted again: "Sanlang!" 


Huacheng was thrown down by him, sitting on the ground with him, 
holding back and praying, laughing. The original fear fears swept away, 
and Xie pity wrapped around his neck, smiling and laughing, and thought 
of tears. 


But the tears have not fallen, and he has found a very bad thing. 


Although Huacheng is a ghost, his body has never been the same as 
ordinary people. 


However, the flower city that is now hugged by him, the bright red dress, 
is slightly transparent. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 241: Smiles 
gradually faded red 2 


Xie pity grabbed him and said: "Sanlang?! What happened to you?" 
Huacheng is still calm, said: "Nothing. Just a little too much." 


Thank you for your pity: "... Why don't you tell me earlier, how can this be 
called nothing?!" 


Mana, those mana! 


Huacheng sent the mana to Xie, and it always seemed to be inexhaustible. 
He smiled as if he had no burden, but it was his own mana, and it was not 
the sand that the big waves scoured. How could it really be inexhaustible? 
Inexhaustible? 


This can't blame Huacheng for not saying it, but can only blame him for 
not thinking about it. Thanks and regrets, "I will give it back to you." 


He kissed the face of Huacheng and kissed him. The wind letter and the 
enthusiasm wanted to come over. When I saw this scene, I immediately 
turned back a few feet to open the distance, and let them both get there. 


The curse has been removed, and he desperately put all the mana he can 
squander into the city of Huacheng, and wants to let him recover as soon 
as possible. However, he kissed for a while, let go of it, the red dress of the 
flower city cuffs and the pair of silver wristbands, still transparent, even 
translucent! 


Thank you for your pity for a while, my heart was scared, and the 
subconsciously held the face of Huacheng to kiss it. Huacheng was quick- 
eyed, and took his face back. He kissed him and smiled. "Although my 
brother is so active, I am very happy. But I still don't have to give me the 
mana. However, if my brother is not borrowing mana, but simply wants to 
kiss me, I don't mind at all. The more the better, the more welcome." 


Xie Li grabbed him tightly and was about to collapse: "What is going 
on?!" 


Huacheng Road: "Just take a little rest, brother, don't be afraid." 


Xie pity hugged his head and said: "How can I not be afraid? I am going 
crazy!" 


With the temperament of Huacheng, if it is not a serious problem, so 
serious that he can no longer cover up, how can he let Xie pity see him like 
this? 


How many mana are there to explode two curses? It is no exaggeration to 
say a vast expanse like Jiang Hai. How could he not have a slight 
influence? 


It’s hard, it’s hard to settle all the messy things. The wind and the feelings 
are open. The curse that bound him for more than eight hundred years was 
also solved. I have always wanted to confess to the flower city and not to 
confess. 


But when he smiled back and ran back, the flower city that greeted him 
became like this. How could he not be afraid? He is afraid of being crazy! 


The wind and the feelings of the feelings are not right, far from the 
ground: "His Royal Highness? What's wrong?!" A few steps to this side, 
but for some reason, I was in the middle of the road, I feel that it is not 
easy to approach. Xie Pity can't notice anyone at the moment. He grabbed 
the flower city and his heart stopped beating. He was frightened and said, 
"What should I do?" 


Huacheng sighed slightly, stretched out his arms and slammed him into his 
arms again. "His Royal Highness, I have been watching you." 


This is the second time he said this, and it was more soft. Thanks to the 
red dress on his chest, he said: "I know, I know. But... what should I do 


now?" 


Huacheng’s slender fingers gently combed his messy hair and said: “Your 
Highness, then you know, why don’t I leave the world?” 


Thanks for the pity, I can't understand why Huacheng 1s still so calm and 
trembled in anxiousness, but the Six Gods are still in the Lord, and they 
still ask some silly: "Why?" 


Huacheng whispered: "Because I have a beloved person still in this world." 
Hearing this sentence, thank you for your slightest glimpse. 
He seems to have heard this sentence. 


Huacheng continued: "My sweetheart is a brave gold leaf and jade leaf. He 
saved my life. I looked at him from a very young age. But I want to catch 
up with him and become better and stronger for him. People. Although he 
may not remember me very much, we have not even said a few words. I 
want to protect him." 


He stared at his pity and said: "If your dream is to save the people, then 
my dream is only one of you." 


Thanks for the memory, the trembling asked: "...but...1n that case, you will, 
you can't rest...?" 


Huacheng replied: "I will never rest in peace." 


In an instant, the breath of pity was stopped at this moment. Hearing two 
voices in one question and one answer. 


"If your loved one knows that you can't rest for yourself, I'm afraid I will 
be annoyed." 


"Then I won't let him know why I don't leave." 


"See you more, you will always know." 
"That wouldn't let him discover that I was protecting him." 


That group of wildfires. The lantern was fired by him for a few nights with 
a few dollars. In the cold winter night, I want to take him out of the grave. 
Stop him in front of the white innocence and keep him from approaching 
dangerous fires. In the heart of the sword, he replaced the screaming fire! 


Huacheng whispered: "His Royal Highness, I know all about you. 


"Your bravery, your despair; your kindness, your pain; your resentment, 
your abomination; your intelligence, your stupidity. 


"If you can, I would like you to treat me as a stepping stone, cross the 
bridge, climb up the bones to be stepped on, and live the sinners. But I 
know you won't." 


As he said, the maple on the clothes was dimmed. 


Xie pity grabbed him with both hands, still did not stop to send him mana, 
and did not stop the gradual desalination of Huacheng figure. 


His eyes are blurred, incoherent and stuttering: "...you don't want to say it, 
I understand...but, but don't you be so good, Saburo. I... I also borrowed a 
lot of mana." Also, the words I just said have not been finished yet, and 
there are still a lot left. No one has listened to me for many years, will you 
stay? You really... Don’t do this. I can’t stand it, Saburo. I really Can't 
stand it. Two times, it has been twice! I don't want to have another third 
time!!!" 


Huacheng has disappeared twice for him from this world! 
Huacheng said: "It is my supreme glory to fight for you." 


This sentence is like a fatal blow. The tears in the eyes of Xie’s pity can no 
longer be tolerated and come out. 


He seemed to seize the last straw, saying: "You said you will not leave." 
Huacheng said: "There is nothing in the world." 
Xie pity buried his head deeply, his throat was sore and he could not speak. 


Immediately, I heard Huacheng say above him: "But I will never leave 
you." 


Hearing words, thank you for raising his head. 
Huacheng said to him: "I will come back. Your Highness, believe me." 


Although his voice was firm, his pale face began to fade and become 
transparent. Xie pity reached out and wanted to touch the face, but the tip 
of the finger penetrated the past. He glanced and looked up again. 


Huacheng’s eyes were gentle and blazing, and only one of the remaining 
eyes was full of love, staring at him silently, seeming to say a word, but no 
sound. Xie pity refused to give up, stretched out his hands, hugged him, 
wanted to hear. 


But he was not working hard, and the person who was hugged by him and 
hugged him disappeared. 


In front of him, the flower city instantly shattered into thousands of silver 
butterflies, turning into a starry wind that could not hold and could not 
hold. 


Cheering hands hugged empty, maintaining a hug posture, motionless. He 
didn't know if he didn't respond or couldn't move. He sat in a dreamlike 
butterfly array and widened his eyes. 


Under the wind letter and admiration, I never imagined that there would be 
such a scene. Both faces were white and rushed up: "His Royal Highness!" 


The wind letter is rushed up first, said: "How could this suddenly happen?! 
Was it not so good now? Is it because of cursing?!" 


Muddy jumped two times and jumped twice, couldn’t jump up, and looked 
up at the silver butterflies and shouted: “Blood rain! Don’t be kidding, 
don’t die, hurry out!” 


Of course, those silver butterflies will not answer him, and they will be 
disturbed and fluttering to the sky. Feng Xin reached out and thanked him, 
but he couldn’t stand up on the ground. Fengxin didn’t know what to do, 
said: “Is there anything we can help? Want mana? Can you save? What 
should I do?” 


I have already seen what I have, and said: "Forget it, shut up! - Nothing 
needs to be done." 


The sky is shining and the wings are shining, just like they reunited for the 
first time in eight hundred years. 


A silver butterfly flies over and over, and he has a little bit on his back, 
cheeks, and forehead, and he is in love with it. Xie pitifully reached out 
and let it perch on his own hands. 


The silver butterfly seemed to be delighted, patted the butterfly wing and 
surely stayed for him. But it can't last long. In a short while, it will 
dissipate with the wind. 


However, where it stayed, the third finger of the pity, the red line, bright 
and still. 


"and then?" 
"It's over." 


"End?" 


"It's over." 


I finally couldn't help it: "No. How could it be here? I can see that a 
layman can't finish it?" 


Mu Qing put a thick stack of books on the table, and said coldly: "I figured 
it out like this. It’s over here. I can count it again on the spot. Please listen 
to the general: Listen to the eight hundred and eighty. 80,000 merits, plus 
6.66 million merits, plus 17.2 million merits, and then deducted..." 


Wind channel: "It doesn't matter if you do it. The number is correct, but it 
definitely misses a lot. Otherwise it won't be right!" 


Admire the feelings: "That's not my problem, anyway, I am not wrong. Or 
you can find someone to count it. I know that I will not be idle." 


After the destruction of Xianjing, the sacred and sacred priests were able 
to reunite, and they pulled the border on the top of Mount Tai Cang, where 
no one was interested, and set up a temporary heaven court. At present, the 
priests are discussing the renovation and reconstruction of Xinxianjing. 


However, it is unfortunate that the fire was not only burned out by the 
extraordinary Golden Temple group, but now they can only squash on this 
desolate mountain, and they can only rest in the temporary shed. It also 
caused all the papers to be burned, a large number of records disappeared, 
pulled and pulled, and it took a few days, and it’s still unclear until now! 


One arm tied with a bandage hanging around the neck, the other hand 
touched the chin, said: "I don't know if it is my illusion, Xuan Zhen's 
recent tone is more and more yin and yang." 


Wind channel: "Is he not always so yin and yang? Now I am too lazy to do 
the surface work." 


The feelings turned a blind eye, and everyone pointed to him: "It’s not like 
iW 


Turn your feelings and turn away. Quan Yizhen was wrapped in a bandage, 
wrapped in a humanoid guise, only revealing a mess of curly hair, the 
voice vaguely said: "What should I do now? Who is going to count?" 


Everyone, you look at me, I hope you, have coughed, and quietly retreat, 
no one is willing to pick up this thankless errand. When I saw it, I sighed 
and said, "Oh, if the spirit is still there. Anyway, she has nothing to say. 
These messy things are recorded in her mind, and the Lingwen Hall burns 
out." Not afraid. Within a day, I will definitely pay the result." 


I have tossed this for a long time on this broken mountain. I have already 
thought about this in my heart. I just dare not say that someone has taken 
the lead and has echoed: "Yes!" 


"I will not be inefficient in the future!" 
"I haven't been jealous..." 
At this time, someone outside reported: "You, Rain Master is here!" 


It was said that all the officials of the gods were happy on the face, and 
they all voluntarily greeted them. Only the look of the gods was subtle. It 
seemed to hesitate for a moment, or chose not to go out. At this time, 
another voice said: "His Royal Highness, you are coming!" 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 242: Too 
crested with thousands of dust 


For a moment, the look of the gods on the faces of the gods became more 
subtle. 


A white man sings out, his face is calm, and his grace is calm and gentle. 
Everyone greeted him: "His Royal Highness." "His Royal Highness." 


Desperate words, no one is careless, polite. Thanks and politeness, 
everyone greeted everyone and greeted them. They said, "The Rain 
Master." 


The rain guard took the tall guardian horse and rode the black cow. He 
came to the temporary shack and made a dagger to the side. 


The black cow was also carrying a large box of local products, which was 
specially sent over. It is said that there was a miraculous effect of 
nourishing the law, and the gods listened, and some of them were eager to 
go up and part, and some did not move. There is no movement in thanking 
the pity, the rain teacher said: "I brought something else to His Royal 
Highness." 


Thanks and smiled: "Oh, then thank you first! What is it?" 


The rain sergeant took out a small piece of white cloth wrapped in the 
sleeve. As soon as she opened it, she thanked her and her eyes were bright. 
"Thank you, Master Rain! I am looking for this everywhere!" 


Fengxin also came over and said: "Spirited silk! Great! Your stuff can 
finally be repaired!" 


Xie pity smashed in the sleeves and took out two broken white scorpions. 
He said: "Yes, I finally found a material that can repair the evil! I will fill 
it up!" 


The wind letter stopped him and said: "You make up, forget it, what can 
you make up, ask someone to help you." He turned back and shouted, 
"Muscle! Come and work!" 


The admiration came slowly and coldly, "What? What do you mean? Call 
me to make up?" 


Wind channel: "Isn't that your special skill?" 


Mu Qing said: "You will use people too much, and I will call you now, I 
am afraid that I will sweep the floor tomorrow." 


Thank you, haha, laughing: "Forget it, forget it. I will come by myself." 


However, he has already taken the white scorpion from his hand and 
turned his eyes to find the needle thread. Later, he also came over and said 
hello. He wanted to pat the black cow, but he was bitten by the big mouth 
of the cow. He almost bit his finger and asked for a boring, and quickly 
left. Yu Shi said: "Is the general arm still not good?" 


Thanks to pity: "No. At the beginning, he and Rong Guang said that he 
would use the Mingguang sword. In addition to asking him to apologize, 
he would have to pay an arm as a price. Although the final disappointment 
was dissipated, leaving a few faces did not have to His arm is still not 
hurt." 


Rainy said: "It turns out that it 1s no wonder that the general looks so 
strange." 


Thankfulness but heart: "He is not surprised because of this." 


It turned out that Yu was always rescued by the rain teacher in the 
Tonglushan and Xianjing fires. He is such a big man who is a good man 
from the top of his head. He can’t bear to lose a little face in front of a 
woman, especially a woman with old grievances. Compared with the rain 
teacher, probably Xuan Ji’s behavior is more acceptable to him. In short, it 
is impossible to let go of it, and seeing the rain teacher is difficult to level, 
so it looks strange. 


However, the rainman did not understand what he cares about, and always 
politely reported a smile, the two are not on a road at all, simply 
inexplicably funny. 


Rainy said: "Yes, how is Your Royal Highness, how is Xuan Ji?" 


Thanks to pity: "Xuan Ji is locked down the mountain, are you going to see 
it?" 


After the war, the demons and ghosts who had escaped from the 
crackdowns were temporarily taken into the dungeons temporarily set up 
under the Tai Cang Mountain. Thanks for the way, not to the dungeon, I 
heard a scream of screams, and sat in the door for half a month. 


Now that the staff is too nervous, it is not enough, so they are sent to help 
the heavens to guard the dungeon. In the prison, the enemies were 
engraved, and the enemies met with extraordinarily blushing. He had a lot 
of enthusiasm for the two men all day long. They pretended not to 
understand, and the wood people sat in the same row. Seeing the two men 
walking in, they all stood up and said: "His Royal Highness, Rain Master." 


The rainman gave them a box of local products and thanked him: "It’s hard 
for you. Rain Master wants to see Xuan Ji." 


I stayed behind and hesitated, saying: "Xuan Ji..." 
Xie Pity is not right: "What happened?" 


When the two entered the prison and found the place to hold the Xuan Ji, 
they were all a glimpse. I saw the prison, empty, and only a set of ragged 
red wedding dresses. 


: "Xuan Ji, it was dissipated last night." 


It’s incredible that Xuan Ji’s grievances have dissipated. Not long ago, the 
woman’s obsession was still so deep, and she refused to let go. Thanks for 
the pity: "Maybe I finally figured it out." 


I have figured out why in the past few hundred years, I have turned from a 
heroic girl to a mad, disgusted woman. If you lose something and get 
something, I am afraid it will be extremely shameful and I will not look 
back. 


She was eager to abandon her man can be touched or threatened by 
himself, and turned back to heart, but suddenly found that there was no 
room for change from the beginning, and finally figured it out. 


However, she is able to stay in the world with the meaning of 
confrontation, and she is unwilling to stay in the world. If she thinks about 
it, there is no need to stay. It 1s quite boring to think about it. 


The rainman sat down in the same place and seemed to be superfluous for 
her. After all, that is the only person in the world who its the only rain 
teacher country in the world. Thanks for the inconvenience, I stopped and 
went out. 


After I went out, I saw the fruit that I had planted in the Yushi Division for 
half a month and half a month. Xie Pity also smashed and prepared to be 
with them. Who knows, he suddenly felt something, and suddenly looked 
back. I saw something in the grass that was not far from the height of the 
people, and there was something flashing past. 


Xie pity immediately threw the fruit and said: "Look here!" ran up. 


The things in the grass were noticed by him and escaped faster. Originally, 
he could catch up with eight steps, but when he ran out of four steps, he 
found out who it was, and he thought about it and slowed down. 


When the thing escaped for a while, he suddenly sneaked out from the side 
and stopped the other party to go. He said: "Ginger orchid girl, are you 
going to stop saying goodbye?" 


The other party is the ghostly scorpion holding the gladioli of the fetus, 
and was shocked by the gratitude of God, saying: "It's you!" 


The white flower's fetal spirit grinned in her arms and seemed to want to 
launch an attack. The sword orchid held it down and said, "Are you 
coming to stop me?" 


Xie pity did not want her to be too vigilant, said: "You don't want to be 
nervous, I just want to give you something." 


He said, he handed out the same thing and said: "Your son is very wrong 
and needs to be in charge. Although it is already in purification, but you 
are not as good as it is, it is difficult to prevent accidents. You need this 
thing. Help you." 


It was a self-made amulet, and Xie Li also made a special demonstration 
to ensure that there was no eccentricity. Jianlan looked at it, and she was 
very vigilant. After all, this thing was very useful. After a moment of 
hesitation, she took it and said, "Thank you." 


Thank you for your pity: "No. As long as you use it, yell three times, 
‘Please protect my Royal Highness, please.’ This can be recorded in my 
name.” 


The gladioli took a few steps, paused, still couldn't hold back, and turned 
back: "You don't stop me? Why?" 


Xie pity waited for her to turn back, did not answer and asked: "Why are 
you wearing a swordsman girl? The wind letter said that he will take care 
of you, he will keep his promise." 


Gladiola's face changed. Finally, she sighed and said, "I know he will. But 
forget it. I don't want to go with him anymore." 


Thank you for your pity, saying: "You are... I don't like him at all?" 


The gladioli probably was tired and sat down on the side of the road. He 
said, "It doesn't matter if you like it or not. I don't want to force him to 
take us around." 


Xie Li sat down next to her and thought about it. "When the wind letter 
must really like you. At that time, he was so overwhelmed, but still 
refused to give up." 


Wen Yan, Sword Lan seems to remember something a long time ago, 
smiled and said: "You said this, I think of it. He was stupid at that time, 
spent a lot of money to save money, bought money for one night, but 
moved A stool sat on me for one night, doing nothing, just chatting with 
me. Everyone used him as a joke, laughing at the dead!" 


Xie pity also smiled and said: "Look, I said that he likes you very much." 


The sword orchid has a smile and said: "What you said is all the previous 
things. Once I liked it, 1t doesn't mean I will always like it. I was 
abandoned by people and I was not allowed to do it." 


Thanks to pity: "How can he dislike you? You still don't know who the 
wind letter is?" 


Gladiolus said: "Your prince is not a human fireworks, of course, thinking 
too simple. Now it will not, on the surface will not. But after a long time, 
then it is not allowed. I want to find He, I have been looking for it, 
Nanyang Temple is not very rare, there is a time all over, but I don't want 
to. 


"He has soared, has the ability, the scenery, but we are all ghosts, what am 
I looking for? A priest with two ghosts, is this not to make him 
embarrassed? 


"When I look at it the best, I put him on the kick. I think it's so good and 
arrogant. In that case, I will always look like that in his heart, not now, it is 
a heavy makeup. And the corners of the eyes are fine." 


She licked her face and said: "If he really recognizes us, facing me this 
face every day, the mistake is still like this, we are dragging our legs, only 
one day tired, tired, always have One day will become disgusting. Why 
bother? That would be too sad, isn’t it?” 


During the speech, the baby spirit has been licking her face with a wet 
tongue, with a subtle and disgusting naughty cuteness. But in the eyes of 
ordinary people, it is probably only disgusting, and it is unacceptable. 


Gladiolus also touched the bare head of his son and said: "I have enough 
mistakes anyway. Who is ignorant when she is young and ignorant? Isn't it 
a pledge? It's true, love, forever. But in this world. The longer I am, the 
more I understand that 'forever' is impossible, and it will never be 
possible. It’s not bad. No one can really do it. I don’t believe it.” 


She reluctantly said: "The wind letter is a good person. Just... it really has 
been too long. Everything is different, or forget it." 


Thanks for listening quietly, without speaking, my heart said: "No." 


There is a voice in his heart that says, ““forever’ is there. Someone can do 
it. I believe it.” 


The gladioli still went with the wrong mistake. 


Thanks for returning to send the rain teacher who had finished the Xuan Ji, 
and then returned to the Tai Cang Mountain, and wanted to tell the wind 
letter Jianlan that he had gone, but did not see him. Looking for someone 
in the chaos, I heard someone shouting: "Taihua is coming! Is it free? Help 
me!" 


There are still people in the world who are still paying for it. Lang Qiangiu 
avoids it and says: "Don't take it, I have something, find someone else!" 


Thank you for your sigh, but he thought that he would try to calculate it. 
Unexpectedly, just after a few steps, he listened to a voice behind him: 
"Master...the country...His Royal Highness." 


Thanks for turning back, Lang Qianqiu stood behind him. He rubbed his 
cheek and said: "Let's talk in one step, can you?" 


Thanks for your pity: "Okay." 


So, he and Lang Qianqiu went to the shabby hall outside the shabby hall. 
Walking and walking, thanked and asked: "How is the millet? Is it 
alright?" 


Lang Qianqiu smiled bitterly: "I don't know if it's good. The child asked 
me all the time to ask him to groan, blame the poor, I had to... put a little 
ghost of the green ghost in a light. Now he runs in front of me with the 
lamp every day, and asks me how the soul in the lamp will grow up! I 
am..." 


Look at him with a depressed face, think about this experience can also 
understand, I really do not know that he was killed by the family, why do 
you still have to do this kind of thing. Xie pity subconsciously wants to pat 
him on the shoulder, but think about what he did in Yongan, or hold back, 
Wen said: "It’s hard. Then, what is it about you looking for me today?" 


After a moment of hesitation, Lang Qianqiu reached into his arms and 
took out one thing and handed it to him, saying: "This." 


When I saw the thing, the breath of pity was slightly congested. 
It is a small, deep red coral bead that is radiant and radiant. 
He trembled: "This is...?!" 


Lang Qianqiu said: "This coral bead is the secret treasure left by the 
ancestors of Yongan." 


It is said that thanking me, this is not the one that Huacheng fell to the 
end, but the one he gave to Lang Ying. 


Not a flower city. He lost his heart, but he took the beads. At this time, 
Lang Qianqiu said: "The ancestors once said that the person who sent him 
this red coral bead is his benefactor and helped him. It is a very good 
person." 


" " 


Lang Qianqiu said again: "But he still did one thing and let that person 
lose everything. The ancestors said that he did not regret doing it, he could 
not do it. But for that person, he later thought about it, still felt some 
Sorry." 


Thanks: "And then?" 


Lang Qianqiu said: "Then, in Xianjing, I looked at the **** rain and the 
tail of the flower, and the more I saw it, the more my father gave me this 
one. Later, I heard the general Xuanzhen said, this bead It was originally a 
pair, it was yours. So, I just want to ask, is this your thing?" 


For a long while, thanked and nodded slowly, saying: "It's mine. It was a 
pair of beads that I sent to me after my father and mother." 


Lang Qianqiu scratched his hair and said: "That... I will give it back." 


He still didn't know what to call for thanks, and he took the beads, and 
after a while, he walked away silently. Xie pity stood in the same place, 
holding the red coral beads in his hand. 


More than 800 years. Going around, the other pair of crimson coral beads 
earrings returned to him. It is his, or his. 


Only, another bead should have been there at this time. It could have been 
made into a pair. 


At this time, the voice of the wind and happiness was heard from the 
mountain: "His Royal Highness! Everyone! Come over!" 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 243: Jun pity, I 
am pity 


Thanks for accepting the beads and looking down. In the simple shed, a 
few priests also came out and asked: "What happened to General 
Nanyang?" 


Just listen to the wind channel: "Look at what I caught!" 


He smashed out of the forest and ran up, catching a black man in his hand, 
and the gods were shocked: "Lingwen!" 


It is the spirit that is taken by the wind. Fengxin said to pray: "As you 
expected, the spirits really went to take the brocade!" 


After taking down the curse, Xie Li mana soared to the point where he 
could compete with Jun Wu, and the Jin Yixian naturally couldn’t help 
him anymore. The spirit was beaten by the flower city as a tumbler. It was 
lost in the war. When the time passed, the spells on her body would be 
automatically unlocked and disappeared. But thankful that she would 
probably come to take the Jinyixian, so she took off the clothes and asked 
the ghost market to release the sound of the wind, and it was natural that it 
was hooked. 


As a fugitive, Lingwen was taken to the temporary council, but he still did 
not see the panic. As soon as she came up, she pressed her shoulder and 
pressed her to the table to sit down. Shen Sheng said: "I finally found you! 
Lingwen, you have to pay the price!" 


More than a dozen priests also gathered around, all eyes like | wolf | like | 


tiger, look like | hungry | like | thirsty, almost near. Lingwen is a little bit 
uncomfortable: "...what do you want to do." 


A loud bang, a stack of nearly high-profile official documents was thrown 


in front of her, and fell to the table with chairs. 
file, said: "These, you deal with." 


"a palm shot on the 


The spirit seems to be relieved, but it feels awkward. Unexpectedly, this 
tone is still not loose, so listen to "Hey!" 


After the seventeen-eighth loud noise, the massive manuscripts of the 
seventeen-eighth stack of people were thrown over and surrounded her. 


Seventeen or eight priests said to her from the gap between Juan Zonglin: 
"Wait for a few more days! Come and help me!" "These are all handled." 
"The missing part 1s remembered." "It's best to organize ours within one 
hour!"... 


Lingwen: "..." 


After a day and a night, Lingwen was finally released from the temporary 
council. 


The original messy files have been completely processed after a day and 
night of fighting, and the classification is neat and tidy. The gods and 
officials happily took the look of their own temples, and the spirits had 
already turned pale, and the dark circles that had disappeared for a while 
under the eyes came out again. 


After the people checked over there, they were overjoyed and said: "Sure 
enough, Jie Qing is more efficient! This can be right!" 


"Clear! Thank you very much for the great man!" 


As a prisoner's spiritual text, among the many priests, he said: "Don't dare 
to act, don't dare to be." 


When I saw it, I didn’t have a filed yesterday. Today, the priests who are 
still in a mess in the temple can’t sit still. They’re surrounded: “Then I’m 


actually a few here. I forgot to bring you to see it yesterday or else...” 
Lingwen: "..." 


Thank you for eating gimmicks outside the temporary hall, and after 
eating the clap, I finally saved the spirit from the suffering: "You, let's 
count it later, let the spirit take a breath." 


When he spoke before, there must be no one to take seriously, but now it is 
different. A few people said: "His Royal Highness is saying." Do not dare 
to speak. Lingwen sat in a chair, closed his eyes and lifted his forehead, 
and waited for other priests to go out. There were not many people in the 
hall, and she said to her: "Congratulations to His Royal Highness, the body 
is reset. Unexpectedly, even the ghosts are your followers, listen to your 
call." 


Thanks to the pity: "That is not my believer, my friends in the ghost city. I 
ask them to help." 


The spirit nodded and looked up. Swearing, thank you: "Ling, I have a 
question to ask you." 


Ling Wendao: "I will ask your Highness Prince." 


Thanks to the pity: "Sanlang, I mean the flower city master, he passed 
through your brocade, but Jin Yixian is ineffective against him. Do you 
know why?" 


Ling Wendao: "It turned out to be this problem. I thought that your Royal 
Highness Prince has already known it?" 


Thank you for your pity, said: "Want to hear it?" 


Ling Wenyi swayed and was sitting in danger: "His Royal Highness, have 
you heard the legend of Jin Yixian?" 


Thanks for your pity: "I have heard it. You did it yourself." 


Lingwen said: "It can be said. Although I never thought that the grievances 
on this dress would make it become such a monster, but it is true that I 
have to kill the white brocade in order to speed up the destruction of the 
country." 


Thank you for listening. Lingwen continued: "This dress is twirling in the 
world, after the hands of countless people, countless people have chosen to 
use it to kill, harm, and deceive. Although it can also eliminate its 
grievances, but white Jin is not such a person. 


"He doesn't like being used by these people, he is very disgusted. So when 
he meets a dresser and a specific wearer similar to him, he won't provoke 
grievances, but he will be very happy." 


Thanks to the pity: "Is the approximation and the specific difference?" 


Ling Wendao said: "You put on the blood and rain to put on the brocade, 
but you don't have a trace of sorrow and hatred on the blood and rain, and 
trust your heart; and the blood and rain, the same for you, no, it should be 
said Even more — the place where blood rain and flowers really resonate 
with him is that even if he does not wear a brocade, what you let him do 
for you, he will not hesitate to do anything for you, including dying for 


99 


you. 


Lingwen said: "This is also why I can guess the boy around you is the 
reason for the **** rain. Although I don't know much about you, I can't 
think of the second person." 


Thanks: "Why?" 


Lingwen raised his finger: "His Royal Highness, what is hanging on your 
neck?" 


Thanks for the pity, the hand could not help but caress. 


Lingwen said: "I have seen similar things, those ghosts that are desperate, 
giving their lover their own ashes." 


The number of files handled by the Lingwen Temple is countless, and it is 
not surprising to have seen it. But in fact, thank you for guessing. 


But when I heard the spirit, I still clenched the crystal clear ring. 


Ling Wendao said: "This 1s a rare thing, but because it is too beautiful, and 
usually very fierce, so the impression is more profound." 


Thanks to the pity: "What is usually very tragic?" 


Lingwen said: "Being loved and stunned, and handing over your life to 
others, there will be many sad and terrible things. 


"What is really heart-wrenching is to be ruined. Some of these ashes 
burned away, some were taken away by others, some were broken by the 
owner, and there is basically nothing to end. However, your Excellency is 
your exception. You save It’s very good, almost dripping.” 


After a long silence, thank you: "You said ‘similar' and ‘resonant’. So, is 
General Bai Jin also such a person?” 


Lingwen smiled and said: "How else would I be cheated?" 


Thanks to pity: "Not a lie. You can't think of it, I deliberately put the news 
out, but you still come to take it." 


Ling Wendao: "Well-proof weapon." 


Thanks to pity: "If you are just a self-defense weapon, you will not take 
such a big risk to steal it. If you fail, you will take it to Tongluoshan." 


Lingwen does not care about the earth: "There is no way to go to 
Tongluoshan, because it has been exposed, and you are caught by the 
Prince." 


Thanks to pity: "Actually, if you want to find an excuse to cover up, you 
can still make sense. If you take a little bit of control, even if you lower 
the level of deduction, you will not become a fugitive. Mainly... you want 
to help General Bai Jincheng. Never let him wake up." 


Lingwen smiled and said: "His Royal Highness, you don't want to say that 
I can do anything for it. After all, 1 am a person who does not recognize 
the six parents, how can I do this kind of thing?" 


"Is that right?" 
"That's it." 


Xie Li was cleaned up on the ruined wall of Emperor Peak of Taijifeng, 
and simply built a small house as a place to stay. It is farther away. When 
he has something, he goes to the temporary council to help, and when he is 
fine, he stays alone. 


After seven or eight days, Mu Qing finally made up the evil and sent it 
over. When he opened the door, he saw a white thing rushing in front of 
him. He was smashed in front of him and reached out and pulled the thing 
down. If the evil began to twist and twist, it seemed to show him his new 
life. Beautiful body. Thanks to pity: "If you just make up, don't mess it up, 
be careful and twist it." 


There is an opinion on the feelings of love: "How 1s this possible? Which 
piece of clothing I have given you has broken?" 


Thanks for the pity: "That is also true." 


He grabbed the sin of the water and carefully looked at it, and it was very 
good for sewing. He could hardly see any traces. He praised: "Your craft 1s 
still so good." 


I admire the feelings: "I will not be happy if you praise me for this kind of 
thing. This time I will not be an example, and I will not do this kind of 
thing." 


Thanks for your pity: "You are quite proud of it..." 


I was awkward and said a few words, "I am done, I am gone. I am busy 
with the things and people of the Xuanzhen Temple." 


Thanks for your pity: "You have to go too? Well, I will help you later. 
When you leave, tell me, I will send it." 


After grabbing the spirit, checking and filling the gaps, and clearing up a 
few big pens, the gods decided to start rebuilding Xianjing. Then, the 
temporary council on the Tai Cang Mountain can be idle. The empathy 
waved his hand, did not refuse and did not agree, took a few steps, and 
stopped, and turned back: "You ... still have to stay in Tai Cangshan?" 


Thanks for your nod and said, "Yeah." 


Hesitating for a moment, admire the feeling: "Or else, you still go with 
us." 


Thanks and smiles: "No, I have to wait." 


Admire the feelings: "You can wait for the Shangtian court in 
Xinxianjing." 


Xie pity shook his head and said: "I think he might come here first when 
he comes back, then you can see it in the first time. If you don't go back 
here, you may return to the ghost city view of the ghost city. Far, more 
convenient than in Xinxianjing." 


It seems that the feelings of love have been a long time, and the look is 
complicated and authentic: "Do you really believe that he will come 
back?" 


Thanks for your pity: "I believe." 


People flooded like water and left like a tide. Tai Cangshan has restored its 
desolate and lonely. 


On the Tai Cang Mountain, there was a large piece of Fenglin, which was 
burned by the fire and reborn after thousands of years. It 1s no longer the 
one who had prayed for it in the tree thousands of years ago, but the 
scenery is the same. 


Xie pity often walks alone in Fenglin. The red maples that are so hot in the 
mountains make him feel like he is in a huge and warm embrace. 


He has been used for more than eight hundred years in a person's day. If 
something goes down, you should pray, collect and collect, and if you have 
nothing, you will grow vegetables and cook. 


However, it is strange that the days of such a person have always been 
taken for granted, but now it has become somewhat difficult. It took a long 
time for Shimi to re-adapt. 


Maybe if a person has been suffering all the time, they will get used to 
bitterness. Suddenly one day, someone gave him a sweet taste. He 
remembered what it was like to taste sweetness. If he went to suffer, he 
would wrinkle his face. 


When I used to pray for myself to live cold and clear, I always hope that 
someone will come to find myself. Look for him to talk or talk to him, 
help him, at least a little popular. But now, he doesn't like it that much. 


Because, when I heard the knocking on the door, he always suddenly 
ecstasy in his heart, looking forward to the extreme. Can go to the front of 
the door to open, inside or outside the door, is not always the person he is 
waiting for. 


Sometimes it is a wind letter, sometimes a feeling of love, sometimes a 
teacher, and sometimes a ghost city who is "filial respect for his old man." 


Everybody is fine. Just, not the one he is waiting for. 


In the first month, thanked a few flower trees and planted them at the door, 
trying to beautify the environment and cover the shabbyness of the broken 


house. He figured out that maybe when the flower city came back, they 
would bloom. 


In the second month, Xie Li demolished the house and rebuilt the weeds of 
the whole mountain. Otherwise, after seeing the city, I saw this messy 
scene, and I must send someone to help him clean up. 


In the third month, the flower tree blossomed. Full of trees and blush, Xie 
pity stood under the tree and looked up, while enjoying the flowers alone, 
thinking and blossoming, it is almost time to come back. 


In the fourth month, all the mountain roads were rebuilt. When the flower 
city comes back to him, you can go up the mountain soon. 


In the fifth month, Feng Xin and Yu Qing came to see him again. He asked 
if he would leave here to go out for a walk. He thanked them for having a 
meal and they ran away. 


In the sixth month, the flowering period has passed. 


Wait, wait, wait. Xie Pity is not anxious, there is no collapse, and there is 
no crying and crying. Instead, I feel that I am getting calmer and more 
patient. 

Think about it, who has not experienced the long years of being alone? 


Huacheng waited for him for more than 800 years. How about he waited 
for another 800 years? 


Even if it is a thousand years or 10,000 years, he will wait and wait. 
What's more, only one year? 


On this day, thankful and prudently received a lot of tattered, piled up with 
his newly bought cattle and carts, and pulled up the mountain. 


Passing through the maple forest at night, walking on the middle of the 
mountain road, Xie pity inadvertently turned back, saw the quiet night sky, 
floating a few light spots. 


He stared at it and found that it was a long lamp, suddenly realized, and 
said to himself: "It turned out that today is the Shangyuan Festival." 


At this moment, probably the priests of the heavenly courts are fighting on 
the banquet. Thanks for the pity, I couldn’t help but pull the rope and stay 
in the same place, staring at the lights. 


He suddenly remembered that he and Huacheng met at the Shangyuan 
Festival. 


That year, the child with a dirty face and scars squeezed down on the 
crowded wall. The 17-year-old Prince Xianle thanked him for shining. He 
looked up and saw a figure falling from the sky. Don't want to, fly and 
jump. 


Shangyuan Festival, Shenwu Street. A glimpse of the glory, the world fell. 
Thanks for the smile, the heart, and finally fell, not a person. 


Turned around and bowed his head, thank you for preparing to continue on 
the mountain. The cart was pulled and twisted for a while. Suddenly, the 
front seemed to be illuminated by something. 


Thanks again, he raised his head and widened his eyes. 
That light is a light. 


If you fish over the rivers, countless lanterns slowly rise from the top of 
the mountain. 


They shine in the night and shine. Such as the floating soul, the most 
magnificent dream, magnificent, illuminating his way. 


Thank you for seeing this scene, seeing it again, breathing and heartbeat 
have stopped. The peak turns, the wheel bends, and Xie pity sees the small 


broken house he built. 

Someone! 

Standing in front of a crooked hut, a red man standing in a long shape with 
a silver scimitar hanging from his back, holding his last long lamp in his 
hand, sent it to the sky. 

Thank you for sitting in silence, wondering if you are still in a dream, or 
this is an illusion. But as the wheel turned and got closer, the man turned 


around and he saw it more and more clearly. 


Before the three thousand lanterns that grew up in the night, the man 
looked back at him, the clothes were red and the maple, the skin was 
white, and the beautiful and unobtrusive eyebrows were still a wild 
madness, and they were not destroyed. 


Although wearing a black eye mask, the bright, star-like scorpion, is 
staring intently at the pity. 


Thanks for the downturn. 
There is no one sentence. Both of them walked toward each other. 
One step, one step, the faster and faster, then, ran. 


The man ran forward, and the tears fell behind him, leaving it in place. 
Thank you, he believes. 


I believe that this person will die for him again and again, and he will be 
born again and again. Even if he falls into hell, he will break through for 
his "belief." 

The last time they ran to each other, it took eight hundred years. 


This time, I will hug in the next moment. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 244: No taboo 


"congratulations!" 
"His Royal Highness, congratulations!" 


The newly-built Bodhisattva view is very lively and come and go. Xie pity 
walks through a few long tables full of Dangdang, and sends out a bowl of 
steamed noodles, golden flower soup, and white flowers. Busy to turn 
around, but also to deal with the guests, busy in the busy time: "Thank 
you, please sit!" 


The Bodhisattva, which was unfortunately collapsed in the chaos, was 
rebuilt. 


After the reconstruction, there was a lot of sentimentality than the original 
dangerous house, and there was a new yard. It is not the remembrance of 
the pity or the reconstruction of the flower city, but the villagers in the 
village of Bodhisattva. After the day of thanks and pity, they turned over 
the ruins and found a box of gold bars. Nature is the pile of power that is 
really stuffed into his merits every day. 


These villagers have never seen so much gold, and they are almost 
frightened. After waking up, the village chief took a part of the 
reconstruction of the Bodhisattva view, and the rest did not dare to move, 
and then gave him back and gave him back. 


Therefore, thanks to the return of Huacheng, he greeted him, in addition to 
the enthusiastic voices of the villagers, "Daochang" and "Little Flowers", 
as well as a brand new Taoist temple and a box of heavy gold bars. 


The gold bar he intended to give the right to a true, but the right is really 
not to pick up, until the flower city told him that you do not take the gold 
bars back, do not want to know the correct way to raise the soul, this child 
is honestly The problem of giving people a gold bar was changed. 


After the greetings, several of the priests headed by the sorrowful 
grievances stepped into the yard, and looked up and saw the whole picture 
of the Taoist priest. 


Blinking. 
It’s too blinking! 


The festive colors of the big red and the green, the fascinating image of 
the colorful mud, are not the most terrible. The most terrible thing is the 
plaque. 


What is written on the plaque, or drawn? 


Congratulations on the completion of the new concept. But this new look 
is so bad and vulgar everywhere, and there is a plaque that 1s the crowning 
touch of desperation. It is so exaggerating that they forget all the good 
words they have made. 


However, thank you for not thinking about it, but it feels good, at least not 
a dangerous house that may collapse at any time. He once again greeted: 
"Please sit?" 


The few priests looked like they didn't want to sit. They came over and 
said that they just walked through the scene and hurriedly dropped the gift 
and left. Thank you for your kindness: "How are they going so fast?" 


Admiration: "Do you still ask?" 
Thank you, "Use it." 
The feelings are not good-hearted: "Go and ask your good Saburo." 


It turned out that when Huacheng came back, the first one knew that it was 
pity, and the second one was that there was no Shangtian court in 
Xinxinjing. Not only because they had recently held the Shangyuan 
banquet lamp, but also the same as the Mid-Autumn Festival banquet 
lamp. The flower city that was suddenly smashed waved three thousand 
smashes and there was no **** left, even more since that night, the mouth 


The bell screamed wildly, and the entire heavenly court echoed its 
announcement, as if reminding them that the nightmare of the gods was 
back! 


The nightmare is in front of you, and ordinary **** officials naturally dare 
not get together. However, now the rumors about the Huacheng and Xie Li 
in the heavens have reached a point where they don’t have to add any 
vinegar. They still want to have a relationship with the Lara and ask for the 
three-pointedness of the city. 


Thank you for listening. I remembered that before the flower city asked 
the heavenly court to report his great achievements for a whole year, he 
smiled and said: "Naughty." 


Mu Qing said: "This is a naughty thing? You let him collect it, it's too 
uncomfortable. Now the clock is irritating every day, and it is completely 
incapable of working in heaven. It also falls from time to time and squats. 
It is hard to rebuild. The new Xianjing, don't waste it because of this kind 
of thing." 


Thanks to pity: "Well, I will talk to him later. By the way, try?" He pointed 
to the rice noodle soup on the table in the yard, adding, "I didn't do it." 


Mu Qing listened to the front of the cold, filled with rejection, listening to 
the next sentence to return to normal. At this time, the wind letter also 
came. He entered the yard and just passed by a few small officials who 
were about to leave. They greeted each other and whispered: "It is General 
Nanyang." 


"It's him. It's so poor, my wife and son ran with people..." 


Fengxin’s forehead burst into blue veins and smashed on the spot: “I’m 
fucking!!! Are you finished?! Have you been forced to do this for a few 
months?! And! It’s 'running’! Not with people. Run '! Net **** rumors!’ 


The few small sergeants who were broken were frightened and fled. The 
feelings of the hands were close to each other and the sleeves were said: 
"You don't explain this explanation, it sounds even more humiliating." 


Fengxin was furious and grabbed a broom next to him and threw it. Amour 
is caught, hehe said: "Old-fashioned. Now this trick is useless to me." 


Fengxin waited for another sigh, thanked the pity and walked over and 
gave him a broom. He said, "It’s useless. Then, the two of you helped me 
to sweep the yard together. Just put a few bunches of firecrackers on the 
ground. It’s red scum. It’s hard. If you are bored, you can pick up the 
dragon by the way.” 


WQggn 


After half an hour, there was a roaring voice coming out of the scene, 
getting closer and closer. 


A few people in the yard looked out. After a while, the black people 
pressed a large group of people into the courtyard of Bodhisattva. They 
shouted: "Is it here?" "It's here, oh, pretty good." "I have a meal, a lot of 
food!" "There is meat!" 


The wind and the freshly cleaned land were trampled by a large group of 
mud legs. He is holding a broom, as if he feels that he has been infected 

with fleas. His eyes are round and round: "...What are these things going 
on?" 


Before the public, one person was headed, and it was Shi Qingxuan. He 
turned around and bowed, and said, "His Royal Highness, I am coming to 
disturb! How about the last time I said good?" 


Thanks and smiles: "Welcome to the extreme, of course! Please sit down, 
please sit down." 


Admire the feeling: "This person is too much." 


Shi Qingxuan: "Not much! Last year, the grandfathers who helped the 
people in the Imperial City were here." 


At that time, Shi Qingxuan and others said that after a good thing, please 
eat chicken legs, everyone has a share, after the event, no one can find 


people everywhere, the chicken legs are naturally not eaten. Today, I can 
finally fulfill my contract. 


A bowl of chicken legs was picked up, and the teacher said: "You don't 
have to worry about it today, eat it!" 


The crowds squeezed from the table to the ground, cheering, and then 
picked up the sea bowl and sucked and sucked. Eat and eat, suddenly one 
person said: "No, there is evil spirit!" 


Everyone turned around and saw that the circle was actually open to the 
eye. Thanks for the headache, said: "How come you are here too?" 


Tianyan opened the way: "The last time we also helped, how can we not 
come?" He raised the bowl high and looked serious: "Let you, listen to me, 
I am absolutely not mistaken! The food in this bowl has evil spirits." I'm 
afraid it's not a good thing, it's weird! Let's put it down!" 


No one cares about him. The public has already finished a round, and they 
have raised empty bowls: "A new bowl!" 


Fengxin and admiration used the broom to fight and swept the red 
firecracker residue in the yard, watching other people eat, drink, and so on. 
They also sat down and picked up the bowl. Just the sky is open-eyed: 
"You don't listen to people!" He said that he would go up to the kitchen to 
see, and Shi Qingxuan kept him. "It's really a long way, you think too 
much, here is It’s normal to have a **** rain, but it’s normal to have evil 
spirits. Well, don’t worry, I'll see, you sit and don’t be impulsive.” 


He really got up on his own, went to the kitchen and picked up the curtain: 
"Look, what 1s weird--" 


Thanks for your pity: "Wait a minute, I have to look at it..." 


However, waiting for him, Shi Qingxuan, Feng Xin, and a few people to 
look at the probe, all shocked. 


I saw the pig in the kitchen, a tall pig butcher was crazy on the cutting 
board, if not the pig legs behind, I thought he was a man. Next to it, a huge 
fire was born under a huge cylinder. A long-necked chicken in the tank was 
bathing in the heat. When someone saw him outside, he screamed and 
screamed at his chest. 


Thanks to the first two big, and quickly walked into the whisper: "I didn't 
say it, can't you?" 


Chicken essence "squeaky" to take the chest to ensure: "Da Bogong, we 
came to take a shower, very clean! And this soup has the effect of 
prolonging life, not drinking will not hurt people! No loss! Rest assured !" 


Shi Qingxuan quietly put down the curtain, and the wind and the feelings 
of the truth immediately threw the bowl away. The spurt said: "It's better 
not to do it!" 


Thank you for your pity, but also funny and helpless: "They must help, no 
way, but also kind." 


At this time, it seems that I finally feel that a few people here are 
suspicious and come over. Xie pity quickly stopped him: "What?" 


He was afraid that they would see the pig butchers in the sky and they 
would have to make trouble. Who knows, the eyes are not coming to the 
kitchen, but to him. He turned around a few circles around Xie, and 
wondered: "Weird..." 


Thank you, "What's wrong?" 


It seems that there is no doubt in the eyes, saying: "No, thank you, you are 
a ghost, how is it worse than last time?" 


Thanks for a light cough. Admire the feelings: "The days and the ghost 
kings are mixed together, of course, getting worse." 


The sky is open but says: "No. Even then, shouldn’t it be like this?" 
Wind channel: "What is it like?" 
Doubt for a long time, the eyes opened and finally said directly. 


He said: "How does this ghost in your body become from the inside out? 
This... this is completely emitted from your body." 


" " 


"I am afraid that you have been sinned. What have you done? How is it so 
sick?" 


Xie pity and cough can not cough out. His entire face will be congested. 


The wind and the feelings of the love have not yet understood. When I 
have returned to the taste, I will look at the pity and silence: "..." 


Only Shi Qingxuan’s brain couldn’t turn and he said, ““What’s wrong? So 
what's the matter? Your Royal Highness, you are really sick? Does the 
blood rain flower know? He didn’t show you good?!” 


No, no. It is because of him, so it will be like this! 


Thank you for your pity: "This. Actually. No. You don't... I think, it's not as 
good, um..." 


There were some messy pictures in his mind, and he said a bunch of 
meaningless words in a mess. Suddenly, he was leaning against one's 
chest. An arm with a silver wristband encircled him, and a familiar voice 
smiled and said: "I think, you might as well go back to your seat, eat 
yours, and take care of nothing else, how?" 


This situation, thank you, I really don't know if it should be more 
embarrassing, such as "Sanlang!" 


When I saw the flower city, the wind and the feelings of the feelings were 
hard to say, but thanking them in the front, they could not say anything. 
Only Shi Qingxuan still asked very seriously: "Blood rain, do you check 
the body of His Royal Highness?" 


Thanks for holding his forehead, I hope he will stop asking. At this time, 
the crowd got up: "A new bowl!" "Add more meat!" "This chicken soup is 
not delicious, put more salt!" 


The feelings of love can't stand any more, said: "Do you know that this is a 
Taoist temple, for the priests, can you hold a little?" 


The public is not eating his set. Last time, they worked together with many 
priests to consolidate the people's formation. I saw a few priests shivering 
and fleeing, but they were not as good as them, and they were too familiar 
with the teacher's youth. They felt that the original gods were like this. It 
seems that they are not much different from each other. It seems that they 
are not so high and inviolable. 


Suddenly, there was a scream in the kitchen: "Who 1s it?" 


I heard the sound, thank you for your tightness, grabbed the kitchen, and 
saw the pig butcher and chicken yelling inside, busy and appease: "Calm! 
Calm! What's wrong?" 


The chicken was so frightened that the goose bumps were all up: "Da 
Bogong! Haunted! There are ghosts, and we have eaten all the delicious 
soup! I just got a fierce, and then I won’t have a bowl! Haunted It!" 


The pig butcher shouted: "What are you afraid of? Isn't it your own to be a 
ghost?" 


Thanks for the slightest sigh: "How come? Only then did you see that you 
just made more than fifty bowls?" 


"Yes ! " 


Can look again, and sure enough, more than fifty bowls are empty, even 
the soup is a clean drink! 


Xie pity is strange, suddenly thought of one person, turned to see the 
flower city leaning against the door, said: "Sanlang, is it?" 


Huacheng whispered: "Eight Eight | Nine." 


"Well..." thanked him. "He should, too, come to congratulate. It is 
reasonable to welcome, but it is a bit more to eat... Now that the food has 
been eaten by him, what should I do?" 


Huacheng smiled and said: "Do not do anything. Add interest." 


The troubled ghost city ghosts began to cook again. At this time, there was 
a groan in the hall and the courtyard. It seemed that who was arguing with 
him. Xie was thinking of going out to mediate, but Huacheng grabbed his 
hand and took him away from the other side of the door. 


The two men walked out of the Bodhisattva. There are trees on the road, 
and it is better to let go when you let go, but the two are not willing to let 
go of the other hand, so they turn around and turn around. Thanks to the 
sidelines: "Sanlang, where are we going now?" 


Huacheng Road: "It's too noisy here, let's go with them, let's go first." 


Thanks for walking and looking back, I was a little worried about the 
truth: "Whether they are? The Bodhisattva is rebuilt, what if it is 
collapsed?" 


Huacheng doesn't care about the tunnel: "If it collapses, it will collapse, 
and then build one. If the brother wants, how much is there." 


"Ha ha ha ha ha ha..." 


In the night, thousands of lights in the view, after bathing, thank you for 
wearing a thin white coat, leaning on the collapsed jade, a stroke. 


He is writing a copybook to Huacheng. Huacheng reclined beside him, and 
only the middle of the coat, the collar was slightly open, and the hands 
were bored with the red coral beads. 


Under the warmth of the jade, he kept staring at the pity, and looked at it 
for a while before he blinked like a lame, sighing: "Brother, don't get that, 
come and rest." 


Xie Pian Fang had already suffered enough, and resolutely refused to be 
fooled. This tone heard his ears burn, strong self-satisfaction, continue to 
write, a serious and authentic: "No. Saburo, today someone said that your 
word is ugly, you I have to practice well, otherwise, I don’t want people to 
know that you are my teacher." 


Huacheng sat up slightly and raised his eyebrows: "Brother, I remember, 
you used to say that you liked my words very much." 


Since the return of Huacheng, for a long time, thanking him for being very 
compliant with him, he is responsive, probably because of this, he finally 
spoiled him, and his bad eyes are getting more and more. Thanks for 
writing the words, put down the pen, and more serious: "Don't make a bad 
mouth. I wrote it, come over and practice." 


So, Huacheng slouched down to Xia pity, hugged his waist, bent slightly, 
his head resting on his shoulder. He took off his red coral bead from the 
end of the hair, put it on the paper, let it chase the bead on the paper, roll 
it, and deliberately refused to write. 


He is so naughty and strong to show his sense of existence, thankful and 
pity to think that the whole person "gears the body, from the inside out" 
exudes ghosts, it is the atmosphere of the flower city, can not help but feel 
a little soft, I earned two times, and whispered: "...write it well." 


Huacheng Road: "Well, listen to your brother." 


He took the pen and wrote two sentences and put it down. Thanks for your 
pity, shook his head, and countless times in his heart: "Not saved." After a 
pause, he also raised a pen and helped him make up the last two sentences. 


After writing, thank you for a gentle blow, picking up the paper, and the 
two looked at the co-written poem. 


The ink on the paper, the four poems that have been built into the sky: 
once having seen the best, the rest is not worthwhile looking. 
Take a look at the flowering lazy, half-edge monastic half-edge. 


Even the embarrassment was at the table, wide-eyed, and it looked as if it 
was invisible. Huacheng smiled and said: "The peerless work. Brother, 
fast, come to the name. This word will be amazing, and will be passed 
down through the ages." 


Xie Li has already written the name of Huacheng in the lower part. 
Hearing that he said this, he really did not go and add his own name. 
Huacheng laughed enough, falsely: "Is your brother embarrassed? I will 
help you." 


Say, hold the hand of thank you, brush and write a few words. Of course, if 
you don't talk about the prospects, no one can tell that this is two words, 
and it is impossible to see the name of the pity... 


Xie pity looked at his own hand to write such a thing, ridiculously, 
smashed his head in front of Huacheng. Suddenly, he felt that the words 
were a bit familiar, as if they had seen it. 


After a short while, he remembered, his eyes lit up and said: "Sanlang, 
you!" 


He grabbed the flower city arm and pulled his sleeve up, rejoicing: "This 
is it!" 


In the days when the two lived together in the view of Bodhisattva, one 
day, thanking him for seeing a tattoo in his hand, it seems that it is an alien 
language. At that time, he still thought about it in his heart, but never 
imagined that it was not "interracial words". It turned out to be his name! 


Huacheng also looked at his arm and smiled: "Is the brother finally 
recognized?" 


Thanks to pity: "It should have been recognized, just..." 


However, the word of Huacheng is really awesome. Needless to say, 
Huacheng also guessed what he was thinking. Haha laughed, and thanked 
him with a waist. He kissed his forehead and said, "It doesn't matter, my 
brother's words will look good, I will be more happy than my words. Ten 
thousand times. 


Thankful hand caressed on the tattoo. The tattoo is very dark, and you can 
imagine how painful it will be. He whispered: "Is this your thorn when you 
were young?" 


Huacheng smiled slightly, pulled down his sleeves and nodded. 
That must be that he himself stabbed himself. Imagine a little boy 
sneaking the picture of the admired person's name on his arm, so naive, so 


brave. 


Ten fingers clasped, red lines intertwined. Thanks to the pity, suddenly 
appeared a scene of the flower city in the Tonglushan Mountain. 


At the last moment, Huacheng said a word. 
Although it is silent, thank you very much for what he said. 


That is the flower city that began when it was a child, and it was carried 
out until death. 


"I will always be your most loyal believer." 


“Folklore Talk” 








Folklore, there is such a broken fairy. 


Although it is called a tattered immortal, but the most blessed by this 
immortal is not the broken, but the peace of the world. Because, he is also 
one of the strongest Valkyrie. 


There is no magic that can't be broken, no evil. Sitting on the power of the 
world, not losing the heart of flowers, 


However, worshipping God is a matter of jealousy and particularity. If you 
encounter a palace that serves the immortal, you must not worship at will. 


It is said that this ruined immortal has a special constitution and will call 
for bad luck. Do not believe, prepare a blind man, first touch the hand of 
the immortal god, and then throw a hand, the luck must be bad home. 


Therefore, praying for the gray statue of a tattered immortal, may be more 
and more unfortunate, drinking cold water, stuffing the teeth, wearing a 
robe is also a ghost. 


Folks also have legends that there is such a red ghost king. 


Although the ghost king is already a non-human, but has a large number of 
huge believers, there is a popular home to secretly set up a ghost king at 
home, day and night to worship, pray for good luck. 


Because, this ghost king is not only said that he has not had a defeat, he is 
invincible, and the fortune is extremely invincible. Do not believe, 
worship him before you cast a donkey. If you can get help, the next one 
must be good. 


However, ghosts are more natural than God's jealousy. Although the ghost 
king has a strong and strong temperament, his temperament is extremely 
strange. 


If he is happy, he will help you without paying attention to him; he is not 
happy, and he is dismissive of you when he spends a lot of money; and if 


he is very unhappy, he may be killed by his backhand. 


Therefore, for the same reason, it is better to respect it. 


However, if people enshrine the two images of this **** and a ghost, they 
will turn into decay. 


The red king of the ghost will dispel the bad luck of the ruined fairy, and 
let him reveal his true face. 


People will be surprised to find that the original color of the tattered 
immortal is not gray, but golden. 


Legends generally have their basis. But this is probably a long story, or it 
needs to be said from eight hundred years ago. It may take a long time to 
say. People don't necessarily have the patience to listen. 


But what is certain is that 1f you want each of them to exert the strongest 
power, they must be enshrined together. 


In this way, you can double the good fortune, double the invincibility. 


Heavenly blessing, no taboos! 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 245: Lantern 
riddle, Yuanxiao Night 


Shangyuan Festival, good night. 


It is early spring, winter is not far away, the wind is still cold. Thanks for a 
big bag, slowly walking on the side of the road, his face was slightly 
blushing by the wind. 


The bag contained a lot of messy things that he had just received, and I 
didn’t know if it was useful. Anyway, it is useless and useful, and I can 
only rely on this for a living in the future. 


After a while, he passed a stall on the street. 


The stall is called "Hou Kee Snack" and sells some snacks. It seems that 
the boss family is sitting on a small table in the middle of the room. A 
slim, pretty girl walks through the table and is busy. The boss calls her not 
to be busy. She didn't listen to the past when she sat down. She only said 
"just come", and her voice is like a jaundice. The rest of the table was 
sitting in front of the guests in threes and twos, but it seemed that they 
were just rushing to the young girl. Just sit and talk, and I will go home 
soon. After all, today is the Shangyuan Festival. 


There was a small pot in front of the stall. The white flower in the pot, the 
round, and the hot rolling thing made him slow down. 


Thank you for your pity: "Yuan Lan." 


When he was a child, every time the Shangyuan Festival, Xianle and the 
Queen would eat a Lantern with him. Xie pity is very picky eaters, not like 
the Lantern Festival, the famous little chef's system is in the golden bowl 
of jade, he is not happy, he is too sweet, eats itchy teeth, this stuff does not 
eat, that Do not eat the stuffing, licking two things. 


Later, when I grew up, I ran to Tai Cangshan to practice. When I returned 
to the Lantern Festival, I didn’t return, and I didn’t eat a few meals. Now 
think about it, he actually doesn't remember at all, what is the taste of 
Yuan Zhen? 


Thanks for the careful look at the booth, and carefully put the ugly big bag 
down from the shoulder, and finally, stepped in cautiously. 


He took off the fight and took it in his hand: "Boss, come to a bowl of 
yuan. Do you have it here?" 


The boss was quite a few years old. He looked at him and didn't answer. 
The slim girl smiled and said: "Yes, you are advanced to sit down!" This is 
getting busy and ready. Thanks for the pity, but when the boss shook his 
head, he was surprised. He wondered if he was dirty on his body. He 
looked down at the sleeves of his clothes and decided that it was not dirty. 
He was a little relieved and asked: "What happened? ?" 


He thought that if the boss didn't like him to bring the bag in, he put the 
bag outside. The boss looked at him again and shook his head: "Tragic. 
Really miserable." 


Thank you, "Ah? What are you talking about?" 


The boss said: "A person in the Great Lantern Festival is frozen in the 
outside stall and eats Lantern Festival. It is too bad." 


"..." Thanks, "You can't do this. You still can't do business..." 


The boss didn't talk to him and took the bowl. Sit for a while, thank you 
for feeling that everyone is looking around. Or, look at the unusually big 
bag next to him and him. 


The boss's daughter also sneaked over and squatted on the floor with a 
finger to poke the bag. It seemed very curious what was inside the sac, and 
was called back by the mother several times. Thanks to this time, I still 
haven't cultivated the cheeky face that I couldn't get into the future. I 
couldn't help but kick the big bag to the table with my foot, and I wanted 


to put it to a place that no one else could see. Unfortunately, this stall is 
small, the tables and chairs are small, and there is nothing to hide. Thanks 
to the constant cough, try to let yourself ignore the eyes of others. 


Will get used to it. No big deal. 


Suddenly, he remembered something, and quickly reached into his chest 
and rubbed his face, his face suddenly changed, and his heart said: "This is 
even worse! Not only a person in the Great Lantern Festival freezes on the 
outside stall to eat Lantern, money. Not enough enough!!!" 


Originally, he wanted to sneak away. At this time, the boss came over with 
a large porcelain bowl and put it on the table, saying: "Five money." 


Thanks for feeling a little suffocating, said: "Hey... I... 


He coughed a few times, his fists in front of his mouth, and listened to the 
boss: "Is there no?" 


Xie Pity is preparing to stand up and get out of the scalp, but see a large 
porcelain bowl"  " placed on the table in front. 


When he glanced, he listened to the boss: "Forget it, look at you so badly, 
send you a bowl. After I finish eating, I have to collect it. Go back quickly. 
Today is Yuanxiao, it is a round!" 


Xie pity sat back again, although the heart was saying that in fact, after 
eating this bowl of yuan, he did not have a place to go back, but still 
whispered: "Thank you." 


The boss went back after dropping the bowl. The remaining Lantern in the 
small pot in front of the stall was taken to the small table by him. The 
little girl bit her head and bite the spoon: "When 1s your brother coming 
back? I want to wait for him to come back and eat again." 


The boss also said: "It's too late, the Lantern Festival is still coming back 
so late, it's really not like it!" 


The woman said: "He also worked hard, and he will return soon. You will 
not marry him later. Wonderful, don't be busy anymore, always let you 
come over and help, really don't want to go, come and eat together. ” 


The young girl said: "Not busy!" Finally, I packed up a table, and I used to 
sit down and share with them. 


The four people seem to be waiting for another person to come back to 
reunite, talking and laughing. Xie pity looked at them, picked up his own 
bowl, and the spoon smashed one into the mouth and took a bite of sweet 
soup. 


But still do not know what it is. 
"Brother, brother?" 


Thank you for your return, and Huacheng is staring at him. The red lining 
of the flower city eyebrows is more invented, and the lights give him a 
soft color to his white face to the lifeless face. Thanks for the slightest 
sigh of God, said: "What?" 


Huacheng Road: "Is my brother tired? Or can't you walk?" 


Xie pity nodded casually, Huacheng Road: "I'm sorry. Last night I was too 
much." 


After a while, thank you for reacting what he said, and quickly said: 
"...what is it, it is not such a thing! It doesn't matter!" 


Huacheng raised an eyebrow and said: "Is it? It doesn't matter at all, it 
means, I was not too much yesterday? So I can...?" 


Xie pity suddenly remembered, here is still on the street of Ghost City, 
wake up, and sure enough, I don’t know when, all sides are crowded with a 


lot of grotesque stuffs, long ears and short ears. Neck, almost all of them 
had their eyes smashed with copper bells, staring at them in the dead, and 
were shocked to know what to say. In the end, said: "Sanlang!" 


Huacheng smiled slightly and said: "Okay, okay. My fault, don't say it." 


Xie Li also took his eyes back from the Lantern Festival monster stand on 
the street. On both sides of Ghost Street, there are red lanterns, and the 
lanterns are full of mysteries. The ghosts say: "Guess riddles! Guess 
riddles! Guess the prize! There are prizes!!!" 


Huacheng said with respect to her: "Brother, try it? There is a prize." 
Thanks for the pity, went up and said: "Try?" 


All the ghosts are excited and shouting each other: "Hey! Hey! Dabogong 
has to guess the riddle! Dabogong guesses the riddle!!!" 


'..." This overwhelming, shouting as if he wants to jump to the gods, thank 
you for being pitiful, just wanting to pick one, but immediately there is a 
tentacle that does not know where to reach out, attentively sent a lantern, : 
"You please! Please!" 


For pity, everything is the same. So he took the light and glanced. The 
mystery 1s four words: "Find the white head." 


I don’t want to think about it, saying, ““ 


Huacheng clap his hands and praised him: "Brother, it's amazing." The 
ghosts also laughed at him with his applause, ghosts and wags, and 
unidentified objects with dark lacquer in the air, and it was too 
exaggerated. Thanks to shame, said: "Actually, this... is really simple." 


The tentacle sent another second light and said, "You please! Please!" 


Thanks for the light, this time, the mystery is "the Spring Festival." 


I didn’t want to think about it. I thanked the old man for the answer and 
said, COGe ee 


Huacheng has to raise his hand and raise his hand. Thanks to the pity: "No, 
this is very simple." 


Huacheng smiled and said: "Is it? But I really feel that my brother is 
amazing." 


Thank you for your kindness: "Where 1s it. If you personally solve the 
mystery on the lantern, I will solve it. That is great..." 


At this time, the tentacle sent a third lamp and sang: "You please! Please!" 


Thanks for the results, the brow slightly concealed. Around the road also 
said: "Hey! This is difficult!" 


Thanks for your nod. Sure enough, this time the mystery can't be seen at a 
glance: "Hyme down and look down." 


mt 


However, it is not too difficult. A few moments, thank you: "shame' 
means mimosa, take the grass; bow, take the head of the low word; 'table 
heart’, take the center of the word 'd'. The three parts are together... ... 
"Flower'. The answer is flowers." 


When he finished, he covered his ears. Sure enough, as soon as he reported 
the mystery, he began to dance around in the crowds, and he was arrogant 
and unremarkable. Huacheng looked at him with a smile and said: 
"Brother, this time, it is really amazing." 


The tentacle sneaked in with a light, and thanked and politely said: "There 
is even more powerful. This time, I can guess the mystery without looking 
at the mystery. Believe it or not." 


Huacheng’s eyes widened and said: “Oh, is it, my brother actually has this 
stunt?” 


Thanks for the light, said: "Of course, I guess, this mystery is the 'city.' 
The city of Huacheng, right?" 


When I look at the lights, I am sure, "Go to the South." Thanks to pity: 
"Go to a move, turn the go, turn it into 'earth'; 'Ge' reservation; 'Southern 
set’, take the word 'square' south, set at the 'earth' 'go' center, for 'city'. 
This should The most difficult puzzle to solve, but unfortunately..." 


Unfortunately, he first guessed the law. What are the four mysteries 
connected? 


The ghosts were all seen, and they didn’t dare to cheer. Instead, they 
coughed up and looked at the sky. The eyes of Huacheng slowly swept 
away, and all the ghosts were scared and timid. Some went into the lamp, 
and some went into the ground, and they all hugged their heads: "The city 
owner is angry! It is not my idea!!!" "Not my fault!" "Fart! You clearly 
agree with the loudest!!!" 


Huacheng whispered: "Roll." 


When I was in a hurry, everyone in this street was like a wind and a cloud, 
and there was very little left. Thanks for hanging the lamp back on the 
Shelf, he said, "Go back." 


The two walked side by side and walked together to the thousand lights. 
On the way, Huacheng is very authentic: "Brother, don't look at me like 
that. It's really not that I let them do this." 


Thanks and smiles, said: "I know. Your words will not be such a mystery." 
Huacheng Road: "Oh? That brother thinks, how can I set a mystery?" 
Thank you for your defense: "Of course, ‘My husband Saburo’...” 

When he got here, he found out that "the disaster came out of his mouth" 
and quickly stopped his mouth. However, it is already late. Huacheng 


laughed and said: "Brother, fooled! Beautiful!" 


"_..0h, hehe..." 


Just at this time, the two returned to the view of the thousand lights. As 
soon as I entered the hall, I thanked and found that there was a table on top 
of the jade platform. He glanced up and went up to see it, it was actually 
two bowls of yuan. 


He turned back, and Huacheng also came up and said: "This is what I saw 
on my brother's road." 


Thanks for your nod. 
Huacheng Road: "Sit down and eat, brother." 


" " 


Xie pity did not sit down, but suddenly slammed into his arms, buried his 
face in his chest, staring at the flower city, tightly not let go. 


Huacheng also hugged him backhand. 


After I didn’t know how many years, he finally remembered what it was 
like. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 246: 
Wonderful memory drifting by His Royal 
Highness Prince Edward 


Xie pity opened his eyes and found himself lying on the ground. 
This is a strange house. He is very confused. 


He clearly knows how to be here at the Emperor's View on Tai Cang 
Mountain. 


Thanks for the slightest sorrow, sitting up from the ground. He found 
himself wearing a plain white robe, too simple, and the broth was like a 
poor man. The material is not very good, quite rough, and it makes his 
skin uncomfortable. 


Xie pity frowned, trying to climb from the ground, who knows that he just 
got up, and he felt more discomfort. 


Backache, leg acid, stomach acid, neck acid. Is it because I was lying on 
the ground for one night and blowing a night? 


ane impossible. He is not so delicate. 


Fengxin and admiration? Thanks to them, they shouted: "Wind...cough, 
cough...???" 


The donkey is not very comfortable. 


He remembered that last night, the wind letter and the affection were 
quarreling for the trivial matter, and he couldn’t calmly meditate. He 
ordered them to go out to speak idioms. Listening to their resentment and 
gnashing teeth, they received more than two hundred idioms. When they 
were sleepy, he rested. How did you wake up and fall into such an 
incredible and confusing situation? ? ? 


Thanks to the table on the side of the table, I stood up and looked around. 
This should be an inn, but in general, if he does not choose to sleep, but 
choose to live in the inn, he will not live in this one-view is very cheap to 
save the inn. 


He was not **** with his hands and the door was not locked, indicating 
that he was not under house arrest. If someone or something has counted 
him, what does it mean to throw him here? 


The more you think about it, the more you feel surprised, but the most 
strange thing is his physical state at the moment, enduring the soreness of 
his arm and taking off his coat, ready to see what hurts on his body. Who 
knows, this off, he looked down, the entire face instantly lost his blood. 


From his abdomen to the chest, itis densely covered with | red_| 
marks. On the skin of the sheep's fat jade, it seems to be full of large 
petals, and blossoming blush. Red, he was so stunned, and looked at the 
mirror. 


really! Not only the heart and the abdomen, but also the neck, the back is 
also! 


Thank you for taking the opportunity to remove the clothes below. 


Things are clear. 


During the time when he did not know why he was in a coma, someone 
gave him a break. 


For the first time in his life, Xie Pity had the feeling of "soft soles", but he 
still barely supported and stood firm. 


He had long heard the servants of his palace and told some horror legends 


outside the palace. What special traits were smuggledjobscene| [the black 
shop ghosts of the black shop, and the girl’s family was given medicine 
and then doing bad things. But...but... 


Xie pity hands clasped his head and murmured: "But, I am, man!... 


Now he looks like this, it is really unsightly, in addition to these kisses | 
scars, scars that are too hard to squeeze, and embarrassing bites. Thanks 
for the pity, I felt a fever in my head and my body was cold. 


Suddenly, he thought of a very serious matter: bad! 


The way he cultivated is absolutely quit, kinky, but this 1s not a broken 
ring? ! 


Xie pity quickly tried. Under a try, sure enough, no mana! 
Xie pity has always been calm, but this situation is just about to collapse. 


I don't know how, when I wake up, it becomes like this. The winds and 
feelings are gone, and I don't know who has made what means to sneak 
out. I really have to collapse! 


For a long while, he still couldn’t accept the fact that he was upset. But I 
can't stay like this all the time, so I have to pick up the clothes and wear 
them out of the inn. No one stopped him along the way, thanking him for a 
sigh of relief, and even the surrounding buildings, pedestrian costumes, 
and accents were quite eccentric. 


But probably there is a ghost in his heart. He always thinks that others 
have seen what happened to him. He looked at him with a strange look, 
forced him to go faster and faster, and finally ran wildly, rushing into a 


forest, punching In the tree, directly discount the tree " ", angered: 
"Bastard!!!" 


He wants to use the most vicious vocabulary to curse those who have done 
this kind of thing to him. He can only turn around and lick "Bastard, 
confuse, mix the ball!", the fire in my heart is not vented, panic. He 


couldn't cry too much, he could only scream. " "\ after 
discounting dozens of big trees, finally hit the land of this place, crying 
and shouting and crawling out to hug his thigh: "His Royal Highness 
Prince! Don't fight under the Prince!" 


Xie pity is full of anger, but the old man suddenly emerged from the soil, 
not an ordinary person, he was surprised to see, "Who are you?" 


The old man wiped his tears and said: "I am the land here, Your Royal 
Highness! This forest is my old-age! You can play the old man again, I 
will drink the northwest wind!" 


After all, I don’t care about other people’s affairs. I can’t arbitrarily anger. 
Besides, the official is small. It’s also a priest. I’m old and need respect. 
So I barely received a little fire, and I took my hand and slowed my tone. , 
said: "... sorry, Iam excited. This is good, just how many trees I have 
discounted, I will lose you." 


The land released the hand that hugged his thigh and said, "No, no, no, no, 
no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, 
no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no 


Xie pity is a bit strange, this land is also a sacred official, and looks more 
than him, why is he so afraid of him, also called him "you old man"? But I 
was not in the mood to ask this question, and asked politely: "You are the 
land of this area, you should know about this area? Can you help me find 
two people?" Then he put his hand into his sleeve and thought Take a few 
golden leaves to make a sacrifice, the land sees his movements, and 
quickly screams: "No need to not use! Who are you looking for?" 


Just thank you for not giving anything, and took out his hand and said: 
"My two attendants, the wind and the love." 


The face of the land suddenly became very strange. Thank you, "What's 
wrong? Is there any difficulty?" 


Land Road: "No, no, no, no difficulty. Just..." What happened to His Royal 
Highness, after eight hundred years, he also called General Nanyang and 
General Xuanzhen as his attendants. I wonder if the two generals will be 
angry. what? After all, it’s okay for the two generals to be angry. This is 


not good at waiting. The one who is angry is scary. Then said: "Please wait 
here for a while, I will find it for you!" 


Thanks to pity: "There is work." Waiting for a bend, raising his head, the 
land has disappeared. 


Thanks for feeling that my head is still burning, holding my forehead, I 
don’t know how long it has been, just listening to a voice in front of me 
and wondering: "What happened?" 


Thanks for raising his head, he saw the wind and the love. 


However, it is not the style and admiration he knows. It is true that the two 
have not changed their looks and their temperament is different. They are 
not like two squatting teenagers. Instead, they are like two generals who 
have been conquering for many years. They are all wearing expensive 
black robes, unlike ordinary people. At least thank you for never seeing 
them wearing this dress. 


Asked is the wind letter, he came over and said: "His Royal Highness, 
what are you doing here alone?" 


'..."" Thanks, "I have to ask, where did you both go? I asked you to pick up 
the dragon outside the door last night. Why didn't the figure disappear this 
morning?" 


The wind and the feelings are exposed to the strange look of the land, as if 
he could not understand his words. Thanks for the headache, and said: 
"And what about your dress? What the **** is going on?" 


Fengxin looked down at himself and wondered: "What happened to this 
dress, isn't it normal?" 


Mu Qing said: "What are you talking about? Sleepy, I was not here last 
night." 


Xie pity took his head and tried to yell and yell, forcing himself to calm 
down and thinking for a moment, saying: "I understand? You are like me, 


being caught by something." 


The wind and the feelings of love are getting more and more different. 
Wind channel: "I am confused. Your Highness still tells us what is going 
on." 


Mu Qing turned his eyes and said: "Don't ask. I said that there is 
something to ask people to look for me, not to find him, 80% is the brain 
is broken." 


Xie Li could not understand what they were saying, saying: "Which is that 
one? National teacher?" 


" " 


The wind and the feelings of the face are opposite, and they must be 
embarrassed, and they will step forward and say: "His Royal Highness." 


Thanks: "What?" 


Admire the feeling: "I am a bit fuzzy now, you tell me, can you remember 
what we are doing these days?" 


Thanks to the pity: "Did we not practice in the Royal High School these 
days?" 


Admiration: "Where is Huacheng?" 


Hearing this name, thankfulness has a very familiar feeling, but after 
thinking about it, he really doesn't know, so he stunned: 
"Flower...city...who?" 


Admired: "Good. I understand." 


He turned his eyes to the side and went to the side with a shocked letter. 
Xie pity suddenly felt a bit suspicious and warned: "What do you know? 
What are you talking about?" 


After the discussion was over, the two turned around. Wind channel: "His 
Royal Highness, let's go." 


Thanks for being more suspicious: "Where are you going?" 


Admiration: "Take you to see someone who can solve this situation. Come 
on!" 


Thanks for the eight-point vigilance, and then back again and again. When 
he saw his feelings, he seemed to want to run. He said, "Don't go!" 
Reaching out and waving an aura, he seems to tie him. But how can you 
not walk away? 


Run your legs! 


As soon as he ran, the wind and the sentiment were big. The two chased 
each other while screaming in the wind, the wind channel: "I am fucking! I 
am really fucking! What is going on with him? He can't forget such a great 
thing when he forgets it! One forget is eight hundred years?!" 


Admiration: "Finally! Finally, the messy things have eaten more and eat 
bad brains!" 


"How ts it possible? I am afraid that he was surprised when he went out 
alone. Hurry and find it! His current brain, but only seventeen!" 


At this time, I still don’t forget to dig out: "Yes, innocent, stupid, 
pampered, seventeen-year-old Prince Edward!" 


"Wait! Tell him first. Tell him soon!" 
Out of this kind of thing, of course, you must first tell that person! 


Thanks for a sigh of relief, he ran for more than 20 miles. After stopping, 
he only gasped slightly. He felt as if he was still in a huge misty net and 
had not yet rushed out. 


What the **** is this all about? 


unusual. Too bad! 


Is it still unclear what strength is it? At that time, the aura should be 
repaired for at least a few hundred years. How can this be true? Definitely 
fake! 


There is him. He is not normal himself. This run, he found himself as light 
as Yan. Although he was as light as Yan, his body seems to be faster and 
more powerful. 


Everything is wrong! 


Calm and calm, then calm down, thank you for remembering, just now, the 
feelings seem to mention a name. 


He muttered: "Flower City." 


I don't know why, this name should be very strange to him, but when he 
thought about it, his heart was a slight movement, as if a small flower was 
opened in a corner of his heart. So, he couldn't help but read the name over 
and over again. 


Huacheng, Huacheng, Huacheng. 


This should be a very important person, perhaps the key to this incident. 
Have to go find him first. 


Make up your mind and walk in the direction of the town. 


Although he was just aware of what happened to him, thankfulness was 
totally unacceptable, but he was slowed down after half an hour. Although 
the heart and the body are still uncomfortable, but now I am trapped in the 
puzzle, there is no time to upset him. The true feelings of humiliation are 
not known, and it is enough to see the black hand behind the scenes. He 
must immediately cheer up and find out the truth. 


So, when he stepped into the town, he had recovered his usual look. 


I just took a tea house and went upstairs to sit by the window, but I didn't 
want to drink tea. Thanks for picking up the cup on the table and looking 
at it, the cup was filled with unclean old tea stains, which made him look 
tired and let go. 


Inside the tea house, a pretty girl with a beautiful face is holding a sly, 
screaming, sitting in a circle of old and young men, staring at her. The 
woman sang the original local minor, the girl went out to pick up the 
flowers early in the morning, but sang for a while, a group of great old 
man said: "No, not good, change!" "Yes, this is not good, change Change!" 
"Change me!" 


The singer has no choice but to change what she wants. She has a pretty 


glamour | love | color|color | minor tune, light and slow, soft voice, 
soft blushing heartbeat. The group of onlookers was satisfied, and they 
were applauded. Thanks for sitting in the corner of the second floor, but it 
is very uncomfortable. 


Listening to the lyrics carefully, it seems that singing the sweet love of a 


couple's wedding night is really bold and explicit. This| —_| word | Yan | 
Qu, thank you have never heard in the Imperial City. If it was in the past, 
even if he heard it, he could only be a singer. The wind was over the ear, 
because it had nothing to do with him. He would never think about it for a 
lifetime. But now, it's not the same. 


Although I don’t remember how it happened, I’ve been personnel, and 
listening to it, my mind is different. Moreover, he found a terrible thing: 
his mind is completely out of his control! 


The lyrics are light | — three points, his heart is very beautiful. Moreover, 
there are still many fragmentary pictures in the mind, the ten fingers of the 
two hands clasped together, the red line between the fingers is pointing | 
dead | wrapped | cotton; the ear seems to be able to hear the broken 
asthma, interest, forgiveness Weeping, and, a man tempted a whisper. 


wae: what are these. What are these? ! 


Thanks for being shameful and annoyed, biting his lower lip and clenching 
his fist. For a long while, I couldn’t bear it, and I couldn’t help but squat 
on the table. 


The" "sound scared the nearby table guests and stared at him. Thanks 
for this, I wake up, I apologize, I can’t wait to block my ears with my 
hands, I can’t hear you, I just want to sing again and I can only leave! 


Suddenly, the song came to an abrupt end, and a scream pulled him out of 
myth. Xie pity suddenly looked up, I saw a large group of people all 
around, it seems to be moving hands, the song girl holding a cockroach, 
scared to stand up, whispered: "You grandfather, let's listen to the song, 
don't do it. Yeah..." 


Several men screamed: "What about hands-on? Anyway, we must not only 
let us do it, I don't believe you have sold it and have not been touched by a 
few!" 


The song was so popular that she said, "What told me to sell it? Iam 
selling it, not selling it!" 


Others deliberately did not listen to her defense, said: "Hey! Say the 
Achilles | Jie | Lie | Women's like! If you really are so serious you will not 
come out to sell!" 


"Yes! I just sang this kind of song and sang people. Now I say that I will 
not sell it. I will set up a memorial archway and laugh at the dead!" 


The song was so fainting that she fainted, and trembled: "You let me sing, 
you let me sing me to sing!" 


However, no matter what she said, the bad listeners always have words to 
say: "We let you sing and sing? So obedient? Explain that you have long 


wanted to sing this kind of thing in your heart] !" 


Thank you for listening. 


He had a fire in his heart, and now he is even more angry. The white 
shadow flashed, and the group of squatting men had not figured out what 
was going on, and he was stumped by a row. The head of the man's fart | 
shares in the sky, Da Dao said: "What are you?? Dare to mess with us?!" 


Thanks to the singer before the singer, the knuckles creaked, but still no 
anger on the face, Shen Sheng said: "The right way to stop it. If you are 
beautiful, anyone will be heart-warming. But if you don't know how to 
treat each other with courtesy, It’s shameful.” 


Someone shouted: "It is clearly she sang first, she sang, we can't touch 
it!!" 


Xie pity but one word: "Yes. She sang, you can't touch it!" 


The voice did not fall, and seven or eight big-shaped big men were thrown 
down by the building. They fell down on the ground and fell scary. 
Actually, they were not seriously injured, but they were enough to swear 
because no one saw it. How did he shoot, and what about resisting 
counterattacks? Busy and fleeing. Upstairs, Xie pity turned back, the 
singer was very grateful to get up and gave him a gift, said: "Thank you 
for the road leader!" 


Thanks to pity: "It’s just a matter of raising your hand. Girl, do you still 
want to stay here?" 


The singer nodded and thanked her and nodded. "Good. Then you can 
continue to sing." 


After he finished, he sat back and squatted, sitting in danger and staying 
here. 


Other men saw him not leaving, but also stared at this side, and sure 
enough did not dare to go to harass. The singer understands his mind, and 
is more grateful, and turns to the opening, which is the original and lively 
local minor. 


Thanks for a cup of tea is preparing to drink, bowed and saw the old tea 
stain inside, hesitated for a moment, still can not beat himself, put down 
the cup, sighed. I turned back unintentionally, but I stopped. 


I saw the opposite side of the Long Street, another more magnificent red 
wine cellar, sitting alone. 


It was a long-haired man in red. 


Although wearing a black eye mask, adding a bit of wildness, but not 
hiding its beauty. Y1 Hong Sheng Feng, skin white if snow, hand hold a 
silver cup, the wine cellar and his silver wrists are generally flashing. At 
first glance, I was so eye-catching that I was looking at it and being far 
away from him. Seeing the gratitude of the line of sight, a slight smile, a 
shallow toast, seems to respect him in the air. 


Somehow, Xie Liyi and the man looked at each other, as if they were 
overpowered, and quickly withdrew their sight. 


However, although he pretended not to care, his heart jumped wildly. 


It’s weird. The man is indeed eye-catching and has a secretive appeal. But 
he used to be a man who has never seen such a style. Why did he see that 
person? 


After thinking about it, he rejected this idea. This is simply not right. 
Because, think about it, he used to, did not see such a handsome man. 


Thinking of this, thank you, this is a rare character, it is better to pay more 
attention, and turned to look. However, this hope, the red man disappeared. 


It just disappeared like this. It was like a gorgeous maple leaf, falling 
down, and flickering in front of me, teaching him to shine, he disappeared. 
It seems that it is not true, it is just a fleeting dream bubble. 


I looked at the magnificent restaurant for a while, and I disappeared. Xie 
Li finally gave up. I don’t know if it was a little disappointing. I gently 


spit out a sigh of relief and rubbed my heart. "Well." 


Who knows, when he turned around, he saw the opposite side and did not 
know when he had already sat alone, and he was staring at him. 


The two men turned their eyes, and the pity was slightly stunned. The man 
smiled and said: "This road leader, can you please have a drink?" 


It was the red man who was greeted by his fart. 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 247: The 
wonderful memory drift of His Royal Highness 2 


He actually sat across from himself so casually. 


Thanks for the blemishes, it took a while to make sure that the man was 
really talking to himself. 


He immediately reacted, and his heart could not be shaken by the 
popularity of this popular person, still calm, and politely said: 
"Unfortunately, under the alcohol, this cup, I am afraid I can't afford it." 


The red man laughed and sat more casually. He said, "Is it? I look at the 
appearance of the leader. It seems that there is no cloud, and I need to use 
alcohol to eliminate it." 


Xie pity quietly said: "I am afraid that you are wrong." 


Although the biggest ring has been broken, it is also impossible to give up 
on it, regardless of other small rings. 


His face is always faint, but the man does not retreat, but instead sits here 
in general, said: "Since the road leader refused to ask me, then, I am self- 
conscious?" 


Thank you for looking at him and look around. strange. There is no 
vacancy around, why should he sit here to drink? But there is no reason to 
refuse, thank you: "You please." 


So, the other side lazy to recruit beckoning. The shop guys have never seen 
such a party guest, the atmosphere did not dare to go out, and quickly sent 
a jug of wine jug, hard to wipe the table, for fear of slowing down this. 


Look at the red man who is calm and self-satisfied, and he can't help but 
say: "Why, whoever you meet with you for the first time, will you ask 
someone to have a drink?" 


The man smiled and said: "Well? That's not. Don't say that the average 
person can't see my face." 


This tone is quite arrogant. However, thanking is not disgusting. 


The two of them are sitting together, and the place where they have been 
looking forward to it seems to be very calm. After a while, the man opened 
his mouth first. 


He pleaded with one hand and said: "What is the name of this long name?" 


Xie pity did not think about it and compiled a fake surname: "Free your 
name." 


The man raised his eyebrow and said: "Oh - the flower is long." 
Thank you, "What do you call?" 
The man said: "The road leader calls me Saburo." 


Thank you for knowing that this person is not willing to tell his true 
identity, nor is he reluctant. After thinking about it, I didn’t think that the 
character was ranked third, so I didn’t bother to speculate. At this moment, 
he suddenly noticed that on the cheek side of the red man, a bundle of 
scorpion hair bundled with a red coral bead. 


The beads are soft and soft, and they are small and small. But thank you 
for always seeing where you saw this bead. It seems to be in the palace 
where your jewels are thrown all over the floor. 


But he is not sure. Saburo noticed his gaze and said, "Like this?" 


As he said, he lifted a few long, white fingers and gently grabbed the coral 
beads and pinched it. 


I don't know why, Xie pity eyes, suddenly a pain in the chest, as if 
somewhere in his body was pinched, slammed back. 


This action is too big, and several guests next to it are looking to this side. 
Saburo looked up in disappointment and was surprised: "This road chief, 
what happened to you?" 


He held out a hand and seemed to come to help. Of course, thank you for 
not helping him, and he sat firmly and said: "No, nothing. That bead..." 


"Oh." Sanlang’s smile on his lips was not diminished. "Do you have this 
bead?" 


In his hands, he intensified his play with the bright coral beads and smiled. 
"This is what I love from my wife. How does the Taoist think?" 


Thanks: "Oh... very good, very good." 


In fact, he didn't know what he was talking about, and the fingers on his 
legs were clenched, such as sitting on a needle felt. 


The strange red man played | the clear is the delicate drops of the beads, 


and then simple movements, but he saw a few lascivious | meaning. 


It seems to be squatting at the fingertips. It is not the red beads that squats 
and squats. It is the part of his body that feels sensitive and sensation. He 
has a fever on his face, and his breathing is short and uncomfortable. 


unusual. This is absolutely not normal. 


The man in charge of the self-proclaimed "Sanlang" is Jun Jun, but he is 
arrogant and unremarkable. Thanks for the bells and bells, he calmed his 
mind, calmed down, and stared at him without fear. He asked, "Excuse me, 
take the initiative to get close, what is it?" 


Saburo smiled and said slowly: "Why are you so vigilant? There is nothing 
wrong with it. But it is to see the long-term style, for the heart, and can't 
help it. If there is offense, look at Haihan." 


Xie Pity does not know whether he should believe him, remove his gaze, 
secretly repent in his heart, should not let this person sit opposite, and 
make himself upset now. Just at this time, the singer went to work, gave a 
gift to everyone, and smiled at Xie Pity, and it floated away. She left, thank 
you for not having to stay, and got up and said: "Frank. You can drink this 
cup yourself." 


In the last sentence, he wanted to be a little provocative, but when he 
spoke, he sent it out politely. Xie pity did not dare to look at the red man, 
almost flew down the stairs, walked around for a while, sure that no one 
followed, and this was a relief. 


After standing still, I feel awkward. 


His clothes were gone, the property was gone, the sword was gone, the 
attendants were gone, and the mana was gone. 


In the seventeen-year life, I have never encountered such a situation where 
I can't do anything. Xie Shi shook his head and stopped a passerby where it 
is. Passerby answered, thank you for not listening to this place, and asked: 
"How far is it from the Imperial City? What is the location in the Imperial 
City?" 


He did not say that it was the city of Xianle, and the passers-by said: 
"Imperial City? It 1s in the south of the Imperial City, far from the 
Imperial City!" 


really. The people here are very strange in their accents and architectural 
styles. Unlike the imperial city, he guessed it must be far away. I don't 
know what purpose people who brought him here have. 


After another walk, Xie pity encountered a new problem. 


He is hungry. 


However, he only said that his property was gone. The pieces that can 
prove the identity of the prince are also missing. I didn’t want to give the 
land a few golden leaves. Sitting on the tea house for a while, a tea table 
has already spent a few of his sons who have been smashed out, and 
because he can't stand the old tea stains, the tea has not taken a bite, and 
the lower abdomen is still empty. 


It’s a mess of heroes. 


Just when he was picked up by a rare eyebrow, he suddenly found that 
something on the ground in front of the floor seemed to have lost 
something and was shining. 


Thanks for the pity, it’s amazing. 


On the ground of this small broken alley, I actually dropped a few golden 
leaves! 


In addition to the golden leaves, there are silver leaves and some small 
pieces of small pieces. In the daytime, I actually got money on the ground, 
and I lost my pie in the sky. I really don’t know if he 1s lucky or lucky. 


After thanking the pity, the first reaction was whether this was accidentally 
dropped. Walking out of the alley, the pedestrians on the street asked: 
"Who is the property left here?" 


Most people shook their heads. Lai Han, who 1s idle, said with a face: "I 
lost! I lost!" Xie pity asked: "How much have you lost?" They all 
screamed and could not answer, ran in laughter. 


Thank you for being afraid of the owner to come back and stand patiently. 
After waiting for nearly an hour, I didn’t see anyone looking for it. I was 
getting hungry in the belly. For a long time, I sighed and looked at the 
belongings in my sleeve. My heart said: "Or else, borrow a little bit and 
use it to return ten times. Let's go." 


There is no other way. So, after waiting for a scent, he went to the street 
and bought a hoe. 


Thank you for not eating gimmicks. I have never eaten this kind of rough 
and steamed buns. It looks big and staying, white and tasteless. But he 
didn't want to use more of the money he had brought in. In case this was 
something that others had to use urgently, it was only the least money. 


For the first time in his life, he got such a big gimmick, and he was a 
novelty. He walked through the alley and went to a more secluded street. 
He was about to send the **** to the entrance. Suddenly, a hand was 
stretched from the side. The girl took it away. 


This method of taking it 1s a god. Thanks for the pity, the hand is empty, 
turned to look at it, standing on the side, actually is the red man on the 
restaurant! 


Thanks for being shocked. 


I did not expect this person to actually follow here, but did not expect that 
he actually grabbed his own gimmick! 


After squatting for a while, he remembered to take it back and jumped up 
and said, "Give it back to me!" 


He captured the momentum very quickly, the man's body is faster, plus a 
taller than him, a flash to avoid, said: "Don't eat this." 


He said this, but he took a bite with the **** and left a gap. This time, 
thank you for wanting to eat and can not eat. He is a prince, how can he not 
eat a bite that has been bitten by a person, and widens his eyes and says, 
"You! " 


The card was a bit, airway: "How is this person like this?" 


When he saw it at first sight, he still felt that this was a rare character. He 
intended to make friends, but he did not expect it to be such a boring 
rogue! 


The two figures are red and white, and they are dazzling. They can’t 
believe that such a wonderful competition is just to grab a gimmick. 


Although Xie pity vaguely felt that his speed could be faster, it was 
enough to catch up with the Saburo's skill, but it seemed that he did not 
grasp the essentials, and he did not listen to his hands and feet. In addition, 
he was tired and annoying and confused throughout the day. He was sore 
and sore, and under the anger, he fell to the ground and fell to the ground. 
He screamed and screamed. 


pain. 
The pain that is difficult to open is diffused from the hard-to-open parts. 


This pain was originally there, but the wound was carefully treated, and he 
was forced to ignore it. This fall, his face suddenly changed. Saburo’s face 
changed, and immediately leaned over and grabbed his arm, saying: 
“Brother...” 


Immediately changed his mind: "Are you okay?" 


Xie pity is very embarrassing, I can't wait to dig a pit to bury my face in 
the ground, trying to pull back and burn my face: "Please don't yell at me, 
don't hold me like this!" 


Saburo really let go of his arm, but that means, he changed his shoulder 
and said: "What happened to you? Where is it hurt?" 


He is very concerned about his tone. It is not like a fake. The so-called 
hand does not laugh at the face, thank you for your pity, but when you 
think about where it hurts, why it hurts, you are ashamed and annoyed, and 
the whole day’s depression is coming up. One of them broke his hand and 
climbed up. He said: "...I don't have any pain at all, it doesn't hurt at all!" I 
lost my turn and ran. Who knows, the man behind him caught his wrist. I 
can't earn it, I can't bear it, I can't bear it, I turn around and glare, but I see 
that Saburo stares at him and sighs softly: "Oh, this road is long, thousands 
of mistakes are my fault, don't I am angry with you. In this way, I will take 
you to have a drink and sin you." 


Somehow, thank you for seeing this person's face, a heart is turbulent, he is 
not used to this feeling, just want to run away quickly, said: "I don't want 


you to bring, I never drink! You let me go." 
Saburo said: "Well, don't drink. Then I will take you to dinner? Hungry." 


Thank you for your bad feelings. What is the tone of this person talking to 
him? He has always been a child, and he has never suffered such 
humiliation. He said: "I don't want you to take me to dinner. I am not 
hungry. You should respect it!" 


The embarrassing thing is that when the voice just fell, there was a weak 
protest in his belly. 


Thanks for being stiff and more angry, his face was red and his face was 
screaming: "You...you...you, why are you pestering me? Don't pester me 
anymore!" 


Saburo stared at him and said: "Dao, have you not found out?" 


Seeing that he suddenly looked serious, thanked him: "What did you 
find?" 


Saburo said: "You have evil things on your body." 
Thank you for your pity. Suddenly, the wrist was loose, and a bandage 
wrapped around the wrist, a white snake generally slipped down and raised 


high in front of him. Then, he rushed toward him! 


However, it has not yet caught up, has been caught by the red man, said: 
"Look." 


The white scorpion seemed to be a viper that had been shackled by him 
seven inches. He was writhing and numb. 


There is such a monster hidden in him! 


Thank you for understanding this. 


He blinked and said: "It turns out that you are close to me because you 
found this evil in my body?" 


Saburo’s face became more and more serious, saying: “Well. This thing is 
so strange, so I noticed it a bit, but fortunately it didn’t hurt you.” 


The truth is clear. Thanks to him, he thought that he was not very polite to 
the son of the son. He was also a slap in the face and was a slap in the face. 
Now that the people are close to him, they are very embarrassed. They are 
serious about him and say: "Thank you. I was misunderstood before." 


He had not bent down and Saburo helped him, saying: "Where, where. It’s 
time to raise your hand." 


Look up, thank you for being slightly confused. I don't know why, he 
always felt that although the man in red looks like a serious man, his eyes 
are full of smiles. I think that my wacky state of wolverines has been seen 
by the other side, and it is somewhat embarrassing. 


It is strange to say that in the same age, thankfulness is already very 
stable. Who knows that when he sees this man, he can't calm down and 
teach him to be uneasy. Saburo did not seem to notice this. He said: "Since 
it has been solved, then I will leave. The road leader will have a period 
later?" 


Thanks for the subconsciousness: "Well, there will be a period later." 


Saburo waved his hand and turned away. Uncontrollable, Xie Pity actually 
followed him a few steps. 


Maybe because I really don't know where to go, it may be confusing. 
Saburo turned back, thanked and pity, this was sober, and quickly stopped, 
pretending to look elsewhere. However, it is already late. 


There were a few chuckles over there, and thank you for the redness of the 
earlobe. 


Looking at the cat with a hard scalp, Saburo smiled with his arm and said: 
"I don't want to wait for it later. I think it is time for it. How? Is the leader 
now willing to go have a drink with me?" 


It was the original magnificent restaurant. 


The red-faced man who just got to know is very generous. When he came 
up, he ordered the best wine in the restaurant. It was not inferior to the 
royal palace, and many of the practices were very novel. Xie had never 
seen it. Hungry, he ate and ate, only to find that Saburo had been 
supporting him in the opposite direction. He looked at him intently. That 
look, as if to treat him as a dish. 


Thankfulness, this kind of gaze was once again stared at the needle felt, 
and I was sure that I was not out of hunger, so I put down the chopsticks 
and coughed, saying: "...you laughed." 


Saburo said: "Well? Is there anything that laughs? Don't care about me. 
Please, please. Continue." 


Then he took out the **** that the two had just robbed for a while, and ate 
it without changing color. Seeing it, thank you more and more. 


He was sitting in danger, looked at the white, and decided to talk about the 
business. He said: "Why is this evil thing hidden in me? I didn't realize it 
at all, it was like..." It was like I have been squatting on him for a long 
time, and I am used to it. 


The white cockroach kept shaking his head and swaying toward him. If he 
was not fixed by Saburo, he was afraid to wrap him in a scorpion. It looks 
like it is... I like him very much. 


Saburo crushed it with a chopstick. He refused to let it pray to him. He 
smiled and said: "It seems that this evil thing is very bad, and it must be 
learned." 


Thanks to the pity: "Beyond the lesson, let's first find out its origins." 


The two talked for a while. Xie pity grew up in the Xianle Palace, and later 
practiced in the Emperor's View. He has never seen such a person who is so 
interesting and knowledgeable. He listened to Saburo and heard his eyes 
bright, his face was more than that, and he almost threw his troubles. The 
brain is gone. After a while, I suddenly remembered that I was in a strange 
whirlpool. The color is correct: "Saburo, can you ask someone about you?" 


Saburo threw the white scorpion on the ground. I don’t know what method 
to make it softly jump, and said: "Who." 


Thanks: "It is like this. I am looking for a person named Huacheng." 
Upon hearing the name, Saburo raised an eyebrow. 


He said: "Well. I can ask, are you looking for this person, do you want to 
do something?" 


Thank you very much and sincerely: "To tell the truth, I don't know." 
Listening to Saburo's tone, he guessed he must know who the flower city 
is, and said: "Maybe you will think that I am jealous of you, but it 1s true, I 


don't know what I can do for him. When I wake up today, I find myself In 
a very strange situation." 


He said the ins and outs in one breath, only omitted those things that were 
ashamed to say. Finally, thank you: "So I think this person should be very 
important. If Saburo knows who he is, is it convenient to tell?" 


Saburo smiled and said: "Ah, there is nothing inconvenient. Dao, you and I 
will see you, I naturally want to help you. Huacheng this person..." 


Xie pity concentrated and listened, saying: "How?" 
Saburo said: "It's a madman." 


Thank you, "How crazy?" 


Saburo took a glass of wine and held it in his hand. He said: "He is a 
believer." 


"Who is the believer?" 
"The Prince of Xianle." 
"Cough and cough -" 


Xie pity quickly swallowed a cup of tea and coughed out, saying: "Wait, 
wait, etc. I - my mother, Xianle, thank you, haven't become a **** yet, 
where are the believers?" 


Saburo does not care about the earth: "It will become a **** sooner or 
later. Moreover, God, then it is the case, you say that God is God, you say 
no, it is not. He thinks yes, that is." 


Xie pity and laugh, said: "This is too casual!" 


After a pause, he said again: "...but he really believes that His Royal 
Highness will be a god?" 


Saburo slowly said: "Not believe." 

Then he smiled: "I firmly believe." 

Xie pity also followed, and said: "I will never let this person expect." 
He also raised his arm and said: "So, where can I see this flower city?" 
Saburo said: "Dao, do you really want to see him?" 

Thank you, "Yes." 


Saburo does not seem to agree with his idea, saying: "Huacheng is a very 
bad person." 


Thanks for the slightest brow, said: "Very bad? Where is it bad?" 


He is not willing to believe that a believer who believes that he will 
become a **** is a bad person. Saburo said: "This is..." 


At this time, thank you for paying attention to one thing. 


He had been careful before, and did not look directly at Saburo. Now they 
have been together for a while, and some are familiar, he just relaxed a 
little, letting his eyes go. 


Saburo’s hand has been resting on the side of the bar, and the fingers are 
not light and heavy on the railing. The five fingers are slender, and the 
third finger is tied with a thin red line, which is like the bright knot. 


Xie Li immediately remembered the tea house, when the singing girl sang, 
the lingering face that flashed in his mind: under the yarn account, two 
hands, ten fingers tightly interlocked. 


On the hand that is over the top, there is such a red line. 2k novel reading 
network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 248: The 
wonderful memories of His Royal Highness Prince 
3 


Thanks to pity and eyes wide open. 
He looked unbelievable, Saburo said: "What is it?" 


Where is the pity, the deceitful, the shyness of being played, the sadness, 
the mixed blood, the rushing to the forehead, the palm of the hand on the 
table, one word and one bite: "...original, come, yes ,you!" 


The desktop couldn't afford his shot, and it was torn apart on the spot. 
Fortunately, the second floor of the wine cellar was not scared by others, 
otherwise it would be scared and shocked. There is no warrior in the hands 
of Xie, and it is a palm. Saburo is still sitting in a chair, only slightly on 
the side. 


The palm of the hand broke into the wall behind him, and the gravel fell, 
but he did not move, holding his arm and raising his eyes, saying: "Dao 
Chang, what 1s this?" 


Xie's face burned so badly that I didn't know what it was like at the 
moment. The other hand was squeaking and screaming. "You...you have to 
reload. What have you done to me...you know Believe." 


Saburo’s eyes lifted a few more points and said: “Unfortunately, I really 
don’t know. What did I do to the Taoist leader and taught you to be so 
angry? Can you advise one or two?” 


This person actually said to him innocently, what did he say? Under the 


broad daylight, what kind of thing is it? ! Thank you for seeing this kind of 
person, anger from the shoulder to the apex of the heart is shaking, his 


face is getting red, and the language is incoherently shouted: "Stop! You 
this... I want to kill you this shameless... | Flowing... despicable... you..." 


Saburo sighed and said: "Dao Chang, I didn't expect that I was really 
sincere, but I have to respond like this. Where am I shameless?" 


Thanks for your pity, it’s easy to get back a little calm, saying: "Don’t 
want to lie to me again! The red line on your hand has proved, you are the 
one... that..." 


"Oh?" Saburo did not panic, raised his hand and said, "Do you say this? Is 
there any problem with this red line?" 


Thanks for seeing the red line, it seems to have been stabbed. "I saw it. At 
that time, you...there is this red line..." 


Saburo: "Which time?" 
For a moment, thank you really want to kill him. 
Knowing it, it’s too bad! 


I don't know why, even if he is angry again, his hands can't move. And it 1s 
not subject to the talents moving, it is his own body that does not let him 
move! 


At this time, a few people ran upstairs and said: "What are the two guest 
officers doing?! How can you fight indiscriminately!" 


Thanks for turning back: "The danger here! You first..." Who knows, this 
look, he stopped again. 


In the hands of those few people, all of them are all tied with a red line! 


Thanks to pity: "What is the red line in your hand?" 


One person: "Red line? The red line is not the red line. What is unusual? 
It's not how it happened... I don't know what's going on." 


Thank you very much. It’s hard to be here, the red line on the hand is a 
very common dressing trend? 


He turned back, Saburo seemed to see through what he was thinking, 
saying: "The road leader guessed well, referring to the red line, is the 
custom of this place. Do not believe the crowd below." 


Thanks to the wine downstairs, and sure enough, among the crowds, there 
are a lot of hands tied with a red line, and some are tied several times. He 
said: "What is this custom?" 


Saburo smiled slightly and said: "This is also true. It is also related to the 
flower city." 


"what?" 


"Because he and his beloved people have such a red line in their hands. So 
many people have followed suit, intending to seek marriage, or love." 


Thanks to the pity, he said: "So, the flower city, is still a rather 
unspeakable person? There are so many people who are keen to follow 
suit..." 


Saburo said: "You can't get it. See who you want to compare. Right, Dao, 
the land seems to have dropped something, can you pick it up?" 


Thanks to this, he only reacted. He has maintained this attacking posture. 
It turned out to be an oolong. After exhausting his breath, he quickly 
withdrew his hand and said: "Sorry, sorry, Saburo, I am really... I can’t help 
it. I was impatient and misunderstood you..." 


Saburo has always been calm, bending over and picking up something, 
saying: "No problem. Dao, is this something you lost?" 


He turned out from the ground in a mess, a golden leaf, probably only 
slipped from his sleeve when he thanked him. Xie pity is about to talk, but 


see Saburo lift the golden leaf to his eyes, blinked and said: "Hey, this 
golden leaf looks a little familiar." 


After that, he took out something from his waist without hesitation. It is 
also a golden leaf. 


Two gold leaves, exactly the same! 
Xie pity said: "Is this yours?" 
Saburo said: "Hey, I did drop something, so I went back and looked for..." 


Hearing this, thank you for fear that he misunderstood, busy: "Sanlang 
listened to me." 


Saburo said: "You don't have to be nervous. I naturally listen to you." 


Thanks for a sigh of relief, said: "This is the case. This golden leaf is that I 
was on the road. I wanted to wait for the owner to return and give it back 
to others, but I waited for an hour and no one came to look for it. | am 
really..." 


Speaking of this, he was a little shy, bowed his head and whispered: "So, 
just... make a self-assertion, borrow a bit first, want to buy something to 
eat, that is the gimmick... I intend to return it in multiples in the future, 
but no matter How to say it, after all, don’t ask for it. Sorry." 


Saburo smiled and said: "Why is the road leader so? Is this a non-human 
sentiment? Not to mention that I originally intended to invite you to drink, 
that one girl, and finally I still ate it? These little things, don't worry about 
it. Don't you think it's wonderful? It's the thing that I lost. The person who 
picked him up 1s the leader. It's really a matter of a thousand miles." 


Thank you for your understanding, the heart is wide, said: "However, you 
must be careful with Saburo. Then you are clearly on the road, you have 
not seen it, next time you can not be so careless." 


At this time, the crowds who shrank their heads and shook their heads and 
counted: "The two guest officers, are you calm and not guilty? If you are 


calm, just count the money from the bad table!" 
Thanks: "..." 


In the past, of course, the amount of compensation is not a problem, but 
now, he can not afford a gimmick. Saburo said: "Nothing. Count me." 


It is only clear that he first moved to Saburo, but Saburo took the initiative 
to help him to pay for his bad things. Thanks to his gentle and thoughtful 
feelings, he was unable to speak, and his throat moved, saying: "You..." 


The buddies didn’t know what was going on, and they were stunned by the 
store and came to help them change a more gorgeous table. The two men 
sat down again, thanking them for being grateful and grateful, and it was 
difficult to express a thousand words. Saburo is also concerned about the 
authenticity: "Dao Chang, I only listened to your words, it seems that there 
is hidden feelings. What happened? Dao, who did you do?" 


That kind of thing, how thank you for saying it, the face that just calmed 
down was red and shy, and said: "...nothing, nothing." 


Saburo said: "If you don't mind, can you tell me one or two? Saburo may 
be able to help a few points." 


Although he is kind, Xie Pity has been chased by him and he has no way to 
escape. He 1s sitting on the ground and is helpless. "...I really have 
nothing. Saburo, can you not ask..." 


It is difficult to open the teeth. 


In this case, Saburo is not reluctant, saying: "Okay. Where are we talking 
about? Do you want to see the flower city?" 


Thanks for the pity, the heart is convinced, "Well. Saburo knows the way?" 


Saburo said: "Nature knows. However, in these few days, Huacheng is not 
good." 


"Why?" 


Saburo used chopsticks to make the dish in the dish into a big smile. He 
said: "It 1s said that his beloved person has been slightly embarrassed in 
recent days, so he has to be a companion. There is no time other than this." 


Thankful, I thought that this flower city 1s still a person of personal 
feelings, very affectionate, more appreciative, said: "It turns out that. 
Then, when will you wait to see him?" 


"More than five days, as long as three days. I suggest that the leader, do 
not have to worry, before that, it is better to rest first." 


Xie pity just thought that he did not have a place to stay, and listened to 
Saburo: "If the head of the road does not have a place to stay, why not go 
to me to rest? Anyway, my house is big, and few people live." 


Thanks again, I can’t help it anymore. I whispered: "Sanlang, you are 
really... really good." 


For the first time, he was so embarrassed to use such straightforward 
words, but besides that, he couldn’t find a word that was more intimate 
with his mood. Saburo seems to be very useful, smiled and said: "Who 
asked me to see you as the Daoist? Oh, yes, there is a problem, forget to 
ask, Daogui this year, Geng?" 


Thanks for the pity: "Seventeen." 
Saburo said: "Oh, seventeen, that is smaller than me." 


Indeed, he seems to be about twenty years old. Saburo seems to be casual: 
"That said, the governor should call my brother." 


Xie Pity is the royal family, the noble Prince of the Prince, and should not 
be a brother and brother with others, and few people can afford it. 
However, the Saburo really felt very grateful to him. He did not even 
compare his brother to his elder brother. He was very novel and laughed. 
"It turned out to be Saburo." 


I don't know if it is an illusion. After he called this "brother", the smile of 
Saburo suddenly became a bit strange. 


It’s hard to describe, Saburo’s left-eye gaze suddenly burned up. He was so 
hot that he felt the skin was hot and blinked. “What happened?” 


The horrible heat was fleeting, and Saburo resumed as usual. He smiled 
and said: "Nothing, too happy. There 1s nothing smaller than me in my 
family. I have never heard anyone call me this way." 


Thanks to pity: "If Saburo does not disappoint, then... I am calling you so 
much?" 


Saburo smiled and his eyes flashed. The mouth still deducted: "Oh, of 
course, I will never dislike it. It depends on Chang Jie." 


Thanks: "I don't mind, of course I don't mind. Saburo, are we going back 
to your home now?" 


Saburo put down the chopsticks and said, "That, let me go now." 


Saburo’s residence is a very spacious and magnificent big house. Thanks 
to pity, I only feel that I am more than a few palaces in the Xianle Palace. 


In the evening, lying alone in bed, thank you for turning to the side. 


He always felt that something was missing next to him, and it was not 
stable. In addition to the body's faint discomfort, lying on his back, he was 
sore; he turned over and felt as if he had something on his back. 


Stumbled, I made a lot of messy dreams. He wanted to move, but he was 
firmly suppressed. The voice whispered in his ear, sometimes a man, 
sometimes a teenager; sometimes he called his brother, brother, and 
sometimes called his Highness, and told him not to fear, His Royal 
Highness. 


Gentle, extremely evil, but also cherished. 


Woke up suddenly, the clothes were all sweaty. Cheering while gasping, 
clenching his fists, anger and powerlessly hammering on the bed, fingers 
inserted into the slightly wet hair, heart: "...this kind of thing, when can I 
forget! Wait for me to catch This shameless bastard, I must..." 


At this time, he found that the pillow did not know when to put a suit. 
Although it is also white, the style is what he likes. Thanks for being too 
big, I quickly went to the house and bathed quickly. 


Remove the clothes and soak in the water, he suddenly found himself 
wearing a thin silver chain around his neck. 


At the end of the chain is a crystal-clear ring. I don't know how long I have 
worn it. Anyway, he didn't notice it at all. It was strange: "Do I have such a 
pendant?" 


This ring is so beautiful, I can see that he 1s almost fascinated, but he has 
not lost his vigilance. Suddenly, he noticed that there was silver flashing 
on the side and immediately shouted: "Who!" 


One shot of the water, the splash of water, like a steel ball, hit the wall and 
squeak, and it is not someone who is hit by him, but a knife? ! 


Xie pity grasped the knife of the hard state, very confused, suddenly, the 
silver thread on the handle was separated, as if one eye opened, and the 
eyes were turned upside down. Thanks for being more shocked. 


What is this strange thing? ! 


The scimitar blade is slender, and if there is life, it is very enthusiastic to 
pounce in his arms. Thanks for the cold and the cold, let it succeed, and 
was called out by the ice "wow", and it was awkward. 


But probably because he didn't sense murderousness, he intuitively felt 
that the scimitar was not dangerous. Except for the difficult push, he didn't 
want to make more rude behaviors, such as slap it and call it to the clouds. 
At this time, a red shadow flashed, grabbed the scimitar, and said: "You 
are here..." 


At a glance, Saburo was standing by the bath, holding the knife in his 
hand. Although he was still smiling, his forehead was faintly blue-lifted, 
and his hand slaps the knife very rudely. "I didn't mean that I don't want to 
come over now?" 


Thanks to the pity: "Sanlang, this knife is yours...the instrument?" 


Saburo turned to him, and the blue veins on his forehead disappeared 
instantly. It was a sigh of peace. He said: "There is nothing wrong with it, 
my brother... my brother, I make you laugh." 


Xie Pity is awe-inspiring, his eyes are bright, and he is holding his red 
dress and saying: "No, no, Sanlang brother, you are so powerful! You can 
practice such a tool with your own intelligence!" 


The knife was only beaten by Saburo. The committee wrinkled its eyes and 
listened to the praise and praise. The eyes were smug and smug, and 
sneaked to him. Saburo is very cold and 1s a palm. 


This time it can not be done," " suddenly fell to the ground, rolling 
around and rolling, as if by the adults hit the ground and rolling the crying 
children. Thanks to the ear, it seems like I can hear it wow wow, and I have 
a distressed look. I am busy getting up and saying: "Wait for Saburo! 
Forget it, you don't want to hit it. I think it 1s just a naughty thing, I want 
to show it. Ok, don't have to be so harsh about it." 


But as soon as I got out of the water, I remembered that my underwater 
body was red-naked, my face was inexplicably red, and I sank back. 
Saburo has already turned very naturally and went out. 


Thanks for rushing out of the water and changing the new clothes, I feel 
that the material of the close-fitting clothing is very fine, and finally I am 
no longer suffering from the skin, and I am more grateful. Out of the 
house, came to the hall of the meeting, Saburo has been waiting for the 
seat. 


I don't know how he taught the knife. Now it is honestly worn by Sanlang's 
waist. When it is not tampering, it is very cold and chilling. I can't 


imagine the fact that the pair is rolling on the ground. Seeing that 
thankfulness came, Saburo smiled and said: "Get up? Can you sleep well 
last night?" 


Thanks and pity: "I didn't know why I had been dreaming in the middle of 
the night... I slept well in the middle of the night." 


Saburo said: "It is too tired." 


The two said a few words casually, and they learned a few times. This day 
is almost over. Probably they will get along with each other before the 
flower city is free. 


However, in the evening, thank you for lying in bed, and doing the dream 
of being so dry and hot. 


He was turned over and over in his dreams and couldn't bear it. He woke 
up suddenly, and he was sweating and angry. He had to get up and want to 
take a few laps to calm down, but he suddenly heard the sound coming 
from the other side of the room. . 


That is the master of Saburo. The soundproofing of the house is very good, 
the sound is very small, but the five senses of the pity are absolutely 
amazing. He held his breath and went silently outside the house. 


Looking through the cracks in the door, I saw Saburo sitting in the middle 
of the house. He held a tube of purple, and seemed to be writing. His look 
was a different cold from the face of him. There was also a black face. The 
man is bending over and reporting in a low voice. 


I don't know what's going on, the presence of the ghost face 1s really low, 
and I may not notice it if | am not careful. Xie Pity is about to listen 
carefully, but the man has already finished the report. He only vaguely 
heard the scattered statement. "The monster is in a mess for a long time." 
"I want to come to the pledge to deal with it, and I have an accident." This 
is just discovered. Orientation. What? 


He is slowly combing, just listening to Saburo: "I am going to accompany 
him now, can't open the body. I will send the monster to me before 
tomorrow night." 


The ghost face whispered: "Yes. Do you want to leave it a sigh of relief?" 


Saburo put a pen on it and glanced at what he wrote. He seemed to be not 
satisfied. He smashed it into a ball and threw it. This was slow and 
succinct: "Leave a few more mouths, let it spit it out, and slowly grind its 
dog's head. broken." 


The look and tone he said when he said this was chilling. But Xie Pity is 
not very resentful. The ghost-faced man had to leave, and Xie pity 
immediately flashed and hid it back. 


Going back to my own room, thanking me for not sleeping, coming and 
going a few times, my heart said: "What is Sanlang? What monster is he 
talking about?" 


It sounds like there is something important to be swallowed by a monster 
that has been a mess for a long time. Saburo is quite angry. But because I 
have to accompany him right now, I can't open my body and smash the 
head of the monster. 


When I think of it, 1am very embarrassed to thank you. This Saburo, when 
he is really sincere, is extremely sincere. 


Suddenly, his mind flashed: Why did he sit like this? Anyway, I can't see 
Huacheng for the time being. He always wanted to do something for 
Saburo, the good brother. Why don't he help him to pick up the monster? 


Let's go and leave. Xie pity made up his mind, and immediately left a 
book, write down Sanlang brothers to worry, pity to go back to the clouds, 
flying and jumping, quietly out of this gorgeous house. 2k novel reading 
network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 249: The 
wonderful memories of His Royal Highness Prince 
4 


The direction of the ghost face is not complicated, just in the cave of a 
certain mountain in the south. Xie Pity also has confidence that the speed 
of ordinary people can't keep up with him now. He must be faster than 
Saburo. 


Sure enough, after an hour, he killed the place, rushed into the mountains 
is amad demolition, playing the mountain night, the cat ghosts crying, 
finally, found a hole in the mountain. 


Although the monster is not small, three or four hundred give ita 
goal, but for the pity, it is no different from the three or four. He also 
worried about the strength of the enemy first, and did not act rashly, but 
patiently stayed near Dongfu for a while, listening to the chattering 
arrangements, only to know that the monster had passed too many days. 


"...Yes, yeah, it’s easy for the mountain lord to escape from a stupid priest, 
scared to death, brought back with injuries, and once he went back, he 
abandoned the original Dongfu and fled here." 


"It turned out! I said how suddenly I summoned the big guys. It turned out 
that the Taoist priests came to retaliate!" 


"Don't be afraid, the Taoist priest was smashed by the mountain lord. Now 
even if you can wake up, you must be confused and unable to find the 
north." 


"How can you not be afraid? The mountain lord is a well-known big 
demon who is hundreds of years old. It is said that the priest suddenly did 
not know where it came from. The two palms smacked it, if 1t was not the 
priest. The injury gave him a few holes in the air, but I was afraid that the 
mountain owner would not come back." 


"Mom, where are the wild priests so powerful!" 


When I heard this, thank you for feeling almost, and I walked out from the 
room and said hello gently: "Hello." 


The little enchanting stunned and jumped up and said, "Who!" 
"Where is the little white face?" 


Thanks for the slightest smile, and there is no time to explain, just go to 
the hole to kill. He grabbed it as many as he could, and even if he had a 
dozens of feet, even if he had no mana, he was scared to scream: "What is 
this little white face? It’s a long way to go! It’s rude. !!!" 


In this way, the wild grass was unimpeded and stepped into the hole. Xie 
was prepared to fight a famous big demon. Who knows that after entering, 
he saw an adult-shaped monster rolling on the ground. Holding your 
stomach, wow, wow. 


Xie Li first thought that it was pretending to be a model. If you look at it 
again, it is not like a fake. It has a tall stomach and it seems to swallow 
something that is so good and powerful. So thank you for your pity: "What 
happened to you?" 


The monster probably felt so confused that when he saw the pity, he 
shouted: "It’s just right! You! I don’t eat! I dare not eat! I don’t dare 
anymore! I swallowed me. Something is still for you! Can't digest it, can't 
digest it!" 


Thanks for your pity: "You have mistaken people? You didn't swallow my 
things, what else did you give me?" 


The monster was so painful that he couldn’t help answering his words. 
Thanks for the unclearness, I first painted Zhang Fu, and then it was put 
away and said. It is very amazing that when the character is photographed, 
the monster turns into a round tumbler, and the stomach 1s bigger than 
other tumblers, which is very funny. Cherished, funny and amazed, looked 


at the character that I painted, I wonder how it would become like this? 
Where did you draw the wrong one? 


But this is not a big problem. This battle is extremely easy, thank you for 
the deep mountains, the sky is clear. He took the tumbler into his sleeve 
and rushed back to the city. 


I finally did one thing for the Saburo. I am very happy with it. I have 
already begun to think about how to take the captured monster to Saburo. 
He secretly warned himself that if Saburo showed a surprised look, he 
would also hold on to it, and he would not be happy. After a night of 
rushing, my legs and legs were a little tired, so thank you for looking for a 
stall to sit and get a bowl of tea without money. 


Drinking and drinking, I suddenly heard someone shouting at him behind 
him: "Thank you!" 


Thanks for giving up the tea bowl. 


Who is so daring and dare to dare to call his name on the street? You must 
know that even if you are a royal family, there are few such disrespectful 
people. Who is not a respectful and sincere devotion to call him His Royal 
Highness? 


Looking back, the man was actually a civilian, carrying a big wooden box, 
striding and shouting: "Wait! Let's wait! You forgot to thank you! Bring 
him too!" 


It turned out not to call him, but someone had the same name as him. 
Thanks for being more strange. Although he didn't care about avoiding 
what he was, he was surprised. Some people dared to take exactly the same 
name. 


He knew it right away, and the person said "thank you" is not a person. 


There was a man sitting near Xie Pity, holding the box and the man went to 
sit next to the man and took a wooden box and said: "I brought the pity. I 


remember the one who gave you the house today. Send it! Don't believe 
this evil, these two are not put together, but it is going to be bad!" 


"That is that. I naturally know..." 
Thanks for the pity, I couldn’t help myself. I said, "Excuse me..." 


The two men turned to look at him. Thanks for the pity: "I’m taking a risk. 
Is it in this box?" 


The man said: "I didn't say it? There is pity inside." 
Thanks for the pity: "But... thank you, not your Royal Highness?" 


The two seemed to be funny, saying: "No one said that he is not a prince, it 
is. You see!" He said, and opened the box. 


The eyes of thank you are wide. The wooden box is actually a small god, 
and there is a gray statue in the shrine. It is a white Taoist who fights. 


He does not know. 


'...""_Xie pity could not understand at all, said, "You mean, this statue is the 
Prince of Xianle, thank you?" 


"if not?" 


Others have also come together, and half of them are watching him like 
this: "You young man is really weird. It seems to be a long way. How can 
you not even know such a simple matter?" 


Half of it is to look at this "Idol": "Wow! This rotten fairy carving 1s not 
bad! It is enough." 


"Yeah, it’s frustrating, I think it’s a bad luck at first glance!" 


"Good! The more ugly it looks, the better it will be when the person breaks 
him. It will take effect for up to eight days." 


Thanks for the pity: "Trashing immortals? How did it become a broken 
fairy??" 


Everyone said: "You are really weird! This is a tragic thing!" 


Cheering is not a very easy person to get angry, but at the moment it is 
slightly annoying. 


Anyone who heard someone ridiculing himself was a bad one, and he 
wouldn’t be too happy. He stood up and sighed: "Do you have any 
dissatisfaction with the Xianle royal family? Even if there is, you insult 
the prince. It 1s not very ceremonial." 


Everyone looked at each other and laughed at him. "What do you say, 
which country's etiquette is in place? Xianleguo was destroyed more than 
800 years ago!" 


After an hour, Xie pity walked on the street, still a little embarrassed. 
too terrifying. Everything I received was too terrible for him. 


"How can Xianle Country be destroyed? My father and mother have 
clearly lived well? And how could it be that I am destroyed? I lost it? I 
destroyed the country? I was also beaten twice? I became a collection. 
Tattered?" 


He asked himself over and over again, telling himself again and again: 
impossible. impossible. impossible! 


He wants to convince himself: "These are not really at all, they must be 
behind the scenes." 


However, all the faint things are wrong, those weird accents, quirky 
costumes and quirky buildings, as well as weird style and admiration, 
telling him that this is not a nightmare, it is not a fantasy. There are no 
demons and ghosts that can create such a real fantasy. 


It’s been eight hundred years. 
How has it been eight hundred years? 
How did he become like this after eight hundred years? 


The fairy country was gone; the father and the mother died; the wind and 
the love rose. He became a broken. 


How could this be? 
This will not be the case. It shouldn't be like this! 


Thanks for the faster and faster, and finally ran up, as if there was 
boundless darkness behind him to swallow him. Suddenly, a red shadow 
flashed, and a long figure was in front of him. "Where is the leader, where 
have you been? I can ask for a while." 


It is Saburo. He was still smiling, and he said that he would come over to 
take him, and when he saw him, he would fall into the cold and screamed, 
"Don't come over!!!" 


Just drink it. Saburo has a shape and looks the same. He said, "What 
happened?" 


Thanks to the fists and fists, cold and cold: "What the **** are you? What 
do you want to do?" 


Saburo said: "I thought that we had talked about it yesterday and didn't 
care about these small problems." 


Thanks for your pity: "You lied to me." 


Silence for a moment, Saburo said: "Do you already know?" 


Thanks to the pity: "I already know, it is already..." Eight hundred years 
later. 


He wouldn't have been so late to notice that something was wrong, but this 
person has been deliberately staring at him and can't find him in the north. 
Otherwise, how could he find the truth after a day? 


Saburo took a step toward him and said: "His Royal Highness." 


Thanks again, I stepped back a few steps and said, "Don't come over!!! 
Come over and hit you!" 


His voice and body are shaking. Thankfulness is terrible. 


I am afraid that it is not a demon or a ghost, nor a man who 1s also a fairy 
and evil in front of him, but a whole strange world. In this world, he has no 
glory of pride, no faithful subordinates, no parents who love him, no 
country of his own, no believers in his love. No, no, nothing! 


Saburo still took a step toward him and said: "Don't be afraid, Your 
Highness." 


Hearing this sentence, thank you for your face changed. 


He suddenly remembered that in the fragmentary fragment, the man who 
whispered in his ear, "Don't be afraid, Your Highness." 


Why didn't he find it? 
Their tone and voice are exactly the same! 
Thank you for your trepidation. "It’s you... it’s really you..." 


When he thought that this person had deceived himself, he was still 
grateful to him, full of good feelings, and he called him "brother". He 
couldn’t stand the anger and surrendered, and he said, "You are a liar!" 


This slapping, just hit the chest of Saburo, thank you for waiting for 
another shot, but found that he could not move. 


It was his own body that blocked him! 


Xie pity did not understand what was going on, but Saburo grabbed his 
hand. Thanks a bit, then a word: "Don't touch me! You lar, lie to me. I will 
never believe you again. You..." 


Saburo calmly said: "His Royal Highness, believe me." 
Thankful and angry: "I don't believe it!!! I!..." 
However, like the stopped attack, the latter "unbelief" can not be shouted. 


The concern and pain in this man’s eyes is absolutely true. Anyone who 
sees a person showing such a look to another person will no longer doubt 
his true heart. 


As if to separate the pity and the strange world that made him fear, Saburo 
finally took him into his arms, his lips kissed him in his hair, softly said: 
"Don't be afraid, Your Highness. It has passed. Your Highness. You have 
already come over." 


For a long time, the body of thankfulness finally softened. 


Now, let go of your shame and think about it. In the fragmentary fragments 
of the dream, the man called his voice, always gentle and unbiased. 


As for himself... Although there are indeed begging for mercy and 
weeping, he can hear it, and he is not half-willing. It’s just that he has been 
reluctant to face up, so he didn’t find it. 


Xie pity finally knows why he couldn't help but trust him when he saw this 
man. I am afraid that after eight hundred years, his relationship with 
Saburo... is not simple. 


He completely gave up resisting his body, letting himself follow his heart 
and bury his face in Saburo’s arms, screaming: "We..." 


Saburo said: "Yeah." 


Silence for a long time, thanked and muttered: "Why... I suddenly forgot 
all about the eight hundred years?" 


Saburo said: "I am not good. The day before yesterday, you suddenly 
received a pledge in the middle of the night, and walked too hurriedly. I 
didn't help you to restore your mana, and I didn't have time to tell you that 
he would be swallowed up by the monster." 


Thanks to the pity: "That is not that you are not good at all, I am not 
careful." 


Saburo said: "His Royal High will never be bad." 


Xie pity smiled awkwardly and lowered the floor: "That, Saburo, how can 
I... let Xianle destroy the country?" 


He clearly cherishes his people so much, and he has the ambition to make 
Xianle more than a thousand years old. 


Saburo held him tighter and calmly said: "It is not your fault." 

Thanks and pity: "How can I fail so? How can I become like this?" 

At the beginning, I didn’t want to do a big, earth-shattering and vigorous 
career. Even if there is not one in a million people who can really achieve 


what he wants, Xie Pity never doubts that he is one in a million. 


Perhaps this is why Saburo did not let him discover that it is now eight 
hundred years old. 


Saburo said: "You have not failed." 


Xie pity shook his head and said: "But I have no believers." 


Saburo said: "You have it." 


Thanks to pity, I was sad, saying: "I am a broken fairy, it 1s a broken, no 
one is my follower, and no one treats me as a god. Who will respect a 
deceased god?" 


This is not the same as his dream. 
Saburo said: "Is not telling you? You have a believer." 


Thanks for raising his face, Saburo smiled at him: "His Royal Highness, I 
said that you will soon see the flower city. Now, you see it." 


Xie pity looked up and stared at his face, slightly confused: "Sanlang, 
you...when did you know me?" 


Huacheng Road: "From very early on, when you have not yet soared." 
Thanks for a slow glance. 


Huacheng said again: "Your Highness, maybe you now, I feel that you have 
failed after 800 years. Maybe you will be disappointed and unacceptable, 
but please believe me, this is not the case." 


His bright left eye stared at the pity, the lightness and the softness of the 
eyes. 


He said: "You saved me. I have been watching you. 


“There are countless people in this world who are ‘successful’ than you, 
but none of them can save me like you, and there is no one that can do 
what you do — 


"You don't know how much courage you gave me to make me the one 
today." 


"In my heart, you will always be the only god." 


Thanks: "And you will always be my most loyal believer." 


When the voice just fell, he reacted, and this sentence was his 
subconscious consciousness, as if he had heard such a precious promise. 
Huacheng smiled, picked up his hand and kissed him on the back of his 
hand. He said, "Yes." 


For a long time, thankfulness seems to have made up his mind to take out 
the monster's tumbler from the sleeve and said: "Is this monster 
swallowing my memory?" 


Huacheng took the monster and said: "Sure enough, your Highness gave 
you his new nest." 


Thanks for your nod and said: "To restore your memory, you have to start 
from it." 


The tumbler grew up in the palm of the flower city, and flew out a few 
fireflies-like light spots in his mouth, flying around him. Huacheng Road: 
"Catch them, you can take back the memory of your eight hundred years." 


Thank you for listening, and reaching out to them. However, when it was 
about to touch, it stopped the action. 


Restoring these eight hundred years of memory, it seems as if we have to 
go through another hundred years, once again through everything, the pain 
of the swords, the shame of defeat, the powerless anger. 


Although he knew that it was only a moment, the fingertips still shivered 
slightly. 


Huacheng stood behind him, making him feel like he was leaning against a 
solid wall. He heard the voice of the flower city coming from the rear: 
"Don't be afraid, Your Highness." 


Thanks for the slightest side, Huacheng grabbed his waist and said: "Trust 
me. No matter how long, I will always wait for you. You will meet me 


again." 
Yes. Still will meet. 
Then, thanks to the light points, they reached out. 


A little bit of starburst fits into his fingertips, he feels very bright in front 
of him, as if something hot is approaching. Before the light came, thank 
you: "I am very happy and met you." 


After this sentence, a little bit of light merged into his body and 
disappeared. Cheering slowly fell forward and was caught by the flower 
city. 


For a while, thank you for your long wake. As soon as I opened my eyes, 
Huacheng whispered: "Brother?" 


Xie pity slowly opened a faint smile, reached out and put on the face of 
Huacheng, saying: "...and meet you again." 


Huacheng also smiled and said: "I said, believe me." 


Thanks and pity: "Are we, are we waiting for another round of eight 
hundred years?" 


Huacheng Road: "Don't you say that, no matter how long, I will wait for 
you. But..." 


He pulled the pity. The two stood face to face, Huacheng clenched his hand 
and smiled: "I don't want to separate for a moment now." 


The past cannot be changed. 


Eight hundred years ago, the seventeen-year-old singer of the heavens did 
not know what he was waiting for in the future. God gave him two doors. 
Shenwu Road is a stunned glimpse. He is all open. 


After that, he will be alone in the inability to go back to the sky, struggling 
to survive the long and arduous years. Pain, anger, disappointment, hatred, 


despair, madness. The heart is as gray as it 1s. 
Then resurrected. 
But those are already gone. 


"Brother, welcome back." 


"Look, I said you will meet me too, I didn't lie to you." 
Thanks for taking a look at Huacheng, saying: "Is it?" 


Huacheng smiled and said: "Of course, why have I lied to my Highness? 
Brother, I..." 


Xie pity put his hand into the arms of Huacheng, took out a piece of paper, 
and read: "Take the care of Sanlang brother, pity does not think that the 
newspaper, willing to do a little bit of power, for the brothers to solve 
problems, temporarily leave. Sanlang brothers have to worry Go, go and 
go back." 


Huacheng raised a brow and held his hand without a word. Thank you for 
reading, and he looked at him and raised his eyebrows: "Sanlang brother, 
good brother. You are so good." 


Huacheng laughed and said: "I am not good, my brother 1s not clear 
already?" 


The face of thankfulness is slightly red, vague: "...1 don't know what you 
are talking about. In short, you are too much for these two days, reflect on 
it." 


Huacheng solemnly said: "Brother, you can't do this. I have been treating 
each other for two days, and I have to endure hardships." 


Thanks to pity: "Where do you treat each other with courtesy, you know... 
obviously..." It’s very fun to play with him. I thought that these two days 
became a seventeen-year-old idiot who was innocent, stupid, and spoiled. I 
played with Huacheng over and over again, thanking me now and 
remembering the process clearly. I can’t look at myself. A bang, hold your 
forehead. Huacheng is just as authentic: "Really. Even if you are 
embarrassed by your brother, it is a shameless and unscrupulous bastard. 
Saburo has no regrets." 


"If your brother is not happy, you can still marry me. Saburo doesn't 
matter." 


Thank you for your pity. 


He sneaked away from his forehead, and the first side of the flower city, 
people had no shadow, said: "Brother? Don't run, okay, my fault, my 
brother!" 


Don't call your brother again! 2k novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 250: Ghost 
King's bedside story 


Huacheng is sick. 


Although it is only a minor illness, it turns out that the ghost king will be 
sick. This is really amazing. 


Therefore, when Xie pity returned to the Qianduan view, as usual to check 
the copybooks practiced in Huacheng, but he saw him with a reddish face, 
he was worried. 


After pressing the flower city on the platform, it’s not bad. They both 
rolled on this spacious platform. They didn’t show any images anyway. 
They prayed for a hand and tried his cheeks and forehead. They were more 
worried: “It’s hot. what." 


Huacheng smiled and said: "I saw my brother is naturally hot. My brother 
will be hotter when he touches it again." 


Xie pity is a glimpse, and I have to work hard to pretend that my face is 
blushing, saying: "The sick mouth is still not so honest." 


Huacheng innocently said: "What did I say? I am very honest. Brother, 
don't worry, little things, no problem." 


But thank you for listening, his voice is lower than usual, hoarse, and the 
eyebrows are also slightly tired, said: "Then rest well, I will be here with 
you these few days, waiting for you." 


After that, he took the pen and ink of the wording to the Shentai side, and 
Huacheng patted him and said: "Is my brother not coming to the stage to 
accompany me?" 


When I came to the stage, I still have to come back. I don’t want to rest for 
a few days. Thanks and pity: "No, I’m too hard to work." 


Huacheng smiled and said: "Where, if it is a brother, how can Saburo work 
hard?" 


Xie pity does not make trouble with him, concentrate on writing a 
copybook. Huacheng turned over and held his hand and stared at his face. 


No matter how many times, thankfulness will be blushing by his gaze, 
quite uncomfortable: "...Sanlang, look at the copybook, not to see me." 


Huacheng sighed: "Brother, it doesn't matter. I saw a headache when I saw 
this thing, but it was written by my brother, and I have to look at it. I may 
have gotten a lot of textbooks." 


Thanks to pity: "Where is this disease." 


Huacheng is very authentic: "It is better to look at my brother. My brother 
is much better than a copybook. Maybe I will look at it more." 


Thankful and helpless, I stopped the pen and shook my head. "How do you 
become more and more confused now? There 1s no formality in your 
mouth. Well, I know, listen to you, don't read the post, then what to do?" 


Huacheng Road: "In fact, you don't have to do anything. You will stay with 
me like this. I won't be able to use it for a long time." 


Thanks again, he touched his forehead. Although this person 1s the face of 
a handsome man, now he is so spoiled, let him think of the child in the 
warm nest in the winter, and find out the red face, the heart is very pity. 
After thinking about it, he said: "This way, I just received one thing today." 


He groaned in his sleeve and took out the same thing. He said: "This is the 
old book that I have received from people today. I am preparing to read it. 
I will tell you the story." 


In his hand is a long-time pamphlet, broken, yellow pages, with a strange 
book of ink, must be turned over countless times. 


Huacheng said: "Don't listen." 


Thank you for your pity: "Why?" 


Huacheng lazily said: "In any case, the story is arranged to be the story of 
other priests. They are so clear about what happened to the sesame and rot 
of the sesame seeds. I have a clear understanding of what is going on, and 
I have to go to Gothic. Read it for me?" 


Right. After all, Huacheng is a man who has mastered many black history 
in the Three Realms. Huacheng Road: "My brother really wants to read, it 
is better to read something else. For example, your own story." 


Thanks for the pity, said: "My business, is there anyone who knows more 
and sees more than you?" 


Huacheng Road: "Tell me more, I want to hear. It is not enough to listen." 


Thanks for knowing that he was serious, and he took care of his cheeks. 
Inadvertently glanced again, and suddenly wondered: "Sanlang, it seems to 
really write you and me." 


"Is it?" 


Thanks for turning over the book again, said: "Really. I have written a lot 
of red ghost kings and tattered immortals. Is this you and me?" 


Huacheng also came to the interest, saying: "Oh? What to write?" 


Xie Li is also very curious about how the folks will arrange him and 
Huacheng, so he opened the story collection and read it to Huacheng: "A 
long time ago, there was a big ghost king who loves to wear red. Although 
the ghost king is extremely powerful, He also has several Jinshan Yinshan, 
but he is very unhappy. Because he is very lonely, he misses his wife..." 


Thanks for the laughter of". ", I can't read it any more, said: "Lonely 
ghost king empty nest waiting... Hahaha... Hahahaha..." 


Huacheng raised his eyebrows: "Nothing wrong. At that time my brother 
was not there, I was very lonely." 


Thanks for the heat, I continued to read it. 


A long time ago, there was a big ghost king who loves to wear red. 
Although the King of the Ghosts is extremely powerful, he still has several 
Jinshan Yinshan, and there are endless money, but he is very unhappy. 
Because he is very lonely, he misses his wife very much. 


But he waited for a few hundred years and did not wait for his beloved, so 
he went to ask an old fairy who is very fortune-telling. Where is my wife? 


The old immortal told him: "You and the other person will meet on a 
mountain. Your wife will wear a wedding dress and marry you in a sedan 
chair." 


The big ghost king was determined to find his wife, and he went to the 
mountain and waited patiently. 


And far away and far away, there is a broken fairy. 


The tattered immortal is ruined, so he is the poorest of the priests, and he 
is poorer than many mortals. 


But although he is poor, he is very kind. One day, on the way to the rotten 
back, the fairy saw a girl crying on the side of the road and asked: "Girl, 
what is it that makes you so sad?" 


The girl cried and said: "I want to marry someone, but when I send my 
parents, I have to turn over a mountain. There is a ghost groom on the 
mountain. The bride who has specially robbed the road, only a few have 
been rescued, I will be robbed and killed. of!" 


The tattered immortal was very sympathetic and determined to kill the 
people, and decided to replace the girl to marry and kill the monster. 


Tattered immortals have two good friends, because of a violent, a stingy, 
so they are violent immortals and small temper. They beat each other and 


told him: "The ghost groom is a big ghost king, his temper is very bad, 
still very embarrassing, most hate the gods, if you go to catch him, you 
will be eaten!" 


But the immortals must go, so they made a sedan chair for the immortals. 
On the day of the marriage, the immortal dressed in a beautiful wedding 
dress borrowed from the wind maiden, pretending to be a bride sitting in 
the sedan chair, was carried up by two friends who were all in the same 
way. 


In the dark lacquered night, the demon wind was a masterpiece, and the 
sedan chair was carried to the mountain. There was no one, and the 
immortal waited, and finally waited to pick up his groom. 


When I picked up the hijab, I was surprised to find that the King of the 
Ghosts turned out to be a very handsome boy. 


What surprised him even more is that this young groom is very polite and 
looks very well-educated, gentle and considerate. Neither the skin of the 
human face reveals the true face of the green face, nor does it force him to 
do anything bad. It is not like the legendary horrible king. 


The mountain 1s very big. The big ghost king brought the immortal to his 
cave house and said to him: "From this moment on, I am your husband, 
you are my beloved wife. This whole mountain is mine. It's also yours, 
you can look around as you like. But remember, there are two houses in 
Houshan, so don't go." 


The immortal asked: "Why?" 


Ghost King groom replied: "That is my secret, you don't have to know. But 
even if you want to go, you can't go, because there are barriers in front of 
the two houses, you must have something on my body to cross the barrier. 


99 


The immortal continues to ask: "What?" 


The ghost king replied: "A dirty waste is hidden in a house. I have to use it 
to get it, and a lot of things can be opened. There is a magic weapon 
hidden in a house. I can’t touch it, but it is very hot. Things can be 
opened." 


The immortal certainly did not listen to him. Although he pretended to be 
very well-behaved in front of the big ghost king, but when the big ghost 
king left, he flew away and quietly went to the back mountain. Sure 
enough, he heard horrible screams and cry for help from the room where 
the dirty waste was hidden. 


The immortal suspected that the missing bride was locked up here, so he 
decided to steal the same thing from the big ghost king and open the 
mysterious house. 


But what are you going to steal? 


The big ghost king has a long, black hair, sometimes draped, sometimes 
bundled. The first method that the immortal came up with was to steal 
some of his hair every day and asked: "Excuse me, can we live in the same 
room?" 


His groom is very polite: "Of course. We are husband and wife." 


In this way, they lived in the same room. Although sleeping in the same 
bed, the immortal did not let the groom take off his clothes, and the ghost 
king did not touch him quite gracefully. 


However, the immortal soon discovered that his groom did not lose a hair. 
No matter whether you brush up your hair in the morning or sleep at night, 
you can't see a hair on your pillow, bed, floor, or comb! 


This can be a headache. The immortal took a sword and wanted to sneak a 
sneak peek at the big ghost king while sleeping. But the ghost king was 
very vigilant, and he opened his eyes as soon as he approached. The 
immortal was caught by him and he was calm. In order to let the big ghost 
king not doubt himself, he immediately cut off his own hair and gave it to 
him. 


The big ghost king was very happy after receiving it. 


Soon, the witty immortal thought of another way. He said to the ghost 
king: "Excuse me, can I kiss you?" 


His groom said with pleasure: "Of course. We are husband and wife." 


Therefore, the immortal took the initiative to hug the ghost groom, forced 
him to kiss him for a long time, finally tasted a little bit of the ghost 
groom, and quickly closed his mouth and ran to the back hill. 


However, it was discovered that it was still not possible. Because there are 
so many things, but he doesn't get enough. He still can't get in, he can only 
put his head into the house, and the body can't get in any way. 


The tattered immortal is a bit frustrated. He thought that it was very 
simple to steal the same thing from the ghost king. I didn't expect it to be 
so hard. 


He thought of a good friend Fengshi Niangniang, so he went to visit the 
Fengshui Temple and asked: "How can I get the same and many things 
from the Big Ghost King?" 


Fengshi Niangniang said: "Hey! It's too simple, you have a woman, and 
there is no room for him!" 


The tattered immortal quickly shook his head. There 1s a rule in the 
immortal law he has practiced. Once he breaks himself, he will lose his 
mana. How can this be done? 


At this time, the Navy Master returned, just heard the words of the 
Niangniang, angered and shouted: "There is no reason! How can you say 
that this is a bad thing!" 


When the Navy Master is angry, he will use money to kill people, and the 
tattered immortals will rush. Running and running, he thought of two other 
good friends, violent immortals and petites, and went to them to ask what 
to do. 


The violent immortals and the little celestial beings are screaming at each 
other, while telling each other that they have a terrible news: because too 
many people have been taken away, the priests will soon attack the 
mountain and capture the big ghost king! 


The immortal was taken aback and worried. Because after many days of 
getting along, he now feels that this young ghost king will not do such a 
bad thing, maybe there is any misunderstanding, maybe the latter is not 

the bride, but something else. 


However, because the tattered immortal is very poor, there is no status, no 
one listens to him. The immortals are very anxious, and then they will not 
find out the truth. Maybe the ghost king will be besieged by the priests. 


There is no way, the immortal had to run back and ask the big ghost king: 
"Excuse me, can you and me have a room?" 


His groom smiled and said: "Oh, of course. We are husbands and wives." 
Therefore, the tattered immortal will be with the big ghost king room. 

On the way, Xian Life was afraid that the Big Ghost King would not leave 
a lot of important things to him, and he hugged him and shouted: "Can you 
give me all? How many times can you give it?" 

His groom is gentle and considerate: "If you want." 


The immortal replied: "I want to..." 


Then, the witty immortal got what he had been looking for. The big ghost 
king touched it, and there were many, many things. 


The next day, the immortal came to the house where the dirty ghosts were 
taken with the things that he had spent a night from the big ghost king. 
This time, he finally went in. 


As soon as the room was opened, the immortal found that there were many 
unkempt bodies inside, and some had turned into bones! 


These bodies are dressed in hi, I am afraid the missing brides. Hope is lost, 
the immortal is shocked and sad. When I turned around, I suddenly found 
out that I didn’t know when I was standing alone. The King of Ghosts 
didn’t know when to stand there! 


The immortal was shocked. He remembered that the violent immortals and 
the little celestial people told him that the great ghost king was very 
embarrassed and hated the gods very much. Now that he has no mana, is it 
that the Ghost King has seen his identity long ago, but he has been lying to 
him? 


The immortal is angry and sad. He runs away and runs faster. Who knows 
but didn't run out. It turned out that he ran too fast, and the big ghost king 
dropped his things and was stopped by the barrier in front of the house. 


The ghost king chased him up, hugged the immortal, and finally said the 
ins and outs. 


It turned out that the Big Ghost King did not arrest people and eat people. 
He was just here waiting for his destined person. One day, a team of 
relatives inadvertently collided with him who was walking in the 
mountains. The groom in the team was scared to escape and left the crying 
bride to sit in the same place. 


The big ghost king didn't want to find trouble. The bride said that she 
didn't want to marry the man, she didn't go back, and she left alone. Later, 
I encountered the same thing several times. The ghost king simply waited 
here and tested the newcomer. If the groom dares to stand up to protect his 
bride before the devils and ghosts, he will not be embarrassed and let them 
go back. And if a vicious groom pushes his bride into the monster's mouth 
to fight for time, he will be arrested and locked into the house. 


Because these people are not right at heart, they often kill each other and 
finally become a white bone. What the immortals saw was their bodies. 
Some of their brides went home, and some fled to the distance with the 
lover, wandering the world, or set up a family. 


The ghost king said: "I have been waiting for you for hundreds of years, 
my brother, I finally waited for you." 


The two of them lifted the misunderstanding and hugged them together. In 
order to leave the house, the big ghost king gave the immortal a lot of his 
things. Who knows, suddenly, the sky 1s rumbling. It turned out that the 
priests were jealous of the ghost king for a long time, seized this 
opportunity, and finally began to attack him! 


The tattered immortal rushed out for a round | beaten, repelled a circle of 
priests. But the whole mountain was collapsed by the priests, and the big 
ghost king was crushed under the mountain. 


The mountain is too high, and the immortal life is afraid of being pressed 
to the big ghost king, trying to hold his shoulders. At this time, he 
suddenly remembered that there was still a mysterious house that had not 
been opened. This house had a powerful magic weapon, and he could 
definitely overthrow the mountain, so he rushed into the cave. As soon as I 
entered, I was pleasantly surprised to find that the Big Ghost King stood 
there intact and stronger! 


The two broke out of the mountains and together they ran the messy 
priests. Finally, sit side by side on the top of the mountain to see the 
clouds and stars left by the priests when they run away. 


The immortal asked: "You are not saying that a house with dirty waste 
needs to be touched by you, and a lot of things are opened, but the house 
that hides the magic weapon needs something that you can't touch but is 
hot and hot to open? ?" 


Ghost Wang smiled and said: "Yes. Is that something that brother didn't 
get early?" 


The immortal knows. That kind of thing is the warm heart of the ghost 
king who loves him. 


As a result, the tattered immortal and the big ghost king happily went to 
the cave together, and they never separated. 


After the story is over, thank you for your pity, and said: "What is this 
written? Is this story too much? No, no, this..." 


What is this mess? Can this be a story? ? ? 


Huacheng has already laughed on the couch. Thank you for your sorrow: 
"It’s totally wrong! What is the prototype of this story? Is it the case with 
Junshan? That’s not the case... completely distorted? And, this story is for 
children. Really? Isn't it right? Who wrote it? And what these seemingly 
familiar but somewhat subtle people are doing..." 


A closer look, the story on this booklet is a naive scene, as if it is for 
children's bedtime reading, but the inside is very overdone, which is more 
difficult to look at than the simple hot explosion. But when I read the end, 
there was another strange feeling, and I thanked myself for wondering if 
something went wrong. 


Huacheng Road: "Well? It's not completely distorted. At least some of the 
points are correct. For example, I did call my brother "Big Brother", and 
for example, Junshan is indeed the one I picked up my brother's sedan 
chair, and then, brother. In the night of the cave, indeed..." 


Xie pity thinks that he has been thick enough for so many years. Who 
knows that in front of Huacheng, he often grows his face and says: "How 
do you know this kind of thing!... and, in addition, Nothing 1s right at 

7 ea 


Although it is known that many folk songs and prototypes have been 
smashed by hundreds of thousands of miles, it is not surprising that after 
numerous processings, it is shocking to see them. There were several 
times in the middle, he was too shameless to read, but was forced by the 
flower city to continue to read to him, really want to hit people, partial life 
can not fight. Huacheng also looked strange and said: "There is definitely 


an insider who missed a star and a half to go out, was arranged by people, 
two points attached to the meeting, and again and again." 


Xie Li put the story on it and said: "Don't look at this messy book, take a 
rest." 


Huacheng asked for a palm: "Writing well, talented. I heard my brother 
read this story feeling a hundred times more spirit. My brother can read 
one more." 


Resolutely refused: "No." 


"Brother, I have a headache." 


Huacheng is also a rare illness. Thanks to him, he is always 
accommodating and responsive. How can he still resist this time? 


Rao was ashamed again, and had to press the shackles. He picked up the 
yellow-yellow booklet and lay down to the flower city. He was taken over 
by the waist and read hard with his scalp. 


"A long time ago, a handsome young gentleman was practicing in the 
mountains. One night, he met a mysterious guest..." 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 251: Damn! 
Wanshen Cave 


With a smile, the flower city that was so fast that he couldn’t breathe was 
pushed down from the body. The passionate mood has not faded. Xie pity 
suddenly remembered something and said: "Yes, Saburo, Wanshen..." 


Huacheng’s arm was put on his chest, and while he was not knowing what 
to play with, he lazily said: “Well? What happened to the Pantheon?” 


Thanks for the pity: "Nothing, I just suddenly remembered that the copper 
furnace broke out, will there be so many gods in the gods cave?" 


If so, it would be a pity. After all, every statue in the city 1s the heart of the 
flower city, he likes it. Huacheng Road: "No. I have already set up a 
boundary. Even if the entire copper furnace collapses, there will be no 
problem." 


Xie pity came up and said: "Is it? Great, it must be fine. I want to see, can 
[?" 


Huacheng seems to have been stagnant for a moment, but even smiled: 
"Okay. Brother wants to see it, what can't it be?" 


Thanks for the higher interest, said: "Then tomorrow. Anyway, the copper 
furnace is already open, ready to go." 


Huacheng raised an eyebrow and said: "Tomorrow? Ok." 
He did not object, not much, but the next moment, turned up again. 


I don't know if it is an illusion. In the latter half of the night, the flower 
city tossed him more and more. After two rounds, Xie Pity was forced to 
call his brother to save his life, and then fell asleep. 


Originally, I could safely sleep until dawn, but after an hour, I felt a little 
lighter in my sleep, and opened my eyes, and people were gone. 


Thanks for a pity, sleepy, and sat up at once. 


He cleaned it up casually. He swallowed the couch and pushed the door 
out. He said, "Where did Sanlang go?" 


Sleeping until midnight suddenly disappeared, this is the first time. He 
didn't see the figure in the circle of bliss. He remembered that there was a 
room in the bliss workshop that was used for transmission. In the past, it 
turned out that the door of the house was opened. 


He remembered that the last time the lineup on the door was not painted 
like this. At this moment, the new cinnabar on the door has not yet dried. 
Thanks for your pity, you will push the door in. When it came out, the door 
was not a bliss, but a dark one. 


Thanks for the sake of closing the door, holding up a group of palms and 
illuminating the surroundings. He couldn't help but see the scenery in front 
of him. 


This place, which was led by the Thousand Miles, turned out to be a 
gloomy cave. 


Wanshen Cave! 


Why does Huacheng come to Wanshen Cave in the middle of the night? 
Are they not scheduled to come together tomorrow? Why did he come first 
tonight? 


Shaking his head, holding the flame, thank you for moving slowly in the 
cool and cool grotto. 


The foot sounds resounded, and the gauze on the masks was taken down. 
In the darkness of all directions, there were countless faces that were 
exactly the same as him. It was a bit horrible to think about this picture. 
Xie pity passed a grotto, and with the eyes swept away, the cave 1s a statue 


of Taizi Yue, the eyebrows are warm, the flowers are set up by the sword, 
and the figure is beautiful. 


There are thousands of statues here, and there are hundreds of statues. I 
don’t know how long time and hard work have been carved, and I don’t 
know how many years of silence in the dark. 


Thinking of this, thank you with a sigh, facing the stone statue, bowed 
slightly, muttered: "It's very lonely." 


It is said that the statue of the god, but also the image of the god. 
The statue of the Prince Edward nodded. 

Thanks: "..." 

This is too scary. 


After a while, thank you for your reaction. It turned out that most of it was 
because he had just added mana. At this moment, he was so full of gas, 
standing here affected the statues, and let it also move. 


Xie Li quickly converges on mana, but it is already late, and the statue of 
the Prince is already taking a step. Because thanks to the mana that 
overflowed to infect it, but did not take it seriously, it was awkward to 


move, and" " fell. 
Thank you for helping him up and saying: "Be careful!" 


The statue was lifted by him, with a smile and a slight head, a look of 
noble and arrogant, and nodded to him and expressed his gratitude. Seeing 
that it is so arrogant, thank you for being funny, forbearing, and said: 
"Have you seen the flower city?" 


The idol can make a simple voice, but it can't speak unless it is the **** of 
the lotus flower. The Prince Edward looked at him and asked him to show 
a little confused color, as if he didn't know who he was talking about. 


Thanks for the pity, this time he still does not know Huacheng. So he 
changed his mouth and asked: "Have you seen a red man?" 


The gods showed their smiles and nodded. Thank you, "Do you know 
where he went?" 


He is not familiar with such a large grotto, but he is afraid of getting lost. 
The statue was slightly indulged, pointing him in a direction, thanking 
him: "Thank you, Your Royal Highness." 


Walking out of the way, he turned back, the statue of the Prince Edward 
has quickly mastered the essentials of how to walk, and also danced the 
sword in the same place, as if he was in the top of the Yuan Festival. 


Unfortunately, no one appreciates it. 


It didn't take long for Xie Li to meet the fork. Of course, he is ready to ask 
for help from his **** and walk into the nearest cave. As soon as I 
entered, I saw a figure sitting on the stone platform and was holding the 
jar. 


Thanks: "..." 
He suddenly took the wine and said: "Don't drink!" 


The statue is also his, but the face is slightly reduced, and a simple white 
dress is no longer luxurious. The jar was taken away by the gratitude. It 
wanted to grab it. It was confusing and robbed. It was so angry that it 
suddenly burst into tears. 


Thanks and stunned, said: "You don't need to cry..." 


The **** cryed even more, as if there were endless grievances, and the 
wine was not robbed, so he did not let him go. Xie pity did not know how 
to be so entangled when he was drunk, but he also held it, gently stroking 
its back, and comforted: "Okay, okay..." 


Look again, there is no wine in the "garden" in the hand, and it doesn't 
matter if it is given to it. "You see a red man? Where did he go?" 


The **** figure pointed him a way, thanked the pity and gave it back to 
the jar, and continued to move forward. The **** did not cry, and sat on 
the ground with the jar, and started to stay. 


Thanks for looking back at it, sighed and continued on. 


After a while, he heard the sound of snoring, as if the chain was rubbed, 
before coming to an empty cave. 


The grotto hangs down from the dome, a statue sits on the swing, and the 
statue is flying, full of youthfulness, and a disciple of the emperor, who is 
about the 16th, grabs the chain of the swing and tries to make it It swayed. 
But because it was sitting on a swing on its own, how could it not sway, so 
it revealed a look of trouble. When you see it, thank you for going up and 
helping it push it twice. 


The swing finally flew up, and the juvenile **** of the costume bundle 
was happy. Thank you for asking me, "Are you seeing a red man? Where 
did he go?" 


The young **** held the swing in one hand and the other in one direction. 
Thanks again, he pushed him twice and said, "Goodbye." 


But the swing was over a dozen times and it stopped slowly. No one 
pushed it again, and the juvenile dear was sitting still, showing a look of 
trouble. 


After a long walk, Xie pity estimated: "It should be here?" 


At this moment, he suddenly heard a small voice of depression and pain, 
and could not help but glance: "What sound?... Breathing?" 


The voice came from a cave in front. Xie pity walked in and saw a stone 
bench in the grotto. On the stage, there was a lying statue, a white gauze 
covering his head from the head and hanging down the ground. Under the 
gauze, sometimes curled up into a ball, sometimes twisting and turning, it 
seems that someone is suffering and struggling underneath. 


Xie pity is going up and pulling down the white gauze. Suddenly, one hand 
covered his eyes from behind. A low voice came from the rear and sighed: 
"Brother." 


Thanks for a smile, Wen said: "Sanlang, you thought it would not show 
me, I don't know what it is?" 


For a long time, Huacheng sighed again and said: "Brother, I am wrong." 
Thanks for taking his hand down and turning back: "Tender township?" 


Standing behind him is a long-haired man in red, and it really is a flower 
city. 


He was arrested and supported, and finally admitted: "...Yes." 


No wonder. Sure enough, it is no wonder that Huacheng has refused to let 
him see. Thanks to pity: "You came over tonight, I want to hide this statue 
in advance." 


Huacheng looked away and said: "Yes." 
Thank you for your regret. Just dare not let him see this statue? 


He said: "Why are you hiding? Actually, it is no big deal. But now there is 
a very difficult problem..." 


The tricky problem is that after the pity comes, it inadvertently causes all 
the idols to move. 


This is no big deal, but it is very painful for this special statue. Because, 
the statue under the yarn, carved is seventeen years old in the barren cave, 
the gentle pity in the gentle township. 


Other gods, either dancing swords, drinking, or swinging, doing anything, 
only it is unlucky, it is the poison of the dead demon. This leads to the 
suffering of the poison after it "lives". 


The wheezing under the gauze was unbearable, and the pity could not bear 
the heart, and remembered the thrilling and savage night, saying: "...this 1s 
too pathetic. If I leave now, it will be reduced to a stone statue. ?" 


That way you don't have to suffer from it. Huacheng said: "I am afraid not. 
After all, my brother is now almost the strongest mana, the statues in the 
entire Million Cave are affected by you. Even if you leave, they will 
continue to attack for a long time." 


That is too painful. Thanks to pity: "Then... is there a way?" 


Huacheng always has a way, slightly nodding, said: "I just deal with this. 
My brother is coming with me." 


He thanked Pity for entering another cave. As soon as he entered, thankful 
and pity his eyes widened. I saw a statue of a man standing in the grotto. 
His body was long and tall, his eyebrows were beautiful, his mouth was 
slightly picked, and his right eye was wearing a blindfold, almost exactly 
the same as the red man in front of him. 


It is actually a ghost king! 
Thanks: "This is..." 


Huacheng Road: "This is the only way I found out that the situation was 
not rushed. I haven’t moved for many years, and my hands have been born. 
My brother can see, can it still be like?" 


Thanks for taking a closer look at it, saying: "It's like! But..." 
Huacheng Road: "However... how?" 

Thank you, Charlie, saying: "It's not as good as your deity." 
Huacheng also laughed. 


Then, thank you again: "So, Saburo, the way you said, 1s..." 


Is it to let this ghost king image "detoxify" the gods in the gentle 
township? 


For a moment of silence, Huacheng gathered a smile, just colored, staring 
at the face of thankfulness, said: "Yes." 


Xie Li did not notice the cautiousness in his look. He said: "This method is 
too..." 


Although it is indeed the cure for the law, it is immediate, but I think it is 
ridiculously ridiculously - to put it bluntly, isn't it to use a ghost king to 
break the body of his younger god, thus suppressing the poison? 


I really feel that it is difficult to talk about it! 


He still didn't know how to respond, but Huacheng suddenly fell in front of 
him and kneeled down on one knee. Thank you for your pity, and I am 
going to pull him, saying: "Sanlang?" What is this? 


Huacheng Shen Sheng: "His Royal Highness, I am disrespectful." 


Xie pity can't afford to pull him, and he will follow him. He will not 
understand: "What disrespect do you have?" 


Huacheng stared at him, taking a breath and sinking his breath: "Please 
believe me under the Highness, today 1s the last resort. I have carved this 
statue by myself, but I have never been to the statue of His Royal 
Highness. | I don't respect. If your Highness feels that this method 1s not 
appropriate, I will find another law." 


Xie pity finally understood why Huacheng suddenly became so serious. 


After all, for the fact that he has carved so many statues of respect and pity 
in private, Huacheng always worried that he would feel that he was 
offended and behaved strangely. Now that I have proposed such a method, 
I am afraid that I will be more worried that Xie will feel that he is full of 
thoughts and disrespectful. 


Thanks and smiled, he sighed and pulled his hand in the flower city. He 
finally pulled him up from the ground and said, "I certainly believe in you. 
I know that you have always respected me." 


However, "it has never been a problem." This is hard to say. After all, if it 
is a bit stricter, after returning from Huacheng Huadie, he will have to be a 
* 11 the thousands of lights, and the courage is getting bigger and 
bigger. 


Xie pity and cough, said: "I think this method... nothing bad. Very good, 
very good." 


However, I think of the essence of this method, and the face 1s slightly 
warm, I feel that this is not a slap in the face. The flower city that he got 
the answer to is finally getting back to life. Xie pity put his hand on the 
shoulder of the ghost king, saying: "I am going to give this statue a light?" 


Huacheng blinked and smiled slowly: "If your brother is willing, he can't 
ask for it." 


Thanks for your nod. Swearing, the statue gently picked an eyebrow. Upon 
seeing it, Xie Lijun couldn’t help but took back his hand and said, “This is 
too much like this!” 


I don't know if it was sensed, and a few figures were slowly swallowed 
outside the grotto. There are actually a few statues curiously encircling 
them. It seems that I want to take a closer look at the new statues in the 
caves that are completely different from them. The ghost king also saw 
them, blinked, and raised his eyebrows higher, wondering what he was 
thinking, and he was looking for something. Thanks for the sorrow and 
sorrow, it is easy to push away the group of my gods. Who knows that the 
corner of the eye is swept away and suddenly says: "Why gentle 
township?" 


He has used this directly to refer to the unfortunate god. I don't know 
when, there is only one white gauze left on the stone platform, and the 
gentle township lying like it is missing! 


Thanks to the poor heart, then the flower city that came in with the hand 1s 
also a glimpse of Meifeng. Thanks to the pity: "The Great Gods Cave is 
very big. You should not be able to run out for a while, please find it!" 


Huacheng said: "I am afraid not. Brother, you see." 


He pointed to the ground. Thanks to the past, I realized that there is 
actually a circular array on the ground, which is drawn directly on the rock 
with extremely strong finger force. 


Shrinking a thousand miles! How many mana did this **** figure **** in 
the end, and can actually zoom in and out of his own hands? ! Xie pity is 
going to fall to the ground. 


The statue is in the state of gentleness, how can he escape if she escapes to 


the mortal woman? In the future, will there be a legend about how to hunt? 
ay 


He said: "When does it run out? Where can it go?" 


Huacheng Road: "Don't worry about your brother, you should think about 
it first. If you were in a gentle township at that time, who would you first 
want to find?" 


This is not hard to think about. Xie Puiyuan was not too anxious, quickly 
calmed down and said: "It should be looking for..." 


The voice did not fall, suddenly a psychic kill, Xie pity could not be raised 
by hand, and listened to the voice of the wind letter in his ear: "His Royal 
Highness! I have a ghost, just a monster posing as you!" 


Seat really! At that time, the most effective assistants of Xie Pity were the 
wind and the love. When this happened, it was natural to find them first! 


Fortunately, I first looked for a letter instead of running on the street. 
Thankful, he was relieved and busy: "No! It is not a monster, nor is it 
impersonating me." 


Feng Xin was shocked: "What do you mean? Isn't it a monster or a fake? Is 
that your deity? No!" 


Thanks: "Not! Anyway, how is it now? Have you caught it? Don't let it 
run!" 


Fengxin said: "It’s late, it’s already running!” 
Thanks for your pity: "What? This is bad!" 


Fengxin: "Yeah, this is bad. Red|body|naked|body running around and 
people see what it is like?!" 


Thanks, "Wait, what do you say? Red|body|naked|body? I...not, is it not 
wearing clothes?" 


Wind channel: "Almost! There is wear, but not much, the tattered like who 
was shredded. Right, that is not a monster or a pretense, what is it? What 
is going on? I look like Is it a god...etc., god?” he shouted. “It shouldn’t be 
from the place below the copper stove? What are you doing?” 


Xie pity did not remember much how much clothes he wore at the time of 
the gentle township. At that time, he was terribly uncomfortable. He might 
have tore himself in tears. He said: "I will explain it later! I will go up 
immediately!" 


After he finished speaking here, he broke the spirit and said to Huacheng: 
"Sanlang, we have to go to the new Xianjing!" 


Over there, Huacheng has already collected the newly carved ghost king, 
and collected a small statue that can stand in the palm of his hand. He said, 
"Okay!" After a while, the two directly killed the Nanyang Temple of 
Xinxianjing. When I opened the door, I saw the wind letter, and he was on 
the flower city, his eyes were round: "Blood rain and flowers? How come 
you are coming? What are you doing in heaven?!" A desperate ghost king, 
not staying in himself all day long. The site, 1f you want to go to Xianjing 
on Xianjing, it is too disappointing! 


Huacheng ignored him and listened for a moment. He said: "Notice. The 
heavens will not be said without words." 


Fengxin naturally knows what the Huacheng is saying, isn’t it a report that 
“the heavenly court must report the whole year’s **** rain and save the 
heroic deeds of the gods’? He had a blue vein on his forehead and said: 
"What is the notification in the middle of the night! Everyone is also going 
to rest, and will be notified during the day!" 


Huacheng was only "oh", probably because it was not pursued. Thanks for 
your pity: "Hey, feel free! Say the key, the ‘I’ you saw? Where did you 
run?” 


Fengxin pointed to the direction and said: "It ran there, I am going to 
chase, you will come up!" 


Suddenly, there was an unpredictable hunch in the heart, saying: "I ask, 
that direction, it won't be..." 


The wind letter is crisp and decent: "The direction of the Xuanzhen 
Temple." 


Thanks: "..." 
Flower City Shen Sheng: "Go!" 


The two people did not dare to delay, hurriedly killed the Xuanzhen 
Temple, opened the door and rushed into it. I rushed in and saw that I was 
sitting on the platform, so that I saw something incredible, and the whole 
person was shocked. Thanks for the pity to wave in front of his eyes, said: 
"Muscle?" 


He saw pity and finally returned to God, but his look was still shocked. For 
a long while, he said: "Thank you, what are you doing?" 


Thanks: "...What am I doing? I... I don't know what I did? Please tell me?" 


Mu Qing still squinted and said: "What did you do in the middle of the 
night?" 


"..."" Huacheng blinked. Thanks to pity: "You don't want to talk so 
misunderstood! No matter what you saw, anyway, that is definitely not 
me!" 


Mu Qing loved half of his face, as if he wanted to take out what he had just 
seen from his eyes. His face 1s iron and blue: "You can't take it off with 
you! Is it the image of the cave? What do you do, put the insulting gods 
out and go out in the middle of the night, you don't have to play with blood 
and rain." Child?!" 


Huacheng shouted: "What is your business?" 
Mourning anger: "What is it about me? This is my temple!" 


Huacheng has a long and authentic way: "Rebuild Xianjing, I also have a 
share." 


To be honest, because of the great injury before the Heavenly Court, many 
of the priests had to secretly ask for help from the owner of the ghost city. 
Counting it, this new Xianjing can be built, and it is really indispensable to 
spend the city. Thanks to pity: "We are not playing, this is an accident. Is it 
now?" 


Admired: "It grabbed me a sword here and ran to..." 


If he does not say anything, thank you for knowing where to go. In the 
garden outside the Xuanzhen Temple, there was a sound of snoring. At the 
same time, the statue of the ghost king that Huacheng took with him also 
fell down. He jumped in the direction of the garden. 


Xie pity immediately rushed out, and sure enough, the gentle township 
image, standing on the rockery in the garden! 


The statue of the **** is not uniform, revealing a large half of the smooth 


shoulders, chest, and the bottom is also if there is nothing, very _ | 
The face of the gods is even more unique. The brow is close to the face, as 


if you can see the blushing color and thin sweat on the skin, saying that it 
is a godsend. Right now, it is holding the sword that was snatched from the 
Xuanzhen Temple. Hey, hey! If you try to stab yourself with a sword, you 
naturally want to detoxify yourself with your own injuries. 


But because the stone that was made in the copper furnace was so 
powerful, the sword couldn’t get in, but it was bent. It seems to be 
desperate, and the palm of his hand is lifted. When he looks at it, he will 
shoot his own brain and crush it. Xie pity quickly called: "Calm! Calm!" 


The **** looked like a fascinated look to him. Xie Fufei was a palm, and 
the statue fell off the rockery and could not stand in a cave. And Huacheng 
also flashed to thank her, lost something. 


It is the ghost king! 


The ghost king image is not so much as the flower city thrown down. It is 
better to say that after seeing the young **** statue, he broke free from his 
palm. He recovered the original slender figure in the air and fell down to 
cover the statue. On the body, there was a shock from the bottom. Xie Li 
quickly jumped off the rockery and pushed the admiration of the sound to 
the Xuanzhen Temple. "I can't wait! Sorry, use it for treasure!" 


The feelings were shocked: "What have you done?" 
Thanks for your pity: "I will explain it later, I am very sorry!" 


Huacheng slowly said: "What's so sorry? How many times this person is 
saved is yours." 


Admiration: "No, you still have to say it now. I seem to see you throwing 
you away. He lost one of him. I am not mistaken? So what are you doing? 
The fake mountain is happening now. what?" 


Thanks to pity, he dragged his neck and dragged it into the temple: "One 
hundred thousand fires! Really admired, don't go over! Why are you 
suffering this!" 


Admiration said: "Thank you! What are you doing in my temple? I fucked, 
I am really fucking!" 


"That's not us! It's just an accident, it's really too late... and you have a 
bunch of words!" 


After an hour, the two gods finally exhausted the mana from the pity and 
the flower city. 


I took a look at the fake mountain and thanked me for holding my 
forehead. 


Huacheng handled the gods, and Xie Pity went out to stop the wind and 
love that he wanted to come over and see what happened. He sincerely 
said: "You will not want to see it." 


The wind letter was not a curious person. The hunch was not good, and he 
immediately lost wisely. Mourning but unable to let go, black face like the 
bottom of the old pot, crazy sleeves, crazy muttered: "I can't believe it... I 
can't believe it! There is such a thing! It will be in my temple. This 
happened in the middle!" Then the ghost floated out, I am afraid I can no 
longer look directly at the rockery in my temple. Xie Pity is very 
suspicious, and he will slap it here. 


To tell the truth, thank you for not being able to believe that you will make 
such a ridiculous accident. I really don’t know if it should be shameful. 
Looking back at the two statues - no, now it should be said to be a "one" 
statue, he said: "They... is that right?" 


Huacheng Road: "That's it. Anyway, it can't be separated." 
Thanks for your pity. 


Where is the statue of a priest in this form! Can you see it? It’s too 
unreasonable, it’s true! 


He | :"...Sanlang, hide them... don't show them." 


Huacheng smiled and said: "This is natural. My brother is relieved." 


Bringing the two gods together into the Wanshen Cave, and finally 
returning to their place, thanking and pity a sweat. 


The other goddess of thankfulness in the Pantheon once again curiously 
surrounded them, and was pushed away by thankfulness: "Be ignorant, do 
not look at it." 


No way, they have to leave. Although they did not see the final form of the 
gods with their own eyes, they turned back and looked as if they envied the 
"cheerfulness" of the gentle township and finally had a "partner." 


The poison of the gentle township is solved, but other gods are still 
missing a perfection. Prince Edward is unappreciated, drunk and 
unguarded, no one to send the swing... 


Thanks for the greed, the heart said: "If every pity can have a flower city, 
it would be fine." 


Who knows, Huacheng also said the same thing: "My brother doesn't think 
that it would be better to have a Sanlang under each of his princes?" 


The two hit it off and immediately stayed at the Wanshen Cave to show 
their talents. 


In a short while, Xie Pity witnessed the whole process of Huacheng 
turning a heavy stone into a dexterous and refined stone statue. That skill 
can't be described, because it is so fast that I can't see how Huacheng is 
doing it. I want to come, Huacheng has already integrated the technique 
into the technique, and he has only left amazement. 


In short, when Huacheng turned around, he proposed a newly carved child 
from the gravel of the earth. The hair was messy, ragged, bandaged and 
looked pitiful. Xie pity put his hand on the little boy's head and gave it 
light, and Huacheng gave it a little mana. After a short while, it blinked 
and turned around and looked around. Looking at someone who was 
holding his clothes and collar, it kicked. 


Huacheng seems to have expected him to do this, easy to avoid, put it in 
his hands, let it struggle to kick. Xie Pian did not expect this small flower 
city to be so sloppy, and laughed and said: "Hey, it's so fierce!" 


Huacheng snorted and threw it away. The child was slammed on the 
ground by his slamming, and he quickly climbed up, staring at the flower 
city. Thank you for worrying about losing weight, and said to it: "Sanlang, 
you are too embarrassed! Be careful to break it." If you really want to 
count, this child should be born just now! 


Huacheng does not care about the earth: "It doesn't matter, his life is very 
tenacious." 


The child was very fierce against the flower city. He was very friendly to 
thank you. Seeing that Xie pity waved at him, he was about to go. At this 
time, the statue of the Prince Taiyue that is not far away seems to have 
sensed something and walked from his position. Come down and look at 
this side. 


When the child saw the statue of the prince, he was stunned. One of the 
eyes that was exposed outside the bandage was so big that he ran to the 
past and seemed to want to grab him and pounce on his clothes. Did not 
dare to approach, dirty God's robes, for a long time, only carefully 
extended his hand to him, open the palm of his hand before death. 


It turned out that what was hidden in his palm was a small flower. 


The Prince Edward took the flowers and smiled. He held out a hand and 
took the initiative to hug him. The two men walked happily together. It 
seems that one who finally found someone who can appreciate his sword, 
one who finally found a flower for him. 


Thanks for watching, I was very pleased. Suddenly I thought of a question. 
"Zi Lang, after you have finished carving, isn’t there a lot of statues and 
my gods in this gods? They will admit each other wrong. After all, many 
of them are the same." 


Huacheng smiled and said: "No." 


"why?" 
Huacheng said it again and said: "No." 


He looked up and thanked him with a slight smile. He said: "Even if 'His 
Highness' is wrong, 'I' will not make a mistake. Because a flower city will 
always be a believer of His Royal Highness, only loyal to one person. So, 
forever will not." 


Xie Pity also stared at him and blurted out: "I will not make a mistake. A 
thankful believer, there will always be only one, ‘I’ will always remember. 
ee 


After saying this, he suddenly blamed it. 


Now they are like two children, and the other party eagerly agrees that 
"my favorite is always you, only you." Although sincere, it is very naive. 


Although childish, it is very sincere. 


For a moment, Xie pity and cough, said: "Then... Then come to help the 
swinging Prince of the Prince to sculpt a ghost king who pushes the 
swing." 


No one helped push the swing, it looked very lonely and distressed. 
Huacheng said with joy: "Okay." 


Thanks again and again: "The one who drinks alcohol? This is a bit of a 
headache. It seems to be confused and will cry. Hey, there are too many 
gods here. I don't know when I can finish them one by one?" 


Huacheng smiled and said: "What are you afraid of? Slowly, you will 
always meet." 


Xie pity also smiled and nodded, whispered: "Well, I will meet." 


Inside the grotto, the two original stone statues that were originally 
independent have been connected at the moment. 


They embraced each other and stared at each other's close-knit faces. The 
eyes and the body were so lingering that they were truly separated. 2k 
novel reading network 


Heaven Official’s Blessing Chapter 252: Ghost 
king's birthday 
Recently, a big event that has not been made is approaching. 


Because of this, the ghost market is awkward. After thanking and hearing, 
he was also shocked. Like the ghosts that God told me to tell him, he was 
worried: "Birthday?" 


"Exactly!" 


It is. The main flower city of the ghost city, I don’t know how many years 
old is coming! 


Thanks for being unprepared, and inexplicably nervous, said: "This, this, 
how did Sanjo’s birthday last?" 


The group of ghosts rushed to the front and confessed: "It’s very lively!" 
"If you don't have a problem, just make a noise..." 

"But the city owner did not care?" 

After listening to this sentence, thank you: "What is it called?" 

A ghost said: "It is the old man of the city, he has never been born." 


"Yes, I don't care what we did on the day of his birthday, and never look at 
the gifts that others have sent. Every year, we are stupid." 


"The city owner, the old man and the nobles, have forgotten things, and 
they don't seem to remember their birthday!" 


Thank you for thinking, and immediately made up your mind. Since the 
previous birth, Huacheng is not a serious matter, then this time, must find 
a way to give him a creative and interesting, so that he can be happy on 


that day. Otherwise, is there a birthday in his life, isn't it the same as the 
birthday without him? 


First of all, the birthday gift must be sent. Thanks for your pity, what 
should I send? 


The ghosts also looked at him and said: "Xie Daochang, are you thinking 
about sending something to the city owner?" 


Thanks to pity: "Well. Say, hey... 1am not sure, what will your city owners 
like. I am afraid that if I don't like it..." 


The pig butcher said: "Hey, what kind of heart do you care about? In fact, 
as long as it is Dabogong... Xie Daochang, you sent it, I think our city 
owners will be very happy." 


"Yeah. Even if he is sending waste paper, he will be happy. Big... Thank 
you, Mr. Daochang, how can you send something to others?" 


Thanks for the pity and laughter, I feel that this kind of thought is too 
narcissistic and frivolous, not solemn and sincere, said: "Can't say that, the 
gift must be carefully selected... Can you have suggestions?" 


How to say, Huacheng is also in the ghost city for many years, maybe the 
group of ghosts will know more about his preferences, can not brainstorm, 
he can use his brains to find a suitable and ingenious gift. Sure enough, all 
the ghosts said: "There are some!" 


It is said that there are more than a dozen pairs of chicken feet, pig's 
trotters, tentacles, etc. handed over a circle of miscellaneous things. These 
things have not been seen before, and they are surrounded by them, and 
their minds are magical. He picked up a small bottle of sapphire that 
looked very mysterious and elegant and asked, "Oh? What 1s this?" 


The bottler said: "There is a lot of fans | love | medicine! Just a few drops, 
the poisoning person immediately slammed the fire, and the sorrow of the 
drug is fascinated! And does not hurt the body!" 


Thanks for the righteousness: "Thank you for your advice. However, since 
the sentiment comes from the heart, how can you manipulate it with 
drugs? You should not use it in the future." 


The ghost who offered the medicine was sincere and fearful: "Yes, yes, no, 
no. But in fact, we usually don't use it very much. This is not Xie 
Daochang, what are you asking for?" 


Thanks and smiled: "I think, you city owners may not need this medicine. ' 


All the ghosts shouted: "That is, who the city owner wants, but also need 
to take medicine? Really!" Seven-eight hands and feet pressed the ghost. 


Thanks for thinking, this is really the truth. For example, he didn't need a 
little medicine at all. When he saw the flower city, he almost had to be 
fascinated. 


In order not to let the shy heart turn into a red cloud, he quickly picked up 
another box and opened the road: "What is inside?" 


The ghost of the treasure: "This 1s Dezi Pill!" 


Xie Li did not have to ask what the pill was doing, and immediately shut 
the box" ", helplessly said: "What is this with?" 


How do you let him send Huacheng this unconventional thing? 


In short, a mess of speculation, thank you also know that there are no 
useful suggestions, and the group of ghosts secretly prepared for the ghost 
king Hesheng, give the flower city a surprise, go on, and continue to think. 


Perhaps he really remembered this thing so much that his distress was 
written on his face. On this day, when he accompanied Huacheng, he was 
racking his brains and suddenly heard a voice: "Brother." 


Thanks for this, I came back to God and said: "What?" 


Huacheng is staring at him and putting down the pen. He said: "Is it my 
illusion? My brother seems to be worried about anything. Can you say it 
and let Saburo solve the problem?" 


Thanks for your enthusiasm, immediately correct, warning: "Pen, don't let 
go. Don't be lazy, pick it up, continue." 


Huacheng laughed and re-held the pen, sighing and sighing: "It was 
discovered." 


Seeing to fool the past, thankful and secretly sigh. Who knows, Huacheng 
wrote two lines and wrote carelessly: "However, my brother recently did 
have some abnormalities." 


Thanks to pity, it’s a hang, and it’s still awkward: “Oh? Where is the 
abnormality?” 


Huacheng carefully looked at him for a while and smiled: "It seems to be 
exceptional... thousands of hundred." 


Xie pity smiled and said: "Is not always been like this?" 


He really had no idea, and decided to take risks. He first ran out of 
nothing, and finally pretended to be careless: "Sanlang, ask you." 


Huacheng Road: "Well? What?" 
Thanks for your pity: "Do you feel that there is something missing?" 


Huacheng Road: "Lack? What does your brother mean? Are you missing 
something?" 


Thanks: "Oh, no... I mean you. Just ask..." 


Poor he didn't dare to ask too direct, such as "What do you like, what you 
want", and was noticed by Huacheng, but had to turn around and bend the 
corners; 


Huacheng Road: "I? My brother thinks, what will I lack?" 
... that is also true, thank you for your helplessness. 
Huacheng said again: "My brother asked me what to do?" 


Thanks to his fear, he was aware of it, and he went out and lifted his hand 
and pushed hard. Huacheng never looked after him, and he pushed him to 
"squat" on the couch. He widened his eyes, but he did not care. He smiled 
and said: "What is this for my brother? It is so warm, you... ... 


Waiting for him to finish, thank you for going to the scalp and blocking his 
words. 


This time, Huacheng did not have the mind to continue interrogation, and 
the backhand grabbed him, and turned it over, no matter where he was 
abnormal. 


I have to think alone and have no solution, and I have to ask for help from 
foreign aid. The first foreign aid he wanted to find was naturally the two 
powerful subordinates of the past. 


The three men lingered in a hidden temple that was unknown to the 
unknown. After a moment of silence, the wind channel: "What do you 
think I do?" 


The other two people still looked at him, and everything was in the air. 


No way, among the three of them, Feng Xin is the only one who has had a 
wife. It is reasonable to say that he should know best how to please people 
close to him. But they can be seen as dark, and they said: "...you don't 
think I use it. I just sent someone else." That is the golden belt. That is still 
to thank him for giving him. 


It is very unbelievable that he is also pulled to ask this kind of thing. It is 
very polite to restrain it from turning over. I just want to solve it quickly. 
"Well, the belt is good, just give you a gold belt. He." 


Xie pity automatically ignored his yin and yang sigh, said: "I have no one 
in the morning." All of them are gone! 


The feelings of anger are more and more yin and yang. "You are so smooth 
and windy now. The streets are full of your temples and believers. Just ask 
a dream and say what you want. Can you still make a fool?" 


Thanks to pity: "That doesn't make sense. If even the birthday gift of the 
giver is to be worshipped by the believers, it is too perfunctory." 


The feelings of yin and yang are not moving, and the tone of speech is 
normal. "How come you are so troublesome? Then you can give it to 
yourself." 


Thanks for your help: "Good idea! But I won't." 

"T can't learn." 

Thanks: "Say well. Who are you looking for?" 

I am impatient and impatient: "How do I know? You are free..." 


The voice did not fall, the feelings of love found that this time, the other 
two people turned their eyes to him. 


After two hours, Xie pity two hands and ten fingers have been tied seven 
or eight holes, tied with a bandage is not full of blood, and his hand has a 
meaning and shape of unclear Shape. 


I can’t stand it anymore and ask, “What is this?” 
Thanks, pray: "The belt." 


Admire: "I know this is a belt. What I ask you is, what is embroidered on 
this belt? What is the significance of these two potato-like patterns?" 


Thanks to pity: "This is not a potato! Can't you see it? This 1s two people." 
To make them see clearly, he also made a stroke: "The faces of two people, 
this is the eyes, the mouth is here..." 


After confirming that this is really two people, the feelings are incredible: 
"Why would someone embroider two big heads on the belt? Can this be 
worn out? You don’t have such a bad taste in dressing. thing?" 


There is no way to thank you. In fact, let him repair the house, drill the 
well, build the wall. He is very good at it, fast and good, but he seems to 
be not good at this kind of woman’s internal affairs. Once he is allowed to 
take needlework or pot spoon, the scene can’t be controlled. It is. He 
glanced at the tied hands like the scorpion. Although he didn't feel the 
pain, but the progress was slow, it was inevitable that he would helplessly. 
"I will change it." 


But the wood has become a boat, how can it be changed? At best, a layer 
of petals was added to the outer circle of the two villains, which became 
two clumsy big-headed flowers. The expression of the wind and the 
feelings of love are even more terrible. 


The amount of love on the forehead has been slightly green: "I taught the 
pigs to teach, how are you so clumsy? Net to your hands?" 


Wind channel: "When did you teach the pig? It’s really empty words and 
talks!" 


Mourning is unceremoniously thankful: "Forget it, you still give up, you 
don't have this talent." He was very rare to say "you have no talent" to say 
thank you, it is justified, it feels good. The wind can't listen, and said: 
"Can you say a few less words? You haven't said anything since you just 
said that it's not the same thing to wear clothes and do it yourself! It's not 
so bad, at least. This belt can still be worn." 


Admire the feelings: "Well, let him do this thing for you. If you dare to 
wear it, I will convinced you." 


The wind letter has not answered yet. Xie Li quickly took the ugly and 
funny belt and said: "Do not make it impossible. I still keep it myself!" 


This kind of thing can't be sent out! 


The wind and the feelings of love can not help anything, thank you for 
turning to help the next one. 


"Gifts? Your Royal Highness, you come to ask me if I really ask the right 
person. I thought that year, Ben... I haven't seen any rare treasures?" 


The two men squatted on the street, and Shi Qingxuan's heads were 
spurred with great enthusiasm. If you look at it, you will know that you are 
an expert. Thank you for your humility. Shi Qingxuan talked and said: 
"There are some treasures without the Lord, but if you want to take it, you 
must make great efforts." 


Thank you for your help: "Nothing. Just what I want." The greater the 
effort, the more precious it 1s, the more you can express your heart. It is 
best to be the hardest to get in the world, and no one can challenge the 
treasure of success. So, if he asks for the flower city, it is of great 
significance. As long as I think that I can make Huacheng slightly raise 
my eyebrows, and my lips will be hooked, thank you for the joyful 
expectation that I can’t restrain myself. I am eager to try. 


Shi Qingxuan thought for a moment, said: "Star Heaven Pot! Your Royal 
Highness should you have heard of it? This pot is a baby, put it in the 
night, the sky and the stars are reflected in the wine in the pot, you can 
* the heaven and the moon. The essence of aura, not only elegant, but 
also greatly contribute to the repair..." 


Who knows, thank you for listening, the more ominous premonition in my 
heart, the more busy, interrupted: "Wait." 


"what happened?" 


Thanks to a size, said: "Qing Xuan, you said, is it such a large black jade 
pot? Is there a fine starlight embedded in the black jade?" 


Teacher Qing Xuanqi said: "Hey? How do you know your Highness? What 
have you seen?" 


" " 


I have seen it. Last month, he wanted to pour some water, but he forgot his 
hand and accidentally did not take it. He broke a pot like this. 


At that time, Huacheng immediately came over and asked him what was 
wrong with his hand. He saw that the pot was very beautiful and strange. 
He asked Huacheng what to do, could he repair it, but Huacheng said that 
nothing was a little thing, and he didn’t even look at it. The debris of the 
pot was swept away and grabbed the arm and went to the arm. 


Now think about it, is it that he is breaking the rare treasure celestial pot in 
the Qingxuan mouth? ! 


Thanks for the cold, half a sigh, half awkward, said: "This... may not be 
suitable. Change one." 


"Oh." Shi Qingxuan is not clear, so he grabbed his hair and thought for a 
moment, and said: "The next one, eight pens! This pen is incredible. It is 
the tail of an ancient monster." The pen is made of a branch of a jade 
bamboo top, which grows when not writing..." 


Thanks to the pity: "Jasper bamboo leaves?" 


Teacher Qingxuan: "Yes! Your Royal Highness, how do you know? Have 
you seen it?" 


Have you ever seen it, that pen is used by Huacheng every day to practice 
the word. Moreover, the ugly words written by him are strange. The pen is 
not good. If you don’t move, you will throw it on the ground. Sometimes 
you have to kick and fly to somewhere. After the pity, I often have to look 
around where the poor pen is, then pick it up and wipe it. 


'..." Thanks to pity: "This may not be appropriate. Or change one." 


Shi Qingxuan repeatedly said seven or eight, and thanked and found that 
the rare treasures in these side populations are so familiar and so 
miserable. It’s not a stool that Huacheng stepped on, it’s a pavilion that he 
paved; it’s not that he used it for fun, but he’s got rid of it! 


I want to come too. There are still rare treasures in this world, which 
Huacheng has never seen or can't get? 


Therefore, the ghost gift of the ghost king, and then think about it, can not 
figure out. 


I was in a hurry and went to the hospital. I thanked him for searching all 
the things he knew and could ask. However, if the right is true, it will only 
be a gold bar, and the flower city will not be bad. Hey, this person will 
only give gifts to women. Asked what he can send to a man, he can't say 
anything serious: Lingwen, although several of the upper-level gods are 
insured, and the heavens are really lacking her, so I didn't give it to the 
prison, but it has been buried. In the volume of the scrolls thrown to her, I 
am about to lose consciousness. Except for the approval of the official 
document, nothing will be done. It is better to be clean in the prison. 


There is no way to help each other. When it is only two days from the birth 
of Huacheng, there is no way to thank you. 


He squinted for a night, full of blood, and finally thought of what to send 
when the sky was not bright. 


With a pass in his head, he sneaked up from the couch and glanced at the 
flower city that was sleeping peacefully. 


The black hair of the flower city is like a crow, the long eyelashes are like 
paint, the eyes are closed, and there is no one eye. The natural attack 
between the beautiful face and the look 1s diluted a little. Now it seems 
that there is no reason. tender. 


Thanks for the movement, I couldn’t help but stretch out my right hand 
and sigh on the face of Huacheng. After all, I was afraid of awakening 
him, and I did not dare to touch it. 


Who knows, he hasn't stayed yet, he has a tight waist and was taken back 
by a hand. A lazy voice came from behind: "Brother, what have you done 
so early?" 


Huacheng actually woke up! 


His voice was low and he had a hint of sand, and he seemed to be half- 
awake. Thanks for being cold and cold, he was taken back by him, and he 
endured guilty conscience and calmly said: "Oh, there 1s a prayer." 


Huacheng got together and kissed him in his ear. He said, "The sky is still 
not bright. Who is going to the temple early in the morning to ask God to 
worship Buddha? Is it impatient?" 


It’s probably a ghost in my heart. I’m sorry to hear him talking in the ear, 
the more hot the face, said: “I didn’t just receive it, it’s the backlog...” 


As he said, he felt that it was really difficult to talk in this position. He had 
to climb again. Huacheng also sat up with him. He wrapped his neck from 
behind and put his head on his shoulder. He said: "Since all are back Now, 
why is there more backlog? Brother was tired last night, and I will rest for 
a while." 


Thanks for his hard work and his entangled arm and the inductive voice, 
he was very reluctant. He said: "I have been backlogged for a long time, 
can't be pressed anymore..." 


Huacheng Road: "Oh. Then I am going with you?" 


Thanks for your help: "No. It won't be too long. I will go back when you 
go. You should rest first!" 


Huacheng Road: "Really don't need me to go?" 


Thanks for your pity: "No! You can't come over, absolutely, you can't 
come over!" 


Huacheng blinked slightly and said, "Why?" 


"..." Thanks for pity, he must, he turned sharply, took the shoulders of 
Huacheng, looked straight at him, and said awkwardly: "You must practice 
words." 


Huacheng looked at him innocently and blinked. Thanks for your hard- 
headed scalp: "Today you have to stay in the field for a day. I have to 
check it when I come back!" 


Huacheng looked more and more innocent, and smashed his head, but he 
still said: "Oh." 


Thanks for the pity, it is easy to cope with the past, and even the belt has 
climbed out of bed. Huacheng half leaned on the stage, staring at the back 
of his deserted, smiling, resting his hands and lying down. 


Xie pity went to the wild mountain ridge first, and after getting what he 
wanted, he went to the copper furnace again. 


In the copper furnace mountain, in a small house in Yulin, when he 
entered, he saw that the national division had a table, and three empty 
shell people were playing cards. The look was dignified. He said that he 
immediately turned around and went out. The national teacher saw his 
eyes and let his eyes shine. He said: "Stop!" 


Xie Li knows that only in one case, the national division will let him stand 
when he plays cards. Sure enough, the next time the national teacher will 
smash the table and say: "Do not fight, have to go ahead! Prince is coming 
back! What are you looking for?" ” 


Thanks for turning back, I saw the three empty shells on the ground, and I 
knew that the National Teacher must have lost soon. I was really guilty: "It 
is not a very big event." 


The national teacher is busy: "No, I think you look serious, it must be 
something big! The cards can be put on, and the teacher will help you 
first!" 


" " 


I can wait for the explanation, and the national teacher changed his 
expression. The two sat on a simple bench, and thanked the net and heard 
the number of the national divisions falling on him: "It’s really not a big 


event. It’s just a birthday, it’s worth your thoughts for so long, and you’re 
going to travel north and south, go in person. Take that kind of thing!" 


Xie Li knew that he couldn't explain it to others, explained that others 
wouldn't understand it, and he was self-satisfied and worried. "I have 
already taken the raw materials anyway, that is, I can't remember it. I used 
it when I was young." How to create a fairy-tale lock, and ask the national 
teacher to give one or two instructions. I don’t have to do it, I can make it 
myself." 


The national teacher seems to be still difficult to say, "You don't need to 
prepare any birthday gifts at all. You have sent it to yourself, what gift do 
you want?" 


This means saying "You are the best gift"? Xie pity can't stand this kind of 
argument, even if I can't think about it, I can't take my forehead and my 
heart says: "I'm not so narcissistic." 


The national teacher saw him shaking his head again and again, resisting 
from the heart, said: "You are also dying. You, God, the only one who has 
risen three times in the sky! Corolla Wushen! Prince Xianle! At the age of 
seventeen, dare to be the world Said that he wants to save the people! 
Eighteen years old..." 


Thanks for the moment: "National teacher! Stop! National teacher! Don't 
say it! Don't say it!" 


What is so proud of this black history! 


Guo Shi looked at him in a complicated way, as if he hated iron and did 
not become steel. He said: "His Royal Highness, you really don't need to 
put yourself so low." 


Thanks to pity: "It’s not that you put yourself down very low, just..." 


Just, in the face of the person you like, you will naturally want to give 
each other the best in the world. However, it is inevitable that I will 
always feel that I am not good enough. 


Guoshi looked at him like this, sighed, his hands clasped his sleeves, 
thinking for a while, said: "Long life lock 1s right, you wait, I think. The 
age is too long, I dare not say remember to remember all Craftsmanship 
and opening ceremony." 


Thanks to pity: "I don't get in the way. If you can't think of it, I will build 
it by memory. I believe in sincerity." 


Speaking, the national teacher looked at him and said, "Would you like to 
ask him?" 


He didn't say the name, but thank you also knows who "he" ts. 
Junwu was suppressed in the depths of the copper furnace. 
Silence for a long time, thank you for still shaking his head. 


After staying in Tonglushan for a long time, Xie pity returned to the ghost 
city. 


At this time, only a few hours left before the official arrival of Huacheng’s 
birthday. The group of ghosts and negotiating negotiating well, pretending 
to have nothing to happen on the surface, but secretly sneaking out the 
ghost market. Xie pity flashed into a small shop. After a while, the ghosts 
gathered around and asked eagerly and arbitrarily: "How? How?" 


Thank you for thinking that this 1s like a thief, saying: "How is your city 
owner? Did you find anything unusual?" 


Ghosts said: "Nothing. The city owner is in a thousand lights today." 


Thank you for your pity: "Is it all day?" 


"Yes! Today, the city owner seems to be in a good mood. Big... Xie 
Daochang, are you ready to give the city owner a birthday gift?" 


Thanks for this, I was relieved. I caressed the long-life silver lock that I 
had to do my best in my sleeves. I smiled and said, "Ready." 


The group of ghosts was overjoyed, and they discussed the arrangement of 
tomorrow's Hesheng, and they returned to the Qiandeng view. As soon as I 
entered, Huacheng was actually practicing words. 


Not to be overwhelmed by him, Huacheng actually took the initiative to 
practice the word, which is really a rare event, it seems that the mood is 
very good. Thanks for seeing the poor and precious eight-character pen 
writing the twisted and ugly words under his hand, inexplicably funny, 
shaking his head. After hearing the thankfulness, Huacheng put down the 
pen and finally no longer tormented it. He smiled and said, "Brother, are 
you coming back? Just come and see what I am doing today." 


Thank you, smile, said: "Okay." Who knows, just at this time, his 
expression 1s a stiff, his feet are down, and his eyebrows are fixed. 


Huacheng immediately noticed that it was wrong. In the next moment, 
people were praying for their side: "What happened?" 


The pity of resentment immediately returned to normal: "Nothing." 
It wasn't okay, only then, his heart hurt a little. 


Huacheng did not allow him to be sloppy. He came up and took his wrist 
and said, "Where have you been? Are you injured?" 


Thanks for your pity: "No." 


This is true, indeed, not. Although these days have been running, it 1s still 
smooth and there is no danger. Huacheng indulged for a moment, did not 
find anything, put down his hand. Thanks for your own interest, and I 
didn’t find anything. I thought it was an illusion. I laughed. "It may be that 
the ribs are twisted. Ok, let me see what happened to you today?" 


Huacheng’s appearance was a smile, and he took his hand and said, “Come 
here.” 


Xie pity still did not respond, suddenly, the heart hurt again. 


This is not an illusion! He clearly felt that if the first time was like the 
pain of being stuck by a needle, the second time was like the pain of being 
scratched by the sharp nails of something. If it wasn't for Huacheng, I just 
turned my face. I am afraid that this time, I can't use the "nothing" to 
perfuse me. 


For the time being, I don’t want to disturb the flower city. The two played 
for a while in Qianduan, and he found an excuse to go out and check it 
carefully. 


For a long while, he put his hand down and looked dignified. 


Of course, there is no problem at all. Otherwise, it will be detected when 
Huacheng seizes his hand. 


Then why is there no reason for heartache? 


Thinking for a moment, thank you for guessing what kind of evil was 
involved, or what was poisonous, but not panic, at least not now. After a 
while, I went to the birth of Huacheng. If there was an accident at this 
time, Huacheng certainly had no thoughts about this birth, and I was afraid 
to follow him to cure the wound. Xie pity often used to endure pain, and 
did not experience this strange thing, did not take it seriously, decided to 
go through this day and then talk about it, and then quietly solve it. 


In the evening, it is almost time to count, and thank you for returning to 
the thousand lights. Huacheng is still bored in the inside, pretending to 
graffiti, making waste paper, thanking the pity and forbearing Jun, but the 
smile has not yet surged, but also a heartache, and the heart 1s not useful, 
the heart said: "It seems This thing is a bit powerful, and I can bear it." 


He took a sigh of relief and went out. He said: "Sanlang? There is one 
thing, I am afraid you need a little help." 


Huacheng put down the pen and said: "What is busy?" 
Thanks for your pity: "Please close your eyes first." 


Huacheng picked up his eyebrows and asked not to ask. He closed his eyes. 
Thanks for holding his hands and laughing: "Go with me." 


This can be reversed with Junshan that night, Huacheng smiled and said: 
"Okay." 


Thanks for pulling his hands and slowly walking to the door, saying: "Be 
careful of the threshold." 


Huacheng did not know how long it took to watch this thousand lights. 
Naturally, he did not need to remind him how to go, but he waited for his 
voice to remind him to lift his boots. The silver chain on the boots was 
smashed, and the two men took the gate together and came to the long 
Street. 


After walking for a while, thank you: "Okay, blink." 


Huacheng is blind. For a moment, the dark eyes seemed to be lit by the 
bright lights, and they all lit up. 


On the long street, the lights are brighter than the past, and the street is 
clean and tidy. It seems that every household has tried hard to clean up, 
and the ragged clothes have been replaced with new ones. The flying horns 
are also shiny. A new look. The ghosts didn't know when they surrounded 
them, and they didn't dare to go out. Huacheng began to desperately blow 
and beat in a blink of an eye, screaming at the "owner's birthday, wow!" 
and screaming, "Hundred Years Good" and "Early Life" "You" is awkward. 


Seeing this bad effect, thank you for taking a shot on the forehead. They 
trained for a long time before they were clear, and they could barely shout, 
and they are still shouting! 


Huacheng face is expressionless, it seems that it is unmovable, only 
picking an eyebrow, said: "What are you doing? Noisy people." 


The group of ghosts have given up the training results and said: "Death 1s 
dead! Anyway, there is no one here!" 


Huacheng laughed and turned around and saw Xie Li standing behind him, 
his hands hidden behind his back, saying: "Sanlang, I heard that... is your 
birthday today?" 


Huacheng seems to have been waiting for a long time, holding his arm, 
looking at him, and smiling: "Well. Yes." 


Xie pity and a few coughs, suddenly jumped up, violently put the long life 
lock on his neck, said: "This ... made in a hurry, but also hope not to 
disappoint!" 


The long-lived lock has a pattern with his wristbands, maple leaves, 
butterflies, beasts, etc., exquisite and extremely, and contains a powerful 
spiritual power, at a glance, it is not a product. A group of ghosts 
screamed: "Absolutely! It's so good! What a baby!" 


"Ah! Only the city owner is worthy of this treasure! Only this treasure is 
worthy of the city!" 


They shouted arrogantly, made them laugh and laugh, and became more 
and more nervous. I don’t know if I should ask what Huacheng felt. 
Huacheng also said nothing, but the eyes were bright and the lips were 
smiling. Picking up the silver lock seemed to be open. 


Who knows, at this time, the change is sudden. 
Cheer, suddenly, his knees were soft and fell to the ground. 


This is really sudden, and the group of ghosts who were so cheerful and 
onlookers burst into exclamation. Huacheng smile was instantly hidden, 
and his eyes quickly caught him. He said, "Brother? What happened?" 


Xie pity turned pale, shook his head, barely smiled and said: "No..." 


The voice did not fall, and the throat was a glimpse. 


Oops, come again! 


The inexplicable heartache came again, and this time, the pain was 
unprecedented and fierce, as if the heart had been blown up. 


Xie pity screamed badly, I didn’t expect this pain to be so violent, but once 
again than once, I was born in this hair! 


He was still calm, but the pain continued, as if someone had waved a 
peach wedge and hammered it into his heart. Thanks for the pain and 
difficulty in breathing, the head must not be lifted, and the cold sweat on 
the forehead. Huacheng’s face changed completely: “His Royal 
Highness!!” 


He grabbed the pity, but still did not find anything, said: "His Royal 
Highness! Where did you go yesterday?!" 


All directions are also panic-stricken calls. Xie pity opened his mouth, 
however, as if something had pinned his throat, he couldn't even say 
anything. 


Huacheng will tremble with his arms. Looking at the beautiful face of 
Huacheng in the past, I was so angry that I was amazed by the frantic color 
of the frenzied, and thanked a heart as if it had been hammered, and finally 
could not support it, and fainted. 


Before he lost consciousness, he was full of "sorry." 
Today is the birth of Huacheng. 


I don't know how long it took, thanked me and woke up awkwardly, still 
not breathing a few breaths, staring blankly at the top of the zenith, 
confused and thought: "Here is... thousand lights view? What happened to 
me... fell asleep ?" 


He is still waking up slowly, and suddenly one hand holds him. The voice 
of the flower city is close at hand: "His Royal Highness?" 


Thanks for looking up, I saw the face of Huacheng, and the eyebrows were 
full of heart. He bowed and was about to speak, and there was another pain 
in his heart. 


This time he was completely awake, and the whole person curled up when 
he was on the road. The five fingers almost broke into the chest and skin, 
and the strength was as great as if he had to dig his heart. Huacheng 
immediately saw his wrist and said: "His Royal Highness!" 


If it weren't for him, he would have to leave five blood holes. At this 
moment, there was a voice on the side: "I don't look right, or else you let 
him go!" 


The feelings are even here. Huacheng Road: "If I let go, what should he do 
if he hurts himself?!" 


The voice of the wind letter immediately sounded: "I will hold it for you! 
Don't hurry to figure out what's going on, he can't stop it!" 


Thanks for bowing his body, feeling the other hand holding his wrist. 
Hearing this statement, the flower city movement was stagnation for a 
while, and he really let go of him. 


It is strange to say that when he let go of his pity, the pain really dissipated 
a lot. Thanks to the pity, he was able to move. When he turned over, he 
found that the wind and the feelings stood on the couch, probably called to 
help. And Huacheng stood not far away, staring at him intently. 


This look, thank you, it is easy to fade a little bit of pain and come back. 
Mu Qing sees his face changed again, to Huacheng Road: "Stand far! He 
seems to be close to you when you see you hurt!" 


Huacheng heard the words, his body was a stiff, his face was terrible and 

unspeakable, but he immediately flew out and was evacuated outside the 

house. And as soon as he disappeared in the sight of gratitude, the pity of 
the heart and the pain really stopped. 


The pain came and went, thanked the pity and was forced to go crazy, 
gasping, and hard to say: "This... in the end... what happened?" 


Admiration is still firmly with the wind letter, to prevent him from 
moving to see the flower city, said: "That will ask you! What are you 
going to do? Certainly get something!" 


Thanks to pity: "...1 checked, there is no evil in my body." 
Admired: "What strange place have you been in these days?" 


Thanks to the pity: "The only places I have been to these days are the 
Tonglushan, and the ... National Teacher's Tomb." 


Frugal frown, said: "What? National teacher tomb? What national tomb?" 


Flower City stood outside the house, but already understood, said: 
"Fangxin National Teacher's Tomb?" 


Thanks for your pity: "Yes. Saburo, you still come in..." 


The sound of the flower city came from the outside: "My brother is here to 
cultivate, so I will go and see." 


Xie pity immediately said: "I am going too!" However, he was together 
and immediately fell asleep. After the flower city was finished, there was 
no more sound, and I thought I had left. Thanks and pity, I want to barely 
climb up and admire: "I see you still have less turmoil, and the road will 
not go!" 


Xie Li was pressed by two people and four hands, still struggling, said: "It 
is not painless, it is used to pains and pains." He can not because of the 
pain, I will not see the flower city. 


Mourning but said: "You are willing to hurt, your Saburo is not willing." 


Thank you for your pity, think about what kind of look Huacheng was 
before he fainted, and then think about what it was like when he found out 
that he was close to him, and he was breathing, and his heart burst into 


tears. Immediately pale face. The wind and the feelings are staring at him. 
The wind is stunned: "Isn't the blood raining flowers gone? How is he still 
hurting?" 


The feelings are very keen, saying: "Have you thought about him in your 
mind?" 


Xie pity bite his teeth for a while, then he reluctantly said: "How... can't 
you think about it?" 


Admire the feelings: "Don't think about it. The more you want to get 
guilty, the more I want to sin. I can drink it with a glass of water." 


Xie Pian even shook his head and said that he had no strength, and he rose 
to get up and pour water. He closed his eyes and barely calmed his mind. 
But the calmer, the more worried. I don't know what the evil thing has 
found him. The two have not discovered the clues. The flower city alone 
went, he really can't worry. At this time, the feelings handed over the tea 
pot. 


The tea was white and elegant, and Huacheng used it the night before. 
Thinking of this festival, thankfulness is a burst of bloodless, lying flat. 
When I saw it, I knew that he didn't manage his mind. The tea in his hand 
couldn't be handed out. He said with a black face: "What do you want to 
think about him? Don't you die?!" 


Thanks to pity: "... Where can I control it?" If you can say that you don't 
want to be alone, you don't want to be alone. Many people in the world 
will not have troubles. 


Mourning feelings: "I see it just stunned him, saving him from being able 
to control his own brain." 


However, as a past attendant of the pity, the wind letter will never give 
thanks, of course, will not allow others to pray in front of him, and 
immediately said: "No! I see you still tell him more. Speak and shift his 
attention so that you don't want to think about it." 


Admire the feeling: "What can I say to him? What can he say that he can't 
think of blood and rain? Or stun it!" 


Wind channel: "I can't play anyway! So, I don't know how to think about 
anything else. I don't have time to keep it. I will come first, Shoubi 
Nanshan!" 


The feelings of admiration for this game, but still reluctantly received: 
"...the mountains are poor." 


Thanks for the pity, there is no way, and there is no way to take it: "...the 
evil purple wins Zhu..." 


As soon as the voice fell, he curled up again. The love is incredible: "How 
can you think of him? This is not a relationship at all!" 


Thanks for your pity: How is it irrelevant? Zhu, Zhu Xi, Zhu Yi, red. When 
I think of the red dress, how can he not want to go to the flower city? 


So tortured, he couldn't help it anymore, and he made a sigh of relief, and 
he would break away according to his two people, and he slammed down 
from the couch. Even if he was eager for the wind and the feelings, he was 
very explosive and secretly stayed behind, but he could not hold him. 
Seeing him break free, he quickly went to the system, but he was stunned 
by his palm. As soon as he looked up, he saw him escaping and escaping. 
"Where are you going? Don't run around!" 


Xie pity is almost reaching the limit, and two exquisite scorpions are 
found in the sleeves, and the bones are thrown out and stumbled into a 
door. 


Huacheng said that if he wants to see him, no matter what time he throws, 
he can see him. This pounce, thank you for not knowing where the 
scorpion took him, but this fall, he fell into a In the arms. The sound of 
Huacheng’s slight squeaking sounded above his head: "His Royal 
Highness!" 


Xie Li quickly hugged him in the backhand, for fear that he would 
disappear again, said: "Sanlang! You don't go alone, I... with you..." 


Huacheng seems to want to hug him immediately, but his arms are frozen 
in the air, and he stubbornly restrains himself. "Your Highness, go back, 
you will hurt a lot." 


Thankful, but biting his teeth, he held him tighter, and trembled: "The pain 
hurts!!!" 


Huacheng Road: "His Royal Highness!" 


Instead of sitting in other places and thinking about the flower city, it is 
better to hold the flower city and be killed. The more you hurt, the more 
you want to hold him tighter. Thanks for the fine sweat, and intermittently 
said: "When you wait for me, just let me go, I will be ready soon, I will get 
used to it soon. I can bear it. You are by my side, I am still hurting. I can 
bear it. If you go, it’s really... it’s so painful that you can’t stand it...” 


After listening to these few sentences, the flower city has been lingering 
for a long time, half a sigh, whispered: "His Royal Highness..." 


This sound is like a sigh, it seems to be more painful than thanking. Xie 
pity took the initiative to hold him, waiting for the hard pains of the past. 


Trying to calm down the breath, suddenly a voice came from behind: "Is 
this cast with your mask?" 


In dizziness, thank you for discovering that the place where they lived was 
a desolate and cemetery cemetery. It was the tomb of the national division 
that he had visited before. And they are still standing behind them, tall and 
tall, it is Lang Qianqiu. 


When he came over, he was already half unconscious, and naturally he did 
not notice the third person. At this point, I noticed that I was not ashamed. 
At this time, the wind and the love are also chasing. Mu Qingfang was 
only stunned by his palm, and the spur of the blue gluten seemed to never 


disappear. He said, "What are you running around! Two people can't hold 
you four hands! - This is again What a ghost place? A grave like!" 


Fengxin is also looking around, saying: "Is this a grave? It is still a tomb 
that has been manned. Is this the tomb of Fangxin Guoshi?" He saw Lang 
Qianqiu and said: "How is Taihua's Highness?" 


Lang Qianqiu's face is not so good, said: "I heard the change of the 
national teacher's tomb, I will take a look." 


Come and see, the result just happened to hit the flower city and thank 
you. He didn't know what he was thinking, he didn't have the mood to say 
hello and explain, stared at the pity, and asked again: "That is the long life 
lock you built with that silver mask? Did you come back the day before 
yesterday, put the mask? Take it away?" 


Hesitated for a while, thanked and nodded. 


In the past, he was a national teacher in Yongan, and he was covered with a 
silver mask all the year round. The mask itself is rare in silver, but it is 
forged by a half-pound silver demon. In addition to obscuring the face, the 
real effect is to rebound the spell and protect itself. After Fang Xinguo’s 
“death”, the mask was buried as a funerary object. 


Gifts, of course, are to send things that you will also cherish. Xie Pity 
racked his brains and finally remembered that he had had such a baby at 
the beginning. It was very useful and helped him several times. He loved 
the mask, but he did not take it away when he climbed out of the coffin. So 
he rushed to the tomb of Fangxinguo in the night, planed his grave, dug it 
out, melted it into silver water, and re-melted it. Long life body lock. 


Everyone is very surprised. After all, the tomb of the Fangxin National 
Teacher has never been worshipped, and the grass has grown a few feet 
high. If you don’t sweep the grave, you’ll forget it. You’ve also planed 
your own grave... No one can do this! 


Silently silenced for a moment, thanking and looking at Lang Qianqiu’s 
quirky look, explained: “The mask was not taken from your home, it was 


made by a silver demon that I used to conquer myself...” 


If it is the thing of the Yongan royal family, he will not want to use it as a 
raw material for the birthday ceremony of the flower city. He did not know 
that Lang Qianqiu was still paying attention to the tomb of Guoshi. He 
thought that Lang Qianqiu had buried him in the first place, otherwise he 
would at least fill in the soil that he had carved out, and he would not be 
surprised to see him. 


Lang Qianqiu stunned and immediately angered: "I haven't thought about 
this with you!" 


Huacheng glanced at him, his eyes were slightly cold, and Lang Qianqiu 
looked a glimpse. And thanking the silver lock, suddenly frowning, as if 
thinking of something. 


He met with Lang Qianqiu and found that he was also a general eye. 
Huacheng will not miss it, saying: "Brother? You have a clue? Is the 
problem in this long-life lock?" 


Thanks to the pity, I have a clue, guessing what is going on, but he does 
not know how to speak. Lang Qianqiu turned his face and opened his 
mouth. 


He said: "It is himself." 
Huacheng cold channel: "What do you mean?" 
Thank you for your help: "Qianqiu!" 


Lang Qianqiu looked at him, but he continued to say it. "After the golden 
banquet, I brought him here." 


Thanks, "Don't say it." 


Lang Qianqiu looked at him and closed his mouth. He probably didn't 
know what to say next. But he does not say that others can continue. 


After the golden feast, Yongan Taizi Lang Qianqi lived in Fangxin Guoshi, 
for revenge, and died in the coffin, sealed in the wilderness, and did not 
allow anyone to worship. Of course, no one would have worshipped the 
mourning. 


At that time, after being pierced by the mahogany, the blood that flowed 
out of the heart of the pity, dyed the silver mask that was used as a 
funerary. The demon of the silver demon preserved the blood and made it 
out of praying for the body, still not dead. On the day before, she returned 
to plan to pave her own grave, took a mask and cast a long life lock, and 
the blood was awakened by him, and she took the opportunity to return to 
his body. 


It is no wonder that Huacheng and his own exploration did not detect any 
abnormalities. Just because the original of the blame is the thing in his 
body, it is his own blood, of course, can not find abnormal! 


Huacheng moved slightly, thanked him for not seeing his expression, and 
kept pressing him: "Sanlang!" 


Lang Qianqiu killed him. It was originally for revenge. The old king of 
Yongan was indeed dead in his hands. He was nailed to the coffin by a few 
nails. Thanks for a few breaths, my heart was a sharp pain, I couldn’t help 
but scream. As a result, Huacheng Metyu was dyed with a burning color, 
saying: "His Royal Highness?" 


Lang Qianqiu hesitated for a moment, seeing Xie pity face white like 
paper, said: "I... want me to help?" 


Xie Li knows what his temper will think, busy: "Nothing is ok, I will not 
need your help. It is not your business, it is not your problem. I am not 
careful. You can leave it alone." 


Mu Qing also feels that the hard-working and murderer Lang Qianqiu is 
really embarrassed on this occasion. "Yes, you don't need to take care of 


him under the Taihua Highness. Go back." 


For a moment, Lang Qianqiu said: "Okay." 


But although he said it well, he still did not leave. Everyone can't take care 
of it, because thank you and hurts to roll. He was so painful that he had to 
roll and he still had to hug the flower city. He refused to let go, and 
Huacheng looked at him like this, and it was almost like two days. The 
imperial ghost king of the Three Realms smells the wind, but he can't help 
him. Wind channel: "First solve this problem!...His Royal Highness? What 
happened to you??" 


Thanks to the pity, he was still struggling. After the sound of "Kai", he 
suddenly calmed down and lie in the arms of Huacheng with his head and 
cold sweat. He did not move. 


Huacheng forced him back and whispered: "Your Highness, well. No pain." 


The crowd found out that he had a broken silver powder in his hand. The 
long-life lock that he originally cherished in his heart disappeared. 


As long as the long-lived lock is ruined, thankful that it will be calmed 
down by the blood of the scorpion that is contaminated by it. So he took 
the long life lock, and with a light grip, it broke. 


Thanks for the calmness of the breathing, one side of the first, I saw the 
stars flowing out of the fingers of the city, a little silver, and then greet the 
eyes of the flower city. I don't know why, but it is a slight heartache. 


He muttered: "Well... it doesn't hurt." 

Finally solved the curse, thank you for saying goodbye to the wind, the 
love, Lang Qianqiu, etc., together with the flower city, slowly go back in 
the direction of the ghost city. 

The two men side by side, thank you for your face all the way is hot. 

This must be blamed for the wind and the feelings. 

Before a few people parted ways, the wind letter wiped the sweat, or could 


not help but ask: "So why is the **** rain and flowers in the temple? How 
is his apex blood? Don't let him be better?" 


Thank you for knowing what happened, and when he asked him, he said, 
"Do not delve into this!" 


Fengxin wondered: "Why don't you go deeper? Otherwise, what should I 
do next time? Always check it out." 


Mu Qing said: "You can't figure it out? The blood has flowed out of his 
body for too many years. After returning, he still doesn't adapt. He must be 
awkward. If his heart is like water, the ancient well has nothing to do..." 


However, if he is uneasy and has a heart in his heart, then the blood will be 
stirred, and he will be painful, and then he will relive the pain of the first 
time. 


Xie Li did not dare to look at the expression of Huacheng at that time. He 
only felt that the face of this life had to be lost in front of Huacheng. 


This means that it means that as soon as he sees and thinks about the 
flower city, he can't help but feel the heart, so he will hurt! 


Thinking of this, thank you for a heart and mad. Fortunately, now, even if 
his heart beats faster, it will not hurt. 


Suddenly, the silent city of Huacheng Road: "His Royal Highness." 
Cheering immediately said: "What?" 

Huacheng Road: "How long have you been in the tomb?" 

Thank you for your pity, saying: "I can't remember." 

Anyway, it’s been a long time, and I don’t want to count it for a long time. 
Pain, hunger, blood loss, hallucinations. At first, I couldn't help but regret 
it. I couldn't help but regret it. I tried to break through, but I finally let 


myself fall into the boundless darkness. 


It doesn't seem like a pain that will never be super-existent when there is 
no sword. But it is a dull pain that never ends. 


He sighed. Huacheng immediately said: "What happened to His Royal 
Highness? Is it still hurting?" 


Xie pity shook his head. For a long while, he sighed: "Sanlang, I am sorry." 
Huacheng strangely said: "Why do you say sorry to me?" 


For a while, thank you: "Today is clearly your birth, I wanted to give you a 
good time, but I have tossed it for a day, I want to curse." 


Originally, he also intended to endure at least the end of the birth, but still 
could not hold back. 


Thanks to the pity: "Even the birthday gift that was given to you, because 
it was to help me curse and destroy." 


Moreover, it is still Huacheng crushed by hand. Thanks for thinking from 
beginning to end, I feel that today is nothing but a frustration. 


Huacheng softly said: "His Royal Highness." 


He paused and said: "You have sent me a birthday gift, I have already 
received it." 


Thank you for a moment: "What did I send you?" 
Don't say anything, you are the best gift, it will make him more shy. 


Huacheng stared at him and whispered: "Your Highness said, even if it 
hurts, I want to see me. Even if it hurts, I don't want to leave." 


Huacheng Road: "I am very happy." 


I remembered that when I was holding the flower city, I said that I was a 
miserable appearance. She thanked me with a soft cough and wanted to 
pretend to cover her face naturally. Huacheng suddenly pulled him and 
forced him into his arms. 


Thanks for a pity, against his slightly shaking chest, he heard his deep 
voice. 


Huacheng Road: "Really. I am very happy." 
I am also very happy. Thank you very much. 


In the long years of a hundred years, even if it hurts again, Huacheng never 
thought about giving up on him. 


It is the most happy to find this pity. 


Huacheng Road: "Just because I am very happy, I never want you to endure 
that kind of pain." 


The two returned to the ghost market, and the group was stunned for a day. 
When they saw the two returning safely, they immediately turned from the 
chicken-flying dog to the boiling horse to boil. Huacheng 1s still too lazy 
to take care of a word, and enters the thousand lights together with Xie. 
But when the two entered, they found that there was a lot of things in the 
view. Huacheng Road: "Who put it in?" 


Thank you for taking a look at it and saying: "Hey? It seems to be a gift 
box? This is the rainman's adult. It's a good fresh dish... Is this the 
windman's adult?... This must be the general... ... " 


He counted it and smiled and said: "Sanlang! This is the birthday gift for 
you to the Lord Ghost." 


In the past few days, he asked everywhere about what he was going to 
give, but he didn’t say who he was going to send, but he was probably 
guessed. 


Huacheng has no interest in these, saying: "All are thrown out. Take the 
place." 


Seeing that he really intends to send someone to lose, thank you for your 
help: "That's still not to be. Well, it's also a wish... Wait, why is this, who 
sent it?" Xie Li actually saw it. Mixed in a pile of serious gifts in the gift | 


love | medicine and de | son | pill, crying and laughing, hot potato is 
generally thrown aside. Huacheng seems to be interested in these things, 
pick it up and look at it: "What?" 


Xie pity quickly stopped him: "Not a good thing! Don't look!" 


In the end, Xie pity tangled, but also gave the belt that he personally made 
to Huacheng, to replace the long life lock. 


Huacheng looked at it and smiled almost out of breath - although the ghost 
didn't have to gasp, in short, he kissed him for a while, always praised 
him, praised pity and shame, and put himself in bed. The next day, 
Huacheng really put on it, and the look was always ready to go out. Thanks 
for the pity, I almost didn't faint. I immediately rushed down and asked for 
a long time. Huacheng reluctantly promised him to use it in reverse, 
without embroidering. The side of the pattern shows the crowd. In this 
way, Xie Pity avoids the fate of his craft being publicly ashamed. 


As for the fact that Huacheng was too big for the day, it was known that 
the heavens and the earth knew that the pity had fainted in the day of his 
birth, which led to the clearing of the ins and outs. Turning it upside down 
and dying, this is what you have to say. 2k novel reading network 